Ohio, session 136, HB96.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 101.01. That sections 3.15, 9.03, 9.07, 9.239, 9.24, 9.27, 9.28, 9.312, 9.331, 9.334, 9.35, 9.67, 9.681, 9.821, 101.30, 101.352, 101.53, 101.63, 101.65, 101.82, 101.83, 101.84, 102.02, 103.05, 103.051, 103.13, 103.65, 106.02, 106.021, 106.023, 106.024, 106.031, 107.03, 107.032, 107.033, 107.12, 109.02, 109.71, 109.73, 109.77, 109.803, 111.15, 111.27, 113.05, 113.13, 113.40, 113.51, 113.53, 113.78, 117.11, 117.38, 117.44, 117.56, 119.03, 119.04, 120.06, 120.08, 121.02, 121.03, 121.085, 121.22, 121.35, 121.36, 121.37, 121.93, 121.931, 121.95, 121.951, 121.953, 122.09, 122.14, 122.175, 122.1710, 122.41, 122.42, 122.47, 122.49, 122.53, 122.571, 122.59, 122.631, 122.632, 122.633, 122.6510, 122.6511, 122.6512, 122.66, 122.67, 122.68, 122.681, 122.69, 122.70, 122.701, 122.702, 122.84, 122.85, 122.86, 123.10, 123.28, 123.281, 124.02, 124.07, 124.135, 124.1310, 124.1312, 124.152, 124.385, 125.01, 125.041, 125.071, 125.11, 125.111, 125.13, 125.183, 125.31, 125.42, 125.58, 125.95, 126.24, 126.42, 126.60, 126.62, 127.12, 127.13, 127.16, 128.021, 128.41, 128.46, 128.54, 131.01, 131.02, 131.35, 131.43, 131.50, 131.51, 133.18, 135.01, 135.03, 135.143, 135.18, 135.35, 135.70, 135.71, 141.04, 145.012, 145.054, 145.055, 145.09, 145.091, 145.99, 148.01, 148.02, 148.04, 148.041, 148.042, 148.05, 148.10, 149.011, 149.10, 149.30, 149.3010, 149.311, 149.38, 149.43, 153.01, 153.07, 153.08, 153.09, 153.12, 153.13, 153.14, 153.501, 153.502, 153.54, 153.59, 153.63, 153.693, 155.33, 155.34, 163.01, 164.01, 164.05, 164.06, 164.08, 164.14, 165.04, 166.01, 166.02, 166.03, 166.08, 166.12, 166.17, 169.01, 169.05, 169.08, 169.13, 173.38, 173.381, 173.391, 173.50, 173.525, 175.16, 175.17, 303.12, 305.021, 305.03, 306.32, 306.322, 306.43, 307.05, 307.673, 307.696, 307.697, 307.86, 307.985, 308.13, 311.14, 317.20, 319.04, 319.202, 319.301, 319.302, 321.03, 323.131, 323.152, 323.153, 323.155, 323.156, 323.158, 323.611, 325.18, 325.25, 340.01, 340.011, 340.02, 340.021, 340.022, 340.03, 340.032, 340.034, 340.036, 340.037, 340.04, 340.041, 340.05, 340.07, 340.08, 340.09, 340.12, 340.13, 340.16, 345.01, 345.03, 345.04, 349.01, 355.04, 501.09, 501.11, 504.14, 505.24, 505.37, 505.48, 505.481, 507.09, 507.12, 511.28, 511.34, 513.18, 519.12, 523.06, 703.331, 703.34, 717.051, 718.01, 718.031, 718.05, 718.12, 718.13, 718.19, 718.85, 718.88, 718.90, 718.91, 731.14, 731.141, 731.29, 733.81, 735.05, 742.043, 742.044, 742.99, 749.31, 755.181, 901.43, 904.02, 904.04, 905.32, 905.57, 907.13, 907.14, 909.01, 909.02, 909.07, 909.08, 909.09, 909.13, 911.02, 913.23, 915.16, 915.24, 921.01, 921.02, 921.06, 921.09, 921.11, 921.12, 921.13, 921.14, 921.16, 921.23, 921.24, 923.42, 923.44, 923.51, 924.01, 924.30, 924.51, 927.53, 928.02, 928.03, 928.04, 935.06, 935.07, 935.09, 935.10, 935.16, 935.17, 935.20, 935.24, 943.04, 943.16, 943.26, 943.99, 956.07, 956.10, 956.13, 956.16, 956.18, 956.21, 956.22, 956.23, 1311.04, 1311.252, 1317.05, 1317.06, 1321.21, 1347.08, 1509.02, 1509.07, 1509.071, 1509.13, 1509.36, 1509.38, 1517.11, 1531.01, 1533.10, 1533.11, 1533.111, 1533.13, 1533.131, 1533.32, 1545.041, 1545.21, 1546.04, 1547.54, 1548.06, 1561.13, 1561.16, 1561.23, 1561.46, 1561.48, 1701.04, 1701.07, 1703.041, 1707.01, 1707.14, 1707.47, 1711.30, 1713.03, 1901.123, 1901.26, 1907.143, 1907.24, 2101.11, 2101.16, 2108.34, 2151.27, 2151.311, 2151.316, 2151.356, 2151.3527, 2151.416, 2151.4115, 2151.421, 2151.423, 2151.424, 2151.45, 2151.451, 2151.452, 2151.453, 2152.26, 2303.12, 2303.201, 2303.26, 2307.66, 2329.66, 2501.16, 2743.03, 2907.15, 2913.401, 2915.01, 2917.211, 2919.171, 2919.19, 2921.13, 2921.36, 2921.41, 2925.14, 2933.32, 2949.12, 2951.041, 2953.32, 2967.14, 2967.18, 2967.26, 2967.271, 2967.28, 2969.13, 2981.02, 3101.08, 3105.171, 3105.63, 3107.01, 3107.012, 3107.031, 3107.033, 3107.034, 3107.062, 3107.063, 3107.064, 3107.065, 3107.38, 3107.391, 3109.14, 3109.171, 3109.172, 3109.173, 3109.178, 3115.201, 3119.01, 3121.441, 3123.89, 3123.90, 3301.01, 3301.02, 3301.03, 3301.06, 3301.071, 3301.074, 3301.079, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0723, 3301.0727, 3301.136, 3301.17, 3301.541, 3301.57, 3302.03, 3302.034, 3302.20, 3302.42, 3305.05, 3305.053, 3307.044, 3307.05, 3307.06, 3307.07, 3307.073, 3307.074, 3307.10, 3307.11, 3307.27, 3307.99, 3309.073, 3309.074, 3309.47, 3309.99, 3310.033, 3310.41, 3310.51, 3310.52, 3310.58, 3310.64, 3311.053, 3311.50, 3313.27, 3313.413, 3313.46, 3313.489, 3313.5313, 3313.603, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6013, 3313.6022, 3313.6028, 3313.618, 3313.6113, 3313.6114, 3313.64, 3313.753, 3313.90, 3313.975, 3313.98, 3314.011, 3314.013, 3314.015, 3314.016, 3314.017, 3314.02, 3314.021, 3314.03, 3314.034, 3314.038, 3314.05, 3314.07, 3314.08, 3314.19, 3314.191, 3314.261, 3314.29, 3314.35, 3314.351, 3314.36, 3314.361, 3314.381, 3314.382, 3315.18, 3315.181, 3316.031, 3316.041, 3316.043, 3316.06, 3316.08, 3316.16, 3317.01, 3317.011, 3317.012, 3317.014, 3317.016, 3317.017, 3317.018, 3317.019, 3317.0110, 3317.02, 3317.021, 3317.022, 3317.024, 3317.026, 3317.0212, 3317.0213, 3317.0215, 3317.0217, 3317.03, 3317.035, 3317.051, 3317.06, 3317.11, 3317.16, 3317.161, 3317.162, 3317.163, 3317.20, 3317.201, 3317.22, 3317.25, 3318.01, 3318.032, 3318.051, 3318.06, 3318.061, 3318.062, 3318.063, 3318.12, 3318.361, 3318.40, 3318.45, 3318.48, 3319.073, 3319.088, 3319.111, 3319.223, 3319.236, 3319.263, 3319.29, 3319.301, 3319.311, 3319.51, 3320.04, 3321.16, 3321.19, 3321.22, 3323.32, 3325.08, 3325.16, 3325.17, 3326.11, 3326.44, 3326.51, 3327.017, 3327.08, 3327.10, 3328.16, 3328.24, 3332.081, 3333.04, 3333.041, 3333.129, 3333.13, 3333.131, 3333.132, 3333.133, 3333.134, 3333.135, 3333.164, 3333.24, 3333.374, 3334.11, 3335.39, 3339.06, 3344.07, 3345.06, 3345.382, 3345.48, 3345.591, 3345.71, 3345.74, 3345.75, 3352.16, 3354.19, 3358.08, 3358.11, 3364.07, 3365.15, 3375.15, 3375.22, 3375.30, 3375.39, 3375.92, 3379.03, 3379.12, 3381.03, 3381.11, 3381.17, 3501.01, 3501.02, 3501.05, 3501.12, 3501.17, 3501.28, 3505.03, 3505.04, 3505.06, 3505.33, 3505.38, 3513.04, 3513.05, 3513.052, 3513.10, 3513.19, 3517.01, 3517.08, 3517.081, 3517.092, 3517.10, 3517.102, 3517.103, 3517.104, 3517.108, 3517.109, 3517.1012, 3517.11, 3517.121, 3517.13, 3517.152, 3517.153, 3517.154, 3517.155, 3517.157, 3517.20, 3517.21, 3517.22, 3517.23, 3517.992, 3517.993, 3701.021, 3701.033, 3701.045, 3701.511, 3701.65, 3701.79, 3701.841, 3704.01, 3704.03, 3704.031, 3704.09, 3704.111, 3704.14, 3705.126, 3705.16, 3705.17, 3706.01, 3709.15, 3715.021, 3717.071, 3718.02, 3718.04, 3719.04, 3721.32, 3728.01, 3734.021, 3734.05, 3734.57, 3734.79, 3734.901, 3734.904, 3734.907, 3735.67, 3735.671, 3737.83, 3738.01, 3738.03, 3738.04, 3738.06, 3738.08, 3738.09, 3742.32, 3742.50, 3743.04, 3743.06, 3743.17, 3743.19, 3743.25, 3743.60, 3743.61, 3743.63, 3743.65, 3745.11, 3745.21, 3748.13, 3750.02, 3769.088, 3770.071, 3770.072, 3770.073, 3770.10, 3770.12, 3770.121, 3770.13, 3770.25, 3772.02, 3775.16, 3780.02, 3780.03, 3780.06, 3780.10, 3780.24, 3780.26, 3780.30, 3781.10, 3781.102, 3781.1011, 3901.90, 3902.70, 3905.426, 3905.72, 3923.443, 3951.03, 3959.01, 3959.111, 4112.055, 4117.08, 4117.10, 4141.01, 4141.02, 4141.162, 4141.23, 4141.281, 4141.29, 4141.33, 4141.56, 4141.60, 4301.12, 4301.19, 4301.30, 4301.421, 4303.181, 4303.183, 4303.204, 4303.2011, 4303.233, 4305.131, 4501.027, 4501.21, 4501.29, 4501.30, 4501.302, 4503.038, 4503.06, 4503.0610, 4503.0611, 4503.10, 4503.102, 4503.29, 4503.41, 4503.579, 4503.91, 4505.07, 4505.09, 4506.01, 4506.05, 4506.07, 4506.13, 4506.131, 4506.14, 4507.061, 4507.08, 4507.09, 4507.21, 4507.40, 4507.53, 4508.02, 4509.06, 4509.07, 4509.101, 4509.70, 4511.01, 4511.75, 4511.76, 4511.77, 4511.771, 4511.78, 4517.01, 4517.52, 4517.60, 4519.59, 4582.024, 4582.26, 4701.01, 4701.04, 4701.16, 4707.024, 4723.28, 4723.483, 4723.4811, 4725.48, 4729.01, 4729.49, 4729.52, 4729.53, 4729.54, 4729.541, 4729.56, 4729.561, 4729.60, 4729.80, 4729.901, 4729.902, 4729.921, 4730.25, 4730.433, 4730.437, 4730.99, 4731.22, 4731.2210, 4731.92, 4731.96, 4731.99, 4735.01, 4735.06, 4735.09, 4735.55, 4735.56, 4735.80, 4740.06, 4741.04, 4743.05, 4743.10, 4749.01, 4751.20, 4751.24, 4751.25, 4758.01, 4758.02, 4758.03, 4758.10, 4758.13, 4758.20, 4758.22, 4758.221, 4758.23, 4758.24, 4758.27, 4758.30, 4758.31, 4758.35, 4758.36, 4758.39, 4758.40, 4758.41, 4758.42, 4758.43, 4758.44, 4758.45, 4758.52, 4758.54, 4758.55, 4758.56, 4758.57, 4758.59, 4758.99, 4759.07, 4759.99, 4760.13, 4760.99, 4761.09, 4761.99, 4762.13, 4762.99, 4765.11, 4765.55, 4767.10, 4772.20, 4772.21, 4772.23, 4772.99, 4774.13, 4774.99, 4778.14, 4778.99, 4785.041, 4903.10, 4905.311, 4906.07, 4911.18, 4921.01, 4923.01, 4927.01, 4928.05, 4928.06, 4928.102, 4928.34, 4928.43, 4928.51, 4928.52, 4928.53, 4928.54, 4928.542, 4928.543, 4928.544, 4928.55, 4928.56, 4928.58, 4928.61, 4928.62, 4928.63, 4928.66, 4928.75, 4928.86, 4981.02, 5101.101, 5101.13, 5101.131, 5101.132, 5101.133, 5101.134, 5101.135, 5101.136, 5101.137, 5101.14, 5101.141, 5101.142, 5101.145, 5101.146, 5101.1410, 5101.1411, 5101.1412, 5101.1413, 5101.1414, 5101.1415, 5101.1416, 5101.1417, 5101.1418, 5101.19, 5101.191, 5101.192, 5101.193, 5101.194, 5101.211, 5101.212, 5101.215, 5101.222, 5101.242, 5101.26, 5101.272, 5101.273, 5101.28, 5101.30, 5101.33, 5101.342, 5101.35, 5101.351, 5101.38, 5101.461, 5101.542, 5101.80, 5101.801, 5101.802, 5101.805, 5101.85, 5101.853, 5101.854, 5101.856, 5101.88, 5101.885, 5101.886, 5101.887, 5101.8812, 5101.89, 5101.891, 5101.892, 5101.893, 5101.894, 5101.895, 5101.897, 5101.899, 5101.98, 5101.99, 5103.02, 5103.021, 5103.0329, 5103.15, 5103.155, 5103.18, 5103.30, 5103.32, 5103.41, 5104.01, 5104.12, 5104.29, 5104.30, 5104.32, 5104.34, 5104.36, 5104.37, 5104.38, 5104.41, 5104.50, 5104.99, 5117.07, 5117.12, 5119.01, 5119.011, 5119.04, 5119.05, 5119.051, 5119.06, 5119.07, 5119.08, 5119.091, 5119.10, 5119.11, 5119.14, 5119.141, 5119.15, 5119.161, 5119.17, 5119.18, 5119.181, 5119.182, 5119.184, 5119.185, 5119.186, 5119.187, 5119.188, 5119.19, 5119.20, 5119.201, 5119.21, 5119.22, 5119.221, 5119.23, 5119.24, 5119.25, 5119.27, 5119.28, 5119.29, 5119.30, 5119.31, 5119.311, 5119.32, 5119.33, 5119.331, 5119.332, 5119.333, 5119.334, 5119.34, 5119.342, 5119.343, 5119.35, 5119.36, 5119.362, 5119.363, 5119.364, 5119.365, 5119.366, 5119.367, 5119.368, 5119.37, 5119.371, 5119.38, 5119.39, 5119.391, 5119.392, 5119.393, 5119.394, 5119.395, 5119.397, 5119.40, 5119.41, 5119.42, 5119.421, 5119.43, 5119.431, 5119.44, 5119.45, 5119.46, 5119.47, 5119.48, 5119.49, 5119.50, 5119.51, 5119.52, 5119.54, 5119.55, 5119.56, 5119.60, 5119.61, 5119.71, 5119.82, 5119.85, 5119.89, 5119.90, 5119.99, 5120.034, 5120.035, 5120.16, 5120.173, 5120.21, 5120.51, 5121.30, 5121.32, 5121.33, 5121.34, 5121.41, 5121.43, 5122.01, 5122.03, 5122.10, 5122.15, 5122.20, 5122.21, 5122.23, 5122.26, 5122.27, 5122.31, 5122.32, 5122.33, 5122.341, 5122.36, 5122.44, 5122.45, 5122.46, 5122.47, 5123.081, 5123.16, 5123.168, 5123.169, 5123.191, 5123.41, 5123.42, 5123.47, 5124.15, 5139.05, 5139.08, 5139.12, 5139.14, 5139.34, 5145.162, 5153.10, 5153.122, 5153.16, 5153.163, 5160.37, 5162.13, 5162.132, 5162.133, 5162.134, 5162.136, 5162.1310, 5162.70, 5162.82, 5163.03, 5163.091, 5163.093, 5163.094, 5163.098, 5163.30, 5163.33, 5165.19, 5165.192, 5165.26, 5166.03, 5167.01, 5167.03, 5167.123, 5167.24, 5168.08, 5168.11, 5168.22, 5168.25, 5168.90, 5180.14, 5180.17, 5180.20, 5180.21, 5180.22, 5310.06, 5310.47, 5323.02, 5501.91, 5502.262, 5502.29, 5502.30, 5502.41, 5503.02, 5505.045, 5505.046, 5505.99, 5525.03, 5537.01, 5537.02, 5537.03, 5537.27, 5540.02, 5595.02, 5701.11, 5703.052, 5703.19, 5703.21, 5703.37, 5703.70, 5705.01, 5705.03, 5705.12, 5705.121, 5705.13, 5705.131, 5705.132, 5705.14, 5705.194, 5705.199, 5705.21, 5705.212, 5705.213, 5705.215, 5705.217, 5705.218, 5705.219, 5705.2111, 5705.2114, 5705.221, 5705.222, 5705.233, 5705.25, 5705.251, 5705.261, 5705.27, 5705.28, 5705.29, 5705.30, 5705.31, 5705.314, 5705.32, 5705.321, 5705.35, 5705.36, 5705.37, 5705.38, 5705.391, 5705.40, 5705.412, 5705.55, 5709.081, 5709.212, 5709.92, 5709.93, 5715.19, 5717.01, 5725.01, 5725.23, 5725.35, 5725.38, 5726.03, 5726.20, 5726.61, 5726.98, 5727.111, 5727.26, 5727.38, 5727.42, 5727.47, 5727.48, 5727.89, 5728.10, 5729.10, 5729.18, 5729.21, 5735.12, 5736.09, 5739.01, 5739.011, 5739.02, 5739.03, 5739.07, 5739.09, 5739.092, 5739.101, 5739.12, 5739.13, 5739.132, 5739.31, 5743.021, 5743.024, 5743.081, 5743.323, 5743.52, 5743.54, 5743.55, 5743.56, 5743.57, 5743.59, 5743.60, 5743.62, 5743.63, 5743.64, 5745.03, 5745.04, 5745.09, 5745.12, 5747.01, 5747.02, 5747.021, 5747.025, 5747.05, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.07, 5747.071, 5747.08, 5747.09, 5747.10, 5747.13, 5747.38, 5747.39, 5747.40, 5747.43, 5747.502, 5747.51, 5747.72, 5747.85, 5747.86, 5747.98, 5748.01, 5748.02, 5748.021, 5748.03, 5748.04, 5748.08, 5748.081, 5748.09, 5749.02, 5749.07, 5751.02, 5751.09, 5751.53, 5751.98, 5753.031, 5753.07, 5907.11, 5907.17, 5923.30, 6101.53, 6101.54, 6101.55, 6111.01, and 6111.04 be amended; sections 103.412 (103.411), 103.414 (103.412), 103.73 (109.39), 122.66 (5101.311), 122.67 (5101.312), 122.68 (5101.313), 122.681 (5101.314), 122.69 (5101.315), 122.70 (5101.316), 122.701 (5101.317), 122.702 (5101.318), 3517.152 (3517.14), 3517.153 (3517.15), 3517.154 (3517.16), 3517.155 (3517.17), 3517.157 (3517.18), 3517.992 (3517.99), 3517.993 (3517.171), 3701.65 (5180.72), 3738.01 (5180.27), 3738.02 (5180.271), 3738.03 (5180.272), 3738.04 (5180.273), 3738.05 (5180.274), 3738.06 (5180.275), 3738.07 (5180.276), 3738.08 (5180.277), 3738.09 (5180.278), 5101.13 (5180.40), 5101.131 (5180.401), 5101.132 (5180.402), 5101.133 (5180.403), 5101.134 (5180.404), 5101.135 (5180.405), 5101.136 (5180.406), 5101.137 (5180.407), 5101.14 (5180.41), 5101.141 (5180.42), 5101.142 (5180.421), 5101.144 (5180.411), 5101.145 (5180.422), 5101.146 (5180.423), 5101.147 (5180.424), 5101.148 (5180.425), 5101.149 (5180.426), 5101.1410 (5180.427), 5101.1411 (5180.428), 5101.1412 (5180.429), 5101.1413 (5180.4210), 5101.1414 (5180.4211), 5101.1415 (5180.4212), 5101.1416 (5180.4213), 5101.1417 (5180.4214), 5101.1418 (5180.43), 5101.15 (5180.44), 5101.19 (5180.45), 5101.191 (5180.451), 5101.192 (5180.452), 5101.193 (5180.453), 5101.194 (5180.454), 5101.34 (5180.70), 5101.341 (5180.701), 5101.342 (5180.702), 5101.343 (5180.703), 5101.76 (5180.26), 5101.77 (5180.261), 5101.78 (5180.262), 5101.802 (5180.52), 5101.804 (5180.71), 5101.805 (5180.704), 5101.85 (5180.50), 5101.851 (5180.51), 5101.853 (5180.511), 5101.854 (5180.512), 5101.855 (5180.513), 5101.856 (5180.514), 5101.88 (5180.53), 5101.881 (5180.531), 5101.884 (5180.532), 5101.885 (5180.533), 5101.886 (5180.534), 5101.887 (5180.535), 5101.889 (5180.57), 5101.8811 (5180.536), 5101.8812 (5180.56), 5104.50 (5180.04), and 5180.40 (5180.73) be amended for the purpose of adopting new section numbers as indicated in parentheses; and new sections 103.41, 107.034, 3313.902, 3313.905, 3314.38, 3321.191, 3333.0415, 3345.86, 3517.991, and 3780.22 and sections 5.62, 9.05, 9.561, 9.64, 9.691, 106.025, 106.026, 106.033, 111.29, 118.29, 121.16, 122.1712, 122.1713, 122.636, 122.97, 122.98, 122.981, 123.14, 123.282, 123.283, 123.30, 124.184, 125.052, 126.024, 126.10, 126.17, 126.67, 131.026, 135.1411, 148.021, 173.503, 319.304, 731.291, 924.212, 943.27, 1310.251, 1349.10, 1349.101, 1501.022, 1501.023, 1501.46, 1501.47, 1509.075, 1513.371, 1546.25, 1546.26, 1713.032, 1713.033, 1713.041, 3301.24, 3301.82, 3310.037, 3310.21, 3310.22, 3310.23, 3310.24, 3310.25, 3310.26, 3310.412, 3310.413, 3310.523, 3311.242, 3313.536, 3313.6031, 3313.6032, 3313.7118, 3314.093, 3314.362, 3315.063, 3317.165, 3317.27, 3317.28, 3317.29, 3317.31, 3319.173, 3319.2310, 3321.043, 3332.17, 3332.21, 3332.22, 3333.0420, 3333.053, 3333.074, 3333.1210, 3333.952, 3333.96, 3333.97, 3345.457, 3345.58, 3345.601, 3345.721, 3345.83, 3345.89, 3375.47, 3501.055, 3701.88, 3704.0310, 3707.61, 3721.074, 3722.15, 3727.46, 3743.48, 3770.074, 3770.075, 3780.37, 3901.047, 3901.3815, 3902.631, 3959.121, 4113.31, 4141.011, 4141.08, 4517.521, 4561.03, 4582.72, 4582.73, 4729.261, 4731.256, 4741.041, 4927.22, 4928.545, 5101.042, 5101.543, 5101.548, 5101.549, 5101.612, 5101.95, 5103.039, 5103.0520, 5103.09, 5104.302, 5104.53, 5104.54, 5104.60, 5119.211, 5119.344, 5119.345, 5123.1613, 5123.423, 5126.222, 5145.32, 5162.08, 5162.14, 5162.25, 5162.251, 5163.04, 5163.104, 5163.11, 5163.50, 5164.093, 5166.50, 5167.09, 5180.705, 5180.706, 5180.707, 5180.99, 5303.34, 5703.83, 5705.17, 5705.316, 5705.60, 5709.89, 5726.62, 5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, 5743.631, 5747.073, 5747.124, and 5747.87 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3.15. (A) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section, at all times during one's term of office: (1) Each member of the general assembly and each elected voting member of the state board of education shall be a resident of the district the member represents. (2) Each judge and each elected officer of a court shall be a resident of the territory of that court. (3) Each person holding an elective office of a political subdivision shall be a resident of that political subdivision. (4) Each member of a municipal legislative authority who represents a ward shall be a resident of the ward the member represents, and each member of a board of education of a city school district who represents a subdistrict shall be a resident of the subdistrict the member represents. (B) Any person who fails to meet any of the requirements of division (A) of this section that apply to the person shall forfeit the office. Division (A) of this section applies to persons who have been either elected or appointed to an elective office. Division (A) of this section does not apply to a member of the general assembly or the state board of education, to a member of a municipal legislative authority who represents a ward, or to a member of a board of education of a city school district who represents a subdistrict, during the remainder of the member's existing term of office after there is a change in the member's district's, ward's, or subdistrict's boundaries that leaves the member's permanent residence outside the district, ward, or subdistrict. Sec. 5.62. (A) The month of June is designated as "Responsible Fatherhood Month" to recognize the importance of fathers in their children's lives, how fathers contribute to their children's safety and stability, and the direct link between positive father involvement and child well-being. (B) The department of children and youth, local governments, and other agencies are encouraged to sponsor events to promote awareness of responsible fatherhood engagement and the contributions fathers make in the lives of their children. Sec. 9.03. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Political subdivision" means any body corporate and politic, except a municipal corporation that has adopted a charter under Section 7 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, and except a county that has adopted a charter under Sections 3 and 4 of Article X, Ohio Constitution, to which both of the following apply: (a) It is responsible for governmental activities only in a geographic area smaller than the state. (b) It is subject to the sovereign immunity of the state. (2) "Cigarettes" and "tobacco product" have the same meanings as in section 5743.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Transaction" has the same meaning as in section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. (4) "Campaign committee," "campaign fund," "candidate," "legislative campaign fund," "political action committee," "political committee," "political party," and "separate segregated fund" have the same meanings as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section, the governing body of a political subdivision may use public funds to publish and distribute newsletters, or to use any other means, to communicate information about the plans, policies, and operations of the political subdivision to members of the public within the political subdivision and to other persons who may be affected by the political subdivision. (C) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(7) of section 340.03 of the Revised Code, no governing body of a political subdivision shall use public funds to do any of the following: (1) Publish, distribute, or otherwise communicate information that does any of the following: (a) Contains defamatory, libelous, or obscene matter; (b) Promotes alcoholic beverages, cigarettes or other tobacco products, or any illegal product, service, or activity; (c) Promotes illegal discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, disability, age, or ancestry; (d) Supports or opposes any labor organization or any action by, on behalf of, or against any labor organization; (e) Supports or opposes the nomination or election of a candidate for public office, the investigation, prosecution, or recall of a public official, or the passage of a levy or bond issue. (2) Compensate any employee of the political subdivision for time spent on any activity to influence the outcome of an election for any of the purposes described in division (C)(1)(e) of this section. Division (C)(2) of this section does not prohibit the use of public funds to compensate an employee of a political subdivision for attending a public meeting to present information about the political subdivision's finances, activities, and governmental actions in a manner that is not designed to influence the outcome of an election or the passage of a levy or bond issue, even though the election, levy, or bond issue is discussed or debated at the meeting. (D) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(7) of section 340.03 of the Revised Code or in division (E) of this section, no person shall knowingly conduct a direct or indirect transaction of public funds to the benefit of any of the following: (1) A campaign committee; (2) A political action committee; (3) A legislative campaign fund; (4) A political party; (5) A campaign fund; (6) A political committee; (7) A separate segregated fund; (8) A candidate. (E) Division (D) of this section does not prohibit the utilization of any person's own time to speak in support of or in opposition to any candidate, recall, referendum, levy, or bond issue unless prohibited by any other section of the Revised Code. (F) Nothing in this section prohibits or restricts any political subdivision from sponsoring, participating in, or doing any of the following: (1) Charitable or public service advertising that is not commercial in nature; (2) Advertising of exhibitions, performances, programs, products, or services that are provided by employees of a political subdivision or are provided at or through premises owned or operated by a political subdivision; (3) Licensing an interest in a name or mark that is owned or controlled by the political subdivision. (G) Whoever violates division (D) of this section shall be punished as provided in section 3599.40 of the Revised Code. Sec. 9.05. (A) As used in the Revised Code: (1) "Boy" means a juvenile human male. (2) "Female" means a person belonging, at conception, to the sex that produces the large reproductive cell. (3) "Gender identity" means an individual's internal and subjective sense of self, disconnected from biological reality and sex and existing on an infinite continuum, that does not provide a meaningful basis for identification and cannot be recognized as a replacement for sex. (4) "Girl" means a juvenile human female. (5) "Male" means an individual belonging, at conception, to the sex that produces the small reproductive cell. (6) "Man" means an adult human male. (7) "Sex" means the biological indication of male and female, including sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous internal and external genitalia present at birth, without regard to an individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience of gender. (8) "Woman" means an adult human female. (B) It is the policy of the state of Ohio to recognize two sexes, male and female. These sexes are not changeable and are grounded in fundamental and incontrovertible reality. Sec. 9.07. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Deadly weapon" has the same meaning as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (2) "Governing authority of a local public entity" means whichever of the following is applicable: (a) For a county, the board of county commissioners of the county; (b) For a municipal corporation, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation; (c) For a combination of counties, a combination of municipal corporations, or a combination of one or more counties and one or more municipal corporations, all boards of county commissioners and legislative authorities of all of the counties and municipal corporations that combined to form a local public entity for purposes of this section. (3) "Local public entity" means a county, a municipal corporation, a combination of counties, a combination of municipal corporations, or a combination of one or more counties and one or more municipal corporations. (4) "Non-contracting political subdivision" means any political subdivision to which all of the following apply: (a) A correctional facility for the housing of out-of-state prisoners in this state is or will be located in the political subdivision. (b) The correctional facility described in division (A)(4)(a) of this section is being operated and managed, or will be operated and managed, by a local public entity or a private contractor pursuant to a contract entered into prior to March 17, 1998, or a contract entered into on or after March 17, 1998, under this section. (c) The political subdivision is not a party to the contract described in division (A)(4)(b) of this section for the management and operation of the correctional facility. (5) "Out-of-state jurisdiction" means the United States, any state other than this state, and any political subdivision or other jurisdiction located in a state other than this state. (6) "Out-of-state prisoner" means a person who is convicted of a crime in another state or under the laws of the United States or who is found under the laws of another state or of the United States to be a delinquent child or the substantially equivalent designation. (7) "Private contractor" means either of the following: (a) A person who, on or after March 17, 1998, enters into a contract under this section with a local public entity to operate and manage a correctional facility in this state for out-of-state prisoners. (b) A person who, pursuant to a contract with a local public entity entered into prior to March 17, 1998, operates and manages on March 17, 1998, a correctional facility in this state for housing out-of-state prisoners. (B) Subject to division (I) of this section, the only entities other than this state that are authorized to operate a correctional facility to house out-of-state prisoners in this state are a local public entity that operates a correctional facility pursuant to this section or a private contractor that operates a correctional facility pursuant to this section under a contract with a local public entity. Subject to division (I) of this section, a private entity may operate a correctional facility in this state for the housing of out-of-state prisoners only if the private entity is a private contractor that enters into a contract that comports with division (D) of this section with a local public entity for the management and operation of the correctional facility. (C)(1) Except as provided in this division, on and after March 17, 1998, a local public entity shall not enter into a contract with an out-of-state jurisdiction to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state. On and after March 17, 1998, a local public entity may enter into a contract with an out-of-state jurisdiction to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state only if the local public entity and the out-of-state jurisdiction with which the local public entity intends to contract jointly submit to the department of rehabilitation and correction a statement that certifies the correctional facility's intended use, intended prisoner population, and custody level, and the department reviews and comments upon the plans for the design or renovation of the correctional facility regarding their suitability for the intended prisoner population specified in the submitted statement. (2) If a local public entity and an out-of-state jurisdiction enter into a contract to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state as authorized under division (C)(1) of this section, in addition to any other provisions it contains, the contract shall include whichever of the following provisions is applicable: (a) If a private contractor will operate the facility in question pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with division (D) of this section, a requirement that, if the facility is closed or ceases to operate for any reason and if the conversion plan described in division (D)(16) of this section is not complied with, the out-of-state jurisdiction will be responsible for housing and transporting the prisoners who are in the facility at the time it is closed or ceases to operate and for the cost of so housing and transporting those prisoners; (b) If a private contractor will not operate the facility in question pursuant to a contract entered into in accordance with division (D) of this section, a conversion plan that will be followed if, for any reason, the facility is closed or ceases to operate. The conversion plan shall include, but is not limited to, provisions that specify whether the local public entity or the out-of-state jurisdiction will be responsible for housing and transporting the prisoners who are in the facility at the time it is closed or ceases to operate and for the cost of so housing and transporting those prisoners. (3) If a local public entity and an out-of-state jurisdiction intend to enter into a contract to house out-of-state prisoners in a correctional facility in this state as authorized under division (C)(1) of this section, or if a local public entity and a private contractor intend to enter into a contract pursuant to division (D) of this section for the private contractor's management and operation of a correctional facility in this state to house out-of-state prisoners, prior to entering into the contract the local public entity and the out-of-state jurisdiction, or the local public entity and the private contractor, whichever is applicable, shall conduct a public hearing in accordance with this division, and, prior to entering into the contract, the governing authority of the local public entity in which the facility is or will be located shall authorize the location and operation of the facility. The hearing shall be conducted at a location within the municipal corporation or township in which the facility is or will be located. At least one week prior to conducting the hearing, the local public entity and the out-of-state jurisdiction or private contractor with the duty to conduct the hearing shall cause notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing to be made by publication in the newspaper with the largest general circulation in the county in which the municipal corporation or township is located. The notice shall be of a sufficient size that it covers at least one-quarter of a page of the newspaper in which it is published. This division applies to a private contractor that, pursuant to the requirement set forth in division (I) of this section, is required to enter into a contract under division (D) of this section. (D) Subject to division (I) of this section, on and after March 17, 1998, if a local public entity enters into a contract with a private contractor for the management and operation of a correctional facility in this state to house out-of-state prisoners, the contract, at a minimum, shall include all of the following provisions: (1) A requirement that the private contractor seek and obtain accreditation from the American correctional association for the correctional facility within two years after accepting the first out-of-state prisoner at the correctional facility under the contract and that it maintain that accreditation for the term of the contract; (2) A requirement that the private contractor comply with all applicable laws, rules, or regulations of the government of this state, political subdivisions of this state, and the United States, including, but not limited to, all sanitation, food service, safety, and health regulations; (3) A requirement that the private contractor send copies of reports of inspections completed by appropriate authorities regarding compliance with laws, rules, and regulations of the type described in division (D)(2) of this section to the director of rehabilitation and correction or the director's designee and to the governing authority of the local public entity in which the correctional facility is located; (4) A requirement that the private contractor report to the local law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the place at which the correctional facility is located, for investigation, all criminal offenses or delinquent acts that are committed in or on the grounds of, or otherwise in connection with, the correctional facility and report to the department of rehabilitation and correction all disturbances at the facility; (5) A requirement that the private contractor immediately report all escapes from the facility, and the apprehension of all escapees, by telephone and in writing to the department of rehabilitation and correction, to all local law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the place at which the facility is located, to the state highway patrol, to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the facility is located, and to a daily newspaper having general circulation in the county in which the facility is located. The written notice may be by either facsimile transmission or mail. A failure to comply with this requirement is a violation of section 2921.22 of the Revised Code. (6) A requirement that the private contractor provide a written report to the director of rehabilitation and correction or the director's designee and to the governing authority of the local public entity in which the correctional facility is located of all unusual incidents occurring at the correctional facility. The private contractor shall report the incidents in accordance with the incident reporting rules that, at the time of the incident, are applicable to state correctional facilities for similar incidents occurring at state correctional facilities. (7) A requirement that the private contractor provide internal and perimeter security to protect the public, staff members of the correctional facility, and prisoners in the correctional facility; (8) A requirement that the correctional facility be staffed at all times with a staffing pattern that is adequate to ensure supervision of inmates and maintenance of security within the correctional facility and to provide for appropriate programs, transportation, security, and other operational needs. In determining security needs for the correctional facility, the private contractor and the contract requirements shall fully take into account all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the proximity of the facility to neighborhoods and schools. (9) A requirement that the private contractor provide an adequate policy of insurance that satisfies the requirements set forth in division (D) of section 9.06 of the Revised Code regarding contractors who operate and manage a facility under that section, and that the private contractor indemnify and hold harmless the state, its officers, agents, and employees, and any local public entity in the state with jurisdiction over the place at which the correctional facility is located or that owns the correctional facility, reimburse the state for its costs in defending the state or any of its officers, agents, or employees, and reimburse any local government entity of that nature for its costs in defending the local government entity, in the manner described in division (D) of that section regarding contractors who operate and manage a facility under that section; (10) A requirement that the private contractor adopt for prisoners housed in the correctional facility the security classification system and schedule adopted by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5145.03 of the Revised Code, classify in accordance with the system and schedule each prisoner housed in the facility, and house all prisoners in the facility in accordance with their classification under this division; (11) A requirement that the private contractor will not accept for housing, and will not house, in the correctional facility any out-of-state prisoner in relation to whom any of the following applies: (a) The private entity has not obtained from the out-of-state jurisdiction that imposed the sentence or sanction under which the prisoner will be confined in this state a copy of the institutional record of the prisoner while previously confined in that out-of-state jurisdiction or a statement that the prisoner previously has not been confined in that out-of-state jurisdiction and a copy of all medical records pertaining to that prisoner that are in the possession of the out-of-state jurisdiction. (b) The prisoner, while confined in any out-of-state jurisdiction, has a record of institutional violence involving the use of a deadly weapon or a pattern of committing acts of an assaultive nature against employees of, or visitors to, the place of confinement or has a record of escape or attempted escape from secure custody. (c) Under the security classification system and schedule adopted by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5145.03 of the Revised Code and adopted by the private contractor under division (B)(10) of this section, the out-of-state prisoner would be classified as being at a security level higher than medium security. (12) A requirement that the private contractor, prior to housing any out-of-state prisoner in the correctional facility under the contract, enter into a written agreement with the department of rehabilitation and correction that sets forth a plan and procedure that will be used to coordinate law enforcement activities of state law enforcement agencies and of local law enforcement agencies with jurisdiction over the place at which the facility is located in response to any riot, rebellion, escape, insurrection, or other emergency occurring inside or outside the facility; (13) A requirement that the private contractor cooperate with the correctional institution inspection committee attorney general in the committee's performance of its the attorney general's duties under section 103.73 109.39 of the Revised Code and provide the committee, its subcommittees, and its the attorney general, including staff members, in performing those duties, with access to the correctional facility as described infor purposes of that section; (14) A requirement that the private contractor permit any peace officer who serves a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the place at which the correctional facility is located to enter into the facility to investigate any criminal offense or delinquent act that allegedly has been committed in or on the grounds of, or otherwise in connection with, the facility; (15) A requirement that the private contractor will not employ any person at the correctional facility until after the private contractor has submitted to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, on a form prescribed by the superintendent of the bureau, a request that the bureau conduct a criminal records check of the person and a requirement that the private contractor will not employ any person at the facility if the records check or other information possessed by the contractor indicates that the person previously has engaged in malfeasance; (16) A requirement that the private contractor will not accept for housing, and will not house, in the correctional facility any out-of-state prisoner unless the private contractor and the out-of-state jurisdiction that imposed the sentence for which the prisoner is to be confined agree that, if the out-of-state prisoner is confined in the facility in this state, commits a criminal offense while confined in the facility, is convicted of or pleads guilty to that offense, and is sentenced to a term of confinement for that offense but is not sentenced to death for that offense, the private contractor and the out-of-state jurisdiction will do all of the following: (a) Unless section 5120.50 of the Revised Code does not apply in relation to the offense the prisoner committed while confined in this state and the term of confinement imposed for that offense, the out-of-state jurisdiction will accept the prisoner pursuant to that section for service of that term of confinement and for any period of time remaining under the sentence for which the prisoner was confined in the facility in this state, the out-of-state jurisdiction will confine the prisoner pursuant to that section for that term and that remaining period of time, and the private contractor will transport the prisoner to the out-of-state jurisdiction for service of that term and that remaining period of time. (b) If section 5120.50 of the Revised Code does not apply in relation to the offense the prisoner committed while confined in this state and the term of confinement imposed for that offense, the prisoner shall be returned to the out-of-state jurisdiction or its private contractor for completion of the period of time remaining under the out-of-state sentence for which the prisoner was confined in the facility in this state before starting service of the term of confinement imposed for the offense committed while confined in this state, the out-of-state jurisdiction or its private contractor will confine the prisoner for that remaining period of time and will transport the prisoner outside of this state for service of that remaining period of time, and, if the prisoner is confined in this state in a facility operated by the department of rehabilitation and correction, the private contractor will be financially responsible for reimbursing the department at the per diem cost of confinement for the duration of that incarceration, with the amount of the reimbursement so paid to be deposited in the department's prisoner programs fund. (17) A requirement that the private contractor, prior to housing any out-of-state prisoner in the correctional facility under the contract, enter into an agreement with the local public entity that sets forth a conversion plan that will be followed if, for any reason, the facility is closed or ceases to operate. The conversion plan shall include, but is not limited to, provisions that specify whether the private contractor, the local public entity, or the out-of-state jurisdictions that imposed the sentences for which the out-of-state prisoners are confined in the facility will be responsible for housing and transporting the prisoners who are in the facility at the time it is closed or ceases to operate and for the cost of so housing and transporting those prisoners. (18) A schedule of fines that the local public entity shall impose upon the private contractor if the private contractor fails to perform its contractual duties, and a requirement that, if the private contractor fails to perform its contractual duties, the local public entity shall impose a fine on the private contractor from the schedule of fines and, in addition to the fine, may exercise any other rights it has under the contract. Division (F)(2) of this section applies regarding a fine described in this division. (19) A requirement that the private contractor adopt and use in the correctional facility the drug testing and treatment program that the department of rehabilitation and correction uses for inmates in state correctional institutions; (20) A requirement that the private contractor provide clothing for all out-of-state prisoners housed in the correctional facility that is conspicuous in its color, style, or color and style, that conspicuously identifies its wearer as a prisoner, and that is readily distinguishable from clothing of a nature that normally is worn outside the facility by non-prisoners, that the private contractor require all out-of-state prisoners housed in the facility to wear the clothing so provided, and that the private contractor not permit any out-of-state prisoner, while inside or on the premises of the facility or while being transported to or from the facility, to wear any clothing of a nature that does not conspicuously identify its wearer as a prisoner and that normally is worn outside the facility by non-prisoners; (21) A requirement that, at the time the contract is made, the private contractor provide to all parties to the contract adequate proof that it has complied with the requirement described in division (D)(9) of this section, and a requirement that, at any time during the term of the contract, the private contractor upon request provide to any party to the contract adequate proof that it continues to be in compliance with the requirement described in division (D)(9) of this section. (E) A private correctional officer or other designated employee of a private contractor that operates a correctional facility that houses out-of-state prisoners in this state under a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, may carry and use firearms in the course of the officer's or employee's employment only if the officer or employee is certified as having satisfactorily completed an approved training program designed to qualify persons for positions as special police officers, security guards, or persons otherwise privately employed in a police capacity, as described in division (A) of section 109.78 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Upon notification by the private contractor of an escape from, or of a disturbance at, a correctional facility that is operated by a private contractor under a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, and that houses out-of-state prisoners in this state, the department of rehabilitation and correction and state and local law enforcement agencies shall use all reasonable means to recapture persons who escaped from the facility or quell any disturbance at the facility, in accordance with the plan and procedure included in the written agreement entered into under division (D)(12) of this section in relation to contracts entered into on or after March 17, 1998, and in accordance with their normal procedures in relation to contracts entered into prior to March 17, 1998. Any cost incurred by this state or a political subdivision of this state relating to the apprehension of a person who escaped from the facility, to the quelling of a disturbance at the facility, or to the investigation or prosecution as described in division (G)(2) of this section of any offense relating to the escape or disturbance shall be chargeable to and borne by the private contractor. The contractor also shall reimburse the state or its political subdivisions for all reasonable costs incurred relating to the temporary detention of a person who escaped from the facility, following the person's recapture. (2) If a private contractor that, on or after March 17, 1998, enters into a contract under this section with a local public entity for the operation of a correctional facility that houses out-of-state prisoners fails to perform its contractual duties, the local public entity shall impose upon the private contractor a fine from the schedule of fines included in the contract and may exercise any other rights it has under the contract. A fine imposed under this division shall be paid to the local public entity that enters into the contract, and the local public entity shall deposit the money so paid into its treasury to the credit of the fund used to pay for community policing. If a fine is imposed under this division, the local public entity may reduce the payment owed to the private contractor pursuant to any invoice in the amount of the fine. (3) If a private contractor, on or after March 17, 1998, enters into a contract under this section with a local public entity for the operation of a correctional facility that houses out-of-state prisoners in this state, the private contractor shall comply with the insurance, indemnification, hold harmless, and cost reimbursement provisions described in division (D)(9) of this section. (G)(1) Any act or omission that would be a criminal offense or a delinquent act if committed at a state correctional institution or at a jail, workhouse, prison, or other correctional facility operated by this state or by any political subdivision or group of political subdivisions of this state shall be a criminal offense or delinquent act if committed by or with regard to any out-of-state prisoner who is housed at any correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998. (2) If any political subdivision of this state experiences any cost in the investigation or prosecution of an offense committed by an out-of-state prisoner housed in a correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, the private contractor shall reimburse the political subdivision for the costs so experienced. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the state, and any officer or employee, as defined in section 109.36 of the Revised Code, of the state is not liable in damages in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from, or is related to, the establishment, management, or operation of a correctional facility to house out-of-state prisoners in this state pursuant to a contract between a local public entity and an out-of-state jurisdiction, a local public entity and a private contractor, or a private contractor and an out-of-state jurisdiction that was entered into prior to March 17, 1998, or that is entered into on or after March 17, 1998, in accordance with its provisions. The immunity provided in this division does not apply regarding an act or omission of an officer or employee, as defined in section 109.36 of the Revised Code, of the state that is manifestly outside the scope of the officer's or employee's official responsibilities or regarding an act or omission of the state, or of an officer or employee, as so defined, of the state that is undertaken with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a non-contracting political subdivision, and any employee, as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, of a non-contracting political subdivision is not liable in damages in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from, or is related to, the establishment, management, or operation of a correctional facility to house out-of-state prisoners in this state pursuant to a contract between a local public entity other than the non-contracting political subdivision and an out-of-state jurisdiction, a local public entity other than the non-contracting political subdivision and a private contractor, or a private contractor and an out-of-state jurisdiction that was entered into prior to March 17, 1998, or that is entered into on or after March 17, 1998, in accordance with its provisions. The immunity provided in this division does not apply regarding an act or omission of an employee, as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, of a non-contracting political subdivision that is manifestly outside the scope of the employee's employment or official responsibilities or regarding an act or omission of a non-contracting political subdivision or an employee, as so defined, of a non-contracting political subdivision that is undertaken with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. (c) Divisions (G)(3)(a) and (b) of this section do not affect any immunity or defense that the state and its officers and employees or a non-contracting political subdivision and its employees may be entitled to under another section of the Revised Code or the common law of this state, including, but not limited to, section 9.86 or Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Upon the completion of an out-of-state prisoner's term of detention at a correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, the operator of the correctional facility shall transport the prisoner to the out-of-state jurisdiction that imposed the sentence for which the prisoner was confined before it releases the prisoner from its custody. (2) No private contractor that operates and manages a correctional facility housing out-of-state prisoners in this state pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998, shall fail to comply with division (H)(1) of this section. (3) Whoever violates division (H)(2) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (I) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the provisions of divisions (A) to (H) of this section apply in relation to any correctional facility operated by a private contractor in this state to house out-of-state prisoners, regardless of whether the facility is operated pursuant to a contract entered into prior to, on, or after March 17, 1998. Division (C)(1) of this section shall not apply in relation to any correctional facility for housing out-of-state prisoners in this state that is operated by a private contractor under a contract entered into with a local public entity prior to March 17, 1998. If a private contractor operates a correctional facility in this state for the housing of out-of-state prisoners under a contract entered into with a local public entity prior to March 17, 1998, no later than thirty days after the effective date of this amendment, the private contractor shall enter into a contract with the local public entity that comports to the requirements and criteria of division (D) of this section. Sec. 9.239. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public building" means a building owned by a public entity. (2) "Public entity" means a subdivision, the general assembly, a court, any department, division, institution, board, commission, authority, bureau or other agency of or instrumentality of the state, the five state retirement systems, or any other governmental entity. (3) "Subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A person that is primarily responsible for designing energy efficient commercial building property installed in a public building may seek allocation of any deduction allowed under section 179D of the Internal Revenue Code in connection with that installation by submitting a written request to the public entity that owns the building and the tax commissioner. Within fifteen days of receiving such a request, the public entity shall respond and, if merited, formally allocate the deduction as required under that section and any associated rules or guidance of the internal revenue service or the United States department of the treasury. The public entity shall send to the commissioner a copy of the response and, if applicable, the document or documents formally allocating the deduction. (C) If a public entity does not respond within fifteen days of receiving a request under division (B) of this section, the entity shall be considered to have approved the request. The commissioner shall provide the person that submitted the request with any documentation necessary to formally allocate the deduction. (D) No public entity and no employee or agent of a public entity acting in the employee's or agent's official capacity shall seek, solicit, charge, or accept a fee, payment, or other consideration in exchange for allocating a deduction allowed under section 179D of the Internal Revenue Code or providing documentation of such an allocation as required under that section and any associated rules or guidance of the internal revenue service or the United States department of the treasury. Sec. 9.24. (A) Except as may be allowed under division (F) of this section, no state agency and no political subdivision shall award a contract as described in division (G)(1) of this section for goods, services, or construction, paid for in whole or in part with state funds, to a person against whom a finding for recovery has been issued by the auditor of state on and after January 1, 2001, if the finding for recovery is unresolved. A contract is considered to be awarded when it is entered into or executed, irrespective of whether the parties to the contract have exchanged any money. (B) For purposes of this section, a finding for recovery is unresolved unless one of the following criteria applies: (1) The money identified in the finding for recovery is paid in full to the state agency or political subdivision to whom the money was owed; (2) The debtor has entered into a repayment plan that is approved by the attorney general and the state agency or political subdivision to whom the money identified in the finding for recovery is owed. A repayment plan may include a provision permitting a state agency or political subdivision to withhold payment to a debtor for goods, services, or construction provided to or for the state agency or political subdivision pursuant to a contract that is entered into with the debtor after the date the finding for recovery was issued. (3) The attorney general waives a repayment plan described in division (B)(2) of this section for good cause; (4) The debtor and state agency or political subdivision to whom the money identified in the finding for recovery is owed have agreed to a payment plan established through an enforceable settlement agreement. (5) The state agency or political subdivision desiring to enter into a contract with a debtor certifies, and the attorney general concurs, that all of the following are true: (a) Essential services the state agency or political subdivision is seeking to obtain from the debtor cannot be provided by any other person besides the debtor; (b) Awarding a contract to the debtor for the essential services described in division (B)(5)(a) of this section is in the best interest of the state; (c) Good faith efforts have been made to collect the money identified in the finding of recovery. (6) The debtor has commenced an action to contest the finding for recovery and a final determination on the action has not yet been reached; (7) The debt has been discharged in bankruptcy or is no longer owed based on a final nonappealable court order. (C) The attorney general shall submit an initial report to the auditor of state, not later than December 1, 2003, indicating the status of collection for all findings for recovery issued by the auditor of state for calendar years 2001, 2002, and 2003. Beginning on January 1, 2004, the attorney general shall submit to the auditor of state, on the first day of every January, April, July, and October, a list of all findings for recovery that have been resolved in accordance with division (B) of this section during the calendar quarter preceding the submission of the list and a description of the means of resolution. The attorney general shall notify the auditor of state when a judgment is issued against an entity described in division (F)(1) of this section. (D) The auditor of state shall maintain a database, accessible to the public, listing persons against whom an unresolved finding for recovery has been issued, and the amount of the money identified in the unresolved finding for recovery. The auditor of state shall have this database operational on or before January 1, 2004. The initial database shall contain the information required under this division for calendar years 2001, 2002, and 2003. Beginning January 15, 2004, the auditor of state shall update the database by the fifteenth day of every January, April, July, and October to reflect resolved findings for recovery that are reported to the auditor of state by the attorney general on the first day of the same month pursuant to division (C) of this section. (E) Before awarding a contract as described in division (G)(1) of this section for goods, services, or construction, paid for in whole or in part with state funds, a state agency or political subdivision shall verify that the person to whom the state agency or political subdivision plans to award the contract has no unresolved finding for recovery issued against the person. A state agency or political subdivision shall verify that the person does not appear in the database described in division (D) of this section or shall obtain other proof that the person has no unresolved finding for recovery issued against the person. (F) The prohibition of division (A) of this section and the requirement of division (E) of this section do not apply with respect to the companies, payments, or agreements described in divisions (F)(1) and (2) of this section, or in the circumstance described in division (F)(3) of this section. (1) A bonding company or a company authorized to transact the business of insurance in this state, a self-insurance pool, joint self-insurance pool, risk management program, or joint risk management program, unless a court has entered a final judgment against the company and the company has not yet satisfied the final judgment. (2) To medicaid provider agreements under the medicaid program. (3) When federal law dictates that a specified entity provide the goods, services, or construction for which a contract is being awarded, regardless of whether that entity would otherwise be prohibited from entering into the contract pursuant to this section. (G)(1) This section applies only to contracts for goods, services, or construction that satisfy the criteria in either division (G)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. This section may apply to contracts for goods, services, or construction that satisfy the criteria in division (G)(1)(c) of this section, provided that the contracts also satisfy the criteria in either division (G)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (a) The cost for the goods, services, or construction provided under the contract is estimated to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. (b) The aggregate cost for the goods, services, or construction provided under multiple contracts entered into by the particular state agency and a single person or the particular political subdivision and a single person within the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year within which a contract is being entered into by that same state agency and the same single person or the same political subdivision and the same single person, exceeded fifty thousand dollars. (c) The contract is a renewal of a contract previously entered into and renewed pursuant to that preceding contract. (2) This section does not apply to employment contracts. (H) As used in this section: (1) "State agency" has the same meaning as in section 9.66 of the Revised Code. (2) "Political subdivision" means a political subdivision as defined in section 9.82 of the Revised Code that has received more than fifty thousand dollars of state money in the current fiscal year or the preceding fiscal year. (3) "Finding for recovery" means a determination issued by the auditor of state, contained in a report the auditor of state gives to the attorney general pursuant to section 117.28 of the Revised Code, that public money has been illegally expended, public money has been collected but not been accounted for, public money is due but has not been collected, or public property has been converted or misappropriated. (4) "Debtor" means a person against whom a finding for recovery has been issued. (5) "Person" means the person named in the finding for recovery. (6) "State money" does not include funds the state receives from another source and passes through to a political subdivision. Sec. 9.27. (A) As used in this section, "state" and "state agency" mean the state of Ohio, including the governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, attorney general, and treasurer of state, and all departments, boards, offices, commissions, agencies, institutions, and other instrumentalities of the state of Ohio, but not including the general assembly or any legislative agency, or any court or judicial agency. (B) Except as otherwise required or permitted by state or federal law, a contract entered into by the state for the procurement of goods or services shall not include any of the following: (1) A provision that requires the state to indemnify or hold harmless another person. (2) A provision by which the state agrees to binding arbitration or any other binding extra-judicial dispute resolution process. (3) A provision that names a venue for any action or dispute against the state other than a court of proper jurisdiction in Franklin county, Ohio. (4) A provision that requires the state to agree to limit the liability for any direct loss to the state for bodily injury, death, or damage to property of the state caused by the negligence, intentional or willful misconduct, fraudulent act, recklessness, or other tortious conduct of a person or a person's employees or agents, or a provision that would otherwise impose an indemnification obligation on the state. (5) A provision that requires the state to be bound by a term or condition that is unknown to the state at the time of signing a contract, that is not specifically negotiated with the state, that may be unilaterally changed by the other party, or that is electronically accepted by a state employee. (6) A provision that provides for a person other than the attorney general to serve as legal counsel for the state or for any state agency, unless allowed for under the process set forth in section 109.07 of the Revised Code. (7) A provision that is inconsistent with the state's obligations under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (8) A provision for automatic renewal such that state funds are or would be obligated in subsequent fiscal years. (9) A provision that limits the state's ability to recover the cost of cover for a replacement contractor. (10) With respect to a purchase in which a state agency receives a license to use a software application designed to run on generally available desktop or server hardware or cloud platforms, a requirement that the state agency install or run the software on hardware or in a cloud platform dedicated solely to the state agency, or a provision that otherwise restricts the state agency from installing or running the software on hardware or in a cloud platform of the state agency's choosing. (C) If a contract contains a term or condition described in division (B) of this section, the term or condition is void ab initio, and the contract containing that term or condition otherwise shall be enforceable as if it did not contain such term or condition. (D) A contract that contains a term or condition described in division (B) of this section shall be governed by and construed in accordance with Ohio law notwithstanding any term or condition to the contrary in the contract. (E) This section does not apply to a contract in effect before the effective date of this section September 30, 2021, or to the renewal or extension of a contract in effect before the effective date of this section that date. Sec. 9.28. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Competitive solicitationselection" means a request for proposal or any other solicitation or announcement by a public office requiring bids or proposals for the provision of goods or services to that officethe procedures for making purchases as defined in section 125.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Public office" includes any state agency, public institution, political subdivision, or other organized body, office, agency, institution, or entity established by the laws of this state for the exercise of any function of government. "Public office" does not include the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "State agency" includes every department, bureau, board, commission, office, or other organized body established by the constitution and laws of this state for the exercise of any function of state government, including any state-supported institution of higher education, the general assembly, any legislative agency, any court or judicial agency, or any political subdivision or agency of a political subdivision. "State agency" does not include the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, materials submitted to a public office in response relating to a competitive solicitation through competitive selection shall not be considered public records for purposes of under section 149.43 of the Revised Code until the date the public office announces after the award of a the contract based on the competitive solicitation or the cancellation of the competitive solicitationselection. (C) If a public office rejects all bids or proposals received in response to a competitive solicitation through competitive selection and, concurrently with the announcement of the rejection gives notice of its intent to reissue the solicitation through competitive selection, the materials submitted in response to the original competitive solicitation and the materials submitted in response to the reissued competitive solicitation shall not be considered public records for purposes of under section 149.43 of the Revised Code until the date the public office announces after the award of a the contract based on the reissued competitive solicitation through or the cancellation of the reissued competitive solicitationselection. Sec. 9.312. (A) If a state agency or political subdivision is required by law or by an ordinance or resolution adopted under division (C) of this section to award a contract to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder, a bidder on the contract shall be considered responsive if the bidder's proposal responds to bid specifications in all material respects and contains no irregularities or deviations from the specifications which would affect the amount of the bid or otherwise give the bidder a competitive advantage. The factors that the state agency or political subdivision shall consider in determining whether a bidder on the contract is responsible include the experience of the bidder, the bidder's financial condition, conduct and performance on previous contracts, facilities, management skills, and ability to execute the contract properly. For purposes of this division, the provision of a bid guaranty in accordance with divisions (A)(1) and (B) of section 153.54 of the Revised Code issued by a surety licensed to do business in this state is evidence of financial responsibility, but a state agency or political subdivision may request additional financial information for review from an apparent low bidder after it opens all submitted bids. A state agency or political subdivision shall keep additional financial information it receives pursuant to a request under this division confidential, except under proper order of a court. The additional financial information is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. An apparent low bidder found not to be responsive and responsible shall be notified by the state agency or political subdivision of that finding and the reasons for it. Except for contracts awarded by the department of administrative services pursuant to section 125.11 of the Revised Code, the notification shall be given in writing and either by certified mail or, if the state agency or political subdivision has record of an internet identifier of record associated with the bidder, or by ordinary certified mail and by that if no internet identifier of record is available. When awarding contracts pursuant to section 125.11 of the Revised Code, the department may send such notice in writing by first class mail or by electronic means. (B) Where a state agency or a political subdivision that has adopted an ordinance or resolution under division (C) of this section determines to award a contract to a bidder other than the apparent low bidder or bidders for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, alteration, repair, painting, or decoration of a public improvement, it shall meet with the apparent low bidder or bidders upon a filing of a timely written protest. The protest must be received within five days of the notification required in division (A) of this section. No final award shall be made until the state agency or political subdivision either affirms or reverses its earlier determination. Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code, the procedure described in this division is not subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (C) A municipal corporation, township, school district, board of county commissioners, any other county board or commission, or any other political subdivision required by law to award contracts by competitive bidding may by ordinance or resolution adopt a policy of requiring each competitively bid contract it awards to be awarded to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder in accordance with this section. (D) As used in this section, "internet identifier of record" means an electronic mail address, or any other designation used for self-identification or routing in internet communication or posting, provided for the purpose of receiving communication. Sec. 9.331. (A) Before entering into a contract to employ a construction manager or construction manager at risk, a public authority shall may advertise, in a newspaper of general circulation news media available in the county where the contract is to be performed, and may shall advertise by electronic means pursuant to rules adopted by the director of administrative services, notice of its intent to employ a construction manager or construction manager at risk. The notice shall invite interested parties to submit proposals for consideration and shall be published at least thirty fourteen calendar days prior to the date for accepting the proposals. The public authority also may advertise the information contained in the notice in appropriate trade journals and otherwise notify persons believed to be interested in employment as a construction manager or construction manager at risk. (B) The advertisement shall include a general description of the project, a statement of the specific management services required, and a description of the qualifications required for the project. Sec. 9.334. (A)(A)(1) Every public authority planning to contract for construction management services with a construction manager at risk shall evaluate the proposals submitted and select not fewer than three construction managers at risk the public authority considers to be the most qualified to provide the required construction management services, except that the public authority shall select and rank fewer than three when the public authority determines in writing that fewer than three qualified construction managers at risk are available. (2) For projects valued at less than four million dollars, the public authority may require the construction manager at risk to submit a proposal described in division (A)(1) of this section along with a pricing proposal described in division (C) of this section. The public authority shall provide each construction manager at risk who desires to submit a proposal under this division a pre-proposal meeting to explore the proposals further, in which the public authority shall provide the construction manager at risk with a description of the project, including the scope and nature of the proposed services and potential technical approaches. The public authority shall proceed with selection and ranking as described in division (A)(1) of this section, based only on the proposal submitted under that division. Once the construction managers at risk have been selected, the public authority shall proceed to evaluate the pricing proposals of each selected construction manager at risk as described in division (D) of this section, continuing the selection process from there. (B) The public authority shall provide each construction manager at risk selected under division (A) of this section with a description of the project, including a statement of available design detail, a description of how the guaranteed maximum price for the project shall be determined, including the estimated level of design detail upon which the guaranteed maximum price shall be based, the form of the construction management contract, and a request for a pricing proposal. (C) The pricing proposal of each construction manager at risk shall include at least the following regarding the construction manager at risk: (1) A list of key personnel for the project; (2) A statement of the general conditions and contingency requirements; (3) A fee proposal divided into a preconstruction fee, a construction fee, and the portion of the construction fee to be at risk in a guaranteed maximum price. (D) The public authority shall evaluate the submitted pricing proposals and may hold discussions with individual construction managers at risk to explore their proposals further, including the scope and nature of the proposed services and potential technical approaches. (E) After evaluating the pricing proposals, the public authority shall rank the selected construction managers at risk based on its evaluation of the value of each pricing proposal, with such evaluation considering the proposed cost and qualifications. (F) The public authority shall enter into negotiations for a construction management contract with the construction manager at risk whose pricing proposal the public authority determines to be the best value under division (E) of this section. Contract negotiations shall be directed toward: (1) Ensuring that the construction manager at risk and the public authority mutually understand the essential requirements involved in providing the required construction management services, including the provisions for the use of contingency funds and the possible distribution of savings in the final costs of the project; (2) Ensuring that the construction manager at risk will be able to provide the necessary personnel, equipment, and facilities to perform the construction management services within the time required by the construction management contract; (3) Agreeing upon a procedure and schedule for determining a guaranteed maximum price using an open book pricing method that shall represent the total maximum amount to be paid by the public authority to the construction manager at risk for the project and that shall include the costs of all the work, the cost of its general conditions, the contingency, and the fee payable to the construction manager at risk. (G)(1) If the public authority fails to negotiate a construction management contract with the construction manager at risk whose pricing proposal the public authority determines to be the best value under division (E) of this section, the public authority shall inform the construction manager at risk, in writing, of the termination of negotiations. (2) Upon terminating negotiations, the public authority may enter into negotiations as provided in this section with the construction manager at risk that the public authority ranked next highest under division (E) of this section. If negotiations fail, the public authority may enter into negotiations as provided in this section with the construction manager at risk the public authority ranked next highest under division (E) of this section. (3) If a public authority fails to negotiate a construction management contract with a construction manager at risk whose pricing proposal the public authority determines to be the best value under division (E) of this section, the public authority may select additional construction managers at risk to provide pricing proposals to the public authority pursuant to this section or may select an alternative delivery method for the project. (H) If the public authority and construction manager at risk fail to agree on a guaranteed maximum price, nothing in this section shall prohibit the public authority from allowing the construction manager at risk to provide the management services that a construction manager is authorized to provide. (I) Nothing in this section affects a public authority's right to accept or reject any or all proposals in whole or in part. Sec. 9.35. (A) As used in this section, "public official" means an elected or appointed officer, employee, or agent of any political subdivision, board, commission, bureau, or other public body established by law who is permitted or required in the performance of hisofficial duties to issue checks, keep books and records, prepare and preserve payroll and other employee records, and make reports or perform other similar duties. (B) Any public official may contract for and engage the services of a financial institution, or other person engaged in the business or capable of rendering electronic data processing or computer services, to perform the mechanical, clerical, or record-keeping services necessary in the performance of hisofficial duties. Such services may include, but are not limited to, the preparation of payroll and other records, the preparation, signing, and issuance of checks, the preparation of reports and accounts, and the performance of all similar duties. (C) A contract authorized by division (B) of this section may be entered into only: (1) If the surety bond required of such public official includes within its coverage any loss which might occur as the result of such contract; (2) Pursuant to a resolution duly adopted by the governing board, commission, bureau, or other public body having jurisdiction over such public official authorizing a contract for the performance of such services; (3) If the contract does not conflict with the accounting requirements prescribed by the auditor of state under section 117.43 of the Revised Code or with accounting procedures prescribed by the director of budget and management under section 126.21 of the Revised Code; (4) If assurances satisfactory to the auditor of state are furnished by both the financial institution, or other person engaged in the business or capable of rendering electronic data processing or computer services, and the public official that the books and records of the public official in the possession of the person performing such . (D) Such services shall be are subject to audit by the auditor of state to the same extent as if such services were being performed by the public official himself. (D)(E) A public official, at the request of a person to whom the political subdivision, board, commission, bureau, or other public body is indebted and to whom payment is to be made, may send a check to a bank representing the amount due such person for credit to histhe person's account in the bank subject to the following conditions: (1) The person to whom payment is to be made provides the public official with a written request on a form approved by the auditor of state which that designates the bank and contains the endorsement of such bank thereon stating its willingness to act in this respect as agent of such person; (2) In the event that there are two or more persons who designate the same bank and payments are due to such persons on the same regularly recurring dates, the public official may draw a single check for the total amount due all such persons in favor of the bank for credit to the accounts of the several persons; (3) Payment of a check drawn in favor of and properly endorsed by the bank designated by a person to whom payment is to be made constitutes a full acquittance to the public official for the amount of such payment. (E)(F) Nothing contained in this section relieves such public official from the primary responsibility for the maintenance of the records and performance of the duties of his office. Sec. 9.561. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Government entity" means a state agency, public institution, political subdivision, or any other organized body, office, agency, institution, or entity established by the laws of this state for the exercise of any function of government. (2) "Public building" means any building owned or occupied by a government entity. (B) No government entity shall place menstrual products in the men's restroom of a public building. Sec. 9.64. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Cybersecurity incident" means any of the following: (a) A substantial loss of confidentiality, integrity, or availability of a covered entity's information system or network; (b) A serious impact on the safety and resiliency of a covered entity's operational systems and processes; (c) A disruption of a covered entity's ability to engage in business or industrial operations, or deliver goods or services; (d) Unauthorized access to an entity's information system or network, or nonpublic information contained therein, that is facilitated through or is caused by: (i) A compromise of a cloud service provider, managed service provider, or other third-party data hosting provider; or (ii) A supply chain compromise. "Cybersecurity incident" does not include mere threats of disruption as extortion; events perpetrated in good faith in response to a request by the system owner or operator; or lawfully authorized activity of a United States, state, local, tribal, or territorial government entity. (2) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, municipal corporation, or other body corporate and politic responsible for governmental activities in a geographic area smaller than that of the state. (3) "Ransomware incident" means a malicious cybersecurity incident in which a person or entity introduces software that gains unauthorized access to or encrypts, modifies, or otherwise renders unavailable a political subdivision's information technology systems or data and thereafter the person or entity demands a ransom to prevent the publication of the data, restore access to the data, or otherwise remediate the impact of the software. (B) A political subdivision experiencing a ransomware incident shall not pay or otherwise comply with a ransom demand unless the political subdivision's legislative authority formally approves the payment or compliance with the ransom demand in a resolution or ordinance that specifically states why the payment or compliance with the ransom demand is in the best interest of the political subdivision. (C) The legislative authority of a political subdivision shall adopt a cybersecurity program that safeguards the political subdivision's data, information technology, and information technology resources to ensure availability, confidentiality, and integrity. The program shall be consistent with generally accepted best practices for cybersecurity, such as the national institute of standards and technology cybersecurity framework, and the center for internet security cybersecurity best practices, and may include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) Identify and address the critical functions and cybersecurity risks of the political subdivision. (2) Identify the potential impacts of a cybersecurity breach. (3) Specify mechanisms to detect potential threats and cybersecurity events. (4) Specify procedures for the political subdivision to establish communication channels, analyze incidents, and take actions to contain cybersecurity incidents. (5) Establish procedures for the repair of infrastructure impacted by a cybersecurity incident, and the maintenance of security after the incident. (6) Establish cybersecurity training requirements for all employees of the political subdivision; the frequency, duration, and detail of which shall correspond to the duties of each employee. Annual cybersecurity training provided by the state, and training provided for local governments by the Ohio persistent cyber initiative program of the Ohio cyber range institute, satisfy the requirements of this division. (D) The legislative authority of a political subdivision, following each cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident, shall notify both of the following: (1) The executive director of the division of homeland security within the department of public safety, in a manner prescribed by the executive director, as soon as possible but not later than seven days after the political subdivision discovers the incident; (2) The auditor of state, in a manner prescribed by the auditor of state, as soon as possible but not later than thirty days after the political subdivision discovers the incident. (E) Any records, documents, or reports related to the cybersecurity program and framework in division (C) of this section, and the reports of a cybersecurity incident or ransomware incident under division (D) of this section, are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (F) A record identifying cybersecurity-related software, hardware, goods, and services, that are being considered for procurement, have been procured, or are being used by a political subdivision, including the vendor name, product name, project name, or project description, is a security record under section 149.433 of the Revised Code. Sec. 9.67. No (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, no owner of a professional sports team that uses a tax-supported facility for most of its home games and receives financial assistance from the state or a political subdivision thereof shall cease playing most of its home games at the tax-supported facility and begin playing most of its home games elsewhere at a facility located outside of the state unless the owner eitherdoes one of the following: (A)(1) Enters into an agreement with the political subdivision permitting the team to play most of its home games elsewhereat a facility located outside of the state; (B) (2) Gives the political subdivision in which the tax-supported facility is located not less than six months' advance written notice of the owner's intention to cease playing most of its home games at the tax-supported facility and, during the six months after such notice, gives the political subdivision or any individual or group of individuals who reside in the area the opportunity to purchase the team. (B)(1) Any lease, operating agreement, management agreement, non-relocation agreement, or other similar agreement entered into with the political subdivision before, on, or after the effective date of this amendment that expressly obligates the professional sports team to play all or most of the professional sports team's regular season home games at the tax-supported facility for the term of the lease or agreement, or for a shorter period of time as set forth in the lease or agreement, is, upon the expiration of the term of the lease or agreement, or shorter period of time as set forth in the lease or agreement, as applicable, deemed an agreement with the political subdivision permitting the team to play most of its home games at a different facility in satisfaction of division (A)(1) of this section. (2) Notwithstanding the expiration of the term of the lease or agreement, or a shorter period of time as set forth in the lease or agreement, as applicable, any lease or agreement described under division (B)(1) of this section is not deemed an agreement with the political subdivision permitting the team to play most of its home games at a different facility, in satisfaction of division (A)(1) of this section, if the different facility is located outside of the state. Sec. 9.681. (A) As used in this section, "tobacco product" and "alternative nicotine product" have the same meanings as in section 2927.02 of the Revised Code. (B) The regulation of tobacco products and alternative nicotine products is a matter of general statewide concern that requires statewide regulation. The state has adopted a comprehensive plan with respect to all aspects of the giveaway, sale, purchase, distribution, manufacture, use, possession, licensing, taxation, inspection, and marketing of tobacco products and alternative nicotine products. No political subdivision may enact, adopt, renew, maintain, enforce, or continue in existence any charter provision, ordinance, resolution, rule, or other measure that conflicts with or preempts any policy of the state regarding the regulation of tobacco products or alternative nicotine products, including, without limitation, by: (1) Setting or imposing standards, requirements, taxes, fees, assessments, or charges of any kind regarding tobacco products or alternative nicotine products that are the same as or similar to, that conflict with, that are different from, or that are in addition to, any standard, requirement, tax, fee, assessment, or other charge established or authorized by state law; (2) Lowering or raising an age requirement provided for in state law in connection with the giveaway, sale, purchase, distribution, manufacture, use, possession, licensing, taxation, inspection, and marketing of tobacco products or alternative nicotine products; (3) Prohibiting an employee eighteen years of age or older of a manufacturer, producer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer of tobacco products or alternative nicotine products from selling tobacco products or alternative nicotine products; (4) Prohibiting an employee eighteen years of age or older of a manufacturer, producer, distributor, wholesaler, or retailer of tobacco products or alternative nicotine products from handling tobacco products or alternative nicotine products in sealed containers in connection with manufacturing, storage, warehousing, placement, stocking, bagging, loading, or unloading. (C) In addition to any other relief provided, the court shall award costs and reasonable attorney attorney's fees to any person, group, or entity that prevails in a challenge to an ordinance, resolution, regulation, local law, or other action as being in conflict with this section. (D) The general assembly finds and declares that this section is part of a statewide and comprehensive legislative enactment regulating all aspects of the giveaway, sale, purchase, distribution, manufacture, use, possession, licensing, taxation, inspection, and marketing of tobacco products and alternative nicotine products. The general assembly further finds and declares that the imposition of tobacco product and alternative nicotine product regulation by any political subdivision is a matter of statewide concern and would be inconsistent with that statewide, comprehensive enactment. Therefore, regulation of the giveaway, sale, purchase, distribution, manufacture, use, possession, licensing, taxation, inspection, and marketing of tobacco products and alternative nicotine products is a matter of general statewide concern that requires uniform statewide regulation. By the enactment of this section, it is the intent of the general assembly to preempt political subdivisions from the regulation of tobacco products and alternative nicotine products. (E) This section does not prohibit a political subdivision from levying a tax expressly authorized by state law, including the taxes authorized under Chapters 5739. and 5741. or sections 5743.021, 5743.024, 5743.026, 5743.321, 5743.323, and 5743.324, 5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code. Sec. 9.691. (A) The general assembly and executive department officers elected under Ohio Constitution, Article III may establish, implement, and fund through public resources, security provisions for the protection of the members of the general assembly and executive department officers covered under this section. (B)(1) The authority to determine and administer appropriate security provisions for the general assembly is vested in the presiding officer of each house. (2) The authority to determine and administer security provisions for executive department officers covered by this section is vested in each respective officer. (3) The supreme court has the authority to adopt rules under its general superintending power that governs security provisions, including establishing, implementing, and funding through public resources, those provisions, for justices, judges, and the judiciary as established by Ohio Constitution, Article IV and the laws of this state. (C)(1) In addition to the sergeant at arms and any assistant sergeants at arms, each house of the general assembly may appoint, employ, contract with, and fix the compensation of law enforcement officers, as defined in section 9.69 of the Revised Code, or other persons to provide or coordinate security for the members of the general assembly. (2) Each executive department officer covered by this section may appoint, employ, contract with, and fix the compensation of law enforcement officers, as defined in section 9.69 of the Revised Code, or other persons to provide or coordinate security for the officer. (3) Any law enforcement officer, as defined in section 9.69 of the Revised Code, who is authorized to provide or coordinate security for the general assembly or the executive department officers covered by this section has the same arrest powers as other peace officers and law enforcement officers to apprehend offenders against the criminal laws who endanger or threaten the security of any person being protected, no matter where the offense occurs. This jurisdiction is concurrent with that of peace officers and law enforcement officers of the county, township, or municipal corporation in which the violation occurs and with the state highway patrol. (D) This section is in addition to, independent of, and operates concurrently with, any security provided by the state highway patrol under section 5503.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 9.821. (A) The department of administrative services shall direct and manage for state agencies all risk management and insurance programs authorized under section 9.822 of the Revised Code. (B) The office of risk management is hereby established within the department of administrative services. The director of administrative services, or a deputy director appointed by the director, shall control and supervise the office. (C) The office may take any of the following actions that it determines to be in the best interests of the state: (1) Provide all insurance coverages for the state, including, but not limited to, vehicle liability, casualty, property, public liability, and fidelity bonding. The cost of insurance coverage shall be paid from appropriations made to the state agencies that the office has designated to receive the coverage. (2) Provide coverage of legal expenses that are necessary and related to the legal defense of claims against the state; (3) Purchase insurance policies consistent with sections 125.01 to 125.111 of the Revised Code, develop and administer self-insurance programs, or do both; (4) Consolidate and combine state insurance coverages; (5) Provide technical services in risk management and insurance to state agencies; (6) Adopt and publish, in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code, necessary rules and procedures governing the administration of the state's insurance and risk management activities. (D) No state agency, except a state agency exempted under section 125.02 or 125.04 of the Revised Code from the department's purchasing authority, shall purchase any insurance described in this section except as authorized by the department, when the office of risk management determines that the purchase is in the best interest of the state pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, and in accordance with terms, conditions, and procurement methods established by the department. (E) With respect to any civil action, demand, or claim against the state that could be filed in the court of claims, nothing in sections 9.82 to 9.823 of the Revised Code shall be interpreted to permit the settlement or compromise of those civil actions, demands, or claims, except in the manner provided in Chapter 2743. of the Revised Code. (F) The department of administrative services and the office of risk management, while acting pursuant to the responsibilities prescribed in sections 9.82 to 9.83 of the Revised Code, are performing a public duty, as defined in section 2743.01 of the Revised Code. (G) The office of the attorney general or counsel appointed by the office of the attorney general, including any legal representatives thereof, shall provide and share communications and documents that are made for the purpose of seeking or providing legal advice or counsel in connection with actual or potential litigation, liability claims, contract disputes, risk management issues, and other matters involving the programs of the office of risk management with the office. All such communications and documents shared between the office, a state agency, and the office of the attorney general or counsel appointed by the office of the attorney general, including any legal representatives thereof, are privileged and confidential. Sec. 101.30. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Legislative document" includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) A working paper, work product, correspondence, preliminary draft, note, proposed bill or resolution, proposed amendment to a bill or resolution, analysis, opinion, memorandum, or other document in whatever form or format prepared by legislative staff, general assembly staff, or a member of the general assembly for a member of the general assembly or for general assembly staff; (b) Any document or material in whatever form or format provided by a member of the general assembly or general assembly staff to legislative staff, general assembly staff, or a member of the general assembly that requests, or that provides information or materials to assist in, the preparation of any of the items described in division (A)(1)(a) of this section; (c) Any summary of a bill or resolution or of an amendment to a bill or resolution in whatever form or format that is prepared by or in the possession of legislative staff for a member of the general assembly or general assembly staff, if the summary is prepared before the bill, resolution, or amendment is filed for introduction or presented at a committee hearing or floor session, as applicable. (2) "Legislative staff" means the staff of the legislative service commission, legislative budget office of the legislative service commission, or any other legislative agency included in the legislative service commission budget group. (3) "General assembly staff" means an officer or employee of either house of the general assembly who acts on behalf of a member of the general assembly or on behalf of a committee or either house of the general assembly. (B) (B)(1) Legislative staff shall maintain a confidential relationship with each member of the general assembly, and with each member of the general assembly staff, with respect to communications between the member of the general assembly or general assembly staff and legislative staff. Except as otherwise provided in this division and division (C) of this section, a legislative document arising out of this confidential relationship is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. When it is in the public interest and with the consent of the commission, the director of the commission may release to the public any legislative document in the possession of the commission staff arising out of a confidential relationship with a former member of the general assembly or former member of the general assembly staff who is not available to make the legislative document a public record as provided in division (C) of this section because of death or disability, whom the director is unable to contact for that purpose, or who fails to respond to the director after the director has made a reasonable number of attempts to make such contact. (2) A legislative document that is not otherwise exempt from disclosure as a public record under division (B)(1) of this section is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code during the general assembly in which the legislative document was created. After the general assembly in which the legislative document was created has adjourned sine die, the legislative document is a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code unless the legislative document would be privileged under Ohio Constitution, Article II, Section 12. (C)(1) A legislative document is a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code if it is an analysis, synopsis, fiscal note, or local impact statement prepared by legislative staff that is required to be prepared by law, or by a rule of either house of the general assembly, for the benefit of the members of either or both of those houses or any legislative committee and if it has been presented to those members. (2) A legislative document is a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code if a member of the general assembly for whom legislative staff prepared the legislative document does any of the following: (a) Files it for introduction with the clerk of the senate or the clerk of the house of representatives, if it is a bill or resolution; (b) Presents it at a committee hearing or floor session, if it is an amendment to a bill or resolution or is a substitute bill or resolution; (c) Releases it, or authorizes general assembly staff or legislative staff to release it, to the public. (D) Nothing in this section or section 149.43 of the Revised Code diminishes, extinguishes, or otherwise limits or restricts the privileges set forth in, or that emanate from, Ohio Constitution, Article II, Section 12. Sec. 101.352. If the joint committee on agency rule review becomes aware that an agency subject to its jurisdiction is relying upon a principle of law or policy that, under section 121.93 of the Revised Code, should have been supplanted by its restatement in a rule, the chairperson of the joint committee responsible for calling and conducting meetings under section 101.35 of the Revised Code, in that chairperson's sole discretion, may request the agency to appear before the joint committee to address why, notwithstanding section 121.93 of the Revised Code, it is so relying. The request shall specify the time and place at which a designee of the agency is to appear before the joint committee to address, and to answer the joint committee's questions concerning, the agency's reliance. The date set for the appearance shall be not earlier than thirty days after the joint committee transmits the request to the agency. The joint committee shall transmit the request to the agency electronically. The joint committee also shall publish the request on its web site, as part of the relevant meeting agenda, and shall indicate in conjunction with the published request that any person is invited to appear before the joint committee when the agency appears to offer and make comments to the joint committee concerning the agency's reliance. Upon receiving the request, the agency shall designate a suitable agency officer or employee to appear on behalf of the agency before the joint committee as directed in the request. The agency electronically shall notify the joint committee of the name, title, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the officer or employee who has been designated to appear before the joint committee in response to the request. Upon appearing before the joint committee, the agency's designee shall address why the agency is relying upon a principle of law or policy that, notwithstanding section 121.93 of the Revised Code, has not been supplanted by its restatement in a rule. The members of the joint committee may question the agency's designee concerning the agency's reliance. Any person may offer and make comments to the joint committee concerning the agency's reliance. After the appearance has concluded, the joint committee, by vote of a majority of its members, in writing may recommend to the agency that it supplant the principle of law or policy that it is relying upon by its restatement in a rule. The joint committee shall support its recommendation with a brief rationale of why, under section 121.93 of the Revised Code, the principle of law or policy should be supplanted by its restatement in a rule. The joint committee shall transmit the recommendation electronically to the agency. After receiving the recommendation from the joint committee, the agency shall commence the rule-making process as soon as it is reasonably feasible to do so, but not later than the date that is six three months after the recommendation was received. The principle of law or policy as it is restated in a rule does not need to be wholly congruent with the supplanted principle of law or policy. The agency lawfully may improve or develop further the supplanted principle of law or policy as it is restated in a rule. The agency may continue to rely upon the principle of law or policy, but only while it is complying with the preceding paragraph. The agency may not rely upon the principle of law or policy in advising with regard to or in determining the rights or liabilities of a person if the any of the following apply: (A) The agency fails to commence the rule-making process by the deadline specified in the preceding paragraph, or if, after . (B) After commencing the rule-making process, the agency neglects or abandons the rule-making process before it is completed. (C) The agency fails to file a rule recommended under this section in final form within one year of receiving a written recommendation from the joint committee in accordance with this section. (D) After filing a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee, the agency notifies the joint committee of the agency's intention to file a revised proposed rule as described in division (B) of section 106.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 101.53. (A) A legislative action to amend or enact a codified or uncodified statutory section shall be indicated in bills and enrolled acts according to the following principles: (1) New matter that is to be inserted into an existing codified or uncodified section shall be indicated by inserting the new matter, underlined, into the section at the appropriate place, in the same form as it is to appear in the resulting law. (2) Old matter that is to be omitted from an existing codified or uncodified section shall be indicated by retaining the matter as it appears in the section and striking it through with a horizontal line. (3) A new codified section that is to be added to the law shall be indicated by presenting the section, underlined, in the same form as it is to appear in the resulting law. (4) A new uncodified section that is to be added to the law shall be indicated by presenting the section, without underlining, in the same form as it is to appear in the resulting law. (B)(1) A legislative proposal to amend or enact a section of the Ohio Constitution shall be indicated in a joint resolution the same as an amendment to or an enactment of a codified statutory section in a bill. (2) A legislative proposal of a schedule or of an amending, enacting, repeal, effective date, or other special clause applying to a proposed amendment of the Ohio Constitution shall be indicated in a joint resolution the same as an enactment of a new uncodified statutory section in a bill. (C) Bills shall be printed in the exact language in which they were passed, under the supervision of the clerk of the house in which they originated. The legislative service commission, by rule adopted under section 111.15 of the Revised Code, shall direct how new matter shall be indicated and old matter omitted. Sec. 101.63. (A)(1) Not later than the first day of March in the odd-numbered year during which an occupational licensing board is scheduled to be triggered to expire the following even-numbered year under section 101.62 of the Revised Code, the speaker of the house of representatives shall direct a standing committee of the house of representatives to hold hearings to receive the testimony of the public and of the chief executive officer of the board, and otherwise to review, consider, and evaluate the usefulness, performance, and effectiveness of the board. Not later than the fifteenth day of November of that same odd-numbered year, the standing committee shall prepare and publish a report of its findings and recommendations in accordance with section 101.65 of the Revised Code. If the standing committee's report includes a bill, the house of representatives shall consider that bill for passage by the thirty-first day of December of that same odd-numbered year. (2) Not later than the first day of March in the even-numbered year during which an occupational licensing board is scheduled to be triggered to expire under section 101.62 of the Revised Code, the president of the senate shall direct a standing committee of the senate to hold hearings to receive testimony of the public and of the chief executive officer of the board, and otherwise to review, consider, and evaluate the usefulness, performance, and effectiveness of the board and any bill considered by the house of representatives related to the expiration of that board. Not later than the fifteenth day of November of that same even-numbered year, the standing committee shall prepare and publish a report of its findings and recommendations in accordance with section 101.65 of the Revised Code. If the standing committee's report includes a bill, the senate shall consider that bill for passage by the thirty-first day of December of that same even-numbered year. (3) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives may, in the same manner as described in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section, direct a standing committee to review an occupational licensing board for which the director of the legislative service commission, under section 103.27 of the Revised Code, has performed a review. (4) The president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall direct standing committees to review approximately thirty-three per cent of the occupational licensing boards each biennium. All occupational licensing boards shall be reviewed over a six-year period including calendar years 2019 through 2024, and also during each subsequent six-year period. (B) Each occupational licensing board that is scheduled to be reviewed by a standing committee shall submit to the standing committee a report that contains all of the following information: (1) The board's primary purpose and its various goals and objectives; (2) The board's past and anticipated workload, the number of staff required to complete that workload, and the board's total number of staff; (3) The board's past and anticipated budgets and its sources of funding; (4) The number of members of its governing board or other governing entity and their compensation, if any. (C) Each board shall have the burden of demonstrating to the standing committee a public need for its continued existence. In determining whether a board has demonstrated that need, the standing committee shall consider, as relevant, all of the following: (1) Whether or not continuation of the board is necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of the public, and if so, whether or not the board's authority is narrowly tailored to protect against present, recognizable, and significant harms to the health, safety, or welfare of the public; (2) Whether or not the public could be protected or served in an alternate or less restrictive manner; (3) Whether or not the board serves a specific private interest; (4) Whether or not rules adopted by the board are consistent with the legislative mandate of the board as expressed in the statutes that created and empowered the board; (5) The extent to which the board's jurisdiction and programs overlap or duplicate those of other boards, the extent to which the board coordinates with those other boards, and the extent to which the board's programs could be consolidated with the programs of other state departments or boards; (6) How many other states regulate the occupation, whether a license is required to engage in the occupation in other states, whether the initial licensing and license renewal requirements for the occupation are substantially equivalent in every state, and the amount of regulation exercised by the board compared to the regulation, if any, in other states; (7) The extent to which significant changes in the board's rules could prevent an individual licensed in this state from practicing, or allow an individual licensed in this state to practice, the same occupation in another jurisdiction without obtaining an occupational license for that occupation in that other jurisdiction; (8) Whether the board recognizes national uniform licensure requirements for the occupation; (9) Whether or not private contractors could be used, in an effective and efficient manner, either to assist the board in the performance of its duties or to perform these duties instead of the board; (10) Whether or not the operation of the board has inhibited economic growth, reduced efficiency, or increased the cost of government; (11) An assessment of the authority of the board regarding fees, inspections, enforcement, and penalties; (12) The extent to which the board has permitted qualified applicants to serve the public; (13) The extent to which the board has permitted individuals to practice elements of the occupation without a license; (14) The cost-effectiveness of the board in terms of number of employees, services rendered, and administrative costs incurred, both past and present; (15) Whether or not the board's operation has been impeded or enhanced by existing statutes and procedures and by budgetary, resource, and personnel practices; (16) Whether the board has recommended statutory changes to the general assembly that would benefit the public as opposed to the persons regulated by the board, if any, and whether its recommendations and other policies have been adopted and implemented; (17) Whether the board has required any persons it regulates to report to it the impact of board rules and decisions on the public as they affect service costs and service delivery; (18) Whether persons regulated by the board, if any, have been required to assess problems in their business operations that affect the public; (19) Whether the board has encouraged public participation in its rule-making and decision-making; (20) The efficiency with which formal public complaints filed with the board have been processed to completion; (21) Whether the purpose for which the board was created has been fulfilled, has changed, or no longer exists; (22) Whether federal law requires that the board be renewed in some form; (23) An assessment of the administrative hearing process of a board if the board has an administrative hearing process, and whether or not the hearing process is consistent with due process rights; (24) Whether the requirement for the occupational license is consistent with the policies expressed in section 4798.02 of the Revised Code, serves a meaningful, defined public interest, and provides the least restrictive form of regulation that adequately protects the public interest; (25) The extent to which licensing ensures that practitioners have occupational skill sets or competencies that are substantially related to protecting consumers from present, significant, and substantiated harms that threaten public health, safety, or welfare, and the impact that those criteria have on applicants for a license, particularly those with moderate or low incomes, seeking to enter the occupation or profession; (26) The extent to which the requirement for the occupational license stimulates or restricts competition, affects consumer choice, and affects the cost of services; (27) An assessment of whether or not changes are needed in the enabling laws of the board in order for it to comply with the criteria suggested by the considerations listed in division (C) of this section; (28) Beginning with reviews commencing on or after January 1, 2027, whether the number of board members is appropriate based on the board's workload and the number of occupational licenses issued by the board. For division (C) of this section, a government regulatory requirement protects or serves the public interest if it provides protection from present, significant, and substantiated harms to the health, safety, or welfare of the public. (D) The legislative service commission shall provide staff services to a standing committee performing its duties under this section and section 101.65 of the Revised Code. Sec. 101.65. (A) After the completion of the review of a board under section 101.63 of the Revised Code, the standing committee that conducted the review shall prepare and publish a report of its findings and recommendations. A standing committee may include in a single report its findings and recommendations regarding more than one board. The committee shall furnish a copy of the report to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the governor, and each affected board. Any published report shall be made available to the public on the standing committee's internet web site, and in the offices of the house of representatives and senate clerks during reasonable hours. As part of a report, the standing committee may present its recommendations to the general assembly in bill form. (B) Recommendations made by the standing committee shall indicate how or whether their implementation will do each of the following: (1) Improve efficiency in the management of state government; (2) Improve services rendered to citizens of the state; (3) Simplify and improve preparation of the state budget; (4) Conserve the natural resources of the state; (5) Promote the orderly growth of the state and its government; (6) Promote that occupational regulations shall be construed and applied to increase economic opportunities, promote competition, and encourage innovation; (7) Provide for the least restrictive regulation by repealing the current regulation and replacing it with a less restrictive regulation that is consistent with the policies expressed in section 4798.02 of the Revised Code; (8) Improve the effectiveness of the services performed by the service departments of the state; (9) Avoid duplication of effort by state agencies or boards; (10) Improve the organization and coordination of the state government in one or more of the ways listed in divisions (B)(1) to (9) of this section. (C) Beginning with reviews commencing on or after January 1, 2027, the standing committee's recommendations shall attempt to ensure that each board consists of not fewer than five members and not more than nine members. Sec. 101.82. As used in sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code: (A) "Agency" means any board, commission, committee, or council, or any other similar state public body required to be established pursuant to state statutes for the exercise of any function of state government and to which members are appointed or elected. "Agency" does not include the following: (1) The general assembly, or any commission, committee, or other body composed entirely of members of the general assembly; (2) Any court; (3) Any public body created by or directly pursuant to the constitution of this state; (4) The board of trustees of any institution of higher education financially supported in whole or in part by the state; (5) Any public body that has the authority to issue bonds or notes or that has issued bonds or notes that have not been fully repaid; (6) The public utilities commission of Ohio; (7) The consumers' counsel governing board; (8) The Ohio board of regents; (9) Any state board or commission that has the authority to issue any final adjudicatory order that may be appealed to the court of common pleas under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code; (10)(9) Any board of elections; (11)(10) The board of directors of the Ohio insurance guaranty association and the board of governors of the Ohio fair plan underwriting association; (12) The Ohio public employees deferred compensation board; (13) (11) The Ohio retirement study council; (14)(12) The board of trustees of the Ohio police and fire pension fund, public employees retirement board, school employees retirement board, state highway patrol retirement board, and state teachers retirement board; (15)(13) The industrial commission; (16)(14) The parole board; (17)(15) The board of tax appeals; (18)(16) The controlling board; (19)(17) The release authority of department of youth services; (20)(18) The environmental review appeals commission; (21)(19) The Ohio ethics commission; (22)(20) The Ohio public works commission; (23)(21) The self-insuring employers evaluation board; (24)(22) The state board of deposit; (25)(23) The state employment relations board; (26)(24) An agency that is exempted from the requirements of sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code by the agency's enabling statutes; and (27)(25) The following agencies, deemed to have a purpose related to federal law: (a) The early childhood children and youth advisory council, under section 5104.50 5180.04 of the Revised Code; (b) The emergency response commission under section 3750.02 of the Revised Code; (c) The public defender commission under section 120.01 of the Revised Code; (d) The homeland security advisory council under division (E) of section 5502.011 of the Revised Code; (e) The unemployment compensation review commission under section 4141.06 of the Revised Code. (B) "Abolish" means to repeal the statutes creating and empowering an agency, remove its personnel, and transfer its records to the department of administrative services pursuant to division (E) of section 149.331 of the Revised Code. (C) "Terminate" means to amend or repeal the statutes creating and empowering an agency, remove its personnel, and reassign its functions and records to another agency or officer designated by the general assembly. (D) "Transfer" means to amend the statutes creating and empowering an agency so that its functions, records, and personnel are conveyed to another agency or officer. (E) "Renew" means to continue an agency, and may include amendment of the statutes creating and empowering the agency, or recommendations for changes in agency operation or personnel. Sec. 101.83. (A) It is the intent of the general assembly that an agency shall expire by operation of sunset review law, sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code, four years more or less after the effective date of the act that established the agency. Unless renewed in accordance with division (E) of this section: (1) An agency created during an even-numbered general assembly expires at the end of the thirty-first day of December in the second year of the next odd-numbered general assembly; (2) An agency created during an odd-numbered general assembly expires at the end of the thirty-first day of December in the second year of the next even-numbered general assembly; and (3) An agency renewed by a prior sunset review committee expires on the expiration date specified in the act that renewed the agency. (B) Any act renewing an agency shall contain a distinct section providing a specific expiration date for the agency in accordance with this section. With respect to an agency scheduled to expire through operation of sunset review law, sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code, the specific expiration date shall be the thirty-first day of December in the second year of a general assembly. (C) If the general assembly does not renew or transfer an agency on or before its expiration date, it expires on that date. The director of budget and management shall not authorize the expenditure of any moneys for any agency on or after the date of its expiration. (D) The general assembly may provide by law for the orderly, efficient, and expeditious conclusion of an agency's business and operation. The rules, orders, licenses, contracts, and other actions made, taken, granted, or performed by the agency continue in effect according to their terms notwithstanding the agency's abolition, unless the general assembly provides otherwise by law. The general assembly may provide by law for the temporary or permanent transfer of some or all of a terminated or transferred agency's functions and personnel to a successor agency or officer. The abolition, termination, or transfer of an agency does not cause the termination or dismissal of any claim pending against the agency by any person, or any claim pending against any person by the agency. Unless the general assembly provides otherwise by law for the substitution of parties, the attorney general shall succeed the agency with reference to any pending claim. (E) An agency may be renewed by passage of a bill that continues the statutes creating and empowering the agency, that amends or repeals those statutes, or that enacts new statutes, to improve agency usefulness, performance, or effectiveness. (F) The chairperson of an agency listed in division (A)(27)(A)(25) of section 101.82 of the Revised Code shall notify the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate, in the manner specified in section 101.68 of the Revised Code, and shall notify the governor, if federal law is modified to eliminate the purpose or necessity for the agency's existence. The notification shall be in writing and include the following disclosure: "The agency known as the _______ was exempted from sunset review law because it had a purpose related to federal law. The federal law specifying that purpose has been amended or repealed eliminating the purpose or necessity for the agency. The sunset review committee, next convened under section 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code, shall schedule the agency for review and shall make a recommendation with respect to the agency in accordance with section 101.87 of the Revised Code." Sec. 101.84. (A) A sunset review committee shall be convened during each general assembly. The committee shall be composed of nine members. The president of the senate shall appoint three members of the senate to the committee, not more than two of whom shall be members of the same political party. The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint three members of the house of representatives to the committee, not more than two of whom shall be members of the same political party. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint three members to the committee, not more than two of whom shall be members of the same political party. Members shall be appointed within forty-five days after the commencement of the first regular session of each general assembly. (B) Each member of the committee who is a member of the general assembly shall serve for the duration of the committee, or until that committee member no longer is a member of the senate or the house of representatives. Each member of the committee who is appointed by the governor shall serve for the duration of the committee, but not later than the thirty-first day of December in the second year of the general assembly. A vacancy on the committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. In the first year of the general assembly, the chairperson of the committee shall be a member of the house of representatives, and the vice-chairperson of the committee shall be a member of the senate. In the second year of the general assembly, the chairperson of the committee shall be a member of the senate, and the vice-chairperson of the committee shall be a member of the house of representatives. Members of the committee shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed for their necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties. (C) The committee shall meet not later than thirty ninety days after the first day of the first year of the general assembly to choose a chairperson and to commence establishment of the schedule for agency review provided for in section 101.85 of the Revised Code or perform other committee duties under sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code. Five members of the committee constitute a quorum for the conduct of committee business. (D) The sunset review committee, after having prepared and published a report of its findings and recommendations, and furnished the report, as required under section 101.87 of the Revised Code, ceases to exist for the remainder of the biennial general assembly. Sec. 102.02. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (H) of this section, all of the following shall file with the appropriate ethics commission the disclosure statement described in this division on a form prescribed by the appropriate commission: every person who is elected to or is a candidate for a state, county, or city office and every person who is appointed to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term in such an elective office; all members of the state board of education; the director, assistant directors, deputy directors, division chiefs, or persons of equivalent rank of any administrative department of the state; the president or other chief administrative officer of every state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; the executive director and the members of the capitol square review and advisory board appointed or employed pursuant to section 105.41 of the Revised Code; all members of the Ohio casino control commission, the executive director of the commission, all professional employees of the commission, and all technical employees of the commission who perform an internal audit function; the individuals set forth in division (B)(2) of section 187.03 of the Revised Code; the chief executive officer and the members of the board of each state retirement system; each employee of a state retirement board who is a state retirement system investment officer licensed pursuant to section 1707.163 of the Revised Code; the members of the Ohio retirement study council appointed pursuant to division (C) of section 171.01 of the Revised Code; employees of the Ohio retirement study council, other than employees who perform purely administrative or clerical functions; the administrator of workers' compensation and each member of the bureau of workers' compensation board of directors; the bureau of workers' compensation director of investments; the chief investment officer of the bureau of workers' compensation; all members of the board of commissioners on grievances and discipline of the supreme court and the ethics commission created under section 102.05 of the Revised Code; every business manager, treasurer, or superintendent of a city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district or an educational service center; every person who is elected to or is a candidate for the office of member of a board of education of a city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district or of a governing board of an educational service center that has a total student count of twelve thousand or more as most recently determined by the department of education and workforce pursuant to section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; every person who is appointed to the board of education of a municipal school district pursuant to division (B) or (F) of section 3311.71 of the Revised Code; all members of the board of directors of a sanitary district that is established under Chapter 6115. of the Revised Code and organized wholly for the purpose of providing a water supply for domestic, municipal, and public use, and that includes two municipal corporations in two counties; every public official or employee who is paid a salary or wage in accordance with schedule C of section 124.15 or schedule E-2 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code; all members appointed to the Ohio livestock care standards board under section 904.02 of the Revised Code; all entrepreneurs in residence assigned by the LeanOhio office in the department of administrative services under section 125.65 of the Revised Code and every other public official or employee who is designated by the appropriate ethics commission pursuant to division (B) of this section. (2) The disclosure statement shall include all of the following: (a) The name of the person filing the statement and each member of the person's immediate family and all names under which the person or members of the person's immediate family do business; (b)(i) Subject to divisions (A)(2)(b)(ii) and (iii) of this section and except as otherwise provided in section 102.022 of the Revised Code, identification of every source of income, other than income from a legislative agent identified in division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, received during the preceding calendar year, in the person's own name or by any other person for the person's use or benefit, by the person filing the statement, and a brief description of the nature of the services for which the income was received. If the person filing the statement is a member of the general assembly, the statement shall identify the amount of every source of income received in accordance with the following ranges of amounts: zero or more, but less than one thousand dollars; one thousand dollars or more, but less than ten thousand dollars; ten thousand dollars or more, but less than twenty-five thousand dollars; twenty-five thousand dollars or more, but less than fifty thousand dollars; fifty thousand dollars or more, but less than one hundred thousand dollars; and one hundred thousand dollars or more. Division (A)(2)(b)(i) of this section shall not be construed to require a person filing the statement who derives income from a business or profession to disclose the individual items of income that constitute the gross income of that business or profession, except for those individual items of income that are attributable to the person's or, if the income is shared with the person, the partner's, solicitation of services or goods or performance, arrangement, or facilitation of services or provision of goods on behalf of the business or profession of clients, including corporate clients, who are legislative agents. A person who files the statement under this section shall disclose the identity of and the amount of income received from a person who the public official or employee knows or has reason to know is doing or seeking to do business of any kind with the public official's or employee's agency. (ii) If the person filing the statement is a member of the general assembly, the statement shall identify every source of income and the amount of that income that was received from a legislative agent during the preceding calendar year, in the person's own name or by any other person for the person's use or benefit, by the person filing the statement, and a brief description of the nature of the services for which the income was received. Division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of this section requires the disclosure of clients of attorneys or persons licensed under section 4732.12 of the Revised Code, or patients of persons licensed under section 4731.14 of the Revised Code, if those clients or patients are legislative agents. Division (A)(2)(b)(ii) of this section requires a person filing the statement who derives income from a business or profession to disclose those individual items of income that constitute the gross income of that business or profession that are received from legislative agents. (iii) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2)(b)(iii) of this section, division (A)(2)(b)(i) of this section applies to attorneys, physicians, and other persons who engage in the practice of a profession and who, pursuant to a section of the Revised Code, the common law of this state, a code of ethics applicable to the profession, or otherwise, generally are required not to reveal, disclose, or use confidences of clients, patients, or other recipients of professional services except under specified circumstances or generally are required to maintain those types of confidences as privileged communications except under specified circumstances. Division (A)(2)(b)(i) of this section does not require an attorney, physician, or other professional subject to a confidentiality requirement as described in division (A)(2)(b)(iii) of this section to disclose the name, other identity, or address of a client, patient, or other recipient of professional services if the disclosure would threaten the client, patient, or other recipient of professional services, would reveal details of the subject matter for which legal, medical, or professional advice or other services were sought, or would reveal an otherwise privileged communication involving the client, patient, or other recipient of professional services. Division (A)(2)(b)(i) of this section does not require an attorney, physician, or other professional subject to a confidentiality requirement as described in division (A)(2)(b)(iii) of this section to disclose in the brief description of the nature of services required by division (A)(2)(b)(i) of this section any information pertaining to specific professional services rendered for a client, patient, or other recipient of professional services that would reveal details of the subject matter for which legal, medical, or professional advice was sought or would reveal an otherwise privileged communication involving the client, patient, or other recipient of professional services. (c) The name of every corporation on file with the secretary of state that is incorporated in this state or holds a certificate of compliance authorizing it to do business in this state, trust, business trust, partnership, or association that transacts business in this state in which the person filing the statement or any other person for the person's use and benefit had during the preceding calendar year an investment of over one thousand dollars at fair market value as of the thirty-first day of December of the preceding calendar year, or the date of disposition, whichever is earlier, or in which the person holds any office or has a fiduciary relationship, and a description of the nature of the investment, office, or relationship. Division (A)(2)(c) of this section does not require disclosure of the name of any bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or building and loan association with which the person filing the statement has a deposit or a withdrawable share account. (d) All fee simple and leasehold interests to which the person filing the statement holds legal title to or a beneficial interest in real property located within the state, excluding the person's residence and property used primarily for personal recreation; (e) The names of all persons residing or transacting business in the state to whom the person filing the statement owes, in the person's own name or in the name of any other person, more than one thousand dollars. Division (A)(2)(e) of this section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of debts owed by the person resulting from the ordinary conduct of a business or profession or debts on the person's residence or real property used primarily for personal recreation, except that the superintendent of financial institutions and any deputy superintendent of banks shall disclose the names of all state-chartered banks and all bank subsidiary corporations subject to regulation under section 1109.44 of the Revised Code to whom the superintendent or deputy superintendent owes any money. (f) The names of all persons residing or transacting business in the state, other than a depository excluded under division (A)(2)(c) of this section, who owe more than one thousand dollars to the person filing the statement, either in the person's own name or to any person for the person's use or benefit. Division (A)(2)(f) of this section shall not be construed to require the disclosure of clients of attorneys or persons licensed under section 4732.12 of the Revised Code, or patients of persons licensed under section 4731.14 of the Revised Code, nor the disclosure of debts owed to the person resulting from the ordinary conduct of a business or profession. (g) Except as otherwise provided in section 102.022 of the Revised Code, the source of each gift of over seventy-five dollars, or of each gift of over twenty-five dollars received by a member of the general assembly from a legislative agent, received by the person in the person's own name or by any other person for the person's use or benefit during the preceding calendar year, except gifts received by will or by virtue of section 2105.06 of the Revised Code, or received from spouses, parents, grandparents, children, grandchildren, siblings, nephews, nieces, uncles, aunts, brothers-in-law, sisters-in-law, sons-in-law, daughters-in-law, fathers-in-law, mothers-in-law, or any person to whom the person filing the statement stands in loco parentis, or received by way of distribution from any inter vivos or testamentary trust established by a spouse or by an ancestor; (h) Except as otherwise provided in section 102.022 of the Revised Code, identification of the source and amount of every payment of expenses incurred for travel to destinations inside or outside this state that is received by the person in the person's own name or by any other person for the person's use or benefit and that is incurred in connection with the person's official duties, except for expenses for travel to meetings or conventions of a national or state organization to which any state agency, including, but not limited to, any legislative agency or state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, pays membership dues, or any political subdivision or any office or agency of a political subdivision pays membership dues; (i) Except as otherwise provided in section 102.022 of the Revised Code, identification of the source of payment of expenses for meals and other food and beverages, other than for meals and other food and beverages provided at a meeting at which the person participated in a panel, seminar, or speaking engagement or at a meeting or convention of a national or state organization to which any state agency, including, but not limited to, any legislative agency or state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, pays membership dues, or any political subdivision or any office or agency of a political subdivision pays membership dues, that are incurred in connection with the person's official duties and that exceed one hundred dollars aggregated per calendar year; (j) If the disclosure statement is filed by a public official or employee described in division (B)(2) of section 101.73 of the Revised Code or division (B)(2) of section 121.63 of the Revised Code who receives a statement from a legislative agent, executive agency lobbyist, or employer that contains the information described in division (F)(2) of section 101.73 of the Revised Code or division (G)(2) of section 121.63 of the Revised Code, all of the nondisputed information contained in the statement delivered to that public official or employee by the legislative agent, executive agency lobbyist, or employer under division (F)(2) of section 101.73 or (G)(2) of section 121.63 of the Revised Code. (3) A person may file a statement required by this section in person, by mail, or by electronic means. (4) A person who is required to file a statement under this section shall file that statement according to the following deadlines, as applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (A)(4)(b), (c), and (d) of this section, the person shall file the statement not later than the fifteenth day of May of each year. (b) A person who is a candidate for elective office shall file the statement no later than the thirtieth day before the primary, special, or general election at which the candidacy is to be voted on, whichever election occurs soonest, except that a person who is a write-in candidate shall file the statement no later than the twentieth day before the earliest election at which the person's candidacy is to be voted on. (c) A person who is appointed to fill a vacancy for an unexpired term in an elective office shall file the statement within fifteen days after the person qualifies for office. (d) A person who is appointed or employed after the fifteenth day of May, other than a person described in division (A)(4)(c) of this section, shall file an annual statement within ninety days after appointment or employment. (5) No person shall be required to file with the appropriate ethics commission more than one statement or pay more than one filing fee for any one calendar year. (6) The appropriate ethics commission, for good cause, may extend for a reasonable time the deadline for filing a statement under this section. (7) A statement filed under this section is subject to public inspection at locations designated by the appropriate ethics commission except as otherwise provided in this section. (B) The Ohio ethics commission, the joint legislative ethics committee, and the board of commissioners on grievances and discipline of the supreme court, using the rule-making procedures of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may require any class of public officials or employees under its jurisdiction and not specifically excluded by this section whose positions involve a substantial and material exercise of administrative discretion in the formulation of public policy, expenditure of public funds, enforcement of laws and rules of the state or a county or city, or the execution of other public trusts, to file an annual statement under division (A) of this section. The appropriate ethics commission shall send the public officials or employees written notice of the requirement not less than thirty days before the applicable filing deadline unless the public official or employee is appointed after that date, in which case the notice shall be sent within thirty days after appointment, and the filing shall be made not later than ninety days after appointment. Disclosure statements filed under this division with the Ohio ethics commission by members of boards, commissions, or bureaus of the state for which no compensation is received other than reasonable and necessary expenses shall be kept confidential. Disclosure statements filed with the Ohio ethics commission under division (A) of this section by business managers, treasurers, and superintendents of city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, or cooperative education school districts or educational service centers shall be kept confidential, except that any person conducting an audit of any such school district or educational service center pursuant to Chapter 117. of the Revised Code may examine the disclosure statement of any business manager, treasurer, or superintendent of that school district or educational service center. Disclosure statements filed with the Ohio ethics commission under division (A) of this section by the individuals set forth in division (B)(2) of section 187.03 of the Revised Code shall be kept confidential. The Ohio ethics commission shall examine each disclosure statement required to be kept confidential to determine whether a potential conflict of interest exists for the person who filed the disclosure statement. A potential conflict of interest exists if the private interests of the person, as indicated by the person's disclosure statement, might interfere with the public interests the person is required to serve in the exercise of the person's authority and duties in the person's office or position of employment. If the commission determines that a potential conflict of interest exists, it shall notify the person who filed the disclosure statement and shall make the portions of the disclosure statement that indicate a potential conflict of interest subject to public inspection in the same manner as is provided for other disclosure statements. Any portion of the disclosure statement that the commission determines does not indicate a potential conflict of interest shall be kept confidential by the commission and shall not be made subject to public inspection, except as is necessary for the enforcement of Chapters 102. and 2921. of the Revised Code and except as otherwise provided in this division. (C) No person shall knowingly fail to file, on or before the applicable filing deadline established under this section, a statement that is required by this section. (D) No person shall knowingly file a false statement that is required to be filed under this section. (E)(1) Except as provided in divisions (E)(2) and (3) of this section, the statement required by division (A) or (B) of this section shall be accompanied by a filing fee of sixty dollars. (2) The statement required by division (A) of this section shall be accompanied by the following filing fee to be paid by the person who is elected or appointed to, or is a candidate for, any of the following offices: 1 2 A For state office, except member of the state board of education $95 B For office of member of general assembly $40 C For county office $60 D For city office $35 E For office of member of the state board of education $35 F For office of member of a city, local, exempted village, or cooperative education board of education or educational service center governing board $30 G For position of business manager, treasurer, or superintendent of a city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district or educational service center $30 (3) No judge of a court of record or candidate for judge of a court of record, and no referee or magistrate serving a court of record, shall be required to pay the fee required under division (E)(1) or (2) or (F) of this section. (4) For any public official who is appointed to a nonelective office of the state and for any employee who holds a nonelective position in a public agency of the state, the state agency that is the primary employer of the state official or employee shall pay the fee required under division (E)(1) or (F) of this section. (F) If a statement required to be filed under this section is not filed by the date on which it is required to be filed, the appropriate ethics commission shall assess the person required to file the statement a late filing fee of ten dollars for each day the statement is not filed, except that the total amount of the late filing fee shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars. (G)(1) The appropriate ethics commission other than the Ohio ethics commission and the joint legislative ethics committee shall deposit all fees it receives under divisions (E) and (F) of this section into the general revenue fund of the state. (2) The Ohio ethics commission shall deposit all receipts, including, but not limited to, fees it receives under divisions (E) and (F) of this section, investigative or other fees, costs, or other funds it receives as a result of court orders, and all moneys it receives from settlements under division (G) of section 102.06 of the Revised Code, into the Ohio ethics commission fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. All moneys credited to the fund shall be used solely for expenses related to the operation and statutory functions of the commission. (3) The joint legislative ethics committee shall deposit all receipts it receives from the payment of financial disclosure statement filing fees under divisions (E) and (F) of this section into the joint legislative ethics committee investigative and financial disclosure fund. (H) Division (A) of this section does not apply to a person elected or appointed to the office of precinct, ward, or district committee member under Chapter 3517. of the Revised Code; a presidential elector; a delegate to a national convention; village or township officials and employees; any physician or psychiatrist who is paid a salary or wage in accordance with schedule C of section 124.15 or schedule E-2 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code and whose primary duties do not require the exercise of administrative discretion; or any member of a board, commission, or bureau of any county or city who receives less than one thousand dollars per year for serving in that position. Sec. 103.05. (A) The director of the legislative service commission shall be the codifier of the rules of the administrative agencies of the state. When In accordance with sections 149.21 to 149.27 of the Revised Code, the commission is the official publisher of the Ohio administrative code. (B) The director, considering the objectives of uniform codification and the principles of legal drafting, shall publish a rule drafting manual that states standards and procedures to be followed by an agency in drafting a rule that is to be codified into the administrative code. The director shall periodically revise and publish a new edition of the manual to maintain the uniformity of the administrative code. In preparing and updating the rule drafting manual, the director shall consider sections 1.31 and 1.41 to 1.59 of the Revised Code and apply the principles of statutory construction to rule drafting. The rule drafting manual shall prescribe and explain any matters the director determines are pertinent to the uniformity of the administrative code, including: (1) The rule numbering system an agency shall follow to codify a rule into the administrative code; (2) The structure of a rule, including: (a) The rule number; (b) The subject matter heading, the principal text, any appendices, and the supplemental information, including information with respect to the history of the rule; (c) A certification that the rule has been lawfully adopted; (d) The effective date, expiration date, and periodic five-year review date of the rule. (3) The standard format for drafting an amendment to an existing rule or an appendix if there is one, an enactment of a new rule or appendix, and a rescission of an existing rule or appendix. (C) When a rule is filed under section 111.15 or , 119.03, or 119.04 of the Revised Code, the director or the director's designee shall examine the rule. If the rule is not numbered or if the numbering of the rule is not in conformity with the system established by the director, the director shall give the rule its proper number by designating the proper number on the left hand margin of the rule. The number shall be the official administrative code number of the rule. Any number so assigned shall be published in any publication of the administrative code. Rules of the administrative code shall be cited and referred to by such official numbers. The legislative service commission shall, under section 111.15 of the Revised Code, adopt, amend, and rescind any rules that are necessary to provide a uniform administrative code; to provide standards for use by the director in determining whether to include in the administrative code the full text of, or a reference to, any rule filed with the commission; to permit the director to discharge the director's duties and exercise the director's powers as described in this section; and to permit the director to discharge the director's duties and exercise the director's powers with respect to establishing and maintaining, and enhancing and improving, the electronic rule-filing system under section 103.0511 of the Revised Code. When the commission adopts rules to provide standards for use by the director in determining whether to include the full text of, or a reference to, a rule in the administrative code, it shall require the director to consider all of the following: (1) Whether the rule applies uniformly to all citizens of the state; (2) Whether the rule applies uniformly to all political subdivisions of the state; (3) Whether the rule affects the health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of the state; (4) Whether the rule applies only to the internal affairs of the agency adopting the rule; (5) The number of persons affected by the rule; (6) Whether the rule affects the statutory or constitutional rights of any person. The director or the director's designee shall accept any rule that is filed under section 111.15 or 119.04 of the Revised Code. If the director or the director's designee accepts a rule that is does not in compliance comply with the rules of the commissionthis section or the rule drafting manual, the director shall give notice of the noncompliance in electronic form to the agency that filed the rule within thirty days after the date on which the rule is filed. The notice shall indicate why the rule does not comply with the rules of the commission this section or the rule drafting manual and how the rule can be brought into compliance. The failure of the director to give an agency notice within the thirty-day period presumptively establishes that the rule complies with the rules of the commissionthis section and the rule drafting manual. (B)(D) Any person may publish an acceptable administrative code. The director shall approve as acceptable any person's publication of the code conforming to the requirements of this division. An Ohio administrative code approved as acceptable by the director shall: (1) Contain a compilation of the full text of, or a reference to, each rule filed under section 111.15 or 119.04 of the Revised Code; (2) Presumptively establish the rules of all agencies adopting rules under section 111.15 or Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are in effect on the day of its initial publication; (3) Contain the full text of, or a reference to, each rule adopted after its initial publication and be updated at least quarterly; (4) Contain an index of the rules and references to rules that are included in the code and each supplement using terms easily understood by the general public; (5) Be published in electronic or print format following, to the extent possible, the subject matter arrangement of the Revised Code; (6) Be numbered according to the numbering system devised by the director. (C) The director may prepare and publish the code, or contract with any person under this division to prepare and publish the code. Any code published under this division shall include all of the requirements of division (B) of this section. In addition, the director shall furnish any code or supplement published under this division to any person who requests the code or supplement upon payment of a charge established by the director, not to exceed the cost of preparation and publication. Upon the request of the director of the legislative service commission under this division, the director of administrative services, in accordance with the competitive selection procedure of Chapter 125. of the Revised Code, shall let a contract for the compilation, preparation, and printing or publication of the administrative code and supplements. Sec. 103.051. The "Register of Ohio" is an electronic publication that functions as a gazette to which members of the public may readily resort for notice of and information about rule-making processes. The director of the legislative service commission shall publish the register. The register is to include all rule-making documents that are required by statute to be published in the register. The director shall display the register free of charge on the internet, and shall ensure that printed copies of all or part of a document published in the register can be easily produced by users of the internet. The director, taking into consideration the public notice and information functions performed by the register, shall update the register at reasonable intervals, but not less often than weekly. The director shall establish a reasonable deadline before each updating. A document received by the director on or before a deadline is to be published in the register upon the register's next updating. The director shall purge a document from the register when its display no longer serves the public notice and information functions performed by the register. The director upon request of any person shall provide the person with a printed copy of all or part of a document published in the register. The director may charge and collect a fee for this service. Any such fee is not to exceed the actual cost of printing and delivering the printed copy to the person requesting it. The director shall deposit the fees into the state treasury to the credit of the register of Ohio fund. Sec. 103.13. The Ohio legislative service commission shall: (A) Conduct research, make investigations, and secure information or data on any subject and make reports thereon to the general assembly; (B) Ascertain facts and make reports concerning the state budget, the revenues and expenditures of the state, and of the organization and functions of the state, its departments, subdivisions, and agencies; (C) Make surveys, investigations, and studies, and compile data, information, and records on any question which may be referred to it by either house of the general assembly or any standing committee of the general assembly; (D) Assist and cooperate with any interim legislative committee or other agency created by the general assembly; (E) Prepare or advise in the preparation of any bill or resolution, when requested by any member of the general assembly; (F) Collect, classify, and index the documents of the state which shall include executive and legislative documents and departmental reports and keep on file all bills, resolutions, and official journals printed by order of either house of the general assembly; (G) Provide members of the general assembly with impartial and accurate information and reports concerning legislative problems in accordance with rules prescribed by the commission; (H) Annually collect the reports required by section 4743.01 of the Revised Code and prepare a report evaluating the extent to which state boards and commissions which regulate occupations are financially self-supporting. The report shall be presented to the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives, the president and the minority leader of the senate, and the chairperson and ranking minority member of the finance committees of both houses, on or before the thirty-first day of December each year. (I) Codify the rules of administrative agencies of the state in accordance with the provisions of section 103.05 of the Revised Code; (J) Publish the register of Ohio under section 103.051 of the Revised Code; (K) Operate the electronic rule-filing system under section 103.0511 of the Revised Code; (L) Assist the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that primarily consider legislation governing the medicaid program, to carry out continuing oversight and other duties regarding the state's medicaid program enumerated under sections 103.41 to 103.412 of the Revised Code. Sec. 103.41. The standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that primarily consider legislation governing the medicaid program shall meet jointly during each session of the general assembly to oversee the medicaid program on a continuing basis. In odd numbered years, the standing committees shall meet jointly at the call of the chairperson of the senate committee that considers the medicaid program. In even numbered years, the standing committees shall meet jointly at the call of the chairperson of the house of representatives committee that considers the medicaid program. Sec. 103.412 103.411. (A) JMOC shall oversee the medicaid program on a continuing basis. As part of its oversight, JMOC To assist the standing committees overseeing the medicaid program as provided in section 103.41 of the Revised Code, the legislative service commission shall do all of the research, review, and summarize the following to the joint standing committees on request of the chairperson who calls the meeting: (1) Review how (A) How the medicaid program relates to the public and private provision of health care coverage in this state and the United States; (2) Review the reforms implemented under section 5162.70 of the Revised Code and evaluate the reforms' successes in achieving their objectives(B) Reports issued by all agencies that participate in the medicaid program that are submitted to the commission; (3) Recommend policies (C) Policies and strategies related to encourage both of the following: (a) (1) Medicaid recipients being physically and mentally able to join and stay in the workforce and ultimately becoming self-sufficient; (b) (2) Less use of the medicaid program. (4) Recommend, to the extent JMOC determines appropriate, improvements in statutes and (D) Newly-adopted rules concerning the medicaid program; (5) Develop a plan of action for the future of the medicaid program(E) Pending Ohio medicaid legislation; (6) Receive and consider reports submitted by local (F) Medicaid legislation and innovations in other states; (G) Local healthier buckeye councils reports submitted under section 355.04 of the Revised Code. (B) JMOC may do all of the following: (1) Plan, advertise, organize, and conduct forums, conferences, and other meetings at which representatives of state agencies and other individuals having expertise in the medicaid program may participate to increase knowledge and understanding of, and to develop and propose improvements in, the medicaid program; (2) Prepare and issue reports on the medicaid program; (3) Solicit written comments on, and conduct public hearings at which persons may offer verbal comments on, drafts of its reports. Sec. 103.414 103.412. (A) Before the beginning of each fiscal biennium, JMOC the legislative service commission shall contract with an actuary to determine the projected medical inflation rate for the upcoming fiscal biennium. The contract shall require the actuary to make the determination using the same types of classifications and sub-classifications of medical care that the United States bureau of labor statistics uses in determining the inflation rate for medical care in the consumer price index. The contract also shall require the actuary to provide JMOC the commission a report with its determination at least one hundred twenty days before the governor is required to submit a state budget for the fiscal biennium to the general assembly under section 107.03 of the Revised Code. (B) On receipt of the actuary's report, JMOC the commission shall share the report with the standing committees overseeing the medicaid program under section 103.41 of the Revised Code. The standing committees, acting jointly, shall determine whether it agrees they agree with the actuary's projected medical inflation rate. If JMOC disagrees they disagree with the actuary's projected medical inflation rate, JMOC shall the standing committees shall work with the commission to determine a different projected medical inflation rate for the upcoming fiscal biennium. The actuary, the commission, and, if JMOC determines a different projected medical inflation rate, JMOC standing committees shall determine the projected medical inflation rate for the state unless that is not practicable in which case the determination shall be made for the midwest region. Regardless of whether it agrees with the actuary's projected medical inflation rate or determines a different projected medical inflation rate, JMOC shall complete a report regarding the projected medical inflation rate. JMOC shall include a copy of the actuary's report in JMOC's report. JMOC's report shall state whether JMOC agrees with the actuary's projected medical inflation rate and, if JMOC disagrees, the reason why JMOC disagrees and the different medical inflation rate JMOC determined. At least ninety days before the governor is required to submit a state budget for the upcoming fiscal biennium to the general assembly under section 107.03 of the Revised Code, JMOC shall submit a copy of the report to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code and to the governor and medicaid director. (C) At least ninety days before the governor is required to submit a state budget for the upcoming fiscal biennium to the general assembly under section 107.03 of the Revised Code, the commission shall submit a report to the governor, medicaid director, and the standing committees that includes the following information: (1) The projected medical inflation rate, whether the standing committees recommend the actuary's rate or the alternate rate recommended by the standing committees; (2) If the standing committees recommend an alternate rate, an explanation for rejecting the actuary's rate; (3) A copy of the actuary's report. Sec. 103.65. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio health oversight and advisory committee. The committee shall consist of the following members: (1) Three members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, two of whom are members of the majority party and one of whom is a member of the minority party; (2) Three members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, two of whom are members of the majority party and one of whom is a member of the minority party. (B) The president and speaker shall make the initial appointments to the committee not later than fifteen calendar days after June 23, 2021. The president and speaker shall make subsequent appointments not later than forty-five calendar days after the commencement of the first regular session of each general assembly. Members of the committee shall serve on the committee until appointments are made in the first regular session of the following general assembly, until a member no longer serves as a member of the chamber from which the member was initially appointed, or until a member is removed by the speaker or president. No committee member shall be removed during the member's term during a state of emergency as defined in section 107.42 of the Revised Code, unless an extraordinary circumstance exists that prevents a member from serving on the committee. A vacancy on the committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (C) In odd-numbered years, the president shall designate one committee member from the senate who is a member of the majority party as the committee chairperson, and the speaker shall designate one committee member from the house who is a member of the majority party as the committee vice-chairperson and one committee member from the house who is a member of the minority party as the committee ranking minority member. In even-numbered years, the speaker shall designate one committee member from the house who is a member of the majority party as the committee chairperson, and the president shall designate one committee member from the senate who is a member of the majority party as the committee vice-chairperson and one committee member from the senate who is a member of the minority party as the committee ranking minority member. (D) In appointing members from the minority party, and in designating ranking minority members, the president and speaker shall consult with the minority leader of their respective houses. (E) The Ohio health oversight and advisory committee shall meet at the call of the chairperson. (F) The executive director and other employees of the joint medicaid oversight committee legislative service commission shall serve provide staff services to the Ohio health oversight and advisory committee to enable the committee to successfully and efficiently perform its duties. Sec. 106.02. Except as provided in section 106.026 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply to a proposed rule: (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, when an agency files a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee on agency rule review, the joint committee shall review the proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis, and an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted, not later than the sixty-fifth day after the day on which the proposed rule was filed with the joint committee. If, after filing the original version of a proposed rule, the agency makes a revision in the proposed rule, the agency shall file the revised proposed rule and a revised rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee. If the revised proposed rule is filed thirty-five or fewer days after the original version of the proposed rule was filed, the joint committee shall review the revised proposed rule and revised rule summary and fiscal analysis, and an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted, not later than the sixty-fifth day after the original version of the proposed rule was filed. If, however, the revised proposed rule is filed more than thirty-five days after the original version of the proposed rule was filed, the joint committee shall review the revised proposed rule and revised rule summary and fiscal analysis, and an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted, not later than the thirtieth day after the revised proposed rule was filed with the joint committee. (B) If, after filing a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee, an agency determines that it needs additional time to consider the proposed rule and possibly file a revised proposed rule, the agency may notify the joint committee of the agency's intention to file a revised proposed rule. When the agency notifies the joint committee of its intention to file a revised proposed rule, the running of the time within which an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted is tolled. If, after notifying the joint committee of the agency's intention to file a revised proposed rule, the agency makes a revision in the proposed rule, the agency shall file the revised proposed rule and a revised rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee. If the revised proposed rule is filed thirty-five or fewer days after the agency filed the original version of the proposed rule, the joint committee shall review the revised proposed rule and revised rule summary and fiscal analysis, and an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted, not later than the sixty-fifth day after the agency filed the original version of the proposed rule. If, however, the revised proposed rule is filed more than thirty-five days after the agency filed the original version of the proposed rule, the joint committee shall review the revised proposed rule and revised rule summary and fiscal analysis, and an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted, not later than the thirtieth day after the revised proposed rule is filed with the joint committee. (C) When an original or revised version of a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis is filed with the joint committee in December or in the following January before the first day of the legislative session, the joint committee shall review the proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis, and an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted, as if the original version of the proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis had been filed with the joint committee on the first day of the legislative session in the following January. If, however, the original version of a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis have been pending before the joint committee for more than thirty-five days, and the proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis are revised in December or in the following January before the first day of the legislative session, the joint committee shall review the revised proposed rule and revised rule summary and fiscal analysis, and an invalidating concurrent resolution may be adopted, not later than the thirtieth day after the first day of the legislative session in the following January. (D) A revised proposed rule supersedes each earlier version of the same proposed rule. (E) The joint committee shall endeavor not to hold its public hearing on a proposed rule earlier than the forty-first day after the proposed rule was filed with the joint committee. The chairperson of the joint committee responsible for calling and conducting meetings under section 101.35 of the Revised Code may select a date for the committee's public hearing on a proposed rule that is earlier than the forty-first day after the proposed rule was filed. Sec. 106.021. If, upon reviewing a proposed rule or revised proposed rule, the joint committee on agency rule review makes any of the following findings with regard to the proposed rule or revised proposed rule, the joint committee may recommend to the senate and house of representatives the adoption of a concurrent resolution to invalidate the proposed rule or revised proposed rule or a part thereof: (A) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule exceeds the scope of its statutory authority. (B) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule conflicts with the legislative intent of the statute under which it was proposed. (C) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule conflicts with another proposed or existing rule. (D) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule incorporates a text or other material by reference and: (1) The accompanying citation is not such as reasonably would enable a reasonable person to whom the proposed rule or revised proposed rule applies readily and without charge to find and inspect the incorporated text or other material; (2) The accompanying citation is not such as reasonably would enable the joint committee readily and without charge to find and inspect the incorporated text or other material, and the agency did not file or otherwise make the incorporated text or other material available without charge to the joint committee; or (3) The agency has treated the proposed rule or revised proposed rule in whole or in part as exempt from sections 121.71 to 121.74 of the Revised Code on grounds the incorporated text or other material has one or more of the characteristics described in division (B) of section 121.75 of the Revised Code, but the incorporated text or other material actually does not have any of those characteristics. (E) The agency has failed to prepare a complete and accurate rule summary and fiscal analysis of the proposed rule or revised proposed rule as required by section 106.024 of the Revised Code. (F) The agency has failed to demonstrate through the business impact analysis, recommendations from the common sense initiative office, and the memorandum of response that the regulatory intent of the proposed rule or revised proposed rule justifies its adverse impact on businesses in this state. (G) If the state agency is subject to sections 121.95, 121.951, 121.952, and 121.953 of the Revised Code, the agency has failed to justify the proposed adoption, amendment, or rescission of a rule containing a regulatory restriction. (H) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule implements a federal law or rule in a manner that is more stringent or burdensome than the federal law or rule requires. (I) If the state agency is subject to sections 121.95, 121.951, 121.952, and 121.953 of the Revised Code, for purposes of those sections, the proposed rule or revised proposed rule removes or replaces "shall," "must," "require," "shall not," "may not," "prohibit," or similar words in a portion of a rule but does not remove a regulatory restriction as defined in section 121.95 of the Revised Code. (J) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule is subject to section 106.025 of the Revised Code, and the joint committee has complied with division (B) of that section. Sec. 106.023. (A) An agency may not adopt a proposed rule or revised proposed rule or file it in final form unless the proposed rule has been filed with the joint committee on agency rule review under division (D) of section 111.15 or division (C) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code and the one of the following applies: (1) The time for the joint committee to review the proposed rule and for the adoption of an invalidating concurrent resolution has expired without adoption of a concurrent resolution to invalidate the proposed rule; (2) The rule or revised proposed rule is subject to section 106.026 of the Revised Code, and a law authorizing its adoption has been enacted in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article II, Sections 15 and 16. (B) If, before the time for its review of a proposed rule or revised proposed rule expires, the joint committee recommends adoption of a concurrent resolution invalidating the proposed rule or revised proposed rule, and the senate and house of representatives does not, within the time remaining for adoption of the concurrent resolution, hold five sessions at which its journal records a roll call vote disclosing a sufficient number of members in attendance to pass a bill, the time within which that house may adopt the concurrent resolution is extended until it has held five such sessions. Sec. 106.024. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Agency" has the meaning defined in section 106.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Rule" includes the adoption, amendment, or rescission of a rule. (3) "Proposed rule" means the original version of a proposed rule, and each revised version of the same proposed rule, that is filed with the joint committee on agency rule review under division (D) of section 111.15 or division (C) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code. (B) An agency shall prepare, on the form designed by the joint committee on agency rule review, a complete and accurate rule summary and fiscal analysis of each proposed rule that it files under division (D) of section 111.15 or division (C) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code. The joint committee on agency rule review shall design a form for the rule summary and fiscal analysis. In the form, the joint committee shall include a space where an agency shall explain the reasoning for any proposed rescission of a rule, including a statement as to whether the agency intends to continue relying on a principle of law or policy stated in the rule when conducting adjudications or other determinations of rights and liabilities or in issuing writings and other materials. The form also may solicit information such as the following information: (1) The name, address, and telephone number of the agency, and the name, telephone number, and electronic mail address of an individual or office within the agency designated by that agency to be responsible for coordinating and making available information in the possession of the agency regarding the proposed rule; (2) The Ohio Administrative Code rule number of the proposed rule; (3) A brief summary of, and the legal basis for, the proposed rule, including citations identifying the statute that prescribes the procedure in accordance with which the agency is required to adopt the proposed rule, the statute that authorizes the agency to adopt the proposed rule, and the statute that the agency intends to amplify or implement by adopting the proposed rule; (4) An estimate, in dollars, of the amount by which the proposed rule would increase or decrease revenues or expenditures during the current biennium; (5) A citation identifying the appropriation that authorizes each expenditure that would be necessitated by the proposed rule; (6) A summary of the estimated cost of compliance with the rule to all directly affected persons; (7) The reasons why the rule is being proposed; (8) If the rule has a fiscal effect on school districts, counties, townships, or municipal corporations, an estimate in dollars of the cost of compliance with the rule, or, if dollar amounts cannot be determined, a written explanation of why it was not possible to ascertain dollar amounts; (9) If the rule has a fiscal effect on school districts, counties, townships, or municipal corporations and is the result of a federal requirement, a clear explanation that the proposed state rule does not exceed the scope and intent of the requirement, or, if the state rule does exceed the minimum necessary federal requirement, a justification of the excess cost, and an estimate of the costs, including those costs for local governments, exceeding the federal requirement; (10) If the rule has a fiscal effect on school districts, counties, townships, or municipal corporations, a comprehensive cost estimate that includes the procedure and method of calculating the costs of compliance and identifies major cost categories including personnel costs, new equipment or other capital costs, operating costs, and indirect central service costs related to the rule. The fiscal analysis shall also include a written explanation of the agency's and the affected local government's ability to pay for the new requirements and a statement of any impact the rule will have on economic development. (11) If the rule incorporates a text or other material by reference, and the agency claims the incorporation by reference is exempt from compliance with sections 121.71 to 121.74 of the Revised Code on grounds the incorporated text or other material has one or more of the characteristics described in division (B) of section 121.75 of the Revised Code, an explanation of how the incorporated text or other material is exempted under that division; (12) If the rule imposes a fee, an explanation of how the fee directly relates to the cost actually incurred by the agency in performing the function for which the fee is charged. The rule summary and fiscal analysis form, instead of or in addition to the foregoing, may solicit any other information the joint committee on agency rule review considers necessary to make the proposed rule or the fiscal effect of the proposed rule fully understandable. (C) The agency shall file the rule summary and fiscal analysis in electronic form along with the proposed rule that it files under division (D) of section 111.15 or divisions (B) and (C) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code. The joint committee on agency rule review shall not accept any proposed rule for filing unless a copy of the rule summary and fiscal analysis of the proposed rule, completely and accurately prepared, is filed along with the proposed rule. (D) The joint committee on agency rule review shall review the fiscal effect of each proposed rule that is filed under division (D) of section 111.15 or division (C) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 106.025. (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, on reviewing a proposed rule or revised proposed rule, the joint committee on agency rule review may proceed in accordance with division (B) of this section if it makes any of the following findings with respect to the rule's summary and fiscal analysis: (1) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule will increase the agency's expenditures during the current biennium by one hundred thousand dollars or more. (2) The cost to comply with the proposed rule or revised proposed rule for a directly affected person will be one hundred thousand dollars or more. (3) The proposed rule or revised proposed rule will impose an annual effect on this state's economy of one million dollars or more. (B) If the joint committee makes one or more of the findings listed in division (A) of this section, the chairperson of the joint committee responsible for calling and conducting meetings under section 101.35 of the Revised Code may request a designee of the filing agency to appear before the joint committee to answer questions about the fiscal effect of the proposed rule or revised proposed rule. The request shall be transmitted to the agency electronically and specify the time and place at which a designee is to appear before the joint committee to answer the joint committee's questions. On receiving the request, the agency shall designate a suitable agency officer or employee to appear on behalf of the agency before the joint committee as directed in the request. The agency electronically shall notify the joint committee of the name, title, telephone number, and electronic mail address of the officer or employee who has been designated to appear before the joint committee in response to the request. After the appearance has concluded, or if the agency designee fails to appear, the joint committee may do any of the following: (1) Allow the time for legislative review to expire; (2) Recommend the adoption of a concurrent resolution to invalidate the proposed rule under section 106.021 of the Revised Code; (3) By vote of a majority of its members, refer the rule for consideration by the full general assembly in accordance with section 106.026 of the Revised Code. (C) This section does not apply to a proposed rule or revised proposed rule if the rule is based on specific statutory language authorizing or requiring an agency to adopt the rule as opposed to a general grant of authority to adopt rules implementing a law. Sec. 106.026. (A) This section applies to a proposed rule or revised proposed rule that the joint committee on agency rule review has, in accordance with section 106.025 of the Revised Code, referred for consideration by the full general assembly. (B) If a proposed rule or revised proposed rule is subject to this section, the chairperson of the joint committee on agency rule review responsible for calling and conducting meetings under section 101.35 of the Revised Code shall immediately transmit the proposed rule or revised proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis to the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives. After the chairperson of the joint committee transmits the rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis under this division, all of the following apply: (1) The joint committee shall take no further action with respect to the proposed rule until after it is adopted or refiled in accordance with division (D) of this section. (2) The agency shall not file a revised proposed version of the rule. (3) The agency shall not adopt the proposed rule unless adoption is authorized by a law enacted in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article II, Sections 15 and 16 after the chairperson transmits the rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis under this division. (C) As soon as practicable after receiving a proposed rule or revised proposed rule transmitted under division (B) of this section: (1) The clerk of the senate shall make the proposed rule or revised proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis available to all members of the senate; and (2) The clerk of the house of representatives shall make the proposed rule or revised proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis available to all members of the house of representatives. Any member of the general assembly may introduce legislation authorizing the agency to adopt the proposed rule or revised proposed rule. (D) If a law authorizing the proposed rule or revised proposed rule is enacted before the general assembly adjourns sine die, legislative review under this chapter ends and the agency may, on or after the law's effective date, file the rule in compliance with section 111.15 or 119.04 of the Revised Code, as applicable. If a law authorizing the rule is not enacted before the general assembly adjourns sine die, the proposed rule or revised proposed rule is invalidated. The agency may refile the rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee. (E) This section does not apply to any rule that is exempt from legislative review under division (D) of section 111.15 of the Revised Code or division (C) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code. (F) The enactment of a law in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article II, Sections 15 and 16, authorizing an agency to adopt a proposed rule or revised proposed rule to which this section applies, does not do either of the following: (1) Grant an agency additional rulemaking authority or modify the agency's existing rulemaking authority; (2) Extinguish or modify any claim against an agency arising from the rule. (G) The enactment of a law in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article II, Sections 15 and 16, authorizing an agency to adopt a proposed rule or revised proposed rule to which this section applies, shall not be used as evidence in any proceeding concerning the rule except for the purpose of determining whether the rule is in effect. Sec. 106.031. If an agency, on the basis of its review of a rule under section 106.03 of the Revised Code, determines that the rule does not need to be amended or rescinded, proceedings shall be had as follows: (A)(1) If, considering only the standard of review specified in division (A)(7) of section 106.03 of the Revised Code, the rule has an adverse impact on businesses, the agency shall prepare a business impact analysis that describes its review of the rule under that division and that explains why the regulatory intent of the rule justifies its adverse impact on businesses. If the rule does not have an adverse impact on businesses, the agency may proceed under division (B) of this section. (2) The agency shall transmit a copy of the full text of the rule and the business impact analysis electronically to the common sense initiative office. The office shall make the rule and analysis available to the public on its web site under section 107.62 of the Revised Code. (3) The agency shall consider any recommendations made by the office. (4) Not earlier than the sixteenth business day after transmitting the rule and analysis to the office, the agency shall either (a) proceed under divisions (A)(5) and (B) of this section or (b) commence, under division (B)(1) of section 106.03 of the Revised Code, the process of rescinding the rule or of amending the rule to incorporate into the rule features the recommendations suggest will eliminate or reduce the adverse impact the rule has on businesses. If the agency determines to amend or rescind the rule, the agency is not subject to the time limit specified in division (B)(1) of section 106.03 of the Revised Code. (5) If the agency receives recommendations from the office, and determines not to amend or rescind the rule, the agency shall prepare a memorandum of response that explains why the rule is not being rescinded or why the recommendations are not being incorporated into the rule. (B) The agency shall assign a new review date to the rule. The review date assigned shall be not later than five years after the immediately preceding review date pertaining to the rule. If the agency assigns a review date that exceeds the five-year maximum, the review date is five years after the immediately preceding review date. The immediately preceding review date includes the date of the review of a rule under section 106.032 of the Revised Code. (C) The agency shall file all the following, in electronic form, with the joint committee on agency rule review, the secretary of state, and the director of the legislative service commission: a copy of the rule specifying its new review date, a complete and accurate rule summary and fiscal analysis, and, if relevant, a business impact analysis of the rule, any recommendations received from the common sense initiative office, and any memorandum of response. (D) The joint committee shall publish notice of the agency's determination not to amend or rescind the rule in the register of Ohio for four consecutive weeks after the rule is filed under division (C) of this section. (E) During the ninety-day period after a rule is filed under division (C) of this section, but after the four-week notice period required by division (D) of this section has ended, the joint committee may recommend to the senate and house of representatives the adoption of a concurrent resolution invalidating the rule if the joint committee finds any of the following: (1) The agency improperly applied the standards in division (A) of section 106.03 of the Revised Code in reviewing the rule and in determining that the rule did not need amendment or rescission. (2) The rule has an adverse impact on businesses, and the agency has failed to demonstrate through a business impact analysis, recommendations from the common sense initiative office, and a memorandum of response that the regulatory intent of the rule justifies its adverse impact on businesses. (3) If the rule incorporates a text or other material by reference, any of the following applies: (a) The citation accompanying the incorporation by reference is not such as reasonably would enable a reasonable person to whom the rule applies readily and without charge to find and inspect the incorporated text or other material; (b) The citation accompanying the incorporation by reference is not such as reasonably would enable the joint committee readily and without charge to find and inspect the incorporated text or other material; or (c) The rule has been exempted in whole or in part from sections 121.71 to 121.74 of the Revised Code on grounds the incorporated text or other material has one or more of the characteristics described in division (B) of section 121.75 of the Revised Code, but the incorporated text or other material actually does not have any of those characteristics. (4) If the agency is subject to sections 121.95, 121.951, 121.952, and 121.953 of the Revised Code, the agency has failed to justify the retention of a rule containing a regulatory restriction. (5) The rule implements a federal law or rule in a manner that is more stringent or burdensome than the federal law or rule requires. (F) If the agency fails to comply with section 106.03 or 106.031 of the Revised Code, the joint committee shall afford the agency an opportunity to appear before the joint committee to show cause why the agency has not complied with either or both of those sections. If the agency appears before the joint committee at the time scheduled for the agency to show cause, and fails to do so, the joint committee, by vote of a majority of its members present, may recommend the adoption of a concurrent resolution invalidating the rule for the agency's failure to show cause. Or if the agency fails to appear before the joint committee at the time scheduled for the agency to show cause, the joint committee, by vote of a majority of its members present, may recommend adoption of a concurrent resolution invalidating the rule for the agency's default. (G)(1) When the joint committee recommends that a rule be invalidated for the agency's failure to show cause at an appearance before the joint committee, the recommendation does not suspend operation of the rule, and the rule remains operational pending action by the senate and house of representatives on the concurrent resolution embodying the recommendation. If the senate and house of representatives adopt the concurrent resolution, the rule is invalid. If, however, the senate and house of representatives do not adopt the resolution, the rule continues in effect, and shall next be reviewed according to the new review date assigned to the rule. (2) When the joint committee recommends that a rule be invalidated for the agency's failure to appear before the joint committee, the recommendation does not suspend operation of the rule, and the rule remains operational pending action by the senate and house of representatives on the concurrent resolution embodying the recommendation. If the senate and house of representatives adopt the concurrent resolution, the rule is invalid. If, however, the senate and house of representatives do not adopt the resolution, the rule expires in accordance with section 106.033 of the Revised Code. Sec. 106.033. Notwithstanding any provision of section 106.031 of the Revised Code to the contrary, if an agency fails to perform a review of an existing rule in accordance with section 106.03 of the Revised Code for one year after the rule's review date, the rule is invalid. The agency shall cease enforcing the rule and shall not rely on a principle of law or policy stated in the rule when conducting adjudications or other determinations of rights and liabilities or in issuing writings and other materials. The agency may institute rulemaking proceedings with regard to a rule that is invalid under this section. Sec. 107.03. (A) As used in this section, "transportation budget" means the biennial budget that primarily includes the following: (1) Motor fuel excise tax-related appropriations for the department of transportation, public works commission, and department of development; (2) Other appropriations that pertain to transportation and infrastructure related to transportation. (B) The governor shall submit a transportation budget to the general assembly not later than four weeks after the general assembly's organization. (C) The governor shall submit to the general assembly, not later than four weeks after its organization, a state budget containing a complete financial plan for the ensuing fiscal biennium, excluding items of revenue and expenditure described in section 126.022 of the Revised Code. However, in years of a new governor's inauguration, this budget shall be submitted not later than the fifteenth day of March. (D) In years of a new governor's inauguration, only the new governor shall submit a budget to the general assembly. In addition to other things required by law, each of the governor's budgets shall contain: (1) A general budget summary by function and agency setting forth the proposed total expenses from each and all funds and the anticipated resources for meeting such expenses; such resources to include any available balances in the several funds at the beginning of the biennium and a classification by totals of all revenue receipts estimated to accrue during the biennium under existing law and proposed legislation. (2) A detailed statement showing the amounts recommended to be appropriated from each fund for each fiscal year of the biennium for current expenses, including, but not limited to, personal services, supplies and materials, equipment, subsidies and revenue distribution, merchandise for resale, transfers, and nonexpense disbursements, obligations, interest on debt, and retirement of debt, and for the biennium for capital outlay, to the respective departments, offices, institutions, as defined in section 121.01 of the Revised Code, and all other public purposes; and, in comparative form, the actual expenses by source of funds during each fiscal year of the previous two bienniums for each such purpose. No alterations shall be made in the requests for the legislative and judicial branches of the state filed with the director of budget and management under section 126.02 of the Revised Code. If any amount of federal money is recommended to be appropriated or has been expended for a purpose for which state money also is recommended to be appropriated or has been expended, the amounts of federal money and state money involved shall be separately identified. (3) A detailed estimate of the revenue receipts in each fund from each source under existing laws during each year of the biennium; and, in comparative form, actual revenue receipts in each fund from each source for each year of the two previous bienniums; (4) The estimated cash balance in each fund at the beginning of the biennium covered by the budget; the estimated liabilities outstanding against each such balance; and the estimated net balance remaining and available for new appropriations; (5) A detailed estimate of the additional revenue receipts in each fund from each source under proposed legislation, if enacted, during each year of the biennium; (6) The most recent report prepared by the department of taxation under section 5703.48 of the Revised Code, which shall be submitted to the general assembly as an appendix to the governor's budget; (7) The most recent TANF spending plan prepared by the department of job and family services under section 5101.806 of the Revised Code, which shall be submitted to the general assembly as an appendix to the governor's budget; (8) The medicaid caseload and expenditure forecast report prepared by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the department of medicaid, under section 126.021 of the Revised Code. The report shall be submitted to the general assembly as a supplemental budget document to provide an in-depth analysis of the governor's budget recommendations for the medicaid budget as a whole and for each of the major medicaid appropriation items. The report shall clearly distinguish a proposed policy change from continuing law or administrative policy and indicate whether the data used throughout the report is proposed, estimated, or actual data for the current or proposed budget biennium. At a minimum, the report shall delineate a part-to-whole mapping of the state and federal shares of the general revenue fund appropriation item 651525, medicaid health care services, or any other equivalent general revenue fund appropriation item, by eligibility group and subgroup, service delivery system, delivery system, medicaid provider, and program. (E) The governor shall not submit to the general assembly a state budget that suspends the operation of section 131.44 of the Revised Code for the fiscal year immediately prior to the biennium covered by the budget resulting in a beginning cash balance for the general revenue fund for the biennium covered by the budget that is greater than the ending fund balance required by section 131.44 of the Revised Code, excluding any encumbered funds that are to be disbursed in the biennium covered by the budget. Sec. 107.032. As used in sections 107.033 to 107.035 of the Revised Code: (A) "Aggregate general revenue fund appropriations" means all appropriations made by the general assembly either directly from the general revenue fund appropriations made by the general assembly or indirectly from any nongeneral revenue fund supported by cash transfers from the general revenue fund except for the following: (1) Appropriations of money received from the federal government; (2) Appropriations made for tax relief or refunds of taxes and other overpayments; (3) Appropriations of money received as gifts. (B) "Rate of inflation" means the percentage increase or decrease in the consumer price index over a one-year period, based on the most recent consumer price index for all urban consumers, midwest region, all items, as determined by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor or, if that index is no longer published, a generally available comparable index. (C) "Rate of population change" means the percentage increase or decrease in the population of this state over a one-year period, based on the most recent population data available for the state published by the bureau of the census of the United States department of commerce, or its successor in responsibility, in the population estimates program, or its successive equivalent. (D) "Recast fiscal year" means fiscal years 2012, 2016, 2020, and each fourth fiscal year thereafter. Sec. 107.033. As part of the state budget the governor submits to the general assembly under section 107.03 of the Revised Code, the governor shall include the state appropriation limitations the general assembly shall not exceed when making aggregate general revenue fund appropriations for each respective fiscal year of the biennium covered by that budget. The aggregate general revenue fund appropriations the governor proposes in the state budget also shall not exceed those limitations for each respective fiscal year of the biennium covered by that budget. As part of this submission, the governor shall identify all nongeneral revenue fund appropriation line items that are subject to the state appropriation limitation for the current fiscal year. If the governor decides to continue funding any of those nongeneral revenue fund line items, the governor shall, to the greatest extent possible, propose funding for those nongeneral revenue fund line items from the general revenue fund for each respective fiscal year of the biennium covered by that budget. Also as part of this submission, the governor shall include a table listing any remaining nongeneral revenue fund appropriation line items that are subject to the state appropriation limitation for the current fiscal year and for each respective fiscal year of the biennium covered by that budget. (A) For fiscal year 2008, the state appropriation limitation is the sum of the following: (1) The aggregate general revenue fund appropriations for fiscal year 2007; plus (2) The aggregate general revenue fund appropriations for fiscal year 2007 multiplied by either three and one-half per cent, or the sum of the rate of inflation plus the rate of population change, whichever is greater. (B) For each fiscal year thereafter that is not a recast fiscal year, the state appropriation limitation is the sum of the following: (1) The state appropriation limitation for the previous fiscal year; plus (2) The state appropriation limitation for the previous fiscal year multiplied by either three and one-half per cent, or the sum of the rate of inflation plus the rate of population change, whichever is greater. (C)(B) For each recast fiscal year, the state appropriation limitation is the sum of the following: (1) The aggregate general revenue fund appropriations for the previous fiscal year; plus (2) The aggregate general revenue fund appropriations for the previous fiscal year multiplied by either three and one-half per cent, or the sum of the rate of inflation plus the rate of population change, whichever is greater. (D)(C) The state appropriation limitation for a fiscal year shall be increased by the amount of a nongeneral revenue fund appropriation made in the immediately preceding fiscal year, if all of the following apply to the nongeneral revenue fund appropriation: (1) It was made on or after July 1, 2013. (2) It is included in the aggregate general revenue fund appropriations proposed for that fiscal year. (3) It is being made for the first time from the general revenue fund. (D) The main operating appropriations act shall contain a list of all nongeneral revenue fund appropriation line items subject to the state appropriation limitations under this section. Sec. 107.034. For the purpose of calculations made on and after the effective date of this section, any tax revenue credited to the general revenue fund under section 113.09 of the Revised Code any time during fiscal years 2026 and 2027 shall be considered a general revenue fund tax source to fund general revenue fund appropriations for each succeeding fiscal year with respect to the determination of the state appropriation limitations under section 107.033 of the Revised Code, even if that tax revenue is subsequently credited to a nongeneral revenue fund account. An appropriation made from that nongeneral revenue fund account shall be considered as if it were made from the general revenue fund. Sec. 107.12. (A) As used in this section, "organization" means a faith-based or other organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, and provides charitable services to needy residents of this state. (B) There is hereby established within the office of the governor the governor's office of faith-based and community initiatives. The office shall: (1) Serve as a clearinghouse of information on federal, state, and local funding for charitable services performed by organizations; (2) Encourage organizations to seek public funding for their charitable services; (3) Assist local, state, and federal agencies in coordinating their activities to secure maximum use of funds and efforts that benefit people receiving charitable services from organizations; (4) Advise the governor, general assembly, and the advisory board of the governor's office of faith-based and community initiatives on the barriers that exist to collaboration between organizations and governmental entities and on ways to remove the barriers. (C) The governor shall appoint an executive director and such other staff as may be necessary to manage the office and perform or oversee the performance of the duties of the office. Within sixty days after being appointed, and every twelve months thereafter, the executive director shall distribute to the advisory board and review with the board a strategic plan. The executive director shall report to the board at least quarterly on proposed initiatives and policies. A report shall include the condition of the budget and the finances of the office. (D)(1) There is hereby created the advisory board of the governor's office of faith-based and community initiatives. The board shall consist of the following members: (a) Four individuals appointed by the governor; (b) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (c) One member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate; (d) Two individuals to represent the faith-based and other nonprofit community, one appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one appointed by the president of the senate. (2) Members of the house of representatives and of the senate who are appointed to serve on the advisory board shall serve on the board for the duration of the general assembly during which they were appointed. Terms of the office for all other members of the advisory board shall be one year. Any vacancy that occurs on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (3) Members of the board are not entitled to compensation, but public members appointed by the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses that are incurred in relation to board meetings. (4) The board shall be presided over by a chairperson and a vice-chairperson, who shall be the members of the board who are also members of the house of representatives or the senate. Annually on the first day of January, the chairpersonship and vice-chairpersonship shall alternate between the members of the house of representatives and the senate. The member of the senate shall be the chairperson during the first regular session of a general assembly and the member of the house of representatives shall be the chairperson during the second regular session of the general assembly. (E) The board shall have the following duties: (1) Provide direction, guidance, and oversight to the office; (2) Assist in the dissemination of information about, and in the stimulation of public awareness of, the service programs supported by the office; (3) Review the budget and finances of the office, proposed initiatives and policies, and the executive director's annual strategic plan at board meetings; (4) Provide feedback for and proposed modifications of the executive director's strategic plan. Within forty-five days after submitting a strategic plan, the executive director shall contact each advisory board member to obtain feedback. With the approval of the advisory board chairperson, the executive director shall lead a strategic plan discussion at the first board meeting following the distribution of the strategic plan. (5) Publish a report of its activities and accomplishments on or before the first day of August of each year, and deliver copies of the report to the governor, the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives, and the president and minority leader of the senate. (F) No member of the board or organization that the member is affiliated or involved with is eligible to receive any grant that the office administers or assists in administering. Sec. 109.02. The attorney general is the chief law officer for the state and all its departments and shall be provided with adequate office space in Columbus. Except as provided in division (E) of section 120.06 and in sections 101.55, 107.13, and 3517.152 to 3517.157 3517.14 to 3517.18 of the Revised Code, no state officer or board, or head of a department or institution of the state shall employ, or be represented by, other counsel or attorneys at law. The attorney general shall appear for the state in the trial and argument of all civil and criminal causes in the supreme court in which the state is directly or indirectly interested. When required by the governor or the general assembly, the attorney general shall appear for the state in any court or tribunal in a cause in which the state is a party, or in which the state is directly interested. Upon the written request of the governor, the attorney general shall prosecute any person indicted for a crime. Sec. 103.73 109.39. (A) The correctional institution inspection committee shall do all of the following: (1) Subject to division (C) of this section, establish There is, as a section within the office of the attorney general, an office of correctional facility inspection services. The office shall establish and maintain a continuing program of inspection of each state correctional institution used for the custody, control, training, and rehabilitation of persons convicted of crime and of each private correctional facility. Subject to division (C) of this section, the committee may inspect ; any local correctional institution used for the same purposes; and any youth services facility. Subject to division (C) of this section, the committee, and each member of the committee, for the purpose of making an inspection pursuant to this section, shall have access to any state or local correctional institution, to any private correctional facility, or to any part of the institution or facility and shall not be required to give advance notice of, or to make prior arrangements before conducting, an inspection. Each inspection shall include an evaluation of the inmate grievance procedure, compliance with meal requirements, at least one review of rehabilitative or educational programs, and any other compliance area the office determines is appropriate. Not later than the last day of January of each year, the office shall submit a report on its findings from the previous calendar year to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. (2) Evaluate and (B) The correctional facility inspection services office may assist the attorney general and correctional facility leadership in the development and evaluation of programs to improve the condition or operation of correctional the facilities or institutions listed in division (A) of this section; (3) Prepare a report for submission to the succeeding general assembly of the findings the committee makes in its inspections and of any programs that have been proposed or developed to improve the condition or operation of the correctional institutions in the state. The report shall contain a separate evaluation of the inmate grievance procedure at each state correctional institution. The committee shall submit the report to the succeeding general assembly within fifteen days after commencement of that general assembly's first regular session. (B) Subject to division (C) of this section, the committee shall make an inspection of each state correctional institution each biennium and of each private correctional facility each biennium. The inspection shall include attendance at one general meal period and one rehabilitative or educational program (C) The office of correctional facility inspection services shall not be required to give advance notice of, or to make prior arrangements before conducting, an inspection under division (A) of this section. (C) An inspection of a state correctional institution, a private correctional facility, or a local correctional institution under division (A) or (B) of this section or under section 103.74 of the Revised Code, or an inspection under section 103.76 of the Revised Code, is subject to and shall be conducted in accordance with all of the following: (1) The inspection shall not be conducted unless the chairperson of the committee grants prior approval for the inspection. (2) The inspection shall be conducted by at least one staff member of the committee and may include one or more of the members appointed to the committee. (3) Unless the chairperson of the committee determines that the inspection must be conducted outside of normal business hours for any reason, including emergency circumstances or a justifiable cause that perpetuates the mission of the committee, and the chairperson specifies in the grant of prior approval for the inspection that the chairperson has so determined, the inspection shall be conducted only during normal business hours. If the chairperson determines that the inspection must be conducted outside of normal business hours and the chairperson specifies in the grant of prior approval for the inspection that the chairperson has so determined, the inspection may be conducted outside of normal business hours. (D) The attorney general shall provide adequate office space, staff, equipment, and materials to the correctional facility inspection services office. (E) The total costs of each inspection conducted under this section shall be recovered by the attorney general from the department of corrections and rehabilitation or the department of youth services. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Local public entity," "out-of-state prisoner," and "private contractor" have the same meanings as in section 9.07 of the Revised Code. (2) "Private correctional facility" means a correctional facility in this state that houses out-of-state prisoners and that is operated by a private contractor under a contract with a local public entity pursuant to section 9.07 of the Revised Code. "Youth services facility" means a facility operated, or contracted for, by the department of youth services that is used for the care, protection, treatment, or secure confinement of any child committed to the department's custody. Sec. 109.71. There is hereby created in the office of the attorney general the Ohio peace officer training commission. The commission shall consist of ten members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate and selected as follows: one member representing the public; one member who represents a fraternal organization representing law enforcement officers; two members who are incumbent sheriffs; two members who are incumbent chiefs of police; one member from the bureau of criminal identification and investigation; one member from the state highway patrol; one member who is the special agent in charge of a field office of the federal bureau of investigation in this state; and one member from the department of education and workforce, trade and industrial education services, law enforcement training. This section does not confer any arrest authority or any ability or authority to detain a person, write or issue any citation, or provide any disposition alternative, as granted under Chapter 2935. of the Revised Code. Pursuant to division (A)(9) of section 101.82 of the Revised Code, the The commission is exempt from the requirements of sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code. As used in sections 109.71 to 109.801 of the Revised Code: (A) "Peace officer" means: (1) A deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, member of the organized police department of a township or municipal corporation, member of a township police district or joint police district police force, member of a police force employed by a metropolitan housing authority under division (D) of section 3735.31 of the Revised Code, or township constable, who is commissioned and employed as a peace officer by a political subdivision of this state or by a metropolitan housing authority, and whose primary duties are to preserve the peace, to protect life and property, and to enforce the laws of this state, ordinances of a municipal corporation, resolutions of a township, or regulations of a board of county commissioners or board of township trustees, or any of those laws, ordinances, resolutions, or regulations; (2) A police officer who is employed by a railroad company and appointed and commissioned by the secretary of state pursuant to sections 4973.17 to 4973.22 of the Revised Code; (3) Employees of the department of taxation engaged in the enforcement of Chapter 5743. of the Revised Code and designated by the tax commissioner for peace officer training for purposes of the delegation of investigation powers under section 5743.45 of the Revised Code; (4) An undercover drug agent; (5) Enforcement agents of the department of public safety whom the director of public safety designates under section 5502.14 of the Revised Code; (6) An employee of the department of natural resources who is a natural resources law enforcement staff officer designated pursuant to section 1501.013, a natural resources officer appointed pursuant to section 1501.24, a forest-fire investigator appointed pursuant to section 1503.09, or a wildlife officer designated pursuant to section 1531.13 of the Revised Code; (7) An employee of a park district who is designated pursuant to section 511.232 or 1545.13 of the Revised Code; (8) An employee of a conservancy district who is designated pursuant to section 6101.75 of the Revised Code; (9) A police officer who is employed by a hospital that employs and maintains its own proprietary police department or security department, and who is appointed and commissioned by the secretary of state pursuant to sections 4973.17 to 4973.22 of the Revised Code; (10) Veterans' homes police officers designated under section 5907.02 of the Revised Code; (11) A police officer who is employed by a qualified nonprofit corporation police department pursuant to section 1702.80 of the Revised Code; (12) A state university law enforcement officer appointed under section 3345.04 of the Revised Code or a person serving as a state university law enforcement officer on a permanent basis on June 19, 1978, who has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program; (13) A special police officer employed by the department of mental health and addiction services pursuant to section 5119.08 of the Revised Code or the department of developmental disabilities pursuant to section 5123.13 of the Revised Code; (14) A member of a campus police department appointed under section 1713.50 of the Revised Code; (15) A member of a police force employed by a regional transit authority under division (Y) of section 306.35 of the Revised Code; (16) Investigators appointed by the auditor of state pursuant to section 117.091 of the Revised Code and engaged in the enforcement of Chapter 117. of the Revised Code; (17) A special police officer designated by the superintendent of the state highway patrol pursuant to section 5503.09 of the Revised Code or a person who was serving as a special police officer pursuant to that section on a permanent basis on October 21, 1997, and who has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program; (18) A special police officer employed by a port authority under section 4582.04 or 4582.28 of the Revised Code or a person serving as a special police officer employed by a port authority on a permanent basis on May 17, 2000, who has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program; (19) A special police officer employed by a municipal corporation who has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission for satisfactory completion of an approved peace officer basic training program and who is employed on a permanent basis on or after March 19, 2003, at a municipal airport, or other municipal air navigation facility, that has scheduled operations, as defined in section 119.3 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, 14 C.F.R. 119.3, as amended, and that is required to be under a security program and is governed by aviation security rules of the transportation security administration of the United States department of transportation as provided in Parts 1542. and 1544. of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended; (20) A police officer who is employed by an owner or operator of an amusement park that has an average yearly attendance in excess of six hundred thousand guests and that employs and maintains its own proprietary police department or security department, and who is appointed and commissioned by a judge of the appropriate municipal court or county court pursuant to section 4973.17 of the Revised Code; (21) A police officer who is employed by a bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit union, or association of banks, savings and loan associations, savings banks, or credit unions, who has been appointed and commissioned by the secretary of state pursuant to sections 4973.17 to 4973.22 of the Revised Code, and who has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of a state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program; (22) An investigator, as defined in section 109.541 of the Revised Code, of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation who is commissioned by the superintendent of the bureau as a special agent for the purpose of assisting law enforcement officers or providing emergency assistance to peace officers pursuant to authority granted under that section; (23) A state fire marshal law enforcement officer appointed under section 3737.22 of the Revised Code or a person serving as a state fire marshal law enforcement officer on a permanent basis on or after July 1, 1982, who has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program; (24) A gaming agent employed under section 3772.03 of the Revised Code; (25) An employee of the state board of pharmacy designated by the executive director of the board pursuant to section 4729.04 of the Revised Code to investigate violations of Chapters 2925., 3715., 3719., 3796., 4729., and 4752. of the Revised Code and rules adopted thereunder. (B) "Undercover drug agent" has the same meaning as in division (B)(2) of section 109.79 of the Revised Code. (C) "Crisis intervention training" means training in the use of interpersonal and communication skills to most effectively and sensitively interview victims of rape. (D) "Missing children" has the same meaning as in section 2901.30 of the Revised Code. (E) "Tactical medical professional" means an EMT, EMT-basic, AEMT, EMT-I, paramedic, nurse, or physician who is trained and certified in a nationally recognized tactical medical training program that is equivalent to "tactical combat casualty care" (TCCC) and "tactical emergency medical support" (TEMS) and who functions in the tactical or austere environment while attached to a law enforcement agency of either this state or a political subdivision of this state. (F) "EMT-basic," "EMT-I," and "paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code and "EMT" and "AEMT" have the same meanings as in section 4765.011 of the Revised Code. (G) "Nurse" means any of the following: (1) Any person who is licensed to practice nursing as a registered nurse by the board of nursing; (2) Any certified nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist, certified registered nurse anesthetist, or certified nurse-midwife who holds a certificate of authority issued by the board of nursing under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code; (3) Any person who is licensed to practice nursing as a licensed practical nurse by the board of nursing pursuant to Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (H) "Physician" means a person who is licensed pursuant to Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (I) "County correctional officer" has the same meaning as in section 341.41 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) "Fire investigator" means an employee of a fire department charged with investigating fires and explosions who has been authorized, in accordance with sections 737.27 and 3737.24 of the Revised Code, to perform the duties of investigating the origin and cause of fires and explosions using the scientific method to investigate elements of the event including the circumstances, actions, persons, means, and motives that resulted in the fire or explosion or the report of a fire or explosion within this state. (2) "Fire investigator" does not include a person who is acting as a fire investigator on behalf of an insurance company or any other privately owned or operated enterprise. (K) "Fire department" means a fire department of the state or an instrumentality of the state or of a municipal corporation, township, joint fire district, or other political subdivision. (L) "At-risk youth" means an individual who is all of the following: (1) Under twenty-one years of age; (2) One of the following: (a) At risk of becoming an abused, neglected, or dependent child, delinquent or unruly child, or juvenile traffic offender; (b) An abused, neglected, or dependent child, delinquent or unruly child, or juvenile traffic offender. (3) Residing in a state correctional institution, a department of youth services institution, or a residential facility. (M) "Residential facility" has the same meaning as in section 2151.46 of the Revised Code. Sec. 109.73. (A) The Ohio peace officer training commission shall recommend rules to the attorney general with respect to all of the following: (1) The approval, or revocation of approval, of peace officer training schools administered by the state, counties, municipal corporations, public school districts, technical college districts, and the department of natural resources; (2) Minimum courses of study, attendance requirements, and equipment and facilities to be required at approved state, county, municipal, and department of natural resources peace officer training schools; (3) Minimum qualifications for instructors at approved state, county, municipal, and department of natural resources peace officer training schools; (4) The requirements of minimum basic training that peace officers appointed to probationary terms shall complete before being eligible for permanent appointment, which requirements shall include training in the handling of the offense of domestic violence, other types of domestic violence-related offenses and incidents, and protection orders and consent agreements issued or approved under section 2919.26 or 3113.31 of the Revised Code; crisis intervention training; and training in the handling of missing children and child abuse and neglect cases; and training in handling violations of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code; and the time within which such basic training shall be completed following appointment to a probationary term; (5) The requirements of minimum basic training that peace officers not appointed for probationary terms but appointed on other than a permanent basis shall complete in order to be eligible for continued employment or permanent appointment, which requirements shall include training in the handling of the offense of domestic violence, other types of domestic violence-related offenses and incidents, and protection orders and consent agreements issued or approved under section 2919.26 or 3113.31 of the Revised Code, crisis intervention training, and training in the handling of missing children and child abuse and neglect cases, and training in handling violations of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code, and the time within which such basic training shall be completed following appointment on other than a permanent basis; (6) Categories or classifications of advanced in-service training programs for peace officers, including programs in the handling of the offense of domestic violence, other types of domestic violence-related offenses and incidents, and protection orders and consent agreements issued or approved under section 2919.26 or 3113.31 of the Revised Code, in crisis intervention, and in the handling of missing children and child abuse and neglect cases, and in handling violations of section 2905.32 of the Revised Code, and minimum courses of study and attendance requirements with respect to such categories or classifications; (7) Permitting persons, who are employed as members of a campus police department appointed under section 1713.50 of the Revised Code; who are employed as police officers by a qualified nonprofit corporation police department pursuant to section 1702.80 of the Revised Code; who are appointed and commissioned as bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit union, or association of banks, savings and loan associations, savings banks, or credit unions police officers, as railroad police officers, or as hospital police officers pursuant to sections 4973.17 to 4973.22 of the Revised Code; or who are appointed and commissioned as amusement park police officers pursuant to section 4973.17 of the Revised Code, to attend approved peace officer training schools, including the Ohio peace officer training academy, and to receive certificates of satisfactory completion of basic training programs, if the private college or university that established the campus police department; qualified nonprofit corporation police department; bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, credit union, or association of banks, savings and loan associations, savings banks, or credit unions; railroad company; hospital; or amusement park sponsoring the police officers pays the entire cost of the training and certification and if trainee vacancies are available; (8) Permitting undercover drug agents to attend approved peace officer training schools, other than the Ohio peace officer training academy, and to receive certificates of satisfactory completion of basic training programs, if, for each undercover drug agent, the county, township, or municipal corporation that employs that undercover drug agent pays the entire cost of the training and certification; (9)(a) The requirements for basic training programs for bailiffs and deputy bailiffs of courts of record of this state and for criminal investigators employed by the state public defender that those persons shall complete before they may carry a firearm while on duty; (b) The requirements for any training received by a bailiff or deputy bailiff of a court of record of this state or by a criminal investigator employed by the state public defender prior to June 6, 1986, that is to be considered equivalent to the training described in division (A)(9)(a) of this section. (10) Establishing minimum qualifications and requirements for certification for dogs utilized by law enforcement agencies; (11) Establishing minimum requirements for certification of persons who are employed as correction officers in a full-service jail, five-day facility, or eight-hour holding facility or who provide correction services in such a jail or facility; (12) Establishing requirements for the training of humane society agents under section 1717.061 of the Revised Code, including, without limitation, a requirement that the agents receive instruction on traditional animal husbandry methods and training techniques, including customary owner-performed practices; (13) Permitting tactical medical professionals to attend approved peace officer training schools, including the Ohio peace officer training academy, to receive training of the type described in division (A)(14) of this section and to receive certificates of satisfactory completion of training programs described in that division; (14) The requirements for training programs that tactical medical professionals shall complete to qualify them to carry firearms while on duty under section 109.771 of the Revised Code, which requirements shall include at least the firearms training specified in division (A) of section 109.748 of the Revised Code; (15) Procedures and requirements for a portion of basic training that peace officers complete in proper interactions with civilians during traffic stops and other in-person encounters as specified in division (B)(4) of section 109.803 of the Revised Code and including the topics of instruction listed for active duty peace officers under divisions (B)(4)(a) to (d) of that section; (16) Permitting county correctional officers to attend approved peace officer training schools, including the Ohio peace officer training academy, to receive training of the type described in division (A)(17) of this section, and to receive certificates of satisfactory completion of basic training programs described in that division; (17) The requirements for basic training programs that county correctional officers shall complete to qualify them to carry firearms while on duty under section 109.772 of the Revised Code, which requirements shall include the firearms training specified in section 109.773 of the Revised Code; (18) Permitting fire investigators to attend approved peace officer training schools, including the Ohio peace officer training academy, to receive training of the type described in division (A)(19) of this section, and to receive certificates of satisfactory completion of training programs described in that division; (19) The requirements for training programs that fire investigators shall complete to qualify them to carry firearms while on duty under section 109.774 of the Revised Code, which requirements shall include at least the firearms training specified in division (A) of section 109.7481 of the Revised Code; (20) The requirements for refresher training under division (M) of section 109.77 of the Revised Code. (B) The commission shall appoint an executive director, with the approval of the attorney general, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the commission. The executive director shall perform such duties assigned by the commission. The executive director shall receive a salary fixed pursuant to Chapter 124. of the Revised Code and reimbursement for expenses within the amounts available by appropriation. The executive director may appoint officers, employees, agents, and consultants as the executive director considers necessary, prescribe their duties, and provide for reimbursement of their expenses within the amounts available for reimbursement by appropriation and with the approval of the commission. (C) The commission may do all of the following: (1) Recommend studies, surveys, and reports to be made by the executive director regarding the carrying out of the objectives and purposes of sections 109.71 to 109.77 of the Revised Code; (2) Visit and inspect any peace officer training school that has been approved by the executive director or for which application for approval has been made; (3) Make recommendations, from time to time, to the executive director, the attorney general, and the general assembly regarding the carrying out of the purposes of sections 109.71 to 109.77 of the Revised Code; (4) Report to the attorney general from time to time, and to the governor and the general assembly at least annually, concerning the activities of the commission; (5) Establish fees for the services the commission offers under sections 109.71 to 109.79 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, fees for training, certification, and testing; (6) Perform such other acts as are necessary or appropriate to carry out the powers and duties of the commission as set forth in sections 109.71 to 109.77 of the Revised Code. (D) In establishing the requirements, under division (A)(12) of this section, the commission may consider any portions of the curriculum for instruction on the topic of animal husbandry practices, if any, of the Ohio state university college of veterinary medicine. No person or entity that fails to provide instruction on traditional animal husbandry methods and training techniques, including customary owner-performed practices, shall qualify to train a humane society agent for appointment under section 1717.06 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) As used in this division, "license" has the same meaning as in section 4796.01 of the Revised Code, except that it includes a certificate of completion of a training program required under sections 109.71 to 109.804 of the Revised Code. "License" does not include a certificate of completion of a firearm basic training program under division (B)(1) of section 109.78 of the Revised Code or a certificate of completion of any firearm requalification training program. (2) Notwithstanding any requirement for a license issued by the commission, the commission shall issue a license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (a) The individual holds a license in another state. (b) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter in the same profession, occupation, or occupational activity as the profession, occupation, or occupational activity for which the license is required in this state in a state that does not require such a license. Sec. 109.77. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Felony" has the same meaning as in section 109.511 of the Revised Code. (2) "Companion animal" has the same meaning as in section 959.131 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Notwithstanding any general, special, or local law or charter to the contrary, and except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall receive an original appointment on a permanent basis as any of the following unless the person previously has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program: (a) A peace officer of any county, township, municipal corporation, regional transit authority, or metropolitan housing authority; (b) A natural resources law enforcement staff officer, forest-fire investigator, wildlife officer, or natural resources officer of the department of natural resources; (c) An employee of a park district under section 511.232 or 1545.13 of the Revised Code; (d) An employee of a conservancy district who is designated pursuant to section 6101.75 of the Revised Code; (e) A state university law enforcement officer; (f) A special police officer employed by the department of mental health and addiction services pursuant to section 5119.08 of the Revised Code or the department of developmental disabilities pursuant to section 5123.13 of the Revised Code; (g) An enforcement agent of the department of public safety whom the director of public safety designates under section 5502.14 of the Revised Code; (h) A special police officer employed by a port authority under section 4582.04 or 4582.28 of the Revised Code; (i) A special police officer employed by a municipal corporation at a municipal airport, or other municipal air navigation facility, that has scheduled operations, as defined in section 119.3 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, 14 C.F.R. 119.3, as amended, and that is required to be under a security program and is governed by aviation security rules of the transportation security administration of the United States department of transportation as provided in Parts 1542. and 1544. of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended; (j) A gaming agent employed under section 3772.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Every person who is appointed on a temporary basis or for a probationary term or on other than a permanent basis as any of the following shall forfeit the appointed position unless the person previously has completed satisfactorily or, within the time prescribed by rules adopted by the attorney general pursuant to section 109.74 of the Revised Code, satisfactorily completes a state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program for temporary or probationary officers and is awarded a certificate by the director attesting to the satisfactory completion of the program: (a) A peace officer of any county, township, municipal corporation, regional transit authority, or metropolitan housing authority; (b) A natural resources law enforcement staff officer, park officer, forest officer, preserve officer, wildlife officer, or state watercraft officer of the department of natural resources; (c) An employee of a park district under section 511.232 or 1545.13 of the Revised Code; (d) An employee of a conservancy district who is designated pursuant to section 6101.75 of the Revised Code; (e) A special police officer employed by the department of mental health and addiction services pursuant to section 5119.08 of the Revised Code or the department of developmental disabilities pursuant to section 5123.13 of the Revised Code; (f) An enforcement agent of the department of public safety whom the director of public safety designates under section 5502.14 of the Revised Code; (g) A special police officer employed by a port authority under section 4582.04 or 4582.28 of the Revised Code; (h) A special police officer employed by a municipal corporation at a municipal airport, or other municipal air navigation facility, that has scheduled operations, as defined in section 119.3 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, 14 C.F.R. 119.3, as amended, and that is required to be under a security program and is governed by aviation security rules of the transportation security administration of the United States department of transportation as provided in Parts 1542. and 1544. of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended. (3) For purposes of division (B) of this section, a state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program, regardless of whether the program is to be completed by peace officers appointed on a permanent or temporary, probationary, or other nonpermanent basis, shall include training in the handling of the offense of domestic violence, other types of domestic violence-related offenses and incidents, protection orders and consent agreements issued or approved under section 2919.26 or 3113.31 of the Revised Code, crisis intervention training, and training on companion animal encounters and companion animal behavior. The requirement to complete training in the handling of the offense of domestic violence, other types of domestic violence-related offenses and incidents, and protection orders and consent agreements issued or approved under section 2919.26 or 3113.31 of the Revised Code does not apply to any person serving as a peace officer on March 27, 1979, and the requirement to complete training in crisis intervention does not apply to any person serving as a peace officer on April 4, 1985. Any person who is serving as a peace officer on April 4, 1985, who terminates that employment after that date, and who subsequently is hired as a peace officer by the same or another law enforcement agency shall complete training in crisis intervention as prescribed by rules adopted by the attorney general pursuant to section 109.742 of the Revised Code. No peace officer shall have employment as a peace officer terminated and then be reinstated with intent to circumvent this section. (4) Division (B) of this section does not apply to any person serving on a permanent basis on March 28, 1985, as a park officer, forest officer, preserve officer, wildlife officer, or state watercraft officer of the department of natural resources or as an employee of a park district under section 511.232 or 1545.13 of the Revised Code, to any person serving on a permanent basis on March 6, 1986, as an employee of a conservancy district designated pursuant to section 6101.75 of the Revised Code, to any person serving on a permanent basis on January 10, 1991, as a preserve officer of the department of natural resources, to any person employed on a permanent basis on July 2, 1992, as a special police officer by the department of mental health and addiction services pursuant to section 5119.08 of the Revised Code or by the department of developmental disabilities pursuant to section 5123.13 of the Revised Code, to any person serving on a permanent basis on May 17, 2000, as a special police officer employed by a port authority under section 4582.04 or 4582.28 of the Revised Code, to any person serving on a permanent basis on March 19, 2003, as a special police officer employed by a municipal corporation at a municipal airport or other municipal air navigation facility described in division (A)(19) of section 109.71 of the Revised Code, to any person serving on a permanent basis on June 19, 1978, as a state university law enforcement officer pursuant to section 3345.04 of the Revised Code and who, immediately prior to June 19, 1978, was serving as a special police officer designated under authority of that section, or to any person serving on a permanent basis on September 20, 1984, as a liquor control investigator, known after June 30, 1999, as an enforcement agent of the department of public safety, engaged in the enforcement of Chapters 4301. and 4303. of the Revised Code. (5) Division (B) of this section does not apply to any person who is appointed as a regional transit authority police officer pursuant to division (Y) of section 306.35 of the Revised Code if, on or before July 1, 1996, the person has completed satisfactorily an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program and has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of such an approved program and if, on July 1, 1996, the person is performing peace officer functions for a regional transit authority. (C) No person, after September 20, 1984, shall receive an original appointment on a permanent basis as a veterans' home police officer designated under section 5907.02 of the Revised Code unless the person previously has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of an approved police officer basic training program. Every person who is appointed on a temporary basis or for a probationary term or on other than a permanent basis as a veterans' home police officer designated under section 5907.02 of the Revised Code shall forfeit that position unless the person previously has completed satisfactorily or, within one year from the time of appointment, satisfactorily completes an approved police officer basic training program. (D) No bailiff or deputy bailiff of a court of record of this state and no criminal investigator who is employed by the state public defender shall carry a firearm, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code, while on duty unless the bailiff, deputy bailiff, or criminal investigator has done or received one of the following: (1) Has been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission, which certificate attests to satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, or municipal basic training program for bailiffs and deputy bailiffs of courts of record and for criminal investigators employed by the state public defender that has been recommended by the Ohio peace officer training commission; (2) Has successfully completed a firearms training program approved by the Ohio peace officer training commission prior to employment as a bailiff, deputy bailiff, or criminal investigator; (3) Prior to June 6, 1986, was authorized to carry a firearm by the court that employed the bailiff or deputy bailiff or, in the case of a criminal investigator, by the state public defender and has received training in the use of firearms that the Ohio peace officer training commission determines is equivalent to the training that otherwise is required by division (D) of this section. (E)(1) Before a person seeking a certificate completes an approved peace officer basic training program, the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission shall request the person to disclose, and the person shall disclose, any previous criminal conviction of or plea of guilty of that person to a felony. (2) Before a person seeking a certificate completes an approved peace officer basic training program, the executive director shall request a criminal history records check on the person. The executive director shall submit the person's fingerprints to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, which shall submit the fingerprints to the federal bureau of investigation for a national criminal history records check. Upon receipt of the executive director's request, the bureau of criminal identification and investigation and the federal bureau of investigation shall conduct a criminal history records check on the person and, upon completion of the check, shall provide a copy of the criminal history records check to the executive director. The executive director shall not award any certificate prescribed in this section unless the executive director has received a copy of the criminal history records check on the person to whom the certificate is to be awarded. (3) The executive director of the commission shall not award a certificate prescribed in this section to a person who has been convicted of or has pleaded guilty to a felony or who fails to disclose any previous criminal conviction of or plea of guilty to a felony as required under division (E)(1) of this section. (4) The executive director of the commission shall revoke the certificate awarded to a person as prescribed in this section, and that person shall forfeit all of the benefits derived from being certified as a peace officer under this section, if the person, before completion of an approved peace officer basic training program, failed to disclose any previous criminal conviction of or plea of guilty to a felony as required under division (E)(1) of this section. (F)(1) Regardless of whether the person has been awarded the certificate or has been classified as a peace officer prior to, on, or after October 16, 1996, the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission shall revoke any certificate that has been awarded to a person as prescribed in this section if the person does either of the following: (a) Pleads guilty to a felony committed on or after January 1, 1997; (b) Pleads guilty to a misdemeanor committed on or after January 1, 1997, pursuant to a negotiated plea agreement as provided in division (D) of section 2929.43 of the Revised Code in which the person agrees to surrender the certificate awarded to the person under this section. (2) The executive director of the commission shall suspend any certificate that has been awarded to a person as prescribed in this section if the person is convicted, after trial, of a felony committed on or after January 1, 1997. The executive director shall suspend the certificate pursuant to division (F)(2) of this section pending the outcome of an appeal by the person from that conviction to the highest court to which the appeal is taken or until the expiration of the period in which an appeal is required to be filed. If the person files an appeal that results in that person's acquittal of the felony or conviction of a misdemeanor, or in the dismissal of the felony charge against that person, the executive director shall reinstate the certificate awarded to the person under this section. If the person files an appeal from that person's conviction of the felony and the conviction is upheld by the highest court to which the appeal is taken or if the person does not file a timely appeal, the executive director shall revoke the certificate awarded to the person under this section. (G)(1) If a person is awarded a certificate under this section and the certificate is revoked pursuant to division (E)(4) or (F) of this section, the person shall not be eligible to receive, at any time, a certificate attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of a peace officer basic training program. (2) The revocation or suspension of a certificate under division (E)(4) or (F) of this section shall be in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (H)(1) A person who was employed as a peace officer of a county, township, or municipal corporation of the state on January 1, 1966, and who has completed at least sixteen years of full-time active service as such a peace officer, or equivalent service as determined by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission, may receive an original appointment on a permanent basis and serve as a peace officer of a county, township, or municipal corporation, or as a state university law enforcement officer, without complying with the requirements of division (B) of this section. (2) Any person who held an appointment as a state highway trooper on January 1, 1966, may receive an original appointment on a permanent basis and serve as a peace officer of a county, township, or municipal corporation, or as a state university law enforcement officer, without complying with the requirements of division (B) of this section. (I) No person who is appointed as a peace officer of a county, township, or municipal corporation on or after April 9, 1985, shall serve as a peace officer of that county, township, or municipal corporation unless the person has received training in the handling of missing children and child abuse and neglect cases from an approved state, county, township, or municipal police officer basic training program or receives the training within the time prescribed by rules adopted by the attorney general pursuant to section 109.741 of the Revised Code. (J) No part of any approved state, county, or municipal basic training program for bailiffs and deputy bailiffs of courts of record and no part of any approved state, county, or municipal basic training program for criminal investigators employed by the state public defender shall be used as credit toward the completion by a peace officer of any part of the approved state, county, or municipal peace officer basic training program that the peace officer is required by this section to complete satisfactorily. (K) This section does not apply to any member of the police department of a municipal corporation in an adjoining state serving in this state under a contract pursuant to section 737.04 of the Revised Code. (L) The executive director of the commission shall issue a certificate of completion of a training program required under this section in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (1) The individual holds a certificate of completion of such a program in another state. (2) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter in the same profession, occupation, or occupational activity as the profession, occupation, or occupational activity for which the certificate is required in this state in a state that does not require completion of such a training program. (M)(1) Except as provided in division (M)(2) of this section, no certificate awarded by the executive director of the Ohio peace officer training commission attesting to a person's satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program shall be deemed insufficient for an appointment to a position listed in division (B)(1) of this section because of a lapse in the person's service as a peace officer. (2) The Ohio peace officer training commission shall require a re-appointed peace officer to complete refresher training of the following duration prior to performing the functions of a peace officer, if the peace officer, having previously been awarded a certificate by the executive director of the commission attesting to the person's satisfactory completion of an approved state, county, municipal, or department of natural resources peace officer basic training program or pursuant to Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code, for at least one year prior to an appointment, was not employed as a peace officer: (a) If the period of lapse was at least one year, but less than four years, up to forty hours; (b) If the period of lapse was four years or longer, eighty hours. Sec. 109.803. (A)(1) Subject to divisions (A)(2) and (B) of this section, every appointing authority shall require each of its appointed peace officers and troopers to complete twenty-four hours of continuing professional training each calendar year. Twenty-four hours is intended to be a minimum requirement, and appointing authorities are encouraged to exceed the twenty-four hour minimum. A minimum of twenty-four hours of continuing professional training shall be reimbursed each calendar year and a maximum of forty hours of continuing professional training may be reimbursed each calendar year. No reimbursement shall be available under this section for continuing professional training provided for a peace officer or trooper appointed by a state agency. (2) An appointing authority may submit a written request to the peace officer training commission that requests for a calendar year because of emergency circumstances an extension of the time within which one or more of its appointed peace officers or troopers must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission, as described in division (A)(1) of this section. A request made under this division shall set forth the name of each of the appointing authority's peace officers or troopers for whom an extension is requested, identify the emergency circumstances related to that peace officer or trooper, include documentation of those emergency circumstances, and set forth the date on which the request is submitted to the commission. A request shall be made under this division not later than the fifteenth day of December in the calendar year for which the extension is requested. Upon receipt of a written request made under this division, the executive director of the commission shall review the request and the submitted documentation. If the executive director of the commission is satisfied that emergency circumstances exist for any peace officer or trooper for whom a request was made under this division, the executive director may approve the request for that peace officer or trooper and grant an extension of the time within which that peace officer or trooper must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission. An extension granted under this division may be for any period of time the executive director believes to be appropriate, and the executive director shall specify in the notice granting the extension the date on which the extension ends. Not later than thirty days after the date on which a request is submitted to the commission, for each peace officer and trooper for whom an extension is requested, the executive director either shall approve the request and grant an extension or deny the request and deny an extension and shall send to the appointing authority that submitted the request written notice of the executive director's decision. If the executive director grants an extension of the time within which a particular appointed peace officer or trooper of an appointing authority must complete the required minimum number of hours of continuing professional training set by the commission, the appointing authority shall require that peace officer or trooper to complete the required minimum number of hours of training not later than the date on which the extension ends. (B) With the advice of the Ohio peace officer training commission, the attorney general shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code rules setting forth minimum standards for continuing professional training for peace officers and troopers and governing the administration of continuing professional training programs for peace officers and troopers. The rules adopted by the attorney general under division (B) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Allow peace officers and troopers to earn credit for up to four hours of continuing professional training for time spent while on duty providing drug use prevention education training that utilizes evidence-based curricula to students in school districts, community schools established under Chapter 3314., STEM schools established under Chapter 3326., and college-preparatory boarding schools established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (2) Allow a peace officer or trooper appointed by a law enforcement agency to earn hours of continuing professional training for other peace officers or troopers appointed by the law enforcement agency by providing drug use prevention education training under division (B)(1) of this section so that hours earned by the peace officer or trooper providing the training in excess of four hours may be applied to offset the number of continuing professional training hours required of another peace officer or trooper appointed by that law enforcement agency. (3) Prohibit the use of continuing professional training hours earned under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section from being used to offset any mandatory hands-on training requirement. (4) Require a peace officer to complete training on proper interactions with civilians during traffic stops and other in-person encounters, which training shall have an online offering and shall include all of the following topics: (a) A person's rights during an interaction with a peace officer, including all of the following: (i) When a peace officer may require a person to exit a vehicle; (ii) Constitutional protections from illegal search and seizure; (iii) The rights of a passenger in a vehicle who has been pulled over for a traffic stop; (iv) The right for a citizen to record an encounter with a peace officer. (b) Proper actions for interacting with a civilian and methods for diffusing a stressful encounter with a civilian; (c) Laws regarding questioning and detention by peace officers, including any law requiring a person to present proof of identity to a peace officer, and the consequences for a person's or officer's failure to comply with those laws; (d) Any other requirements and procedures necessary for the proper implementation of this section. (C) The attorney general shall transmit a certified copy of any rule adopted under this section to the secretary of state. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code. (2) "Trooper" means an individual appointed as a state highway patrol trooper under section 5503.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Appointing authority" means any agency or entity that appoints a peace officer or trooper. Sec. 111.15. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Rule" includes any rule, regulation, bylaw, or standard having a general and uniform operation adopted by an agency under the authority of the laws governing the agency; any appendix to a rule; and any internal management rule. "Rule" does not include any guideline adopted pursuant to section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code, any order respecting the duties of employees, any finding, any determination of a question of law or fact in a matter presented to an agency, or any rule promulgated pursuant to Chapter 119. or division (C)(1) or (2) of section 5117.02 of the Revised Code. "Rule" includes any amendment or rescission of a rule. (2) "Agency" means any governmental entity of the state and includes, but is not limited to, any board, department, division, commission, bureau, society, council, institution, state college or university, community college district, technical college district, or state community college. "Agency" does not include the general assembly, the controlling board, the adjutant general's department, or any court. (3) "Internal management rule" means any rule, regulation, bylaw, or standard governing the day-to-day staff procedures and operations within an agency. (B)(1) Any rule, other than a rule of an emergency nature, adopted by any agency pursuant to this section shall be effective on the tenth day after the day on which the rule in final form and in compliance with division (B)(3) of this section is filed as follows: (a) The rule shall be filed in electronic form with both the secretary of state and the director of the legislative service commission; (b) The rule shall be filed in electronic form with the joint committee on agency rule review. Division (B)(1)(b) of this section does not apply to any rule to which division (D) of this section does not apply. An agency that adopts or amends a rule that is subject to division (D) of this section shall assign a review date to the rule that is not later than five years after its effective date. If a review date assigned to a rule exceeds the five-year maximum, the review date for the rule is five years after its effective date. A rule with a review date is subject to review under section 106.03 of the Revised Code and expiration under section 106.033 of the Revised Code. This paragraph does not apply to a rule of a state college or university, community college district, technical college district, or state community college. If an agency in adopting a rule designates an effective date that is later than the effective date provided for by division (B)(1) of this section, the rule if filed as required by such division shall become effective on the later date designated by the agency. Any rule that is required to be filed under division (B)(1) of this section is also subject to division (D) of this section if not exempted by that division. If a rule incorporates a text or other material by reference, the agency shall comply with sections 121.71 to 121.75 of the Revised Code. (2) A rule of an emergency nature necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety shall state the reasons for the necessity. The emergency rule, in final form and in compliance with division (B)(3) of this section, shall be filed in electronic form with the secretary of state, the director of the legislative service commission, and the joint committee on agency rule review. The emergency rule is effective immediately upon completion of the latest filing, except that if the agency in adopting the emergency rule designates an effective date, or date and time of day, that is later than the effective date and time provided for by division (B)(2) of this section, the emergency rule if filed as required by such division shall become effective at the later date, or later date and time of day, designated by the agency. Except as provided in section 107.43 of the Revised Code, an emergency rule becomes invalid at the end of the one hundred twentieth day it is in effect. Prior to that date, the agency may file the emergency rule as a nonemergency rule in compliance with division (B)(1) of this section. The agency may not refile the emergency rule in compliance with division (B)(2) of this section so that, upon the emergency rule becoming invalid under such division, the emergency rule will continue in effect without interruption for another one hundred twenty-day period. The adoption of an emergency rule under division (B)(2) of this section in response to a state of emergency, as defined under section 107.42 of the Revised Code, may be invalidated by the general assembly, in whole or in part, by adopting a concurrent resolution in accordance with section 107.43 of the Revised Code. (3) An agency shall file a rule under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section in compliance with the following standards and procedures: (a) The rule shall be numbered in accordance with the numbering system devised by the director for the Ohio administrative code. (b) The rule shall be prepared and submitted in compliance with the rules section 103.05 of the Revised Code and the rule drafting manual of the legislative service commission. (c) The rule shall clearly state the date on which it is to be effective and the date on which it will expire, if known. (d) Each rule that amends or rescinds another rule shall clearly refer to the rule that is amended or rescinded. Each amendment shall fully restate the rule as amended. If the director of the legislative service commission or the director's designee gives an agency notice pursuant to section 103.05 of the Revised Code that a rule filed by the agency is not in compliance with the rules section 103.05 of the Revised Code and the rule drafting manual of the legislative service commission, the agency shall within thirty days after receipt of the notice conform the rule to the rules of the commission as directed in the notice. (C) All rules filed pursuant to divisions (B)(1)(a) and (2) of this section shall be recorded by the secretary of state and the director under the title of the agency adopting the rule and shall be numbered according to the numbering system devised by the director. The secretary of state and the director shall preserve the rules in an accessible manner. Each such rule shall be a public record open to public inspection and may be transmitted to any law publishing company that wishes to reproduce it. (D)(D)(1) At least sixty-five days before a board, commission, department, division, or bureau of the government of the state files a rule under division (B)(1) of this section, it shall file the full text of the proposed rule in electronic form with the joint committee on agency rule review, and the proposed rule is subject to legislative review and invalidation under section sections 106.021, 106.025, and 106.026 of the Revised Code. If a state board, commission, department, division, or bureau makes a revision in a proposed rule after it is filed with the joint committee, the state board, commission, department, division, or bureau shall promptly file the full text of the proposed rule in its revised form in electronic form with the joint committee. A state board, commission, department, division, or bureau shall also file the rule summary and fiscal analysis prepared under section 106.024 of the Revised Code in electronic form along with a proposed rule, and along with a proposed rule in revised form, that is filed under this division. If a proposed rule has an adverse impact on businesses, the state board, commission, department, division, or bureau also shall file the business impact analysis, any recommendations received from the common sense initiative office, and the associated memorandum of response, if any, in electronic form along with the proposed rule, or the proposed rule in revised form, that is filed under this division. If the rule summary and fiscal analysis indicates the rule may have any of the effects listed in division (A) of section 106.025 of the Revised Code, the executive director of the joint committee shall notify the members of the general assembly and include all documentation submitted to the joint committee in the agency's original rule filing with the notice. (2) A proposed rule that is subject to legislative review under this division may not be adopted and filed in final form under division (B)(1) of this section unless the one of the following applies: (a) The proposed rule has been filed with the joint committee on agency rule review under this division and the time for the joint committee to review the proposed rule has expired without recommendation of a concurrent resolution to invalidate the proposed rule. (b) The proposed rule is subject to section 106.026 of the Revised Code, and a law authorizing its adoption enacted in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article II, Sections 15 and 16 is in effect. (3) If a proposed rule that is subject to legislative review under this division implements a federal law or rule, the agency shall provide to the joint committee a citation to the federal law or rule the proposed rule implements and a statement as to whether the proposed rule implements the federal law or rule in a manner that is more or less stringent or burdensome than the federal law or rule requires. (4) As used in this division, "commission" includes the public utilities commission when adopting rules under a federal or state statute. This division (5) Division (D) of this section does not apply to any of the following: (1)(a) A proposed rule of an emergency nature; (2)(b) A rule proposed under section 1121.05, 1121.06, 1349.33, 1707.201, 1733.412, 4123.29, 4123.34, 4123.341, 4123.342, 4123.345, 4123.40, 4123.411, 4123.44, or 4123.442 of the Revised Code; (3)(c) A rule proposed by an agency other than a board, commission, department, division, or bureau of the government of the state; (4)(d) A proposed internal management rule of a board, commission, department, division, or bureau of the government of the state; (5)(e) Any proposed rule that must be adopted verbatim by an agency pursuant to federal law or rule, to become effective within sixty days of adoption, in order to continue the operation of a federally reimbursed program in this state, so long as the proposed rule contains both of the following: (a)(i) A statement that it is proposed for the purpose of complying with a federal law or rule; (b)(ii) A citation to the federal law or rule that requires verbatim compliance. (6)(f) An initial rule proposed by the director of health to impose quality standards on a health care facility as defined in section 3702.30 of the Revised Code; (7)(g) A rule of the state lottery commission pertaining to instant game rules. If a rule is exempt from legislative review under division (D)(5)(D)(5)(e) of this section, and if the federal law or rule pursuant to which the rule was adopted expires, is repealed or rescinded, or otherwise terminates, the rule is thereafter subject to legislative review under division (D) of this section. Whenever a state board, commission, department, division, or bureau files a proposed rule or a proposed rule in revised form under division (D) of this section, it shall also file the full text of the same proposed rule or proposed rule in revised form in electronic form with the secretary of state and the director of the legislative service commission. A state board, commission, department, division, or bureau shall file the rule summary and fiscal analysis prepared under section 106.024 of the Revised Code in electronic form along with a proposed rule or proposed rule in revised form that is filed with the secretary of state or the director of the legislative service commission. Sec. 111.27. There is hereby established in the state treasury the board of elections reimbursement and education fund. The fund shall be used by the secretary of state to provide advancements, subject to recoupment, or to reimburse boards of elections pursuant to sections 3513.301, 3513.312, 3515.071, and 3521.03 of the Revised Code, and to provide training and educational programs for members and employees of boards of elections. The fund shall receive transfers of cash pursuant to controlling board action. Sec. 111.29. The Ohio election integrity commission fund is created in the state treasury. The secretary of state shall use the money in the fund for the sole purpose of paying expenses related to the operation of the Ohio election integrity commission established under section 3517.14 of the Revised Code. Sec. 113.05. (A) As used in sections 113.05 to 113.40 of the Revised Code: (1) "Account," "appropriation," "disbursement," "electronic funds transfer," "fund," and "warrant" have the same meanings as in section 131.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Assets" has the same meaning as in section 131.01 of the Revised Code, but does not include items held in safekeeping by the treasurer of state including, but not limited to, collateral pledged to a state agency. (3) "Custodial funds" do not include items held in safekeeping by the treasurer of state including, but not limited to, collateral pledged to a state agency. (B) The state treasury consists of the moneys, claims, bonds, notes, other obligations, stocks, and other securities, receipts or other evidences of ownership, and other intangible assets of the state that are required by law to be deposited in the state treasury or are otherwise a part of the state treasury. All assets of the state treasury shall be kept in the rooms assigned the treasurer of state, with the vaults, safes, and other appliances therein; provided, that: (1) Securities required by law to be deposited or kept in the state treasury may be deposited for safekeeping with the federal reserve bank of Cleveland, Ohio or secured and insured depositories in or out of this state as designated by the treasurer of state. (2) Public moneys may be kept in constituted state depositories. (C) The custodial funds of the treasurer of state consist of the moneys, claims, bonds, notes, other obligations, stocks, and other securities, receipts or other evidences of ownership, and other intangible assets that are required by law to be kept in the custody of the treasurer of state but are not part of the state treasury. All assets of the custodial funds of the treasurer of state shall be kept in either or both of the following: (1) The rooms assigned the treasurer of state, with the vaults, safes, and other appliances therein; (2) The federal reserve bank of Cleveland, Ohio or secured and insured depositories in or out of this state as designated by the treasurer of state. (D) Assets of the state treasury shall not be commingled with assets of the custodial funds of the treasurer of state. The repositing and deposit of payments pursuant to section 113.06 of the Revised Code is in compliance with this section. Sec. 113.13. The treasurer of state shall have available and, as requested, transmit to the director of budget and management and to the governor information concerning the amount in the inactive account, the amount in the active account, and the amount of cash on hand. Sec. 113.40. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Administrative agent of the board of deposit" means the treasurer of state. (2) "Financial transaction device" includes a credit card, debit card, charge banking card, prepaid or stored value card, or automated clearinghouse network credit, debit, or e-check entry that includes, but is not limited to, accounts receivable and internet-initiated, point of purchase, and telephone-initiated applications, or any other device or method for making an electronic payment or transfer of funds denominated in United States dollars. (2)(3) "Processor" means an entity conducting the settlement of an electronic payment or transfer of funds, which shall be denominated in United States dollars. (4) "State expensesRevenue" includes fees, charges, tolls, costs, taxes, expenses, assessments, fines, penalties, payments, judgments, restitution ordered by a court, or any other expense amount a person owes to a state office under the authority of a state elected official or to a state entity. (3)(5) "State elected official" means the governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, secretary of state, treasurer of state, and auditor of state. (4)(6) "State entity" includes any state department, agency, board, or commission, or office under the authority of a state elected official that deposits funds into the state treasury or into an account in the custody of the treasurer of state. (B) Notwithstanding any other section of the Revised Code and subject to division (D) of this section, the board of deposit may shall adopt a resolution authorizing the acceptance of payments by financial transaction device to pay for state expensescollection, receipt, and acceptance by the state of revenue, gifts, donations, or bequests made by a financial transaction device. The resolution shall include all of the following: (1) A designation of those state elected officials and state entities authorized to accept payments by financial transaction device; (2) A list of state expenses that may be paid by the use of a financial transaction device; (3) Specific identification of financial transaction devices that a state elected official or state entity may authorize as acceptable means of payment for state expenses. Division (B)(3) of this section does not require that the same financial transaction devices be accepted for the payment of different types of state expenses. (4) The amount, if any, authorized as a surcharge or convenience fee under division (E) of this section for persons using a financial transaction device. Division (B)(4) of this section does not require that the same surcharges or convenience fees be applied to the payment of different types of state expenses. (5) A specific requirement, as provided in division (G) of this section, for the payment of a penalty if a payment made by means of a financial transaction device is returned or dishonored for any reason. The board of deposit's resolution also shall designate the treasurer of state as the direct the administrative agent of the board of deposit to solicit proposals, within guidelines established by the board of deposit in the resolution and in compliance with the procedures provided in division (C) of this section, from financial institutions, issuers of financial transaction devices, and processors of financial transaction devices; to make recommendations about those proposals to the state elected officials; and to assist state offices entities and state elected officials in implementing the state's any financial transaction device collection, acceptance and , processing, receipt, and settlement program authorized pursuant to this section. The board of deposit's resolution applies to financial transaction device services related to any and all bank accounts comprising the state treasury as well as those in the custody of the treasurer of state but not part of the state treasury. (C) The administrative agent shall follow the procedures provided in this division whenever it plans to contract with financial institutions, issuers of financial transaction devices,one or more processors of financial transaction devices for the purposes of this section. The administrative agent shall request proposals from at least three financial institutions, issuers of financial transaction devices, or processors of financial transaction devicesfor acceptance, processing, and settlement services, as appropriate in accordance with the resolution adopted under division (B) of this section. Prior to sending any financial institution, issuer, or processor a copy of any such requestmaking the request for proposals available, the administrative agent shall advertise its intent to request proposals for two consecutive weeks by electronic publication on a state agency the administrative agent's web site made available to the general public. The notice shall state that the administrative agent intends to request proposals; specify the purpose of the request; indicate the date, which shall be at least ten fifteen calendar days after the initial publication, on which the request for proposals will be electronically mailed to financial institutions, issuers, or processors; and require that any financial institution, issuer, or processor, whichever is appropriate, interested in receiving the request for proposals submit written notice of this interest to the administrative agent not later than the day on which the available and shall detail the service or services subject to the request for proposals will be electronically mailed. Upon receiving the proposals, the administrative agent shall review them and make a recommendation to the board of deposit regarding which proposal or proposals to accept. The board of deposit shall consider the agent's recommendation and review all proposals submitted, and then may choose to authorize the administrative agent, on the board's behalf, to contract with any or all of the entities one or more of the processors submitting proposals, as appropriate. The board of deposit shall provide any financial institution, issuer, or processor administrative agent may enter into one or more contracts for the provision of payment, collection, acceptance, processing, receipt, and settlement services to the state entities and state elected officials. Through its administrative agent, the board of deposit shall provide any processor that submitted a proposal, but with which the board of deposit's administrative agent does not enter into a contract, notice that its proposal is rejected. (D) The board of deposit shall send a copy of the resolution adopted under division (B) of this section to each state elected official and state entity authorized to accept payments for state expenses by financial transaction device. After receiving the resolution and before accepting such payments by financial transaction device, such a state elected official or state entity shall provide written notification to the administrative agent of the official's or entity's intent to implement the resolution within the official's or entity's office. Each state office elected official or state entity subject to the board's resolution adopted under division (B) of this section shall use only the financial institutions, issuers of financial transaction devices, and processors of financial transaction devices with which the board of deposit deposit's administrative agent contracts, and each such office state elected official or state entity is subject to the terms of those contracts. If a state entity under the authority of a state elected official is directly responsible for collecting one or more state expenses and the state elected official determines not to accept payments by financial transaction device for one or more of those expenses, the office is not required to accept payments by financial transaction device for those expenses, notwithstanding the adoption of a resolution by the board of deposit under division (B) of this section. (E) The board of deposit state elected official or state entity may establish a surcharge or convenience fee that may be imposed upon a person making payment by a financial transaction device. The surcharge or convenience fee shall not be imposed unless authorized or otherwise permitted by the rules prescribed under a contract, between the financial institution, issuer, or processor and the administrative agent, governing the use and acceptance of the financial transaction device. The establishment of a Any surcharge or convenience fee shall follow the guidelines of the financial institution, issuer of financial transaction devices, or processor or processors of financial transaction devices with which the board of deposit of deposit's administrative agent contracts. If a surcharge or convenience fee is imposed, every state elected official and state entity accepting payment by a financial transaction device, regardless of whether that entity is subject to a resolution adopted by the board of deposit, shall clearly post a notice in the entity's office, and shall notify each person making a payment by such a device, about the surcharge or fee. Notice to each person making a payment shall be provided regardless of the medium used to make the payment and in a manner appropriate to that medium. Each notice shall include all both of the following: (1) A statement that there is a surcharge or convenience fee for using a financial transaction device; (2) The total amount of the charge or fee expressed in dollars and cents for each transaction, or the rate of the charge or fee expressed as a percentage of the total amount of the transaction, whichever is applicable; (3) A clear statement that the surcharge or convenience fee is nonrefundable. (F) If a person elects to make a payment by a financial transaction device and a surcharge or convenience fee is imposed, the payment of the surcharge or convenience fee is not refundable. (G) If a person makes payment remits revenue to the state by a financial transaction device and the payment of the revenue is returned or dishonored reversed for any reason, or if the value of the remitted payment in United States dollars at the time of receipt by the state elected official or state entity is less than the amount owed, the person is liable to the state elected official or state entity for the state expense total amount of the state revenue and any reimbursable costs for collection, including banking charges, legal fees, or other expenses incurred by the state elected official or state entity in collecting the returned or dishonored reversed payment. The remedies and procedures provided in this section are in addition to any other available civil or criminal remedies provided by law. (H)(G) No person making any payment remitting any revenue by a financial transaction device to a state office elected official or state entity shall be relieved from liability for the underlying obligation, except to the extent that the state elected official or state entity realizes final payment of the underlying obligation the revenue to the state elected official or state entity in cash or its equivalent. If final payment revenue is not made remitted by the financial transaction device issuer, or by other means of payment, or by other guarantor of payment in the transaction, the underlying obligation survives and the state elected official or state entity shall retain all remedies for enforcement that would have applied if the transaction had not occurred. (I) (H) A state entity elected official or employee of a state entity or state elected official who accepts a financial transaction device payment in accordance with this section and any applicable state or local statutes, laws, policies, or rules is immune from personal liability for the final collection of such payments as specified in section 9.87 of the Revised Code. (J)(I) If the board of deposit determines that it is necessary and in the state's best interest to contract with an additional entity processor subsequent to the contract award made under division (C) of this section, the board may meet and choose to contract with one or more additional entities processors for the remainder of the period previously established by a contract award made under division (C) of this section. (K)(J) The administrative agent, in cooperation with the office of budget and management, may adopt, amend, and rescind rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code to implement and administer this section. (K) The treasurer of state shall have the authority to enter into such contracts necessary to fulfill its obligations as administrative agent for the board of deposit. Sec. 113.51. (A) The treasurer of state shall implement and administer a program under the terms and conditions established under sections 113.50 to 113.56 of the Revised Code. For that purpose, the treasurer shall do all of the following: (1) Develop and implement the program in a manner consistent with the provisions of sections 113.50 to 113.56 of the Revised Code; (2) Engage the services of consultants on a contract basis for rendering professional and technical assistance and advice; (3) Seek rulings and other guidance from the secretary and the internal revenue service relating to the program; (4) Make modifications to the program as necessary for participants in the program to qualify for the federal income tax benefits or treatment provided under section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code or rules adopted thereunder; (5) Impose and collect administrative fees and service charges in connection with any agreement or transaction relating to the program; (6) Develop marketing plans and promotional materials to publicize the program; (7) Establish the procedures by which funds held in program accounts shall be disbursed; (8) Administer the issuance of interests by the Ohio ABLE savings program trust fund to designated beneficiaries; (9) Establish the procedures by which funds held in program accounts shall be allocated to pay for administrative costs; (10) Take any other action necessary to implement and administer the program; (11) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code necessary to implement and administer the program; (12) Notify the secretary when a program account has been opened for a designated beneficiary and submit other reports concerning the program as required by the secretary or under section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code. (B) The treasurer of state may enter into agreements with other states or agencies of, subdivisions of, or residents of those states related to the program or a similar ABLE account program established by another state in accordance with section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code. (C) Any record of the treasurer of state indicating the identity of account beneficiaries and the balances and activity in ABLE accounts is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (D) The treasurer of state shall pay account fees associated with an ABLE account on behalf of an Ohio account owner or beneficiary. Sec. 113.53. (A) A designated beneficiary, or a trustee or guardian of a designated beneficiary who lacks capacity to enter into an agreement, may apply, on forms prescribed by the treasurer of state, to open a program account. A beneficiary may have only one ABLE account. The treasurer of state may impose a nonrefundable application fee. The application shall require the applicant to provide the following information: (1) The name, address, social security number, and birth date of the designated beneficiary; (2) The name, address, and social security number of the designated beneficiary's trustee or guardian, if applicable; (3) Certification by the applicant that the applicant understands the maximum account value and the consequences under division (C) of this section for excess contributions and understands how program account values exceeding the amount designated under section 103 of the "Stephen Beck, Jr., ABLE Act of 2014," 26 U.S.C. 529A note, may affect the applicant's resources for determining the applicant's eligibility for the supplemental security income program; (4) Any additional information required by the treasurer of state. (B)(1) To qualify for a program account, a designated beneficiary must be an eligible individual at the time the program account is opened. Before opening a program account, the treasurer of state or program manager shall enter into an agreement with the account owner that discloses the requirements and restrictions on contributions and withdrawals from the program account. (2) Any person may make contributions to a program account after the account is opened, subject to the limitations imposed by section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code and any rules adopted by the secretary. (C) Contributions to a program account shall be made in cash. The treasurer of state or program manager shall reject or promptly withdraw a contribution to a program account if that contribution would exceed the annual limits prescribed in subsection (b)(2)(B) of section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code. The treasurer or program manager shall reject or promptly withdraw a contribution if the value of the program account equals or exceeds the maximum account value or the designated beneficiary is not an eligible individual in the current calendar year. (D)(1) To the extent authorized by federal law, and in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state, an account owner may change the designated beneficiary of a program account to another individual. (2) No account owner may use an interest in an ABLE account as security for a loan. Any pledge of an interest in an account shall be void and of no force and effect. (E)(1) A distribution from a program account to any individual or for the benefit of any individual during a calendar year shall be reported to the internal revenue service and the designated beneficiary or the distributee to the extent required under state or federal law. (2) Statements shall be provided to each account owner of a program account at least four times each year within thirty days after the end of the quarterly period to which a statement relates. The statement shall identify the contributions made during the preceding quarter, the total contributions made to the account through the last day of that quarter, the value of the account on the last day of that quarter, distributions made during that quarter, and any other information that the treasurer of state requires to be reported to the account owner. (3) Statements and information relating to program accounts shall be prepared and filed to the extent required under sections 113.50 to 113.56 of the Revised Code and any other state or federal law. (F) The program shall provide separate accounting for each designated beneficiary. An annual fee may be imposed upon the account owner for the maintenance of a program account. (G) (G)(1) Money in an ABLE account shall be exempt from attachment, execution, or garnishment as provided in section 2329.66 of the Revised Code, and is . (2) Unless required by federal law, money in an ABLE account is not subject to claims made under the medicaid estate recovery program instituted pursuant to section 5162.21 of the Revised Code, in accordance with subsection (f) of section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code and subject to any limitations imposed by the secretary. (H)(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, all of the following shall be disregarded for the purposes of determining an individual's eligibility for a means-tested public assistance program funded only with state, local, or state and local funds and the amount of assistance or benefits the individual is eligible to receive under the program: (a) Any amount in an ABLE account, including earnings on the account; (b) Any contributions to an ABLE account; (c) Any distribution from an ABLE account for qualified disability expenses. (2) Division (H)(1) of this section applies only to an individual who is either of the following: (a) The designated beneficiary of the ABLE account; (b) An individual whose eligibility for the means-tested program is conditioned on the ABLE account's designated beneficiary disclosing the designated beneficiary's income, resources, or both to the entity administering the means-tested public assistance program. Sec. 113.78. The medical quality assurance fund is created, which shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state but shall not be part of the state treasury. The fund shall consist of all money transferred to it as a result of the repeal of section 3701.89 of the Revised Code on January 1, 2026, by H.B. 238 of the 135th General Assembly general assembly and its requirements related to the repeal of that section. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. All money in the fund shall be used as directed by the general assembly, which may include funding any of the following programs that the former Ohio medical quality foundation was authorized to fund in a similar manner under division (F) of section 3701.89 of the Revised Code before the repeal of that section by this act: (A) Programs approved under criteria established under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code; (B) Programs designed to improve the quality of graduate medical education; (C) Programs designed to improve risk management and quality assurance in hospitals, as defined in section 3722.01 of the Revised Code, and in outpatient settings, including physician offices; (D) Other programs, meetings, and educational seminars that are designed to improve the quality of medical care in this state. Sec. 117.11. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this division and in sections section 117.112 and 117.113 of the Revised Code, the auditor of state shall audit each public office at least once every two fiscal years. The auditor of state shall audit a public office each fiscal year if that public office is required to be audited on an annual basis pursuant to "The Single Audit Act of 1984," 98 Stat. 2327, 31 U.S.C.A. 7501 et seq., as amended. In the annual or biennial audit, inquiry shall be made into the methods, accuracy, and legality of the accounts, financial reports, records, files, and reports of the office, whether the laws, rules, ordinances, and orders pertaining to the office have been observed, and whether the requirements and rules of the auditor of state have been complied with. Except as otherwise provided in this division or where auditing standards or procedures dictate otherwise, each audit shall cover at least one fiscal year. If a public office is audited only once every two fiscal years, the audit shall cover both fiscal years. (B) In addition to the annual or biennial audit provided for in division (A) of this section, the auditor of state may conduct an audit of a public office at any time when so requested by the public office or upon the auditor of state's own initiative if the auditor of state has reasonable cause to believe that an additional audit is in the public interest. (C)(1) The auditor of state shall identify any public office in which the auditor of state will be unable to conduct an audit at least once every two fiscal years as required by division (A) of this section and shall provide immediate written notice to the clerk of the legislative authority or governing board of the public office so identified. Within six months of the receipt of such notice, the legislative authority or governing board may engage an independent certified public accountant to conduct an audit pursuant to section 117.12 of the Revised Code. (2) When the chief fiscal officer of a public office notifies the auditor of state that an audit is required at a time prior to the next regularly scheduled audit by the auditor of state, the auditor of state shall either cause an earlier audit to be made by the auditor of state or authorize the legislative authority or governing board of the public office to engage an independent certified public accountant to conduct the required audit. The scope of the audit shall be as authorized by the auditor of state. (3) The auditor of state shall approve the scope of an audit under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section as set forth in the contract for the proposed audit before the contract is executed on behalf of the public office that is to be audited. The independent accountant conducting an audit under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section shall be paid by the public office. (4) The contract for attest services with an independent accountant employed pursuant to this section or section 117.115 of the Revised Code may include binding arbitration provisions, provisions of Chapter 2711. of the Revised Code, or any other alternative dispute resolution procedures to be followed in the event a dispute remains between the state or public office and the independent accountant concerning the terms of or services under the contract, or a breach of the contract, after the administrative provisions of the contract have been exhausted. (D) If a uniform accounting network is established under section 117.101 of the Revised Code, the auditor of state or a certified public accountant employed pursuant to this section or section 117.112 or 117.115 of the Revised Code shall, to the extent practicable, utilize services offered by the network in order to conduct efficient and economical audits of public offices. (E) The auditor of state, in accordance with division (A)(3) of section 9.65 of the Revised Code and this section, may audit an annuity program for volunteer fire fighters established by a political subdivision under section 9.65 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "volunteer fire fighters" and "political subdivision" have the same meanings as in division (C) of section 9.65 of the Revised Code. (F) The auditor of state may establish by rule an agreed-upon procedure by which political subdivisions may be audited. The rules shall set forth the standards, procedures, guidelines, and reporting requirements for an agreed-upon procedure audit. Sec. 117.38. (A) Each public office, other than a state agency, shall file a financial report for each fiscal year. The auditor of state may prescribe forms by rule or may issue guidelines, or both, for such reports. If the auditor of state has not prescribed a rule regarding the form for the report, the public office shall submit its report on the form utilized by the public office. (B) The report shall be certified by the proper officer or board and filed with the auditor of state within sixty days after the close of the fiscal year, except that public offices reporting pursuant to generally accepted accounting principles shall file their reports within one hundred fifty days after the close of the fiscal year. The auditor of state may extend the deadline for filing a financial report and establish terms and conditions for any such extension. At the time the report is filed with the auditor of state, the chief fiscal officer, except as otherwise provided in section 319.11 of the Revised Code, shall publish notice in a newspaper published in the political subdivision or taxing district, and if there is no such newspaper, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the political subdivision or taxing district. The notice shall state that the financial report has been completed by the public office and is available for public inspection at the office of the chief fiscal officer. (C) The report shall contain the following: (1) Amount of collections and receipts, and accounts due from each source; (2) Amount of expenditures for each purpose; (3) Income of each public service industry owned or operated by a municipal corporation, and the cost of such ownership or operation; (4) Amount of public debt of each taxing district, the purpose for which each item of such debt was created, and the provision made for the payment thereof; (5) Budgetary comparison information as required by the applicable reporting framework or as prescribed by the auditor of state. (D) Any public office, other than a state agency, that does not file its financial report at the time required by this section shall pay to the auditor of state twenty-five dollars for each day the report remains unfiled after the filing date; provided, that the penalty payments shall not exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars. The auditor of state may waive all or any part of the penalty assessed under this section upon the filing of the past due financial report. All sums collected from such penalties shall be placed in the public audit expense fund--local government. If the auditor of state fails to receive payment for penalties not paid within one year from the required filing date, the auditor may recover the penalties through the process in division (D) of section 117.13 of the Revised Code. (E) Every county agency, board, or commission shall provide to the county auditor, not later than the first day of March each year unless a later date is authorized by the county auditor, all information determined by the county auditor to be necessary for the preparation of the report required by this section. (F) The auditor of state shall publish the substance of the report submitted under this section in an electronic format that is available to the public. Sec. 117.44. To enhance local officials' background and working knowledge of government accounting, budgeting and financing, financial report preparation, and the rules adopted by the auditor of state, the auditor of state shall hold training programs for persons elected for the first time as township fiscal officers, city auditors, and village clerks, between the first day of December and the first day of April immediately following a general election for any of these offices. Similar training may also be provided to any township fiscal officer, city auditor, or village clerk who is appointed to fill a vacancy or who is elected in a special election. The auditor of state also shall develop and provide an annual training program of continuing education for village clerks. The auditor of state shall determine the manner, content, and length of the training programs after consultation with appropriate statewide organizations of local governmental officials. The auditor of state shall charge the political subdivisions that the trainees represent a registration fee that will meet actual and necessary expenses of the training, including instructor fees, site acquisition costs, and the cost of course materials. The necessary personal expenses incurred by the officials as a result of attending the training program shall be borne by the political subdivisions they represent. The auditor of state shall allow any other interested person to attend any of the training programs that the auditor of state holds pursuant to this section; provided, that before attending any such training program, the interested person shall pay to the auditor of state the full registration fee that the auditor of state has set for the training program. The auditor of state may provide any other appropriate training or educational programs that may be developed and offered by the auditor of state or in collaboration with one or more other state agencies, political subdivisions, or other public or private entities. There is hereby established in the state treasury the auditor of state training program fund, to be used by the auditor of state for the actual and necessary expenses of any training programs held pursuant to this section, section 117.441, or section 321.46 of the Revised Code. All registration fees collected under this section shall be paid into the fund. Sec. 117.56. (A) During the course of an audit, including a performance audit, of the department of transportationany state agency or institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, the auditor of state, an employee of the auditor of state, and any independent accountants or consultants contracted by the auditor of state as necessary to carry out the statutory responsibilities of the auditor of state, may request access to any system the department agency or institution uses or maintains. The director of transportation and employees of the department If the auditor of state requests access, the agency or institution shall provide access subject to the following: (1) The access is read only and is downloadable for analysis; (2) The access is requested after the notice of engagement letter is sent to the agency or institution; (3) Any employee of the auditor of state, or independent accountant or consultant contracted by the auditor of state, who will have access as set forth above, is a national of the United States or lawful permanent resident of the United States; (4) The data accessed is kept on servers located in the United States. (5) Employees of the agency or institution shall assist the auditor of state, employees of the auditor of state, and independent accountants or consultants contracted by the auditor of state with accessing the department's systems including but not limited to providing a comprehensive list of all the data available and data definitions necessary to understand the systems and data provided to the auditor of state. (B) The auditor of state, employees of the auditor of state, and independent accountants and consultants retained contracted by the auditor of state, shall comply with all state and federal privacy and confidentiality laws, rules, and regulations that apply to the content of the systems the auditor of state accesses. (C) Any system breach, unauthorized access, or unauthorized release of information that results from access under this section shall be reported immediately to the state highway patrol and any other relevant law enforcement agency for criminal investigation. Sec. 118.29. (A) The financial supervisor, or the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees of a municipal corporation, county, or township in fiscal emergency, may make a referral to the attorney general for the creation of a receivership over the municipal corporation, county, or township in fiscal emergency if both the following conditions are met: (1) The municipal corporation, county, or township satisfies either of the following: (a) It has been in a state of fiscal emergency for a continuous period of ten years. (b) It has been in a state of fiscal emergency at least twice in a period of ten years, and the combined period of fiscal emergency is at least five years. (2) The municipal corporation, county, or township has demonstrated one or more of the following, as determined by the financial supervisor: (a) Failure to comply with the applicable budgetary and spending processes in Chapter 5705. of the Revised Code; (b) Failure to ensure that appropriations comply with the financial plan in accordance with section 118.13 of the Revised Code; (c) Assuming debt without the approval of the financial planning and supervision commission in violation of section 118.15 of the Revised Code; (d) Undertaking administrative or legislative action that is not in accordance with the terms of the financial plan or, when applicable, without permission of the commission. (B) Upon receipt of a referral, the attorney general shall promptly file a petition for a receivership with the court of claims. The judge that has served the longest on the court as of the date the petition is filed promptly shall appoint a receiver. The appointed receiver shall satisfy the requirements of section 2735.02 of the Revised Code and shall comply with section 2735.03 of the Revised Code. With the approval of the court, the receiver may request reasonable fees for work performed including, but not limited to, costs associated with retaining legal counsel, accountants, or other similar advisors that the receiver considers necessary in the performance of the receiver's duties. The fees shall be paid from funds appropriated to the office of budget and management during the period of fiscal emergency. (C) A receiver appointed under this section has all of the following powers and duties in addition to the powers stated in section 2735.04 of the Revised Code: (1) Consult with the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees to make recommendations or, if necessary, to assume responsibility for implementing cost reductions and revenue increases to achieve a balanced budget and carry out the financial plan, and to make reductions in force or spending to resolve the fiscal emergency conditions; (2) Ensure the municipal corporation, county, or township in fiscal emergency complies with all aspects of the financial plan approved by the commission in accordance with section 118.06 of the Revised Code, or as amended in accordance with this chapter. If no financial plan has been approved by the commission in accordance with section 118.06 of the Revised Code, the receiver, after consulting with the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees, shall make recommendations, or assume, if necessary, the responsibility for crafting and submitting the financial plan to the financial planning and supervision commission. (3) Ensure the municipal corporation, county, or township in fiscal emergency complies with any other relevant aspects of this chapter; (4) Provide monthly, written reports about the progress toward resolving the conditions of fiscal emergency to the financial planning and supervision commission, to the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees, and to the mayor or city manager in the case of a municipal corporation; (5) Appear at least quarterly to present information about progress toward resolving the conditions of fiscal emergency at an open meeting and, if allowable under section 121.22 of the Revised Code, in executive session, of the legislative authority of municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees; (6) Appear at least quarterly to present information about progress toward resolving the conditions of fiscal emergency at an open meeting and, if allowable under section 121.22 of the Revised Code, in executive session, of the financial planning and supervision commission of the municipal corporation, county, or township in fiscal emergency; (7) At the receiver's initiative or upon invitation, attend executive sessions of the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees; (8) Exercise any other powers granted to the receiver by the court necessary to perform the duties stated in this section. (D)(1) If, in the judgment of the receiver, the criteria required to file for bankruptcy under the "Federal Bankruptcy Act," 11 U.S.C. 101, et seq., are satisfied and no reasonable alternative exists to eliminate the fiscal emergency condition within three years, the receiver may present findings and submit a written recommendation on filing for bankruptcy to the financial planning and supervision commission and the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of township trustees. Beginning sixty days after submitting the recommendation, the receiver may initiate bankruptcy proceedings unless both of the following occur: (a) The legislative authority or board adopts an ordinance or resolution, effective within sixty days of receipt of the recommendation, opposing the recommendation. The ordinance or resolution shall specify the legislative authority's or board's plan to satisfy and discharge the debts and liabilities included in the receiver's recommendation for bankruptcy within seven years of the adoption of the ordinance or resolution and promptly alleviate the fiscal emergency conditions using expenditure reductions or available and future tax revenue, including necessary tax rate increases, of the municipal corporation, county, or township. (b) After reviewing the ordinance or resolution under division (D)(1)(a) of this section, the financial planning and supervision commission determines the plan is sufficient to satisfy and discharge the debts and liabilities included in the receiver's recommendation for bankruptcy within seven years of the adoption of the resolution and promptly alleviate the fiscal emergency conditions. If the financial planning and supervision commission determines that the plan is not sufficient, the receiver may initiate bankruptcy proceedings notwithstanding the ordinance or resolution opposing the recommendation. (2) If the financial planning and supervision commission determines under division (D)(1) of this section that the plan is sufficient and the plan requires voted taxes authorized under another Revised Code section, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of trustees shall direct the board of elections to submit the tax question to the electors at the next general election or at a special election conducted on the day of the next primary election in the municipal corporation, township, or county occurring not less than ninety days after the resolution is certified to the board, as applicable under the provision authorizing the tax question. If the taxes are not approved by the electors, the receiver may initiate bankruptcy proceedings, notwithstanding the resolution or ordinance opposing bankruptcy. If the taxes are approved by the electors, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, board of county commissioners, or board of trustees shall implement the plan to satisfy and discharge the debts and liabilities included in the receiver's recommendation for bankruptcy within seven years of the adoption of the ordinance or resolution and promptly alleviate the fiscal emergency conditions. (E) The court shall terminate the receivership when the municipal corporation, county, or township has corrected and eliminated all of the fiscal emergency conditions determined pursuant to section 118.04 of the Revised Code, and no new fiscal emergency conditions have occurred. (F) Conditions in division (A) of this section may be applied retroactively in a remedial nature. Sec. 119.03. In the adoption, amendment, or rescission of any rule, an agency shall comply with the following procedure: (A) Reasonable public notice shall be given in the register of Ohio at least thirty days prior to the date set for a hearing, in the form the agency determines. The agency shall file copies of the public notice under division (B) of this section. (The agency gives public notice in the register of Ohio when the public notice is published in the register under that division.) The public notice shall include: (1) A statement of the agency's intention to consider adopting, amending, or rescinding a rule; (2) A synopsis of the proposed rule, amendment, or rule to be rescinded or a general statement of the subject matter to which the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission relates; (3) A statement of the reason or purpose for adopting, amending, or rescinding the rule; (4) The date, time, and place of a hearing on the proposed action, which shall be not earlier than the thirty-first nor later than the fortieth day after the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission is filed under division (B) of this section. In addition to public notice given in the register of Ohio, the agency may give whatever other notice it reasonably considers necessary to ensure notice constructively is given to all persons who are subject to or affected by the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission. The agency shall provide a copy of the public notice required under division (A) of this section to any person who requests it and pays a reasonable fee, not to exceed the cost of copying and mailing. (B) The full text of the proposed rule, amendment, or rule to be rescinded, accompanied by the public notice required under division (A) of this section, shall be filed in electronic form with the secretary of state and with the director of the legislative service commission. (If in compliance with this division an agency files more than one proposed rule, amendment, or rescission at the same time, and has prepared a public notice under division (A) of this section that applies to more than one of the proposed rules, amendments, or rescissions, the agency shall file only one notice with the secretary of state and with the director for all of the proposed rules, amendments, or rescissions to which the notice applies.) The proposed rule, amendment, or rescission and public notice shall be filed as required by this division at least sixty-five days prior to the date on which the agency, in accordance with division (E) of this section, issues an order adopting the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission. If the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission incorporates a text or other material by reference, the agency shall comply with sections 121.71 to 121.75 of the Revised Code. The proposed rule, amendment, or rescission shall be available for at least thirty days prior to the date of the hearing at the office of the agency in printed or other legible form without charge to any person affected by the proposal. Failure to furnish such text to any person requesting it shall not invalidate any action of the agency in connection therewith. If the agency files a revision in the text of the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission, it shall also promptly file the full text of the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission in its revised form in electronic form with the secretary of state and with the director of the legislative service commission. The agency shall file the rule summary and fiscal analysis prepared under section 106.024 of the Revised Code in electronic form along with a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission or proposed rule, amendment, or rescission in revised form that is filed with the secretary of state or the director of the legislative service commission. The agency shall file the hearing report relating to a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission in electronic form with the secretary of state and the director of the legislative service commission at the same time the agency files the hearing report with the joint committee on agency rule review. The director of the legislative service commission shall publish in the register of Ohio the full text of the original and each revised version of a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission; the full text of a public notice; the full text of a rule summary and fiscal analysis; and the full text of a hearing report that is filed with the director under this division. (C)(C)(1) When an agency files a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission under division (B) of this section, it also shall file in electronic form with the joint committee on agency rule review the full text of the proposed rule, amendment, or rule to be rescinded in the same form and the public notice required under division (A) of this section. (If in compliance with this division an agency files more than one proposed rule, amendment, or rescission at the same time, and has given a public notice under division (A) of this section that applies to more than one of the proposed rules, amendments, or rescissions, the agency shall file only one notice with the joint committee for all of the proposed rules, amendments, or rescissions to which the notice applies.) The proposed rule, amendment, or rescission is subject to legislative review and invalidation under sections 106.02, 106.021, and 106.022, 106.025, and 106.026 of the Revised Code. If the agency makes a revision in a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission after it is filed with the joint committee, the agency promptly shall file the full text of the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission in its revised form in electronic form with the joint committee. An agency shall file the rule summary and fiscal analysis prepared under section 106.024 of the Revised Code in electronic form along with a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission, and along with a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission in revised form, that is filed under this division. If the rule summary and fiscal analysis indicates the rule may have any of the effects listed in division (A) of section 106.025 of the Revised Code, the executive director of the joint committee shall notify the members of the general assembly and include all documentation submitted to the joint committee in the agency's original rule filing with the notice. (2) If a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission has an adverse impact on businesses, the agency also shall file the business impact analysis, any recommendations received from the common sense initiative office, and the agency's memorandum of response, if any, in electronic form along with the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission, or along with the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission in revised form, that is filed under this division. (3) The agency shall file the hearing report in electronic form with the joint committee before the joint committee holds its public hearing on the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission. The filing of a hearing report does not constitute a revision of the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission to which the hearing report relates. (4) If the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission requires liability insurance, a bond, or any other financial responsibility instrument as a condition of licensure, the agency shall conduct a diligent search to determine if the liability insurance, bond, or other financial responsibility instrument is readily available in the amounts required as a condition of licensure, and shall certify to the joint committee that the search was conducted. (5) If the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission implements a federal law or rule, the agency shall provide to the joint committee a citation to the federal law or rule the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission implements and a statement as to whether the proposed rule implements the federal law or rule in a manner that is more or less stringent or burdensome than the federal law or rule requires. (6) A proposed rule, amendment, or rescission that is subject to legislative review under this division may not be adopted under division (E) of this section or filed in final form under section 119.04 of the Revised Code unless the one of the following applies: (a) The proposed rule, amendment, or rescission has been filed with the joint committee on agency rule review under this division and the time for legislative review of the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission has expired without adoption of a concurrent resolution to invalidate the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission. (b) The proposed rule, amendment, or rescission is subject to section 106.026 of the Revised Code, and a law authorizing its adoption enacted in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article II, Sections 15 and 16 is in effect. This division (7) Division (C) of this section does not apply to: (1)(a) An emergency rule, amendment, or rescission; (2)(b) A proposed rule, amendment, or rescission that must be adopted verbatim by an agency pursuant to federal law or rule, to become effective within sixty days of adoption, in order to continue the operation of a federally reimbursed program in this state, so long as the proposed rule contains both of the following: (a)(i) A statement that it is proposed for the purpose of complying with a federal law or rule; (b)(ii) A citation to the federal law or rule that requires verbatim compliance. (3)(c) A proposed rule, amendment, or rescission that, as set forth in section 3719.41 of the Revised Code, must be adopted by the state board of pharmacy pursuant to federal law or rule, to become effective within sixty days of adoption, so long as the proposed rule contains a statement that it is proposed for the purpose of complying with federal law or rule. (8) If a rule or amendment is exempt from legislative review under division (C)(2)(C)(7)(b) of this section, and if the federal law or rule pursuant to which the rule or amendment was adopted expires, is repealed or rescinded, or otherwise terminates, the rule or amendment, or its rescission, is thereafter subject to legislative review under division (C) of this section. (D) On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice, the agency shall conduct a public hearing at which any person affected by the proposed action of the agency may appear and be heard in person, by the person's attorney, or both, may present the person's position, arguments, or contentions, orally or in writing, offer and examine witnesses, and present evidence tending to show that the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission, if adopted or effectuated, will be unreasonable or unlawful. An agency may permit persons affected by the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission to present their positions, arguments, or contentions in writing, not only at the hearing, but also for a reasonable period before, after, or both before and after the hearing. A person who presents a position or arguments or contentions in writing before or after the hearing is not required to appear at the hearing. At the hearing, the testimony shall be recorded. Such record shall be made at the expense of the agency. The agency is required to transcribe a record that is not sight readable only if a person requests transcription of all or part of the record and agrees to reimburse the agency for the costs of the transcription. An agency may require the person to pay in advance all or part of the cost of the transcription. In any hearing under this section the agency may administer oaths or affirmations. The agency shall consider the positions, arguments, or contentions presented at, or before or after, the hearing. The agency shall prepare a hearing summary of the positions, arguments, or contentions, and of the issues raised by the positions, arguments, or contentions. The agency then shall prepare a hearing report explaining, with regard to each issue, how it is reflected in the rule, amendment, or rescission. If an issue is not reflected in the rule, amendment, or rescission, the hearing report shall explain why the issue is not reflected. The agency shall include the hearing summary in the hearing report as an appendix thereto. And, in the hearing report, the agency shall identify the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission to which the hearing report relates. (E) After (E)(1) Subject to division (E)(2) of this section, after divisions (A), (B), (C), and (D) of this section have been complied with, and when the time for legislative review under sections 106.02, 106.022, and 106.023, and 106.025 of the Revised Code has expired without adoption of a concurrent resolution to invalidate the proposed rule, amendment, or rescission, the agency may issue an order adopting the proposed rule or the proposed amendment or rescission of the rule, consistent with the synopsis or general statement included in the public notice. At that time the agency shall designate the effective date of the rule, amendment, or rescission, which shall not be earlier than the tenth day after the rule, amendment, or rescission has been filed in its final form as provided in section 119.04 of the Revised Code. (2) If a proposed rule, amendment, or rescission is subject to section 106.026 of the Revised Code, the agency may issue an order adopting the proposed rule or the proposed amendment or rescission of the rule on or after the effective date of the law authorizing adoption enacted in accordance with Ohio Constitution, Article II, Sections 15 and 16. At that time the agency shall designate the effective date of the rule, amendment, or rescission, which shall not be earlier than the tenth day after the rule, amendment, or rescission has been filed in its final form as provided in section 119.04 of the Revised Code. (F) Prior to the effective date of a rule, amendment, or rescission, the agency shall make a reasonable effort to inform those affected by the rule, amendment, or rescission and to have available for distribution to those requesting it the full text of the rule as adopted or as amended. (G)(1) If the governor, upon the request of an agency, determines that an emergency requires the immediate adoption, amendment, or rescission of a rule, the governor shall issue an order, the text of which shall be filed in electronic form with the agency, the secretary of state, the director of the legislative service commission, and the joint committee on agency rule review, that the procedure prescribed by this section with respect to the adoption, amendment, or rescission of a specified rule is suspended. The agency may then adopt immediately the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission and it becomes effective on the date the rule, amendment, or rescission, in final form and in compliance with division (A)(2) of section 119.04 of the Revised Code, is filed in electronic form with the secretary of state, the director of the legislative service commission, and the joint committee on agency rule review. The director shall publish the full text of the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission in the register of Ohio. Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, or section 107.43 of the Revised Code, the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission shall become invalid at the end of the one hundred twentieth day it is in effect. Prior to that date the agency may adopt the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission as a nonemergency rule, amendment, or rescission by complying with the procedure prescribed by this section for the adoption, amendment, and rescission of nonemergency rules. The agency shall not use the procedure of division (G)(1) of this section to readopt the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission so that, upon the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission becoming invalid under division (G)(1) of this section, the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission will continue in effect without interruption for another one-hundred-twenty-day period, except when section 106.02 of the Revised Code prevents the agency from adopting the emergency rule, amendment, or rescission as a nonemergency rule, amendment, or rescission within the one-hundred-twenty-day period. Division (G)(1) of this section does not apply to the adoption of any emergency rule, amendment, or rescission by the tax commissioner under division (C)(2) of section 5117.02 of the Revised Code. (2) An emergency rule or amendment adding a substance to a controlled substance schedule shall become invalid at the end of the one hundred eightieth day it is in effect. Prior to that date, the state board of pharmacy may adopt the emergency rule or amendment as a nonemergency rule or amendment by complying with the procedure prescribed by this section for adoption and amendment of nonemergency rules. The board shall not use the procedure of division (G)(1) of this section to readopt the emergency rule or amendment so that, upon the emergency rule or amendment becoming invalid under division (G)(2) of this section, the emergency rule or amendment will continue in effect beyond the one-hundred-eighty-day period. (3) The general assembly, by adopting a concurrent resolution, and in accordance with section 107.43 of the Revised Code, may do either of the following: (a) Invalidate, in whole or in part, an emergency rule adopted or amended by an agency in response to a state of emergency, as defined under section 107.42 of the Revised Code, under division (G)(1) of this section; (b) Authorize an agency to readopt, in whole or in part, a rule that was rescinded in response to a state of emergency under division (G)(1) of this section. (H) Rules adopted by an authority within the department of job and family services for the administration or enforcement of Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code or of the department of taxation shall be effective without a hearing as provided by this section if the statutes pertaining to such agency specifically give a right of appeal to the board of tax appeals or to a higher authority within the agency or to a court, and also give the appellant a right to a hearing on such appeal. This division does not apply to the adoption of any rule, amendment, or rescission by the tax commissioner under division (C)(1) or (2) of section 5117.02 of the Revised Code, or deny the right to file an action for declaratory judgment as provided in Chapter 2721. of the Revised Code from the decision of the board of tax appeals or of the higher authority within such agency. Sec. 119.04. (A)(1) Any rule adopted by any agency shall be effective on the tenth day after the day on which the rule in final form and in compliance with division (A)(2) of this section is filed as follows: (a) The rule shall be filed in electronic form with both the secretary of state and the director of the legislative service commission; (b) The rule shall be filed in electronic form with the joint committee on agency rule review. Division (A)(1)(b) of this section does not apply to any rule to which division (C) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code does not apply. If an agency in adopting a rule designates an effective date that is later than the effective date provided for by this division, the rule if filed as required by this division shall become effective on the later date designated by the agency. An agency that adopts or amends a rule that is subject to section 106.03 of the Revised Code shall assign a review date to the rule that is not later than five years after its effective date. If a review date assigned to a rule exceeds the five-year maximum, the review date for the rule is five years after its effective date. A rule with a review date is subject to review under section 106.03 of the Revised Code. (2) The agency shall file the rule in compliance with the following standards and procedures: (a) The rule shall be numbered in accordance with the numbering system devised by the director for the Ohio administrative code. (b) The rule shall be prepared and submitted in compliance with the rules section 103.05 of the Revised Code and the rule drafting manual of the legislative service commission. (c) The rule shall clearly state the date on which it is to be effective and the date on which it will expire, if known. (d) Each rule that amends or rescinds another rule shall clearly refer to the rule that is amended or rescinded. Each amendment shall fully restate the rule as amended. If the director of the legislative service commission or the director's designee gives an agency notice pursuant to section 103.05 of the Revised Code that a rule filed by the agency is not in compliance with the rules section 103.05 of the Revised Code and the rule drafting manual of the commission, the agency shall within thirty days after receipt of the notice conform the rule to the rules of the commission as directed in the notice. (3) As used in this section, "rule" includes an amendment or rescission of a rule. (B) The secretary of state and the director shall preserve the rules filed under division (A)(1)(a) of this section in an accessible manner. Each such rule shall be a public record open to public inspection and may be transmitted to any law publishing company that wishes to reproduce it. Sec. 120.06. (A)(1) The state public defender, when designated by the court or requested by a county public defender or joint county public defender, may provide legal representation in all courts throughout the state to indigent adults and juveniles who are charged with the commission of an offense or act for which the penalty or any possible adjudication includes the potential loss of liberty. (2) The state public defender may provide legal representation to any indigent person who, while incarcerated in any state correctional institution, is charged with a felony offense, for which the penalty or any possible adjudication that may be imposed by a court upon conviction includes the potential loss of liberty. (3) The state public defender may provide legal representation to any person incarcerated in any correctional institution of the state, in any matter in which the person asserts the person is unlawfully imprisoned or detained. (4) The state public defender, in any case in which the state public defender has provided legal representation or is requested to do so by a county public defender or joint county public defender, may provide legal representation on appeal. (5) The (5)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(5)(b) of this section, the state public defender, when designated by the court or requested by a county public defender, joint county public defender, or the director of rehabilitation and correction, shall provide legal representation in parole and probation revocation matters or matters relating to the revocation of community control or post-release control under a community control sanction or post-release control sanction, unless the state public defender finds that the alleged parole or probation violator or alleged violator of a community control sanction or post-release control sanction has the financial capacity to retain the alleged violator's own counsel. (b) If the state public defender determines that the state public defender does not have the capacity to provide the legal representation described in division (A)(5)(a) of this section, the state public defender may contract with private legal counsel to provide the legal representation described in that division. (6) If the state public defender contracts with a county public defender commission, a joint county public defender commission, or a board of county commissioners for the provision of services, under authority of division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the state public defender shall provide legal representation in accordance with the contract. (B) The state public defender shall not be required to prosecute any appeal, postconviction remedy, or other proceeding pursuant to division (A)(3), (4), or (5) of this section, unless the state public defender first is satisfied that there is arguable merit to the proceeding. (C) A court may appoint counsel or allow an indigent person to select the indigent's own personal counsel to assist the state public defender as co-counsel when the interests of justice so require. When co-counsel is appointed to assist the state public defender, the co-counsel shall receive any compensation that the court may approve, not to exceed the amounts provided for in section 2941.51 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) When the state public defender is designated by the court or requested by a county public defender or joint county public defender to provide legal representation for an indigent person in any case, other than pursuant to a contract entered into under authority of division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the state public defender shall send to the county in which the case is filed a bill detailing the actual cost of the representation that separately itemizes legal fees and expenses. The county, upon receipt of an itemized bill from the state public defender pursuant to this division, shall pay the state public defender one hundred per cent of the amount identified as legal fees and expenses in the itemized bill. (2) Upon payment of the itemized bill under division (D)(1) of this section, the county may submit the cost of the legal fees and expenses to the state public defender for reimbursement pursuant to section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (3) When the state public defender provides investigation or mitigation services to private appointed counsel or to a county or joint county public defender as approved by the appointing court, other than pursuant to a contract entered into under authority of division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code, the state public defender shall send to the county in which the case is filed a bill itemizing the actual cost of the services provided. The county, upon receipt of an itemized bill from the state public defender pursuant to this division, shall pay one hundred per cent of the amount as set forth in the itemized bill. Upon payment of the itemized bill received pursuant to this division, the county may submit the cost of the investigation and mitigation services to the state public defender for reimbursement pursuant to section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (4) There is hereby created in the state treasury the county representation fund for the deposit of moneys received from counties under this division. All moneys credited to the fund shall be used by the state public defender to provide legal representation for indigent persons when designated by the court or requested by a county or joint county public defender or to provide investigation or mitigation services, including investigation or mitigation services to private appointed counsel or a county or joint county public defender, as approved by the court. (5) If the state public defender determines that the state public defender does not have the capacity to provide the legal representation described in division (A)(5)(a) of this section and the state public defender contracts with private legal counsel to provide the legal representation, the state public defender shall directly pay private legal counsel's fees and expenses from the indigent defense support fund pursuant to section 120.08 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of sections 109.02, 109.07, 109.361 to 109.366, and 120.03 of the Revised Code that pertains to representation by the attorney general, an assistant attorney general, or special counsel of an officer or employee, as defined in section 109.36 of the Revised Code, or of an entity of state government, the state public defender may elect to contract with, and to have the state pay pursuant to division (E)(2) of this section for the services of, private legal counsel to represent the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, assistant state public defenders, other employees of the commission or the state public defender, and attorneys described in division (C) of section 120.41 of the Revised Code in a malpractice or other civil action or proceeding that arises from alleged actions or omissions related to responsibilities derived pursuant to this chapter, or in a civil action that is based upon alleged violations of the constitution or statutes of the United States, including section 1983 of Title 42 of the United States Code, 93 Stat. 1284 (1979), 42 U.S.C.A. 1983, as amended, and that arises from alleged actions or omissions related to responsibilities derived pursuant to this chapter, if the state public defender determines, in good faith, that the defendant in the civil action or proceeding did not act manifestly outside the scope of the defendant's employment or official responsibilities, with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner. If the state public defender elects not to contract pursuant to this division for private legal counsel in a civil action or proceeding, then, in accordance with sections 109.02, 109.07, 109.361 to 109.366, and 120.03 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall represent or provide for the representation of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, assistant state public defenders, other employees of the commission or the state public defender, or attorneys described in division (C) of section 120.41 of the Revised Code in the civil action or proceeding. (2)(a) Subject to division (E)(2)(b) of this section, payment from the state treasury for the services of private legal counsel with whom the state public defender has contracted pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section shall be accomplished only through the following procedure: (i) The private legal counsel shall file with the attorney general a copy of the contract; a request for an award of legal fees, court costs, and expenses earned or incurred in connection with the defense of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, an assistant state public defender, an employee, or an attorney in a specified civil action or proceeding; a written itemization of those fees, costs, and expenses, including the signature of the state public defender and the state public defender's attestation that the fees, costs, and expenses were earned or incurred pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section to the best of the state public defender's knowledge and information; a written statement whether the fees, costs, and expenses are for all legal services to be rendered in connection with that defense, are only for legal services rendered to the date of the request and additional legal services likely will have to be provided in connection with that defense, or are for the final legal services rendered in connection with that defense; a written statement indicating whether the private legal counsel previously submitted a request for an award under division (E)(2) of this section in connection with that defense and, if so, the date and the amount of each award granted; and, if the fees, costs, and expenses are for all legal services to be rendered in connection with that defense or are for the final legal services rendered in connection with that defense, a certified copy of any judgment entry in the civil action or proceeding or a signed copy of any settlement agreement entered into between the parties to the civil action or proceeding. (ii) Upon receipt of a request for an award of legal fees, court costs, and expenses and the requisite supportive documentation described in division (E)(2)(a)(i) of this section, the attorney general shall review the request and documentation; determine whether any of the limitations specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section apply to the request; and, if an award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses is permissible after applying the limitations, prepare a document awarding legal fees, court costs, or expenses to the private legal counsel. The document shall name the private legal counsel as the recipient of the award; specify the total amount of the award as determined by the attorney general; itemize the portions of the award that represent legal fees, court costs, and expenses; specify any limitation applied pursuant to division (E)(2)(b) of this section to reduce the amount of the award sought by the private legal counsel; state that the award is payable from the state treasury pursuant to division (E)(2)(a)(iii) of this section; and be approved by the inclusion of the signatures of the attorney general, the state public defender, and the private legal counsel. (iii) The attorney general shall forward a copy of the document prepared pursuant to division (E)(2)(a)(ii) of this section to the director of budget and management. The award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses shall be paid out of the state public defender's appropriations, to the extent there is a sufficient available balance in those appropriations. If the state public defender does not have a sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations to pay the entire award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses, the director shall make application for a transfer of appropriations out of the emergency purposes account or any other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies in an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations. A transfer of appropriations out of the emergency purposes account or any other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies shall be authorized if there are sufficient moneys greater than the sum total of then pending emergency purposes account requests, or requests for releases from the other appropriation. If a transfer of appropriations out of the emergency purposes account or other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies is made to pay an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations, the director shall cause the payment to be made to the private legal counsel. If sufficient moneys do not exist in the emergency purposes account or other appropriation for emergencies or contingencies to pay an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations, the private legal counsel shall request the general assembly to make an appropriation sufficient to pay an amount equal to the portion of the award that exceeds the sufficient available balance in the state public defender's appropriations, and no payment in that amount shall be made until the appropriation has been made. The private legal counsel shall make the request during the current biennium and during each succeeding biennium until a sufficient appropriation is made. (b) An award of legal fees, court costs, and expenses pursuant to division (E) of this section is subject to the following limitations: (i) The maximum award or maximum aggregate of a series of awards of legal fees, court costs, and expenses to the private legal counsel in connection with the defense of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, an assistant state public defender, an employee, or an attorney in a specified civil action or proceeding shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars. (ii) The private legal counsel shall not be awarded legal fees, court costs, or expenses to the extent the fees, costs, or expenses are covered by a policy of malpractice or other insurance. (iii) The private legal counsel shall be awarded legal fees and expenses only to the extent that the fees and expenses are reasonable in light of the legal services rendered by the private legal counsel in connection with the defense of the Ohio public defender commission, the state public defender, an assistant state public defender, an employee, or an attorney in a specified civil action or proceeding. (c) If, pursuant to division (E)(2)(a) of this section, the attorney general denies a request for an award of legal fees, court costs, or expenses to private legal counsel because of the application of a limitation specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, the attorney general shall notify the private legal counsel in writing of the denial and of the limitation applied. (d) If, pursuant to division (E)(2)(c) of this section, a private legal counsel receives a denial of an award notification or if a private legal counsel refuses to approve a document under division (E)(2)(a)(ii) of this section because of the proposed application of a limitation specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, the private legal counsel may commence a civil action against the attorney general in the court of claims to prove the private legal counsel's entitlement to the award sought, to prove that division (E)(2)(b) of this section does not prohibit or otherwise limit the award sought, and to recover a judgment for the amount of the award sought. A civil action under division (E)(2)(d) of this section shall be commenced no later than two years after receipt of a denial of award notification or, if the private legal counsel refused to approve a document under division (E)(2)(a)(ii) of this section because of the proposed application of a limitation specified in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, no later than two years after the refusal. Any judgment of the court of claims in favor of the private legal counsel shall be paid from the state treasury in accordance with division (E)(2)(a) of this section. (F) If a court appoints the office of the state public defender to represent a petitioner in a postconviction relief proceeding under section 2953.21 of the Revised Code, the petitioner has received a sentence of death, and the proceeding relates to that sentence, all of the attorneys who represent the petitioner in the proceeding pursuant to the appointment, whether an assistant state public defender, the state public defender, or another attorney, shall be certified under Rule 20 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio to represent indigent defendants charged with or convicted of an offense for which the death penalty can be or has been imposed. (G)(1) The state public defender may conduct a legal assistance referral service for children committed to the department of youth services relative to conditions of confinement claims. If the legal assistance referral service receives a request for assistance from a child confined in a facility operated, or contracted for, by the department of youth services and the state public defender determines that the child has a conditions of confinement claim that has merit, the state public defender may refer the child to a private attorney. If no private attorney who the child has been referred to by the state public defender accepts the case within a reasonable time, the state public defender may prepare, as appropriate, pro se pleadings in the form of a complaint regarding the conditions of confinement at the facility where the child is confined with a motion for appointment of counsel and other applicable pleadings necessary for sufficient pro se representation. (2) Division (G)(1) of this section does not authorize the state public defender to represent a child committed to the department of youth services in general civil matters arising solely out of state law. (3) The state public defender shall not undertake the representation of a child in court based on a conditions of confinement claim arising under this division. (H) A child's right to representation or services under this section is not affected by the child, or another person on behalf of the child, previously having paid for similar representation or services or having waived legal representation. (I) The state public defender shall have reasonable access to any child committed to the department of youth services, department of youth services institution, and department of youth services record as needed to implement this section. (J) As used in this section: (1) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Conditions of confinement" means any issue involving a constitutional right or other civil right related to a child's incarceration, including, but not limited to, actions cognizable under 42 U.S.C. 1983. (3) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 120.08. There is hereby created in the state treasury the indigent defense support fund, consisting of money paid into the fund pursuant to sections 4507.45, 4509.101, 4510.22, and 4511.19 of the Revised Code and pursuant to sections 2937.22, 2949.091, and 2949.094 of the Revised Code out of the additional court costs imposed under those sections. The state public defender shall use at least eighty-three per cent of the money in the fund for the purposes of reimbursing county governments for expenses incurred pursuant to sections 120.18, 120.28, and 120.33 of the Revised Code and , operating its system pursuant to division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code and division (B) of section 120.33 of the Revised Code, and directly paying private legal counsel's fees and expenses incurred pursuant to division (D)(5) of section 120.06 of the Revised Code. Disbursements from the fund to county governments shall be made at least once per year and shall be allocated proportionately so that each county receives an equal percentage of its cost for operating its county public defender system, its joint county public defender system, its county appointed counsel system, or its system operated under division (C)(7) of section 120.04 of the Revised Code and division (B) of section 120.33 of the Revised Code. The state public defender may use not more than seventeen per cent of the money in the fund for the purposes of appointing assistant state public defenders, providing other personnel, equipment, and facilities necessary for the operation of the state public defender office, and providing training, developing and implementing electronic forms, or establishing and maintaining an information technology system used for the uniform operation of this chapter. Sec. 121.02. The following administrative departments and their respective directors are hereby created: (A) The office of budget and management, which shall be administered by the director of budget and management; (B) The department of commerce, which shall be administered by the director of commerce; (C) The department of administrative services, which shall be administered by the director of administrative services; (D) The department of transportation, which shall be administered by the director of transportation; (E) The department of agriculture, which shall be administered by the director of agriculture; (F) The department of natural resources, which shall be administered by the director of natural resources; (G) The department of health, which shall be administered by the director of health; (H) The department of job and family services, which shall be administered by the director of job and family services; (I) The department of children and youth, which shall be administered by the director of children and youth; (J) The department of public safety, which shall be administered by the director of public safety; (K) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, which shall be administered by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (L) The department of developmental disabilities, which shall be administered by the director of developmental disabilities; (M) The department of insurance, which shall be administered by the superintendent of insurance as director thereof; (N) The department of development, which shall be administered by the director of development; (O) The department of youth services, which shall be administered by the director of youth services; (P) The department of rehabilitation and correction, which shall be administered by the director of rehabilitation and correction; (Q) The environmental protection agency, which shall be administered by the director of environmental protection; (R) The department of aging, which shall be administered by the director of aging; (S) The department of veterans services, which shall be administered by the director of veterans services; (T) The department of medicaid, which shall be administered by the medicaid director; (U) The department of education and workforce, which shall be administered by the director of education and workforce. The director of each department shall exercise the powers and perform the duties vested by law in such department. Sec. 121.03. The following administrative department heads shall be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, and shall hold their offices during the term of the appointing governor, and are subject to removal at the pleasure of the governor. (A) The director of budget and management; (B) The director of commerce; (C) The director of transportation; (D) The director of agriculture; (E) The director of job and family services; (F) The director of children and youth; (G) The director of public safety; (H) The superintendent of insurance; (I) The director of development; (J) The tax commissioner; (K) The director of administrative services; (L) The director of natural resources; (M) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (N) The director of developmental disabilities; (O) The director of health; (P) The director of youth services; (Q) The director of rehabilitation and correction; (R) The director of environmental protection; (S) The director of aging; (T) The administrator of workers' compensation who meets the qualifications required under division (A) of section 4121.121 of the Revised Code; (U) The director of veterans services who meets the qualifications required under section 5902.01 of the Revised Code; (V) The chancellor of higher education; (W) The medicaid director; (X) The director of education and workforce. Sec. 121.085. The financial literacy education fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of funds transferred to it from the consumer finance fund pursuant to section 1321.21 of the Revised Code. The fund shall be used to support various adult financial literacy education programs developed or implemented by the director of commerce. The fund shall be administered by the director of commerce who shall adopt rules for the distribution of fund moneys. The director of commerce shall adopt a rule to require that at least one-half of the financial literacy education programs developed or implemented pursuant to this section, and offered to the public, be presented by or available at public community colleges or state institutions throughout the state. The director of commerce shall deliver to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the senate, the minority leader of the house of representatives, and the governor an annual report that includes an outline of each adult financial literacy education program developed or implemented, the number of individuals who were educated by each program, and an accounting for all funds distributed. Sec. 121.16. Not later than ten days after receiving notice from the federal government about a reduction or other modification to federal funding a state agency receives, the state agency that received the notice shall submit a copy to the president of the senate, or the president's designee, and to the speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker's designee. Not later than ten days after receiving notice from the federal government that a state program is or may be out of compliance with federal requirements, the state agency that received the notice shall submit a copy to the president of the senate, or the president's designee, and to the speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker's designee. Sec. 121.22. (A) This section shall be liberally construed to require public officials to take official action and to conduct all deliberations upon official business only in open meetings unless the subject matter is specifically excepted by law. (B) As used in this section: (1) "Public body" means any of the following: (a) Any board, commission, committee, council, or similar decision-making body of a state agency, institution, or authority, and any legislative authority or board, commission, committee, council, agency, authority, or similar decision-making body of any county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision or local public institution; (b) Any committee or subcommittee of a body described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section; (c) A court of jurisdiction of a sanitary district organized wholly for the purpose of providing a water supply for domestic, municipal, and public use when meeting for the purpose of the appointment, removal, or reappointment of a member of the board of directors of such a district pursuant to section 6115.10 of the Revised Code, if applicable, or for any other matter related to such a district other than litigation involving the district. As used in division (B)(1)(c) of this section, "court of jurisdiction" has the same meaning as "court" in section 6115.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Meeting" means any prearranged discussion of the public business of the public body by a majority of its members. (3) "Regulated individual" means either of the following: (a) A student in a state or local public educational institution; (b) A person who is, voluntarily or involuntarily, an inmate, patient, or resident of a state or local institution because of criminal behavior, mental illness, an intellectual disability, disease, disability, age, or other condition requiring custodial care. (4) "Public office" has the same meaning as in section 149.011 of the Revised Code. (C) All meetings of any public body are declared to be public meetings open to the public at all times. A member of a public body shall be present in person at a meeting open to the public to be considered present or to vote at the meeting and for purposes of determining whether a quorum is present at the meeting. The minutes of a regular or special meeting of any public body shall be promptly prepared, filed, and maintained and shall be open to public inspection. The minutes need only reflect the general subject matter of discussions in executive sessions authorized under division (G) or (J) of this section. (D) This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) A grand jury; (2) An audit conference conducted by the auditor of state or independent certified public accountants with officials of the public office that is the subject of the audit; (3) The adult parole authority when its hearings are conducted at a correctional institution for the sole purpose of interviewing inmates to determine parole or pardon and the department of rehabilitation and correction when its hearings are conducted at a correctional institution for the sole purpose of making determinations under section 2967.271 of the Revised Code regarding the release or maintained incarceration of an offender to whom that section applies; (4) The organized crime investigations commission established under section 177.01 of the Revised Code; (5) Meetings of a child fatality review board established under section 307.621 of the Revised Code, meetings related to a review conducted pursuant to guidelines established by the director of health under section 3701.70 of the Revised Code, and meetings conducted pursuant to sections 5153.171 to 5153.173 of the Revised Code; (6) The state medical board when determining whether to suspend a license or certificate without a prior hearing pursuant to division (G) of either section 4730.25 or 4731.22 of the Revised Code; (7) The board of nursing when determining whether to suspend a license or certificate without a prior hearing pursuant to division (B) of section 4723.281 of the Revised Code; (8) The state board of pharmacy when determining whether to do either of the following: (a) Suspend a license, certification, or registration without a prior hearing, including during meetings conducted by telephone conference, pursuant to Chapters 3719., 3796., 4729., and 4752. of the Revised Code and rules adopted thereunder; or (b) Restrict a person from obtaining further information from the drug database established in section 4729.75 of the Revised Code without a prior hearing pursuant to division (C) of section 4729.86 of the Revised Code. (9) The state chiropractic board when determining whether to suspend a license without a hearing pursuant to section 4734.37 of the Revised Code; (10) The executive committee of the emergency response commission when determining whether to issue an enforcement order or request that a civil action, civil penalty action, or criminal action be brought to enforce Chapter 3750. of the Revised Code; (11) The board of directors of the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code or any committee thereof, and the board of directors of any subsidiary of that corporation or a committee thereof; (12) An audit conference conducted by the audit staff of the department of job and family services with officials of the public office that is the subject of that audit under section 5101.37 of the Revised Code; (13) The occupational therapy section of the occupational therapy, physical therapy, and athletic trainers board when determining whether to suspend a license without a hearing pursuant to division (E) of section 4755.11 of the Revised Code; (14) The physical therapy section of the occupational therapy, physical therapy, and athletic trainers board when determining whether to suspend a license without a hearing pursuant to division (F) of section 4755.47 of the Revised Code; (15) The athletic trainers section of the occupational therapy, physical therapy, and athletic trainers board when determining whether to suspend a license without a hearing pursuant to division (E) of section 4755.64 of the Revised Code; (16) Meetings of the pregnancy-associated mortality review board established under section 3738.01 5180.27 of the Revised Code; (17) Meetings of a fetal-infant mortality review board established under section 3707.71 of the Revised Code; (18) Meetings of a drug overdose fatality review committee described in section 307.631 of the Revised Code; (19) Meetings of a suicide fatality review committee described in section 307.641 of the Revised Code; (20) Meetings of the officers, members, or directors of an existing qualified nonprofit corporation that creates a special improvement district under Chapter 1710. of the Revised Code, at which the public business of the corporation pertaining to a purpose for which the district is created is not discussed; (21) Meetings of a domestic violence fatality review board established under section 307.651 of the Revised Code; (22) Any nonprofit agency that has received an endorsement under section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code. (E) The controlling board, the tax credit authority, or the minority development financing advisory board, when meeting to consider granting assistance pursuant to Chapter 122. or 166. of the Revised Code, in order to protect the interest of the applicant or the possible investment of public funds, by unanimous vote of all board or authority members present, may close the meeting during consideration of the following information confidentially received by the authority or board from the applicant: (1) Marketing plans; (2) Specific business strategy; (3) Production techniques and trade secrets; (4) Financial projections; (5) Personal financial statements of the applicant or members of the applicant's immediate family, including, but not limited to, tax records or other similar information not open to public inspection. The vote by the authority or board to accept or reject the application, as well as all proceedings of the authority or board not subject to this division, shall be open to the public and governed by this section. (F) Every public body, by rule, shall establish a reasonable method whereby any person may determine the time and place of all regularly scheduled meetings and the time, place, and purpose of all special meetings. A public body shall not hold a special meeting unless it gives at least twenty-four hours' advance notice to the news media that have requested notification, except in the event of an emergency requiring immediate official action. In the event of an emergency, the member or members calling the meeting shall notify the news media that have requested notification immediately of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting. The rule shall provide that any person, upon request and payment of a reasonable fee, may obtain reasonable advance notification of all meetings at which any specific type of public business is to be discussed. Provisions for advance notification may include, but are not limited to, mailing the agenda of meetings to all subscribers on a mailing list or mailing notices in self-addressed, stamped envelopes provided by the person. (G) Except as provided in divisions (G)(8) and (J) of this section, the members of a public body may hold an executive session only after a majority of a quorum of the public body determines, by a roll call vote, to hold an executive session and only at a regular or special meeting for the sole purpose of the consideration of any of the following matters: (1) To consider the appointment, employment, dismissal, discipline, promotion, demotion, or compensation of a public employee or official, or the investigation of charges or complaints against a public employee, official, licensee, or regulated individual, unless the public employee, official, licensee, or regulated individual requests a public hearing. Except as otherwise provided by law, no public body shall hold an executive session for the discipline of an elected official for conduct related to the performance of the elected official's official duties or for the elected official's removal from office. If a public body holds an executive session pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, the motion and vote to hold that executive session shall state which one or more of the approved purposes listed in division (G)(1) of this section are the purposes for which the executive session is to be held, but need not include the name of any person to be considered at the meeting. (2) To consider the purchase of property for public purposes, the sale of property at competitive bidding, or the sale or other disposition of unneeded, obsolete, or unfit-for-use property in accordance with section 505.10 of the Revised Code, if premature disclosure of information would give an unfair competitive or bargaining advantage to a person whose personal, private interest is adverse to the general public interest. No member of a public body shall use division (G)(2) of this section as a subterfuge for providing covert information to prospective buyers or sellers. A purchase or sale of public property is void if the seller or buyer of the public property has received covert information from a member of a public body that has not been disclosed to the general public in sufficient time for other prospective buyers and sellers to prepare and submit offers. If the minutes of the public body show that all meetings and deliberations of the public body have been conducted in compliance with this section, any instrument executed by the public body purporting to convey, lease, or otherwise dispose of any right, title, or interest in any public property shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with this section insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or transferees of the property is concerned. (3) Conferences with an attorney for the public body concerning disputes involving the public body that are the subject of pending or imminent court action; (4) Preparing for, conducting, or reviewing negotiations or bargaining sessions with public employees concerning their compensation or other terms and conditions of their employment; (5) Matters required to be kept confidential by federal law or regulations or state statutes; (6) Details relative to the security arrangements and emergency response protocols for a public body or a public office, if disclosure of the matters discussed could reasonably be expected to jeopardize the security of the public body or public office; (7) In the case of a county hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 339. of the Revised Code, a joint township hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 513. of the Revised Code, or a municipal hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 749. of the Revised Code, to consider trade secrets, as defined in section 1333.61 of the Revised Code; (8) To consider confidential information related to the marketing plans, specific business strategy, production techniques, trade secrets, or personal financial statements of an applicant for economic development assistance, or to negotiations with other political subdivisions respecting requests for economic development assistance, provided that both of the following conditions apply: (a) The information is directly related to a request for economic development assistance that is to be provided or administered under any provision of Chapter 715., 725., 1724., or 1728. or sections 701.07, 3735.67 to 3735.70, 5709.40 to 5709.43, 5709.61 to 5709.69, 5709.73 to 5709.75, or 5709.77 to 5709.81 of the Revised Code, or that involves public infrastructure improvements or the extension of utility services that are directly related to an economic development project. (b) A unanimous quorum of the public body determines, by a roll call vote, that the executive session is necessary to protect the interests of the applicant or the possible investment or expenditure of public funds to be made in connection with the economic development project. If a public body holds an executive session to consider any of the matters listed in divisions (G)(2) to (8) of this section, the motion and vote to hold that executive session shall state which one or more of the approved matters listed in those divisions are to be considered at the executive session. A public body specified in division (B)(1)(c) of this section shall not hold an executive session when meeting for the purposes specified in that division. (H) A resolution, rule, or formal action of any kind is invalid unless adopted in an open meeting of the public body. A resolution, rule, or formal action adopted in an open meeting that results from deliberations in a meeting not open to the public is invalid unless the deliberations were for a purpose specifically authorized in division (G) or (J) of this section and conducted at an executive session held in compliance with this section. A resolution, rule, or formal action adopted in an open meeting is invalid if the public body that adopted the resolution, rule, or formal action violated division (F) of this section. (I)(1) Any person may bring an action to enforce this section. An action under division (I)(1) of this section shall be brought within two years after the date of the alleged violation or threatened violation. Upon proof of a violation or threatened violation of this section in an action brought by any person, the court of common pleas shall issue an injunction to compel the members of the public body to comply with its provisions. (2)(a) If the court of common pleas issues an injunction pursuant to division (I)(1) of this section, the court shall order the public body that it enjoins to pay a civil forfeiture of five hundred dollars to the party that sought the injunction and shall award to that party all court costs and, subject to reduction as described in division (I)(2) of this section, reasonable attorney's fees. The court, in its discretion, may reduce an award of attorney's fees to the party that sought the injunction or not award attorney's fees to that party if the court determines both of the following: (i) That, based on the ordinary application of statutory law and case law as it existed at the time of violation or threatened violation that was the basis of the injunction, a well-informed public body reasonably would believe that the public body was not violating or threatening to violate this section; (ii) That a well-informed public body reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct that was the basis of the injunction would serve the public policy that underlies the authority that is asserted as permitting that conduct or threatened conduct. (b) If the court of common pleas does not issue an injunction pursuant to division (I)(1) of this section and the court determines at that time that the bringing of the action was frivolous conduct, as defined in division (A) of section 2323.51 of the Revised Code, the court shall award to the public body all court costs and reasonable attorney's fees, as determined by the court. (3) Irreparable harm and prejudice to the party that sought the injunction shall be conclusively and irrebuttably presumed upon proof of a violation or threatened violation of this section. (4) A member of a public body who knowingly violates an injunction issued pursuant to division (I)(1) of this section may be removed from office by an action brought in the court of common pleas for that purpose by the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general. (J)(1) Pursuant to division (C) of section 5901.09 of the Revised Code, a veterans service commission shall hold an executive session for one or more of the following purposes unless an applicant requests a public hearing: (a) Interviewing an applicant for financial assistance under sections 5901.01 to 5901.15 of the Revised Code; (b) Discussing applications, statements, and other documents described in division (B) of section 5901.09 of the Revised Code; (c) Reviewing matters relating to an applicant's request for financial assistance under sections 5901.01 to 5901.15 of the Revised Code. (2) A veterans service commission shall not exclude an applicant for, recipient of, or former recipient of financial assistance under sections 5901.01 to 5901.15 of the Revised Code, and shall not exclude representatives selected by the applicant, recipient, or former recipient, from a meeting that the commission conducts as an executive session that pertains to the applicant's, recipient's, or former recipient's application for financial assistance. (3) A veterans service commission shall vote on the grant or denial of financial assistance under sections 5901.01 to 5901.15 of the Revised Code only in an open meeting of the commission. The minutes of the meeting shall indicate the name, address, and occupation of the applicant, whether the assistance was granted or denied, the amount of the assistance if assistance is granted, and the votes for and against the granting of assistance. Sec. 121.35. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, the following state agencies shall collaborate to revise and make more uniform the eligibility standards and eligibility determination procedures of programs the state agencies administer: (1) The department of aging; (2) The department of development; (3) The department of developmental disabilities; (4) The department of education and workforce; (5) The department of health; (6) The department of job and family services; (7) The department of medicaid; (8) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (9) The opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency; (10) The department of children and youth. (B) In revising eligibility standards and eligibility determination procedures, a state agency shall not make any program's eligibility standards or eligibility determination procedures inconsistent with state or federal law. To the extent authorized by state and federal law, the revisions may provide for the state agencies to share administrative operations. Sec. 121.36. (A) As used in this section, "home care dependent adult" means an individual who resides in a private home or other noninstitutional and unlicensed living arrangement, without the presence of a parent or guardian, but has health and safety needs that require the provision of regularly scheduled home care services to remain in the home or other living arrangement because one of the following is the case: (1) The individual is at least twenty-one years of age but less than sixty years of age and has a physical disability or mental impairment. (2) The individual is sixty years of age or older, regardless of whether the individual has a physical disability or mental impairment. (B) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the departments of developmental disabilities, aging, job and family services, and health shall each implement this section with respect to all contracts entered into by the department for the provision of home care services to home care dependent adults that are paid for in whole or in part with federal, state, or local funds. Except as provided in division (D) of this section, each department shall also require all public and private entities that receive money from or through the department to comply with this section when entering into contracts for the provision of home care services to home care dependent adults that are paid for in whole or in part with federal, state, or local funds. Such entities may include county boards of developmental disabilities, area agencies on aging, county departments of job and family services, and boards of health of city and general health districts. (C) Beginning one year after September 26, 2003, each Each contract subject to this section shall include terms requiring that the provider of home care services to home care dependent adults have a system in place that effectively monitors the delivery of the services by its employees. To be considered an effective monitoring system for purposes of the contract, the system established by a provider must include at least the following components: (1) When providing home care services to home care dependent adults who have a mental impairment or life-threatening health condition, a mechanism to verify whether the provider's employees are present at the location where the services are to be provided and at the time the services are to be provided; (2) When providing home care services to all other home care dependent adults, a system to verify at the end of each working day whether the provider's employees have provided the services at the proper location and time; (3) A protocol to be followed in scheduling a substitute employee when the monitoring system identifies that an employee has failed to provide home care services at the proper location and time, including standards for determining the length of time that may elapse without jeopardizing the health and safety of the home care dependent adult; (4) Procedures for maintaining records of the information obtained through the monitoring system; (5) Procedures for compiling annual reports of the information obtained through the monitoring system, including statistics on the rate at which home care services were provided at the proper location and time; (6) Procedures for conducting random checks of the accuracy of the monitoring system. For purposes of conducting these checks, a random check is considered to be a check of not more than five per cent of the home care visits the provider's employees make to different home care dependent adults within a particular work shift. (D) In implementing this section, the departments shall exempt providers the following from the section's requirements: (1) Providers of home care services who are self-employed providers with no other employees or are otherwise considered by the departments not to be agency providers. The departments shall conduct a study on how the exempted providers may be made subject to the requirement of effectively monitoring whether home care services are being provided and have been provided at the proper location and time. Not later than two years after September 26, 2003, the departments shall prepare a report of their findings and recommendations. The report shall be submitted to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives; (2) Providers who utilize an electronic visit verification system as described in section 12006 of the "21st Century Cures Act of 2016," 42 U.S.C. 1903(l). (E) The departments of developmental disabilities, aging, job and family services, and health shall each adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 121.37. (A)(1) There is hereby created the Ohio family and children first cabinet council. The council shall be composed of the director of education and workforce, the executive director of the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, the medicaid director, and the directors of youth services, job and family services, mental behavioral health and addiction services, health, developmental disabilities, aging, rehabilitation and correction, children and youth, and budget and management. The chairperson of the council shall be the governor or the governor's designee and shall establish procedures for the council's internal control and management. The purpose of the cabinet council is to help families seeking government services. This section shall not be interpreted or applied to usurp the role of parents, but solely to streamline and coordinate existing government services for families seeking assistance for their children. (2) In seeking to fulfill its purpose, the council may do any of the following: (a) Advise and make recommendations to the governor and general assembly regarding the provision of services to children; (b) Advise and assess local governments on the coordination of service delivery to children; (c) Hold meetings at such times and places as may be prescribed by the council's procedures and maintain records of the meetings, except that records identifying individual children are confidential and shall be disclosed only as provided by law; (d) Develop programs and projects, including pilot projects, to encourage coordinated efforts at the state and local level to improve the state's social service delivery system; (e) Enter into contracts with and administer grants to county family and children first councils, as well as other county or multicounty organizations to plan and coordinate service delivery between state agencies and local service providers for families and children; (f) Enter into contracts with and apply for grants from federal agencies or private organizations; (g) Enter into interagency agreements to encourage coordinated efforts at the state and local level to improve the state's social service delivery system. The agreements may include provisions regarding the receipt, transfer, and expenditure of funds; (h) Identify public and private funding sources for services provided to alleged or adjudicated unruly children and children who are at risk of being alleged or adjudicated unruly children, including regulations governing access to and use of the services; (i) Collect information provided by local communities regarding successful programs for prevention, intervention, and treatment of unruly behavior, including evaluations of the programs; (j) Identify and disseminate publications regarding alleged or adjudicated unruly children and children who are at risk of being alleged or adjudicated unruly children and regarding programs serving those types of children; (k) Maintain an inventory of strategic planning facilitators for use by government or nonprofit entities that serve alleged or adjudicated unruly children or children who are at risk of being alleged or adjudicated unruly children. (3) The cabinet council shall provide for the following: (a) Reviews of service and treatment plans for children for which such reviews are requested; (b) Assistance as the council determines to be necessary to meet the needs of children referred by county family and children first councils; (c) Monitoring and supervision of a statewide, comprehensive, coordinated, multi-disciplinary, interagency system for infants and toddlers with developmental disabilities or delays and their families, as established pursuant to federal grants received and administered by the department of children and youth for early intervention services under the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 2004," 118 Stat. 2744, 20 U.S.C.A. 1400, as amended; (d) Establishing and maintaining the Ohio automated service coordination system pursuant to section 121.376 of the Revised Code. (4) The cabinet council shall develop and implement the following: (a) An interagency process to select the indicators that will be used to measure progress toward increasing child well-being in the state and to update the indicators on an annual basis. (b) An interagency system to offer guidance and monitor progress toward increasing child well-being in the state and in each county; (c) An annual plan that identifies state-level agency efforts taken to ensure progress towards increasing child well-being in the state; (d) A state appeals process to resolve disputes among the members of a county council, established under division (B) of this section, concerning whether reasonable responsibilities are being shared. The appeals process may be accessed only by a majority vote of the council members who are required to serve on the council. Upon appeal, the cabinet council may order that state funds for services to children and families be redirected to a county's board of county commissioners. (5) On an annual basis, the cabinet council shall submit to the governor and the general assembly a report on the status of efforts to increase child well-being in the state. This report shall be made available to any other person on request. (6) The cabinet council state office may adopt rules governing the responsibilities of county family and children first councils established in division (B)(3)(B)(5) of this section. (B)(1) Each Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, each board of county commissioners shall establish a county family and children first council. The board may invite any local public or private agency or group that funds, advocates, or provides services to children and families to have a representative become a permanent or temporary member of its county council. Each county council must include the following individuals: (a) At least three individuals who are not employed by an agency represented on the council and whose families are receiving or have received services from an agency represented on the council or another county's council. If such an individual is employed by an agency represented on the council, the individual shall complete a conflict of interest disclosure form and abstain from any vote that involves the agency that employs the individual. Where possible, the number of members representing families shall may be equal to twenty per cent of the council's membership. (b) The director of the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that serves the county, or, in the case of a county that has a board of alcohol and drug addiction services and a community mental health board, the directors of both boards. If a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services covers more than one county, the director may designate a person to participate on the county's council. (c) The health commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, of the board of health of each city and general health district in the county. If the county has two or more health districts, the health commissioner membership may be limited to the commissioners of the two districts with the largest populations. (d) The director of the county department of job and family services; (e) The executive director of the public children services agency; (f) The superintendent of the county board of developmental disabilities or, if the superintendent serves as superintendent of more than one county board of developmental disabilities, the superintendent's designee; (g) The superintendent of the city, exempted village, or local school district with the largest number of pupils residing in the county, or a district-level administrative designee with decision-making authority, as determined by the department of education and workforce, which shall notify each board of county commissioners of its determination at least biennially; (h) A school superintendent representing all other school districts with territory in the county, or a district-level administrative designee with decision-making authority, as designated at a biennial meeting of the superintendents of those districts; (i) A representative of the municipal corporation with the largest population in the county; (j) The president of the board of county commissioners or an individual designated by the board; (k) A representative of the department of youth services or an individual designated by the department; (l) A representative of the county's head start agencies, as defined in section 3301.32 of the Revised Code; (m) A representative of the county's early intervention collaborative established pursuant to the federal early intervention program operated under the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 2004"; (n) A representative of a local nonprofit entity that funds, advocates, or provides services to children and families. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the public members of a county council are not prohibited from serving on the council and making decisions regarding the duties of the council, including those involving the funding of joint projects and those outlined in the county's service coordination mechanism implemented pursuant to division (C) of this section. The county's juvenile court judge senior in service or another judge of the juvenile court designated by the administrative judge or, where there is no administrative judge, by the judge senior in service shall serve as the judicial advisor to the county family and children first council. The judge may advise the county council on the court's utilization of resources, services, or programs provided by the entities represented by the members of the county council and how those resources, services, or programs assist the court in its administration of justice. Service of a judge as a judicial advisor pursuant to this section is a judicial function. (2) By passing a resolution, a board of county commissioners may decide not to establish or maintain a county family and children first council for the county if the board determines that all of the following conditions exist: (a) Alternative programs and services exist in the county to meet the needs of those served by a family and children first council. (b) A family and children first council for the county is not or would not be sufficiently funded to make the council financially sustainable. (c) The director of the county department of job and family services, executive director of the public children services agency, and county board of developmental disabilities each recommend to the board of county commissioners not to establish or maintain a county family and children first council. (3) A county's board of county commissioners that has decided to not establish or maintain a county family and children first council may reconsider the decision at any time but shall do so not later than five years after the date the resolution passed. In reconsidering the decision, the board of county commissioners shall determine whether all the conditions described in division (B)(2) of this section exist. (4) The purpose of the county council is to streamline and coordinate existing government services for families seeking services for their children. In seeking to fulfill its purpose, a county council shall provide for the following: (a) Referrals to the cabinet council of those children for whom the county council cannot provide adequate services; (b) Development and implementation of a process that annually evaluates and prioritizes services, fills service gaps where possible, and invents new approaches to achieve better results for families and children; (c) Participation in the development of a countywide, comprehensive, coordinated, multi-disciplinary, interagency system for infants and toddlers with developmental disabilities or delays and their families, as established pursuant to federal grants received and administered by the department of children and youth for early intervention services under the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 2004"; (d) Maintenance of an accountability system to monitor the county council's progress in achieving results for families and children; (e) Establishment of a mechanism to ensure ongoing input from a broad representation of families who are receiving services within the county system. (3)(5) A county council shall develop and implement the following: (a) An interagency process to establish local indicators and monitor the county's progress toward increasing child well-being in the county; (b) An interagency process to identify local priorities to increase child well-being. (c) An annual plan that identifies the county's interagency efforts to increase child well-being in the county. On an annual basis, the county council shall submit a report on the status of efforts by the county to increase child well-being in the county to the county's board of county commissioners and the cabinet council. This report shall be made available to any other person on request. (4)(a)(6)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(4)(b)(B)(6)(b) of this section, a county council shall comply with the policies, procedures, and activities prescribed by the rules or interagency agreements of a state department participating on the cabinet council whenever the county council performs a function subject to those rules or agreements. (b) On application of a county council, the cabinet council may grant an exemption from any rules or interagency agreements of a state department participating on the council if an exemption is necessary for the council to implement an alternative program or approach for service delivery to families and children. The application shall describe the proposed program or approach and specify the rules or interagency agreements from which an exemption is necessary. The cabinet council shall approve or disapprove the application in accordance with standards and procedures it shall adopt. If an application is approved, the exemption is effective only while the program or approach is being implemented, including a reasonable period during which the program or approach is being evaluated for effectiveness. (5)(a)(7)(a) Each county council shall designate an administrative agent for the council from among the following public entities: the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, including a board of alcohol and drug addiction or a community mental health board if the county is served by separate boards; the board of county commissioners; any board of health of the county's city and general health districts; the county department of job and family services; the county agency responsible for the administration of children services pursuant to section 5153.15 of the Revised Code; the county board of developmental disabilities; any of the county's boards of education or governing boards of educational service centers; or the county's juvenile court. Any of the foregoing public entities, other than the board of county commissioners, may decline to serve as the council's administrative agent. A county council's administrative agent shall serve as the council's appointing authority for any employees of the council. The council shall file an annual budget with its administrative agent, with copies filed with the county auditor and with the board of county commissioners, unless the board is serving as the council's administrative agent. The council's administrative agent shall ensure that all expenditures are handled in accordance with policies, procedures, and activities prescribed by state departments in rules, grant agreements, or interagency agreements that are applicable to the council's functions. The administrative agent of a county council shall may send notice of a member's absence if a member listed in division (B)(1) of this section has been absent from either three consecutive meetings of the county council or a county council subcommittee, or from one-quarter of such meetings in a calendar year, whichever is less. The notice shall be sent to the board of county commissioners that establishes the county council and, for the members listed in divisions (B)(1)(b), (c), (e), and (l) of this section, to the governing board overseeing the respective entity; for the member listed in division (B)(1)(f) of this section, to the county board of developmental disabilities that employs the superintendent; for a member listed in division (B)(1)(g) or (h) of this section, to the school board that employs the superintendent; for the member listed in division (B)(1)(i) of this section, to the mayor of the municipal corporation; for the member listed in division (B)(1)(k) of this section, to the director of youth services; and for the member listed in division (B)(1)(n) of this section, to that member's board of trustees. The administrative agent for a county council may do any of the following on behalf of the council: (i) Enter into agreements or administer contracts with public or private entities to fulfill specific council business. Such agreements and contracts are exempt from the competitive bidding requirements of section 307.86 of the Revised Code if they have been approved by the county council and they are for the purchase of services for families and children. The approval of the county council is not required to exempt agreements or contracts entered into under section 5139.34, 5139.41, or 5139.43 of the Revised Code from the competitive bidding requirements of section 307.86 of the Revised Code. (ii) As determined by the council, provide financial stipends, reimbursements, or both, to family representatives for expenses related to council activity; (iii) Receive by gift, grant, devise, or bequest any moneys, lands, or other property for the purposes for which the council is established. The agent shall hold, apply, and dispose of the moneys, lands, or other property according to the terms of the gift, grant, devise, or bequest. Any interest or earnings shall be treated in the same manner and are subject to the same terms as the gift, grant, devise, or bequest from which it accrues. (b)(i) If the county council designates the board of county commissioners as its administrative agent, the board may, by resolution, delegate any of its powers and duties as administrative agent to an executive committee the board establishes from the membership of the county council. The board shall name to the executive committee at least the individuals described in divisions (B)(1)(b) to (h) of this section and may appoint the president of the board or another individual as the chair of the executive committee. The executive committee must include at least one family county council representative who does not have a family member employed by an agency represented on the council. (ii) The executive committee may, with the approval of the board, hire an executive director to assist the county council in administering its powers and duties. The executive director shall serve in the unclassified civil service at the pleasure of the executive committee. The executive director may, with the approval of the executive committee, hire other employees as necessary to properly conduct the county council's business. (iii) The board may require the executive committee to submit an annual budget to the board for approval and may amend or repeal the resolution that delegated to the executive committee its authority as the county council's administrative agent. (6)(8) Two or more county councils may enter into an agreement to administer their county councils jointly by creating a regional family and children first council. A regional council possesses the same duties and authority possessed by a county council, except that the duties and authority apply regionally rather than to individual counties. Prior to entering into an agreement to create a regional council, the members of each county council to be part of the regional council shall meet to determine whether all or part of the members of each county council will serve as members of the regional council. (7)(9) A board of county commissioners may approve a resolution by a majority vote of the board's members that requires the county council to submit a statement to the board each time the council proposes to enter into an agreement, adopt a plan, or make a decision, other than a decision pursuant to section 121.38 of the Revised Code, that requires the expenditure of funds for two or more families. The statement shall describe the proposed agreement, plan, or decision. Not later than fifteen days after the board receives the statement, it shall, by resolution approved by a majority of its members, approve or disapprove the agreement, plan, or decision. Failure of the board to pass a resolution during that time period shall be considered approval of the agreement, plan, or decision. An agreement, plan, or decision for which a statement is required to be submitted to the board shall be implemented only if it is approved by the board. (C) Each county shall develop a county service coordination mechanism. The county service coordination mechanism shall serve as the guiding document for coordination of services in the county. For children who also receive services under the early intervention program, the main provider of service coordination shall be an early intervention service coordinator to ensure compliance with section 5123.02 5180.30 of the Revised Code. All family service coordination plans shall be developed in accordance with the county service coordination mechanism. The mechanism shall be developed and approved with the participation of the county entities representing child welfare; developmental disabilities; alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; health; juvenile judges; education; the county family and children first council; and the county early intervention collaborative established pursuant to the federal early intervention program operated under the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 2004." The county shall establish an implementation schedule for the mechanism. The cabinet council may monitor the implementation and administration of each county's service coordination mechanism. Each mechanism shall include all of the following: (1) A procedure for an agency, including a juvenile court, or a family voluntarily seeking service coordination, to refer the child and family to the county council for service coordination in accordance with the mechanism; (2) A procedure ensuring that a family and all appropriate staff from involved agencies, including a representative from the appropriate school district, are notified of and invited to participate in all family service coordination plan meetings; (3) A procedure that permits a family to initiate a meeting to develop or review the family's service coordination plan and allows the family to invite a family advocate, mentor, or support person of the family's choice to participate in any such meeting; (4) A procedure for ensuring that a family service coordination plan meeting is conducted for each child who receives service coordination under the mechanism and for whom an emergency out-of-home placement has been made or for whom a nonemergency out-of-home placement is being considered. The meeting shall be conducted within ten days of an emergency out-of-home placement. The meeting shall be conducted before a nonemergency out-of-home placement. The family service coordination plan shall outline how the county council members will jointly pay for services, where applicable, and provide services in the least restrictive environment. (5) A procedure for monitoring the progress and tracking the outcomes of each service coordination plan requested in the county including monitoring and tracking children in out-of-home placements to assure continued progress, appropriateness of placement, and continuity of care after discharge from placement with appropriate arrangements for housing, treatment, and education; (6) A procedure for protecting the confidentiality of all personal family information disclosed during service coordination meetings or contained in the comprehensive family service coordination plan; (7) A procedure for assessing the needs and strengths of any child or family that has been referred to the council for service coordination, including a child whose parent or custodian is voluntarily seeking services, and for ensuring that parents and custodians are afforded the opportunity to participate; (8) A procedure for development of a family service coordination plan described in division (D) of this section; (9) A local dispute resolution process to serve as the process that must be used first to resolve disputes among the agencies represented on the county council concerning the provision of services to children, including children who are abused, neglected, dependent, unruly, alleged unruly, or delinquent children and under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and children whose parents or custodians are voluntarily seeking services. The local dispute resolution process shall comply with sections 121.38, 121.381, and 121.382 of the Revised Code. The local dispute resolution process shall be used to resolve disputes between a child's parents or custodians and the county council regarding service coordination. The county council shall inform the parents or custodians of their right to use the dispute resolution process. Parents or custodians shall use existing local agency grievance procedures to address disputes not involving service coordination. The dispute resolution process is in addition to and does not replace other rights or procedures that parents or custodians may have under other sections of the Revised Code. The cabinet council shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing an administrative review process to address problems that arise concerning the operation of a local dispute resolution process. Nothing in division (C)(4) of this section shall be interpreted as overriding or affecting decisions of a juvenile court or public children services agency regarding an out-of-home placement, long-term placement, or emergency out-of-home placement. (D) Each county shall develop a family service coordination plan that does all of the following: (1) Designates service responsibilities among the various state and local agencies that provide services to children and their families, including children who are abused, neglected, dependent, unruly, or delinquent children and under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and children whose parents or custodians are voluntarily seeking services; (2) Designates an individual, approved by the family, to track the progress of the family service coordination plan, schedule reviews as necessary, and facilitate the family service coordination plan meeting process; (3) Ensures that assistance and services to be provided are responsive to the strengths and needs of the family, as well as the family's culture, race, and ethnic group, by allowing the family to offer information and suggestions and participate in decisions. Identified assistance and services shall be provided in the least restrictive environment possible. (4) Includes a process for dealing with a child who is alleged to be an unruly child. The process shall include methods to divert the child from the juvenile court system; (5) Includes timelines for completion of goals specified in the plan with regular reviews scheduled to monitor progress toward those goals; (6) Includes a plan for dealing with short-term crisis situations and safety concerns. (E)(1) The process provided for under division (D)(4) of this section may include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) Designation of the person or agency to conduct the assessment of the child and the child's family as described in division (C)(7) of this section and designation of the instrument or instruments to be used to conduct the assessment; (b) An emphasis on the personal responsibilities of the child and the parental responsibilities of the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child; (c) Involvement of local law enforcement agencies and officials. (2) The method to divert a child from the juvenile court system that must be included in the service coordination process may include, but is not limited to, the following: (a) The preparation of a complaint under section 2151.27 of the Revised Code alleging that the child is an unruly child and notifying the child and the parents, guardian, or custodian that the complaint has been prepared to encourage the child and the parents, guardian, or custodian to comply with other methods to divert the child from the juvenile court system; (b) Conducting a meeting with the child, the parents, guardian, or custodian, and other interested parties to determine the appropriate methods to divert the child from the juvenile court system; (c) A method to provide to the child and the child's family a short-term respite from a short-term crisis situation involving a confrontation between the child and the parents, guardian, or custodian; (d) A program to provide a mentor to the child or the parents, guardian, or custodian; (e) A program to provide parenting education to the parents, guardian, or custodian; (f) An alternative school program for children who are truant from school, repeatedly disruptive in school, or suspended or expelled from school; (g) Other appropriate measures, including, but not limited to, any alternative methods to divert a child from the juvenile court system that are identified by the Ohio family and children first cabinet council. (F) Each county may review and revise the service coordination process described in division (D) of this section based on the availability of funds under Title IV-A of the "Social Security Act," 110 Stat. 2113 (1996), 42 U.S.C.A. 601, as amended, or to the extent resources are available from any other federal, state, or local funds. (G) As used in this section, "early intervention service coordinator" means a person who holds an early intervention service coordinator credential or an early intervention service coordination supervisor credential issued by the department of developmental disabilities children and youth and who assists and enables an infant or toddler with a developmental delay or disability and the child's family to receive the services and rights, including procedural safeguards, required under part C of the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act of 2004," 20 U.S.C. 1400, as amended. Sec. 121.93. (A) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, an agency shall review its operations to identify principles of law or policy that have not been stated in a rule and that the agency is relying upon in conducting adjudications or other determinations of rights and liabilities or in issuing writings and other materials, such as instructions, directives, policy statements, guidelines, handbooks, manuals, advisories, notices, circulars, advertisements, forms, letters, and opinions. An agency is not required to identify principles of law or policy relied upon in issuing internal management rules as defined n section 111.15 of the Revised Code. The agency shall complete at least one of the reviews during a governor's term. Within six months after the expiration of a governor's term, the agency electronically shall transmit a report to the joint committee on agency rule review containing the following: (1) A statement that the agency has completed one or more of the reviews, specifying the exact number of reviews completed during the governor's expired term; (2) The principles of law or policies identified under this division; (3) The agency's considerations regarding the identified principles of law or policies under division (B) of this section; (4) Any principles of law or policies for which the agency determines rulemaking is indicated or for which the agency has commenced the rule-making process under division (C) of this section. The joint committee on agency rule review shall make the reports available on its web site. (B) The agency shall determine whether a principle of law or policy thus identified has a general and uniform operation and establishes a legal regulation or standard that would not exist in its absence. If the principle of law or policy has these characteristics, the agency shall determine whether the principle of law or policy should be supplanted by its restatement in a rule to achieve one or more of the following as they are relevant to the principle of law or policy: (1) Assert the general and uniform operation of the principle of law or policy; (2) Make the principle of law or policy more readily available to the public; (3) Make the principle of law or policy more readily available to persons who specifically are affected by the principle of law or policy; (4) Enable the principle of law or policy to be better known in advance of its application; (5) Enable greater public participation in improvement and further development of the principle of law or policy; (6) Enable greater participation by persons specifically affected by the principle of law or policy in the improvement and further development of the principle of law or policy; (7) Make the principle of law or policy more easily understandable; or (8) Make the principle of law or policy more readily available to those legally charged with monitoring or reviewing the agency's operations. If a principle of law or policy aids in the interpretation of an existing rule or statute, the agency shall consider whether the aiding effect clarifies or otherwise resolves an uncertainty in the existing rule or statute. If the principle of law or policy can be so characterized, the agency shall consider whether the principle of law or policy should be supplanted by its restatement in an interpretive rule. The agency may not presume that a principle of law or policy that aids in the interpretation of an existing rule or statute is simply a reiteration of the existing rule or statute. (C) If the agency determines, in light of the foregoing standards, that rulemaking is indicated, the agency shall commence the rule-making process as soon as it is reasonably feasible to do so, but not later than the date that is six three months after the determination was made. The principle of law or policy as it is restated in a rule does not need to be wholly congruent with the supplanted principle of law or policy. The agency lawfully may improve or develop further the supplanted principle of law or policy as it is restated in a rule. The agency may continue to rely upon the principle of law or policy, but only while it is complying with the preceding paragraph. The agency may not rely upon the principle of law or policy in advising with regard to or in determining the rights or liabilities of a person if the any of the following apply: (1) The agency fails to commence the rule-making process by the deadline specified in the preceding paragraph, or if, after . (2) After commencing the rule-making process, the agency neglects or abandons the rule-making process before it is completed. (3) The agency fails to file a rule for which rulemaking is indicated under this section in final form within one year of the agency making a determination under this section. (4) After filing a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee, the agency notifies the joint committee of the agency's intention to file a revised proposed rule as described in division (B) of section 106.02 of the Revised Code. (D) A principle of law or policy that is relied upon directly or by clear implication from a statute applying to the agency does not need to be supplanted by rule. (E) This section does not apply to an agency, commission, or committee created in the legislative branch of government or to serve the general assembly including, but not limited to, all of the following: (1) The joint legislative ethics committee; (2) The joint medicaid oversight committee; (3) The correctional institution inspection committee; (4)(2) The legislative service commission; (5)(3) The legislative information services; (6)(4) The capitol square review and advisory board. Sec. 121.931. (A) A person may petition an agency in writing to restate a principle of law or policy in a rule if (1) the person was a party to an adjudication or other determination before an agency that has resulted in an order or other disposition or was a party to a civil action in which judgment has been entered, and (2) the adjudication or other determination, or the civil action, involved a principle of law or policy relied upon by the agency that, under section 121.93 of the Revised Code, should have been supplanted by its restatement in a rule but has not been so supplanted. The petition shall briefly explain why the principle of law or policy should, under section 121.93 of the Revised Code, be supplanted by its restatement in a rule. The person shall send the petition to the agency not later than the ninetieth day after the order or other disposition was issued or the judgment was entered. The person also shall send a copy of the petition to the joint committee on agency rule review. (B) The agency, not later than the thirtieth day after receiving a timely petition, shall consider the petition in light of section 121.93 of the Revised Code, and shall notify the petitioner in writing, by certified mail, return receipt requested, whether it grants or intends to deny the petition. (1) If the agency grants the petition, it shall commence the rule-making process as soon as it is reasonably feasible to do so, but not later than the date that is six three months after the petition was granted. The principle of law or policy as it is restated in a rule does not need to be wholly congruent with the supplanted principle of law or policy. The agency lawfully may improve or develop further the supplanted principle of law or policy. The agency may continue to rely upon the principle of law or policy, but only while it is complying with the preceding paragraph. The agency may not rely upon the principle of law or policy in advising with regard to or in determining the rights or liabilities of a person if the any of the following apply: (a) The agency fails to commence the rule-making process by the deadline specified in the preceding paragraph, or if, after . (b) After commencing the rule-making process, the agency neglects or abandons the rule-making process before it is completed. (c) The agency fails to file a rule for which rulemaking is required under this section in final form within one year of the agency granting a petition under this division. (d) After filing a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee, the agency notifies the joint committee of the agency's intention to file a revised proposed rule as described in division (B) of section 106.02 of the Revised Code. (2) If the agency intends to deny the petition, it shall send the petitioner a notice affording the petitioner an opportunity for a hearing on the petition and briefly explaining why the agency intends to deny the petition. If the petitioner does not in writing request a hearing within fifteen days after receiving the notice, the agency shall deny the petition and notify the petitioner in writing. If the petitioner responds in writing within the fifteen-day period requesting a hearing, the agency, by certified mail, return receipt requested, promptly shall notify the petitioner of the time and place for the hearing, which shall be not earlier than the thirtieth day after the notice was sent to the petitioner. (C) At the hearing, the agency shall explain why, notwithstanding section 121.93 of the Revised Code, it intends to deny the petition, and the petitioner shall explain why under that section the petitioner believes the agency's intention to be erroneous. The hearing shall be informal. The petitioner may be assisted by counsel at the hearing. (D) Not later than the thirtieth day after the hearing concludes, the agency shall grant or deny the petition. (1) If the agency grants the petition, it shall commence the rule-making process as soon as it is reasonably feasible to do so, but not later than the date that is six three months after the determination was made. The principle of law or policy as it is restated in a rule does not need to be wholly congruent with the supplanted principle of law or policy. The agency lawfully may improve or develop further the supplanted principle of law or policy as it is restated in a rule. The agency may continue to rely upon the principle of law or policy, but only while it is complying with the preceding paragraph. The agency may not rely upon the principle of law or policy in advising with regard to or in determining the rights or liabilities of a person if the any of the following apply: (a) The agency fails to commence the rule-making process by the deadline specified in the preceding paragraph, or if, after . (b) After commencing the rule-making process, the agency neglects or abandons the rule-making process before it is completed. (c) The agency fails to file a rule for which rulemaking is required under this section in final form within one year of the agency granting a petition under this division. (d) After filing a proposed rule and rule summary and fiscal analysis with the joint committee, the agency notifies the joint committee of the agency's intention to file a revised proposed rule as described in division (B) of section 106.02 of the Revised Code. (2) If the petitioner failed to appear at the hearing, or if the petitioner failed to persuade the agency that its intention to deny the petition is erroneous, the agency shall deny the petition. The agency shall send notice in writing to the petitioner of the outcome. If the outcome is denial of the petition, the notice shall explain briefly why the agency is denying the petition. The petitioner is not entitled to appeal the outcome. Sec. 121.95. (A) As used in sections 121.95, 121.951, 121.952, 121.953, and 121.954 of the Revised Code, "state : (1) "State agency" means an administrative department created under section 121.02 of the Revised Code, an administrative department head appointed under section 121.03 of the Revised Code, and a state agency organized under an administrative department or administrative department head. "State agency" also includes the department of education and workforce, the state lottery commission, the Ohio casino control commission, the state racing commission, and the public utilities commission of Ohio. Rules adopted by an otherwise independent official or entity organized under a state agency shall be attributed to the agency under which the official or entity is organized for the purposes of sections 121.95, 121.951, 121.952, 121.953, and 121.954 of the Revised Code. (2) "Regulatory restriction" means any part of a rule that requires or prohibits an action. (B) Not later than December 31, 2019, a state agency shall review its existing rules to identify rules having one or more regulatory restrictions that require or prohibit an action and prepare a base inventory of the regulatory restrictions in its existing rules. Rules that include the words "shall," "must," "require," "shall not," "may not," and "prohibit" shall be considered to contain regulatory restrictions. (C) In the base inventory, the state agency shall indicate all of the following concerning each regulatory restriction: (1) A description of the regulatory restriction; (2) The rule number of the rule in which the regulatory restriction appears; (3) The statute under which the regulatory restriction was adopted; (4) Whether state or federal law expressly and specifically requires the agency to adopt the regulatory restriction or the agency adopted the regulatory restriction under the agency's general authority; (5) Whether removing the regulatory restriction would require a change to state or federal law, provided that removing a regulatory restriction adopted under a law granting the agency general authority shall be presumed not to require a change to state or federal law; (6) Any other information the joint committee on agency rule review considers necessary. (D) The state agency shall compute and state the total number of regulatory restrictions indicated in the base inventory, shall post the base inventory on its web site, and shall electronically transmit a copy of the inventory to the joint committee. The joint committee shall review the base inventory, then transmit it electronically to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. (E) The following types of rules or regulatory restrictions are not required to be included in a state agency's inventory of regulatory restrictions: (1) An internal management rule; (2) An emergency rule; (3) A rule that state or federal law requires the state agency to adopt verbatim; (4) A regulatory restriction contained in materials or documents incorporated by reference into a rule pursuant to sections 121.71 to 121.75 of the Revised Code; (5) A rule adopted pursuant to section 1347.15 of the Revised Code; (6) A rule concerning instant lottery games; (7) A rule adopted by the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission concerning sports gaming; (8) Any other rule that is not subject to review under Chapter 106. of the Revised Code; (9) Any rule that is adopted as a requirement for the state agency to obtain or maintain accreditation or certification from a multistate organization consisting of at least forty-five participating states. (F) Beginning on October 17, 2019, and ending on June 30, 2025, a state agency may not adopt a new regulatory restriction unless it simultaneously removes two or more other existing regulatory restrictions. The state agency may not satisfy this section by merging two or more existing regulatory restrictions into a single surviving regulatory restriction. Sec. 121.951. (A)(1) Using the criteria listed in division (A) of section 106.03 of the Revised Code, a state agency shall amend or rescind rules identified in its base inventory of regulatory restrictions prepared under section 121.95 of the Revised Code as necessary to reduce the total number of regulatory restrictions by thirty per cent, according to the following schedule: (a) A ten per cent reduction not later than June 30, 2023; (b) A twenty per cent reduction not later than June 30, 2024; and (c) The thirty per cent reduction not later than June 30, 2025. When a state agency has achieved a reduction of any percentage in regulatory restrictions, whether or not as specified in this section, the state agency may not adopt or maintain regulatory restrictions that would negate the reduction. (2) Beginning July 1, 2025, a state agency that has not achieved the specified thirty per cent reduction may not adopt a new regulatory restriction unless it simultaneously removes two or more other existing regulatory restrictions, until the specified thirty per cent reduction has been achieved. The state agency may not fulfill this requirement by merging two or more existing regulatory restrictions into a single surviving regulatory restriction. Removing or replacing "shall," "must," "require," "shall not," "may not," "prohibit," or similar words in a portion of a rule does not remove a regulatory restriction from a rule unless the removal eliminates a requirement or prohibition from the rule. (3) A state agency that has achieved the specified thirty per cent reduction may not adopt a new regulatory restriction unless it simultaneously removes one or more other existing regulatory restrictions. The state agency may not fulfill this requirement by merging two or more existing regulatory restrictions into a single surviving regulatory restriction. (4) A state agency is encouraged to continue to reduce regulatory restrictions after it has achieved the specified thirty per cent reduction. (B)(1) Not later than September 15, 2022, a state agency shall prepare an historical report of its progress in reducing regulatory restrictions over the period of time beginning when the agency prepared its base inventory under section 121.95 of the Revised Code and ending on June 30, 2022. Annually thereafter, a state agency shall prepare an historical report of its progress in reducing regulatory restrictions over the preceding fiscal year. The state agency shall explain in the report how it applied the criteria described in division (A) of section 106.03 of the Revised Code to its determinations as to which regulatory restrictions to amend or rescind. The state agency shall include a revised inventory of regulatory restrictions with the report. (2) In the revised inventory, in addition to the information required by section 121.95 of the Revised Code, the state agency shall compute the percentage net reduction in regulatory restrictions by subtracting the current number of regulatory restrictions from the number of regulatory restrictions identified in the base inventory and then dividing the resulting number by the number of regulatory restrictions in the base inventory. (3) The state agency shall transmit the report electronically to the joint committee on agency rule review. The joint committee shall review the report and shall transmit it electronically to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. The state agency shall continue preparing and transmitting annual reports until it has reported that it has achieved the required reduction in regulatory restrictions. Sec. 121.953. (A) Effective Except as provided in division (C) of this section, effective July 1, 2025, the number of regulatory restrictions in this state shall not exceed a number of regulatory restrictions determined by the joint committee on agency rule review in accordance with this section. The joint committee shall determine that number by calculating, for each agency, the number of regulatory restrictions identified by the agency in the base inventory prepared under section 121.95 of the Revised Code, minus the number of regulatory restrictions that represents the percentage reduction the state agency is required to achieve, and then totaling the resulting numbers for all state agencies. The joint committee shall consider any lessened required reductions under section 121.952 of the Revised Code. (B) A state agency shall contact the joint committee before submitting a proposed rule containing a regulatory restriction, and the joint committee shall determine whether adopting the regulatory restriction would cause the state to exceed the number of regulatory restrictions permitted under this section. A Except as provided in division (C) of this section, a state agency may not adopt a rule if by adopting the rule the state agency would cause the number of regulatory restrictions to exceed the state limit as determined by the joint committee. (C) Beginning on the effective date of this amendment, a state agency may appear before the joint committee to show cause why the agency should be permitted to adopt a rule that would cause the number of regulatory restrictions to exceed the state limit as determined by the joint committee. If the joint committee determines that the state agency has shown cause, the joint committee may, by a vote of a majority of its members, permit the state agency to adopt the rule notwithstanding the state limit on regulatory restrictions determined by the joint committee. The joint committee shall prepare a report summarizing all the rules it has authorized a state agency to adopt notwithstanding the state limit on regulatory restrictions. The joint committee shall transmit the report electronically to the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year. Sec. 122.09. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Development costs" means all expenditures paid or incurred by the property owner in completing a certified transformational mixed use development project including acquisition costs and all costs incurred before the project is certified by the director of development. (2) "Eligible expenditures" means certain expenditures paid or incurred by the property owner in completing a certified transformational mixed use development project after the project is certified by the director of development, including architectural or engineering fees, due diligence costs, hard and soft construction costs, paid or incurred in connection with the project and expenses incurred and architectural and engineering fees and due diligence costs incurred before the date the project is certified by the tax credit authority director of development under division (C) of this section. In the case of a certified transformational mixed use development project that is part of a larger contiguous project that is planned to be completed in phases, "development costs" include only expenditures associated with the portion of the project that is certified by the tax credit authority and do not include expenditures incurred for other phases of the project. (2)(3) "Owner""Property owner" means a person or persons holding a fee simple or leasehold interest in real property, including interests in real property acquired through a capital lease arrangement, and a person or persons in contract to acquire real property with the only remaining contractual contingency being receipt of an award under this section. "Owner" does not include the state or a state agency, or any political subdivision as defined in section 9.23 of the Revised Code. For the purpose of this division, "fee simple interest," "leasehold interest," and "capital lease" shall be construed in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. (3)(4) "Transformational mixed use development" means a project that consists of eligible expenditures for new construction or the redevelopment, rehabilitation, expansion, or other improvement of vacant buildings or structures, or a combination of the foregoing, and that, inclusively: (a) Will have a transformational economic impact on the development project site and the surrounding area; (b) Integrates some combination of retail, office, residential, recreation, structured parking, and other similar uses into one mixed use development; and at least two of the following uses into one mixed use development: (i) Office; (ii) Residential; (iii) Retail, which may include restaurant space; (iv) Hotel and hospitality; (v) Recreation. (c) Satisfies one of the following criteria: (i) If the development project site is located within ten miles of a major city, the project includes at least one new or previously vacant building that is fifteen or more stories in height or has a floor area of at least three hundred fifty thousand square feet, or after completion will be the site of employment accounting for at least four five million dollars in annual payroll, or includes two or more buildings that are connected to each other, are located on the same parcel or on contiguous parcels, and that collectively have a floor area of at least three hundred fifty thousand square feet; (ii) If the development project site is not located within ten miles of a major city, the project includes at least one new or previously vacant building that is two or more stories in height or has a floor area of at least seventy-five thousand square feet or two or more new buildings that are located on the same parcel or on contiguous parcels and that collectively have a floor area of at least seventy-five thousand square feet. A "transformational mixed use development" does not include a project located wholly or partially in a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district as defined in section 123.28 of the Revised Code. "Transformational mixed use development" may include a portion of a larger contiguous project that is planned to be completed in phases as long as the phases collectively meet the criteria described in division (A)(3) of this section. (4)(5) "Increase in tax collections" means the difference, if positive, of the amount of state and local taxes estimated to be derived from economic activity occurring within the development project site and the surrounding area, but excluding any other phases of the development project for developments completed in phases, during a the completion period of time minus the amount of such taxes that are estimated to be derived from such economic activity in that site and surrounding area during the same period if the transformational mixed use development project were not certified by the director of development and completed. (5)(6) "Completion period" means the time period beginning on the day after a transformational mixed use development project is certified by the tax credit authority director of development and ending on the fifth anniversary of the day the project is completed. (6) "Insurance company" means a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5725.18 or 5729.03 of the Revised Code. (7) "Contribute capital" means to invest, loan, or donate cash in exchange for an equity interest in an asset, or a debt instrument, or no consideration. (8) "Major city" means a municipal corporation that has a population greater than one hundred thousand. (9) "Tax credit authority" means the tax credit authority created under section 122.17 of the Revised Code. (10) "Adjusted development costs" means the development costs attributed to a complete transformational mixed use development project minus the sum of the capital contributions of any insurance companies that are preliminarily approved for a tax credit in connection with the same project. (11) A "property owner's share" of the increase in tax collections equals the product obtained by multiplying the total increase in tax collections since the date the transformational mixed use development project was certified by a fraction, the numerator of which is the adjusted development costs and the denominator of which is the actual development costs attributed to the project. (12) An "insurance company's share" of the increase in tax collections equals the product obtained by multiplying the total increase in tax collections since the date the transformational mixed use development project was certified by a fraction, the numerator of which is the insurance company's capital contribution to the project and the denominator of which is the actual development costs attributed to the project"Project site" means the land, and improvements thereon, upon which a transformational mixed use development will be constructed, which consists of a single parcel or multiple parcels that are contiguous with one another, including parcels separated only by a publicly dedicated road. (B) The property owner of one or more parcels of land in this state within which a transformational mixed use development project is planned or an insurance company that contributes capital to be used in the planning or construction of such a development may apply to the tax credit authority director of development for certification of the development project and preliminary approval of a tax credit in an amount up to ten per cent of the estimated eligible expenditures. Each application shall be filed in the form and manner prescribed by the director of development and shall, at minimum, include a development plan comprised of all of the following information: (1) The location of the development project site and an indication of whether it is located within ten miles of a major city; (2) A detailed description of the proposed transformational mixed use development project including site plans, elevations, construction drawings, architectural renderings, or other means sufficient to convey the appearance, size, purposes, capacity, and scope of the project and, if applicable, previously completed and future phases of the project; (3) A viable financial plan project budget supported by construction hard cost estimates, organized by line item, that estimates the development costs development costs and eligible expenditures that have been or will be incurred in the completion of the project and that designates a source of financing or a strategy for obtaining financing; (4) A viable financial plan showing both (a) at least fifty-one per cent of the needed funding secured, as evidenced by commitment letters, letters of intent, or terms sheets and third party equity verification, and (b) a strategy for obtaining any needed but not yet secured funding; (5) An estimated schedule for the progression and completion of the project including, if applicable, previously completed and future phases of the project; (5)(6) An assessment of the projected newly created economic impact of and from the project on based upon the projected increase in tax collections during the completion period at the development project site and the surrounding area, excluding economic activity existing at the time of or before certification of the development project and preliminary approval of a tax credit, prepared by an economic impact consultant with experience performing economic impact studies in Ohio and reviewed by an independent third party reviewer retained by the director of development to ensure accuracy, uniformity, consistency, and fairness; (6)(7) Evidence that the increase in tax collections during the completion period will exceed ten per cent of the estimated development costs eligible expenditures reported under division (B)(3) of this section; (7) If the (8) The portion of any tax credit issued that the applicant is would like issued to the property owner or to an insurance company that is not the property owner, the amount of the insurance company's , financial institution, or other person based upon capital contribution contributions that have been made or will be made to the development and the date on which it was or will be madeproject; (8)(9) Evidence that the project will not be completed unless the applicant receives the credit, but for the applicant's receipt of the credit, the project will not be completed. If any portion of the project the applicant seeks certification and preliminary approval for has commenced construction, excluding brownfield remediation and demolition, or the project has closed on construction financing, this division's standard is not met and the project is not eligible for certification and preliminary approval. (C)(1) In determining whether to certify a project that is the subject of an application submitted under division (B) of this section, the tax credit authority director of development shall consider the potential impact of the transformational mixed use development on the development project site and the surrounding area in terms of architecture, accessibility to pedestrians, retail entertainment and dining sales, job creation, property values, connectivity, and revenue from sales, income, lodging, and property taxes. The tax credit authority director shall not certify a project unless it satisfies the following conditions: (a) The project qualifies as a transformational mixed use development project and satisfies all other criteria prescribed by this section or by rule of the director of development; (b) The estimated increase in tax collections from the project site during the completion period exceeds ten per cent of the estimated development costs eligible expenditures for the project reported under division (B)(3) of this section; (c) The applicant will not be able to (i) close on construction financing, (ii) commence construction, excluding any brownfield remediation or demolition that may have already been performed, and (iii) complete the project will not be completed unless the applicant receives the credit; (d) If the development project site is located within ten miles of a major city, the estimated development costs eligible expenditures to complete the project plus, if applicable, the estimated expenditures that have been or will be incurred to complete all other contiguous phases of the project, exceed fifty million dollars. In making its a determination of whether or not to approve an application, the tax credit authority director may conduct an interview of the applicant. (2) If the tax credit authority director of development approves an application, the authority director shall issue a statement certifying the associated transformational mixed use development project and preliminarily approving a tax credit. The statement shall stipulate that receipt issuance of a tax credit certificate is contingent upon completion of the transformational mixed use development project as described in the development plan for the project. The statement shall specify the estimated amount of the tax credit preliminarily approved and the amount of credit preliminarily approved for each person identified in the application pursuant to division (B)(8) of this section, but state that the amount of the credit is dependent upon determination of the actual development costseligible expenditures attributed to the project and, unless the tax credit authority grants a request by the property owner under division (F) of this section, of the increase in tax collections during the completion period. The amount of the credit shall not exceed the amount applied for in the application approved by the director. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the applicant is an insurance company that is not the property owner, the estimated amount of the tax credit shall equal ten per cent of the insurance company's capital contribution to the project as reported in the development plan pursuant to division (B)(7) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the applicant is the property owner, the The total estimated amount of the tax credit shall equal up to ten per cent of the estimated development costs eligible expenditures for the project as reported in the project development plan pursuant to division (B)(3)(B) of this section minus any estimated credit amounts that have been preliminarily approved for insurance companies contributing capital to the project. The estimated credit amounts may be reduced by the tax credit authority director of development as a condition of certifying the project if such a reduction is necessary to comply with the limitations on the amount of credits that may be preliminarily approved as prescribed by division (C)(5) of this section. The estimated credit amounts shall not be adjusted after the statement described in division (C)(2) of this section has been issued, except as provided by division (G) of this section. (4) If the tax credit authority director of development denies an application, the authority director shall notify the applicant of the reason or reasons for such determination. The authority's director's determination is final, but an applicant may revise and resubmit a previously denied application in a future year. (5)(a) The tax credit authority shall not certify any transformational mixed use development projects after June 30, 2025. (b) The tax credit authority director of development may not preliminarily approve more than one hundred twenty-five million dollars of new estimated tax credits in each of fiscal years 2022, 2023, 2024, and 20252026 and 2027. The director shall not preliminarily approve any dollar amount of new estimated tax credits under this section in any fiscal year after fiscal year 2027 unless specifically authorized by an act of the general assembly. Tax credits preliminarily approved under this section in preceding fiscal years and for which preliminary approval was rescinded in the fiscal year immediately preceding the current fiscal year shall be available for preliminary approval under this section in the current fiscal year. Credit amounts available due to such rescission do not apply towards the one hundred twenty-five million dollar limit prescribed in this division. (c) Not (b) Except as provided in division (C)(6) of this section, not more than eighty eighty-five million dollars of estimated new tax credits in each such , plus an amount equal to two-thirds of any credits for which preliminary approval was rescinded in the preceding fiscal year, may be preliminarily approved in connection with projects that are located within ten miles of a major city in the current fiscal year. (d)(c) Not more than forty twenty million dollars of estimated tax credits may be preliminarily approved in connection with the same transformational mixed use development project. (6) If, for the current fiscal year, the dollar amount of tax credits applied for under division (B) of this section in connection with projects that are not located within ten miles of a major city exceeds eighty forty million dollars for a fiscal year, plus an amount equal to one-third of any credits for which preliminary approval was rescinded in the preceding fiscal year, the tax credit authority director of development shall rank those applications and certify and preliminarily approve tax credits for the associated projects in order, starting with the project that presents the best combination of economic value and transformational impactpursuant to division (C)(7) of this section. If the dollar amount of tax credits applied for under division (B) of this section in connection with such projects is less than that amount, the difference shall be available for projects within ten miles of a major city. If, for the current fiscal year, the dollar amount of tax credits applied for in connection with projects not located within ten miles of a major city exceeds twenty million dollars for a fiscal yeareighty-five million dollars, plus an amount equal to two-thirds of any credits for which preliminary approval was rescinded in the previous fiscal year and the amount of funds initially reserved for projects more than ten miles from a major city but unawarded to such projects, the tax credit authority director shall rank those applications and certify the associated projects in order, starting with the project that presents the best combination of economic value and transformational impactpursuant to division (C)(7) of this section. In either case, the authority shall consider the following factors in ranking the applications: (a) The projected increase in tax collections during the completion period as a percentage of the total amount of estimated tax credits that would be preliminarily approved in connection with the project; (b) The economic impact of the project on the development site and the surrounding area and the impact of the project in terms of architecture, accessibility to pedestrians, retail entertainment and dining sales, job creation, property values, and connectivity; (c) The expeditiousness of the schedule for completing the project, realizing the increase in tax collections, and attaining the economic and other impacts on the development site and the surrounding area. (7) When ranking is required under division (C)(6) of this section, the director of development shall compare applicant projects that are within ten miles of a major city to other applicant projects that are within ten miles of a major city, and the director shall compare applicant projects that are more than ten miles outside of a major city with other applicant projects that are more than ten miles outside of a major city. The director shall apply a point value to applications according to the following criteria: (a) Up to ten points based on comparative measurement of physical scope of the projects as measured by gross square footage of vertical improvements including new construction and renovated space. The largest project in terms of physical scope shall receive ten points and the remaining projects shall receive points based on a percentage basis in proportion to each project's relative size as compared to the largest project in that location category, by gross square footage; (b) Up to five points based on a comparative measurement of the density of the new project as measured by a building to land ratio using the gross square footage of new construction and renovated space and the gross land square footage of the project parcels excluding submerged land. The highest ratio in terms of building to land ratio shall receive five points and the remaining projects shall receive points based on a percentage basis in proportion to each project's relative ratio as compared to the highest project ratio; (c) Up to ten points based on an evaluation of the distribution of project end uses, with preference given to projects with greater variety and distribution of uses; (d) Up to fourteen points based on the project's receipt of necessary government approvals and local support, available as follows: (i) Two points for zoning approval or evidence, in the form of a letter from the governmental body with jurisdiction over the zoning of the project site, that the project site already has the necessary zoning for the project; (ii) Two points for planning commission approval or evidence that planning commission approval is not required; (iii) Two points available for existing utility connections or commitments to establish utility connections including water, sewer, sanitary storm, and electric documented by utility service letters; (iv) Two points for an approved and executed development agreement with each municipal corporation or township in which the development project is proposed; (v) Two points for approved construction drawings and issuance of construction permits for the entirety of the scope of work set forth in the application; (vi) Up to two points available for letters in support of the project and the application. One point is available for a letter in support of the project and the application from the mayor, city manager, or other chief executive of each municipal corporation or township, and one point is available for a letter in support of the project and the application from the chief executive of each county, where the development project is to be located; (vii) Two points available for documented financial support for the project from each municipal corporation or township in which the project is located, which may include tax increment financing or creation of a community reinvestment area under section 3735.66 of the Revised Code. (e) Up to ten points based on the committed funding sources as a percentage of total development costs. A project that has funding commitments for all projected development costs shall receive ten points, and projects with funding commitments for less than all projected development costs shall receive a number of points based on the relative amount of committed funding compared to total development costs of the given project. The funding commitments may take into account the monetized value of the certificate applied for under this section so long as the applicant provides a letter of intent or commitment to purchase that certificate if issued. Letters of intent or loan commitments are required to earn points for any financing that is a funding source in this category and any such letter of intent or loan commitment may be subject to the receipt of an award under this section. (f) Up to five points based on purchase or lease commitments from end users for the space created by the project. Projects that have received commitments for all space shall receive five points, and projects with less than all end users committed shall be allocated points based on the relative square footage of committed space compared to total project square footage. (g) Up to ten points for projects in areas of higher relative walkability as measured by the United States environmental protection agency's walkability index for the project's census tract with projects in areas designated as the highest level of walkability receiving ten points and projects in areas with lower levels of walkability receiving proportional points; (h) Up to five points based on a comparative measurement of total retail, entertainment, and dining sales to be generated by the project. Projects generating the largest return on investment shall receive five points, and the remaining projects shall be allocated points based on relative return on investment in comparison to the highest scoring project in this category. (i) Up to five points based on a comparative measurement of the total new payroll to be generated by the project. Projects generating the largest return on investment shall receive five points, and remaining projects shall be allocated points based on relative return on investment in comparison to the highest scoring project in this category. (j) Up to twenty points based on a comparative measurement of the total sales, income, lodging, and property taxes to be generated by the project. Projects generating the largest return on investment shall receive twenty points, and remaining projects shall be allocated points based on relative return on investment in comparison to the highest scoring project in this category. (k) Up to six points for community impacts, available as follows: (i) Two points for evidence that the project supports the vision and goals stated in the local master plan or other economic development strategy adopted by the local jurisdiction. (ii) Two points for the projects that provide community gathering, event, park, or other similar space open to the public. Projects that incorporate public space that accounts for ten per cent or more public space relative to the total square footage of all project end uses will receive two points. Projects that incorporate public space that accounts for less than ten per cent but greater than zero per cent public space relative to the total square footage of all project end uses will receive one point. (iii) Two points for projects that include remediation of a brownfield or the rehabilitation of a building or structure that is one hundred per cent vacant for the twelve months immediately preceding the date of application. As used in this division "brownfield" has the same meaning as in section 122.6511 of the Revised Code. (8) When calculating the economic impact of a project previously completed and future phases of a phased development are not permitted to be included in the economic impact analysis or scoring. (D) Within twelve months of the date a project is certified, the property owner shall provide the tax credit authority director of development with an updated schedule for the progression and completion of the project and documentation sufficient to demonstrate that construction of the project has begun. If the property owner does not provide the schedule and documentation or if construction of the project has not begun within the time prescribed by this division, the tax credit authority director shall rescind certification of the project and send notice of the rescission to the property owner and each insurance company that is preliminarily approved for a tax credit in connection with the project. A property owner that receives notice of rescission may submit a new application concerning the same project under division (B) of this section. (E) An applicant that is the property owner and is preliminarily approved for a tax credit under this section may sell or transfer the rights to all or a portion of that credit to one or more persons for the purpose of raising capital for the certified project. The applicant shall notify the tax credit authority upon selling or transferring the rights to the credit. The notice shall identify the person or persons to which the credit was sold or transferred and the credit amount sold or transferred to each such person. Only an applicant that owns the property may sell or transfer a credit under this division. A credit may be divided among multiple purchasers through more than one transaction but once a particular credit amount is acquired by a person other than the applicant it may not be sold or transferred againand any person to whom the right to claim all or a portion of a credit was transferred may transfer that right, in whole or in part, to another person. (F) After a transformational mixed use development project is certified and before it is completed, the property owner may request that the value of the tax credit certificates awarded in connection with the project be computed using the alternative method described in division (I) of this section. The tax credit authority shall grant the request if the authority determines, and a third party engaged by the authority at the expense of the property owner affirms, that it is reasonably certain that the increase in tax collections will exceed ten per cent of the estimated development costs within one year after the project is completed. Otherwise, the authority shall deny the request and the amount of each credit awarded in connection with the project shall be computed under division (H) of this section. The authority's determination under this division shall be delivered in writing and is final and not appealable. (G)(1)(F)(1) The property owner shall notify the tax credit authority director of development upon completion of a certified transformational mixed use development project. The notification shall include a report prepared by a third-party certified public accountant that contains a detailed accounting of the actual development costs and eligible expenditures attributed to the project. (2) Upon receiving such a notice, unless the tax credit authority has previously granted a request by the property owner under division (F) of this section, the authority shall determine the increase in tax collections since the date the project was certified by consulting with the tax commissioner and with the tax administrator of any municipal corporation that levies an income tax within the project site and the surrounding area. The tax commissioner and the tax administrators that are consulted pursuant to this division shall provide the tax credit authority with any information that is necessary to determine the increase in tax collections. (3) After determining the increase in tax collections under division (G)(2) of this section, if required, and computing the value of the tax credit under division (H) or (I) of this section, as applicable, the tax credit authority director of development shall issue a tax credit certificate to each applicant, or other person identified in the application pursuant to division (B)(8) of this section, that is preliminarily approved for a credit associated with the project or to the person or persons to which such an applicant sold or transferred the rights to the credit under division (E) of this section. If the amount of the tax credit awarded to the property owner is less than the credit amount estimated under division (C) of this section and the property owner sold or transferred the rights to the credit, the tax credit authority shall reduce the amount of each tax credit certificate issued to each purchaser or recipient on a pro rata basis unless the property owner requests an alternative allocation of the credit. (H)(1) Unless the tax credit authority granted a request by the property owner under division (F) of this section, the aggregate value of the tax credit certificates issued under division (G) of this section to the property owner and to any persons to whom the property owner sold or transferred the rights to the credit shall equal the lesser of the following: (a) Ten per cent of the adjusted development costs; (b) Five per cent of the adjusted development costs plus any amount by which the property owner's share of the increase in tax collections since the date the project was certified exceeds five per cent of the adjusted development costs; (c) The estimated credit amount specified in the tax credit authority's statement certifying the project and preliminarily approving the tax credit under division (C) of this section. (2) The value of a tax credit certificate issued under division (G) of this section to an insurance company that contributed capital to the project shall equal the lesser of the following: (a) Ten per cent of the insurance company's actual capital contribution; (b) Five per cent of such capital contribution plus any amount by which the insurance company's share of the increase in tax collections since the date the project was certified exceeds five per cent of the insurance company's capital contribution; (c) The estimated credit amount specified in the tax credit authority's statement certifying the project and preliminarily approving the tax credit under division (C) of this section. (I) If the tax credit authority granted a request by the property owner under division (F) of this section, the (G) The value of the tax credit certificates issued in connection with the transformational mixed use development project shall be computed as follows: (1) For the property owner or any person to which the property owner sold or transferred the rights to the credit, the lesser of the amount preliminarily approved for the tax credit or ten per cent of the actual development costs eligible expenditures attributed to the project. If the amount of the credit is less than the credit amount estimated under division (C) of this section and the property owner sold or transferred the rights to the credit to more than one person, the authority shall reduce the amount of each tax credit certificate on a pro rata basis unless the property owner requests an alternative allocation of the credit. (2) For an insurance company that contributed capital to the project, ten per cent of the insurance company's actual capital contribution. (J) If the value of a tax credit certificate was computed under division (H) of this section for a project, the property owner, on or before the thirtieth day following the first, second, third, fourth, and fifth anniversaries of the date the certified transformational mixed use development project is completed, may request in writing that the tax credit authority update the increase in tax collections during the completion period. Upon receiving such a request, the tax credit authority shall update the increase in tax collections in the same manner described by division (G) of this section. If the tax credit authority determines that the value of the tax credit certificates computed under division (H) of this section would be greater if computed based on the updated increase in tax collections, the authority shall issue an additional tax credit certificate to each person that previously received a certificate for the project under those divisions. The value of each additional tax credit certificate shall equal the amount by which the tax credit certificate computed under division (H) of this section upon completion of the project would have been greater had the value of such certificate been computed based on the updated increase in tax collections, less the value of any additional tax credit certificates previously issued under this division to the same person respecting the same project. (K)(H) The aggregate value of all tax credit certificates issued under this section for the same transformational mixed use development project shall not exceed (1) ten per cent of the actual development costs eligible expenditures of that project or (2) the sum of all estimated credit amounts amount preliminarily approved by the tax credit authority director of development in connection with the project. (L)(I) Issuance of a tax credit certificate under this section does not represent a verification or certification by the tax credit authority director of development of the actual development costs eligible expenditures of the project or the capital contributions to the project by an insurance company. Such amounts are subject to inspection and examination by the superintendent of insuranceother state agencies. (M)(J) Upon the issuance of a tax credit certificate under division (G) or (J) of this section, the tax credit authority director of development shall certify to the superintendent of insurance and the tax commissioner (1) the name of each person that was issued a tax credit certificate, (2) whether the person is the property owner, an insurance company that contributed capital to the development, or a person that acquired the rights to the tax credit certificate from the property owner, (3) the credit amount shown on each tax credit certificate, and (4)(3) any other information required by the rules adopted under this section. A person that holds the rights to a tax credit certificate issued under this section and that is an insurance company may claim a tax credit under section 5725.35 or , 5726.62, 5729.18, or 5747.87 of the Revised Code, subject to any limitations in those sections. (N)(K) The tax credit authority director of development shall publish information about each transformational mixed use development on the web site of the department of development not later than the first day of August following certification of the project. The tax credit authority director shall update the published information annually until the project is complete and the credit or credits are fully claimed. The published information shall include all of the following: (1) The location of the transformational mixed use development and the name by which it is known; (2) The estimated schedule for progression and completion of the project included in the development plan pursuant to division (B)(4) of this section; (3) The assessment of the projected economic impact of the project included in the development plan pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section; (4) The evidence supporting the estimated increase in tax collections included in the development plan pursuant to division (B)(6) of this section, except that the tax credit authority director may omit any proprietary or sensitive information included in such evidence; (5) The estimated development costs eligible expenditures that have been or will be incurred in completion of the project and, if applicable, the amount of the insurance company's capital contribution to the development and the date on which it was made, as reported in the development plan pursuant to divisions (B)(3) and (7) of this section; (6) A copy of each report submitted to the tax credit authority director of development by the applicant under division (D) of this section. (O)(L) The director of development, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules that establish all of the following: (1) Forms and procedures by which applicants may apply for a transformational investment mixed use development tax credit, and any deadlines for applying; (2) Criteria and procedures for reviewing, evaluating, ranking, and approving applications within the limitations prescribed by this section, including rules prescribing the timing and frequency by which the tax credit authority director of development must rank applications and preliminarily approve tax credits under division (C) of this section; (3) Eligibility requirements for obtaining a tax credit certificate under this section; (4) The form of the tax credit certificate; (5) Reporting requirements and monitoring procedures; (6) Procedures for computing the increase in tax collections within the project site and the surrounding area; (7) Forms and procedures by which property owners may request the alternative method of computing the value of tax credit certificates under division (I) of this section that are awarded in connection with a project and criteria for evaluating and making a determination on such requests; (8) Any other rules necessary to implement and administer this section. Sec. 122.14. (A) As used in this section, "professional sports facility" has the same meaning as in section 5516.01 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby created in the state treasury the roadwork development fund. The fund shall consist of the investment earnings of the security deposit fund created by section 4509.27 of the Revised Code and revenue transferred to it by the director of budget and management from the highway operating fund created in section 5735.051 of the Revised Code. The fund shall be used by the department of development services agency in accordance with Section 5a of Article XII, Ohio Constitution, to make road improvements associated with retaining or attracting business for this state, including both of the following: (1) Construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of public roads that provide access to a public airport or are located within a public airport; (2) Construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of public roads and the associated improvements that provide or improve access to tourism attractions or professional sports facilities. (B)(C) Tourism attractions or professional sports facilities may use funds received from the department of development, in accordance with this section, to make improvements associated with the retail and residential components of the total development of which they are a part. (D) All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 122.175. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Capital investment project" means a plan of investment at a project site for the acquisition, construction, renovation, expansion, replacement, or repair of a computer data center or of computer data center equipment, but does not include any of the following: (a) Project costs paid before a date determined by the tax credit authority for each capital investment project; (b) Payments made to a related member as defined in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code or to a consolidated elected taxpayer or a combined taxpayer as defined in section 5751.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Computer data center" means a facility used or to be used primarily to house computer data center equipment used or to be used in conducting one or more computer data center businesses, as determined by the tax credit authority. (3) "Computer data center business" means, as may be further determined by the tax credit authority, a business that provides electronic information services as defined in division (Y)(1)(c) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, or that leases a facility to one or more such businesses. "Computer data center business" does not include providing electronic publishing as defined in that section. (4) "Computer data center equipment" means tangible personal property used or to be used for any of the following: (a) To conduct a computer data center business, including equipment cooling systems to manage the performance of computer data center equipment; (b) To generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity necessary to operate the tangible personal property used or to be used in conducting a computer data center business; (c) As building and construction materials sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a computer data center. (5) "Eligible computer data center" means a computer data center that satisfies all of the following requirements: (a) One or more taxpayers operating a computer data center business at the project site will, in the aggregate, make payments for a capital investment project of at least one hundred million dollars at the project site during one of the following cumulative periods: (i) For projects beginning in 2013, six consecutive calendar years; (ii) For projects beginning in 2014, four consecutive calendar years; (iii) For projects beginning in or after 2015, three consecutive calendar years. (b) One or more taxpayers operating a computer data center business at the project site will, in the aggregate, pay annual compensation that is subject to the withholding obligation imposed under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code of at least one million five hundred thousand dollars to employees employed at the project site for each year of the agreement beginning on or after the first day of the twenty-fifth month after the agreement was entered into under this section. (6) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 5701.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Project site," "related member," and "tax credit authority" have the same meanings as in sections 122.17 and 122.171 of the Revised Code. (8) "Taxpayer" means any person subject to the taxes imposed under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code. (B) The tax credit authority may completely or partially exempt from the taxes levied under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code the sale, storage, use, or other consumption of computer data center equipment used or to be used at an eligible computer data center. Any such exemption shall extend to charges for the delivery, installation, or repair of the computer data center equipment subject to the exemption under this section. (C) A taxpayer that proposes a capital improvement project for an eligible computer data center in this state may apply to the tax credit authority to enter into an agreement under this section authorizing a complete or partial exemption from the taxes imposed under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code on computer data center equipment purchased by the applicant or any other taxpayer that operates a computer data center business at the project site and used or to be used at the eligible computer data center. The director of development services shall prescribe the form of the application. After receipt of an application, the authority shall forward copies of the application to the director of budget and management and the tax commissioner, each of whom who shall review the application to determine the economic impact that the proposed eligible computer data center would have on the state and any affected political subdivisions and submit to the authority a summary of their determinations. The authority shall also forward a copy of the application to the director of development services who shall review the application to determine the economic impact that the proposed eligible computer data center would have on the state and the affected political subdivisions and shall submit a summary of their determinations and recommendations to the authority. (D) Upon review and consideration of such determinations and recommendations, the tax credit authority , before October 1, 2025, may enter into an agreement with the applicant and any other taxpayer that operates a computer data center business at the project site for a complete or partial exemption from the taxes imposed under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code on computer data center equipment used or to be used at an eligible computer data center if the authority determines all of the following: (1) The capital investment project for the eligible computer data center will increase payroll and the amount of income taxes to be withheld from employee compensation pursuant to section 5747.06 of the Revised Code. (2) The applicant is economically sound and has the ability to complete or effect the completion of the proposed capital investment project. (3) The applicant intends to and has the ability to maintain operations at the project site for the term of the agreement. (4) Receiving the exemption is a major factor in the applicant's decision to begin, continue with, or complete the capital investment project. (E) An agreement entered into under this section shall include all of the following: (1) A detailed description of the capital investment project that is the subject of the agreement, including the amount of the investment, the period over which the investment has been or is being made, the annual compensation to be paid by each taxpayer subject to the agreement to its employees at the project site, and the anticipated amount of income taxes to be withheld from employee compensation pursuant to section 5747.06 of the Revised Code. (2) The percentage of the exemption from the taxes imposed under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code for the computer data center equipment used or to be used at the eligible computer data center, the length of time the computer data center equipment will be exempted, and the first date on which the exemption applies. (3) A requirement that the computer data center remain an eligible computer data center during the term of the agreement and that the applicant maintain operations at the eligible computer data center during that term. An applicant does not violate the requirement described in division (E)(3) of this section if the applicant ceases operations at the eligible computer data center during the term of the agreement but resumes those operations within eighteen months after the date of cessation. The agreement shall provide that, in such a case, the applicant and any other taxpayer that operates a computer data center business at the project site shall not claim the tax exemption authorized in the agreement for any purchase of computer data center equipment made during the period in which the applicant did not maintain operations at the eligible computer data center. (4) A requirement that, for each year of the term of the agreement beginning on or after the first day of the twenty-fifth month after the date the agreement was entered into, one or more taxpayers operating a computer data center business at the project site will, in the aggregate, pay annual compensation that is subject to the withholding obligation imposed under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code of at least one million five hundred thousand dollars to employees at the eligible computer data center. (5) A requirement that each taxpayer subject to the agreement annually report to the director of development services employment, tax withholding, capital investment, and other information required by the director to perform the director's duties under this section. (6) A requirement that the director of development services annually review the annual reports of each taxpayer subject to the agreement to verify the information reported under division (E)(5) of this section and compliance with the agreement. Upon verification, the director shall issue a certificate to each such taxpayer stating that the information has been verified and that the taxpayer remains eligible for the exemption specified in the agreement. (7) A provision providing that the taxpayers subject to the agreement may not relocate a substantial number of employment positions from elsewhere in this state to the project site unless the director of development services determines that the appropriate taxpayer notified the legislative authority of the county, township, or municipal corporation from which the employment positions would be relocated. For purposes of this paragraph, the movement of an employment position from one political subdivision to another political subdivision shall be considered a relocation of an employment position unless the movement is confined to the project site. The transfer of an employment position from one political subdivision to another political subdivision shall not be considered a relocation of an employment position if the employment position in the first political subdivision is replaced by another employment position. (8) A waiver by each taxpayer subject to the agreement of any limitations periods relating to assessments or adjustments resulting from the taxpayer's failure to comply with the agreement. (F) The term of an agreement under this section shall be determined by the tax credit authority, and the amount of the exemption shall not exceed one hundred per cent of such taxes that would otherwise be owed in respect to the exempted computer data center equipment. (G) If any taxpayer subject to an agreement under this section fails to meet or comply with any condition or requirement set forth in the agreement, the tax credit authority may amend the agreement to reduce the percentage of the exemption or term during which the exemption applies to the computer data center equipment used or to be used by the noncompliant taxpayer at an eligible computer data center. The reduction of the percentage or term may take effect in the current calendar year. (H) Financial statements and other information submitted to the department of development services or the tax credit authority by an applicant for or recipient of an exemption under this section, and any information taken for any purpose from such statements or information, are not public records subject to section 149.43 of the Revised Code. However, the chairperson of the authority may make use of the statements and other information for purposes of issuing public reports or in connection with court proceedings concerning tax exemption agreements under this section. Upon the request of the tax commissioner, the chairperson of the authority shall provide to the tax commissioner any statement or other information submitted by an applicant for or recipient of an exemption under this section. The tax commissioner shall preserve the confidentiality of the statement or other information. (I) The tax commissioner shall issue a direct payment permit under section 5739.031 of the Revised Code to each taxpayer subject to an agreement under this section. Such direct payment permit shall authorize the taxpayer to pay any sales and use taxes due on purchases of computer data center equipment used or to be used in an eligible computer data center and to pay any sales and use taxes due on purchases of tangible personal property or taxable services other than computer data center equipment used or to be used in an eligible computer data center directly to the tax commissioner. Each such taxpayer shall pay pursuant to such direct payment permit all sales tax levied on such purchases under sections 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, and 5739.026 of the Revised Code and all use tax levied on such purchases under sections 5741.02, 5741.021, 5741.022, and 5741.023 of the Revised Code, consistent with the terms of the agreement entered into under this section. During the term of an agreement under this section each taxpayer subject to the agreement shall submit to the tax commissioner a return that shows the amount of computer data center equipment purchased for use at the eligible computer data center, the amount of tangible personal property and taxable services other than computer data center equipment purchased for use at the eligible computer data center, the amount of tax under Chapter 5739. or 5741. of the Revised Code that would be due in the absence of the agreement under this section, the exemption percentage for computer data center equipment specified in the agreement, and the amount of tax due under Chapter 5739. or 5741. of the Revised Code as a result of the agreement under this section. Each such taxpayer shall pay the tax shown on the return to be due in the manner and at the times as may be further prescribed by the tax commissioner. Each such taxpayer shall include a copy of the director of development services' development's certificate of verification issued under division (E)(6) of this section. Failure to submit a copy of the certificate with the return does not invalidate the claim for exemption if the taxpayer submits a copy of the certificate to the tax commissioner within the time prescribed by section 5703.0510 of the Revised Code. (J) If the director of development services determines that one or more taxpayers received an exemption from taxes due on the purchase of computer data center equipment purchased for use at a computer data center that no longer complies with the requirement under division (E)(3) of this section, the director shall notify the tax credit authority and, if applicable, the taxpayer that applied to enter the agreement for the exemption under division (C) of this section of the noncompliance. After receiving such a notice, and after giving each taxpayer subject to the agreement an opportunity to explain the noncompliance, the authority may terminate the agreement and require each such taxpayer to pay to the state all or a portion of the taxes that would have been owed in regards to the exempt equipment in previous years, all as determined under rules adopted pursuant to division (K) of this section. In determining the portion of the taxes that would have been owed on the previously exempted equipment to be paid to this state by a taxpayer, the authority shall consider the effect of market conditions on the eligible computer data center, whether the taxpayer continues to maintain other operations in this state, and, with respect to agreements involving multiple taxpayers, the taxpayer's level of responsibility for the noncompliance. After making the determination, the authority shall certify to the tax commissioner the amount to be paid by each taxpayer subject to the agreement. The tax commissioner shall make an assessment for that amount against each such taxpayer under Chapter 5739. or 5741. of the Revised Code. The time limitations on assessments under those chapters do not apply to an assessment under this division, but the tax commissioner shall make the assessment within one year after the date the authority certifies to the tax commissioner the amount to be paid by the taxpayer. (K) The director of development services, after consultation with the tax commissioner and in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section. The rules may provide for recipients of tax exemptions under this section to be charged fees to cover administrative costs incurred in the administration of this section. The fees collected shall be credited to the tax incentives operating fund created in section 122.174 of the Revised Code. At the time the director gives public notice under division (A) of section 119.03 of the Revised Code of the adoption of the rules, the director shall submit copies of the proposed rules to the chairpersons of the standing committees on economic development in the senate and the house of representatives. (L) On or before the first day of August of each year, the director of development services shall submit a report to the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives on the tax exemption authorized under this section. The report shall include information on the number of agreements that were entered into under this section during the preceding calendar year, a description of the eligible computer data center that is the subject of each such agreement, and an update on the status of eligible computer data centers under agreements entered into before the preceding calendar year. (M) A taxpayer may be made a party to an existing agreement entered into under this section by the tax credit authority and another taxpayer or group of taxpayers. In such a case, the taxpayer shall be entitled to all benefits and bound by all obligations contained in the agreement and all requirements described in this section. When an agreement includes multiple taxpayers, each taxpayer shall be entitled to a direct payment permit as authorized in division (I) of this section. Sec. 122.1710. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Low-income individual" has the same meaning as "low-income person" in section 122.66 5101.311 of the Revised Code. (2) "Microcredential" has the same meaning as in section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (3) "OhioMeansJobs web site" has the same meaning as in section 6301.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Partially unemployed" and "totally unemployed" have the same meanings as in section 4141.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Training provider" means all of the following: (a) A state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) An Ohio technical center as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code; (c) A private business or institution that offers training to allow an individual to earn one or more microcredentials. (6) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of this state as specified in section 9.34 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby created the individual microcredential assistance program to reimburse training providers for training costs for individuals to earn a microcredential. The department of development, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall administer the program. The director shall administer the program so that the total reimbursement to each training provider approved to participate in the program occurs at least once per fiscal year. (C) A training provider seeking to participate in the program shall submit an application to the director of development at the beginning or before the beginning of a fiscal year, but not later than the date established by the director. The training provider shall include in the application all of the following information: (1) The number of microcredentials the training provider will seek a reimbursement for and the names of the microcredentials; (2) The cost of the training for each microcredential; (3) The total amount of the reimbursement the training provider will seek; (4) The training provider's plan to provide opportunities for individuals who are low income, partially unemployed, or totally unemployed to participate in a training program and receive a microcredential; (5) Any other information the director requires. (D)(1) The director shall consider the following factors in determining whether to approve an application submitted under division (C) of this section: (a) The duration of the training program; (b) The cost of the training; (c) Whether approving an application will promote regional diversity in apportioning reimbursements uniformly across the state; (d) The training provider's commitment to providing opportunities for individuals who are low income, partially unemployed, or totally unemployed to participate in a training program and receive a microcredential. (2) In determining regional diversity under division (D)(1)(c) of this section, the director shall use the regions established under division (G) of section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (3) The director shall not approve an application submitted under this section if either of the following apply: (a) The microcredentials identified in the application are not included in the list the chancellor of higher education establishes under section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (b) The training provider has violated Chapter 4111. of the Revised Code within the four fiscal years immediately preceding the date of application. (4) The director shall notify a training provider in writing of the director's decision to approve or deny the training provider's application to participate in the program. (E) A participating training provider shall not charge an individual participating in a training program to earn a microcredential for which the training provider is seeking a reimbursement for either of the following: (1) Any costs associated with the individual's participation in the training program; (2) Any costs to the training provider resulting from an individual not completing the training program. (F)(1) Each participating training provider seeking reimbursement for training costs for one or more microcredentials earned by one or more individuals in a training program shall submit an application to the director after the individual or individuals have earned a microcredential. The training provider shall submit the reimbursement application during the fiscal year in which the training provider applied under division (C) of this section, but not later than the date established by the director. The training provider shall include in the reimbursement application all of the following information: (a) The actual cost for the training provider to provide each individual with the training; (b) Evidence that each individual earned a microcredential; (c) Any demographic information of each individual that the individual provides to the training provider, including race and gender. (2) The amount of the reimbursement shall be not more than three thousand dollars for each microcredential an individual receives. A participating training provider may not receive a reimbursement for any additional individual who earns a microcredential beyond the number of microcredentials included in the application under division (C) of this section. A participating training provider may receive a total reimbursement of five hundred thousand dollars in a fiscal year. However, each participating training provider that is a state institution of higher education may receive a total reimbursement or advance payment amount under section 122.1713 of the Revised Code of one million dollars in a fiscal year. (3) A training provider may request that an individual participating in the training provider's program provide demographic information to the training provider, including race and gender. An individual is not required to provide that information. (G) The director shall do both all of the following regarding the operation of the program: (1) Create an application to participate in the program and an application for reimbursement; (2) Create applications to participate in and seek advance payments under the platinum provider programs established under sections 122.1712 and 122.1713 of the Revised Code; (3) Create and distribute a survey to each individual who successfully earned a microcredential because of a reimbursement to a training provider under this section inquiring as to the individual's occupation and wages at the time of completing the survey. (H) The director shall include on the internet web site maintained by the department, and the governor's office of workforce transformation shall include on the office's internet web site and the OhioMeansJobs web site, all of the content created under division (G) of this section. (I) The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as the director considers necessary to implement this section and sections 122.1712 and 122.1713 of the Revised Code, including establishing priority guidelines for approving applications under division (D) of this section. (J) Any personal information of an individual the director receives in connection with the individual microcredential assistance program created under this section is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. However, the director may use the information as necessary to complete the reports required under section 122.1711 of the Revised Code. Sec. 122.1712. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of this state as specified in section 9.34 of the Revised Code. (2) "Individual microcredential assistance program" means the individual microcredential assistance program created under section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. (3) "Microcredential" has the same meaning as in section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (4) "Training provider" means all of the following: (a) An Ohio technical center as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code; (b) A private business or institution that offers training to allow an individual to earn one or more microcredentials; (c) A state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of development, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall establish a platinum provider program. A training provider that is approved to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program and that meets the requirements specified under this section is eligible to participate in the platinum provider program. A training provider approved to participate in the platinum provider program may receive one or more advance payments to cover the training costs for individuals to earn a microcredential under the individual microcredential assistance program. (C) A training provider seeking to participate in the platinum provider program shall apply to the director on a form prescribed by the director after the training provider is approved to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program. The training provider shall include in the application all of the following information: (1) The advance payment amount the training provider is seeking, not to exceed twenty per cent of the total reimbursement amount the training provider seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code; (2) Evidence that at least eighty per cent of individuals who participated in training programs offered by the training provider in the previous fiscal year earned a microcredential under the individual microcredential assistance program; (3) The number of microcredentials for which the training provider is seeking an advance payment and the names of the microcredentials; (4) The cost of the training for each microcredential for which the training provider is seeking an advance payment; (5) Proof that the training provider has obtained a surety bond that meets the requirements of division (J) of this section. (D) The director shall notify a training provider in writing of the director's decision to approve or deny an application the training provider submits under division (C) of this section. If the director approves the application, the director shall do both of the following: (1) Designate the training provider as a platinum provider; (2) Provide an initial advance payment to the platinum provider in the amount specified in the application but not exceeding any of the amounts described under division (F) of this section. (E) After each training program that a platinum provider administers during a fiscal year that results in at least one individual earning a microcredential, the provider may apply for a subsequent advance payment of not more than the least of the amounts described under division (F) of this section. The provider shall include in the application the same information as described under division (C) of this section. If a provider applies for a subsequent advance payment under this division, one of the following applies depending on the training program's completion rate: (1) If at least eighty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the provider in the amount specified in the application. (2) If less than eighty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment, the provider shall refund to the director a certain per cent of the advance payment amount that was last provided to the provider during the fiscal year as determined under division (E)(2)(a) of this section. (a) The per cent a provider must refund to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment under division (E)(2) of this section is the difference between eighty per cent and the per cent of individuals who earned a microcredential. (b) For a provider to whom division (E)(2) of this section applies, if the provider complies with that division, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the provider in the amount specified in the provider's application. If the provider does not comply with that division, the director shall not provide a subsequent advance payment. (F) In no case shall the director provide an advance payment under this section that exceeds the least of the following amounts: (1) Twenty per cent of the total amount of reimbursement the platinum provider seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code; (2) The amount of the provider's surety bond required by division (J) of this section, less any previous advance payment the provider is required to refund to the director under division (G) of this section, if the provider has not yet completed the refund; (3) One hundred thousand dollars. (G)(1) If the director approves a reimbursement application that a platinum provider submits under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director shall reimburse the platinum provider for the total actual cost for the platinum provider to provide training to individuals who earned a microcredential in accordance with that division less the total advance payment amount provided to the platinum provider under this section. The director shall not reimburse the platinum provider for any amounts the platinum provider refunded to the director under division (E)(2) of this section. If the platinum provider specifies in the reimbursement application that the total actual cost for the platinum provider to provide the training is less than the total advance payment amount provided to the platinum provider under this section, the platinum provider shall refund to the director the difference between the advance payment amount and the actual training cost. (2) If a platinum provider fails to apply for reimbursement under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director shall require the platinum provider to refund the total advance payment amount provided to the platinum provider under this section. (H) If, at the time a platinum provider seeks reimbursement under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director determines that less than eighty per cent of individuals who participated in training programs provided by the platinum provider in the fiscal year earned a microcredential or that the platinum provider has failed to maintain the bond required under division (J) of this section, both of the following apply: (1) The director shall revoke the provider's status as a platinum provider; (2) The provider is ineligible to participate in the platinum provider program for the following fiscal year. (I) A training provider whose platinum status is revoked under division (H) of this section may reapply to participate in the platinum provider program in the fiscal year that follows the fiscal year in which the training provider is ineligible to participate in the program under that division. (J) A training provider that is certified as a platinum provider or that seeks to participate in the platinum provider program shall maintain a surety bond issued by a bonding company or an insurance company licensed to do business in this state. The bond shall be in favor of the director in an amount not less than the sum of the total advance payments received by the provider for the fiscal year plus any advance payments for previous fiscal years that the provider is required to refund under division (G) of this section, if the provider has not yet completed the refund. The provider shall maintain the bond for so long as it participates in the program and shall not allow it to expire or terminate until all of the provider's obligations under division (G) of this section are fulfilled. Sec. 122.1713. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of this state as specified in section 9.34 of the Revised Code. (2) "Individual microcredential assistance program" means the individual microcredential assistance program created under section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. (3) "Microcredential" has the same meaning as in section 122.178 of the Revised Code. (4) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of development, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall establish an institutional platinum provider program for state institutions of higher education approved to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program. (C) Each state institution of higher education shall do both of the following: (1) Provide at least two in-person training programs and at least one online training program for individuals to earn a microcredential; (2) Not later than the thirty-first day of December immediately after the effective date of this section, and not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year thereafter, apply to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program. (D) If the director approves a state institution of higher education's application to participate in the individual microcredential assistance program, all of the following apply: (1) The director shall designate the institution as an institutional platinum provider. (2) The institution may participate in the institutional platinum provider program established under this section. (3) The institution is eligible to apply for one or more advance payments under this section to cover training costs for individuals to earn a microcredential. (E) An institutional platinum provider may apply for an initial advance payment of not more than twenty per cent of the total reimbursement amount the institution seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. If an institution submits an application under this division, the director shall provide an advance payment to the institution in the amount specified in the application. (F) After each training program that an institutional platinum provider administers during a fiscal year that results in at least one individual earning a microcredential, the institution may apply for a subsequent advance payment of not more than twenty per cent of the total reimbursement amount the institution seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. If an institution applies for a subsequent advance payment under this division, one of the following applies depending on the training program's completion rate: (1) If at least fifty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the institution in the amount specified in the application. (2) If less than fifty per cent of the individuals who participated in the training program earned a microcredential, to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment, the institution shall refund to the director a certain per cent of the advance payment amount that was last provided to the institution during the fiscal year as determined under division (F)(2)(a) of this section. (a) The per cent an institution must refund to be eligible for a subsequent advance payment under division (F)(2) of this section is the difference between fifty per cent and the per cent of individuals who earned a microcredential. (b) For an institution to whom division (F)(2) of this section applies, if the institution complies with that division, the director shall provide a subsequent advance payment to the institution in the amount specified in the institution's application. If the institution does not comply with that division, the director shall not provide a subsequent advance payment. (G) In no case shall the total amount of the advance payments an institutional platinum provider receives under this section during any fiscal year exceed the total reimbursement amount the institution seeks under division (C) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code. (H) If the director approves a reimbursement application that an institutional platinum provider submits under division (F) of section 122.1710 of the Revised Code, the director shall reimburse the institution in accordance with that division for the total actual cost for the institution to provide training to individuals who earned a microcredential less the total advance payment amount provided to the institution under this section. The director shall not reimburse the institution for any amounts the institution refunded to the director under division (F)(2) of this section. If the institution specifies in the reimbursement application that the total actual cost for the institution to provide the training is less than the total advance payment amount provided to the institution under this section, the institution shall refund to the director the difference between the advance payment amount and the actual training cost. Sec. 122.41. The director of development services is invested with the powers and duties provided in Chapter 122. of the Revised Code, in order to promote the welfare of the people of the state, to stabilize the economy, to provide employment, to assist in the development within the state of industrial, commercial, distribution, and research activities required for the people of the state, and for their gainful employment, or otherwise to create or preserve jobs and employment opportunities, or improve the economic welfare of the people of the state, and also to assist in the financing of air, water, or thermal pollution control facilities and solid waste disposal facilities by mortgage insurance as provided in section 122.451 of the Revised Code. It is hereby determined that the accomplishment of such purposes is essential so that the people of the state may maintain their present high standards in comparison with the people of other states and so that opportunities for employment and for favorable markets for the products of the state's natural resources, agriculture, and manufacturing shall be improved and that it is necessary for the state to establish the programs authorized pursuant to Chapter 122. of the Revised Code and invest the director of development services with the powers and duties provided in Chapter 122. of the Revised Code. The powers granted to the director by Chapter 165. of the Revised Code are independent of and in addition and alternate to, and are not limited or restricted by, Chapter 122. of the Revised Code. Sec. 122.42. (A) The director of development shall do all of the following: (1) Receive applications for assistance under sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code; (2) Make a final determination whether to approve the application for assistance; (3) Transmit determinations to approve assistance to the controlling board together with any information the controlling board requires for the board's review and decision as to whether to approve the assistance; (4) Issue revenue bonds of the state through the treasurer of state, as necessary, payable solely from revenues and other sources as provided in sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code. (B) The director may do all of the following: (1) Fix the rate of interest and charges to be made upon or with respect to moneys loaned by the director and the terms upon which mortgages and lease rentals may be guaranteed and the rates of charges to be made for the loans and guarantees and to make provisions for the operation of the funds established by the director in accordance with this section and sections section 122.54, 122.55, 122.56, and 122.57 of the Revised Code; (2) Loan moneys from the fund established in accordance with section 122.54 of the Revised Code pursuant to and in compliance with sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code; (3) Acquire in the name of the director any property of any kind or character in accordance with sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code, by purchase, purchase at foreclosure, or exchange on such terms and in such manner as the director considers proper; (4) Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of the director's duties and the exercise of the director's powers under sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code; (5) Maintain, protect, repair, improve, and insure any property which the director has acquired and dispose of the same by sale, exchange, or lease for the consideration and on the terms and in the manner as the director considers proper, but is not authorized to operate any such property as a business except as the lessor of the property; (6)(a) When the cost of any contract for the maintenance, protection, repair, or improvement of any property held by the director other than compensation for personal services involves an expenditure of more than one thousand dollars, the director shall make a written contract with the lowest responsive and responsible bidder in accordance with section 9.312 of the Revised Code after advertisement for not less than two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where such contract, or some substantial part of it, is to be performed, and in such other publications as the director determines, which notice shall state the general character of the work and the general character of the materials to be furnished, the place where plans and specifications may be examined, and the time and place of receiving bids. (b) Each bid for a contract for the construction, demolition, alteration, repair, or reconstruction of an improvement shall contain the full name of every person interested in it and meet the requirements of section 153.54 of the Revised Code. (c) Each bid for a contract, except as provided in division (B)(6)(b) of this section, shall contain the full name of every person interested in it and shall be accompanied by bond or certified check on a solvent bank, in such amount as the director considers sufficient, that if the bid is accepted a contract will be entered into and the performance of the proposal secured. (d) The director may reject any and all bids. (e) A bond with good and sufficient surety, approved by the director, shall be required of every contractor awarded a contract except as provided in division (B)(6)(b) of this section, in an amount equal to at least fifty per cent of the contract price, conditioned upon faithful performance of the contract. (7) Employ financial consultants, appraisers, consulting engineers, superintendents, managers, construction and accounting experts, attorneys, and other employees and agents as are necessary in the director's judgment and fix their compensation; (8) Assist qualified persons in the coordination and formation of a small business development company, having a statewide area of operation, conditional upon the company's agreeing to seek to obtain certification from the federal small business administration as a certified statewide development company and participation in the guaranteed loan program administered by the small business administration pursuant to the Act of July 2, 1980, 94 Stat. 837, 15 U.S.C.A. 697. During the initial period of formation of the statewide small business development company, the director shall provide technical and financial expertise, legal and managerial assistance, and other services as are necessary and proper to enable the company to obtain and maintain federal certification and participation in the federal guaranteed loan program. The director may charge a fee, in such amount and on such terms and conditions as the director determines necessary and proper, for assistance and services provided pursuant to division (B)(8) of this section. Persons chosen by the director to receive assistance in the formation of a statewide small business development company pursuant to division (B)(8) of this section shall make a special effort to use their participation in the federal guaranteed loan program to assist small businesses which are minority business enterprises as defined in division (E) of section 122.71 of the Revised Code. The director, with the assistance of the minority business development division of the department of development, shall provide technical and financial expertise, legal and managerial assistance, and other services in such a manner to enable the development company to provide assistance to small businesses which are minority business enterprises, and shall make available to the development company information pertaining to assistance available to minority business enterprises under programs established pursuant to sections 122.71 to 122.83, 122.87 to 122.89, 122.92 to 122.94, 122.921, and 125.081 of the Revised Code. (9) Receive and accept grants, gifts, and contributions of money, property, labor, and other things of value to be held, used, and applied only for the purpose for which such grants, gifts, and contributions are made, from individuals, private and public corporations, from the United States or any agency of the United States, from the state or any agency of the state, and from any political subdivision of the state, and may agree to repay any contribution of money or to return any property contributed or the value of the property at such times, in such amounts, and on such terms and conditions, excluding the payment of interest, as the director determines at the time such contribution is made, and may evidence such obligations by notes, bonds, or other written instruments; (10) Establish with the treasurer of state the funds fund provided in sections section 122.54, 122.55, 122.56, and 122.57 of the Revised Code, in addition to such funds as the director determines are necessary or proper; (11) Do all acts and things necessary or proper to carry out the powers expressly granted and the duties imposed in sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 and Chapter 163. of the Revised Code. (C) All expenses and obligations incurred by the director in carrying out the director's powers and in exercising the director's duties under sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code, shall be payable solely from the proceeds of revenue bonds issued pursuant to those sections, from revenues or other receipts or income of the director, from grants, gifts, and contributions, or funds established in accordance with those sections. Those sections do not authorize the director to incur indebtedness or to impose liability on the state or any political subdivision of the state. (D) Financial statements and financial data submitted to the director by any corporation, partnership, or person in connection with a loan application, or any information taken from such statements or data for any purpose, shall not be open to public inspection. Sec. 122.47. At the request of the director of development, the treasurer of state shall issue revenue bonds of the state for the purpose of acquiring moneys for the purposes of this chapter, which moneys shall be credited by the treasurer of state as the director of development shall determine to and among the funds established in accordance with or pursuant to sections 122.35, 122.42, and 122.54, 122.55, 122.56, 122.561, and 122.57 of the Revised Code. The principal of and interest on such Such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the sinking funds established in accordance with section 122.57 of the Revised Code at the times and in the order and manner provided in the bond issuing proceedings or in any trust agreements securing such bonds, and shall be secured by the revenue bond guaranty fund established in accordance with section 122.571 of the Revised Code and shall also be secured by moneys in the other funds established by the director to the extent and on the terms he the director specifies and by covenants of the director that he will to so manage the loans and leases and fix interest rates, charges, and rentals so as to assure receipt of net income and revenue sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and the interest on the revenue bonds. Sec. 122.49. The proceeds of each issue of revenue bonds issued pursuant to sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code shall be used for the making of loans authorized in sections 122.43 and 122.45 of the Revised Code, for the purchase and improvement of property authorized in section 122.46 of the Revised Code, for insuring mortgage payments authorized in section 122.451 of the Revised Code, and for the crediting into and among the funds established in accordance with sections 122.35, and 122.54, 122.55, 122.56, 122.561, and 122.57 of the Revised Code, but subject to such conditions, limitations, and covenants with the purchasers and holders of the bonds as shall be provided for in the bond authorization proceedings and in the trust agreement securing the same. Provision shall be made by the director of development services for the payment of the expenses of the director in operating the assistance programs authorized under this chapter in such manner and to such extent as shall be determined by the director. Sec. 122.53. In the discretion of the treasurer of state, any bonds issued under sections 122.39 and 122.41 to 122.62 of the Revised Code, may be secured by a trust agreement between the treasurer of state and a corporate trustee, which trustee may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state. Any such trust agreement may pledge or assign payments of principal of and interest on loans, charges, fees, and other revenue to be received by the director of development services, all rentals received under leases made by the director, and all proceeds of the sale or other disposition of property held by the director, and may provide for the holding in trust by the trustee to the extent provided for in the proceedings authorizing such bonds, of all such moneys and moneys otherwise payable into the mortgage guarantee fund created by section 122.56 of the Revised Code, and all moneys otherwise payable into the mortgage insurance fund created by section 122.561 of the Revised Code, and of moneys payable into the sinking fund or funds referred to in section 122.57 of the Revised Code, but shall not convey or mortgage any of the real or personal property held by the director or any part thereof. Any such trust agreement, or any proceedings providing for the issuance of such bonds, may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as are reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the director in relation to the acquisition of property, and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation, and insurance of facilities, the making of loans and leases and the terms and provisions thereof, and the custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of all moneys, and provisions for the employment of consulting engineers or other consultants in connection with the making of loans and leases and the construction or operation of any facility. Any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state which may act as trustee or as depository of the proceeds of bonds or of revenue may furnish such indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as are required by the treasurer of state. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders as is customary in trust agreements or trust indentures securing bonds or debentures of corporations. Such trust agreement may contain such other provisions as the treasurer of state deems reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred by the treasurer of state in carrying out the provisions of any such trust agreement shall be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the assistance programs authorized pursuant to Chapter 122. of the Revised Code. Any such trust agreement may provide the method whereby general administrative overhead expense of the director with respect to those assistance programs shall be allocated among the funds established pursuant to Chapter 122. of the Revised Code with respect to the operating expenses of the director payable out of the income of the assistance programs. Sec. 122.571. In addition to the separate sinking funds created under section 122.57 of the Revised Code, there There is hereby created the revenue bond guaranty fund to consist of all money allocated by the director of development to guarantee payment of interest on, principal of and redemption premium on, the revenue bonds issued by the director under Chapter 122. of the Revised Code, all grants, gifts, and contributions made to the director for such purpose, and all money and property provided by law for such purpose. Sec. 122.59. In the event of a default with respect to any loan or lease, the director of development shall take such action as he the director deems proper in the circumstances to enforce and protect the rights of the director, and such action as may be required by the provisions of any proceedings authorizing the revenue bonds or of any trust agreement securing such bonds, which may include any appropriate action at law or in equity, enforcement or waiver of any provision of any mortgage or security agreement or lease, or reinstatement of any forfeited or cancelled right, title, or privilege. Notwithstanding any such action, the director shall transfer from the mortgage guarantee fund created by section 122.56 of the Revised Code to the sinking fund or funds referred to in section 122.57 of the Revised Code amounts not greater than the amounts which would have been paid upon such loan or under such lease but for such default, at the time or times when such amounts would have been paid but for such defaults, to the extent provided in the proceedings authorizing and the trust agreements securing such bonds, to be held and applied as other moneys in the sinking fund, and shall make such other transfers and take such other action as shall be required of the director by any such bond issuance proceedings or trust agreement. Sec. 122.631. (A) As used in sections 122.631 to 122.633 of the Revised Code: (1) "Qualified nonprofit developer" means a nonprofit corporation, as defined in section 1702.01 of the Revised Code, that is all of the following: (a) Incorporated in this state; (b) Engaged in community development activities primarily within an identified geographic area of operation in this state; (c) Has as its primary purpose the improvement of the physical, economic, or social environment by addressing critical problems in that geographic area of operation including housing. (2) "Electing subdivision," "county land reutilization corporation," and "land reutilization program" have the same meanings as in section 5722.01 of the Revised Code. (2)(3) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code, and "mobile home" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (3)(4) "Qualifying residential property" means single-family residential property, including a a single unit of single-family residential property that has at least eight hundred square feet of habitable space and is either a stand-alone unit or in a multi-unit property containing not more than ten single-family residential units. "Qualifying residential property" excludes mobile homes but includes both of the following: (a) A manufactured home; (b) A single unit in a multi-unit property containing not more than ten units but excluding manufactured homes, that has at least one thousand square feet of habitable space per unitthat has other nonresidential units or uses. Such nonresidential units or uses are not qualifying residential property. (4)(5) "Qualifying median income" means eighty one hundred twenty per cent of median income for the county where qualifying residential property is located, as determined by the director of development pursuant to section 174.04 of the Revised Code. (6) "Qualifying financial literacy counseling" means a homeownership course with a curriculum that includes basic home maintenance training and financial literacy. (7) "Qualifying counseling provider" means an individual, business, nonprofit organization, or political subdivision, including an agency or instrumentality thereof, that is licensed, certified, or authorized to provide homeownership counseling and financial literacy as one of its primary functions, including housing counselors certified by the United States department of housing and urban development or the Ohio housing financing agency. (B) There is created in the department of development the welcome home Ohio (WHO) program to administer the grants authorized by this section and section 163.632 122.632 of the Revised Code and the tax credits authorized by section 122.633 of the Revised Code. The department shall create and maintain a list of qualifying residential property to which the deed restriction described in division (D)(4) of this section, division (B)(4) of section 122.632, or division (C)(4) of section 122.633 of the Revised Code applies. That list is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (C) An electing subdivision or, a county land reutilization corporation, or a qualified nonprofit developer may apply to the director of development for a grant from the welcome home Ohio fund, which is created in the state treasury, to pay or defer the cost of purchasing qualifying residential property for incorporation into the electing subdivision's or county land reutilization corporation's land reutilization program or the qualified nonprofit developer's housing program. Up to two thousand dollars of each grant may be used to fund the qualifying financial literacy counseling required under division (D)(6) of this section. To the extent that funding is available in that fund, the director may award grants to electing subdivisions and, county land reutilization corporations, and qualified nonprofit developers that make such an application and agree to comply with division (D) of this section, with a maximum grant of one hundred thousand dollars per qualifying residential property. (D) The director of development shall require all applicants for a grant authorized by division (C) of this section to agree, as part of the application, to all of the following: (1) That grant funds shall only be used to pay the cost of purchasing qualifying residential property; (2) That qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent shall be held until sold to an individual or individuals who, inclusively: (a) Have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income; (b) Demonstrate the financial means to purchase the qualifying residential property; (c) Agree to maintain ownership of the qualifying residential property, occupy it as a primary residence, and not to rent any portion of the property to another individual for use as a dwelling, for at least five three years following the date of purchase; (d) Agree not to sell the qualifying residential property, within twenty fifteen years after the date of the sale, to any purchaser except other than the electing subdivision, county land reutilization corporation, or qualified nonprofit developer or an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income; (e) Agree to pay a penalty to the director of development for violation of the agreement required by division (D)(2)(c) of this section that, subject to divisions (F)(2) and (3) of this section, equals ninety thousand dollarsthe amount of the grant attributable to the property, less eighteen thousand dollars one-third of that amount multiplied by the number of full years the individual or individuals owned the property; (f) Agree that the director of development is a third-party beneficiary of the purchase agreement; (g) Agree to participate in the applicant's qualifying financial literacy program; (h) Agree to annually certify to the director of development or the director's designee, during the period described by division (D)(2)(c) of this section, that the individual or individuals own and occupy the qualifying residential property, and that no part of the property is being rented to another individual for use as a dwelling. (3) That qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent shall be sold for not more than one two hundred eighty twenty thousand dollars per property. (4) That qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent shall not be sold without a deed restriction prohibiting the sale of the property to a person that is not the electing subdivision, county land reutilization corporation, or qualified nonprofit developer or an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income for twenty fifteen years after the date of the property's first transfer from the applicant following the use of grant funds. The deed restriction is a covenant running with the land and is fully binding on subsequent purchasers of the property until it expires on the fifteenth anniversary of the property's first transfer from the applicant following the use of grant funds. The electing subdivision, county land reutilization corporation, or qualified nonprofit developer may include in the deed restriction a right of first refusal to repurchase the property for the purpose of ensuring that the property is ultimately sold to an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income. (5) That the applicant shall repay all grant funds not expended to purchase qualifying residential property or to fund the qualifying financial literacy counseling required by division (D)(6) of this section and all grant funds expended to purchase qualifying residential property that is not sold to an individual or individuals who meet the requirements described in division (D)(2) of this section or that is sold without the deed restriction described in division (D)(4) of this section. (6) That the applicant shall provide qualifying financial literacy counseling, over a minimum of one yearsix months, delivered by a qualifying counseling provider, to each purchaser of qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent. An applicant may provide information regarding its qualifying financial literacy program to the director of development for review as part of the application or prior to application. Financial Qualifying financial literacy counseling provided by the applicant to the same purchaser, in accordance with division (B)(6) of section 122.632 of the Revised Code or division (C)(5) of section 122.633 of the Revised Code, satisfies the requirements of division (D)(6) of this section. (7) That the applicant shall report to the department of development the date when the qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application is sold by the applicant. (E) The director of development has authority and standing to sue for the enforcement of a deed restriction described in division (D)(4) of this section. (F)(1)(F) An electing subdivision or, a county land reutilization corporation, or a qualified nonprofit developer may apply for, and the director of development may award both a grant under this section for the purchase of qualifying residential property, and either a grant under section 122.632 of the Revised Code, or a tax credit under section 122.633 of the Revised Code, to rehabilitate or construct the same qualifying residential property. (2) If an electing subdivision or county land reutilization is awarded a grant under this section and a grant under section 122.632 of the Revised Code for the same qualifying residential property, and the individual or individuals who purchase the property violate both of the agreements required by division (D)(2)(c) of this section and division (B)(2)(c) of section 122.632 of the Revised Code, only the penalty described by division (B)(2)(e) of section 122.632 of the Revised Code applies. (3) If an electing subdivision or county land reutilization is awarded a grant under this section and a tax credit under section 122.633 of the Revised Code for the same qualifying residential property, and the individual or individuals who purchase the property violate both of the agreements required by division (D)(2)(c) of this section and division (C)(2)(a) of section 122.633 of the Revised Code, only the greater of the penalties described in divisions (D)(2)(e) of this section and division (C)(2)(c) of section 122.633 of the Revised Code applies. (G)(1) The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. Of the Revised Code as necessary to administer the grant program. Such rules may include the following: (a) Application forms, deadlines, and procedures; (b) Criteria for evaluating and prioritizing applications; (c) Guidelines for promoting an even geographic distribution of grants throughout the state; (d) Guidelines to determine the value of qualifying residential property located in a building with other uses and the total value of that building. (2) Any grants repaid under this section shall be credited to the welcome home Ohio fund. (3) An electing subdivision, a county land reutilization corporation, or a qualified nonprofit developer shall use all profits derived from the sale of qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent, including profits derived from the resale of such property to a subsequent purchaser, for the electing subdivision's or county land reutilization corporation's land reutilization program or the qualified nonprofit developer's housing program. Sec. 122.632. (A) An electing subdivision or, a county land reutilization corporation, or a qualified nonprofit developer may apply to the director of development for a grant from the welcome home Ohio fund created in section 122.631 of the Revised Code to pay or defer the cost to rehabilitate or construct qualifying residential property held by the electing subdivision's or county land reutilization corporation's land reutilization program or the qualified nonprofit developer's housing program. To the extent that funding is available, in that fund the director may award grants to electing subdivisions and, county land reutilization corporations, and qualified nonprofit developers that make such an application and agree to comply with division (B) of this section, with a maximum grant of thirty one hundred thousand dollars per qualifying residential property. (B) The director of development shall require all applicants for a grant authorized by division (A) of this section to agree, as part of the application, to all of the following: (1) That grant funds shall only be used to pay the cost of rehabilitation or construction of qualifying residential property and all work will be completed according to all applicable construction and design standards; . Up to two thousand dollars of each grant may be used to fund the qualifying financial literacy counseling required under division (B)(6) of this section. If grant funds are spent to construct or rehabilitate a qualifying residential property described in division (A)(4)(b) of section 122.631 of the Revised Code, then no portion of the funds shall be spent to construct or rehabilitate portions of the building that are for nonresidential uses, except for common areas used by the occupants of the residential units and improvements that serve both the residential units and the other portions of the building. (2) That qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent shall be held until sold to an individual or individuals who, inclusively: (a) Have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income; (b) Demonstrate the financial means to purchase the qualifying residential property; (c) Agree to maintain ownership of the qualifying residential property, occupy it as a primary residence, and not to rent any portion of the property to another individual for use as a dwelling, for at least five three years following the date of purchase; (d) Agree not to sell the qualifying residential property, within twenty fifteen years after the date of the sale, to any purchaser except other than the electing subdivision, county land reutilization corporation, or qualified nonprofit developer or an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income; (e) Agree to pay a penalty to the director of development for violation of the agreement required by division (B)(2)(c) of this section that, subject to division (F)(2) of section 122.631 of the Revised Code, equals ninety thousand dollarsthe amount of the grant attributable to the property, less eighteen thousand dollars one-third of that amount multiplied by the number of full years the individual or individuals owned the property. (f) Agree that the director of development is a third-party beneficiary of the purchase agreement; (g) Agree to participate in the applicant's qualifying financial literacy program; (h) Agree to annually certify to the director of development or the director's designee, during the period described by division (B)(2)(c) of this section, that the individual or individuals own and occupy the qualifying residential property, and that no part of the property is being rented to another individual for use as a dwelling. (3) That qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent shall be sold for not more than one two hundred eighty twenty thousand dollars per property. (4) That qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent shall not be sold without a deed restriction prohibiting the sale of the property to a person that is not the electing subdivision, county land reutilization corporation, or qualified nonprofit developer or an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the median income for twenty fifteen years after the date of the property's first transfer from the applicant following the use of grant funds;. The deed restriction is a covenant running with the land and is fully binding on subsequent purchasers of the property until it expires on the fifteenth anniversary of the property's first transfer from the applicant following the use of grant funds. The electing subdivision, county land reutilization corporation, or qualified nonprofit developer may include in the deed restriction a right of first refusal to repurchase the property for the purpose of ensuring that the property is ultimately sold to an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income. (5) That the applicant shall repay all grant funds expended on any expenses other than the construction or rehabilitation of qualifying residential property or financial literacy counseling required under division (B)(6) of this section, or on qualifying residential property that is not sold to an individual or individuals who meet the requirements described in division (B)(2) of this section or that is sold without the deed restriction described in division (B)(4) of this section; (6) That the applicant shall provide financial qualifying literacy counseling, over a minimum of one yearsix months, delivered by the qualifying counseling provider, to each purchaser of qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent. An applicant may provide information regarding its qualifying financial literacy program to the director of development for review as part of the application or prior to application; (7) That the applicant shall report to the department of development the date when the qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application is sold by the applicant. (8) That, if grant funds are received, the qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application shall not be the subject of an application for a tax credit under section 122.633 of the Revised Code. (C) The director of development is granted authority and standing to sue for the enforcement of a deed restriction described in division (B)(4) of this section. (D)(1) The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to administer the grant program. Such rules may include the following: (a) Application forms, deadlines, and procedures; (b) Criteria for evaluating and prioritizing applications; (c) Guidelines for promoting an even geographic distribution of grants throughout the state; (d) Guidelines to determine the value of qualifying residential property located in a building with other uses and the total value of that building. (2) Any grants repaid under this section shall be credited to the welcome home Ohio fund. (3) An electing subdivision, a county land reutilization corporation, or a qualified nonprofit developer shall use all profits derived from the sale of qualifying residential property on which grant funds are spent, including profits derived from the resale of such property to a subsequent purchaser, for the electing subdivision's or county land reutilization corporation's land reutilization program or the qualified nonprofit developer's housing program. Sec. 122.633. (A) As used in this section, "eligible developer" means any of the following: (1) A nonprofit corporation, as defined in section 1702.01 of the Revised Code, based in this state with a primary activity of the development and preservation of affordable housing; (2) A limited partnership or domestic limited partnership, as defined in section 1782.01 of the Revised Code, in which a general partner is a nonprofit corporation based in this state, a primary activity of which is the development and preservation of affordable housing; (3) A limited liability company, as defined in section 1706.01 of the Revised Code, in which the manager is a nonprofit corporation based in this state, a primary activity of which is the development and preservation of affordable housing; (4) A community improvement corporation, as defined in section 1724.01 of the Revised Code, or a community urban redevelopment corporation, as defined in section 1728.01 of the Revised Code. (B) An electing subdivision or eligible developer that rehabilitates or constructs a unit of qualifying residential property and sells the property to an individual or individuals for the individual's or individuals' occupancy may apply to the director of development for a nonrefundable credit against the tax levied under section 5726.02 or 5747.02 of the Revised Code, provided the rehabilitation or construction and the sale comply with division (C) of this section. The credit application shall be made on forms prescribed by the director. The credit shall equal ninety thousand dollars or one-third ninety per cent of the cost to rehabilitate or construct the property, whichever is less. (C) An application for a credit authorized by division (C) (B) of this section shall certify all of the following: (1) That the rehabilitation or construction of qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application was completed according to all applicable construction and design standards; (2) That each qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application was sold to an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income, demonstrated the financial means to purchase the qualifying residential property, and agreed to all of the following in the purchase agreement: (a) To maintain ownership of the qualifying residential property, occupy it as a primary residence, and not to rent any portion of the property to another individual for use as a dwelling, for at least five three years following the date of purchase; (b) Not to sell the qualifying residential property to a purchaser other than the electing subdivision, the eligible developer, or an individual or individuals who have annual income that is no more than the qualifying median income for at least twenty fifteen years after the date of purchase; (c) To pay a penalty to the director of development for violation of the agreement required by division (C)(2)(a) of this section that, subject to division (F)(3) of section 122.631 of the Revised Code, equals the total amount of the tax credit authorized by this section and attributable to the qualifying residential property purchased by the individual, reduced by twenty per cent one-third of that amount for each full year the individual or individuals owned the property; (d) That the director of development is a third-party beneficiary of the purchase agreement; (e) To participate in the applicant's qualifying financial literacy program; (f) Agree to annually certify to the director of development or the director's designee, during the period described by division (C)(2)(a) of this section, that the individual or individuals own and occupy the qualifying residential property, and that no part of the property is being rented to another individual for use as a dwelling. (3) That the qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application was sold for not more than one two hundred eighty twenty thousand dollars; (4) That the purchaser of the qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application was transferred with a deed restriction prohibiting the sale of the property to a person other than the electing subdivision, the eligible developer, or an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income for at least twenty fifteen years after the date of transfer. The deed restriction is a covenant running with the land and is fully binding on subsequent purchasers of the property until it expires on the fifteenth anniversary of the property's first transfer from the applicant under this section. The electing subdivision or eligible developer may include in the deed restriction a right of first refusal to repurchase the property for the purposes of ensuring that the property is ultimately sold to an individual or individuals who have annual income that is not more than the qualifying median income. (5) That the applicant provides a minimum of one year six months of qualifying financial literacy counseling, delivered by a qualifying counseling provider, to each purchaser of qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application. An applicant may provide information regarding its qualifying financial literacy program to the director of development for review as part of the application or prior to application; . (6) That the applicant shall report to the department of development the date when the qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application is sold by the applicant. (7) That the qualifying residential property that is the subject of the application was not rehabilitated or constructed using grant funds received under section 122.632 of the Revised Code. (D) The director of development is granted authority and standing to sue for the enforcement of a deed restriction described in division (C)(4) of this section. (E)(1) Subject to division (E)(2) of this section, if the director determines that the applicant qualifies for a credit under this section, the director shall issue a tax credit certificate to the applicant identified with a unique number and listing the amount of the credit that is eligible to be transferred or claimed pursuant to division (E)(3) or (F) of this section. (2) The total amount of tax credits issued by the director under this section after the effective date of this amendment shall not exceed twenty-five twenty million dollars in any fiscal year, and no tax credits shall be issued after June 30, 20252027. (3) A person granted a certificate pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section may claim the credit against the tax levied under section 5726.02 of the Revised Code or against the person's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for the taxable year in which the certificate is issued. The taxpayer shall claim the credit in the order prescribed by section 5726.98 or 5747.98 of the Revised Code, as applicable. Any unused amount may be carried forward for the following five taxable years. If the person is a pass-through entity, any taxpayer that is a direct or indirect investor in the pass-through entity on the last day of the entity's taxable year may claim the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive share of the credit against the taxpayer's aggregate amount of tax levied under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. A taxpayer claiming a credit under this section shall submit a copy of the certificate with the taxpayer's return or report. (F) A person granted a certificate pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section may transfer the right to claim all or part of the credit reflected on the certificate to another person. To effectuate the transfer, the transferor shall notify the tax commissioner, in writing, that the transferor is transferring the right to claim all or part of the remaining credit stated on the certificate. The transferor shall identify in that notification the certificate's number, the name and the tax identification number of the transferee, the amount of the remaining credit transferred to the transferee, and, if applicable, the amount of remaining credit retained by the transferor. The transferee may claim the amount of the credit received under this division against the tax levied under section 5726.02 of the Revised Code or against the person's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for the taxable year in the same manner and for the same taxable years as it may be claimed by a person under division (E)(3) of this section. Any person to which a credit has been transferred under this division may transfer the right to claim all or part of the transferred credit amount to any other person, in the same manner prescribed by this division for the initial transfer, including that any such transfer be reported by the transferor to the tax commissioner as described in this division. Transferring a credit under this division does not extend the taxable years for which the credit may be claimed or number of years for which the unclaimed credit amount may be carried forward. (G) The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to administer the tax credits authorized by this section. Such rules may include the following: (1) Application forms, deadlines, and procedures; (2) Criteria for evaluating and prioritizing applications; (3) Guidelines for promoting an even geographic distribution of credits throughout the state. Sec. 122.636. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Major economic development project" means a project in this state that is reasonably expected to create, retain, and attract jobs or otherwise improve the economic well-being of the area surrounding the project site and that meets either of the following: (a) The project is reasonably expected to create at least seven hundred new permanent jobs. (b) At least seven hundred million dollars in private investments are committed to establish, expand, renovate, or occupy a facility as part of a single project at a designated project site, including investment in new buildings, additions or improvements to existing buildings, machinery, equipment, furniture, fixtures, and inventory. (2) "Major workforce housing project" means a project that reserves at least one hundred units, designed for residential occupancy by at least one hundred individuals or families living independently from each other. (3) "Pro-housing development policy" may include any of the following: (a) Having a process in place to increase the rate at which permits for housing developments are reviewed; (b) Having a pre-approval process in place for an expedited review of permits for a diverse range of housing developers; (c) Subsidizing or decreasing costs related to water or sewer connections and extensions for major workforce housing projects; (d) Acquiring and readying sites that are ready to be financed and built upon by developers; (e) Reducing or eliminating impact, inspection, and plan review fees for housing developers; (f) Adopting a zoning plan that includes promoting higher density, small lot size, and minimum setback requirements; (g) Developing a comprehensive plan that promotes diverse residential development options; (h) Having no or minimal parking requirements for developments that include residential units; (i) Conducting a traffic study, improving water or sewer infrastructure, improving roads, or permitting both rigid and flexible pavement types; (j) Developing partnerships to expand the provision of sewer and water services to new areas; (k) Promoting the use of non-traditional building structures such as modular or manufactured homes. (4) "Residential economic development district" means all parcels of land within a twenty-mile radius of a major economic development project. (B) A county, township, or municipal corporation that is fully or partially located within a residential economic development district may apply for a grant under this section in the form and manner prescribed by the department of development. The county, township, or municipal corporation may submit the application independently or in collaboration with a housing developer, port authority, council of government, regional planning commission, or one or more other counties, townships, or municipal corporations. The application shall, at minimum, include documentation or other evidence that proves, to the satisfaction of the department, that the applicant has done or has imminent plans to do both of the following within the district: (1) Adopt and implement pro-housing development policies; (2) Approve a major workforce housing project. (C)(1) The department shall review applications and award grants under this section on a rolling basis, to the extent that funds are available. (2) The department shall evaluate applications and determine the amount of each grant awarded in accordance with scoring metrics that include all of the following: (a) Density, with more points awarded to projects that have more units per acre, starting at two units per acre; (b) Lot size, with more points awarded to projects that have smaller lot sizes, starting with an average of seven thousand five hundred square feet; (c) Side yard setbacks, with more points awarded to projects that have smaller setback requirements, starting with six feet; (d) Open space requirements, with more points awarded to projects that have lesser open space requirements, starting with twenty-five per cent of gross acreage; (e) Inspection, plan, impact, or water and sewer tap fee reductions, with more points awarded for lower or no fees; (f) Use of water pipe type, with more points awarded for allowing polyvinyl chloride as opposed to ductile iron; (g) Use of rigid and flexible pavement types, with more points awarded for allowing both; (h) Traffic studies and thoroughfare plans, with more points awarded for applicants that seek to use funds for those purposes and have demonstrated success in completing such studies or plans for a major workforce housing project; (i) Sanitary sewer or water extensions, with more points awarded for applicants that seek to use funds for those purposes as related to the major workforce housing project. (3) The department shall give preference to applicants that adopt more pro-housing development policies in terms of both quantity and impact. (D) If a county, township, or municipal corporation is approved for a grant under this section based on imminent plans to adopt and implement pro-housing development policies and approve a major workforce housing project, the department shall confirm that the county, township, or municipal corporation follows through with those plans, as described in the grant application, before disbursing grant funds. A grant recipient shall use the funds only for the following purposes: (1) Providing capital for housing development through grants or loans; (2) Readying sites for development; (3) Providing financial assistance for housing-related infrastructure projects including road improvements and water or sewer connections; (4) Addressing additional service or public safety needs due to increases in population. (E) The director of development shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement and administer this section. The rules shall address application procedures, scoring metrics, grant distribution, and state model zoning plans that include density, lot size, and setback preferences. The director shall finalize and publish the initial application procedures and scoring metrics to the department's web site no later than December 31, 2025. (F) All applications for grants under this section and the scoring metrics used by the department of development in awarding such grants are public records for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (G) The general assembly, in enacting this section, hereby declares its intent to encourage major workforce housing projects in areas of the state that otherwise would not attract such developments and to increase home ownership among Ohioans. Sec. 122.6510. (A) As used in this section, "federal act" means the "Small Business Liability Relief and Brownfields Revitalization Act," 115 Stat. 2356 (2002), 42 U.S.C. 9601 and 9604. (B) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Brownfields Revolving Loan Fund. The Fund shall consist of all moneys received by the state from repayments of loans made under the terms of the federal act, and any other money transferred to the Fund. The Fund may be used to make grants and loans by the Director of Development Services. All investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund. (C) The Director shall administer moneys received into the Fund and comply with all requirements imposed by the federal act in administering the funds. (D) The Director may establish a schedule of fees and charges payable by loan recipients to the Director for the administration of this section. Sec. 122.6511. (A) As used in this section and section 122.6512 of the Revised Code: (1) "Brownfield" means an abandoned, idled, or under-used industrial, commercial, or institutional property where expansion or redevelopment is complicated by known or potential releases of hazardous substances or petroleum. (2) "Lead entity" means a county, township, municipal corporation, port authority, conservancy district, park district or other similar park authority, county land reutilization corporation, or organization for profit. (3) "Remediation" means any action to contain, remove, or dispose of hazardous substances or petroleum at a brownfield. "Remediation" includes the acquisition of a brownfield, demolition performed at a brownfield, and the installation or upgrade of the minimum amount of infrastructure that is necessary to make a brownfield operational for economic development activity. "Remediation" also includes demolition and infrastructure development costs. (4) "County land reutilization corporation" has the same meaning as in section 1724.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Demolition and infrastructure development costs" means demolition costs and costs associated with constructing, upgrading, or extending infrastructure necessary to make a brownfield operational. (5)(6) "Priority investment area eligible project" means some or all of the following activities necessary or conducive for generating, transporting, storing, or transmitting electricity at the site of a brownfield or former coal mine located in a priority investment area designated under section 122.161 of the Revised Code: (a) Environmental or cultural resource site assessments; (b) The monitoring, remediation, cleanup, or containment of land to remove any condition or substance regulated by state or federal environmental laws or regulations, including hazardous substances, hazardous wastes, solid wastes, or petroleum; (c) The demolition and removal of existing structures, grading, or other site work necessary to make a site or certain real property that includes a brownfield or former coal mine usable for economic development; (d) The development of a remediation and reuse plan; (e) The development or operation of a site for energy generation or battery storage. (B)(1) There is hereby created the brownfield remediation program to award grants for priority investment area eligible projects and the remediation of brownfield sites throughout Ohio. The program shall be administered by the director of development pursuant to this section and rules adopted pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section. (2) The director shall adopt rules, under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, for the administration of the program. The rules shall include provisions for determining project and project sponsor eligibility, program administration, and any other provisions the director finds necessary. (3) The director shall not award a grant exceeding ten million dollars to a priority investment area eligible project. Grants for such projects may not be used for the construction or operation of electric generating infrastructure. (C)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the brownfield remediation fund. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly, and investment earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. The director shall reserve funds from each appropriation to the fund to each county in the state. The amount reserved shall be one million dollars per county, or, if an appropriation is less than eighty-eight million dollars, a proportionate amount to each county. Amounts reserved pursuant to this section are reserved for one calendar year from the date of the appropriation. After one calendar year, the funds shall be available pursuant to division (D) of this section. (2) A lead entity may submit an initial a grant application for the use of funds reserved under division (C)(1) of this section to the director. The lead entity may later submit an amended application to the director, and the director may accept and approve that application for use of funds up to the amount reserved for that county. (D) Funds from an appropriation not reserved under division (C)(1) of this section shall be available for grants to projects located anywhere in the state, and grants from those funds shall be awarded to qualifying projects on a first-come, first-served basison a case by case basis. In making the award determination, the director shall evaluate the economic merit of the project to the county, surrounding counties, and state. The director also shall ensure that projects awarded are in different regions of the state. (E) The amendments to this section by H.B. 315 of the 135th general assembly this act apply to new projects that are applied for and awarded funding by the director of development on and after July 1, 2025the effective date of this amendment. Projects that are applied for or were applied for under this section prior to July 1, 2025, shall be governed by this section as it existed prior to July 1, 2025. Sec. 122.6512. (A)(1) There is hereby created the building demolition and site revitalization program to award grants for the demolition of commercial and residential buildings and revitalization of surrounding properties on sites that are not brownfields. The program shall be administered by the director of development pursuant to this section and rules adopted pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section. (2) The director shall adopt rules, under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, for the administration of the program. The rules shall include provisions for determining project and project sponsor eligibility, program administration, and any other provisions the director finds necessary. (3) The director shall ensure that the program is operational and accepting proposals for grants not later than ninety days after September 30, 2021. (4) To streamline funding through the program, each county shall have one lead entity designated in accordance with the following: (a) If the county has a population of less than one hundred thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census, the director shall select the lead entity from a list of recommendations made by the board of county commissioners of the county. The board shall submit a lead entity letter of intent and any other documentation required by the director in order for the director to select a lead entity for that county. (b) If the county has a population of one hundred thousand or more according to the most recent federal decennial census and the county does not have a county land reutilization corporation, the director shall select the lead entity from a list of recommendations made by the board of county commissioners of the county. The board shall submit a lead entity letter of intent and any other documentation required by the director in order for the director to select a lead entity for that county. (c) If the county has a population of one hundred thousand or more according to the most recent federal decennial census and the county has a county land reutilization corporation, the county land reutilization corporation is the lead entity for that county. (5) The lead entity of each county shall submit all grant applications for that county. The lead entity shall submit with a grant application any agreements executed between the lead entity with other recipients that will receive grant money through the lead entity, if applicable. Such recipients may include local governments, nonprofit organizations, community development corporations, regional planning commissions, county land reutilization corporations, and community action agencies. (B)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the building demolition and site revitalization fund. The fund shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly, and investment earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. (2) The director shall reserve funds from each appropriation to the fund to each county in the state. The amount reserved shall be five hundred thousand dollars per county, or, if an appropriation is less than forty-four million dollars, a proportionate amount to each county. Amounts reserved pursuant to this section are reserved for one calendar year from the date of the appropriation. After one calendar year, the funds shall be available pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section. (3) Funds from an appropriation not reserved under division (B)(2) of this section shall be available for grants to projects located anywhere in the state, and grants from those funds shall be awarded to qualifying projects on a first-come, first-served basis. Grants awarded pursuant to this division shall be limited to seventy-five per cent of a project's total cost. Sec. 122.84. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Ohio qualified opportunity fund" means a qualified opportunity fund that holds one hundred per cent of its invested assets in qualified opportunity zone property situated in an Ohio opportunity zone. In the case of qualified opportunity zone property that is qualified opportunity zone stock or qualified opportunity zone partnership interest, the stock or interest is situated in an Ohio opportunity zone only if, during all of the qualified opportunity fund's holding period for such stock or interest, all of the use of the corporation's or partnership's tangible property was in an Ohio opportunity zone. In the case of qualified opportunity zone property that is qualified opportunity zone business property, the property is situated in an Ohio opportunity zone only if, during all of the fund's holding period for such property, all of the use of the property was in an Ohio opportunity zone. All terms used in division (A) of this section have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. 1400Z-2, except that "all" shall be substituted for "substantially all" wherever "substantially all" appears in the definition of those terms or in the definition of terms used in those terms. (2) "Ohio opportunity zone" means a qualified opportunity zone designated in this state under 26 U.S.C. 1400Z-1 before, on, or after, October 17, 2019, the effective date of the enactment of this section by H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly. (3) "Business day" means a day of the week excluding Saturday, Sunday, and a legal holiday as defined under section 1.14 of the Revised Code. (4) "Investment period" means the six-month period from the first day of January to the thirtieth day of June, or from the first day of July to the thirty-first day of December. (5) "Investment" means money from any source other than grant funds that is invested to improve property located in an Ohio opportunity zone with the expectation of receiving a profit. (B) A person that invests in one or more Ohio qualified opportunity funds may apply to the director of development for a nonrefundable credit against the tax levied under section 5725.18, 5726.02, 5729.03, or 5747.02 of the Revised Code. The application shall be made on forms prescribed by the director. The director shall accept and review applications submitted under this section during two annual periods, the first of which begins on the tenth day of January and ends after the first day of Februaryon the seventeenth day of January, and the second of which begins on the tenth day of July and ends after the first day of Auguston the seventeenth day of July. If any of those dates fall on a day that is not a business day, then the application period begins on or ends after the next business day, as applicable. The credit shall equal ten per cent of the amount of the person's investment in the fund that the fund invested during the immediately preceding investment period in projects located in Ohio opportunity zones. The person shall include the following information with the person's application: (1) The amount of the person's investment in Ohio qualified opportunity funds, arranged according to the amount invested in each such fund if the person invested in more than one such fund; (2) A statement from an employee or officer of each Ohio qualified opportunity fund identified by the person under division (B)(1) of this section certifying the amount of the person's investment in the fund and the amount of that investment the fund invested in projects located in Ohio opportunity zones during the immediately preceding investment period. The statement shall describe each project funded by the investment and state each project's location and the portion of the person's investment invested in each such project. Unless the fund demonstrates otherwise to the director's satisfaction, the amount of a person's investment that the fund invested in a project located in an Ohio opportunity zone equals the same proportion of the amount of the fund's investment in the project as the person's investment in the fund bears to the total investment by all investors in that fund on the date the fund makes the investment in the project. The director shall review and process applications in the order in which applications are received. (C)(1) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, if the director determines that the applicant qualifies for a credit under this section, the director shall issue, within sixty days after the last day on which an application may be submitted for that application period, a tax credit certificate to the person identified with a unique number and listing the amount of credit the director determines is eligible to be claimed or transferred. (2) The total amount of tax credits issued by the director shall not exceed: (a) Seventy-five million dollars for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2021, and ending June 30, 2023; (b) Fifty fifty million dollars for each of fiscal year 2024; (c) Twenty-five million dollars for each fiscal year thereafteryears 2026 and 2027. The director shall not issue any dollar amount of new tax credits under this section in any fiscal year after fiscal year 2027 unless specifically authorized by an act of the general assembly. If the tax credits issued in the first year of the fiscal biennium are less than the maximum allowed, the excess shall be carried forward to the second year of the fiscal biennium. The director shall not issue certificates to a single applicant in any fiscal biennium in an amount that exceeds two million dollars. The director shall not issue certificates that exceed five million dollars on the basis of the same project located in an Ohio opportunity zone. The director may not issue a certificate under this section on the basis of any investment for which a small business investment certificate has been issued under section 122.86 of the Revised Code. (3) The credit may be claimed by a person under section 5725.38, 5726.61, 5729.21, or 5747.86 of the Revised Code, as applicable. A person that is not subject to taxation under section 5725.18, 5726.02, 5729.03, or 5747.02 of the Revised Code shall not claim the credit but if the person is the applicant to which the certificate was initially issued, the person may transfer the right to claim the credit under division (D) of this section. (D) A taxpayer claiming a credit under this section shall submit a copy of the certificate with the taxpayer's return or report. (E) A person that holds a wholly or partially unclaimed certificate issued under this section may transfer the right to claim all or part of the remaining credit to any other person. To effectuate the transfer, the transferor must notify the tax commissioner, in writing, that the transferor is transferring the right to claim all or part of the remaining credit stated on the certificate. The transferor shall identify in that notification the certificate's number, the name and the tax identification number of the transferee, the amount of remaining credit transferred to the transferee, and, if applicable, the amount of remaining credit retained by the transferor. The transferee may claim the amount of credit received under this division pursuant to and in the manner required under divisions (C)(3) and (D) of this section. Transferring a credit under this division does not extend the taxable year or calendar year for which the credit may be claimed or number of years for which the unclaimed credit amount may be carried forward under section 5725.38, 5726.61, 5729.21, or 5747.86 of the Revised Code, as applicable. Any person to which a credit has been transferred under this division may transfer the right to claim all or part of the transferred credit amount to any other person, in the same manner prescribed by this division for the initial transfer, including that any such transfer be reported by the transferor to the tax commissioner as described in this division. (F) On or before the first day of August each year, the director of development shall submit a report to the governor, the president and minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives on the tax credit program authorized under this section. The report shall include the following information: (1) The number of projects funded by investments for which a tax credit application was submitted under this section during the preceding year, the Ohio opportunity zone in which each such project is located, the number of projects funded by investments for which certificates were allocated during the preceding year, a description of each such project, and the composition of an Ohio qualified opportunity fund's investments in each project funded by investments for which a tax credit application was submitted under this section; (2) The number of persons that invested in an Ohio qualified opportunity fund and applied for a tax credit based on the fund's investment in a project during the preceding year, the name of the fund in which each such investment was made, the number of persons allocated a credit for such investments under this section, and the dollar amount of those credits; (3) A map that shows the location of each Ohio opportunity zone and that indicates which zones include existing or pending projects that are, or will be, funded by tax credit-eligible investments. Sec. 122.85. (A) As used in this section and in sections 5726.55, 5733.59, 5747.66, and 5751.54 of the Revised Code: (1) "Tax credit-eligible production" means a motion picture or broadway theatrical production certified by the director of development under division (B) of this section as qualifying the production a company for a tax credit under section 5726.55, 5733.59, 5747.66, or 5751.54 of the Revised Code. (2) "Certificate owner" means a production qualifying company to which a tax credit certificate is issued. (3) "Production Qualifying company" means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or other form of business association that is registered with the secretary of state and that is producing a motion picture or producing or presenting broadway theatrical production. (4) "Eligible expenditures" means expenditures made after June 30, 2009, for goods or services purchased and consumed in this state by a production qualifying company directly for the production of a tax credit-eligible production, for postproduction activities, or for advertising and promotion of the production. "Eligible expenditures" do not include qualified expenditures for which a production company receives a tax credit under section 122.852 of the Revised Code. "Eligible expenditures" include expenditures for cast and crew wages, accommodations, costs of set construction and operations, editing and related services, photography, sound synchronization, lighting, wardrobe, makeup and accessories, film processing, transfer, sound mixing, special and visual effects, music, location fees, and the purchase or rental of facilities and equipment. (5) "Motion picture" means entertainment content created in whole or in part within this state for distribution or exhibition to the general public, including, but not limited to, feature-length films; documentaries; long-form, specials, miniseries, series, and interstitial television programming; interactive web sites; sound recordings; videos; music videos; interactive television; interactive games; video games; commercials; any format of digital media; and any trailer, pilot, video teaser, or demo created primarily to stimulate the sale, marketing, promotion, or exploitation of future investment in either a product or a motion picture by any means and media in any digital media format, film, or videotape, provided the motion picture qualifies as a motion picture. "Motion picture" does not include any television program created primarily as news, weather, or financial market reports, a production featuring current events or sporting events, an awards show or other gala event, a production whose sole purpose is fundraising, a long-form production that primarily markets a product or service or in-house corporate advertising or other similar productions, a production for purposes of political advocacy, or any production for which records are required to be maintained under 18 U.S.C. 2257 with respect to sexually explicit content. (6) "Broadway theatrical production" means a prebroadway production, long run production, or tour launch that is directed, managed, and performed by a professional cast and crew and that is directly associated with New York city's broadway theater district. (7) "Prebroadway production" means a live stage production that is scheduled for presentation in New York city's broadway theater district after the original or adaptive version is performed in a qualified production facility. (8) "Long run production" means a live stage production that is scheduled to be performed at a qualified production facility for more than five weeks, with an average of at least six performances per week. (9) "Tour launch" means a live stage production for which the activities comprising the technical period are conducted at a qualified production facility before a tour of the original or adaptive version of the production begins. (10) "Qualified production facility" means a facility located in this state that is used in the development or presentation to the public of theater productions. (11) "Investment intent letter" means a letter that satisfies all of the following: (a) Is executed on official letterhead of the qualifying company, investor, or investment entity; (b) Clearly states the amount of investment being committed; (c) Specifies the date on which the investment is to be made available; (d) Identifies the motion picture or broadway theatrical production to which the funds are allocated. (B) For the purpose of encouraging and developing strong film and theater industries in this state, the director of development may certify a motion picture or broadway theatrical production produced by a production qualifying company as a tax credit-eligible production. In the case of a television series, the director may certify the production of each episode of the series as a separate tax credit-eligible production. A production qualifying company shall apply for certification of a motion picture or broadway theatrical production as a tax credit-eligible production on a form and in the manner prescribed by the director. Each application shall include the following information: (1) The name and telephone number of the production qualifying company; (2) The name and telephone number of the company's contact person; (3) A list of the first preproduction date through the last production and postproduction dates in Ohio and, in the case of a broadway theatrical production, a list of each scheduled performance in a qualified production facility; (4) The Ohio production office or qualified production facility address and telephone number; (5) The total production budget; (6) The total budgeted eligible expenditures and the percentage that amount is of the total production budget of the motion picture or broadway theatrical production; (7) In the case of a motion picture, the total percentage of the production being shot in Ohio; (8) The level of employment of cast and crew who reside in Ohio; (9) A synopsis of the script; (10) In the case of a motion picture, the shooting script; (11) A creative elements list that includes the names of the principal cast and crew and the producer and director; (12) Documentation of financial ability to undertake and complete the motion picture or broadway theatrical production, including documentation that shows that the company has secured funding equal to at least fifty per cent of the total production budget, which may be in the form of an investment intent letter; (13) Estimated value of the tax credit based upon total budgeted eligible expenditures; (14) Estimated amount of state and local taxes to be generated in this state from the production; (15) Estimated economic impact of the production in this state; (16) Any other information considered necessary by the director. Within ninety days after certification of a motion picture or broadway theatrical production as a tax credit-eligible production, and any time thereafter upon the request of the director, the production qualifying company shall present to the director sufficient evidence of reviewable progress. If the production company fails to present sufficient evidence, the director may rescind the certification. If the production of a motion picture or broadway theatrical production does not begin within ninety days after the date it is certified as a tax credit-eligible production, the director shall rescind the certification unless the director finds that the production company shows good cause for the delay, meaning that the production was delayed due to unforeseeable circumstances beyond the production company's control or due to action or inaction by a government agency. Upon rescission, the director shall notify the applicant that the certification has been rescinded. Nothing in this section prohibits an applicant whose tax credit-eligible production certification has been rescinded from submitting a subsequent application for certification. (C)(1) A production qualifying company whose motion picture or broadway theatrical production has been certified as a tax credit-eligible production may apply to the director of development on or after July 1, 2009, for a refundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5726.02, 5733.06, 5747.02, or 5751.02 of the Revised Code. The director in consultation with the tax commissioner shall prescribe the form and manner of the application and the information or documentation required to be submitted with the application. The credit is determined as follows: (a) If the total budgeted eligible expenditures stated in the application submitted under division (B) of this section or the actual eligible expenditures as finally determined under division (D) of this section, whichever is least, is less than or equal to three hundred thousand dollars, no credit is allowed; (b) If the total budgeted eligible expenditures stated in the application submitted under division (B) of this section or the actual eligible expenditures as finally determined under division (D) of this section, whichever is least, is greater than three hundred thousand dollars, the credit equals thirty per cent of the least of such budgeted or actual eligible expenditure amounts. (2) Except as provided in division (C)(4) of this section, if the director of development approves a production qualifying company's application for a credit, the director shall issue a tax credit certificate to the company. The director in consultation with the tax commissioner shall prescribe the form and manner of issuing certificates. The director shall assign a unique identifying number to each tax credit certificate and shall record the certificate in a register devised and maintained by the director for that purpose. The certificate shall state the amount of the eligible expenditures on which the credit is based and the amount of the credit. Upon the issuance of a certificate, the director shall certify to the tax commissioner the name of the production qualifying company to which the certificate was issued, the amount of eligible expenditures shown on the certificate, the amount of the credit, and any other information required by the rules adopted to administer this section. (3) The amount of eligible expenditures for which a tax credit may be claimed is subject to inspection and examination by the tax commissioner or employees of the commissioner under section 5703.19 of the Revised Code and any other applicable law. Once the eligible expenditures are finally determined under section 5703.19 of the Revised Code and division (D) of this section, the credit amount is not subject to adjustment unless the director determines an error was committed in the computation of the credit amount. (4) No tax credit certificate may be issued before the completion of the tax credit-eligible production. The amount of tax credit allowed per fiscal year, through fiscal year 2027, shall not exceed the sum of (a) fifty million dollars, (b) the difference between the maximum credit amount for that fiscal year under section 122.852 of the Revised Code and the amount the director of development elects to allow under this section pursuant to division (D)(1) of section 122.852 of the Revised Code, and (c) the difference between the maximum amount of credits that could have been awarded in the previous fiscal year under this section and the amount actually awarded. Out of that sum, five million dollars shall be reserved for broadway theatrical productions, and the balance may be allowed for any tax credit-eligible production. For any fiscal year in which less than five million dollars of tax credits are allowed for broadway theatrical productions, the amount of the five million dollars not allowed and added to the maximum annual amount for the following fiscal year shall be reserved for broadway theatrical productions in the following fiscal year. No amount of tax credit shall be allowed under this section after fiscal year 2027 unless specifically authorized by an act of the general assembly. (5) The director shall review and approve applications for tax credits in two rounds each fiscal year. The first round of credits shall be awarded not later than the last day of July of the fiscal year, and the second round of credits shall be awarded not later than the last day of the ensuing January. The amount of credits awarded in the first round of applications each fiscal year shall not exceed one-half of the maximum allowance for the fiscal year calculated under division (C)(4) of this section, two million five hundred thousand dollars of which shall be reserved for broadway theatrical productions. For each round, the director shall rank applications on the basis of the extent of positive economic impact each tax credit-eligible production is likely to have in this state and the effect on developing a permanent workforce in motion picture or theatrical production industries in the state. For the purpose of such ranking, the on a rolling basis. The director shall give priority to tax-credit eligible productions that are television series or miniseries due to the long-term commitment typically associated with such productions.The economic impact ranking shall be based on the production company's total expenditures in this state directly associated with the tax credit-eligible production. The effect on developing a permanent workforce in the motion picture or theatrical production industries shall be evaluated first by the number of new jobs created and second by amount of payroll added with respect to employees in this state. The director shall approve productions in the order of their ranking, from those with the greatest positive economic impact and workforce development effect to those with the least positive economic impact and workforce development effect. (D) A production qualifying company whose motion picture or broadway theatrical production has been certified as a tax credit-eligible production shall engage, at the company's expense, an independent certified public accountant to examine the company's production, postproduction, and advertising and promotion expenditures to identify the expenditures that qualify as eligible expenditures. The certified public accountant shall issue a report to the company and to the director of development certifying the company's eligible expenditures and any other information required by the director. Upon receiving and examining the report, the director may disallow any expenditure the director determines is not an eligible expenditure. If the director disallows an expenditure, the director shall issue a written notice to the production company stating that the expenditure is disallowed and the reason for the disallowance. Upon examination of the report and disallowance of any expenditures, the director shall determine finally the lesser of the total budgeted eligible expenditures stated in the application submitted under division (B) of this section or the actual eligible expenditures for the purpose of computing the amount of the credit. (E) No credit shall be allowed under section 5726.55, 5733.59, 5747.66, or 5751.54 of the Revised Code unless the director has reviewed the report and made the determination prescribed by division (D) of this section. (F) This state reserves the right to refuse the use of this state's name in the credits of any tax credit-eligible motion picture production or program of any broadway theatrical production. (G)(1) The director of development in consultation with the tax commissioner shall adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules setting forth and governing the criteria for determining whether a motion picture or broadway theatrical production is a tax credit-eligible production; activities that constitute the production or postproduction of a motion picture or broadway theatrical production; reporting sufficient evidence of reviewable progress; expenditures that qualify as eligible expenditures; a schedule and deadlines for applications to be submitted and reviewed; a competitive process for approving credits based on likely economic impact in this state and development of a permanent workforce in motion picture or theatrical production industries in this state; consideration of geographic distribution of credits; and implementation of the program described in division (H) of this section. The rules shall be adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (2) To cover the administrative costs of the program, the director shall require each applicant to pay an application fee equal to the lesser of ten thousand dollars or one per cent of the estimated value of the tax credit as stated in the application. The fees collected shall be credited to the tax incentives operating fund created in section 122.174 of the Revised Code. All grants, gifts, fees, and contributions made to the director for marketing and promotion of the motion picture industry within this state shall also be credited to the fund. (H) The director of development shall establish a program for the training of Ohio residents who are or wish to be employed in the film or multimedia industry. Under the program, the director shall: (1) Certify individuals as film and multimedia trainees. In order to receive such a certification, an individual must be an Ohio resident, have participated in relevant on-the-job training or have completed a relevant training course approved by the director, and have met any other requirements established by the director. (2) Accept applications from production qualifying companies that intend to hire and provide on-the-job training to one or more certified film and multimedia trainees who will be employed in the company's tax credit-eligible production; (3) Upon completion of a tax-credit eligible production, and upon the receipt of any salary information and other documentation required by the director, authorize a reimbursement payment to each production qualifying company whose application was approved under division (H)(2) of this section. The payment shall equal fifty per cent of the salaries paid to film and multimedia trainees employed in the production. Sec. 122.86. (A) As used in this section and section 5747.81 of the Revised Code: (1) "Small business enterprise" means a corporation, pass-through entity, or other person satisfying all of the following: (a) At the time of a qualifying investment, the enterprise meets all of the following requirements: (i) Has no outstanding tax or other liabilities owed to the state; (ii) Is in good standing with the secretary of state, if the enterprise is required to be registered with the secretary; (iii) Is current with any court-ordered payments; (iv) Is not engaged in any illegal activity. (b) At the time of a qualifying investment, the enterprise's assets according to generally accepted accounting principles do not exceed fifty million dollars, or its annual sales do not exceed ten million dollars. When making this determination, the assets and annual sales of all of the enterprise's related or affiliated entities shall be included in the calculation. (c) At the time of a qualifying investment and for the two-year period immediately preceding the qualifying investment, the enterprise employs at least fifty full-time equivalent employees in this state for whom the enterprise is required to withhold income tax under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code, or more than one-half the enterprise's total number of full-time equivalent employees employed anywhere in the United States are employed in this state and are subject to that withholding requirement. (d) The enterprise, within six months after an eligible investor's qualifying investment is made, incurs cost for one or more of the following: (i) Tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles operated on public roads and highways, used in business and physically located in this state from the time of its acquisition by the enterprise until the end of the investor's holding period, including the installation of such tangible personal property; (ii) Motor vehicles operated on public roads and highways if, from the time of acquisition by the enterprise until the end of the investor's holding period, the motor vehicles are purchased in this state, registered in this state under Chapter 4503. of the Revised Code, are used primarily for business purposes, and are necessary for the operation of the enterprise's business; (iii) Real property located in this state that is used in the business from the time of its acquisition by the enterprise until the end of the holding period; (iv) Leasehold improvements and construction costs for property located in this state that is used in the business from the time its improvement or construction was completed until the end of the holding period; (v) Compensation for new employees of the enterprise hired after the date the qualifying investment is made for whom the enterprise is required to withhold income tax under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code. (2) "Qualifying investment" means an investment of money made on or after July 1, 2019, to acquire capital stock or other equity interest in a small business enterprise. "Qualifying investment" does not include either of the following: (a) Any investment of money an eligible investor derives, directly or indirectly, from a grant or loan from the federal government or the state or a political subdivision, including the third frontier program under Chapter 184. of the Revised Code; (b) Any investment of money which is the basis of a tax credit granted under any other section of the Revised Code. (3) "Eligible investor" means an individual, estate, or trust subject to the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, or a pass-through entity in which such an individual, estate, or trust holds a direct or indirect ownership or other equity interest. To qualify as an eligible investor, the individual, estate, trust, or pass-through entity shall not owe any outstanding tax or other liability to the state at the time of a qualifying investment. (4) "Holding period" means the two-year period beginning on the day a qualifying investment is made. (5) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (B) An eligible investor that makes a qualifying investment in a small business enterprise on or after July 1, 2019, but on or before November 3, 2025, may apply to the director of development services to obtain an allocation for a small business investment certificate from the director. Alternatively, a small business enterprise may apply on behalf of eligible investors to obtain the allocation for those investors. The application must be submitted to the director within sixty days after the date of the qualifying investment, but within the same biennium as the qualifying investment. The director, in consultation with the tax commissioner, shall prescribe the form or manner in which an applicant shall apply for the certificate, devise the form of the certificate, and prescribe any records or other information an applicant shall furnish with the application to evidence the qualifying investment. The applicant shall pay an application fee equal to the greater of one-tenth of one per cent of the amount of the intended investment or one hundred dollars. The director of development services may reserve small business investment allocations to qualifying applicants in the order in which the director receives applications. An application is completed when the director has validated that an eligible investor has made a qualified investment and receives all required documentation needed to demonstrate the small business enterprise satisfies the requirements of division (A)(1) of this section. To qualify for an allocation, an eligible investor must satisfy both of the following, subject to the limitation on the amount of qualifying investments for which allocations may be issued under division (C) of this section: (1) The eligible investor makes a qualifying investment on or after July 1, 2019, but on or before November 3, 2025. (2) The eligible investor pledges not to sell or otherwise dispose of the qualifying investment before the conclusion of the applicable holding period. (C)(1) The amount of any eligible investor's qualifying investments for which small business investment allocations may be issued for a fiscal biennium shall not exceed ten million dollars. (2) The director of development services shall not issue a small business investment allocation to an eligible investor representing an amount of qualifying investment in excess of the amount of the investment indicated on the investor's application. (3) For any fiscal biennium beginning before July 1, 2019, the director of development services shall not issue small business investment allocations in a total amount that would cause the tax credits claimed in that biennium to exceed one hundred million dollars. For any fiscal biennium beginning on or after July 1, 2019, the director shall not issue small business investment allocations in a total amount that would cause the tax credits claimed in that biennium to exceed fifty million dollars. (4) The director of development services may issue a small business investment allocation only if both of the following apply at the time of issuance: (a) The small business enterprise meets all the requirements listed in divisions (A)(1)(a)(i) to (iv) of this section; (b) The eligible investor does not owe any outstanding tax or other liability to the state. (5) The director shall not issue a small business investment allocation on the basis of any investment for which an Ohio opportunity zone investment certificate has been issued under section 122.84 of the Revised Code. (D) Before the end of the applicable holding period of a qualifying investment, each enterprise in which a qualifying investment was made for which a small business investment allocation has been issued, upon the request of the director of development services, shall provide to the director records or other evidence satisfactory to the director that the enterprise is a small business enterprise for the purposes of this section. Each enterprise shall also provide annually to the director records or evidence regarding the number of jobs created or retained in the state. The director shall compile and maintain a register of small business enterprises qualifying under this section and shall certify the register to the tax commissioner. The director shall also compile and maintain a record of the number of jobs created or retained as a result of qualifying investments made pursuant to this section. (E) After the conclusion of the applicable holding period for a qualifying investment, a person to whom a small business investment allocation has been issued under this section shall receive a small business investment certification, which entitles the person to claim a credit as provided under section 5747.81 of the Revised Code. However, no certificate may be issued if the director finds that any requirement under this section is not met. (F) The director of development services, in consultation with the tax commissioner, may adopt rules for the administration of this section, including rules governing the following: (1) Documents, records, or other information eligible investors shall provide to the director; (2) Any information a small business enterprise shall provide for the purposes of this section and section 5747.81 of the Revised Code; (3) Determination of the number of full-time equivalent employees of a small business enterprise; (4) Verification of a small business enterprise's investment; (5) Circumstances under which small business enterprises or eligible investors may be subverting the purposes of this section and section 5747.81 of the Revised Code. (G) Application fees paid under division (B) of this section shall be credited to the tax incentives operating fund created in section 122.174 of the Revised Code. Sec. 122.97. (A) The director of development may allocate the state ceiling on the aggregate amount of private activity bonds issued in this state as provided in 26 U.S.C. 146. The allocation shall be made pursuant to rules the director adopts in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that do all of the following: (1) Provide a formula for allocating the state ceiling, as authorized under 26 U.S.C. 146(e); (2) Authorize procedures to administer those allocations; (3) Impose fees on persons to which such allocations are issued; (4) Establish any other requirements, processes, or procedures to administer the state ceiling. (B) The development volume cap fund is created in the custody of the treasurer of state, but is not part of the state treasury. The fund shall consist of all fees paid by issuers receiving state ceiling allocations. Funds may be used to pay the department of development's costs in administering ceiling allocations. The treasurer of state shall disburse money from the fund on order of the director of development. All interest and investment income earned by the fund shall be deposited into the fund. Sec. 122.98. (A) The general assembly finds that access to affordable housing in rural areas is an important part of fostering a robust and lasting population. Accordingly, it is declared to be the public policy of the state to increase the availability of single-family homes in the rural areas through the residential development revolving loan program, administered by the department of development. (B) An eligible borrower for a residential development loan is a county, or a township or municipal corporation that is fully or partially located in a county, that meets both of the following: (1) Has a population of not more than seventy-five thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census published by the United States census bureau; (2) The number of privately owned housing units authorized by building permit in the preceding calendar year, according to the most recent data provided by the United States census bureau, is less than the average number of private housing units authorized by building permit for counties in this state over the same period. (C) An eligible borrower shall use the proceeds of a residential development loan exclusively to develop, repair, or upgrade water, sewer, transportation, electric, or gas infrastructure needed for the construction of single-family, residential dwellings that are part of a residential development project. An eligible borrower shall not use any portion of the proceeds for routine infrastructure maintenance or for developments, repairs, or upgrades that exceed the projected requirements of the residential development project. (D) The department shall not approve an application for a residential development loan unless the eligible borrower demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the department, that the residential development project served by the infrastructure developments, repairs, or upgrades meets all of the following: (1) Is fully located in a county that meets the criteria prescribed by divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section; (2) Has a net density of at least four single-family, residential dwellings per acre; (3) Is zoned exclusively for single-family, residential use; (4) Does not currently, and will not upon its completion, include a qualified low-income building that receives a tax credit under 26 U.S.C. 42. (E) An eligible borrower shall, at minimum, include all of the following in the loan application: (1) A description of the infrastructure developments, repairs, or upgrades to be funded by the loan and an estimate of the total cost to complete those developments, repairs, or upgrades; (2) The loan amount requested by the eligible borrower, which shall not exceed either of the following amounts: (a) Fifty per cent of the total cost of the infrastructure developments, repairs, or upgrades; (b) Thirty thousand dollars per single-family, residential dwelling included in the residential development project served by the developments, repairs or upgrades. (3) Documentation sufficient to prove, to the satisfaction of the department, all of the following: (a) That the applicant is an eligible borrower under division (B) of this section; (b) That the infrastructure developments, repairs, or upgrades meet the requirements under division (C) of this section; (c) That the residential development project served by those developments, repairs, or upgrades meets the requirements under division (D) of this section. (4) The proposed or recorded plot of the subdivision that is the basis of the development project. (5) Certification that the eligible borrower agrees to comply with all provisions of this section. (F) The department shall accept applications and make low-interest loans under this section on a rolling basis whenever funding is available. The department shall begin accepting applications for the first round of loans not later than January 1, 2026. (G) The department shall not establish or levy any fees on loan applicants or recipients. (H) An eligible borrower that receives a loan under this section shall do all of the following: (1) Exempt the residential development project served by the infrastructure developments, repairs, or upgrades, from both of the following: (a) Any building or road standards of the eligible borrower that are more stringent than those prescribed by state law; (b) Ordinances, resolutions, rules, or restrictions of the eligible borrower concerning any of the following: (i) Minimum square footage for residential dwellings; (ii) Off-street parking; (iii) The existence, size, or placement of a garage. (2) Complete any required traffic reviews or studies for the residential development project within forty-five days after receiving the loan; (3) Provide a quarterly report to the director on the status of the work funded by the loan; (4) Repay the principal and interest of the loan in accordance with terms specified by the department. (I) The director shall develop and utilize scoring metrics in prioritizing applications, determining whether to approve low-interest loans, and determining the amount of such loans. The metrics must meet all of the following requirements: (1) Give higher priority to projects in locations with greater housing need and lack of private housing investment; (2) Consider the potential economic impact of the project and the regional distributive balance of the loans; (3) Not consider whether the project is located in an economically distressed area, including by weighting preference based on the poverty rate in the jurisdiction or census tract in which the project is located. (J) The interest rate for loans made under the program shall be the effective federal funds rate in effect at the time of the loan agreement. The department shall credit all principal, interest, and fees paid under this section by an eligible borrower to the residential development revolving loan fund created under section 122.981 of the Revised Code. Sec. 122.981. There is hereby created in the state treasury the residential development revolving loan fund. The fund shall consist of appropriations by the general assembly, money received as repayment for loans under section 122.98 of the Revised Code, fees collected in accordance with that section, and any other money transferred to the fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The department of development shall use money in the fund exclusively to make low-interest loans under section 122.98 of the Revised Code and to offset the expenditures incurred by the department in administering that section. The aggregate amount of money used to offset the department's expenditures in any fiscal year shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars. Sec. 123.10. (A) As used in this section and section 123.11 of the Revised Code, "public exigency" means an injury or obstruction that occurs in any public works of the state and that materially impairs its immediate use or places in jeopardy property adjacent to it; an immediate danger of such an injury or obstruction; or an injury or obstruction, or an immediate danger of an injury or obstruction, that occurs in any public works of the state and that materially impairs its immediate use or places in jeopardy property adjacent to it. (B) When a declaration of public exigency is issued pursuant to division (C) of this section, the Ohio facilities construction commission, or the requesting director of the state agency, state institution of higher education as defined in division (A)(1) of section 3345.12 of the Revised Code, or other state instrumentality, as determined by the executive director of the commission, shall enter into contracts with proper persons for the performance of labor, the furnishing of materials, or the construction of any structures and buildings necessary to the maintenance, control, and management of the public works of the state or any part of those public works. Any contracts awarded for the work performed pursuant to the declaration of a public exigency may be awarded without competitive bidding or selection as set forth in Chapter 153. of the Revised Code. (C) The executive director of the Ohio facilities construction commission may issue a declaration of a public exigency on the executive director's own initiative or upon the request of the director of any state agency, a state institution of higher education as defined in division (A)(1) of section 3345.12 of the Revised Code, or any other state instrumentality. The executive director's declaration shall identify the specific injury, obstruction, or danger that is the subject of the declaration and shall set forth a dollar limitation for the repair, removal, or prevention of that exigency under the declaration. Before any project to repair, remove, or prevent a public exigency under the executive director's declaration may begin, the executive director shall send notice of the project, in writing, to the director of budget and management and to the members of the controlling board. That notice shall detail the project to be undertaken to address the public exigency and shall include a copy of the executive director's declaration that establishes the monetary limitations on that project. Sec. 123.14. (A) Every two years, the department of administrative services shall conduct a comprehensive study and issue a report on all real property owned or leased by the state or a state agency. The director of administrative services shall deliver the report to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the governor not later than the thirty-first day of January of every odd-numbered year. The study shall include all of the following: (1) A complete list of all the real property owned by the state or a state agency. The list shall be organized by who owns the real property, which shall include information regarding the nature of the real property, such as whether the real property includes structures, whether any structure is office space, the value of the real property, the cost of maintaining the real property, and what percentage of the real property is used or unused by the state or state agency. (2) A complete list of all the real property that the state or a state agency rents or leases, but does not own, and the cost of renting or leasing; (3) Which state agencies use the real property, whether owned or leased, and the square footage that is used, versus not used, organized by state agency; (4) How much of the real property identified in division (A)(3) of this section would be used if all employees of that agency worked in person, rather than remote. (B) As used in this section, "state agency" means every organized body, office, or agency established by the laws of the state for the exercise of any function of state government, including the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code, but not including the courts or any judicial agency, any state-assisted institution of higher education, or any local agency. Sec. 123.28. As used in this section and in section sections 123.281 to 123.283, except as otherwise provided in those sections, of the Revised Code: (A) "Culture" means any of the following: (1) Visual, musical, dramatic, graphic, design, and other arts, including, but not limited to, architecture, dance, literature, motion pictures, music, painting, photography, sculpture, and theater, and the provision of training or education in these arts; (2) The presentation or making available, in museums or other indoor or outdoor facilities, of principles of science and their development, use, or application in business, industry, or commerce or of the history, heritage, development, presentation, and uses of the arts described in division (A)(1) of this section and of transportation; (3) The preservation, presentation, or making available of features of archaeological, architectural, environmental, or historical interest or significance in a state historical facility or a local historical facility. (B) "Cultural organization" means either of the following: (1) A governmental agency or Ohio nonprofit corporation, including the Ohio history connection, that provides programs or activities in areas directly concerned with culture; (2) A regional arts and cultural district as defined in section 3381.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Cultural project" means all or any portion of an Ohio cultural facility for which the general assembly has made an appropriation or has specifically authorized the spending of money or the making of rental payments relating to the financing of construction. (D) "Cooperative use agreement" means a contract between the Ohio facilities construction commission and a cultural organization providing the terms and conditions of the cooperative use of an Ohio cultural facility. (E) "Costs of operation" means amounts required to manage an Ohio cultural facility that are incurred following the completion of construction of its cultural project, provided that both of the following apply: (1) Those amounts either: (a) Have been committed to a fund dedicated to that purpose; (b) Equal the principal of any endowment fund, the income from which is dedicated to that purpose. (2) The commission and the cultural organization have executed an agreement with respect to either of those funds. (F) "Governmental agency" means a state agency, a state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.12 of the Revised Code, a municipal corporation, county, township, or school district, a port authority created under Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code, any other political subdivision or special district in this state established by or pursuant to law, or any combination of these entities; except where otherwise indicated, the United States or any department, division, or agency of the United States, or any agency, commission, or authority established pursuant to an interstate compact or agreement. (G) "Local contributions" means the value of an asset provided by or on behalf of a cultural organization from sources other than the state, the value and nature of which shall be approved by the Ohio facilities construction commission, in its sole discretion. "Local contributions" may include the value of the site where a cultural project is to be constructed. All "local contributions," except a contribution attributable to such a site, shall be for the costs of construction of a cultural project or the creation or expansion of an endowment for the costs of operation of a cultural facility. (H) "Local historical facility" means a site or facility, other than a state historical facility, of archaeological, architectural, environmental, or historical interest or significance, or a facility, including a storage facility, appurtenant to the operations of such a site or facility, that is owned by a cultural organization and is used for or in connection with cultural activities, including the presentation or making available of culture to the public. (I) "Manage," "operate," or "management" means the provision of, or the exercise of control over the provision of, activities: (1) Relating to culture for an Ohio cultural facility, including as applicable, but not limited to, providing for displays, exhibitions, specimens, and models; booking of artists, performances, or presentations; scheduling; and hiring or contracting for directors, curators, technical and scientific staff, ushers, stage managers, and others directly related to the cultural activities in the facility; but not including general building services; (2) Relating to sports and athletic events for an Ohio sports facility, including as applicable, but not limited to, providing for booking of athletes, teams, and events; scheduling; and hiring or contracting for staff, ushers, managers, and others directly related to the sports and athletic events in the facility; but not including general building services. (J) "Ohio cultural facility" means any of the following: (1) The theaters located in the state office tower at 77 South High street in Columbus; (2) Any cultural facility in this state that is managed directly by, or is subject to a cooperative use or management agreement with, the Ohio facilities construction commission. (3) A state historical facility or a local historical facility. (K) "Construction" includes acquisition, including acquisition by lease-purchase, demolition, reconstruction, alteration, renovation, remodeling, enlargement, improvement, site improvements, and related equipping and furnishing. (L) "State historical facility" means a site or facility that has all of the following characteristics: (1) It is created, supervised, operated, protected, maintained, and promoted by the Ohio history connection pursuant to the Ohio history connection's performance of public functions under sections 149.30 and 149.302 of the Revised Code. (2) Its title must reside wholly or in part with the state, the Ohio history connection, or both the state and the Ohio history connection. (3) It is managed directly by or is subject to a cooperative use or management agreement with the Ohio facilities construction commission and is used for or in connection with cultural activities, including the presentation or making available of culture to the public. (M) "Ohio sports facility" means all or a portion of a stadium, arena, tennis facility, motorsports complex, or other capital facility in this state. A primary purpose of the facility shall be to provide a site or venue for the presentation to the public of motorsports events, professional tennis tournaments, or events of one or more major or minor league professional athletic or sports teams that are associated with the state or with a city or region of the state. The facility shall be, in the case of a motorsports complex, owned by the state or governmental agency, or in all other instances, owned by or located on real property owned by the state or a governmental agency, and includes all parking facilities, walkways, and other auxiliary facilities, equipment, furnishings, and real and personal property and interests and rights therein, that may be appropriate for or used for or in connection with the facility or its operation, for capital costs of which state funds are spent pursuant to this section and section 123.281 of the Revised Code. A facility constructed as an Ohio sports facility may be both an Ohio cultural facility and an Ohio sports facility. (N) "Motorsports" means sporting events in which motor vehicles are driven on a clearly demarcated tracked surface. (O) "Professional sports franchise" means a member of the following professional sports leagues: the national football league, women's national football conference, women's football alliance, women's football league association, national hockey league, professional women's hockey league, major league baseball, women's professional baseball league, major league soccer, national women's soccer league, national basketball association, or the women's national basketball association, or a successor of such an entity. (P) "Major sports facility" means a stadium, arena, complex, or other facility that a governmental agency owns, will own, or has or will have a sufficient ownership interest in, the primary purpose of which is to provide a site or venue for the presentation of home games of a professional sports franchise for a period of at least thirty years after completion of the construction of the stadium, arena, complex, or other facility. (Q) "Transformational major sports facility mixed-use project" means the following, as applicable: (1) A mixed-use project that meets all of the following criteria: (a) Includes the construction of a major sports facility; (b) Integrates some combination of retail, office, hotel, residential, recreation, structured parking, or other similar uses into one or more mixed-use developments; (c) Is expected to generate incremental state tax revenues pursuant to state taxes levied under Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code; (d) Has an initial total estimated construction cost, excluding any site acquisition cost, that is greater than one billion dollars. (2) In addition to the criteria under division (Q)(1) of this section, a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project may include any of the following: (a) Other projects supporting or relating to the major sports facility or the professional sports franchise constructing or using the major sports facility; (b) Any mixed-use project adjacent or otherwise relating to practice facilities for the professional sports franchise; (c) Conference centers, concert, or other entertainment venues and facilities; (d) Retail, food, restaurant, and beverage facilities, whether fixed or mobile; (e) Parks and other public open spaces or facilities; (f) Related on-site infrastructure necessary or desirable for all such elements for the transformational major sports facility mixed-use project. (R) "Transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district" means the geographic area encompassing, and including all of the area within the territorial boundaries of, the land upon which the transformational major sports facility mixed-use project is located, as determined by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the department of taxation, the Ohio facilities construction commission, and any applicable county or municipal offices in accordance with division (H)(5)(e) of section 123.281 of the Revised Code. (S) "Base professional sports franchise state tax revenues" means an amount or calculation either established by the general assembly or equal to all state tax revenues generated pursuant to state taxes levied under Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code that are attributable to the professional sports franchise and its operations at the professional sports franchise's existing facility, and collected by the department of taxation in the calendar year occurring immediately before the calendar year in which the professional sports franchise plays its initial regular season home game in the major sports facility, which shall be increased by three and one-half per cent per year each calendar year for up to sixteen years thereafter. (T) "Total major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues" means the total aggregate state tax revenue generated in the territory of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district pursuant to state taxes levied under Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code beginning in the calendar year in which a performance grant is eligible for disbursement under an appropriation and for sixteen years thereafter. Total major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues also includes the following: (1) State tax revenues attributable to the construction of, and the purchasing of or leasing of materials and items used in the construction of, a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district beginning in the calendar year in which the performance grant is eligible for disbursement under an appropriation; (2) The professional sports franchise and its operations at the major sports facility. (U) "Incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues" means the amount of state tax revenues received by the state determined by subtracting base professional sports franchise state tax revenues, as calculated for a given calendar year including any required three and one-half per cent annual increase, from total major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues for such year. (V) "Total incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues" means the aggregate amount of incremental major sports facility mixed-use district state tax revenues beginning in the calendar year in which a performance grant is eligible for disbursement under an appropriation and for sixteen years thereafter. (W) "Affiliate" means a person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, is under common control with, or acts in concert with, or is a participant in a joint venture, partnership, consortium, or similar business arrangement with, a professional sports franchise or owner. (X) "Owner" means a person that has a controlling ownership interest in a professional sports franchise. (Y) "Person" means one or more individuals, receivers, assignees, trustees in bankruptcy, estates, firms, limited liability companies, partnerships, associations, joint-stock companies, joint ventures, clubs, societies, corporations, and combinations of individuals in any form. Sec. 123.281. (A) The Ohio facilities construction commission shall provide for the construction of a cultural project in conformity with Chapter 153. of the Revised Code, except for construction services provided on behalf of the state by a governmental agency or a cultural organization in accordance with divisions (B) and (C) of this section. (B) In order for a governmental agency or a cultural organization to provide construction services on behalf of the state for a cultural project, other than a state historical facility, for which the general assembly has made an appropriation or specifically authorized the spending of money or the making of rental payments relating to the financing of the construction, the governmental agency or cultural organization shall submit to the Ohio facilities construction commission a cooperative use agreement that includes, but is not limited to, provisions that: (1) Specify how the proposed project will support culture; (2) Specify that the governmental agency or cultural organization has local contributions amounting to not less than fifty per cent of the total state funding for the cultural project; (3) Specify that the funds shall be used only for construction; (4) Identify the facility to be constructed, renovated, remodeled, or improved; (5) Specify that the project scope meets the intent and purpose of the project appropriation and that the project can be completed and ready to support culture without exceeding appropriated funds; (6) Specify that the governmental agency or cultural organization shall hold the Ohio facilities construction commission harmless from all liability for the operation and maintenance costs of the facility; (7) Specify that the agreement or any actions taken under it are not subject to Chapter 123. or 153. of the Revised Code, except for sections 123.20, 123.201, 123.21, 123.28, 123.281, and 153.011 of the Revised Code, and are subject to Chapter 4115. of the Revised Code; and (8) Provide that amendments to the agreement shall require the approval of the Ohio facilities construction commission. (C) In order for a cultural organization to provide construction services on behalf of the state for a state historical facility for which the general assembly has made an appropriation or specifically authorized the spending of money or the making of rental payments relating to the financing of the construction, the cultural organization shall submit to the Ohio facilities construction commission a cooperative use agreement that includes, but is not limited to, provisions that: (1) Specify how the proposed project will support culture; (2) Specify that the funds shall be used only for construction; (3) Specify that not more than three per cent of the funds may be used by the cultural organization to administer the project; (4) Identify the facility to be constructed, renovated, remodeled, or improved; (5) Specify that the project scope meets the intent and purpose of the project appropriation and that the project can be completed and ready to support culture without exceeding appropriated funds; (6) Specify that the cultural organization shall hold the Ohio facilities construction commission harmless from all liability for the operation and maintenance costs of the facility; (7) Specify that the agreement or any actions taken under it are not subject to Chapter 123., 153., or 4115. of the Revised Code, except for sections 123.20, 123.201, 123.21, 123.28, and 123.281 of the Revised Code; and (8) Provide that amendments to the agreement shall require the approval of the Ohio facilities construction commission. (D) For an Ohio sports facility that is financed in part by obligations issued under Chapter 154. of the Revised Code, construction services shall be provided on behalf of the state by or at the direction of the governmental agency or nonprofit corporation that will own or be responsible for the management of the facility. Any construction services to be provided by a governmental agency or nonprofit corporation shall be specified in a cooperative use agreement between the Ohio facilities construction commission and the governmental agency or nonprofit corporation. The agreement and any actions taken under it are not subject to Chapter 123. or 153. of the Revised Code, except for sections 123.20, 123.201, 123.21, 123.28, 123.281, and 153.011 of the Revised Code, and are subject to Chapter 4115. of the Revised Code. (E) State Except as provided in division (H) of this section and section 123.283 of the Revised Code, state funds shall not be used to pay or reimburse more than fifteen per cent of the initial estimated construction cost of an Ohio sports facility, excluding any site acquisition cost, and no state funds, including any state bond proceeds, shall be spent on any Ohio sports facility under this chapter unless, with respect to that facility, all of the following apply: (1) The Ohio facilities construction commission has received a financial and development plan satisfactory to it, and provision has been made, by agreement or otherwise, satisfactory to the commission, for a contribution amounting to not less than eighty-five per cent of the total estimated construction cost of the facility, excluding any site acquisition cost, from sources other than the state. (2) The general assembly has specifically authorized the spending of money on, or made an appropriation for, the construction of the facility, or for rental payments relating to state financing of all or a portion of the costs of constructing the facility. Authorization to spend money, or an appropriation, for planning or determining the feasibility of or need for the facility does not constitute authorization to spend money on, or an appropriation for, costs of constructing the facility. (3) If state bond proceeds are being used for the Ohio sports facility, the state or a governmental agency owns or has sufficient property interests in the facility or in the site of the facility or in the portion or portions of the facility financed from proceeds of state bonds, which may include, but is not limited to, the right to use or to require the use of the facility for the presentation of sport and athletic events to the public at the facility. (F) In addition to the requirements of division (E) of this section, no state funds, including any state bond proceeds, shall be spent on any Ohio sports facility that is a motorsports complex, unless, with respect to that facility, both of the following apply: (1) Motorsports events shall be presented at the facility pursuant to a lease entered into with the owner of the facility. The term of the lease shall be for a period of not less than the greater of the useful life of the portion of the facility financed from proceeds of state bonds as determined using the guidelines for maximum maturities as provided under divisions (B) and (C) of section 133.20 of the Revised Code, or the period of time remaining to the date of payment or provision for payment of outstanding state bonds allocable to costs of the facility, all as determined by the director of budget and management and certified by the executive director of the Ohio facilities construction commission and to the treasurer of state. (2) Any motorsports organization that commits to using the facility for an established period of time shall give the political subdivision in which the facility is located not less than six months' advance notice if the organization intends to cease utilizing the facility prior to the expiration of that established period. Such a motorsports organization shall be liable to the state for any state funds used on the construction costs of the facility. (G) In addition to the requirements of division (E) of this section, no state bond proceeds shall be spent on any Ohio sports facility that is a tennis facility, unless the owner or manager of the facility provides contractual commitments from a national or international professional tennis organization in a form acceptable to the Ohio facilities construction commission that assures that one or more sanctioned professional tennis events will be presented at the facility during each year that the bonds remain outstanding. (H) State funds may be used as a performance grant to pay or reimburse up to twenty-five per cent of the initial estimated construction cost for a major sports facility if all of the following criteria are met: (1) The major sports facility upon completion will be a part of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project. (2) The office of budget and management in consultation with the Ohio facilities construction commission has received a financial and development plan that satisfies the requirements of this section, and includes a contribution amounting to not less than seventy-five per cent of the total initial estimated construction cost of the major sports facility, excluding any site acquisition cost, from sources other than the state's performance grant, including a contribution from the professional sports franchise that plans to use the facility, or the owner or an authorized affiliate, of at least fifty per cent of the total estimated construction cost of the major sports facility. (3) The general assembly has specifically authorized, or made an appropriation for, the performance grant to aid in the construction of the major sports facility, provided that the grant's authorization or appropriation does not include planning or determining the feasibility of or need for the major sports facility as a cost of constructing the major sports facility. The performance grant is not subject to the review or authorization of the controlling board, and upon the office of budget and management's receipt of the escrow amount and of a certification of funds or other requisite proof the supplemental reserve amount has been established in accordance with division (H)(4) of this section, is eligible for disbursement in full or in part, for the payment or reimbursement of construction costs for the major sports facility, without regard to the other sources of contribution for the costs of construction of the major sports facility as described in division (H)(2) of this section and not on a pro rata basis. The state shall not incur debt to fund or assist a major sports facility receiving a performance grant under this section. (4)(a) The professional sports franchise planning to use the facility, or the owner or an authorized affiliate, has executed and filed with the office of budget and management an escrow amount equal to eight and one-third per cent of the total amount of the performance grant appropriated for the project, which shall be deposited in an interest-bearing account maintained within the state treasury, nonrefundable disbursements from which shall be as described in division (H)(5) of this section. Whatever remains of the amount in escrow after the sixteen-year period, including any interest earnings thereon, shall be returned to the professional sports franchise, owner, or affiliate upon certification by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the department of taxation, that the total incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues have achieved all required target amounts as described in division (H)(5) of this section. (b) The professional sports franchise planning to use the facility, or the owner or an authorized affiliate, shall establish a supplemental reserve, which may take the form of a line of credit or other commercially reasonable type of certifiable and available liquidity, in an amount equal to the initial escrow account deposit required by division (H)(4)(a) of this section. The supplemental reserve shall be available to be drawn upon in accordance with division (H)(5)(c) of this section. The supplemental reserve shall not be required to be replenished if drawn upon in accordance with division (H)(5) of this section. (5) The professional sports franchise planning to use the facility, or the owner or an authorized affiliate, has entered into an agreement with the office of budget and management that complies with this section and specifies all of the following: (a) The incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues meet target amounts, as determined by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the Ohio facilities construction commission and the department of taxation, the total amount of which collected over a sixteen-year period equals or exceeds the amount of the performance grant appropriated to the project. The target amounts shall be as follows: (i) For the first four full calendar years beginning in the year in which the performance grant is eligible for disbursement under an appropriation, ten per cent of the total appropriated amount; (ii) For the second four-year period, twenty-six per cent of the total appropriated amount; (iii) For the third four-year period, thirty-two per cent of the total appropriated amount; (iv) For the fourth four-year period, thirty-two per cent of the total appropriated amount. (b) Incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues in excess of the target amount shall be credited towards target amounts in future periods. (c) If the incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues do not achieve target amounts at the end of each four-year period as determined by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the department of taxation, the deficit shall be offset by any excess tax revenue credit from previous years under division (H)(5)(b) of this section. If a deficit remains, the office of budget and management shall take a nonrefundable amount of money equal to the remaining deficit amount from the escrow account described under division (H)(4) of this section and deposit it into the general revenue fund. If a deficit still remains, the office of budget and management shall take a nonrefundable amount of money equal to the remaining deficit amount for that period from the supplemental reserve established pursuant to division (H)(4)(b) of this section, to the extent available, and deposit the money into the general revenue fund. Beginning in the ninth calendar year after the performance grant is eligible for disbursement, and once annually thereafter until completion of the sixteenth year, the professional sports franchise, or the owner or an authorized affiliate, may request a determination by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the department of taxation, that the total incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues equals or exceeds the amount of the performance grant appropriated to the project. Once the total incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues equals or exceeds the amount of the performance grant appropriated to the project, whether at the conclusion of a designated four-year period under division (H)(5)(a) of this section or upon an annual request under this division, the professional sports franchise, or the owner or authorized affiliate, shall receive the remainder of the amount in escrow, principal and interest, as provided for under division (H)(4)(a) of this section. (d) If, prior to the expiration of the fourth four-year period described in division (H)(5)(a) of this section, the owner's share of the ownership interest in the professional sports franchise becomes less than a controlling ownership interest, all rights, privileges, responsibilities, and obligations of the owner provided under this section and the agreement with the office of budget and management shall be assigned to, and assumed by, any new owner with a controlling ownership interest. (e) Establishes the metes and bounds of, including all areas within, the proposed transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district, which shall meet all of the following requirements: (i) All territory in the district is contiguous. (ii) The office of budget and management receives a petition, accompanied by a description of the proposed transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district, signed by every record owner of a parcel of real property located in the district and the owner of every business that operates in the district. (iii) A transformational major sports facility mixed-use project will be located on territory of the proposed transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district. (iv) Not more than one major sports facility mixed-use project may be located within a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district. (v) For purposes of determining total incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues, the district's territorial boundary may not be enlarged after it is established with the office of budget and management, which may consult with the department of taxation, the Ohio facilities construction commission, and any applicable county or municipal offices to ensure each requirement in this division is met. (f) Every record owner of a parcel of real property located in the proposed transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district shall be required to comply with, and will cause every person that enters into a lease, license, use, or operating agreement for all or a portion of the building or facilities located in, a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district to be subject to, reporting requirements as may be required by the department of taxation, in consultation with the office of budget and management and the Ohio facilities construction commission as described in division (J) of this section. Such requirement may be evidenced by an instrument that has been duly recorded in the land records of the county. (6)(a) The professional sports franchise planning to use the major sports facility shall not cease playing most of its home games at the major sports facility and begin playing most of its home games at a different facility located anywhere outside of the transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district until the earlier of one of the following dates: (i) The total incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues equals or exceeds the amount of the performance grant appropriated to the transformational major sports facility mixed-use project, inclusive of any amounts drawn from the escrow account or supplemental reserve under division (H)(4) of this section; (ii) Thirty years after the professional sports franchise plays its initial regular season home game at the major sports facility. (b) This division is in addition to, independent of, and operates concurrently with section 9.67 of the Revised Code. (I) Every person who owns real property located in, enters into a lease, license, use, or operating agreement for all or a portion of the building and facilities located in, or purchases or leases materials and items used in construction in the territory of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district is subject to reporting requirements as may be required by the department of taxation, in consultation with the office of budget and management and the Ohio facilities construction commission. Compliance with these requirements may be evidenced by an instrument that is duly recorded with the county recorder. (J) Every person doing business in a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district shall file tax returns and make tax payments pursuant to Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code using an electronic medium in a format prescribed by the department of taxation. Persons that pay salaries and wages to employees in the territory of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district shall register for a separate withholding account and shall remit the wages and salaries withheld from employees for activities performed in the territory of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district separately from all income taxes withheld by such employer. In addition, every person doing business in the territory of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district shall provide all of the following information to the department of taxation: (1) For persons that collect transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district tax revenues pursuant to Chapter 5739. of the Revised Code, tax collections generated from construction or transactions in the territory of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district on the returns filed pursuant to Chapter 5739. of the Revised Code as prescribed by the department of taxation; (2) For persons that generate transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district tax revenues under Chapters 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code, estimated payments for corporate income taxes generated from the transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district and information regarding gross revenues generated from activities in the transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district and gross revenues from all activities in this state; (3) For persons that make payments to an independent contractor attributable to construction or transactions in the territory of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district, information regarding such payments by the thirty-first day of January of each year in a format prescribed by the department of taxation. (4) The department of taxation may disclose taxpayer information regarding transactions, real or personal property, income, or business of any person to the governmental agency that owns, or holds a sufficient ownership interest in, a major sports facility as may be necessary for the administration of the provisions authorized by this section. (K) The department of taxation shall develop forms necessary to implement and administer this section. Sec. 123.282. The Ohio cultural and sports facility performance grant fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of all money remitted by the director of commerce under division (I) of section 169.08 of the Revised Code and amounts appropriated by the general assembly. The money in the fund shall be used as performance grants for Ohio cultural facility, Ohio sports facility, and major sports facility projects in accordance with sections 123.281 and 123.283 of the Revised Code. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 123.283. (A) As used in this section: "Ohio sports facility" means all or a portion of a stadium, arena, tennis facility, motorsports complex, or other capital facility in this state. A primary purpose of the facility shall be to provide a site or venue for the presentation to the public of motorsports events, professional tennis tournaments, or events of one or more major or minor league professional athletic or sports teams that are associated with the state or with a city or region of the state. The facility shall be owned by or located on real property owned by the state or a governmental agency, a nonprofit corporation, or a new community authority as defined in section 349.01 of the Revised Code. "Initial estimated construction or renovation cost" means the initial estimated cost to construct a new Ohio sports facility or Ohio cultural facility, or the initial estimated cost to renovate an existing Ohio sports facility or Ohio cultural facility, not including any site acquisition cost, and not including any other state funds awarded to, or to be spent on, the project, other than state funds awarded under this section. (B) Funds from the Ohio cultural and sports facility performance grant fund created in section 123.282 of the Revised Code may be used to pay or reimburse up to fifteen per cent of the initial estimated construction or renovation cost, if the initial estimated construction or renovation cost is less than five hundred million dollars. State funds may be used to pay or reimburse up to twenty-five per cent of the initial estimated construction or renovation cost if the initial estimated construction or renovation cost is five hundred million dollars or greater. No grant may be of an amount greater than two hundred fifty million dollars. No state funds may be awarded under this section until all of the following conditions are met: (1) In the case of an Ohio sports facility, the initial estimated construction or renovation cost is at least fifty million dollars, or in the case of an Ohio cultural facility, five million dollars. Any performance grants awarded under this section shall only be used for construction or renovation and on such projects that effectuate permanent improvements at the facility. (2) The professional sports franchise, governmental agency, nonprofit corporation, new community authority, or other organization that would operate the facility has applied to the office of budget and management, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the office of budget and management, to receive the funds. The application shall include a financial and development plan, which shall be evaluated by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the Ohio facilities construction commission and the department of taxation, as applicable. The financial and development plan shall identify the facility to be constructed or renovated, and include or demonstrate, with sufficient detail and clarity, all of the following: (a) An executed lease agreement, operating agreement, management agreement, non-relocation agreement, cooperative use agreement, or other similar agreement, or an executed and binding term sheet if no other agreement is available; (b) The length of time remaining on any existing agreement, including any options to extend, or agreed to in any new agreement or binding term sheet, as described in division (B)(2)(a) of this section; (c) Any state tax credit program that has been awarded, applied for, or is anticipated or otherwise expected to be awarded or applied for, and any associated fiscal impact that it will have on the project; (d) Project phases and associated timelines; (e) How the facility will benefit the state, through at least one of the following mechanisms: (i) That the facility will generate increased state tax revenues under Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code, which over a period of time will equal or exceed the amount of the performance grant; (ii) That the facility will bring a positive economic impact to the state, as demonstrated by an objectively verifiable economic impact study provided by an independent third party; (iii) Any other objectively verifiable metric or measurement established by the office of budget and management, and approved by the controlling board, that demonstrates that the facility will positively impact the local community, region, or state; (iv) In case of a cultural facility, that the facility will benefit the public in a meaningful way and support culture in the state, and that the facility can be completed and ready to support culture without exceeding the grant amount, as determined by the office of budget and management and approved by controlling board. (3) If the office of budget and management, in consultation with the Ohio facilities construction commission and the department of taxation, as applicable, is satisfied that the financial and development plan meets the requirements of divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, the office of budget and management may, subject to the availability of appropriated funds and at its discretion, enter into a tentative agreement with the applicant organization, which shall identify the facility to be constructed or renovated, and specify all of the following: (a) In the case of a facility under division (B)(2)(e)(i) of this section, the target amounts of increased state tax revenues the facility shall generate, and the period over which the facility shall generate the increased state tax revenues, which in no case shall exceed thirty years; (b) In the case of a facility under division (B)(2)(e)(ii) or (B)(2)(e)(iii) of this section, any economic impact targets or indicators, or other objectively verifiable metric or measurement targets or indicators; (c) At the discretion of the office of budget and management, the applicant organization may combine one or more of the target or indicator amounts described under divisions (B)(3)(e)(i) and (B)(3)(e)(ii) of this section to measure the organization's performance under the grant; (d) If the increased state tax revenues, economic activity, or other objectively verifiable metric or measurement do not achieve target amounts or indicators, as determined by the office of budget and management in consultation with the department of taxation, as applicable, the the office of budget and management shall take a nonrefundable amount of money equal to the deficit from the escrow account described under division (B)(4) of this section and deposit it into the general revenue fund; (e) In the case of an Ohio sports facility, if a professional sports franchise intends to use the facility, the professional sports franchise shall not cease playing most of its home games at the Ohio sports facility and begin playing most of its home games at a different facility until the earlier of one of the following dates: (i) The total increased state tax revenues or economic activity have achieved target amounts or indicators, including with funds from the escrow amount under division (B)(4) of this section; (ii) Thirty years after the professional sports franchise plays its initial regular season home game at the newly constructed or renovated Ohio sports facility. Division (B)(3)(e) of this section is in addition to, independent of, and operates concurrently with section 9.67 of the Revised Code. (f) In the case of an Ohio cultural facility, that the project scope meets the intent and purpose of this section, and of the development plan as approved by the office of budget and management and the controlling board; (g) In the case of a motorsports complex, that motorsports events shall be presented at the facility for the period described in the agreement entered into under division (B)(3) of this section, and that any motorsports organization that commits to using the facility for an established period of time shall give the office of budget and management not less than six months' advance notice if the organization intends to cease utilizing the facility prior to the expiration of that established period, and that if the motorsports organization does so, the motorsports organization shall be liable to the state for any performance grant funds used on the construction or renovation costs of the facility, which shall include drawing down the remainder of any escrow account established under division (B)(4) of this section; (h) In the case of a tennis facility, that the owner or manager of the facility shall provide contractual commitments from a national or international professional tennis organization in a form acceptable to the office of budget and management and the controlling board, in consultation with the Ohio facilities construction commission, that assures that one or more sanctioned professional tennis events will be presented at the facility during each year of the period described in the agreement entered into under division (B)(3) of this section. Any national or international professional tennis organization that commits to using the facility for an established period of time shall give the owner or manager of the facility and the office of budget and management not less than six months' advance notice if the organization intends to cease utilizing the facility prior to the expiration of that established period, and that if the organization does so, the organization and owner or manager of the facility shall be jointly and severally liable to the state for any performance grant funds used on the construction or renovation costs of the facility, which shall include drawing down the remainder of any escrow account established under division (B)(4) of this section. (i) The applicant organization shall hold the state of Ohio, including the office of budget and management, the Ohio facilities construction commission, the department of taxation, and the controlling board harmless from all liability for the operation and maintenance costs of the facility, and any costs incurred related to the grant application, agreement entered into under division (B)(3) of this section, the escrow deposited under division (B)(4) of this section, or the submission to controlling board for approval. (4) In the case of a facility under division (B)(2)(e)(i), (B)(2)(e)(ii), or (B)(2)(e)(iii) of this section, the professional sports franchise, governmental agency, nonprofit corporation, new community authority, or other organization that would operate the facility, upon reaching the agreement with the office of budget and management under division (B)(3) of this section, has executed and filed with the office of budget and management an escrow amount equal to five per cent of the total amount of the performance grant applied for, which shall be deposited in an interest-bearing account maintained within the state treasury, nonrefundable disbursements from which shall be as described in division (B)(3)(d) of this section. Whatever remains of the amount in escrow after the period described in division (B)(3)(a) of this section, or after a period agreed upon under division (B)(3)(b) or (B)(3)(c) of this section, including any interest earnings thereon, shall be returned to the applicant organization, upon certification by the office of budget and management, in consultation with the department of taxation, as applicable, that all conditions of the agreement are satisfied. The agreement under division (B)(3) of this section may provide for a process and timeline by which the applicant organization may seek a determination that all target amounts and indicators have been achieved or exceeded, then apply for the return of any remaining escrow balance. (5) The agreement under division (B)(3) of this section is submitted to, and approved by, the controlling board. Approval of any such agreement is wholly within the controlling board's discretion, and no such agreement is in any way final or enforceable unless and until the controlling board approves it. As part of its consideration, the controlling board may evaluate all grant application and agreement requirements and materials, as provided for under this section, as well as any other factor, criteria, data, metric, measurement, or information or documents the controlling board determines necessary. (C) Every person who owns real property located in, enters into a lease, license, use, or operating agreement for all or a portion of the building and facilities located in, or purchases or leases materials and items used in construction or renovation in the facility is subject to reporting requirements as may be required by the department of taxation, in consultation with the office of budget and management and the Ohio facilities construction commission, for the purposes of this section. Compliance with these requirements may be evidenced by an instrument that is duly recorded with the county recorder. (D) The office of budget and management, Ohio facilities construction commission, and department of taxation, as applicable, may develop forms necessary to implement and administer this section. Sec. 123.30. (A) As used in this section, "authorized flag" means any of the following: (1) The official state flag as described in section 5.01 of the Revised Code; (2) The United States flag; (3) The POW/MIA flag as described in section 9.50 of the Revised Code; (4) A flag containing the official logo of a state agency, so long as the flag has been approved by the governor or the governor's designee. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, no state agency or any entity that manages the grounds or buildings under the control of a state agency shall display on the grounds or building any flag except for an authorized flag. (C) Division (B) of this section does not apply to the Ohio statehouse or the grounds of the Ohio statehouse. Sec. 124.02. The director of administrative services and the state personnel board of review shall exercise all functions, powers, and duties that formerly , on or before January 1, 1959, were by law actually devolved upon, vested in, and imposed upon the state civil service commission and the offices of commissioners and members and upon their employees, agents, and representatives. Whenever in any law or rule of this state or any political subdivision, "state civil service commission," "commission," "commissioner" or "member," meaning the state civil service commission or the offices of commissioners or members of said commission, is used, such terms shall be construed as referring to the department of administrative services, the director of administrative services, the state personnel board of review, or the members of the state personnel board of review, as this chapter may require. Sec. 124.07. (A) The director of administrative services shall appoint examiners, inspectors, clerks, and other assistants as necessary to carry out sections 124.01 to 124.64 of the Revised Code. The director may designate persons in or out of the service of the state to serve as examiners or assistants under the director's direction. An examiner or assistant shall receive the compensation for each day actually and necessarily spent in the discharge of duties as an examiner or assistant that the director determines; provided that, if the examiner or assistant is in the service of the state or any political subdivision of the state, it shall be a part of the examiner's or assistant's official duties to render those services in connection with an examination without extra compensation. (B) Each state agency shall pay the cost of the services and facilities furnished to it by the department of administrative services that are necessary to provide and maintain payroll services as prescribed in section 125.21 of the Revised Code and state merit standards as prescribed in sections 124.01 to 124.64 of the Revised Code for the agency. If a state-supported college or university or a municipal corporation chooses to use the services and facilities furnished by the department that are necessary to provide and maintain the services and standards so prescribed, the state-supported college or university or municipal corporation shall pay the cost of the services and facilities that the department furnishes to it. The charges against a state agency, a state-supported college or university, or a municipal corporation shall be computed on a reasonable cost basis in accordance with procedures prescribed by the director of budget and management. Any moneys the department receives from a state agency, a state-supported college or university, or a municipal corporation under this division that are in excess of the amount necessary to pay the cost of furnishing the department's services and facilities during any fiscal year shall be either refunded to or credited for the ensuing fiscal year to the state agency, the state-supported college or university, or the municipal corporation. (C) The director of administrative services may enter into an agreement with any county, municipal corporation, or other political subdivision to furnish services and facilities of the department in the administration of a merit program or other functions related to human resources that include, but are not limited to, providing competitive examinations for positions in the classified service. The agreement shall provide that the department shall be reimbursed for the reasonable costs of those services and facilities as determined by the director. (D) All moneys received by the department as reimbursement for a merit program or other human resources services performed and facilities furnished under this section, such as competitive examinations administered, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the human resources services fund, which is hereby created. (E) In counties of the state in which are located cities having municipal civil service commissions, the director of administrative services may designate the municipal civil service commission of the largest city within the county as the director's agent for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 124.01 to 124.64 of the Revised Code, within the county, that the director designates. Each municipal civil service commission designated as an agent of the director shall render to the director, at the end of each month, an itemized statement of the cost incurred by the commission for work done as the agent of the director, and the director, after approving that statement, shall pay the total amount of it to the treasurer of the municipal corporation in the same manner as other expenses of the department of administrative services. (F) The director of administrative services and the examiners, inspectors, clerks, and assistants referred to in this section shall receive, in addition to their salaries, reimbursement for necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the actual discharge of their official duties. The director may also incur the necessary expenses for stationery, printing, and other supplies incident to the business of the department. Sec. 124.135. (A) State employees are entitled to paid leave when summoned for jury duty by a court of competent jurisdiction. (B) State employees are entitled to paid leave when subpoenaed to appear before any court, commission, board, or other legally constituted body authorized by law to compel the attendance of witnesses. This division does not apply if the state employee is a party to the action or proceeding involved or is subpoenaed as a result of secondary employment outside the service of the state. (C) A state employee shall not be required, as a condition of receiving paid leave under divisions (A) or (B) of this section, to remit to the employee's appointing authority or another officer, commission, board, or body any portion of the compensation or reimbursement paid to the employee for serving on a jury or for appearing in court pursuant to a subpoena. (D) Each full-time permanent state employee paid in accordance with section 124.152 of the Revised Code and those employees described in divisions (B)(2) and (4) of section 124.14 of the Revised Code also may be entitled, in their appointing authority's discretion, to paid leave when appointed to serve on advisory boards or commissions or when soliciting for charities for which payroll deductions are made. Sec. 124.1310. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Emergency medical service," "EMT-basic," "EMT-I," "first responder," and "paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Volunteer firefighter" has the same meaning as in section 146.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A state employee who is an EMT-basic, EMT-I, first responder, paramedic, or volunteer firefighter shall receive forty one hundred twenty hours of leave with pay each calendar year to use during those hours when the employee is absent from work in order to provide do either of the following: (1) Provide emergency medical service or fire-fighting service; (2) Attend a training or continuing education program that relates to providing emergency medical service or fire-fighting service. (C) An appointing authority shall compensate an employee who uses leave granted under this section at the employee's regular rate of pay for those regular work hours during which the employee is absent from work. Sec. 124.1312. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (B) Each permanent full-time and permanent part-time employee paid in accordance with section 124.152 of the Revised Code and each employee listed in division (B)(2), (3), or (4) of section 124.14 of the Revised Code who works thirty or more hours per week, and who is a foster caregiver or kinship caregiver is eligible, on placement of a child in the employee's home, to a maximum of five days of caregiver leave with full pay in a calendar year. Caregiver leave eligibility begins on the day on which the child is placed with the prospective foster caregiver or kinship caregiver. (C) The average number of regular hours worked, which shall include all hours of holiday pay and other types of paid leave, during the three-month period immediately preceding the day caregiver leave begins shall be used to determine eligibility for leave under this section for part-time employees. If an employee has not worked for a three-month period, the number of hours for which the employee has been scheduled to work per week during the employee's period of employment shall be used to determine eligibility for leave under this section. (D) Use of caregiver leave does not affect an employee's eligibility for other forms of paid leave granted under this chapter and does not prohibit an employee from taking leave under the "Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993," 29 U.S.C. 2601, except that caregiver leave shall be included in any leave time provided under that act. (E) The director of administrative services may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing caregiver leave established under this section. Sec. 124.152. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, each exempt employee shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of division (B) of this section. (2) Each exempt employee who holds a position in the unclassified civil service pursuant to division (A)(26) or (30) of section 124.11 of the Revised Code may be paid a salary or wage in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of division (B) of this section, as applicable. (B)(1) Each exempt employee who must be paid in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of this section shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with the following schedule of rates as of the pay period that includes July 1, 20212024: Schedule E-1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A Pay Ranges and Step Values B C Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 D Range 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A 1 Hourly 12.14 13.52 12.69 14.13 13.21 14.72 13.80 15.37 B Annually 25251 28122 26395 29390 27476 30618 28704 31970 C 2 Hourly 14.73 16.41 15.36 17.10 16.01 17.83 16.72 18.63 D Annually 30638 34133 31948 35568 33300 37086 34777 38750 E 3 Hourly 15.44 17.20 16.13 17.97 16.84 18.76 17.56 19.56 F Annually 32115 35776 33550 37378 35027 39021 36524 40685 G 4 Hourly 16.20 18.05 16.93 18.86 17.75 19.77 18.51 20.62 H Annually 33696 37544 35214 39229 36920 41122 38500 42890 I 5 Hourly 17.00 18.94 17.78 19.80 18.51 20.62 19.33 21.54 J Annually 35360 39395 36982 41184 38500 42890 40206 44803 K 6 Hourly 17.91 19.95 18.66 20.79 19.47 21.68 20.27 22.59 L Annually 37252 41496 38812 43243 40497 45094 42161 46987 M 7 Hourly 19.01 21.18 19.72 21.97 20.54 22.88 21.25 23.68 22.07 24.58 N Annually 39540 44054 41017 45698 42723 47590 44200 49254 45905 51126 O 8 Hourly 20.11 22.40 21.00 23.39 21.90 24.40 22.89 25.50 23.97 26.70 P Annually 41828 46592 43680 48651 45552 50752 47611 53040 49857 55536 Q 9 Hourly 21.45 23.89 22.56 25.14 23.67 26.37 24.85 27.69 26.11 29.09 R Annually 44616 49691 46924 52291 49233 54850 51688 57595 54308 60507 S 10 Hourly 23.13 25.76 24.41 27.18 25.72 28.64 27.20 30.30 28.64 31.91 T Annually 48110 53581 50772 56534 53497 59571 56576 63024 59571 66373 U 11 Hourly 25.20 28.08 26.66 29.69 28.20 31.42 29.80 33.19 31.49 35.07 V Annually 52416 58406 55452 61755 58656 65354 61984 69035 65499 72946 W 12 Hourly 27.80 30.96 29.36 32.71 30.93 34.46 32.64 36.36 34.46 38.38 36.34 40.48 37.82 42.13 39.60 44.11 X Annually 57824 64397 61068 68037 64334 71677 67891 75629 71676 79830 75587 84198 78665 87630 82368 91749 Y 13 Hourly 30.64 34.14 32.32 36.00 34.09 37.97 35.92 40.02 37.95 42.27 39.99 44.55 41.63 46.38 43.59 48.56 Z Annually 63731 71011 67225 74880 70907 78978 74713 83242 78936 87922 83179 92664 86590 96470 90667 101005 AA 14 Hourly 33.69 37.53 35.61 39.67 37.52 41.80 39.56 44.07 41.80 46.56 44.13 49.15 45.95 51.19 48.10 53.58 AB Annually 70075 78062 74068 82514 78041 86944 82284 91666 86944 96845 91790 102232 95576 106475 100048 111446 AC 15 Hourly 37.02 41.23 39.10 43.55 41.30 46.01 43.57 48.54 45.99 51.23 48.51 54.04 50.50 56.26 52.88 58.91 AD Annually 77001 85758 81328 90584 85904 95701 90625 100963 95659 106558 100900 112403 105040 117021 109990 122533 AE 16 Hourly 40.81 45.45 43.08 47.99 45.45 50.62 48.00 53.47 50.63 56.40 53.53 59.63 55.73 62.08 58.34 64.98 AF Annually 84884 94536 89606 99819 94536 105290 99840 111218 105310 117312 111342 124030 115918 129126 121347 135158 AG 17 Hourly 44.96 50.09 47.44 52.85 50.10 55.81 52.86 58.88 55.83 62.19 58.94 65.66 69.27 AH Annually 93516 104187 98675 109928 104208 116085 109948 122470 116126 129355 122595 136573 144082 AI 18 Hourly 49.55 55.20 52.29 58.25 55.24 61.54 58.28 64.92 61.50 68.51 64.94 72.35 AJ Annually 103064 114816 108763 121160 114899 128003 121222 135034 127920142501 135075 150488 AK 19 Hourly 60.72 64.37 67.69 71.41 75.37 79.58 AL Annually 126298 133890 140795 148533 156770 165526 Schedule E-2 1 2 3 4 A Range Minimum Maximum B 41 Hourly 16.23 48.9954.57 C Annually 33758 101899113506 D 42 Hourly 17.89 54.0960.25 E Annually 37211 112507125320 F 43 Hourly 19.70 59.5666.35 G Annually 40976 123884138008 H 44 Hourly 21.73 65.0872.49 I Annually 45198 135366150779 J 45 Hourly 24.01 71.0579.15 K Annually 49941 147784164632 L 46 Hourly 26.43 77.6586.50 M Annually 54974 161512179920 N 47 Hourly 29.14 84.7594.41 O Annually 60611 176280196373 P 48 Hourly 32.14 92.45102.98 Q Annually 66851 192296214198 R 49 Hourly 35.44 99.83111.20 S Annually 73715 207646231296 (2) Each exempt employee who must be paid in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of this section shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with the following schedule of rates as of the pay period that includes July 1, 20222025: Schedule E-1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A Pay Ranges and Step Values B Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 C Range 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A 1 Hourly 12.50 14.13 13.07 14.77 13.61 15.38 14.21 16.06 B Annually 26000 29390 27185 30722 28308 31990 29556 33405 C 2 Hourly 15.17 17.15 15.82 17.87 16.49 18.63 17.22 19.47 D Annually 31553 35672 32905 37170 34299 38750 35817 40498 E 3 Hourly 15.90 17.97 16.61 18.78 17.35 19.60 18.09 20.44 F Annually 33072 37378 34548 39062 36088 40768 37627 42515 G 4 Hourly 16.69 18.86 17.44 19.71 18.28 20.66 19.07 21.55 H Annually 34715 39229 36275 40997 38022 42973 39665 44824 I 5 Hourly 17.51 19.79 18.31 20.69 19.07 21.55 19.91 22.51 J Annually 36420 41163 38084 43035 39665 44824 41412 46821 K 6 Hourly 18.45 20.85 19.22 21.73 20.05 22.66 20.88 23.61 L Annually 38376 43368 39977 45198 41704 47133 43430 49109 M 7 Hourly 19.58 22.13 20.31 22.96 21.16 23.91 21.89 24.75 22.73 25.69 N Annually 40726 46030 42244 47757 44012 49733 45531 51480 47278 53435 O 8 Hourly 20.71 23.41 21.63 24.44 22.56 25.50 23.58 26.65 24.69 27.90 P Annually 43076 48693 44990 50835 46924 53040 49046 55432 51355 58032 Q 9 Hourly 22.09 24.97 23.24 26.27 24.38 27.56 25.60 28.94 26.89 30.40 R Annually 45947 51938 48339 54642 50710 57325 53248 60195 55931 63232 S 10 Hourly 23.82 26.92 25.14 28.40 26.49 29.93 28.02 31.66 29.50 33.35 T Annually 49545 55994 52291 59072 55099 62254 58281 65853 61360 69368 U 11 Hourly 25.96 29.34 27.46 31.03 29.05 32.83 30.69 34.68 32.43 36.65 V Annually 53996 61027 57116 64542 60424 68286 63835 72134 67454 76232 W 12 Hourly 28.63 32.35 30.24 34.18 31.86 36.01 33.62 38.00 35.49 40.11 37.43 42.30 38.95 44.03 40.79 46.09 X Annually 59550 67288 62889 71094 66268 74901 69929 79040 73819 83429 77854 87984 81016 91582 84843 95867 Y 13 Hourly 31.56 35.68 33.29 37.62 35.11 39.68 37.00 41.82 39.09 44.17 41.19 46.55 42.88 48.47 44.90 50.75 Z Annually 65644 74214 69243 78250 73028 82534 76960 86986 81307 91874 85675 96824 89190 100818 93392 105560 AA 14 Hourly 34.70 39.22 36.68 41.46 38.65 43.68 40.75 46.05 43.05 48.66 45.45 51.36 47.33 53.49 49.54 55.99 AB Annually 72176 81578 76294 86237 80392 90854 84760 95784 89544 101213 94536 106829 98446 111259 103043 116459 AC 15 Hourly 38.13 43.09 40.27 45.51 42.54 48.08 44.88 50.72 47.37 53.54 49.97 56.47 52.02 58.79 54.47 61.56 AD Annually 79310 89627 83761 94661 88483 100006 93350 105498 98529 111363 103937 117458 108201 122283 113297 128045 AE 16 Hourly 42.03 47.50 44.37 50.15 46.81 52.90 49.44 55.88 52.15 58.94 55.14 62.31 57.40 64.87 60.09 67.90 AF Annually 87422 98800 92289 104312 97364 110032 102835 116230 108472 122595 114691 129605 119392 134930 124987 141232 AG 17 Hourly 46.31 52.34 48.86 55.23 51.60 58.32 54.45 61.53 57.50 64.99 60.71 68.61 72.39 AH Annually 96324 108867 101628 114878 107328 121306 113256 127982 119600 135179 126276 142709 150571 AI 18 Hourly 51.04 57.68 53.86 60.87 56.90 64.31 60.03 67.84 63.35 71.59 66.89 75.61 AJ Annually 106163 119974 112028 126610 118352 133765 124862 141107 131768 148907 139131 157269 AK 19 Hourly 63.45 67.27 70.74 74.62 78.76 83.16 AL Annually 131976 139922 147139 155210 163821 172973 Schedule E-2 1 2 3 4 A Range Minimum Maximum B 41 Hourly 16.23 50.4657.03 C Annually 33758 104956118622 D 42 Hourly 17.89 55.7162.96 E Annually 37211 115876130957 F 43 Hourly 19.70 61.3569.34 G Annually 40976 127608144227 H 44 Hourly 21.73 67.0375.75 I Annually 45198 139422157560 J 45 Hourly 24.01 73.1882.71 K Annually 49941 152214172037 L 46 Hourly 26.43 79.9890.39 M Annually 54974 166358188011 N 47 Hourly 29.14 87.2998.66 O Annually 60611 181563205213 P 48 Hourly 32.14 95.22107.61 Q Annually 66851 198057223829 R 49 Hourly 35.44 102.82116.20 S Annually 73715 213865241696 (3) Each exempt employee who must be paid in accordance with schedule E-1 or schedule E-2 of this section shall be paid a salary or wage in accordance with the following schedule of rates as of the pay period that includes July 1, 20232026: Schedule E-1 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 A Pay Ranges and Step Values B Step 1 Step 2 Step 3 Step 4 Step 5 Step 6 Step 7 Step 8 C Range D 1 Hourly 12.88 14.55 13.46 15.21 14.02 15.84 14.64 16.54 E Annually 26790 30264 27996 31637 29161 32947 30451 34403 F 2 Hourly 15.63 17.66 16.29 18.41 16.98 19.19 17.74 20.05 G Annually 32510 36733 33883 38293 35318 39915 36899 41704 H 3 Hourly 16.38 18.51 17.11 19.34 17.87 20.19 18.63 21.05 I Annually 34070 38501 35588 40227 37169 41995 38750 43784 J 4 Hourly 17.19 19.43 17.96 20.30 18.83 21.28 19.64 22.20 K Annually 35755 40414 37356 42224 39166 44262 40851 46176 L 5 Hourly 18.04 20.38 18.86 21.31 19.64 22.20 20.51 23.19 M Annually 37523 42390 39228 44325 40851 46176 42660 48235 N 6 Hourly 19.00 21.48 19.80 22.38 20.65 23.34 21.51 24.32 O Annually 39520 44678 41184 46550 42952 48547 44740 50586 P 7 Hourly 20.17 22.79 20.92 23.65 21.79 24.63 22.55 25.49 23.41 26.46 Q Annually 41953 47403 43513 49192 45323 51230 46904 53019 48692 55037 R 8 Hourly 21.33 24.11 22.28 25.17 23.24 26.27 24.29 27.45 25.43 28.74 S Annually 44366 50149 46342 52354 48339 54642 50523 57096 52894 59779 T 9 Hourly 22.75 25.72 23.94 27.06 25.11 28.39 26.37 29.81 27.70 31.31 U Annually 47320 53498 49795 56285 52228 59051 54849 62005 57616 65125 V 10 Hourly 24.53 27.73 25.89 29.25 27.28 30.83 28.86 32.61 30.39 34.35 W Annually 51022 57678 53851 60840 56742 64126 60028 67829 63211 71448 X 11 Hourly 26.74 30.22 28.28 31.96 29.92 33.81 31.61 35.72 33.40 37.75 Y Annually 55619 62858 58822 66477 62233 70325 65748 74298 69472 78520 Z 12 Hourly 29.49 33.32 31.15 35.21 32.82 37.09 34.63 39.14 36.55 41.31 38.55 43.57 40.12 45.35 42.01 47.47 AA Annually 61339 69306 64792 73237 68265 77147 72030 81411 76024 85925 80184 90626 83449 94328 87380 98738 AB 13 Hourly 32.51 36.75 34.29 38.75 36.16 40.87 38.11 43.07 40.26 45.50 42.43 47.95 44.17 49.92 46.25 52.27 AC Annually 67620 76440 71323 80600 75212 85010 79268 89586 83740 94640 88254 99736 91873 103834 96200 108722 AD 14 Hourly 35.74 40.40 37.78 42.70 39.81 44.99 41.97 47.43 44.34 50.12 46.81 52.90 48.75 55.09 51.03 57.67 AE Annually 74339 84032 78582 88816 82804 93579 87297 98654 92227 104250 97364 110032 101400 114587 106142 119954 AF 15 Hourly 39.27 44.38 41.48 46.88 43.82 49.52 46.23 52.24 48.79 55.15 51.47 58.16 53.58 60.55 56.10 63.41 AG Annually 81681 92310 86278 97510 91145 103002 96158 108659 101483 114712 107057 120973 111446 125944 116688 131893 AH 16 Hourly 43.29 48.93 45.70 51.65 48.21 54.49 50.92 57.56 53.71 60.71 56.79 64.18 59.12 66.82 61.89 69.94 AI Annually 90043 101774 95056 107432 100276 113339 105913 119725 111716 126277 118123 133494 122969 138986 128731 145475 AJ 17 Hourly 47.70 53.91 50.33 56.89 53.15 60.07 56.08 63.38 59.23 66.94 62.53 70.67 65.97 74.56 AK Annually 99216 112133 104686 118331 110552 124946 116646 131830 123198 139235 130062 146994 137217 155085 AL 18 Hourly 52.57 59.41 55.48 62.70 58.61 66.24 61.83 69.88 65.25 73.74 68.90 77.88 AM Annually 109345 123573 115398 130416 121908 137779 128606 145350 135720 153379 143312 161990 AN 19 Hourly 57.83 65.35 61.03 69.29 64.47 72.86 68.01 76.86 71.78 81.12 75.79 85.65 AO Annually 120286 135928 126942 144123 134097 151549 141460 159869 149302 168730 157643 178152 Schedule E-2 1 2 3 4 A Range Minimum Maximum B 41 Hourly 16.23 51.9758.74 C Annually 33758 108097122179 D 42 Hourly 17.89 57.3864.85 E Annually 37211 119350134888 F 43 Hourly 19.70 63.1971.42 G Annually 40976 131435148554 H 44 Hourly 21.73 69.0478.02 I Annually 45198 143603162282 J 45 Hourly 24.01 75.3885.19 K Annually 49941 156790177195 L 46 Hourly 26.43 82.3893.10 M Annually 54974 171350193648 N 47 Hourly 29.14 89.91101.62 O Annually 60611 187012211370 P 48 Hourly 32.14 98.08110.84 Q Annually 66851 204006230547 R 49 Hourly 35.44 105.90119.69 S Annually 73715 220272248955 (C) As used in this section: (1) "Exempt employee" means a permanent full-time or permanent part-time employee paid directly by warrant of the director of budget and management whose position is included in the job classification plan established under division (A) of section 124.14 of the Revised Code but who is not considered a public employee for the purposes of Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. "Exempt employee" also includes a permanent full-time or permanent part-time employee of the secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general who has not been placed in an appropriate bargaining unit by the state employment relations board. (2) "Base rate of pay" means the rate of pay established under schedule E-1 of this section, plus the supplement provided under division (E) of section 124.181 of the Revised Code, plus any supplements enacted into law that are added to schedule E-1 of this section. (D) Notwithstanding any division of this section to the contrary, or division (E) or (G) of section 124.15 of the Revised Code with respect to requirements for step placement and advancement, no exempt employee other than a captain or equivalent officer in the state highway patrol shall be placed in step value 7 in range 17 of schedule E-1 of division (B)(3) (B) of this section. Sec. 124.184. (A) As used in this section: (1) "State agency" means every organized body, office, or agency established by the laws of the state for the exercise of any function of state government. "State agency" does not include any of the following: (a) The public employees retirement system, Ohio police and fire pension fund, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, and state highway patrol retirement system; (b) A state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (c) The nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code. (2) Notwithstanding the definition of "employee" in section 124.01 of the Revised Code, "state employee" means an individual holding a position subject to appointment, removal, promotion, or reduction by a state agency. (B)(1) Not later than October 15, 2025, each state agency shall develop a plan for the agency's state employees to report to the agency's worksite or another location designated by the agency during the time the employees are performing their duties for the agency. (2) Beginning January 1, 2026, a state agency shall require the agency's state employees to report to the agency's worksite or another location in accordance with the plan developed by the agency under division (B)(1) of this section. Except as provided in divisions (C) and (D) of this section, no state employee shall work from the employee's place of residence. (C) Nothing in this section precludes a state agency from permitting a state employee employed by the agency to work from the employee's place of residence as a reasonable accommodation under Title I of the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 42 U.S.C. 12111, et seq. or Chapter 4112. of the Revised Code. (D) A state agency may adopt a policy allowing an appointing authority or the appointing authority's designee to approve a state employee to work from the employee's place of residence or other off-site location under any of the following circumstances: (1) During an occasional or emergent situation as required to complete a necessary or time-sensitive business function of the agency; (2) Rare occasions where a health order or weather emergency requires an individual to remain at the individual's place of residence or to shelter in place; (3) Occasions where the agency's worksite is or may be closed on a temporary or ongoing basis, including remodeling an existing building, natural disaster, utility outage, security threat, or other occurrence that has or will result in such a closure; (4) Except as provided in division (D)(5) of this section, the appointing authority or the appointing authority's designee determines that an employee, due to the employee's job classification or position, primarily performs the employee's duties for the agency in the field or another location designated by the agency that is not the employee's place of residence; (5) Where the appointing authority or the appointing authority's designee determines that an employee is in a computer-related occupation as provided in sections 13(a)(1) and (17) of the "Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938," 29 U.S.C. 213, as defined in 29 C.F.R. 541.400; (6) Where the appointing authority or the appointing authority's designee grants an employee an accommodation for a temporary medical condition not covered under division (C) of this section; (7) Where the appointing authority or the appointing authority's designee determines that an employee's place of residence is forty or more miles from the agency's worksite; (8) Where the appointing authority or the appointing authority's designee determines that the agency does not have adequate space or equipment for an employee at the agency's worksite. (E) Nothing in this section shall interfere with an administrative policy regarding employee work location adopted by the supreme court, which is a separate branch of government established and vested with judicial power under Ohio Constitution, Article IV. Sec. 124.385. (A) An employee is eligible for disability leave benefits under this section if the employee has completed one year of continuous state service immediately prior to the date of the disability and if any of the following applies: (1) The employee is a full-time permanent employee and is eligible for sick leave credit pursuant to division (B) of section 124.382 of the Revised Code or is entitled to disability benefits under a collective bargaining agreement. (2) The employee is a part-time permanent employee who has worked at least fifteen hundred hours within the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of disability and is eligible for sick leave credit under division (B) of section 124.382 of the Revised Code. (3) The employee is a full-time permanent or part-time permanent employee, is on disability leave or leave of absence for medical reasons, and would be eligible for sick leave credit pursuant to division (B) of section 124.382 of the Revised Code except that the employee is in no pay status due to the employee's medical condition. (B) The director of administrative services, by rule adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt a rule to establish a disability leave program. The rule shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (1) Procedures to be followed for determining disability; (2) Provisions for the allowance of disability leave due to illness or injury; (3) Provisions for the continuation of service credit for employees granted disability leave, including service credit towards retirement, as provided by the applicable statute; (4) The establishment of a minimum level of benefit and of a waiting period before benefits begin; (5) Provisions setting a maximum length of benefit and requiring that employees eligible to apply for disability retirement shall do so prior to completing the first six months of their period of disability. The director's rules shall indicate those employees required to apply for disability retirement. If an employee is approved to receive disability retirement, the employee shall receive the retirement benefit and a supplement payment that equals a percentage of the employee's base rate of pay and that, when added to the retirement benefit, equals no more than the percentage of pay received by employees after the first six months of disability. This supplemental payment shall not be considered earnable salary, compensation, or salary, and is not subject to contributions, under Chapter 145., 742., 3307., 3309., or 5505. of the Revised Code. (6) Provisions that allow employees to utilize available sick leave, personal leave, compensatory time, or vacation leave balances to supplement the benefits payable under this section. The balances used to supplement the benefits, plus any amount contributed by the state as provided in division (D) of this section, shall be paid at the employee's base rate of pay in an amount sufficient to give employees up to one hundred per cent of pay for time on disability. (7) Procedures for appealing denial of payment of a claim, including the following: (a) A maximum of thirty days to file an appeal by the employee; (b) A maximum of fifteen days for the parties to select a third-party opinion pursuant to division (F) of this section, unless an extension is agreed to by the parties; (c) A maximum of thirty days for the third party to render an opinion. (8) Provisions for approving leave of absence for medical reasons where an employee is in no pay status because the employee has used all the employee's sick leave, personal leave, vacation leave, and compensatory time; (9) (8) Provisions for precluding the payment of benefits if the injury for which the benefits are sought is covered by a workers' compensation plan; (10) Provisions for precluding the payment of benefits in order to ensure that benefits are provided in a consistent manner. (C) Except as provided in division (B)(6) of this section, time off for an employee granted disability leave is not chargeable to any other leave granted by other sections The adjudication hearing requirements prescribed in Chapter 119. of the Revised Code do not apply to the procedures for appealing denial of payment of a claim that the director adopts by rule under division (B)(7) of this section. (D) While an employee is on an approved disability leave, the employee shall be responsible for paying the employee's share of retirement contributions and the employer's share shall be paid by the state. (E) The approval for disability leave shall be made by the director, upon recommendation by the appointing authority. The director may delegate to any appointing authority the authority to approve disability benefits for a standard recovery period. (F) If a request for disability leave is denied based on a medical determination, the director shall obtain a medical opinion from a third party. The decision of the third party is binding. (G)(F) The rule adopted by the director under division (B) of this section shall not deny disability leave benefits for an illness or injury to an employee who is a veteran of the United States armed forces because the employee contracted the illness or received the injury in the course of or as a result of military service and the illness or injury is or may be covered by a compensation plan administered by the United States department of veterans affairs. Sec. 125.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Order" means a copy of a contract or a statement of the nature of a contemplated expenditure, a description of the property or supplies to be purchased or service to be performed, other than a service performed by officers and regular employees of the state, and per diem of the national guard, and the total sum of the expenditure to be made therefor, if the sum is fixed and ascertained, otherwise the estimated sum thereof, and an authorization to pay for the contemplated expenditure, signed by the person instructed and authorized to pay upon receipt of a proper invoice. (B) "Invoice" means an itemized listing showing delivery of the supplies or performance of the service described in the order including all of the following: (1) The date of the purchase or rendering of the service; (2) An itemization of the things done, material supplied, or labor furnished; (3) The sum due pursuant to the contract or obligation. (C) "Products" means materials, supplies, merchandise, goods, wares, and foodstuffs. (D) "Produced" means the manufacturing, processing, mining, developing, and making of a thing into a new article with a distinct character in use through the application of input, within the state or a state bordering Ohio, of Buy Ohio products, labor, skill, or other services. "Produced" does not include the mere assembling or putting together of products or materials from outside of Ohio or a state bordering Ohio. (E) "Buy Ohio products" means products that are mined, excavated, produced, manufactured, raised, or grown in the state or a state bordering Ohio where the input of Buy Ohio products, labor, skill, or other services constitutes no less than twenty-five per cent of the manufactured cost. With respect to mined products, such products shall be mined or excavated in this state or a state bordering Ohio. "Buy Ohio products" includes any product that includes semiconductors produced by a company with a significant Ohio economic presence. (F) "Purchase" means to buy, rent, lease, lease purchase, or otherwise acquire supplies or services. "Purchase" also includes all functions that pertain to the obtaining of supplies or services, including description of requirements, selection and solicitation of sources, preparation and award of contracts, all phases of contract administration, and receipt and acceptance of the supplies and services and payment for them. (G) "Services" means the furnishing of labor, time, or effort by a person, not involving the delivery of a specific end product other than a report which, if provided, is merely incidental to the required performance. "Services" does not include services furnished pursuant to employment agreements or collective bargaining agreements. (H) "Supplies" means all property, including, but not limited to, equipment, materials, and other tangible assets, but excluding real property or an interest in real property. (I) "Competitive selection" means any of the following procedures for making purchases: (1) Competitive sealed bidding under section 125.07 of the Revised Code; (2) Competitive sealed proposals under section 125.071 of the Revised Code; (3) Reverse auctions under section 125.072 of the Revised Code; (4) Electronic procurement under section 125.073 of the Revised Code. (J) "Direct purchasing authority" means the authority of a state agency to make a purchase without competitive selection pursuant to sections 125.05 and 127.16 of the Revised Code. Sec. 125.041. (A) Nothing in sections 125.02, 125.04 to 125.08, 125.12 to 125.16, 125.18, 125.31 to 125.76125.71, or 125.831 of the Revised Code shall be construed as limiting the attorney general, auditor of state, secretary of state, or treasurer of state in any of the following: (1) Purchases for less than the dollar amounts for the purchase of supplies or services determined under section 125.05 of the Revised Code; (2) Purchases that equal or exceed the dollar amounts for the purchase of supplies or services determined under section 125.05 of the Revised Code with the approval of the controlling board, if that approval is required by section 127.16 of the Revised Code; (3) The final determination of the nature or quantity of any purchase of supplies or services under division (B) of section 125.02 or under division (G) of section 125.035 of the Revised Code; (4) The final determination and disposal of excess and surplus supplies; (5) The inventory of state property; (6) The purchase of printing; (7) Activities related to information technology development and use; (8) The fleet management program. (B) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the attorney general, auditor of state, secretary of state, or treasurer of state from complying with or participating in any aspect of Chapter 125. of the Revised Code through the department of administrative services. Sec. 125.052. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Online subscription" means an offering through an internet online service or platform to access digital content or services on a recurring basis in exchange for a subscription fee. (2) "State agency" has the same meaning as in section 1.60 of the Revised Code, except that it does not include the general assembly, any legislative agency, or the governor. (B) Any online subscription purchased by a state agency for a news periodical or news web site that is not headquartered in this state, and which in the aggregate exceeds five hundred dollars during the fiscal year, is subject to controlling board approval. Sec. 125.071. (A) In accordance with rules the director of administrative services shall adopt, the director may make purchases by competitive sealed proposal whenever the director determines that the use of competitive sealed bidding is not possible or not advantageous to the state. (B) Proposals shall be solicited through a request for proposals. The request for proposals shall state the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors. Notice of the request for proposals shall be given in accordance with rules the director shall adopt. (C) Proposals shall be opened so as to avoid disclosure of contents to competing offerors. In order to ensure fair and impartial evaluation, proposals and related documents submitted in response to a request for proposals are not available for public inspection and copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code until after the award of the contract. (D) As provided in the request for proposals, and under rules the director shall adopt, discussions may be conducted with responsible offerors who submit proposals determined to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award for the purpose of ensuring full understanding of, and responsiveness to, solicitation requirements. Offerors shall be accorded fair and equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion regarding any clarification, correction, or revision of proposals. No disclosure of any information derived from proposals submitted by competing offerors shall occur when discussions are conducted. (E) Award may be made to the offerors whose proposals are determined to be the most advantageous to this state, taking into consideration factors such as price and the evaluation criteria set forth in the request for proposals. The contract file shall contain the basis on which the award is made. Sec. 125.11. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, contracts awarded pursuant to a reverse auction under section 125.072 of the Revised Code or pursuant to competitive sealed bidding, including contracts awarded under section 125.081 of the Revised Code, shall be awarded to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder in accordance with section 9.312 of the Revised Code, and contracts awarded pursuant to a competitive sealed proposal shall be awarded to the offeror determined to be the most advantageous to this state. (B) Prior to awarding a contract under division (A) of this section, the department of administrative services or the state agency responsible for evaluating a contract for the purchase of products or services shall evaluate the bids and offers received according to the criteria and procedures established pursuant to division (B) of section 125.09 of the Revised Code for determining if a product is mined, excavated, produced, manufactured, raised, or grown in the United States, in this state, or in a state bordering Ohio, whether the bid or offer was received from a Buy Ohio supplier, and whether the bid or offer was received from a certified veteran-friendly business enterprise. These requirements shall be applied where sufficient competition can be generated to ensure that compliance with these requirements will be in the best interest of the state unless otherwise prohibited. (C) In order to ensure fair and impartial evaluation, materials relating to a solicitation through competitive selection shall not be considered public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code until after the award of the contract based on the competitive selection. If all bids or proposals received in response to a solicitation through competitive selection are rejected, and notice is provided of an intent to reissue the solicitation through competitive selection, the materials relating to the original solicitation and the materials relating to the reissued solicitation shall not be considered public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code until after the award of the contract based on the reissued solicitation through competitive selection. (D) Division (B) of this section applies to contracts for which competitive selection is waived by the controlling board. (D)(E) Division (B) of this section does not apply to the purchase by the division of liquor control of spirituous liquor. Sec. 125.111. (A) Every contract for or on behalf of the state or any of its political subdivisions for any purchase shall contain provisions similar to those required by section 153.59 of the Revised Code in the case of construction contracts by which the contractor agrees to both of the following: (1)(A) That, in the hiring of employees for the performance of work under the contract or any subcontract, no contractor or subcontractor, by reason of race, color, religion, sex, age, disability or military status as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, national origin, or ancestry, shall discriminate against any citizen of this state in the employment of a person qualified and available to perform the work to which the contract relates; (2)(B) That no contractor, subcontractor, or person acting on behalf of any contractor or subcontractor, in any manner, shall discriminate against, intimidate, or retaliate against any employee hired for the performance of work under the contract on account of race, color, religion, sex, age, disability or military status as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, national origin, or ancestry. (B) All contractors from whom the state or any of its political subdivisions make purchases shall have a written affirmative action program for the employment and effective utilization of economically disadvantaged persons, as referred to in division (E)(1) of section 122.71 of the Revised Code. Annually, each such contractor shall file a description of the affirmative action program and a progress report on its implementation with the department of development. Sec. 125.13. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Emergency medical service organization" has the same meaning as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Private fire company" has the same meaning as in section 9.60 of the Revised Code. (B) Whenever a state agency has excess or surplus supplies, it shall notify the director of administrative services. On forms provided by the director, the state agency shall furnish to the director a list of its excess and surplus supplies, including the location of the supplies and whether the supplies are currently in the agency's control. (C) Upon receipt of notification and at no cost to the state agency, the director of administrative services shall make arrangements for their disposition and shall take immediate control of a state agency's excess and surplus supplies, except for the following excess and surplus supplies: (1) Excess or surplus supplies that have a value below the minimum value that the director establishes for excess and surplus supplies under division (F) of this section; (2) Excess or surplus supplies that the director has authorized an agency to donate to a governmental agency, including, but not limited to, public schools and surplus computers and computer equipment transferred to a public school under division (G) of this section; (3) Excess or surplus supplies that an agency trades in as full or partial payment when purchasing a replacement item; (4) Hazardous property; (5) Excess or surplus supplies that the director has authorized to be part of an interagency transfer; (6) Excess or surplus supplies that are donated under division (H) of this section. (D) The director shall inventory excess and surplus supplies in the director's control and post on a public web site a list of the supplies available for acquisition. The director may have the supplies repaired. The director shall not charge a fee for the collection or transportation of excess and surplus supplies. (E) The director may do any of the following: (1) Dispose of declared surplus or excess supplies in the director's control by sale, lease, donation, or transfer. If the director does so, the director shall dispose of those supplies in any of the following manners: (a) To state agencies or by interagency trade; (b) To state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education; (c) To tax-supported agencies, municipal corporations, or other political subdivisions of this state, private fire companies, or private, nonprofit emergency medical service organizations; (d) To nonpublic elementary and secondary schools chartered by the department of education and workforce under section 3301.16 of the Revised Code; (e) To a nonprofit organization that is both exempt from federal income taxation under 26 U.S.C. 501(a) and (c)(3) and that receives funds from the state or has a contract is registered and in good standing with the secretary of state as a domestic nonprofit or not-for-profit corporation; (f) To the general public by auction, sealed bid, sale, or negotiation. (2) If the director has attempted to dispose of any declared surplus or excess motor vehicle that does not exceed four thousand five hundred dollars in value pursuant to divisions (E)(1)(a) to (c) of this section, donate the motor vehicle to a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 501(a) and (c)(3) for the purpose of meeting the transportation needs of participants in the Ohio works first program established under Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code and participants in the prevention, retention, and contingency program established under Chapter 5108. of the Revised Code. The director may not donate a motor vehicle furnished to the state highway patrol to a nonprofit organization pursuant to this division. (F) The director may adopt rules governing the sale, lease, or transfer of surplus and excess supplies in the director's control by public auction, sealed bid, sale, or negotiation, except that no employee of the disposing agency shall be allowed to purchase, lease, or receive any such supplies. The director may dispose of declared surplus or excess supplies, including motor vehicles, in the director's control as the director determines proper if such supplies cannot be disposed of pursuant to division (E) of this section. The director shall by rule establish a minimum value for excess and surplus supplies and prescribe procedures for a state agency to follow in disposing of excess and surplus supplies in its control that have a value below the minimum value established by the director. (G) The director of administrative services may authorize any state agency to transfer surplus computers and computer equipment that are not needed by other state agencies directly to an accredited public school within the state. The computers and computer equipment may be repaired or refurbished prior to transfer. The state agency may charge a service fee to the public schools for the property not to exceed the direct cost of repairing or refurbishing it. The state agency shall deposit such funds into the account used for repair or refurbishment. (H) Excess and surplus supplies of food shall be exempt from this section and may be donated directly to nonprofit food pantries and institutions without notification to the director of administrative services. Sec. 125.183. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Covered application" means all of the following: (a) The TikTok application and service or any successor application or service developed or provided by ByteDance limited or an entity owned by ByteDance limited; (b) The WeChat application and service or any successor application or service developed or provided by Tencent holdings limited or an entity owned by Tencent holdings limited; (c) Any application or service owned by an entity located in China, including QQ International (QQi), Qzone, Weibo, Xiao HongShu, Zhihu, Meituan, Toutiao, Alipay, Xiami Music, Tiantian Music, DingTalkfDing Ding, Douban, RenRen, Youku/Tudou, Little Red Book, and Zhihuany application owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by an entity identified as a foreign adversary as defined in 15 C.F.R. 791.2. (2) "State agency" means every organized body, office, or agency established by the laws of this state for the exercise of any function of state government, other than any state-supported institution of higher education, the courts, or any judicial agency. "State agency" includes the general assembly, any legislative agency, and the capitol square review and advisory board. (B) Subject to division (C) of this section, the state chief information officer shall do all of the following: (1) Require state agencies immediately to remove any covered application from all equipment they own or lease; (2) Prohibit all of the following on equipment owned or leased by a state agency: (a) The downloading, installation, or use of a covered application; (b) The downloading, installation, or use of a covered application using an internet connection provided by a state agency; (c) The downloading, installation, or use of a covered application by any officer, employee, or contractor of a state agency. (3) Require state agencies to take measures to prevent the downloading, installation, or use of a covered application as described in division (B)(2) of this section. (C) Division (B) of this section shall include exceptions to allow a qualified person to download, install, or use a covered application for law enforcement or security purposes, so long as the person takes appropriate measures to mitigate the security risks involved in doing so. Sec. 125.31. (A) The department of administrative services shall have supervision of all public printing except as follows: (1) Printing for the general assembly shall be the sole responsibility of the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives unless the clerk of the senate or the clerk of the house of representatives chooses either of the options specified in section 101.523 or 101.524 of the Revised Code. (2) Printing for the Ohio arts council shall be under the supervision of the council. (3) Printing for the capitol square review and advisory board shall be under the supervision of the board. (4) Printing for state-supported institutions of higher education shall be under the supervision of the department of purchasing of each such institution or the department or officer within each institution that performs the functions of a department of purchasing. (B) The department of administrative services shall determine, except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the number of copies to be printed of each publication or document, the source of reproduction, the manner of binding, quality of paper, the general kind, size, and spacing of type to be used in all reports, publications, bulletins, documents, or pamphlets printed at public expense. The department shall not use its authority to curtail the release of public information by any elected state official. (C) For the purposes of sections 125.31 to 125.76 of the Revised Code, all functions, powers, and duties assigned to the department of administrative services are considered to be assigned to the division of state printing within the department of administrative servicesDivision (B) of this section does not apply to printing contracts requiring special security paper, of a unique nature, if compliance will result in acquiring a disproportionately inferior product or a price that exceeds by more than five per cent the lowest price submitted on a non-Ohio bid. Sec. 125.42. (A) No agency, officer, board, or commission, except the clerk of the senate and the clerk of the house of representatives, shall print or cause to be printed at the public expense, any report, bulletin, document, or pamphlet, unless such report, bulletin, document, or pamphlet is first submitted to, and the printing thereof approved by, the department of administrative services. If the department approves the printing, it shall determine the form of such printing and the number of copies. If such approval is given, the department shall cause the same to be printed and bound as provided by sections 125.49, 125.51, and 125.56 of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided by section 125.45 of the Revised Code; and when printed, such publications or forms shall be delivered to the ordering officer, board, commission, or department, or sold at a price not to exceed the total cost. (B) The department of administrative services annually shall set a maximum cost per page and a maximum total cost for the printing by any board, commission, council, or other public body of the state of any annual report or any other report that it is required by law to produce. No board, commission, council, or other public body of the state shall expend or incur the expenditure of any amount in excess of these maximum amounts without the prior approval of the department. This division does not apply to the general assembly or any court. Sec. 125.58. The department of administrative services shall promptly notify each successful offeror of the acceptance of the offeror's bid or proposal for state printing. If such offeror fails to execute the contract because of death or other cause, or if the offeror fails to execute the work required by the contract in a proper manner and with reasonable promptness, or the contract is abandoned, or its execution is temporarily suspended, the department may enter into a contract with another person for the prompt execution of the work for the lowest price which may be obtained. Before any work is relet in consequence of the misconduct or default of the contractor, the department shall give the contractor written notice thereof. The department of administrative services may set a daily penalty charge for late orders, provided the penalty schedule and amount are stated in the invitation to bid or request for proposals for the printing. Sec. 125.95. (A) There is hereby created within the department of administrative services the prescription drug transparency and affordability advisory council. The department shall provide administrative support to the advisory council as necessary for the advisory council to carry out its duties under this section. (1) Members of the advisory council shall include the following: (a) The director of administrative services; (b) The director of health; (c) The medicaid director; (d) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (e) The administrator of workers' compensation. (2) Members of the advisory council shall also include individuals who are working to address prescription drug availability and affordability in any of the following areas: (a) Insurance; (b) Local, state, and federal government service; (c) Private industry; (d) Organizations of faith; (e) Health care providers; (f) Consumer organizations; (g) Prescription drug manufacturers; (h) Prescription drug wholesale distributors; (i) Pharmacists; (j) Business organizations; (k) Individuals concerned about mental health or substance abuse matters; (l) Advocates for individuals struggling to afford prescription drugs. The governor, the senate president, and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint three members, each of whom represents at least one of the categories listed in divisions (A)(2)(a) to (l) of this section. (B) Members shall serve without compensation. Initial appointments shall be made not later than sixty days after the effective date of this section October 17, 2019. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. (C) Not later than six months after the date of initial appointments under division (B) of this section, the advisory council shall submit a report to the governor, and the general assembly, and the chairperson of the joint medicaid oversight committee in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall include recommendations on all of the following: (1) How this state can best achieve prescription drug price transparency; (2) New payment models or other avenues to create the most affordable environment for purchasing prescription drugs; (3) Leveraging this state's purchasing power across all state agencies, boards, commissions, and similar entities; (4) Creating efficiencies across different health care systems, such as hospitals, the criminal justice system, treatment and recovery support programs, and employer-sponsored health insurance, to reduce duplicative service delivery across these systems, ensure that patients receive high quality and affordable prescription drugs, and support quality care and outcomes; (5) Which critical outcomes can be measured and used to improve this state's system of purchasing affordable prescribed drugs; (6) How federal, state, and local resources are being used to optimize these outcomes and identify where the resources can be better coordinated or redirected to meet the needs of consumers in this state. (D) State agencies, boards, commissions, and similar entities shall cooperate with and provide assistance to the advisory council as necessary for the advisory council to carry out its duties under this section. (E) On the effective date of this amendment September 30, 2021, the advisory council shall cease to exist. Thereafter, the joint medicaid oversight committee legislative service commission may examine any of the topics described in the report prepared by the former advisory council under division (C) of this section upon the request of a member of the committeethe standing committees with oversight of the medicaid program as provided in section 103.41 of the Revised Code. Sec. 126.024. Beginning with the state budget that is introduced following the effective date of this section, and subsequent state budgets thereafter, the director of budget and management, in consultation with the medicaid director, shall request and propose multiple medicaid health care services general revenue fund appropriation items. At a minimum, the directors shall propose a separate general revenue fund appropriation item for the different health care services included in the medicaid program, including all of the following: (A) Services provided under the care management system; (B) Nursing facility services; (C) Hospital services; (D) Behavioral health services; (E) Services provided under medicaid waiver components administered by the department of aging; (F) Prescription drug services; (G) Physician services; (H) Services provided under the Ohio home care waiver program; (I) Services provided under medicaid waiver components administered by the department of developmental disabilities; (J) Services provided under the medicaid waiver component known as the Ohio resilience through integrated systems and excellence (OhioRISE) waiver; (K) Any other medicaid health care services that the directors determine should have a separate general revenue fund appropriation item. Sec. 126.10. (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Agency" has the same meaning as in section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (2) "State program" means any program, initiative, or service administered or overseen by an agency. (B) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary or any rules adopted under it, if the federal government reduces, discontinues, pauses, or otherwise suspends any federal program that provides federal funds for any corresponding state program, such program may be reduced, discontinued, paused, or suspended. This shall include any contract, agreement, memorandum of understanding, or any other covenant entered into by the state that is dependent on federal funding. Sec. 126.17. (A) As used in this section: "Direct cost" means a cost that can be identified specifically with a particular final cost objective or that can be directly assigned to such activities relatively easily with a high degree of accuracy. "Indirect cost" means a cost that is not readily identified with a particular project, function or activity, but is necessary for the general operation of the organization, and a cost not directly identified with a single, final cost objective, but identified with two or more final cost objectives or an intermediate cost objective. "State grant" means funding provided by a state agency to a state grant recipient for which the agency does not require repayment. "State grant recipient" means an entity that receives a state grant, whether for profit or nonprofit, a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, sole proprietorship, or other business entity. "State grant recipient" does not include an individual who receives state assistance that is not related to the individual's business. (B) The director of budget and management shall establish and administer a centralized reporting system to receive financial status reports submitted by state grant recipients. The system shall be operational not later than one year after the effective date of this section. The director shall adopt rules, under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, to set forth the information to be included in the financial status reports, the frequency at which reports shall be submitted, and guidelines for determining direct and indirect costs. The information required shall be intended to assist the state in oversight of public funds, and in evaluation of the effectiveness of grant programs. It shall include all of the following: (1) An accounting of the expenditure of grant funds by a state grant recipient, which shall separately identify any amount expended by vendor and items purchased to directly benefit the public, and the amount of indirect costs; (2) A project progress report; (3) Confirmation that the state grant recipient is in compliance with any applicable laws or regulations. The centralized reporting system shall enable a state agency to report, to the director, information regarding a state grant. (C) A state agency shall inform a state grant recipient of the requirements of this section, and shall provide the name and contact information of each recipient, the amount of the grant, and other project-identifying information to the director of budget and management. (D) A state grant recipient shall comply with the reporting requirements established under this section, with respect to each state grant that is awarded on or after the date that is one year after the effective date of this section. Sec. 126.24. The OAKS support organization fund is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of paying the operating, development, and upgrade expenses of the state's enterprise resource planning system. The fund shall consist of transfers received pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 126.12 of the Revised Code and agency payroll charge revenues that are designated to support the operating, development, and upgrade costs of the Ohio administrative knowledge system. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 126.42. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the office of budget and management shall perform routine support for the following boards and commissions: (1) Architects board; (2) State chiropractic board; (3) State cosmetology and barber board; (4) Accountancy board; (5) State dental board; (6) Ohio occupational therapy, physical therapy, and athletic trainers board; (7) State board of registration for professional engineers and surveyors; (8) Board of embalmers and funeral directors; (9) State board of psychology; (10) Counselor, social worker, and marriage and family therapist board; (11) State veterinary medical licensing board; (12) Commission on Hispanic-Latino affairs; (13) Commission on African-Americans; (14) Chemical dependency professionals board; (15) State vision professionals board; (16) State speech and hearing professionals board; (17) New African immigrants commission. (B)(1) For purposes of this section, the office of budget and management shall perform the following routine support services for the boards and commissions named in division (A) of this section unless the controlling board exempts a board or commission from this requirement on the recommendation of the office of budget and management: (a) Preparing and processing payroll and other personnel documents; (b) Preparing and processing vouchers, purchase orders, encumbrances, and other accounting documents; (c) Maintaining ledgers of accounts and balances; (d) Preparing and monitoring budgets and allotment plans in consultation with the boards and commissions; (e) Routine human resources and personnel services; (f) Other routine support services that the director of budget and management considers appropriate to achieve efficiency. (2) In addition to the routine support services listed in division (B)(1) of this section, the office of budget and management may perform other services which a board or commission named in division (A) of this section delegates to the office and the office accepts. (3) The office of budget and management may perform routine support services for any professional or occupational licensing board or commission not named in division (A) of this section at the request of the board or commission. (C) The office of budget and management shall determine the fees to be charged to the boards and commissions, which shall be in proportion to the services performed for each board or commission. Sec. 126.60. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Agricultural water project" means a project that will improve water quality by reducing or aiding in the reduction of levels of phosphorus, nitrogen, or sediment, that result from agricultural practices, in the waters of the state. "Agricultural water project" includes a project involving research, technology, design, construction, best management practices, conservation, testing, or education. (2) "Community water project" means a project involving a public water system operated by a political subdivision that will improve water quality by reducing or aiding in the reduction of levels of phosphorus, nitrogen, or sediment in the waters of the state. "Community water project" includes a project involving research, technology, design, construction, best management practices, conservation, testing, or maintenance. (3) "Nature water project" means a project involving a natural water system that will improve water quality by reducing or aiding in the reduction of levels of phosphorus, nitrogen, or sediment in the waters of the state. "Nature water project" includes a project involving research, technology, design, construction, best management practices, conservation, or maintenance. "Nature water project" also includes the creation, maintenance, or restoration of wetlands, flood plains, flood control systems, and buffers throughout the state, including the western basin of Lake Erie. (B)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the H2Ohio fund consisting of money credited to it and any donations, gifts, bequests, and other money received for deposit in the fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. All money credited or deposited in the fund shall be used for any of the following purposes: (1)(a) Agriculture water projects; (2)(b) Community water projects; (3)(c) Nature water projects; (4)(d) Awarding or allocating grants or money, issuing loans, or making purchases for the development and implementation of projects and programs, including remediation projects, that are designed to address water quality priorities; (5)(e) Funding cooperative research, data gathering and monitoring, and demonstration projects related to water quality priorities; (6)(f) Encouraging cooperation with and among leaders from state legislatures, state agencies, political subdivisions, business and industry, labor, agriculture, environmental organizations, institutions of higher education, and water conservation districts; (7)(g) Other purposes, policies, programs, and priorities identified by the Ohio Lake Erie commission in coordination with state agencies or boards responsible for water protection and water management, provided that the purposes, policies, programs, and priorities align with a statewide strategic vision and comprehensive periodic water protection and restoration strategy. (2) Money credited to or deposited in the fund shall not be used for the purchase of land or for the purchase of a conservation easement. (C) Not later than August 31, 2020, and annually thereafter, the Ohio Lake Erie commission, in coordination with state agencies or boards responsible for water protection and water management, shall do both of the following: (1) Prepare a report of the activities that were undertaken with respect to the fund during the immediately preceding fiscal year, including the revenues and expenses of the fund for the preceding fiscal year; (2) Submit the report to the general assembly and to the governor. (D) Within forty-five days after the report is submitted under division (C) of this section, the directors of the state agencies that contributed to the report and the executive director of the Lake Erie commission shall appear before both the house of representatives and senate committees that oversee state finance to testify on the report. Sec. 126.62. (A) The all Ohio future fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money credited to it and any donations, gifts, bequests, or other money received for deposit in the fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Money in the fund shall be used to promote economic development throughout the state, including infrastructure projects and other infrastructure improvements. (B) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish requirements and procedures to provide financial assistance from the all Ohio future fund. The director shall consult with JobsOhio in adopting the rules. (C) No money shall be expended from the all Ohio future fund, pursuant to appropriation, until it has been released by the controlling board. Sec. 126.67. The targeted addiction assistance fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money awarded to the state by court order that is intended to address the effects of the opioid crisis. Beginning January 15, 2027, any money received under the settlement agreement in State of Ohio v. McKesson Corp., Case No. CVH20180055 (C.P. Madison Co., settlement agreement of October 7, 2021) shall be certified by the attorney general and remitted to the office of budget and management for deposit in the fund. The director of budget and management shall notify the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the chairpersons of the finance committees of the house of representatives and senate when money is deposited into the fund. Sec. 127.12. There is hereby created a controlling board consisting of all of the following: (A) The director of budget and management or an employee of the office of budget and management designated by the director; (B) The chairperson or vice-chairperson of the finance-appropriations committee of the house of representatives, as designated by the speaker; (C) The chairperson or vice-chairperson of the finance committee of the senate, as designated by the president; (D) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker, one from the majority party and one from the minority party; (E) Two members of the senate appointed by the president, one from the majority party and one from the minority party. Notwithstanding section 101.26 of the Revised Code, the legislative members, when engaged in their duties as members of the controlling board, shall be paid at the per diem rate of one hundred fifty dollars, and their necessary traveling expenses, which shall be paid from the funds appropriated for the payment of expenses of legislative committees. (F) In the event of the absence, illness, disability, death, or resignation of a legislative member, the following persons may serve in the member's absence: for the chairperson or vice-chairperson of the finance-appropriations committee of the house of representatives, the speaker or a member of the house of representatives designated by the speaker; for the chairperson or vice-chairperson of the senate finance committee, the president or a member of the senate designated by the president; for a member of the board appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, or the president of the senate, the speaker or the president, as the case may be, or a member of the house of representatives or of the senate of the same party as such controlling board member, designated by such speaker or president. As used in any statute, "controlling board," unless the context otherwise requires, means the controlling board created by this section. Sec. 127.13. The director of budget and management or his the director's designee shall be president of the controlling board. The president shall prepare the proposed agenda for the meetings of the board and shall provide, at least seven ten days prior to the meeting, copies of the proposed agenda and supporting documentation to the members of the board and to the legislative budget office of the legislative service commission. The director shall designate an employee of the office of budget and management to serve as secretary of the controlling board. The secretary shall assist the president of the board and shall make and keep a record of each request received by the board and of its action thereon. The secretary shall certify a copy of the record of each action to each member of the board and to the director. The controlling board may adopt procedural rules for the conduct of the business of the board, may approve, disapprove, modify as to specific dollar amounts, or defer requests, and may require that a request from the senate, the house of representatives, the supreme court, or an elected member of the executive department as defined in Section 1 of Article III, Ohio Constitution, not currently before the controlling board be added to the agenda for a specified future meeting of the board, provided that such request has been previously submitted to the president for inclusion in the agenda for a board meeting. The controlling board also may adopt rules authorizing the president to act on its behalf in exigent circumstances affecting the public health, safety, or welfare. The affirmative vote of no fewer than four members of the controlling board shall be required for any action of the board. The board shall meet at least once a month. Sec. 127.16. (A) Upon the request of either a state agency or the director of budget and management and after the controlling board determines that an emergency or a sufficient economic reason exists, the controlling board may approve the making of a purchase without competitive selection as provided in division (B) of this section. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no state agency, using money that has been appropriated to it directly, shall: (1) Make any purchase from a particular supplier, that would amount to fifty thousand dollars or more when combined with both the amount of all disbursements to the supplier during the fiscal year for purchases made by the agency and the amount of all outstanding encumbrances for purchases made by the agency from the supplier, unless the purchase is made by competitive selection or with the approval of the controlling board; (2) Lease real estate from a particular supplier, if the lease would amount to seventy-five thousand dollars or more when combined with both the amount of all disbursements to the supplier during the fiscal year for real estate leases made by the agency and the amount of all outstanding encumbrances for real estate leases made by the agency from the supplier, unless the lease is made by competitive selection or with the approval of the controlling board. (C) Any person who authorizes a purchase in violation of division (B) of this section shall be liable to the state for any state funds spent on the purchase, and the attorney general shall collect the amount from the person. (D) Nothing in division (B) of this section shall be construed as: (1) A limitation upon the authority of the director of transportation as granted in sections 5501.17, 5517.02, and 5525.14 of the Revised Code; (2) Applying to medicaid provider agreements under the medicaid program; (3) Applying to the purchase of examinations from a sole supplier by a state licensing board under Title XLVII of the Revised Code; (4) Applying to entertainment contracts for the Ohio state fair entered into by the Ohio expositions commission, provided that the controlling board has given its approval to the commission to enter into such contracts and has approved a total budget amount for such contracts as agreed upon by commission action, and that the commission causes to be kept itemized records of the amounts of money spent under each contract and annually files those records with the clerk of the house of representatives and the clerk of the senate following the close of the fair; (5) Limiting the authority of the chief of the division of mineral resources management to contract for reclamation work with an operator mining adjacent land as provided in section 1513.27 of the Revised Code; (6) Applying to investment transactions and procedures of any state agency, except that the agency shall file with the board the name of any person with whom the agency contracts to make, broker, service, or otherwise manage its investments, as well as the commission, rate, or schedule of charges of such person with respect to any investment transactions to be undertaken on behalf of the agency. The filing shall be in a form and at such times as the board considers appropriate. (7) Applying to purchases made with money for the per cent for arts program established by section 3379.10 of the Revised Code; (8) Applying to purchases made by the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency of services, or supplies, that are provided to persons with disabilities, or to purchases made by the agency in connection with the eligibility determinations it makes for applicants of programs administered by the social security administration; (9)(8) Applying to payments by the department of medicaid under section 5164.85 of the Revised Code for group health plan premiums, deductibles, coinsurance, and other cost-sharing expenses; (10)(9) Applying to any agency of the legislative branch of the state government; (11)(10) Applying to agreements or contracts entered into under section 5101.11, 5101.20, 5101.201, 5101.21, or 5101.214 of the Revised Code; (12)(11) Applying to purchases of services by the adult parole authority under section 2967.14 of the Revised Code or by the department of youth services under section 5139.08 of the Revised Code; (13)(12) Applying to dues or fees paid for membership in an organization or association; (14)(13) Applying to purchases of utility services pursuant to section 9.30 of the Revised Code; (15)(14) Applying to purchases made in accordance with rules adopted by the department of administrative services of motor vehicle, aviation, or watercraft fuel, or emergency repairs of such vehicles; (16)(15) Applying to purchases of tickets for passenger air transportation; (17)(16) Applying to purchases necessary to provide public notifications required by law or to provide notifications of job openings; (18)(17) Applying to the judicial branch of state government; (19)(18) Applying to purchases of liquor for resale by the division of liquor control; (20)(19) Applying to purchases of motor courier and freight services made in accordance with department of administrative services rules; (21)(20) Applying to purchases from the United States postal service and purchases of stamps and postal meter replenishment from vendors at rates established by the United States postal service; (22)(21) Applying to purchases of books, periodicals, pamphlets, newspapers, maintenance subscriptions, and other published materials; (23)(22) Applying to purchases from other state agencies, including state-assisted institutions of higher education or the Ohio history connection; (24)(23) Applying to purchases from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 125.60 to 125.6012 or 4115.31 to 4115.35 of the Revised Code; (25)(24) Applying to payments by the department of job and family services to the United States department of health and human services for printing and mailing notices pertaining to the tax refund offset program of the internal revenue service of the United States department of the treasury; (26)(25) Applying to contracts entered into by the department of developmental disabilities under section 5123.18 of the Revised Code; (27)(26) Applying to payments made by the department of mental health and addiction services under a physician recruitment program authorized by section 5119.185 of the Revised Code; (28)(27) Applying to contracts entered into with persons by the director of commerce for unclaimed funds collection and remittance efforts as provided in division (G) of section 169.03 of the Revised Code. The director shall keep an itemized accounting of unclaimed funds collected by those persons and amounts paid to them for their services. (29)(28) Applying to purchases made by a state institution of higher education in accordance with the terms of a contract between the vendor and an inter-university purchasing group comprised of purchasing officers of state institutions of higher education; (30)(29) Applying to the department of medicaid's purchases of health assistance services under the children's health insurance program; (31)(30) Applying to payments by the attorney general from the reparations fund to hospitals and other emergency medical facilities for performing medical examinations to collect physical evidence pursuant to section 2907.28 of the Revised Code; (32)(31) Applying to contracts with a contracting authority or administrative receiver under division (B) of section 5126.056 of the Revised Code; (33)(32) Applying to purchases of goods and services by the department of veterans services in accordance with the terms of contracts entered into by the United States department of veterans affairs; (34)(33) Applying to payments by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation to the federal bureau of investigation for criminal records checks pursuant to section 109.572 of the Revised Code; (35)(34) Applying to contracts entered into by the department of medicaid under section 5164.47 of the Revised Code; (36)(35) Applying to contracts entered into under section 5160.12 of the Revised Code; (37)(36) Applying to payments to the Ohio history connection from other state agencies. (E) When determining whether a state agency has reached the cumulative purchase thresholds established in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, the following purchases by such agency shall not be considered: (1) Purchases made through competitive selection or with controlling board approval; (2) Purchases listed in division (D) of this section; (3) For the purposes of the threshold of division (B)(1) of this section only, leases of real estate. (F) A state agency, when exercising direct purchasing authority under this section, shall utilize a selection process that complies with all applicable laws, rules, or regulations of the department of administrative services. (G) As used in this section, "competitive selection," "direct purchasing authority," "purchase," "supplies," and "services" have the same meanings as in section 125.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 128.021. (A) Not later than January 1, 2014, and in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the steering committee shall adopt rules that establish technical and operational standards for public safety answering points eligible to receive disbursements under section 128.55 of the Revised Code. The rules shall incorporate industry standards and best practices for 9-1-1 services. Public safety answering points shall comply with the standards not later than two years after the effective date of the rules adopting the standards. A public safety answering point may be deemed compliant with rules for minimum staffing standards, if it can demonstrate compliance with all other rules for operational standards. (B) Not later than one year after September 29, 2015, and in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the steering committee shall conduct an assessment of the operational standards for public safety answering points developed under division (A) of this section and revise the standards as necessary to ensure that the operational standards contain the following: (1) Policies to ensure that public safety answering point personnel prioritize life-saving questions in responding to each call to a 9-1-1 system established under this chapter; (2) A requirement that all public safety answering point personnel complete proper training or provide proof of prior training to give instructions regarding emergency situations. (C) Upon the effective date of the amendments to this section by this act H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly, October 3, 2023, all public safety answering points that answer 9-1-1 calls for service from wireless services shall be subject to the public safety answering point operations rules. Public safety answering points not originally required to be compliant shall comply with the standards not later than two years after the effective date of the amendments to this section by this act H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly, October 3, 2023. Sec. 128.41. (A) As used in this section, "communications service" means any wireless service, multiline telephone system, and voice over internet protocol system to which both of the following apply: (1) The service or system is registered to the subscriber's address within this state or the subscriber's primary place of using the service or system is in this state. (2) The service or system is capable of initiating a direct connection to 9-1-1. (B) After the expiration of the charge described in division (A)(1) of section 128.40 of the Revised Code and except as provided in sections 128.413 and 128.42 of the Revised Code, there is imposed a next generation 9-1-1 access fee of forty sixty cents per month on each communications service, which shall be imposed as follows: (1) In the case of wireless telephone service, a subscriber shall pay a separate next generation 9-1-1 access fee for each wireless telephone number assigned to the subscriber. (2) In the case of a voice over internet protocol system, a subscriber shall pay a separate fee for each voice channel provided to the subscriber through the system. The number of voice channels shall be equal to the number of outbound calls the subscriber can maintain at the same time using the system, but excludes a direct inward dialing number that merely routes an inbound call. The maximum number of separate fees imposed on a subscriber's system shall not exceed one hundred voice channels per network. (3) In the case of a multiline telephone system, the subscriber shall pay a separate fee for each line. The maximum number of separate fees imposed on a single subscriber with a multiline telephone system shall not exceed one hundred per building with a unique street address or physically identifiable location. (C) If more than one communications service shares the same telephone number, then the next generation 9-1-1 access fee imposed shall not exceed forty sixty cents per month. Sec. 128.46. (A)(1) An entity required to collect a wireless 9-1-1 charge under section 128.40 of the Revised Code or the next generation 9-1-1 access fee under section 128.414 or 128.421 of the Revised Code shall, on or before the twenty-third day of each month, except as provided in divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section, do both of the following: (a) Make and file a return for the preceding month, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, showing the amount of the charges or fees due for that month; (b) Remit the full amount due, as shown on the return, with the exception of charges or fees equivalent to the amount authorized as a collection fee under division (B) of this section. (2) The commissioner may grant one or more thirty-day extensions for making and filing returns and remitting amounts due. (3) If a seller is required to collect prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges under section 128.40 of the Revised Code or next generation 9-1-1 access fees under section 128.421 of the Revised Code in amounts that do not merit monthly returns, the commissioner may authorize the seller to make and file returns less frequently. The commissioner shall ascertain whether this authorization is warranted upon the basis of administrative costs to the state. (B) A wireless service provider, reseller, and seller may each retain as a collection fee three per cent of the total wireless 9-1-1 charges required to be collected under sections 128.40, 128.41, and 128.42 of the Revised Code, and shall account to the tax commissioner for the amount retained. (C) The return required under division (A)(1)(a) of this section shall be filed electronically using the Ohio business gateway, as defined in section 718.01 of the Revised Code, or any other electronic means prescribed by the tax commissioner. Remittance of the amount due shall be made electronically in a manner approved by the commissioner. An entity required to file the return may apply to the commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner to be excused from either electronic requirement of this division. For good cause shown, the commissioner may excuse the entity from either or both of the requirements and may permit the entity to file returns or make remittances by nonelectronic means. (D)(1) Each subscriber or consumer on which a wireless 9-1-1 charge is imposed under section 128.40 of the Revised Code or on which a next generation 9-1-1 access fee is imposed under section 128.41 or 128.42 of the Revised Code is liable to the state for the amount of the charge. (2) An entity required to collect the wireless 9-1-1 charge under section 128.40 of the Revised Code or the next generation 9-1-1 access fee under section 128.414 or 128.421 of the Revised Code is liable to the state for any amount that was required to be collected but that was not remitted, regardless of whether the amount was collected. (3) No provider of a prepaid wireless calling service shall be liable to the state for any wireless 9-1-1 charge imposed under section 128.40 of the Revised Code or any next generation 9-1-1 access fee imposed under section 128.42 of the Revised Code that was not collected or remitted. (E)(1) If the tax commissioner has reason to believe that an entity required to collect a wireless 9-1-1 charge under section 128.40 of the Revised Code or the next generation 9-1-1 access fee under section 128.414 or 128.421 of the Revised Code has failed to bill, collect, or remit the charge or fee as required by this section and sections 128.40 to 128.422 of the Revised Code or has retained more than the amount authorized under division (B) of this section, and after written notice to the entity, the tax commissioner may audit the entity for the sole purpose of making such a determination. The audit may include, but is not limited to, a sample of the entity's billings, collections, remittances, or retentions for a representative period, and the tax commissioner shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the entity in selecting that sample. (2) Upon written notice to the entity, the tax commissioner, after completion of the audit, may make an assessment against the entity if, pursuant to the audit, the tax commissioner determines that the entity has failed to bill, collect, or remit the charge or fee as required by sections 128.40 to 128.422 of the Revised Code or has retained more than the amount authorized under division (B) of this section. The assessment shall be in the amount of any remittance that was due and unpaid on the date notice of the audit was sent by the tax commissioner to the entity or, as applicable, in the amount of the excess amount under division (B) of this section retained by the entity as of that date. (3) The portion of any assessment consisting of charges or fees due and not paid within sixty days after the date that the assessment was made under division (E)(2) of this section shall bear interest from that date until paid at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. That interest may be collected by making an assessment under division (E)(2) of this section. (4) Unless the entity assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment, signed by the entity assessed or that entity's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment shall become final and the amount of the assessment shall be due and payable from the entity assessed to the treasurer of state, for deposit to the next generation 9-1-1 fund, which is created under section 128.54 of the Revised Code. The petition shall indicate the objections of the entity assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (5) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the final assessment may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the business of the assessed entity is conducted. If the entity assessed maintains no place of business in this state, the certified copy of the final assessment may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the assessed entity in the amount shown on the final assessment. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for 9-1-1 charges and fees" and shall have the same effect as other judgments. The judgment shall be executed upon the request of the tax commissioner. (6) If the commissioner determines that the commissioner erroneously has refunded a 9-1-1 charge or fee to any person, the commissioner may make an assessment against that person for recovery of the erroneously refunded charge. (7) An assessment under division (E) of this section does not discharge a subscriber's or consumer's liability to reimburse the entity for a 9-1-1 charge or fee. If, after the date of service of the audit notice under division (E)(1) of this section, a subscriber or consumer pays a 9-1-1 charge or fee for the period covered by the assessment, the payment shall be credited against the assessment. Sec. 128.54. (A)(1) For the purpose of receiving, distributing, and accounting for amounts received from the wireless 9-1-1 charges imposed under section 128.40 of the Revised Code and the next generation 9-1-1 access fees imposed under sections 128.41 and 128.42 of the Revised Code, the following funds are created in the state treasury: (a) The 9-1-1 government assistance fund; (b) The 9-1-1 administrative fund; (c) The 9-1-1 program fund; (d) The next generation 9-1-1 fund. (2) Amounts remitted under section 128.46 of the Revised Code shall be paid to the treasurer of state for deposit as follows: (a) Seventy-two Eighty-one and one-third per cent to the 9-1-1 government assistance fund. All interest earned on the 9-1-1 government assistance fund shall be credited to the fund. (b) One Two-thirds of one per cent to the 9-1-1 administrative fund; (c) Two One and one-third per cent to the 9-1-1 program fund; (d) Twenty-five Sixteen and two-thirds per cent to the next generation 9-1-1 fund. (3) The tax commissioner shall use the 9-1-1 administrative fund to defray the costs incurred in carrying out this chapter. (4) The steering committee shall use the 9-1-1 program fund to defray the costs incurred by the steering committee in carrying out this chapter. (5) Annually, the tax commissioner, after paying administrative costs under division (A)(3) of this section, shall transfer any excess remaining in the 9-1-1 administrative fund to the next generation 9-1-1 fund, created under this section. (B) At the direction of the steering committee, the tax commissioner shall transfer the funds remaining in the 9-1-1 government assistance fund to the credit of the next generation 9-1-1 fund. All interest earned on the next generation 9-1-1 fund shall be credited to the fund. (C) From the funds created in division (A)(1) of this section, the director of budget and management shall, as funds are available, transfer to the tax refund fund, created under section 5703.052 of the Revised Code, amounts equal to the refunds certified by the tax commissioner under division (D) of section 128.47 of the Revised Code, in the same percentage as the certified refund amounts were deposited in those funds as specified in division (A)(2) of this section. (D) The department of administrative services may move funds between the next generation 9-1-1 fund and the 9-1-1 government assistance fund to ensure funding remains sustainable for both funds. Sec. 131.01. As used in Chapters 113., 117., 123., 124., 125., 126., 127., and 131. of the Revised Code, and any statute that uses the terms in connection with state accounting or budgeting: (A) "Account" means any record, element, or summary in which financial transactions are identified and recorded as debit or credit transactions in order to summarize items of a similar nature or classification. (B) "Accounting procedure" means the arrangement of all processes which discover, record, and summarize financial information to produce financial statements and reports and to provide internal control. (C) "Accounting system" means the total structure of records and procedures which discover, record, classify, and report information on the financial position and operations of a governmental unit or any of its funds and organizational components. (D) "Allocation" means a portion of an appropriation which is designated for expenditure by specific organizational units or for special purposes, activities, or objects that do not relate to a period of time. (E) "Allotment" means all or part of an appropriation which may be encumbered or expended within a specific period of time. (F) "Appropriation" means an authorization granted by the general assembly to make expenditures and to incur obligations for specific purposes. (G) "Assets" means resources owned, controlled, or otherwise used or held by the state which have monetary value. (H) "Budget" means the plan of financial operation embodying an estimate of proposed expenditures and obligations for a given period and the proposed means of financing them. (I) "Check" means a negotiable financial instrument, payable upon demand, directing a financial institution to transfer money from the payer's account to the payee. (J) "Direct deposit" is a form of electronic funds transfer in which money is electronically deposited into the account of a person or entity at a financial institution. (J)(K) "Disbursement" means a payment made for any purpose. (K)(L) "Electronic benefit transfer" means the electronic delivery of benefits through automated teller machines, point of sale terminals, or other electronic media pursuant to section 5101.33 of the Revised Code. (L)(M) "Electronic funds transfer" means the electronic movement of funds via automated clearing house or wire transfer. (M)(N) "Encumbrancing document" means a document reserving all or part of an appropriation. (N)(O) "Expenditure" means a reduction of the balance of an appropriation after legal requirements have been met. (O)(P) "Fund" means an independent fiscal and accounting entity with a self-balancing set of accounts recording cash or other resources, together with all related liabilities, obligations, reserves, and fund balances which are segregated for the purpose of carrying on specific activities or attaining certain objectives in accordance with special rules, restrictions, or limitations. (P)(Q) "Lapse" means the automatic termination of an appropriation at the end of the fiscal period for which it was appropriated. (Q)(R) "Reappropriation" means an appropriation of a previous appropriation that is continued in force in a succeeding appropriation period. "Reappropriation" shall be equated with and incorporated in the term "appropriation." (R)(S) "Stored value card" means a payment card that may have money loaded and stored on the card and accessed through automated teller machines, point of sale terminals, or other electronic media. "Stored value card" does not include any payment card linked to, and that can access money in, an external account maintained by a financial institution. (S)(T) "Voucher" means the document used to transmit a claim for payment and evidentiary matter related to the claim. (T)(U) "Warrant" means an order drawn upon the treasurer of state by the director of budget and management, or an authorized person at a state entity that has a custodial account in the custody of the treasurer of state, directing the treasurer of state to pay a specified amount to one or more specified payees. A variety of payment instruments may be used, including but not limited to paper warrants or checks, stored value cards, direct deposit to the payee's bank account, or the drawdown of funds by electronic benefit transfer, and the resulting electronic transfer to or by the ultimate payees. The terms defined in this section shall be used, on all accounting forms, reports, formal rules, and budget requests produced by a state agency, only as defined in this section. Sec. 131.02. (A) Except as otherwise provided in section 4123.37, section 5703.061, and division (K) of section 4123.511 of the Revised Code, whenever any amount is payable to the state, the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which the amount is payable shall immediately proceed to collect the amount or cause the amount to be collected and shall pay the amount into the state treasury or into the appropriate custodial fund in the manner set forth pursuant to section 113.08 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the amount is not paid within forty-five days after payment is due, the officer, employee, or agent shall certify the amount due to the attorney general, in accordance with section 131.026 of the Revised Code and in the form and manner prescribed by the attorney general. In the case of an amount payable by a student enrolled in a state institution of higher education, the amount shall be certified, in accordance with section 131.026 of the Revised Code, within the later of forty-five days after the amount is due or the tenth day after the beginning of the next academic semester, quarter, or other session following the session for which the payment is payable. The attorney general may assess the collection cost to the amount certified in such manner and amount as prescribed by the attorney general. If an amount payable to a political subdivision is past due, the political subdivision may, with the approval of the attorney general, certify the amount to the attorney general pursuant to this section in accordance with section 131.026 of the Revised Code. For the purposes of this section, the attorney general and the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which the amount is payable shall agree on the time a payment is due, and that agreed upon time shall be one of the following times: (1) If a law, including an administrative rule, of this state prescribes the time a payment is required to be made or reported, when the payment is required by that law to be paid or reported. (2) If the payment is for services rendered, when the rendering of the services is completed. (3) If the payment is reimbursement for a loss, when the loss is incurred. (4) In the case of a fine or penalty for which a law or administrative rule does not prescribe a time for payment, when the fine or penalty is first assessed. (5) If the payment arises from a legal finding, judgment, or adjudication order, when the finding, judgment, or order is rendered or issued. (6) If the payment arises from an overpayment of money by the state to another person, when the overpayment is discovered. (7) The date on which the amount for which an individual is personally liable under section 5735.35, section 5739.33, or division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code is determined. (8) Upon proof of claim being filed in a bankruptcy case. (9) Any other appropriate time determined by the attorney general and the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which the amount is payable on the basis of statutory requirements or ordinary business processes of the agency, institution, or political subdivision to which the payment is owed. (B)(1) The Upon certification of an amount due in accordance with division (A) of this section and section 131.026 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall give immediate notice by mail or otherwise in the manner described in section 131.026 of the Revised Code to the party indebted of the nature and amount of the indebtedness. (2) If the amount payable to this state arises from a tax levied under Chapter 5733., 5739., 5741., 5747., or 5751. of the Revised Code, the notice also shall specify all of the following: (a) The assessment or case number; (b) The tax pursuant to which the assessment is made; (c) The reason for the liability, including, if applicable, that a penalty or interest is due; (d) An explanation of how and when interest will be added to the amount assessed; (e) That the attorney general and tax commissioner, acting together, have the authority, but are not required, to compromise the claim and accept payment over a reasonable time, if such actions are in the best interest of the state. (C) The attorney general shall collect the claim or secure a judgment and issue an execution for its collection. (D) Each claim shall bear interest, from the day on which the claim became due, at the rate per annum required by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. (E) The attorney general and the chief officer of the agency reporting a claim, acting together, may do any of the following if such action is in the best interests of the state: (1) Compromise the claim; (2) Extend for a reasonable period the time for payment of the claim by agreeing to accept monthly or other periodic payments. The agreement may require security for payment of the claim. (3) Add fees to recover the cost of processing checks or other draft instruments returned for insufficient funds and the cost of providing electronic payment options. (F)(1) Except as provided in division (F)(2) of this section, if the attorney general finds, after investigation, that any claim due and owing to the state is uncollectible, the attorney general, with the consent of the chief officer of the agency reporting the claim, may do the following: (a) Sell, convey, or otherwise transfer the claim to one or more private entities for collection; (b) Cancel the claim or cause it to be canceled. (2) The attorney general shall cancel or cause to be canceled an unsatisfied claim on the date that is forty years after the date the claim is certified, unless the attorney general has adopted a rule under division (F)(5) of this section shortening this time frame with respect to a subset of claims. (3) No initial action shall be commenced to collect any tax payable to the state that is administered by the tax commissioner, whether or not such tax is subject to division (B) of this section, or any penalty, interest, or additional charge on such tax, after the expiration of the period ending on the later of the dates specified in divisions (F)(3)(a) and (b) of this section, provided that such period shall be extended by the period of any stay to such collection or by any other period to which the parties mutually agree. If the initial action in aid of execution is commenced before the later of the dates specified in divisions (F)(3)(a) and (b) of this section, any and all subsequent actions may be pursued in aid of execution of judgment for as long as the debt exists. (a) Seven years after the assessment of the tax, penalty, interest, or additional charge is issued. (b) Four years after the assessment of the tax, penalty, interest, or additional charge becomes final. For the purposes of division (F)(3)(b) of this section, the assessment becomes final at the latest of the following: upon expiration of the period to petition for reassessment, or if applicable, to appeal a final determination of the commissioner or decision of the board of tax appeals or a court, or, if applicable, upon decision of the United States supreme court. For the purposes of division (F)(3) of this section, an initial action to collect a tax debt is commenced at the time when a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making an assessment final has been filed in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas in the county in which the taxpayer resides or has its principal place of business in this state, or in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas of Franklin county, as provided in section 5739.13, 5741.14, 5747.13, or 5751.09 of the Revised Code or in any other applicable law requiring such a filing. If an assessment has not been issued and there is no time limitation on the issuance of an assessment under applicable law, an action to collect a tax debt commences when the action is filed in the courts of this state to collect the liability. (4) If information contained in a claim that is sold, conveyed, or transferred to a private entity pursuant to this section is confidential pursuant to federal law or a section of the Revised Code that implements a federal law governing confidentiality, such information remains subject to that law during and following the sale, conveyance, or transfer. (5) The attorney general may adopt rules to aid in the implementation of this section. Sec. 131.026. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Last known address" means the mailing address or the electronic mail address appearing in the official records of the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which an amount is payable or of the attorney general. (2) "Traceable delivery service" means a delivery service provided by the United States postal service or a domestic commercial delivery service allowing the sender to track a sent item's progress and providing notice of a completed delivery to the sender. (B) Before an officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which an amount is due certifies the amount due to the attorney general under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, the officer, employee, or agent shall serve a notice to the debtor or the debtor's statutory agent in the manner described in this section. The officer, employee, or agent shall serve a notice not sooner than forty-five days, nor later than sixty days, after payment is due. (C) The notice shall include all of the following information: (1) The name of the debtor or statutory agent; (2) The nature and amount of the indebtedness; (3) The information required under division (B)(2) of section 131.02 of the Revised Code if the debt arises from a tax levied. (D)(1) An officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which an amount is payable or the attorney general may serve a notice required by this section or section 131.02 of the Revised Code through any of the following methods: (a) Electronic mail at the debtor's or debtor's statutory agent's last known address; (b) Facsimile transmission at the debtor's or debtor's statutory agent's facsimile number appearing in the official records of the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which an amount is payable or of the attorney general; (c) Traceable delivery service at the debtor's or debtor's statutory agent's last known address; (d) Personal service at the debtor's or debtor's statutory agent's last known address. (2) Service of a notice required under this section or section 131.02 of the Revised Code is complete on the following dates: (a) For electronic mail, the date the receipt of the document is relayed electronically by a direct reply from the debtor or debtor's statutory agent to the officer, employee, or agent responsible for administering the law under which an amount is payable or to the attorney general or through electronic tracking software demonstrating that the recipient accessed the document. (b) For facsimile transmission, the date indicated on the facsimile transmission confirmation page. (c) For traceable delivery service, the date of delivery indicated on the notice of completed delivery provided by the United States postal service or domestic commercial delivery service. (d) For personal service, the date indicated on a document confirming physical delivery signed by the debtor, the debtor's statutory agent, an adult located at the debtor's or debtor's statutory agent's last known address, or the delivery person. (E)(1) Upon receipt of the notice, the debtor or statutory agent may satisfy the debt within thirty days of receiving the notice. If the debt is satisfied within those thirty days, the officer, employee, or agent shall not certify an amount due to the attorney general. (2) If the debtor or statutory agent does not satisfy the debt within thirty days after receiving the notice, the officer, employee, or agent shall certify the amount due to the attorney general. The attorney general shall collect the amount due in accordance with section 131.02 of the Revised Code. If the attorney general files a lien to collect the amount due, the attorney general shall not file the lien unless both of the following are included with the lien when filing: (1) A copy of the notice required under division (B) of this section; (2) Proof of service of the notice as described under division (D) of this section. (F)(1) Nothing in this section prevents or limits the attorney general or the appropriate authority from taking any action set forth under divisions (E) or (F) of section 131.02 of the Revised Code. (2) No amount that is payable under section 131.02 of the Revised Code is deemed uncollectible, discharged, relieved, or otherwise satisfied or non-payable because of any failure to comply with a specific time requirement provided for under this section. Sec. 131.35. (A) With respect to federal revenue received into any fund of the state, except for those funds listed in division (D) of section 127.14 of the Revised Code: (1) No state agency may make expenditures of any federal revenue, whether the revenue is advanced prior to expenditure or as reimbursement, unless such expenditures are made pursuant to specific appropriations of the general assembly, are authorized by the controlling board pursuant to division (A)(5) of this section, or are authorized by an executive order issued in accordance with section 107.17 of the Revised Code, and until an allotment has been approved by the director of budget and management. All federal revenue received by a state agency shall be reported to the director within fifteen days of the receipt of the revenue or the notification of award, whichever occurs first. The director shall prescribe the forms and procedures to be used when reporting the receipt of federal revenue. (2) If the federal revenue received is greater than the amount of the revenue appropriated by the general assembly for a specific purpose, the total appropriation of federal and state funds for such purpose shall remain at the amount designated by the general assembly, except that the expenditure of federal revenue received in excess of such specific appropriation may be authorized by the controlling board, subject to division (D) of this section. (3) To the extent that the expenditure of excess federal revenue is authorized, the controlling board may transfer a like amount of general revenue fund appropriation authority from the affected agency to the emergency purposes appropriation of the controlling board, if such action is permitted under federal regulations. (4) Additional funds may be created by the controlling board to receive revenues not anticipated in an appropriations act for the biennium in which such new revenues are received. Subject to division (D) of this section, expenditures from such additional funds may be authorized by the controlling board, but such authorization shall not extend beyond the end of the biennium in which such funds are created. (5) Controlling board authorization for a state agency to make an expenditure of federal revenue constitutes authority for the agency to participate in the federal program providing the revenue, and the agency is not required to obtain an executive order under section 107.17 of the Revised Code to participate in the federal program. (B) With respect to nonfederal revenue received into any fund of the state, except for any other fund listed in division (D) of section 127.14 of the Revised Code: (1) No state agency may make expenditures of any of the revenue unless the expenditures are made pursuant to specific appropriations of the general assembly. (2) If the revenue received into any fund is greater than the amount appropriated, the appropriation for that fund shall remain at the amount designated by the general assembly or, subject to division (D)(E) of this section, as increased and approved by the controlling board. (3) Additional funds may be created by the controlling board to receive revenues not anticipated in an appropriations act for the biennium in which such new revenues are received. Subject to division (D) of this section, expenditures from such additional funds may be authorized by the controlling board, but such authorization shall not extend beyond the end of the biennium in which such funds are created. (C) The controlling board shall not authorize more than ten per cent of additional spending from the occupational licensing and regulatory fund, created in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code, in excess of any appropriation made by the general assembly to a licensing agency except an appropriation for costs related to the examination or reexamination of applicants for a license. As used in this division, "licensing agency" and "license" have the same meanings as in section 4745.01 of the Revised Code. (D) If federal revenue is received in the waterways safety fund or wildlife fund, the controlling board, at the request of the director of natural resources, may approve the expenditure of the federal revenue for purposes for which the federal revenue was granted. (E) The amount of any expenditure authorized under division (A)(2) or (4) or (B)(2) or (3) of this section for a specific or related purpose or item in any fiscal year shall not exceed an amount greater than one-half of one per cent of the general revenue fund appropriations one hundred million dollars for that fiscal year. Sec. 131.43. There is hereby created in the state treasury the budget stabilization fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. It is the intent of the general assembly to maintain an amount of money in the budget stabilization fund that amounts to approximately ten per cent of the general revenue fund revenues for the preceding fiscal year. The governor shall include in the state budget the governor submits to the general assembly under section 107.03 of the Revised Code proposals for transfers between the general revenue fund and the budget stabilization fund for the ensuing fiscal biennium. The balance in the fund may be combined with the balance in the general revenue fund for purposes of cash management. Sec. 131.50. (A) As used in this section, "state agency" has the same meaning as in section 155.30 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby created in the state treasury the state land royalty fund consisting of money credited to it under section 155.33 of the Revised Code. Any investment proceeds earned on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. (B)(1)(C)(1) A state agency is entitled to receive from the fund the amount that the state agency contributed and a share of the investment earnings of the fund in an amount that is equivalent to the proportionate share of contributions made by the state agency to the fund. Regarding the department of natural resources, each division within the department is entitled to receive from the department's proportionate share all amounts received by the department that are attributable to the state-owned land controlled by that division. (2) The treasurer of state, in consultation with Upon request from a state agency entitled to receive revenue in accordance with this section, the director of budget and management, shall disburse money transfer cash from the state land royalty fund to the natural resources land royalty fund, the wildlife land royalty fund, the transportation land royalty fund, or the appropriate fund designated by the any other state agency, as applicable, not later than thirty days after the deposit of any money into the state land royalty fund. If the state agency is the department of natural resources, the treasurer of state, in consultation with the director of budget and management and the director of natural resources, shall disburse the money to the appropriate fund designated by the applicable division within the department. (3) A state agency or, as applicable, a division of the department of natural resources, may use the money for any costs and expenses the agency determines are necessary. (C) As used in this section, "state agency" has the same meaning as in section 155.30 of the Revised Code.(D)(1) The natural resources land royalty fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money credited to it under division (C) of this section for leased mineral rights on land owned or controlled by the department of natural resources, other than the division of wildlife. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. (2) The wildlife land royalty fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money credited to it under division (C) of this section for leased mineral rights on land owned or controlled by the division of wildlife in the department of natural resources. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. (3) The transportation land royalty fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money credited to it under division (C) of this section for leased mineral rights on land owned or controlled by the department of transportation. All Investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 131.51. (A) On or before the seventh day of each month, the director of budget and management shall credit to the local government fund one and seven-tenths seventy-five one-hundredths per cent of the total tax revenue credited to the general revenue fund during the preceding month. In determining the total tax revenue credited to the general revenue fund during the preceding month, the director shall include amounts transferred from the fund during the preceding month under this division and division (B) of this section. Money shall be distributed from the local government fund as required under sections 5747.50 and 5747.503 of the Revised Code during the same month in which it is credited to the fund. (B) On or before the seventh day of each month, the director of budget and management shall credit to the public library fund one and seven-tenths per cent of the total tax revenue credited to the general revenue fund during the preceding month. In determining the total tax revenue credited to the general revenue fund during the preceding month, the director shall include amounts transferred from the fund during the preceding month under this division and division (A) of this section, from the general revenue fund, one-twelfth of the amount appropriated by the general assembly for the public library fund for the fiscal year. Money shall be distributed from the public library fund as required under section 5747.47 of the Revised Code during the same month in which it is credited to the fund. (C) The director of budget and management shall develop a schedule identifying the specific tax revenue sources to be used to make the monthly transfers required under divisionsdivision (A) and (B) of this section. The director may, from time to time, revise the schedule as the director considers necessary. Sec. 133.18. (A) The taxing authority of a subdivision may by legislation submit to the electors of the subdivision the question of issuing any general obligation bonds, for one purpose, that the subdivision has power or authority to issue. (B) When the taxing authority of a subdivision desires or is required by law to submit the question of a bond issue to the electors, it shall pass legislation that does all of the following: (1) Declares the necessity and purpose of the bond issue; (2) States the date of the authorized election at which the question shall be submitted to the electors; (3) States the amount, approximate date, estimated net average rate of interest, and maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (4) Declares the necessity of levying a tax outside the tax limitation to pay the debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities. The estimated net average interest rate shall be determined by the taxing authority based on, among other factors, then existing market conditions, and may reflect adjustments for any anticipated direct payments expected to be received by the taxing authority from the government of the United States relating to the bonds and the effect of any federal tax credits anticipated to be available to owners of all or a portion of the bonds. The estimated net average rate of interest, and any statutory or charter limit on interest rates that may then be in effect and that is subsequently amended, shall not be a limitation on the actual interest rate or rates on the securities when issued. (C) The taxing authority shall certify a copy of the legislation passed under division (B) of this section to the county auditor. The county auditor shall promptly calculate and advise and, not later than ninety days before the election, confirm that advice by certification to the taxing authority the estimated average annual property tax levy, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value and in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, that the county auditor estimates to be required throughout the stated maturity of the bonds to pay the debt charges on the bonds. In calculating the estimated average annual property tax levy for this purpose, the county auditor shall assume that the bonds are issued in one series bearing interest and maturing in substantially equal principal amounts in each year over the maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid as stated in that legislation, and that the amount of the tax valuation of the subdivision most recently certified by the county auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code remains the same throughout the maturity of the bonds. If the subdivision is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain the assistance of the county auditors of the other counties, and those county auditors shall provide assistance, in establishing the tax valuation of the subdivision for purposes of certifying the estimated average annual property tax levy. (D) After receiving the county auditor's advice under division (C) of this section, the taxing authority by legislation may determine to proceed with submitting the question of the issue of securities, and shall, not later than the ninetieth day before the day of the election, file the following with the board of elections: (1) Copies of the legislation provided for in divisions (B) and (D) of this section; (2) The amount of the estimated average annual property tax levy, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value and in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, as estimated and certified to the taxing authority by the county auditor. (E)(1) The board of elections shall prepare the ballots and make other necessary arrangements for the submission of the question to the electors of the subdivision. If the subdivision is located in more than one county, the board shall inform the boards of elections of the other counties of the filings with it, and those other boards shall if appropriate make the other necessary arrangements for the election in their counties. The election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided in Title XXXV of the Revised Code. (2) The election shall be held at the regular places for voting in the subdivision. If the electors of only a part of a precinct are qualified to vote at the election the board of elections may assign the electors in that part to an adjoining precinct, including an adjoining precinct in another county if the board of elections of the other county consents to and approves the assignment. Each elector so assigned shall be notified of that fact prior to the election by notice mailed by the board of elections, in such manner as it determines, prior to the election. (3) The board of elections shall publish a notice of the election once in a newspaper of general circulation in the subdivision, no later than ten days prior to the election. The notice shall state all of the following: (a) The principal amount of the proposed bond issue; (b) The stated purpose for which the bonds are to be issued; (c) The maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (d) The estimated additional average annual property tax levy, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value and in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, to be levied outside the tax limitation, as estimated and certified to the taxing authority by the county auditor; (e) The first calendar year in which the tax is expected to be due. (F) The form of the ballot to be used at the election shall be substantially either of the following, as applicable: (1) "Shall bonds be issued by the ____________ (name of subdivision) for the purpose of ___________ (purpose of the bond issue) in the principal amount of $__________ (principal amount of the bond issue), to be repaid annually over a maximum period of __________ (the maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid) years, and an annual levy of property taxes be made outside the __________ (as applicable, "ten-mill" or "___charter tax") limitation, estimated by the county auditor to average over the repayment period of the bond issue __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, commencing in __________ (first year the tax will be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due), to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds, and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of those bonds? For the bond issue Against the bond issue " (2) In the case of an election held pursuant to legislation adopted under section 3375.43 or 3375.431 of the Revised Code: "Shall bonds be issued for __________ (name of library) for the purpose of __________ (purpose of the bond issue), in the principal amount of $__________ (amount of the bond issue) by __________ (the name of the subdivision that is to issue the bonds and levy the tax) as the issuer of the bonds, to be repaid annually over a maximum period of __________ (the maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid) years, and an annual levy of property taxes be made outside the ten-mill limitation, estimated by the county auditor to average over the repayment period of the bond issue __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, commencing in __________ (first year the tax will be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due), to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds, and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of those bonds? For the bond issue Against the bond issue " (G) The board of elections shall promptly certify the results of the election to the tax commissioner, the county auditor of each county in which any part of the subdivision is located, and the fiscal officer of the subdivision. The election, including the proceedings for and result of the election, is incontestable other than in a contest filed under section 3515.09 of the Revised Code in which the plaintiff prevails. (H) If a majority of the electors voting upon the question vote for it, the taxing authority of the subdivision may proceed under sections 133.21 to 133.33 of the Revised Code with the issuance of the securities and with the levy and collection of a property tax outside the tax limitation during the period the securities are outstanding sufficient in amount to pay the debt charges on the securities, including debt charges on any anticipatory securities required to be paid from that tax. If legislation passed under section 133.22 or 133.23 of the Revised Code authorizing those securities is filed with the county auditor on or before the last day of November, the amount of the voted property tax levy required to pay debt charges or estimated debt charges on the securities payable in the following year shall if requested by the taxing authority be included in the taxes levied for collection in the following year under section 319.30 of the Revised Code. (I)(1) If, before any securities authorized at an election under this section are issued, the net indebtedness of the subdivision exceeds that applicable to that subdivision or those securities, then and so long as that is the case none of the securities may be issued. (2) No securities authorized at an election under this section may be initially issued after the first day of the sixth January following the election, but this period of limitation shall not run for any time during which any part of the permanent improvement for which the securities have been authorized, or the issuing or validity of any part of the securities issued or to be issued, or the related proceedings, is involved or questioned before a court or a commission or other tribunal, administrative agency, or board. (3) Securities representing a portion of the amount authorized at an election that are issued within the applicable limitation on net indebtedness are valid and in no manner affected by the fact that the balance of the securities authorized cannot be issued by reason of the net indebtedness limitation or lapse of time. (4) Nothing in this division (I) shall be interpreted or applied to prevent the issuance of securities in an amount to fund or refund anticipatory securities lawfully issued. (5) The limitations of divisions (I)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to any securities authorized at an election under this section if at least ten per cent of the principal amount of the securities, including anticipatory securities, authorized has theretofore been issued, or if the securities are to be issued for the purpose of participating in any federally or state-assisted program. (6) The certificate of the fiscal officer of the subdivision is conclusive proof of the facts referred to in this division. (J) As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" has the same meaning as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 135.01. Except as otherwise provided in sections 135.14, 135.143, 135.181, and 135.182 of the Revised Code, as used in sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code: (A) "Active deposit" means a public deposit necessary to meet current demands on the treasury, and that is deposited in any of the following: (1) A commercial account that is payable or withdrawable, in whole or in part, on demand; (2) A negotiable order of withdrawal account as authorized in the "Consumer Checking Account Equity Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 146, 12 U.S.C.A. 1832(a); (3) A money market deposit account as authorized in the "Garn-St. Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982," 96 Stat. 1501, 12 U.S.C. 3503. (B) "Auditor" includes the auditor of state and the auditor, or officer exercising the functions of an auditor, of any subdivision. (C) "Capital funds" means the sum of the following: the par value of the outstanding common capital stock, the par value of the outstanding preferred capital stock, the aggregate par value of all outstanding capital notes and debentures, and the surplus. In the case of an institution having offices in more than one county, the capital funds of such institution, for the purposes of sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code, relative to the deposit of the public moneys of the subdivisions in one such county, shall be considered to be that proportion of the capital funds of the institution that is represented by the ratio that the deposit liabilities of such institution originating at the office located in the county bears to the total deposit liabilities of the institution. (D) "Governing board" means, in the case of the state, the state board of deposit; in the case of all school districts and educational service centers except as otherwise provided in this section, the board of education or governing board of a service center, and when the case so requires, the board of commissioners of the sinking fund; in the case of a municipal corporation, the legislative authority, and when the case so requires, the board of trustees of the sinking fund; in the case of a township, the board of township trustees; in the case of a union or joint institution or enterprise of two or more subdivisions not having a treasurer, the board of directors or trustees thereof; and in the case of any other subdivision electing or appointing a treasurer, the directors, trustees, or other similar officers of such subdivision. The governing board of a subdivision electing or appointing a treasurer shall be the governing board of all other subdivisions for which such treasurer is authorized by law to act. In the case of a county school financing district that levies a tax pursuant to section 5705.215 of the Revised Code, the county board of education that serves as its taxing authority shall operate as a governing board. Any other county board of education shall operate as a governing board unless it adopts a resolution designating the board of county commissioners as the governing board for the county school district. (E) "Inactive deposit" means a public deposit other than an interim deposit or an active deposit. (F) "Interim deposit" means a deposit of interim moneys. "Interim moneys" means public moneys in the treasury of any subdivision after the award of inactive deposits has been made in accordance with section 135.07 of the Revised Code, which moneys are in excess of the aggregate amount of the inactive deposits as estimated by the governing board prior to the period of designation and which the governing board finds should not be deposited as active or inactive deposits for the reason that such moneys will not be needed for immediate use but will be needed before the end of the period of designation. In the case of the state treasury, "interim moneys" means public moneys that are not active deposits and may be invested in accordance with section 135.143 of the Revised Code. (G) "Permissible rate of interest" means a rate of interest that all eligible institutions mentioned in section 135.03 of the Revised Code are permitted to pay by law or valid regulations. (H) "Warrant clearance account" means an account established by the treasurer of state for either of the following purposes: (a)(1) The deposit of active state moneys for the purposes of clearing state paper warrants or checks through the banking system, funding electronic benefit transfer cards, issuing stored value cards, or otherwise facilitating the settlement of state obligations; (b)(2) The deposit of custodial moneys from an account held in the custody of the treasurer of state to facilitate settlement of obligations of the custodial fund. (I) "Public deposit" means public moneys deposited in a public depository pursuant to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (J) "Public depository" means an institution which receives or holds any public deposits. (K) "Public moneys" means all moneys in the treasury of the state or any subdivision of the state, or moneys coming lawfully into the possession or custody of the treasurer of state or of the treasurer of any subdivision. "Public moneys of the state" includes all such moneys coming lawfully into the possession of the treasurer of state; and "public moneys of a subdivision" includes all such moneys coming lawfully into the possession of the treasurer of the subdivision. (L) "Subdivision" means any municipal corporation, except one which has adopted a charter under Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, and the charter or ordinances of the chartered municipal corporation set forth special provisions respecting the deposit or investment of its public moneys, or any school district or educational service center, a county school financing district, township, municipal or school district sinking fund, special taxing or assessment district, or other district or local authority electing or appointing a treasurer, except a county. In the case of a school district or educational service center, special taxing or assessment district, or other local authority for which a treasurer, elected or appointed primarily as the treasurer of a subdivision, is authorized or required by law to act as ex officio treasurer, the subdivision for which such a treasurer has been primarily elected or appointed shall be considered to be the "subdivision." The term also includes a union or joint institution or enterprise of two or more subdivisions, that is not authorized to elect or appoint a treasurer, and for which no ex officio treasurer is provided by law. (M) "Treasurer" means, in the case of the state, the treasurer of state and in the case of any subdivision, the treasurer, or officer exercising the functions of a treasurer, of such subdivision. In the case of a board of trustees of the sinking fund of a municipal corporation, the board of commissioners of the sinking fund of a school district, or a board of directors or trustees of any union or joint institution or enterprise of two or more subdivisions not having a treasurer, such term means such board of trustees of the sinking fund, board of commissioners of the sinking fund, or board of directors or trustees. (N) "Treasury investment board" of a municipal corporation means the mayor or other chief executive officer, the village solicitor or city director of law, and the auditor or other chief fiscal officer. (O) "No-load money market mutual fund" means a no-load money market mutual fund to which all of the following apply: (1) The fund is registered as an investment company under the "Investment Company Act of 1940," 54 Stat. 789, 15 U.S.C.A. 80a-1 to 80a-64; (2) The fund has the highest letter or numerical rating provided by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization; (3) The fund does not include any investment in a derivative. As used in division (O)(3) of this section, "derivative" means a financial instrument or contract or obligation whose value or return is based upon or linked to another asset or index, or both, separate from the financial instrument, contract, or obligation itself. Any security, obligation, trust account, or other instrument that is created from an issue of the United States treasury or is created from an obligation of a federal agency or instrumentality or is created from both is considered a derivative instrument. An eligible investment described in section 135.14 or 135.35 of the Revised Code with a variable interest rate payment, based upon a single interest payment or single index comprised of other investments provided for in division (B)(1) or (2) of section 135.14 of the Revised Code, is not a derivative, provided that such variable rate investment has a maximum maturity of two years. (P) "Public depositor" means the state or a subdivision, as applicable, that deposits public moneys in a public depository pursuant to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (Q) "Uninsured public deposit" means the portion of a public deposit that is not insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or by any other agency or instrumentality of the federal government. Sec. 135.03. (A) As used in this section, "banking office" has the same meaning as in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Any national bank, any bank doing business under authority granted by the superintendent of financial institutions, or any bank doing business under authority granted by the regulatory authority of another state of the United States, and which has a banking office located in this state, is eligible to become a public depository, subject to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. No bank shall receive or have on deposit at any one time public moneys, including public moneys as defined in section 135.31 of the Revised Code, in an aggregate amount in excess of thirty per cent of its total assets, as shown in its latest report to the comptroller of the currency, the superintendent of financial institutions, the federal deposit insurance corporation, or the board of governors of the federal reserve system. (C) Any federal savings association or any savings and loan association or savings bank doing business under authority granted by the regulatory authority of another state of the United States, and which has a banking office located in this state, and authorized to accept deposits is eligible to become a public depository, subject to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. No savings association, savings and loan association, or savings bank shall receive or have on deposit at any one time public moneys, including public moneys as defined in section 135.31 of the Revised Code, in an aggregate amount in excess of thirty per cent of its total assets, as shown in its latest report to the former office of thrift supervision, the comptroller of the currency, the superintendent of financial institutions, the federal deposit insurance corporation, or the board of governors of the federal reserve system. Sec. 135.143. (A) The treasurer of state may invest or execute transactions for any part or all of the interim funds of the state in the following classifications of obligations: (1) United States treasury bills, notes, bonds, or any other obligations or securities issued by the United States treasury or any other obligation guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States; (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by any federal government agency or instrumentality; (3)(a) Bonds, notes, and other obligations of the state of Ohio, including, but not limited to, any obligations issued by the treasurer of state, the Ohio public facilities commission, the Ohio housing finance agency, the Ohio water development authority, the Ohio turnpike infrastructure commission, the Ohio higher educational facility commission, and state institutions of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) Bonds, notes, and other obligations of any state or political subdivision thereof rated in the three highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization and purchased through a registered securities broker or dealer, provided the treasurer of state is not the sole purchaser of the bonds, notes, or other obligations at original issuance. (4)(a) Written repurchase agreements with any eligible Ohio financial institution that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank, any registered United States government securities dealer, or any counterparty rated in one of the three highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or otherwise determined by the treasurer of state to have adequate capital and liquidity, under the terms of which agreement the treasurer of state purchases and the eligible financial institution, dealer, or counterparty agrees unconditionally to repurchase any of the securities that are listed in division (A)(1), (2), (3), (6), or (11) of this section. The market value of securities subject to these transactions must exceed the principal value of the repurchase agreement by an amount specified by the treasurer of state, and the securities must be delivered into the custody of the treasurer of state or the qualified trustee or agent designated by the treasurer of state. The agreement shall contain the requirement that for each transaction pursuant to the agreement, the participating institution, dealer, or counterparty shall provide all of the following information: (i) The par value of the securities; (ii) The type, rate, and maturity date of the securities; (iii) A numerical identifier generally accepted in the securities industry that designates the securities. (b) The treasurer of state also may sell any securities, listed in division (A)(1), (2), (6), or (11) of this section, regardless of maturity or time of redemption of the securities, under the same terms and conditions for repurchase, provided that the securities have been fully paid for and are owned by the treasurer of state at the time of the sale. (c) For purposes of division (A)(4) of this section, the treasurer of state shall only buy or sell securities listed in division (A)(11) of this section issued by entities that are organized under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States. (5) Securities lending agreements with any eligible financial institution that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank or any recognized United States government securities dealer, under the terms of which agreements the treasurer of state lends securities and the eligible financial institution or dealer agrees to simultaneously exchange similar securities or cash, equal value for equal value. Securities and cash received as collateral for a securities lending agreement are not interim funds of the state. The investment of cash collateral received pursuant to a securities lending agreement may be invested only in such instruments specified by the treasurer of state in accordance with a written investment policy. (6) Various forms of commercial paper issued by any entity that is organized under the laws of the United States or a state, which notes are rated in the two highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, provided that the total amount invested under this section in any commercial paper at any time shall not exceed forty per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state; (7) Bankers acceptances, maturing in two hundred seventy days or less, provided that the total amount invested in bankers acceptances at any time shall not exceed ten per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state; (8) Certificates of deposit, savings accounts, or deposit accounts in eligible institutions applying for interim moneys as provided in section 135.08 of the Revised Code, including linked deposits as authorized under section 135.61 of the Revised Code; . For interim funds invested in accordance with division (A)(8) of this section, the pledging requirements described in section 135.18, 135.181, or 135.182 of the Revised Code may be reduced by up to ten per cent in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state. (9) Negotiable certificates of deposit denominated in United States dollars issued by a nationally or state-chartered bank, a savings association or a federal savings association, a state or federal credit union, or a federally licensed or state-licensed branch of a foreign bank, which are rated in the two highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, provided that the total amount invested under this section in negotiable certificates of deposit at any time shall not exceed twenty-five per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. Interim funds invested in accordance with division (A)(9) of this section are not limited to institutions applying for interim moneys under section 135.08 of the Revised Code, nor are they subject to any pledging requirements described in sections 135.18, 135.181, or 135.182 of the Revised Code. (10) The state treasurer's investment pool authorized under section 135.45 of the Revised Code; (11) Debt interests, other than commercial paper described in division (A)(6) of this section, rated in the three four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations and issued by entities that are organized under the laws of the United States or a state, or issued by foreign nations diplomatically recognized by the United States government, or any instrument based on, derived from, or related to such interests, provided that: (a) The investments in debt interests other than commercial paper, when added to the investment in written repurchase agreements for securities listed in division (A)(3) or (11) of this section, shall not exceed in the aggregate twenty-five per cent of the state's portfolio. (b) The investments in debt interests rated in the fourth highest category shall not exceed in the aggregate ten per cent of the state's portfolio. (c) The investments in debt interests issued by foreign nations shall not exceed in the aggregate two per cent of the state's portfolio. The treasurer of state shall invest under division (A)(11) of this section in a debt interest issued by a foreign nation only if the debt interest is backed by the full faith and credit of that foreign nation, and provided that all interest and principal shall be denominated and payable in United States funds. (c)(d) When added to the investment in commercial paper and negotiable certificates of deposit, the investments in the debt interests of a single issuer shall not exceed in the aggregate five per cent of the state's portfolio. (d)(e) For purposes of division (A)(11) of this section, a debt interest is rated in the three four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations if either the debt interest itself or the issuer of the debt interest is rated, or is implicitly rated, in the three four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (e)(f) For purposes of division (A)(11) of this section, the "state's portfolio" means the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. (12) No-load money market mutual funds rated in the highest category by one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or consisting exclusively of obligations described in division (A)(1), (2), or (6) of this section and repurchase agreements secured by such obligations; (13) Obligations issued by, or on behalf of, an Ohio political subdivision under Chapter 133. of the Revised Code or Section 12 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, and identified in an agreement described in division (G) of this section; (14) Obligations issued by the state of Ohio, any political subdivision thereof, or by or on behalf of any nonprofit corporation or association doing business in this state rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization and identified in an agreement described in division (K) of this section. (B)(B)(1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the treasurer of state shall notify the state board of deposit that the following reports pertaining to the immediately preceding month have been posted to the web site maintained by the treasurer of state: (1)(a) The daily ledger report of state funds prepared in accordance with section 113.13 of the Revised Code; (2)(b) The monthly portfolio report detailing the current inventory of all investments and deposits held within the classification of interim moneys; (3)(c) The monthly activity report within the classification of interim moneys summarized by type of investment or deposit. (2) In the event the state board of deposit does not concur in such classification or in the investments or deposits made under this section, subject to division (B)(3) of this section, the board may order the treasurer of state to sell or liquidate any of the investments or deposits, and any such order shall specifically describe the investments or deposits and fix the date upon which they are to be sold or liquidated. Investments or deposits so ordered to be sold or liquidated shall be sold or liquidated for cash by the treasurer of state on the date fixed in such order at the then current market price. Neither the treasurer of state nor the members of the state board of deposit shall be held accountable for any loss occasioned by sales or liquidations of investments or deposits at prices lower than their cost. Any loss or expense incurred in making these sales or liquidations is payable as other expenses of the treasurer's office. (3) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, the state board of deposit shall not order the treasurer of state to sell or liquidate investments or deposits with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. (C) If any securities or obligations invested in by the treasurer of state pursuant to this section are registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, such securities or obligations shall be registered in the name of the treasurer of state. (D) The treasurer of state is responsible for the safekeeping of all securities or obligations under this section. Any such securities or obligations may be deposited for safekeeping as provided in section 113.05 of the Revised Code. (E) Interest earned on any investments or deposits authorized by this section shall be collected by the treasurer of state and credited by the treasurer of state to the proper fund of the state. (F) Whenever investments or deposits acquired under this section mature and become due and payable, the treasurer of state shall present them for payment according to their tenor, and shall collect the moneys payable thereon. The moneys so collected shall be treated as public moneys subject to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (G) The treasurer of state and any entity issuing obligations referred to in division (A)(13) of this section, which obligations mature within one year from the original date of issuance, may enter into an agreement providing for: (1) The purchase of those obligations by the treasurer of state on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (2) The payment to the treasurer of state of a reasonable fee as consideration for the agreement of the treasurer of state to purchase those obligations; provided, however, that the treasurer of state shall not be authorized to enter into any such agreement with a board of education of a school district that has an outstanding obligation with respect to a loan received under authority of section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. (H) For purposes of division (G) of this section, a fee shall not be considered reasonable unless it is set to recover only the direct costs, a reasonable estimate of the indirect costs associated with the purchasing of obligations under division (G) of this section and any reselling of the obligations or any interest in the obligations, including interests in a fund comprised of the obligations, and the administration thereof. No money from the general revenue fund shall be used to subsidize the purchase or resale of these obligations. (I) All money collected by the treasurer of state from the fee imposed by division (G) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state political subdivision obligations fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. Money credited to the fund shall be used solely to pay the treasurer of state's direct and indirect costs associated with purchasing and reselling obligations under division (G) of this section. (J) As used in this section, "political subdivision" means a county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or other body corporate and politic responsible for governmental activities in a geographic area smaller than that of the state. (K)(1) The treasurer of state and any entity issuing obligations referred to in division (A)(14) of this section, which obligations require a conditional liquidity requirement, may enter into an agreement providing for the following: (a) The purchase of the obligations by the treasurer of state on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (b) Payment to the treasurer of state of a fee as consideration for the agreement of the treasurer of state to purchase the obligations. (2) The treasurer of state shall not enter into agreements under division (K)(1) of this section for obligations that, in the aggregate, exceed ten per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. (3) For purposes of division (A)(14) of this section, an obligation is rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization if either the debt interest itself or the obligor of the debt interest is rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization. (4) All money collected by the treasurer of state from the fee imposed by division (K) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state securities tender program fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The amount of income from the state securities tender program credited to the state securities tender program fund shall not exceed one per cent of the average par value of obligations subject to agreements under division (K)(1) of this section. All other such income shall be credited to the general revenue fund. The treasurer of state may use the state securities tender program fund solely for operations of the office of the treasurer of state. (L)(1) The treasurer of state and a state university or college issuing obligations under section 3345.12 of the Revised Code may enter into an agreement providing for the following: (a) The purchase of those obligations by the treasurer of state pursuant to division (A)(3)(a) of this section on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (b) The department of higher education to withhold, in the event the state university or college does not pay bond service charges on the obligations when due, appropriated funds allocated to the state university or college in an amount sufficient to pay bond service charges on the obligations, less any amounts deposited for that purpose under the bond proceedings. Upon the request of the treasurer of state, the department of higher education shall promptly pay to the treasurer of state the amounts withheld. (2) For purposes of division (L)(1) of this section, "obligations," "state university or college," "bond service charges," and "bond proceedings" have the same meanings as in section 3345.12 of the Revised Code. (M) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, the treasurer of state shall not do either of the following: (1) Make an investment decision with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy; (2) Permit any person or entity to which the treasurer of state delegates the management of the investment of state money to make investment decisions with state money with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. Sec. 135.1411. Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, the treasurer or the governing board of a municipal corporation shall not do either of the following: (A) Make an investment decision with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy; (B) Permit any person or entity to which the treasurer or governing board delegates the management of the investment of public money to make investment decisions with public money with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. Sec. 135.18. (A) Each institution designated as a public depository and awarded public deposits under sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code, except as provided in section 135.144 or 135.145 of the Revised Code, shall provide security for the repayment of all public deposits by selecting one of the following methods: (1) Securing all uninsured public deposits of each public depositor separately as set forth in divisions (B) to (J) of this section; (2) Securing all uninsured public deposits of every public depositor pursuant to section 135.181 or 135.182 of the Revised Code, as applicable, by establishing and pledging to the treasurer of state a single pool of collateral for the benefit of every public depositor at the public depository. (B) If a public depository elects to provide security pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section, the public depository shall pledge to the public depositor, as security for the repayment of all public moneys deposited in the public depository during the period of designation pursuant to an award made under sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code, eligible securities of aggregate market value at all times equal to at least one hundred five per cent of the total amount of the public depositor's uninsured public deposits. (C) In order for a public depository to receive public moneys under this section, the public depository and the public depositor shall first execute an agreement that sets forth the entire arrangement among the parties and that meets the requirements described in 12 U.S.C. 1823(e). In addition, the agreement shall authorize the public depositor to obtain control of the collateral pursuant to division (D) of section 1308.24 of the Revised Code. (D) The following securities or other obligations shall be eligible for the purposes of this section: (1) Bonds, notes, or other obligations of the United States; or bonds, notes, or other obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or those for which the faith of the United States is pledged for the payment of principal and interest thereon, by language appearing in the instrument specifically providing such guarantee or pledge and not merely by interpretation or otherwise; (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, letters of credit, or other obligations or securities issued by any federal government agency or instrumentality, or the export-import bank of Washington; bonds, notes, or other obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or those for which the faith of the United States is pledged for the payment of principal and interest thereon, by interpretation or otherwise and not by language appearing in the instrument specifically providing such guarantee or pledge; (3) Obligations of or fully insured or fully guaranteed by the United States or any federal government agency or instrumentality; (4) Obligations partially insured or partially guaranteed by any federal agency or instrumentality; (5) Obligations of or fully guaranteed by the federal national mortgage association, federal home loan mortgage corporation, federal farm credit bank, or student loan marketing association; (6) Bonds and other obligations of this state; (7) Bonds and other obligations of any county, township, school district, municipal corporation, or other legally constituted taxing subdivision of this state, which is not at the time of such deposit, in default in the payment of principal or interest on any of its bonds or other obligations, for which the full faith and credit of the issuing subdivision is pledged; (8) Bonds of other states of the United States which have not during the ten years immediately preceding the time of such deposit defaulted in payments of either interest or principal on any of their bonds; (9) Shares of no-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of obligations described in division (D)(1) or (2) of this section and repurchase agreements secured by such obligations; (10) A surety bond issued by a corporate surety licensed by the state and authorized to issue surety bonds in this state pursuant to Chapter 3929. of the Revised Code, and qualified to provide surety bonds to the federal government pursuant to 96 Stat. 1047 (1982), 31 U.S.C.A. 9304; (11) Bonds or other obligations of any county, municipal corporation, or other legally constituted taxing subdivision of another state of the United States, or of any instrumentality of such county, municipal corporation, or other taxing subdivision, for which the full faith and credit of the issuer is pledged and, at the time of purchase of the bonds or other obligations, rated in one of the two highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization. (E) An institution designated as a public depository shall designate a qualified trustee and place the eligible securities required by division (D) of this section with the trustee for safekeeping. The trustee shall hold the eligible securities in an account indicating the public depositor's security interest in the securities. The trustee shall report to the public depositor information relating to the securities pledged to secure the public deposits in the manner and frequency required by the public depositor. (F) The qualified trustee shall enter into a custodial agreement with the public depositor and public depository in which the trustee agrees to comply with entitlement orders originated by the public depositor without further consent by the public depository or, in the case of collateral held by the public depository in an account at a federal reserve bank, the public depositor shall have the public depositor's security interest marked on the books of the federal reserve bank where the account for the collateral is maintained. If the public depository fails to pay over any part of the public deposits made by the public depositor therein as provided by law, the public depositor shall give written notice of this failure to the qualified trustee holding the securities pledged against its public deposits and, at the same time, shall send a copy of this notice to the public depository. Upon receipt of this notice, the trustee shall transfer to the public depositor for sale, the securities that are necessary to produce an amount equal to the public deposits made by the public depositor and not paid over, less the portion of the deposits covered by any federal deposit insurance, plus any accrued interest due on the deposits. The public depositor shall sell any of the bonds or other securities so transferred. When a sale of bonds or other securities has been so made and upon payment to the public depositor of the purchase money, the public depositor shall transfer such bonds or securities whereupon the absolute ownership of such bonds or securities shall pass to the purchasers. Any surplus after deducting the amount due the public depositor and expenses of sale shall be paid to the public depository. (G) When the public depository has placed eligible securities described in division (D)(1) of this section with a trustee for safekeeping, the public depository may at any time substitute or exchange eligible securities described in division (D)(1) of this section having a current market value equal to or greater than the current market value of the securities then on deposit and for which they are to be substituted or exchanged, without specific authorization from any public depositor's governing board, boards, or treasurer of any such substitution or exchange. (H) When the public depository has placed eligible securities described in divisions (D)(2) to (9) of this section with a trustee for safekeeping, the public depository may at any time substitute or exchange eligible securities having a current market value equal to or greater than the current market value of the securities then on deposit and for which they are to be substituted or exchanged without specific authorization of any public depositor's governing board, boards, or treasurer of any such substitution or exchange only if one of the following applies: (1) The public depositor has authorized the public depository to make such substitution or exchange on a continuing basis during a specified period without prior approval of each substitution or exchange. The authorization may be effected by the public depositor sending to the trustee a written notice stating that substitution may be effected on a continuing basis during a specified period which shall not extend beyond the end of the period of designation during which the notice is given. The trustee may rely upon this notice and upon the period of authorization stated therein and upon the period of designation stated therein. (2) The public depository notifies the public depositor and the trustee of an intended substitution or exchange, and the public depositor does not object to the trustee as to the eligibility or market value of the securities being substituted within three business days after the date appearing on the notice of proposed substitution. The notice to the public depositor and to the trustee shall be given in writing and delivered electronically. The trustee may assume in any case that the notice has been delivered to the public depositor. In order for objections of the public depositor to be effective, receipt of the objections must be acknowledged in writing by the trustee. (3) The public depositor gives written authorization for a substitution or exchange of specific securities. (I) The public depository shall notify any public depositor of any substitution or exchange under division (H)(1) or (2) of this section. (J) Any federal reserve bank or branch thereof located in this state or federal home loan bank, without compliance with Chapter 1111. of the Revised Code and without becoming subject to any other law of this state relative to the exercise by corporations of trust powers generally, is qualified to act as trustee for the safekeeping of securities, under this section. Any institution mentioned in section 135.03 or 135.32 of the Revised Code that holds a certificate of qualification issued by the superintendent of financial institutions or any institution complying with sections 1111.04, 1111.05, and 1111.06 of the Revised Code, is qualified to act as trustee for the safekeeping of securities under this section, other than those belonging to itself or to an affiliate as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding the fact that a public depository is required to pledge eligible securities in certain amounts to secure deposits of public moneys, a trustee has no duty or obligation to determine the eligibility, market value, or face value of any securities deposited with the trustee by a public depository. This applies in all situations including, without limitation, a substitution or exchange of securities. Any charges or compensation of a designated trustee for acting as such under this section shall be paid by the public depository and in no event shall be chargeable to the state or the subdivision or to any officer of the state or subdivision. The charges or compensation shall not be a lien or charge upon the securities deposited for safekeeping prior or superior to the rights to and interests in the securities of the public depositor. The treasurer and the treasurer's bonders or surety shall be relieved from any liability to the public depositor or to the public depository for the loss or destruction of any securities deposited with a qualified trustee pursuant to this section. Sec. 135.35. (A) The investing authority shall deposit or invest any part or all of the county's inactive moneys and shall invest all of the money in the county public library fund when required by section 135.352 of the Revised Code. The following classifications of securities and obligations are eligible for such deposit or investment: (1) United States treasury bills, notes, bonds, or any other obligation or security issued by the United States treasury, any other obligation guaranteed as to principal or interest by the United States, or any book entry, zero-coupon United States treasury security that is a direct obligation of the United States. Nothing in the classification of eligible securities and obligations set forth in divisions (A)(2) to (10) of this section shall be construed to authorize any investment in stripped principal or interest obligations of such eligible securities and obligations. (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by any federal government agency or instrumentality, including, but not limited to, the federal national mortgage association, federal home loan bank, federal farm credit bank, federal home loan mortgage corporation, and government national mortgage association. All federal agency securities shall be direct issuances of federal government agencies or instrumentalities. (3) Time certificates of deposit or savings or deposit accounts, including, but not limited to, passbook accounts, in any eligible institution mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code; (4) Bonds and other obligations of this state or the political subdivisions of this state, provided the bonds or other obligations of political subdivisions mature within ten years from the date of settlement; (5) No-load money market mutual funds rated in the highest category at the time of purchase by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or consisting exclusively of obligations described in division (A)(1), (2), or (6) of section 135.143 of the Revised Code and repurchase agreements secured by such obligations, provided that investments in securities described in this division are made only through eligible institutions mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code; (6) The Ohio subdivision's fund as provided in section 135.45 of the Revised Code; (7) Securities lending agreements with any eligible institution mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank or with any recognized United States government securities dealer meeting the description in division (J)(1) of this section, under the terms of which agreements the investing authority lends securities and the eligible institution or dealer agrees to simultaneously exchange similar securities or cash, equal value for equal value. Securities and cash received as collateral for a securities lending agreement are not inactive moneys of the county or moneys of a county public library fund. The investment of cash collateral received pursuant to a securities lending agreement may be invested only in instruments specified by the investing authority in the written investment policy described in division (K) of this section. (8) Up to forty per cent of the county's total average portfolio in either of the following investments: (a) Commercial paper notes issued by an entity that is defined in division (D) of section 1705.01 or division (E) (K) of section 1706.01 of the Revised Code and that has assets exceeding five hundred million dollars, to which notes all of the following apply: (i) The notes are rated at the time of purchase in the highest classification established by at least two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (ii) The aggregate value of the notes does not exceed ten per cent of the aggregate value of the outstanding commercial paper of the issuing corporation. (iii) The notes mature not later than two hundred seventy days after purchase. (iv) The investment in commercial paper notes of a single issuer shall not exceed in the aggregate five per cent of interim moneys available for investment at the time of purchase. (b) Bankers acceptances of banks that are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation and that mature not later than one hundred eighty days after purchase. No investment shall be made pursuant to division (A)(8) of this section unless the investing authority has completed additional training for making the investments authorized by division (A)(8) of this section. The type and amount of additional training shall be approved by the treasurer of state and may be conducted by or provided under the supervision of the treasurer of state. (9) Up to fifteen per cent of the county's total average portfolio in notes issued by corporations that are incorporated under the laws of the United States and that are operating within the United States, or by depository institutions that are doing business under authority granted by the United States or any state and that are operating within the United States, provided both of the following apply: (a) The notes are rated in the three highest categories by at least two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations at the time of purchase. (b) The notes mature not later than three years after purchase. (10) Debt interests rated at the time of purchase in the three highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations and issued by foreign nations diplomatically recognized by the United States government. All interest and principal shall be denominated and payable in United States funds. The investments made under division (A)(10) of this section shall not exceed in the aggregate two per cent of a county's total average portfolio. The investing authority shall invest under division (A)(10) of this section in a debt interest issued by a foreign nation only if the debt interest is backed by the full faith and credit of that foreign nation, there is no prior history of default, and the debt interest matures not later than five years after purchase. For purposes of division (A)(10) of this section, a debt interest is rated in the three highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations if either the debt interest itself or the issuer of the debt interest is rated, or is implicitly rated, at the time of purchase in the three highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (11) A current unpaid or delinquent tax line of credit authorized under division (G) of section 135.341 of the Revised Code, provided that all of the conditions for entering into such a line of credit under that division are satisfied, or bonds and other obligations of a county land reutilization corporation organized under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code, if the county land reutilization corporation is located wholly or partly within the same county as the investing authority. (B) Nothing in the classifications of eligible obligations and securities set forth in divisions (A)(1) to (10) of this section shall be construed to authorize investment in a derivative, and no investing authority shall invest any county inactive moneys or any moneys in a county public library fund in a derivative. For purposes of this division, "derivative" means a financial instrument or contract or obligation whose value or return is based upon or linked to another asset or index, or both, separate from the financial instrument, contract, or obligation itself. Any security, obligation, trust account, or other instrument that is created from an issue of the United States treasury or is created from an obligation of a federal agency or instrumentality or is created from both is considered a derivative instrument. An eligible investment described in this section with a variable interest rate payment, based upon a single interest payment or single index comprised of other eligible investments provided for in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, is not a derivative, provided that such variable rate investment has a maximum maturity of two years. A treasury inflation-protected security shall not be considered a derivative, provided the security matures not later than five years after purchase. (C) Except as provided in division (A)(4) or (D) of this section, any investment made pursuant to this section must mature within five years from the date of settlement, unless the investment is matched to a specific obligation or debt of the county or to a specific obligation or debt of a political subdivision of this state, and the investment is specifically approved by the investment advisory committee. (D) The investing authority may also enter into a written repurchase agreement with any eligible institution mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code or any eligible securities dealer pursuant to division (J) of this section, under the terms of which agreement the investing authority purchases and the eligible institution or dealer agrees unconditionally to repurchase any of the securities listed in divisions (D)(1) to (5), except letters of credit described in division (D)(2), of section 135.18 of the Revised Code. The market value of securities subject to an overnight written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the overnight written repurchase agreement by at least two per cent. A written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the overnight written repurchase agreement, by at least two per cent. A written repurchase agreement shall not exceed thirty days, and the market value of securities subject to a written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the written repurchase agreement by at least two per cent and be marked to market daily. All securities purchased pursuant to this division shall be delivered into the custody of the investing authority or the qualified custodian of the investing authority or an agent designated by the investing authority. A written repurchase agreement with an eligible securities dealer shall be transacted on a delivery versus payment basis. The agreement shall contain the requirement that for each transaction pursuant to the agreement the participating institution shall provide all of the following information: (1) The par value of the securities; (2) The type, rate, and maturity date of the securities; (3) A numerical identifier generally accepted in the securities industry that designates the securities. No investing authority shall enter into a written repurchase agreement under the terms of which the investing authority agrees to sell securities owned by the county to a purchaser and agrees with that purchaser to unconditionally repurchase those securities. (E) No investing authority shall make an investment under this section, unless the investing authority, at the time of making the investment, reasonably expects that the investment can be held until its maturity. The investing authority's written investment policy shall specify the conditions under which an investment may be redeemed or sold prior to maturity. (F) No investing authority shall pay a county's inactive moneys or moneys of a county public library fund into a fund established by another subdivision, treasurer, governing board, or investing authority, if that fund was established by the subdivision, treasurer, governing board, or investing authority for the purpose of investing or depositing the public moneys of other subdivisions. This division does not apply to the payment of public moneys into either of the following: (1) The Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant to division (A)(6) of this section; (2) A fund created solely for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, owning, leasing, or operating municipal utilities pursuant to the authority provided under section 715.02 of the Revised Code or Section 4 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution. For purposes of division (F) of this section, "subdivision" includes a county. (G) The use of leverage, in which the county uses its current investment assets as collateral for the purpose of purchasing other assets, is prohibited. The issuance of taxable notes for the purpose of arbitrage is prohibited. Contracting to sell securities not owned by the county, for the purpose of purchasing such securities on the speculation that bond prices will decline, is prohibited. (H) Any securities, certificates of deposit, deposit accounts, or any other documents evidencing deposits or investments made under authority of this section shall be issued in the name of the county with the county treasurer or investing authority as the designated payee. If any such deposits or investments are registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, they shall be registered in the name of the treasurer. (I) The investing authority shall be responsible for the safekeeping of all documents evidencing a deposit or investment acquired under this section, including, but not limited to, safekeeping receipts evidencing securities deposited with a qualified trustee, as provided in section 135.37 of the Revised Code, and documents confirming the purchase of securities under any repurchase agreement under this section shall be deposited with a qualified trustee, provided, however, that the qualified trustee shall be required to report to the investing authority, auditor of state, or an authorized outside auditor at any time upon request as to the identity, market value, and location of the document evidencing each security, and that if the participating institution is a designated depository of the county for the current period of designation, the securities that are the subject of the repurchase agreement may be delivered to the treasurer or held in trust by the participating institution on behalf of the investing authority. Upon the expiration of the term of office of an investing authority or in the event of a vacancy in the office for any reason, the officer or the officer's legal representative shall transfer and deliver to the officer's successor all documents mentioned in this division for which the officer has been responsible for safekeeping. For all such documents transferred and delivered, the officer shall be credited with, and the officer's successor shall be charged with, the amount of moneys evidenced by such documents. (J)(1) All investments, except for investments in securities described in divisions (A)(5), (6), and (11) of this section, shall be made only through a member of the financial industry regulatory authority (FINRA), through a bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association regulated by the superintendent of financial institutions, or through an institution regulated by the comptroller of the currency, federal deposit insurance corporation, or board of governors of the federal reserve system. (2) Payment for investments shall be made only upon the delivery of securities representing such investments to the treasurer, investing authority, or qualified trustee. If the securities transferred are not represented by a certificate, payment shall be made only upon receipt of confirmation of transfer from the custodian by the treasurer, governing board, or qualified trustee. (K)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(2) of this section, no investing authority shall make an investment or deposit under this section, unless there is on file with the auditor of state a written investment policy approved by the investing authority. The policy shall require that all entities conducting investment business with the investing authority shall sign the investment policy of that investing authority. All brokers, dealers, and financial institutions, described in division (J)(1) of this section, initiating transactions with the investing authority by giving advice or making investment recommendations shall sign the investing authority's investment policy thereby acknowledging their agreement to abide by the policy's contents. All brokers, dealers, and financial institutions, described in division (J)(1) of this section, executing transactions initiated by the investing authority, having read the policy's contents, shall sign the investment policy thereby acknowledging their comprehension and receipt. (2) If a written investment policy described in division (K)(1) of this section is not filed on behalf of the county with the auditor of state, the investing authority of that county shall invest the county's inactive moneys and moneys of the county public library fund only in time certificates of deposits or savings or deposit accounts pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section, no-load money market mutual funds pursuant to division (A)(5) of this section, or the Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant to division (A)(6) of this section. (L)(1) The investing authority shall establish and maintain an inventory of all obligations and securities acquired by the investing authority pursuant to this section. The inventory shall include a description of each obligation or security, including type, cost, par value, maturity date, settlement date, and any coupon rate. (2) The investing authority shall also keep a complete record of all purchases and sales of the obligations and securities made pursuant to this section. (3) The investing authority shall maintain a monthly portfolio report and issue a copy of the monthly portfolio report describing such investments to the county investment advisory committee, detailing the current inventory of all obligations and securities, all transactions during the month that affected the inventory, any income received from the obligations and securities, and any investment expenses paid, and stating the names of any persons effecting transactions on behalf of the investing authority. (4) The monthly portfolio report shall be a public record and available for inspection under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (5) The inventory and the monthly portfolio report shall be filed with the board of county commissioners. The monthly portfolio report also shall be filed with the treasurer of state. (M) An investing authority may enter into a written investment or deposit agreement that includes a provision under which the parties agree to submit to nonbinding arbitration to settle any controversy that may arise out of the agreement, including any controversy pertaining to losses of public moneys resulting from investment or deposit. The arbitration provision shall be set forth entirely in the agreement, and the agreement shall include a conspicuous notice to the parties that any party to the arbitration may apply to the court of common pleas of the county in which the arbitration was held for an order to vacate, modify, or correct the award. Any such party may also apply to the court for an order to change venue to a court of common pleas located more than one hundred miles from the county in which the investing authority is located. For purposes of this division, "investment or deposit agreement" means any agreement between an investing authority and a person, under which agreement the person agrees to invest, deposit, or otherwise manage, on behalf of the investing authority, a county's inactive moneys or moneys in a county public library fund, or agrees to provide investment advice to the investing authority. (N)(1) An investment held in the county portfolio on September 27, 1996, that was a legal investment under the law as it existed before September 27, 1996, may be held until maturity. (2) An investment held in the county portfolio on September 10, 2012, that was a legal investment under the law as it existed before September 10, 2012, may be held until maturity. (O) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, an investing authority shall not do either of the following: (1) Make an investment decision with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy; (2) Permit any person or entity to which the investing authority delegates the management of the investment of public money to make investment decisions with public money with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. Sec. 135.70. As used in sections 135.70 to 135.71 of the Revised Code: (A) "Closing costs" means a disbursement listed on a closing disclosure for the purchase of a home by an eligible participant. (B) "Closing disclosure" means the statement of receipts and disbursements for a transaction related to real estate, including a statement prescribed under the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974, 12 U.S.C. 2601 et seq., as amended, and the regulations thereunder. (C) "Discount interest rate" means an interest rate below the prevailing interest rate that the treasurer of state determines eligible savings institutions are willing to pay to hold linked deposits. (D) "Eligible credit union" has the same meaning as in section 135.62 of the Revised Code. (E) "Eligible expenses" has the same meaning as in section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. (F) "Eligible home costs" means the down payment, eligible expenses, and closing costs for the purchase of a home by an eligible participant, or the transfer of funds from one homeownership savings account to another homeownership savings account belonging to the eligible participant at a different eligible savings institution, or the withdrawal of funds from a homeownership savings account that are redeposited into the same or another homeownership savings account belonging to the eligible participant within ninety days of the initial withdrawal. (G) "Eligible participant" means an individual who has met all of the requirements necessary to participate in the specific linked deposit program for which they have applied. (H) "Eligible program costs" means costs corresponding to the purpose of the eligible linked deposit program. (I) "Eligible savings institution" means a financial institution that: (1) Offers accounts to residents of this state to save for the purposes related to the applicable linked deposit program; (2) Agrees to participate in the applicable linked deposit program; (3) Is a public depository of state funds, or an eligible credit union designated under division (A) of section 135.12 of the Revised Code. (J) "Home" means "primary residence" as defined by section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. (K) "Homeownership savings account" means a linked deposit savings account opened exclusively for the purpose of paying eligible home costs and in compliance with the requirements of section 135.71 of the Revised Code. (L) "Linked deposit" means a certificate of deposit, share certificate, other financial institution instrument, or portion of an existing deposit of interim funds made in accordance with section 135.09 of the Revised Code that is placed, purchased, or designated by the treasurer of state with an eligible savings institution; provided the institution agrees to pay the premium savings rate to approved eligible participants, in accordance with the deposit agreement required by section 135.703 of the Revised Code. (M) "Linked deposit program" means a program authorized under section 135.61 and sections 135.70 to 135.71 of the Revised Code and established by the treasurer of state pursuant to those sections. (N) "Linked deposit savings account" means an interest-bearing account that is opened by an eligible participant at an eligible savings institution exclusively for the purpose of the applicable linked deposit program. (O) "Other financial institution instrument" means a product that otherwise would pay the prevailing interest rate approved by the treasurer of state, for the purpose of providing eligible participants with the benefits of the applicable linked deposit program, and in accordance with the deposit agreement under section 135.703 of the Revised Code. (P) "Premium savings rate" means a rate, established under section 135.704 of the Revised Code, that reflects the percentage rate increase above the present savings rate, as determined by the eligible savings institution, applicable to each eligible participant. (Q) "Prevailing interest rate" means a current market interest rate selected by the treasurer of state that eligible savings institutions are willing to pay to hold deposits of the treasurer of state. (R) "Program period" means five years from the date the eligible participant opens a linked deposit savings account with the eligible savings institution. (S) "Treasurer of state's assessment rate" has the same meaning as in section 135.62 of the Revised Code. Sec. 135.71. (A) The general assembly finds that making homeownership more attainable is an important part of fostering a robust and lasting population across the state. However, individuals often struggle to accumulate the financial resources needed to purchase a home. Accordingly, it is declared to be the public policy of the state through the homeownership savings linked deposit program to make available premium rate savings accounts for the down payment and closing costs associated with the purchase of a home. (B) An eligible participant for the homeownership savings linked deposit program is an individual who is a resident of this state, or a member of the uniformed services, on active duty assignment, who is a resident of this state via a residency or domicile election in accordance with 50 U.S.C. 4001, and has applied for a homeownership savings account at an eligible savings institution. A member of the uniformed services, who is an eligible participant, may apply for a homeownership savings account at an eligible savings institution on or after the date affixed to the permanent change of station orders. As used in this division, "active duty" and "uniformed services" have the meanings defined in 10 U.S.C. 101. (C) An eligible participant shall certify on the application that the funds in the homeownership savings account shall be used exclusively for eligible home costs. (D) A homeownership savings account shall be owned by not more than one eligible participant and an eligible participant shall hold not more than one homeownership savings account per program period at any eligible savings institution. (E) The treasurer of state shall report to the tax commissioner any information in the treasurer of state's possession deemed necessary by the tax commissioner to properly administer section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. (F) Not later than January 31, 2027, the treasurer of state and the tax commissioner shall issue a report regarding the efficacy of the homeownership savings linked deposit program. The report shall include all of the following: (1) The number of homeownership savings accounts created; (2) The number of participating eligible savings institutions; (3) The total amount contributed into the accounts; (4) The average yield premium savings rate paid on the accounts; (5) Any other information the treasurer of state or tax commissioner deems relevant. The report shall be delivered to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate. Sec. 141.04. (A) The annual salaries of the chief justice of the supreme court and of the justices and judges named in this section payable from the state treasury are as follows: (1) For the chief justice of the supreme court, the following amounts effective in the following years: (a) Beginning January 1, 2018, one hundred seventy-four thousand seven hundred dollars; (b) Beginning January 1, 2019, one hundred eighty-three thousand four hundred fifty dollars; (c) Beginning January 1, 2020, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2028 2025 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (d) Beginning January 1, 2026, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by five per cent. (2) For the justices of the supreme court, the following amounts effective in the following years: (a) Beginning January 1, 2018, one hundred sixty-four thousand dollars; (b) Beginning January 1, 2019, one hundred seventy-two thousand two hundred dollars; (c) Beginning January 1, 2020, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2028 2025 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (d) Beginning January 1, 2026, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by five per cent. (3) For the judges of the courts of appeals, the following amounts effective in the following years: (a) Beginning January 1, 2018, one hundred fifty-two thousand eight hundred fifty dollars; (b) Beginning January 1, 2019, one hundred sixty thousand five hundred dollars; (c) Beginning January 1, 2020, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2028 2025 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (d) Beginning January 1, 2026, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by five per cent. (4) For the judges of the courts of common pleas, the following amounts effective in the following years, reduced by an amount equal to the annual compensation paid to that judge from the county treasury pursuant to section 141.05 of the Revised Code: (a) Beginning January 1, 2018, one hundred forty thousand five hundred fifty dollars; (b) Beginning January 1, 2019, one hundred forty-seven thousand six hundred dollars; (c) Beginning January 1, 2020, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2028 2025 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (d) Beginning January 1, 2026, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by five per cent. (5) For the full-time judges of a municipal court or the part-time judges of a municipal court of a territory having a population of more than fifty thousand, the following amounts effective in the following years, reduced by an amount equal to the annual compensation paid to that judge pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of section 1901.11 of the Revised Code from municipal corporations and counties: (a) Beginning January 1, 2018, one hundred thirty-two thousand one hundred fifty dollars; (b) Beginning January 1, 2019, one hundred thirty-eight thousand eight hundred dollars; (c) Beginning January 1, 2020, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2028 2025 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (d) Beginning January 1, 2026, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by five per cent. (6) For judges of a municipal court designated as part-time judges by section 1901.08 of the Revised Code, other than part-time judges to whom division (A)(5) of this section applies, and for judges of a county court, the following amounts effective in the following years, reduced by an amount equal to the annual compensation paid to that judge pursuant to division (A) of section 1901.11 of the Revised Code from municipal corporations and counties or pursuant to division (A) of section 1907.16 of the Revised Code from counties: (a) Beginning January 1, 2018, seventy-six thousand fifty dollars; (b) Beginning January 1, 2019, seventy-nine thousand nine hundred dollars; (c) Beginning January 1, 2020, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2028 2025 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (d) Beginning January 1, 2026, and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029 beginning on the first day of January, the annual compensation amount shall be increased by five per cent. (B) Except as provided in sections 1901.122 and 1901.123 of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in this division, and except for the compensation to which the judges described in division (A)(5) of this section are entitled pursuant to divisions (B)(1)(a) and (2) of section 1901.11 of the Revised Code, the annual salary of the chief justice of the supreme court and of each justice or judge listed in division (A) of this section shall be paid in equal monthly installments from the state treasury. If the chief justice of the supreme court or any justice or judge listed in division (A)(2), (3), or (4) of this section delivers a written request to be paid biweekly to the administrative director of the supreme court prior to the first day of January of any year, the annual salary of the chief justice or the justice or judge that is listed in division (A)(2), (3), or (4) of this section shall be paid, during the year immediately following the year in which the request is delivered to the administrative director of the supreme court, biweekly from the state treasury. (C) Upon the death of the chief justice or a justice of the supreme court during that person's term of office, an amount shall be paid in accordance with section 2113.04 of the Revised Code, or to that person's estate. The amount shall equal the amount of the salary that the chief justice or justice would have received during the remainder of the unexpired term or an amount equal to the salary of office for two years, whichever is less. (D) Neither the chief justice of the supreme court nor any justice or judge of the supreme court, the court of appeals, the court of common pleas, or the probate court shall hold any other office of trust or profit under the authority of this state or the United States. (E) In addition to the salaries payable pursuant to this section, the chief justice of the supreme court and the justices of the supreme court shall be entitled to a vehicle allowance of five hundred dollars per month, payable from the state treasury. The allowance shall be increased on the first day of January of each odd-numbered year by an amount equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the consumer price index for the immediately preceding twenty-four month period for which information is available. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Consumer price index" has the same meaning as in section 101.27 of the Revised Codemeans the consumer price index prepared by the United States bureau of labor statistics (U.S. city average for urban wage earners and clerical workers: all items, 1982-1984=100), or, if that index is no longer published, a generally available comparable index. (2) "Salary" does not include any portion of the cost, premium, or charge for health, medical, hospital, dental, or surgical benefits, or any combination of those benefits, covering the chief justice of the supreme court or a justice or judge named in this section and paid on the chief justice's or the justice's or judge's behalf by a governmental entity. Sec. 145.012. (A) "Public employee," as defined in division (A) of section 145.01 of the Revised Code, does not include any person: (1) Who is employed by a private, temporary-help service and performs services under the direction of a public employer or is employed on a contractual basis as an independent contractor under a personal service contract with a public employer; (2) Who is an emergency employee serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, snow, earthquake, flood, or other similar emergency; (3) Who is employed in a program established pursuant to the "Job Training Partnership Act," 96 Stat. 1322 (1982), 29 U.S.C.A. 1501; (4) Who is an appointed member of either the motor vehicle salvage dealers board or the motor vehicle dealer's board whose rate and method of payment are determined pursuant to division (J) of section 124.15 of the Revised Code; (5) Who is employed appointed to serve as an a precinct election worker official under section 3501.22 of the Revised Code and paid less than six hundred dollars per calendar year received compensation for that service, except for a under section 3501.28 of the Revised Code during a calendar year in which more than one primary election and one general election are held, the person is paid six hundred dollars plus an amount not to exceed four hundred dollars for that service; (6) Who is employed as a firefighter in a position requiring satisfactory completion of a firefighter training course approved under former section 3303.07 or section 4765.55 of the Revised Code or conducted under section 3737.33 of the Revised Code except for the following: (a) Any firefighter who has elected under section 145.013 of the Revised Code to remain a contributing member of the public employees retirement system; (b) Any firefighter who was eligible to transfer from the public employees retirement system to the Ohio police and fire pension fund under section 742.51 or 742.515 of the Revised Code and did not elect to transfer; (c) Any firefighter who has elected under section 742.516 of the Revised Code to transfer from the Ohio police and fire pension fund to the public employees retirement system. (7) Who is a member of the board of health of a city or general health district, which pursuant to sections 3709.051 and 3709.07 of the Revised Code includes a combined health district, and whose compensation for attendance at meetings of the board is set forth in division (B) of section 3709.02 or division (B) of section 3709.05 of the Revised Code, as appropriate; (8) Who participates in an alternative retirement plan established under Chapter 3305. of the Revised Code; (9) Who is a member of the board of directors of a sanitary district established under Chapter 6115. of the Revised Code; (10) Who is an employee, officer, or governor-appointed member of the board of directors of the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code; (11) Who is employed by the nonprofit entity established to provide advocacy services and a client assistance program for people with disabilities under Section 319.20 of Am. Sub. H.B. 153 of the 129th general assembly and whose employment begins on or after October 1, 2012. (B) No inmate of a correctional institution operated by the department of rehabilitation and correction, no patient in a hospital for persons with mental illnesses operated by the department of mental health and addiction services, no resident in an institution for persons with intellectual disabilities operated by the department of developmental disabilities, no resident admitted as a patient of a veterans' home operated under Chapter 5907. of the Revised Code, and no resident of a county home shall be considered as a public employee for the purpose of establishing membership or calculating service credit or benefits under this chapter. Nothing in this division shall be construed to affect any service credit attained by any person who was a public employee before becoming an inmate, patient, or resident at any institution listed in this division, or the payment of any benefit for which such a person or such a person's beneficiaries otherwise would be eligible. Sec. 145.054. (A) No person shall knowingly fail to file a complete and accurate campaign finance statement or independent expenditure statement in accordance with section 145.053 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, during the course of a person seeking nomination for, or during any campaign for, election to the public employees retirement board, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the nomination or the outcome of the campaign do any of the following by means of campaign materials, an advertisement on radio or television or in a newspaper or periodical, a public speech, press release, or otherwise: (1) With regard to a candidate, identify the candidate in a manner that implies that the candidate is a member of the board or use the term "re-elect" when the candidate is not currently a member of the board; (2) Make a false statement concerning the formal schooling or training completed or attempted by a candidate; a degree, diploma, certificate, scholarship, grant, award, prize, or honor received, earned, or held by a candidate; or the period of time during which a candidate attended any school, college, community technical school, or institution; (3) Make a false statement concerning the professional, occupational, or vocational licenses held by a candidate, or concerning any position the candidate held for which the candidate received a salary or wages; (4) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been indicted or convicted of a theft offense, extortion, or other crime involving financial corruption or moral turpitude; (5) Make a statement that a candidate has been indicted for any crime or has been the subject of a finding by the Ohio elections commission, the secretary of state, or the Ohio election integrity commission without disclosing the outcome of any legal proceedings resulting from the indictment or finding; (6) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has a record of treatment or confinement for mental disorder; (7) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been subjected to military discipline for criminal misconduct or dishonorably discharged from the armed services; (8) Falsely identify the source of a statement, issue statements under the name of another person without authorization, or falsely state the endorsement of or opposition to a candidate by a person or publication; (9) Make a false statement concerning the voting record of a candidate or board member; (10) Post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise disseminate a false statement concerning a candidate, either knowing the same to be false or with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not, if the statement is designed to promote the election, nomination, or defeat of the candidate. Sec. 145.055. The secretary of state, or any person acting on personal knowledge and subject to the penalties of perjury, may file a A complaint with the Ohio elections commission alleging a violation of section 145.054 of the Revised Code may be filed in accordance with section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. The complaint shall be made on a form prescribed and provided by the commission. On receipt of a complaint under this section, the commission shall hold a hearing open to the public to determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. The commission may administer oaths and issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. On the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold contempt proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. The commission shall provide the person accused of the violation at least seven days prior notice of the time, date, and place of the hearing. The accused may be represented by an attorney and shall have an opportunity to present evidence, call witnesses, and cross-examine witnesses. At the hearing, the commission shall determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. If the commission determines that a violation of division (A) of section 145.054 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall either impose a fine under section 145.99 of the Revised Code or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose the fine. If the commission determines that a violation of division (B) of section 145.054 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall impose the fine described in section 145.99 of the Revised Code, refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor, or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose a fine or refer the matter to a prosecutor. Sec. 145.09. The public employees retirement board shall elect from its membership a chairperson. The board shall appoint an executive director who shall serve as secretary to the board, an actuary, and other employees as necessary for the transaction of the business of the public employees retirement system. The compensation of all persons so appointed shall be fixed by the board. Such persons appointed by the board are not employees of the state and are not subject to Chapter 124. of the Revised Code. If the board provides health care coverage to employees of the retirement system, it may permit employees of the Ohio public employees deferred compensation board to participate. Effective ninety days after September 15, 2004, the board may not employ a state retirement system investment officer, as defined in section 1707.01 of the Revised Code, who does not hold a valid state retirement system investment officer license issued by the division of securities in the department of commerce. Every expense voucher of an employee, officer, or board member of the public employees retirement system shall itemize all purchases and expenditures. The board shall perform other functions as required for the proper execution of this chapter, and may adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code for the proper administration and management of this chapter. The board may take all appropriate action to avoid payment by the system or its members of federal or state income taxes on contributions to the system or amounts earned on such contributions. Notice of proposed rules shall be given to interested parties and rules adopted by the board shall be published and otherwise made available. When it files a rule with the joint committee on agency rule review pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code, the board shall submit to the Ohio retirement study council a copy of the full text of the rule, and if applicable, a copy of the rule summary and fiscal analysis required by division (B) of section 106.024 of the Revised Code. The board may sue and be sued, plead and be impleaded, contract and be contracted with. All of its business shall be transacted, all of its funds invested, all warrants for money drawn and payments made, and all of its cash and securities and other property shall be held in the name of the board, or in the name of its nominee, provided that nominees are authorized by retirement board resolution for the purpose of facilitating the ownership and transfer of investments. If the Ohio retirement study council establishes a uniform format for any report the board is required to submit to the council, the board shall submit the report in that format. Sec. 145.091. The public employees retirement system shall administer the PERS defined benefit plan and, the PERS defined contribution plans, and the Ohio public employees deferred compensation program established under Chapter 148. of the Revised Code. Sec. 145.99. (A) Whoever violates division (A) of section 145.054 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of the violation. (B) Whoever violates division (B) of section 145.054 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for not more than six months or fined not more than five thousand dollars, or both. (C) Fines imposed by the Ohio elections commission under this section shall be paid into the Ohio elections commission fund created under section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 148.01. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Eligible employee" means any public employee, as defined in division (A) of section 145.01 of the Revised Code; any person eligible to become a member of the public employees retirement system under section 145.20 of the Revised Code; any employee, as defined in division (C) of section 742.01, division (B) of section 3309.01, or division (A) of section 5505.01 of the Revised Code; any electing employee, as defined in section 3305.01 of the Revised Code; and any member of the state teachers retirement system. (2) "Participant account" means any of the following accounts: (a) An account that is maintained by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board and that evidences moneys that have been deferred by, or on behalf of, a continuing member or participating employee and transmitted to the board by the retirement system of the continuing member or participating employee; (b) An account that is maintained by the governing board, administrator, depository, or trustee of a deferred compensation program of a municipal corporation and that evidences moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of that municipal corporation and transmitted to the governing board, administrator, depository, or trustee by the retirement system of the officer or employee or in another manner; (c) An account that is maintained by a governing board, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, and that evidences moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of a government unit, as defined in that section, and transmitted to the governing board by the retirement system of the officer or employee or in another manner. (3) "Participating employee" means any eligible employee who is having compensation deferred pursuant to either of the following: (a) An agreement that is entered into before the compensation is earned and that is with the eligible employee's employer and the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board; (b) Automatic enrollment in the Ohio public employees deferred compensation program under section 148.042 of the Revised Code. (4) "Continuing member" means any former participating employee who is not currently having compensation deferred, or the former participating employee's beneficiary, to whom payment has not been made of all deferred compensation distributions. (B) Notwithstanding section 145.01 of the Revised Code, the definitions of that section are applicable to this chapter only to any extent necessary to fully understand the provisions of this chapter. Reference may also be had to Chapters 742., 3305., 3307., 3309., and 5505. of the Revised Code for that purpose. Sec. 148.02. The Ohio public employees deferred compensation board shall be comprised of a member of the house of representatives and a member of the senate, who shall not be of the same political party, each to be appointed to serve at the pleasure of the member's respective leadership, and the members of the public employees retirement board as constituted by section 145.04 of the Revised Code, who are program is hereby created as a separate legal entity for the purpose of administering a deferred compensation system for all eligible employees. The public employees retirement board created in section 145.04 of the Revised Code shall administer the program. The board may utilize its employees and property in the administration of the system on behalf of the Ohio public employees deferred compensation board, program in consideration of a reasonable service charge to be applied in a nondiscriminatory manner to all amounts of compensation deferred under this systemthe program. The Ohio public employees deferred compensation board may exercise the same powers granted by section 145.09 of the Revised Code necessary to perform its functions under this chapter. The attorney general shall be the legal adviser of the board. The Ohio public employees deferred compensation receiving account, which is hereby created, shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state, but shall not be part of the state treasury. The Ohio public employees deferred compensation receiving account is a legal entity that is separate from the various funds created under Chapter 145. of the Revised Code. Sec. 148.021. Whenever the Ohio public employees deferred compensation board or the executive director of that board or a variation thereof is used, referred to, or designated in any statute, rule, contract, grant, or other document, the use, reference, or designation shall be deemed to refer to the public employees retirement board or the executive director of the public employees retirement system, as the case may be. Sec. 148.04. (A) The Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board shall initiate, plan, expedite, and, subject to an appropriate assurance of the approval of the internal revenue service, promulgate and offer to all eligible employees, and thereafter administer on behalf of all participating employees and continuing members, and alter as required, a program for deferral of compensation, including a reasonable number of options to the employee for the investment of deferred funds, always in such form as will assure the desired tax treatment of such funds. The members of the board are the trustees of any deferred funds and shall discharge their duties with respect to the funds solely in the interest of and for the exclusive benefit of participating employees, continuing members, and their beneficiaries. With respect to such deferred funds, section 148.09 of the Revised Code shall apply to claims against participating employees or continuing members and their employers. (B) Every employer of an eligible employee shall enroll the employee in a deferred compensation program offered by the board on the employee's application to participate, on the employee's election under section 148.041 of the Revised Code, or by automatic enrollment under section 148.042 of the Revised Code. (C) The board shall take all actions necessary to ensure that the program qualifies as an eligible deferred compensation plan under section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. 457. The board shall, subject to any applicable provisions of the Ohio public employees deferred compensation program plan, undertake to obtain as favorable conditions of tax treatment as possible, both in the initial programs and any permitted alterations of them or additions to them, as to such matters as terms of distribution, designation of beneficiaries, withdrawal upon disability, financial hardship, or termination of public employment, and other optional provisions. The board may establish a designated Roth account feature or any other feature in which an employee may make tax-deferred or nontax-deferred contributions to an eligible government plan in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 457, as amended. (D) In no event shall the total of the amount of deferred compensation to be set aside under a deferred compensation program and the employee's nondeferred income for any year exceed the total annual salary or compensation under the existing salary schedule or classification plan applicable to the employee in that year. Such a deferred compensation program shall be in addition to any retirement or any other benefit program provided by law for employees of this state. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to provide any necessary standards or conditions for the administration of its programs, including any limits on the portion of a participating employee's compensation that may be deferred in order to avoid adverse treatment of the program by the internal revenue service or the occurrence of deferral, withholding, or other deductions in excess of the compensation available for any pay period. Both of the following apply to a deferred compensation program established under this section: (1) Any income deferred under the program shall continue to be included as regular compensation for the purpose of computing the contributions to and benefits from the retirement system of an employee; (2) Any sums deferred shall not be included in the computation of any federal and state income taxes withheld on behalf of an employee. Sums contributed to a Roth account feature or other feature to which nontax-deferred contributions are made shall be included in the computation of any federal and state income taxes withheld on behalf of an employee. (E) This section does not limit the authority of any municipal corporation, county, township, park district, conservancy district, sanitary district, health district, public library, county law library, public institution of higher education, or school district to provide separate authorized plans or programs for deferring compensation of their officers and employees in addition to the program for the deferral of compensation offered by the board. Any municipal corporation, township, public institution of higher education, or school district that offers such plans or programs shall include a reasonable number of options to its officers or employees for the investment of the deferred funds, including annuities, variable annuities, regulated investment trusts, or other forms of investment approved by the municipal corporation, township, public institution of higher education, or school district, that will assure the desired tax treatment of the funds. Sec. 148.041. (A) Unless the employee will be automatically enrolled in the Ohio public employees deferred compensation program under section 148.042 of the Revised Code, whenever an eligible employee becomes employed in a position paid by warrant of the director of budget and management, the employee's employer shall do both of the following at the time the employee completes the employee's initial employment paperwork: (1) Provide to the employee materials provided by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board under division (D) of this section regarding the benefits of long-term savings through deferred compensation; (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (E) of this section, secure, in writing or by electronic means, the employee's election to participate or not participate in a deferred compensation program offered by the board. (B) An election regarding participation under this section shall be made in the manner prescribed by the board. (C) The employer shall forward each election completed under this section to the program not later than forty-five days after the date the employee's employment begins. (D) The board shall provide informational materials and participation forms to employers required to comply with this section. (E) If an eligible employee transfers employment from one position paid by warrant of the director of budget and management to another position paid by warrant of the director of budget and management and, at the time of transfer, is a participating employee, the employee's new employer shall not be required to secure the employee's election to participate or not participate under division (A)(2) of this section. Sec. 148.042. (A) As used in this section, "employing authority" means both of the following: (1) The supreme court, house of representatives, senate, legislative service commission, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general with respect to employees of those entities; (2) The director of administrative services, with respect to eligible employees employed in a position paid by warrant of the director of budget and management who are not employed by a person or entity listed in division (A)(1) of this section. (B)(1) An employing authority may elect to automatically enroll employees described in division (C)(1) of this section in the Ohio public employees deferred compensation program. An employing authority that elects automatic enrollment shall notify the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board of that election. Automatic enrollment shall commence as soon as administratively practical for the board and the employing authority. (2) An employing authority that elects automatic enrollment may cease automatic enrollment by notifying the board. The employing authority shall specify in the notice the date on which automatic enrollment will cease, and that date must be at least ninety days after the date the employing authority sends the notice. An employee who commences employment after automatic enrollment ceases may elect to participate in the program in accordance with section 148.04 or 148.041 of the Revised Code. Cessation of automatic enrollment does not affect the enrollment of employees enrolled during an automatic enrollment period. An employing authority that ceases automatic enrollment may subsequently elect automatic enrollment by complying with division (B)(1) of this section. (C)(1) An eligible employee employed by an employing authority that has elected automatic enrollment shall be automatically enrolled in the program if one of the following applies to the employee: (a) The employee initially commences employment with the employing authority on or after the date automatic enrollment begins under division (B) of this section. (b) The employee separates from employment with an employing authority, becomes a continuing member, and, on or after the date automatic enrollment begins, commences employment with that employing authority or a different employing authority. (c) The employee is employed in a position paid by warrant of the director of budget and management and the employee transfers employment from an employing authority that has not elected to automatically enroll employees under this section to another position paid by warrant of the director of budget and management under an employing authority that has elected to automatically enroll employees, if the transfer occurs on or after the date automatic enrollment begins. (2) An employee who, at the time of transferring from one employing authority to another as described in division (C)(1)(c) of this section, is a participating employee shall not be automatically enrolled in the program by the employing authority to which the employee transfers. (D) The board shall establish the automatic deferral amounts and specify the investment options into which those deferred amounts will be invested for participating employees who are enrolled under this section. Deferral amounts shall not exceed the lesser of either ten per cent of an eligible employee's compensation or the maximum contribution that the employee is eligible to contribute under federal law. (E) An employing authority that elects to automatically enroll employees under this section shall provide those employees with notice of the employee's rights and obligations in the manner prescribed by the board. (F) An employing authority shall not elect to automatically enroll an eligible employee under this section, or elect to cease automatic enrollment, if that election conflicts with any collective bargaining agreement entered into between the employing authority and an exclusive representative as defined in section 4117.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 148.05. (A)(1) As used in this division, "personal history record" means information maintained by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board on an individual who is a participating employee or continuing member that includes the address, telephone number, social security number, record of contributions, records of benefits, correspondence with the Ohio public employees deferred compensation program, or other information the board determines to be confidential. (2) The records of the board shall be open to public inspection, except that the following shall be excluded, except with the written authorization of the individual concerned: (a) Information pertaining to an individual's participant account; (b) The individual's personal history record. (B)(1) All medical reports, records, and recommendations of a participating employee or a continuing member that are in the possession of the board are privileged. (2) All tax information of a participating employee, continuing member, or former participant or member that is in the possession of the board shall be confidential to the extent the information is confidential under Title LVII or any other provision of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding the exceptions to public inspection in division (A)(2) of this section, the board may furnish the following information: (1) If a participating employee, continuing member, or former participant or member is subject to an order issued under section 2907.15 of the Revised Code or is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code, on written request of a prosecutor as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, the board shall furnish to the prosecutor the information requested from the individual's personal history record or participant account. (2) Pursuant to a court or administrative order issued pursuant to Chapter 3119., 3121., 3123., or 3125. of the Revised Code, the board shall furnish to a court or child support enforcement agency the information required under that section. (3) Pursuant to an administrative subpoena issued by a state agency, the board shall furnish the information required by the subpoena. (4) The board shall comply with orders issued under section 3105.87 of the Revised Code. (D) A statement that contains information obtained from the program's records that is signed by the executive director or the director's designee and to which the board's official seal is affixed, or copies of the program's records to which the signature and seal are attached, shall be received as true copies of the board's records in any court or before any officer of this state. Sec. 148.10. (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any payment, other than a survivorship benefit, that is to be made to a person by a deferred compensation program pursuant to those sections or a deferred compensation program offered by a government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, or by a municipal corporation is subject to any withholding order issued pursuant to section 2907.15 or division (C)(2)(b) of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code. The Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board, the governing board, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, that is associated with a government unit, and the governing board, administrator, depository, or trustee of a deferred compensation program of a municipal corporation shall comply with that withholding order in making payment. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a deferred compensation program receives a notice pursuant to section 2907.15 or division (D) of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code that a person who has a participant account has been charged with a violation of section 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, or 2921.41 of the Revised Code, no payment from that account shall be made prior to whichever of the following is applicable: (1) If the person is convicted of or pleads guilty to the violation and a motion for a withholding order for purposes of restitution has not been filed under section 2907.15 or division (C)(2)(b)(i) of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code, thirty days after the day on which the person is sentenced for the violation; (2) If the person is convicted of or pleads guilty to the violation and a motion for a withholding order for purposes of restitution has been filed under section 2907.15 or division (C)(2)(b)(i) of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code, the day on which the court decides the motion; (3) If the charge is dismissed or the person is found not guilty or not guilty by reason of insanity of the violation, the day on which the dismissal of the charge or the verdict is entered in the journal of the court. Sec. 149.011. As used in this chapter, except as otherwise provided: (A) "Public office" includes any state agency, public institution, political subdivision, or other organized body, office, agency, institution, or entity established by the laws of this state for the exercise of any function of government. "Public office" does not include the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "State agency" includes every department, bureau, board, commission, office, or other organized body established by the constitution and laws of this state for the exercise of any function of state government, including any state-supported institution of higher education, the general assembly, any legislative agency, any court or judicial agency, or any political subdivision or agency of a political subdivision. "State agency" does not include the nonprofit corporation formed under section 187.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Public money" includes all money received or collected by or due a public official, whether in accordance with or under authority of any law, ordinance, resolution, or order, under color of office, or otherwise. It also includes any money collected by any individual on behalf of a public office or as a purported representative or agent of the public office. (D) "Public official" includes all officers, employees, or duly authorized representatives or agents of a public office. (E) "Color of office" includes any act purported or alleged to be done under any law, ordinance, resolution, order, or other pretension to official right, power, or authority. (F) "Archive" includes any public record that is transferred to the state archives or other designated archival institutions because of the historical information contained on it. (G) "Records" includes any document, device, or item, regardless of physical form or characteristic, including an electronic record as defined in section 1306.01 of the Revised Code, created or received by or coming under the jurisdiction of any public office of the state or its political subdivisions, which serves to document the organization, functions, policies, decisions, procedures, operations, or other activities of the office. "Records" does not include personal notes or any document, device, or item, regardless of physical form or whether an assistive device or application was used, of a public official, or of the official's attorney, employee, or agent, that is used, maintained, and accessed solely by the individual who creates it or causes its creation. Sec. 149.10. All boards, commissions, agencies, institutions, and departments in the executive branch of state government shall submit to the auditor of state a copy of each formal internally or independently produced audit report, as well as any management study or report which that recommends changes which that would affect the auditing system. Pursuant to section 117.43 of the Revised Code, no such report shall be produced without the approval of the auditor of state. Sec. 149.30. The Ohio history connection, chartered by this state as a corporation not for profit to promote a knowledge of history and archaeology, especially of Ohio, and operated continuously in the public interest since 1885, may perform public functions as prescribed by law. The general assembly may appropriate money to the Ohio history connection each biennium to carry out the public functions of the Ohio history connection as enumerated in this section. An appropriation by the general assembly to the Ohio history connection constitutes an offer to contract with the Ohio history connection to carry out those public functions for which appropriations are made. An acceptance by the Ohio history connection of the appropriated funds constitutes an acceptance by the Ohio history connection of the offer and is considered an agreement by the Ohio history connection to perform those functions in accordance with the terms of the appropriation and the law and to expend the funds only for the purposes for which appropriated. The governor may request on behalf of the Ohio history connection, and the controlling board may release, additional funds to the Ohio history connection for survey, salvage, repair, or rehabilitation of an emergency nature for which funds have not been appropriated, and acceptance by the Ohio history connection of those funds constitutes an agreement on the part of the Ohio history connection to expend those funds only for the purpose for which released by the controlling board. The Ohio history connection shall faithfully expend and apply all moneys received from the state to the uses and purposes directed by law and for necessary administrative expenses. If the general assembly appropriates money to the Ohio history connection for grants or subsidies to other entities for their site-related programs, the Ohio history connection, except for good cause, shall distribute the money within ninety days of accepting a grant or subsidy application for the money. The Ohio history connection shall perform the public function of sending notice by ordinary or certified mail to the owner of any property at the time it is listed on the national register of historic places. The Ohio history connection shall accurately record all expenditures of such funds in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles. The auditor of state shall audit all funds and fiscal records of the Ohio history connection. The public functions to be performed by the Ohio history connection shall include all of the following: (A) Creating, supervising, operating, protecting, maintaining, and promoting for public use a system of state memorials, titles to which may reside wholly or in part with this state or wholly or in part with the Ohio history connection as provided in and in conformity to appropriate acts and resolves of the general assembly, and leasing for renewable periods of two years or less, with the advice and consent of the attorney general and the director of administrative services, lands and buildings owned by the state which are in the care, custody, and control of the Ohio history connection, all of which shall be maintained and kept for public use at reasonable hours; (B) Making alterations and improvements, marking, and constructing, reconstructing, protecting, or restoring structures, earthworks, and monuments in its care, and equipping such facilities with appropriate educational maintenance facilities; (C) Serving as the archives administration for the state and its political subdivisions as provided in sections 149.31 to 149.42 of the Revised Code; (D) Administering a state historical museum, to be the headquarters of the society and its principal museum and library, which shall be maintained and kept for public use at reasonable hours; (E) Establishing a marking system to identify all designated historic and archaeological sites within the state and marking or causing to be marked historic sites and communities considered by the society to be historically or archaeologically significant; (F) Publishing books, pamphlets, periodicals, and other publications about history, archaeology, and natural science and offering one copy of each regular periodical issue to all public libraries in this state at a reasonable price, which shall not exceed one hundred ten per cent more than the total cost of publication; (G) Engaging in research in history, archaeology, and natural science and providing historical information upon request to all state agencies; (H) Collecting, preserving, and making available by all appropriate means and under approved safeguards all manuscript, print, or near-print library collections and all historical objects, specimens, and artifacts which pertain to the history of Ohio and its people, including the following original documents: Ohio Constitution of 1802; Ohio Constitution of 1851; proposed Ohio Constitution of 1875; design and the letters of patent and assignment of patent for the state flag; S.J.R. 13 (1873); S.J.R. 53 (1875); S.J.R. 72 (1875); S.J.R. 50 (1883); H.J.R. 73 (1883); S.J.R. 28 (1885); H.J.R. 67 (1885); S.J.R. 17 (1902); S.J.R. 28 (1902); H.J.R. 39 (1902); S.J.R. 23 (1903); H.J.R. 19 (1904); S.J.R. 16 (1905); H.J.R. 41 (1913); H.J.R. 34 (1917); petition form (2) (1918); S.J.R. 6 (1921); H.J.R. 5 (1923); H.J.R. 40 (1923); H.J.R. 8 (1929); H.J.R. 20 (1929); S.J.R. 4 (1933); petition form (2) (1933); S.J.R. 57 (1936); petition form (1936); H.J.R. 14 (1942); H.J.R. 15 (1944); H.J.R. 8 (1944); S.J.R. 6 (1947); petition form (1947); H.J.R. 24 (1947); and H.J.R. 48 (1947); (I) Encouraging and promoting the organization and development of county and local historical societies; (J) Providing to Ohio schools such materials as the Ohio history connection may prepare to facilitate the instruction of Ohio history at a reasonable price, which shall not exceed one hundred ten per cent more than the total cost of preparation and delivery; (K) Providing advisory and technical assistance to local societies for the preservation and restoration of historic and archaeological sites; (L) Devising uniform criteria for the designation of historic and archaeological sites throughout the state and advising local historical societies of the criteria and their application; (M) Taking inventory, in cooperation with the Ohio arts council, the Ohio archaeological council, and the archaeological society of Ohio, of significant designated and undesignated state and local sites and keeping an active registry of all designated sites within the state; (N) Contracting with the owners or persons having an interest in designated historic or archaeological sites or property adjacent or contiguous to those sites, or acquiring, by purchase, gift, or devise, easements in those sites or in property adjacent or contiguous to those sites, in order to control or restrict the use of those historic or archaeological sites or adjacent or contiguous property for the purpose of restoring or preserving the historical or archaeological significance or educational value of those sites; (O) Constructing a monument honoring Governor James A. Rhodes, which shall stand on the northeast quadrant of the grounds surrounding the capitol building. The monument shall be constructed with private funds donated to the Ohio history connection and designated for this purpose. No public funds shall be expended to construct this monument. The department of administrative services shall cooperate with the Ohio history connection in carrying out this function and shall maintain the monument in a manner compatible with the grounds of the capitol building. (P) Commissioning a portrait of each departing governor, which shall be displayed in the capitol building. The Ohio history connection may accept private contributions designated for this purpose and, at the discretion of its board of trustees, also may apply for the same purpose funds appropriated by the general assembly to the Ohio history connection pursuant to this section. (Q) Being the custodian of the field notes, maps, records, documents, papers, and implements relating to or used in the survey of the public lands within the state, which were delivered to the executive of this state by the surveyor of the United States at Detroit, by order of the government of the United States, the records of field notes and other records of papers that have been added thereto, the records of deeds and other records or papers relating to the public lands originally deposited with the governor or secretary of state, and the records, maps, plats, papers, documents, and implements relating to the public lands in the Virginia military district in this state, from the United States land office at Chillicothe. These records and files shall be subject to inspection, and the Ohio history connection, on demand and tender of the proper fees, shall furnish certified copies of any of them. (R) Furnishing to the board of education of each school district copies of deeds, leases, field notes, records, and other papers and documents that are in the Ohio history connection's possession, relating to the lands appropriated by congress for the support of schools and ministerial purposes that have been allocated for the benefit of that district, and such copies, when certified by the Ohio history connection, shall be received as competent evidence and shall have the same force and effect as the originals. The Ohio history connection shall charge fees sufficient to defray the cost of preparing copies. (S) Submitting an annual report of its activities, programs, and operations to the governor within two months after the close of each fiscal year of the state. The Ohio history connection, with the help of local historical societies, may compile and maintain a registry of war relics, as defined in section 155.28 of the Revised Code, that are located on public property or on the property of a cemetery association. The Ohio history connection shall not sell, mortgage, transfer, or dispose of historical or archaeological sites to which it has title and in which the state has monetary interest except by action of the general assembly. Money or fines paid to the Ohio history connection under section 155.99 of the Revised Code shall be expended by the Ohio history connection only for the preservation of war relics. In consideration of the public functions performed by the Ohio history connection for the state, employees of the Ohio history connection shall be considered public employees within the meaning of section 145.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 149.3010. The Ohio history connection, in addition to its other functions, may use any land owned by the Ohio history connection, any land owned by the state and in the Ohio history connection's custody and control, any land leased by the Ohio history connection, or any land that the Ohio history connection has agreed to lease to another entity or organization, for the purpose of repatriation of American Indian human remains. The Ohio history connection shall work with and cooperate with federally recognized Indian tribal governments in the selection, management, and use of burial sites under this section. The Ohio history connection shall implement reasonable standards for the use and maintenance of the burial sites. In the event the Ohio history connection shall deaccession, otherwise dispose of, or no longer have custody and control of a burial site, the Ohio history connection shall retain access and authority to maintain the site or the Ohio history connection shall assign its right of access and maintenance to the person acquiring the site. For each burial site established on or after the effective date of this section, and for each burial site established before the effective date of this section and for which it is legally feasible, the Ohio history connection shall establish a perpetual easement, enforceable by the Ohio history connection or a person assigned by the Ohio history connection, to preserve the burial sites. Chapters 517., 759., 1721., and 4767. of the Revised Code do not apply to burial sites under this section. Sec. 149.311. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Historic building" means a building, including its structural components, that is located in this state and that is either individually listed on the national register of historic places under 16 U.S.C. 470a, located in a registered historic district, and certified by the state historic preservation officer as being of historic significance to the district, or is individually listed as an historic landmark designated by a local government certified under 16 U.S.C. 470a(c). (2) "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" means expenditures paid or incurred during the rehabilitation period, and before and after that period as determined under 26 U.S.C. 47, by an owner or qualified lessee of an historic building to rehabilitate the building. "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" includes architectural or engineering fees paid or incurred in connection with the rehabilitation, and expenses incurred in the preparation of nomination forms for listing on the national register of historic places. "Qualified rehabilitation expenditures" does not include any of the following: (a) The cost of acquiring, expanding, or enlarging an historic building; (b) Expenditures attributable to work done to facilities related to the building, such as parking lots, sidewalks, and landscaping; (c) New building construction costs. (3) "Owner" of an historic building means a person holding the fee simple interest in the building. "Owner" does not include the state or a state agency, or any political subdivision as defined in section 9.23 of the Revised Code. (4) "Qualified lessee" means a person subject to a lease agreement for an historic building and eligible for the federal rehabilitation tax credit under 26 U.S.C. 47. "Qualified lessee" does not include the state or a state agency or political subdivision as defined in section 9.23 of the Revised Code. (5) "Certificate owner" means the owner or qualified lessee of an historic building to which a rehabilitation tax credit certificate was issued under this section. (6) "Registered historic district" means an historic district listed in the national register of historic places under 16 U.S.C. 470a, an historic district designated by a local government certified under 16 U.S.C. 470a(c), or a local historic district certified under 36 C.F.R. 67.8 and 67.9. (7) "Rehabilitation" means the process of repairing or altering an historic building or buildings, making possible an efficient use while preserving those portions and features of the building and its site and environment that are significant to its historic, architectural, and cultural values. (8) "Rehabilitation period" means one of the following: (a) If the rehabilitation initially was not planned to be completed in stages, a period chosen by the owner or qualified lessee not to exceed twenty-four months during which rehabilitation occurs; (b) If the rehabilitation initially was planned to be completed in stages, a period chosen by the owner or qualified lessee not to exceed sixty months during which rehabilitation occurs. Each stage shall be reviewed as a phase of a rehabilitation as determined under 26 C.F.R. 1.48-12 or a successor to that section. (9) "State historic preservation officer" or "officer" means the state historic preservation officer appointed by the governor under 16 U.S.C. 470a. (10) "Catalytic project" means the rehabilitation of an historic building, the rehabilitation of which will foster economic development within two thousand five hundred feet of the historic building. (B) The owner or qualified lessee of an historic building may apply to the director of development for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate for qualified rehabilitation expenditures paid or incurred by such owner or qualified lessee after April 4, 2007, for rehabilitation of an historic building. If the owner of an historic building enters a pass-through agreement with a qualified lessee for the purposes of the federal rehabilitation tax credit under 26 U.S.C. 47, the qualified rehabilitation expenditures paid or incurred by the owner after April 4, 2007, may be attributed to the qualified lessee. The form and manner of filing such applications shall be prescribed by rule of the director. Each application shall state the amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures the applicant estimates will be paid or incurred and shall indicate whether the historic building was used as a theater before, and is intended to be used as a theater after, the rehabilitation. The director may require applicants to furnish documentation of such estimates. The director, after consultation with the tax commissioner and in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules that establish all of the following: (1) Forms and procedures by which applicants may apply for rehabilitation tax credit certificates; (2) Criteria for reviewing, evaluating, and approving applications for certificates within the limitations under division (D) of this section, criteria for assuring that the certificates issued encompass a mixture of high and low qualified rehabilitation expenditures, and criteria for issuing certificates under division (C)(3)(b) of this section; (3) Eligibility requirements for obtaining a certificate under this section; (4) The form of rehabilitation tax credit certificates; (5) Reporting requirements and monitoring procedures; (6) Procedures and criteria for conducting cost-benefit analyses of historic buildings that are the subjects of applications filed under this section. The purpose of a cost-benefit analysis shall be to determine whether rehabilitation of the historic building will result in a net revenue gain in state and local taxes once the building is used. (7) Any other rules necessary to implement and administer this section. (C) The director shall review the applications with the assistance of the state historic preservation officer and determine whether all of the following criteria are met: (1) That the building that is the subject of the application is an historic building and the applicant is the owner or qualified lessee of the building; (2) That the rehabilitation will satisfy standards prescribed by the United States secretary of the interior under 16 U.S.C. 470, et seq., as amended, and 36 C.F.R. 67.7 or a successor to that section; (3) That receiving a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under this section is a major factor in: (a) The applicant's decision to rehabilitate the historic building; or (b) To increase the level of investment in such rehabilitation. (4) The historic building that is the subject of the application is not, and will not upon completion of the rehabilitation project be, part of a qualified low-income housing project allocated a tax credit pursuant to section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. An applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the state historic preservation officer and director that the rehabilitation will satisfy the standards described in division (C)(2) of this section before the applicant begins the physical rehabilitation of the historic building. (D)(1) If the director determines that an application meets the criteria in division (C) of this section, the director shall conduct a cost-benefit analysis for the historic building that is the subject of the application to determine whether rehabilitation of the historic building will result in a net revenue gain in state and local taxes once the building is used. The director shall consider the results of the cost-benefit analysis in determining whether to approve the application. The director shall also consider the potential economic impact and the regional distributive balance of the credits throughout the state. The director shall not consider whether the historic building is located in or will benefit an economically distressed area, including by weighting preference based on the poverty rate in the jurisdiction or census tract in which the building is located, nor shall the director consider or give weighted preference based on vacancy or underutilization of the building. The director may approve an application only after completion of the cost-benefit analysis. (2) A rehabilitation tax credit certificate shall not be issued for an amount greater than the estimated amount furnished by the applicant on the application for such certificate and approved by the director. The director shall not approve more than a total of one hundred twenty seventy-five million dollars of rehabilitation tax credits for each of fiscal years 2023 and 2024, and sixty million dollars of rehabilitation tax credits for each fiscal year thereafter 2026 and 2027, but the director may reallocate unused tax credits from a prior fiscal year for new applicants and such reallocated credits shall not apply toward the dollar limit of this division. The director shall not approve any amount of rehabilitation tax credits after fiscal year 2027 unless specifically approved by an act of the general assembly. (3) For rehabilitations with a rehabilitation period not exceeding twenty-four months as provided in division (A)(8)(a) of this section, a rehabilitation tax credit certificate shall not be issued before the rehabilitation of the historic building is completed. (4) For rehabilitations with a rehabilitation period not exceeding sixty months as provided in division (A)(8)(b) of this section, a rehabilitation tax credit certificate shall not be issued before a stage of rehabilitation is completed. After all stages of rehabilitation are completed, if the director cannot determine that the criteria in division (C) of this section are satisfied for all stages of rehabilitations, the director shall certify this finding to the tax commissioner, and any rehabilitation tax credits received by the applicant shall be repaid by the applicant and may be collected by assessment as unpaid tax by the commissioner. (5) The director shall require the applicant to provide a third-party cost certification by a certified public accountant of the actual costs attributed to the rehabilitation of the historic building when qualified rehabilitation expenditures exceed two hundred thousand dollars. If an applicant whose application is approved for receipt of a rehabilitation tax credit certificate fails to provide to the director sufficient evidence of reviewable progress, including a viable financial plan, copies of final construction drawings, and evidence that the applicant has obtained all historic approvals within twelve months after the date the applicant received notification of approval, and if the applicant fails to provide evidence to the director that the applicant has secured and closed on financing for the rehabilitation within eighteen months after receiving notification of approval, the director may rescind the approval of the application. The director shall notify the applicant if the approval has been rescinded. Credits that would have been available to an applicant whose approval was rescinded shall be available for other qualified applicants. Nothing in this division prohibits an applicant whose approval has been rescinded from submitting a new application for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate. (6) The director may approve the application of, and issue a rehabilitation tax credit certificate to, the owner of a catalytic project, provided the application otherwise meets the criteria described in divisions (C) and (D) of this section. The director may not approve more than one application for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under division (D)(6) of this section during each state fiscal biennium. The director shall not approve an application for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under division (D)(6) of this section during the state fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2017, or during any state fiscal biennium thereafter. The director shall consider the following criteria in determining whether to approve an application for a certificate under division (D)(6) of this section: (a) Whether the historic building is a catalytic project; (b) The effect issuance of the certificate would have on the availability of credits for other applicants that qualify for a credit certificate within the credit dollar limit described in division (D)(2) of this section; (c) The number of jobs, if any, the catalytic project will create. (7)(a) The owner or qualified lessee of a historic building may apply for a rehabilitation tax credit certificate under both divisions (B) and (D)(6) of this section. In such a case, the director shall consider each application at the time the application is submitted. (b) The director shall not issue more than one certificate under this section with respect to the same qualified rehabilitation expenditures. (8) The director shall give consideration for tax credits awarded under this section to rehabilitations of historic buildings used as a theater before, and intended to be used as a theater after, the rehabilitation. In determining whether to approve an application for such a rehabilitation, the director shall consider the extent to which the rehabilitation will increase attendance at the theater and increase the theater's gross revenue. (9) The director shall rescind the approval of any application if the building that is the subject of the application is part of a qualified low-income housing project allocated a tax credit pursuant to section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code at any time before the building's rehabilitation is complete. (E) Issuance of a certificate represents a finding by the director of the matters described in divisions (C)(1), (2), and (3) of this section only; issuance of a certificate does not represent a verification or certification by the director of the amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures for which a tax credit may be claimed under section 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, or 5747.76 of the Revised Code. The amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures for which a tax credit may be claimed is subject to inspection and examination by the tax commissioner or employees of the commissioner under section 5703.19 of the Revised Code and any other applicable law. Upon the issuance of a certificate, the director shall certify to the tax commissioner, in the form and manner requested by the tax commissioner, the name of the applicant, the amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures shown on the certificate, and any other information required by the rules adopted under this section. (F)(1) On or before the first day of August each year, the director and tax commissioner jointly shall submit to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives a report on the tax credit program established under this section and sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code. The report shall present an overview of the program and shall include information on the number of rehabilitation tax credit certificates issued under this section during the preceding fiscal year, an update on the status of each historic building for which an application was approved under this section, the dollar amount of the tax credits granted under sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, and any other information the director and commissioner consider relevant to the topics addressed in the report. (2) On or before December 1, 2015, the director and tax commissioner jointly shall submit to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives a comprehensive report that includes the information required by division (F)(1) of this section and a detailed analysis of the effectiveness of issuing tax credits for rehabilitating historic buildings. The report shall be prepared with the assistance of an economic research organization jointly chosen by the director and commissioner. (G) There is hereby created in the state treasury the historic rehabilitation tax credit operating fund. The director is authorized to charge reasonable application and other fees in connection with the administration of tax credits authorized by this section and sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code. Any such fees collected shall be credited to the fund and used to pay reasonable costs incurred by the department of development in administering this section and sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code. The Ohio historic preservation office is authorized to charge reasonable fees in connection with its review and approval of applications under this section. Any such fees collected shall be credited to the fund and used to pay administrative costs incurred by the Ohio historic preservation office pursuant to this section. (H) Notwithstanding sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, the certificate owner of a tax credit certificate issued under division (D)(6) of this section may claim a tax credit equal to twenty-five per cent of the dollar amount indicated on the certificate for a total credit of not more than twenty-five million dollars. The credit claimed by such a certificate owner for any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year under section 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, or 5747.76 of the Revised Code shall not exceed five million dollars. If the certificate owner is eligible for more than five million dollars in total credits, the certificate owner may carry forward the balance of the credit in excess of the amount claimed for that year for not more than five ensuing calendar years, tax years, or taxable years. If the credit claimed in any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year exceeds the tax otherwise due, the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer. (I) Notwithstanding sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, the following apply to a tax credit approved under this section after September 13, 2022, and before July 1, 2024: (1) The certificate holder may claim a tax credit equal to thirty-five per cent of the dollar amount indicated on the tax credit certificate if any county, township, or municipal corporation within which the project is located has a population of less than three hundred thousand according to the 2020 decennial census. The tax credit equals twenty-five per cent of the dollar amount indicated on the certificate if the project is not located within such a county, township, or municipal corporation. (2) The total tax credit claimed under section 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, or 5747.76 of the Revised Code for any one project shall not exceed ten million dollars for any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year. (3) If the credit claimed in any calendar year, tax year, or taxable year exceeds the tax otherwise due, the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer, subject to division (I)(2) of this section. (J) Notwithstanding sections 5725.151, 5725.34, 5726.52, 5729.17, 5733.47, and 5747.76 of the Revised Code, the certificate owner of a tax credit certificate may claim a tax credit equal to thirty-five per cent of the dollar amount of qualified rehabilitation expenditures indicated on the certificate if the project for which the certificate was issued is located in a municipal corporation with a population of less than three hundred thousand or in the unincorporated area of a township. (K) The director of development, in consultation with the director of budget and management, shall develop and adopt a system of tracking any information necessary to anticipate the impact of credits issued under this section on tax revenues for current and future fiscal years. Such information may include the number of applications approved, the estimated rehabilitation expenditures and rehabilitation period associated with such applications, the number and amount of tax credit certificates issued, and any other information the director of budget and management requires for the purposes of this division. (K)(L) For purposes of this section and Chapter 122:19-1 of the Ohio Administrative Code, a tax credit certificate issued under this section is effective on the date that all historic buildings rehabilitated by the project are "placed in service," as that term is used in section 47 of the Internal Revenue Code. Sec. 149.38. (A) Except as otherwise provided in section 307.847 of the Revised Code, there is hereby created in each county a county records commission, composed of a member of the board of county commissioners as chairperson, the prosecuting attorney, the auditor, the recorder, and the clerk of the court of common pleas. The commission shall appoint a secretary, who may or may not be a member of the commission and who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The commission may employ an archivist or records manager to serve under its direction. The commission shall meet upon the call of the chairperson. (B)(1) The functions of the county records commission shall be to provide rules for retention and disposal of records of the county, and to review applications for one-time disposal of obsolete records and schedules of records retention and disposition submitted by county offices. The commission may dispose of records pursuant to the procedure outlined in this section. The commission, at any time, may review any schedule it has previously approved and, for good cause shown, may revise that schedule, subject to division (D) of this section. (2)(a) As used in division (B)(2) of this section, "paper case records" means written reports of child abuse or neglect, written records of investigations, or other written records required to be prepared under section 2151.421, 5101.13, 5153.166, or 5153.17, or 5180.40 of the Revised Code. (b) A county public children services agency may submit to the county records commission applications for one-time disposal, or schedules of records retention and disposition, of paper case records that have been entered into permanently maintained and retrievable fields in the state automated child welfare information system established under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code or entered into other permanently maintained and retrievable electronic files. The county records commission may dispose of the paper case records pursuant to the procedure outlined in this section. (C)(1) When the county records commission has approved any county application for one-time disposal of obsolete records or any schedule of records retention and disposition, the commission shall send that application or schedule to the Ohio history connection for its review. The Ohio history connection shall review the application or schedule within a period of not more than sixty days after its receipt of it. During the sixty-day review period, the Ohio history connection may select for its custody from the application for one-time disposal of obsolete records any records it considers to be of continuing historical value, and shall denote upon any schedule of records retention and disposition any records for which the Ohio history connection will require a certificate of records disposal prior to their disposal. (2) Upon completion of its review, the Ohio history connection shall forward the application for one-time disposal of obsolete records or the schedule of records retention and disposition to the auditor of state for the auditor's approval or disapproval. The auditor of state shall approve or disapprove the application or schedule within a period of not more than sixty days after receipt of it. (3) Before public records are to be disposed of pursuant to an approved schedule of records retention and disposition, the county records commission shall inform the Ohio history connection of the disposal through the submission of a certificate of records disposal for only the records required by the schedule to be disposed of and shall give the Ohio history connection the opportunity for a period of fifteen business days to select for its custody those records, from the certificate submitted, that it considers to be of continuing historical value. Upon the expiration of the fifteen-business-day period, the county records commission also shall notify the public libraries, county historical society, state universities, and other public or quasi-public institutions, agencies, or corporations in the county that have provided the commission with their name and address for these notification purposes, that the commission has informed the Ohio history connection of the records disposal and that the notified entities, upon written agreement with the Ohio history connection pursuant to section 149.31 of the Revised Code, may select records of continuing historical value, including records that may be distributed to any of the notified entities under section 149.31 of the Revised Code. Any notified entity that notifies the county records commission of its intent to review and select records of continuing historical value from certificates of records disposal is responsible for the cost of any notice given and for the transportation of those records. (D) The rules of the county records commission shall include a rule that requires any receipts, checks, vouchers, or other similar records pertaining to expenditures from the delinquent tax and assessment collection fund created in section 321.261 of the Revised Code, from the real estate assessment fund created in section 325.31 of the Revised Code, or from amounts allocated for the furtherance of justice to the county sheriff under section 325.071 of the Revised Code or to the prosecuting attorney under section 325.12 of the Revised Code to be retained for at least four years. (E) No person shall knowingly violate the rule adopted under division (D) of this section. Whoever violates that rule is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 149.43. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public record" means records kept by any public office, including, but not limited to, state, county, city, village, township, and school district units, and records pertaining to the delivery of educational services by an alternative school in this state kept by the nonprofit or for-profit entity operating the alternative school pursuant to section 3313.533 of the Revised Code. "Public record" does not mean any of the following: (a) Medical records; (b) Records pertaining to probation and parole proceedings, to proceedings related to the imposition of community control sanctions and post-release control sanctions, or to proceedings related to determinations under section 2967.271 of the Revised Code regarding the release or maintained incarceration of an offender to whom that section applies; (c) Records pertaining to actions under section 2151.85 and division (C) of section 2919.121 of the Revised Code and to appeals of actions arising under those sections; (d) Records pertaining to adoption proceedings, including the contents of an adoption file maintained by the department of health under sections 3705.12 to 3705.124 of the Revised Code; (e) Information in a record contained in the putative father registry established by section 3107.062 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the information is held by the department of job and family services children and youth or, pursuant to section 3111.69 of the Revised Code, the office of child support in the department of job and family services or a child support enforcement agency; (f) Records specified in division (A) of section 3107.52 of the Revised Code; (g) Trial preparation records, prior to the conclusion of all direct appeals or, if no appeal is filed, prior to the expiration of the time during which an appeal may be filed, or, if no trial has occurred, until the civil or criminal action or proceeding has ended without the possibility of direct appeal or each agency, office, or official responsible for the matter has made a decision not to proceed with the matter; (h) Confidential law enforcement investigatory records; (i) Records containing information that is confidential under section 2710.03 or 4112.05 of the Revised Code; (j) DNA records stored in the DNA database pursuant to section 109.573 of the Revised Code; (k) Inmate records released by the department of rehabilitation and correction to the department of youth services or a court of record pursuant to division (E) of under section 5120.21 of the Revised Code, except for permitted disclosure of the information listed in division (E)(1) of that section; (l) Records maintained by the department of youth services pertaining to children in its custody released by the department of youth services to the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to section 5139.05 of the Revised Code; (m) Intellectual property records; (n) Donor profile records; (o) Records maintained by the department of job and family services pursuant to section 3121.894 of the Revised Code; (p) Designated public service worker residential and familial information; (q) In the case of a county hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 339. of the Revised Code or a municipal hospital operated pursuant to Chapter 749. of the Revised Code, information that constitutes a trade secret, as defined in section 1333.61 of the Revised Code; (r) Information pertaining to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen; (s) In the case of a child fatality review board acting under sections 307.621 to 307.629 of the Revised Code or a review conducted pursuant to guidelines established by the director of health under section 3701.70 of the Revised Code, records provided to the board or director, statements made by board members during meetings of the board or by persons participating in the director's review, and all work products of the board or director, and in the case of a child fatality review board, child fatality review data submitted by the board to the department of health or a national child death review database, other than the report prepared pursuant to division (A) of section 307.626 of the Revised Code; (t) Records provided to and statements made by the executive director of a public children services agency or a prosecuting attorney acting pursuant to section 5153.171 of the Revised Code other than the information released under that section; (u) Test materials, examinations, or evaluation tools used in an examination for licensure as a nursing home administrator that the board of executives of long-term services and supports administers under section 4751.15 of the Revised Code or contracts under that section with a private or government entity to administer; (v) Records the release of which is prohibited by state or federal law; (w) Proprietary information of or relating to any person that is submitted to or compiled by the Ohio venture capital authority created under section 150.01 of the Revised Code; (x) Financial statements and data any person submits for any purpose to the Ohio housing finance agency or the controlling board in connection with applying for, receiving, or accounting for financial assistance from the agency, and information that identifies any individual who benefits directly or indirectly from financial assistance from the agency; (y) Records listed in section 5101.29 of the Revised Code; (z) Discharges recorded with a county recorder under section 317.24 of the Revised Code, as specified in division (B)(2) of that section; (aa) Usage information including names and addresses of specific residential and commercial customers of a municipally owned or operated public utility; (bb) Records described in division (C) of section 187.04 of the Revised Code that are not designated to be made available to the public as provided in that division; (cc) Information and records that are made confidential, privileged, and not subject to disclosure under divisions (B) and (C) of section 2949.221 of the Revised Code; (dd) Personal information, as defined in section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (ee) The confidential name, address, and other personally identifiable information of a program participant in the address confidentiality program established under sections 111.41 to 111.47 of the Revised Code, including the contents of any application for absent voter's ballots, absent voter's ballot identification envelope statement of voter, or provisional ballot affirmation completed by a program participant who has a confidential voter registration record; records or portions of records pertaining to that program that identify the number of program participants that reside within a precinct, ward, township, municipal corporation, county, or any other geographic area smaller than the state; and any real property confidentiality notice filed under section 111.431 of the Revised Code and the information described in division (C) of that section. As used in this division, "confidential address" and "program participant" have the meaning defined in section 111.41 of the Revised Code. (ff) Orders for active military service of an individual serving or with previous service in the armed forces of the United States, including a reserve component, or the Ohio organized militia, except that, such order becomes a public record on the day that is fifteen years after the published date or effective date of the call to order; (gg) The name, address, contact information, or other personal information of an individual who is less than eighteen years of age that is included in any record related to a traffic accident involving a school vehicle in which the individual was an occupant at the time of the accident; (hh) Protected health information, as defined in 45 C.F.R. 160.103, that is in a claim for payment for a health care product, service, or procedure, as well as any other health claims data in another document that reveals the identity of an individual who is the subject of the data or could be used to reveal that individual's identity; (ii) Any depiction by photograph, film, videotape, or printed or digital image under either of the following circumstances: (i) The depiction is that of a victim of an offense the release of which would be, to a reasonable person of ordinary sensibilities, an offensive and objectionable intrusion into the victim's expectation of bodily privacy and integrity. (ii) The depiction captures or depicts the victim of a sexually oriented offense, as defined in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code, at the actual occurrence of that offense. (jj) Restricted portions of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording; (kk) In the case of a fetal-infant mortality review board acting under sections 3707.70 to 3707.77 of the Revised Code, records, documents, reports, or other information presented to the board or a person abstracting such materials on the board's behalf, statements made by review board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health or a national infant death review database, other than the report prepared pursuant to section 3707.77 of the Revised Code. (ll) Records, documents, reports, or other information presented to the pregnancy-associated mortality review board established under section 3738.01 5180.27 of the Revised Code, statements made by board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health, other than the biennial reports prepared under section 3738.08 5180.277 of the Revised Code; (mm) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(1)(oo) of this section, telephone numbers for a victim, as defined in section 2930.01 of the Revised Code or a witness to a crime that are listed on any law enforcement record or report. (nn) A preneed funeral contract, as defined in section 4717.01 of the Revised Code, and contract terms and personally identifying information of a preneed funeral contract, that is contained in a report submitted by or for a funeral home to the board of embalmers and funeral directors under division (C) of section 4717.13, division (J) of section 4717.31, or section 4717.41 of the Revised Code. (oo) Telephone numbers for a party to a motor vehicle accident subject to the requirements of section 5502.11 of the Revised Code that are listed on any law enforcement record or report, except that the telephone numbers described in this division are not excluded from the definition of "public record" under this division on and after the thirtieth day after the occurrence of the motor vehicle accident. (pp) Records pertaining to individuals who complete training under section 5502.703 of the Revised Code to be permitted by a school district board of education or governing body of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or a chartered nonpublic school to convey deadly weapons or dangerous ordnance into a school safety zone; (qq) Records, documents, reports, or other information presented to a domestic violence fatality review board established under section 307.651 of the Revised Code, statements made by board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted by the board to the department of health, other than a report prepared pursuant to section 307.656 of the Revised Code; (rr) Records, documents, and information the release of which is prohibited under sections 2930.04 and 2930.07 of the Revised Code; (ss) Records of an existing qualified nonprofit corporation that creates a special improvement district under Chapter 1710. of the Revised Code that do not pertain to a purpose for which the district is created; (tt) Educational support services data, as defined in section 3319.325 of the Revised Code; (uu) Records of the past, current, and future work schedule of a designated public service worker. As used in division (A)(1)(uu) of this section, "work schedule" does not include the docket of cases of a court, judge, or magistrate; (vv) A request form or confirmation letter submitted to a public office under section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (ww) An affidavit or confirmation letter submitted under section 319.28 of the Revised Code; (xx) License or certificate application or renewal responses and supporting documentation submitted to the state medical board regarding an applicant's, or a license or certificate holder's, inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of a medical condition; (yy) Images and data captured by an automated license plate recognition system that are maintained in a law enforcement database; (zz) Attorney work product record; (aaa) Any entry on the public calendar of an elected official that is for any date that is after the date the record is requested; (bbb) Records pertaining to burial sites under section 149.3010 of the Revised Code. A record that is not a public record under division (A)(1) of this section and that, under law, is permanently retained becomes a public record on the day that is seventy-five years after the day on which the record was created, or in the case of a record that is not a public record under division (A)(1)(uu) of this section that is retained, three years after the day on which the record was created, except for any record protected by the attorney-client privilege, a trial preparation record as defined in this section, a statement prohibiting the release of identifying information signed under section 3107.083 of the Revised Code, a denial of release form filed pursuant to section 3107.46 of the Revised Code, records pertaining to burial sites under section 149.3010 of the Revised Code, or any record that is exempt from release or disclosure under section 149.433 of the Revised Code. If the record is a birth certificate and a biological parent's name redaction request form has been accepted under section 3107.391 of the Revised Code, the name of that parent shall be redacted from the birth certificate before it is released under this paragraph. If any other section of the Revised Code establishes a time period for disclosure of a record that conflicts with the time period specified in this section, the time period in the other section prevails. (2)(2)(a) "Confidential law enforcement investigatory record" means any record that pertains to a law enforcement matter of a criminal, quasi-criminal, civil, or administrative nature, but only to the extent that the release of the record would create a high probability of disclosure of any of the following: (a)(i) The identity of a suspect who has not been charged with the offense to which the record pertains, or of an information source or witness to whom confidentiality has been reasonably promised; (b)(ii) Information provided by an information source or witness to whom confidentiality has been reasonably promised, which information would reasonably tend to disclose the source's or witness's identity; (c)(iii) Specific confidential investigatory techniques or procedures or specific investigatory work product; (d)(iv) Information that would endanger the life or physical safety of law enforcement personnel, a crime victim, a witness, or a confidential information source. (b) As used in divisions (A)(2) and (18) of this section, "specific investigatory work product" means information assembled by law enforcement officials in connection with a probable or pending criminal or civil proceeding, with the exception of routine incident reports. "Specific investigatory work product" is not a public record prior to the conclusion of all direct appeals, or, if no appeal is filed, prior to the expiration of the time during which an appeal may be filed, or, if no trial has occurred, until the criminal or civil proceeding has ended without possibility of direct appeal or each agency, office, or official responsible for the matter has made a decision not to proceed with the matter. (3) "Medical record" means any document or combination of documents, except births, deaths, and the fact of admission to or discharge from a hospital, that pertains to the medical history, diagnosis, prognosis, or medical condition of a patient and that is generated and maintained in the process of medical treatment. (4) "Trial preparation record" means any record created by or for another party or by or for that party's representative, in reasonable anticipation of, or in defense of, a civil or criminal action or proceeding, that is not a confidential law enforcement investigatory record or attorney work product record and that contains factual information that is specifically compiled in reasonable anticipation of, or in defense of, a for that civil or criminal action or proceeding,. including the independent thought processes and personal trial preparation of an attorney. (5) "Intellectual property record" means a record, other than a financial or administrative record, that is produced or collected by or for faculty or staff of a state institution of higher learning in the conduct of or as a result of study or research on an educational, commercial, scientific, artistic, technical, or scholarly issue, regardless of whether the study or research was sponsored by the institution alone or in conjunction with a governmental body or private concern, and that has not been publicly released, published, or patented. (6) "Donor profile record" means all records about donors or potential donors to a public institution of higher education except the names and reported addresses of the actual donors and the date, amount, and conditions of the actual donation. (7) "Designated public service worker" means a peace officer, parole officer, probation officer, bailiff, prosecuting attorney, assistant prosecuting attorney, correctional employee, county or multicounty corrections officer, community-based correctional facility employee, designated Ohio national guard member, protective services worker, youth services employee, firefighter, EMT, medical director or member of a cooperating physician advisory board of an emergency medical service organization, state board of pharmacy employee, investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, emergency service telecommunicator, forensic mental health provider, mental health evaluation provider, regional psychiatric hospital employee, judge, magistrate, or federal law enforcement officer. (8) "Designated public service worker residential and familial information" means any information that discloses any of the following about a designated public service worker: (a) The address of the actual personal residence of a designated public service worker, except for the following information: (i) The address of the actual personal residence of a prosecuting attorney or judge; and (ii) The state or political subdivision in which a designated public service worker resides. (b) Information compiled from referral to or participation in an employee assistance program; (c) The social security number, the residential telephone number, any bank account, debit card, charge card, or credit card number, or the emergency telephone number of, or any medical information pertaining to, a designated public service worker; (d) The name of any beneficiary of employment benefits, including, but not limited to, life insurance benefits, provided to a designated public service worker by the designated public service worker's employer; (e) The identity and amount of any charitable or employment benefit deduction made by the designated public service worker's employer from the designated public service worker's compensation, unless the amount of the deduction is required by state or federal law; (f) The name, the residential address, the name of the employer, the address of the employer, the social security number, the residential telephone number, any bank account, debit card, charge card, or credit card number, or the emergency telephone number of the spouse, a former spouse, or any child of a designated public service worker; (g) A photograph of a peace officer who holds a position or has an assignment that may include undercover or plain clothes positions or assignments as determined by the peace officer's appointing authority. (9) As used in divisions (A)(7) and (15) to (17) of this section: "Peace officer" has the meaning defined in section 109.71 of the Revised Code and also includes the superintendent and troopers of the state highway patrol; it does not include the sheriff of a county or a supervisory employee who, in the absence of the sheriff, is authorized to stand in for, exercise the authority of, and perform the duties of the sheriff. "Correctional employee" means any employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction who in the course of performing the employee's job duties has or has had contact with inmates and persons under supervision. "County or multicounty corrections officer" means any corrections officer employed by any county or multicounty correctional facility. "Designated Ohio national guard member" means a member of the Ohio national guard who is participating in duties related to remotely piloted aircraft, including, but not limited to, pilots, sensor operators, and mission intelligence personnel, duties related to special forces operations, or duties related to cybersecurity, and is designated by the adjutant general as a designated public service worker for those purposes. "Protective services worker" means any employee of a county agency who is responsible for child protective services, child support services, or adult protective services. "Youth services employee" means any employee of the department of youth services who in the course of performing the employee's job duties has or has had contact with children committed to the custody of the department of youth services. "Firefighter" means any regular, paid or volunteer, member of a lawfully constituted fire department of a municipal corporation, township, fire district, or village. "EMT" means EMTs-basic, EMTs-I, and paramedics that provide emergency medical services for a public emergency medical service organization. "Emergency medical service organization," "EMT-basic," "EMT-I," and "paramedic" have the meanings defined in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. "Investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation" has the meaning defined in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code. "Emergency service telecommunicator" means an individual employed by an emergency service provider as defined under section 128.01 of the Revised Code, whose primary responsibility is to be an operator for the receipt or processing of calls for emergency services made by telephone, radio, or other electronic means. "Forensic mental health provider" means any employee of a community mental health service provider or local alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services board who, in the course of the employee's duties, has contact with persons committed to a local alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services board by a court order pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. "Mental health evaluation provider" means an individual who, under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, examines a respondent who is alleged to be a mentally ill person subject to court order, as defined in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code, and reports to the probate court the respondent's mental condition. "Regional psychiatric hospital employee" means any employee of the department of mental health and addiction services who, in the course of performing the employee's duties, has contact with patients committed to the department of mental health and addiction services by a court order pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code. "Federal law enforcement officer" has the meaning defined in section 9.88 of the Revised Code. (10) "Information pertaining to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen" means information that is kept in the ordinary course of business by a public office, that pertains to the recreational activities of a person under the age of eighteen years, and that discloses any of the following: (a) The address or telephone number of a person under the age of eighteen or the address or telephone number of that person's parent, guardian, custodian, or emergency contact person; (b) The social security number, birth date, or photographic image of a person under the age of eighteen; (c) Any medical record, history, or information pertaining to a person under the age of eighteen; (d) Any additional information sought or required about a person under the age of eighteen for the purpose of allowing that person to participate in any recreational activity conducted or sponsored by a public office or to use or obtain admission privileges to any recreational facility owned or operated by a public office. (11) "Community control sanction" has the meaning defined in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (12) "Post-release control sanction" has the meaning defined in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (13) "Redaction" means obscuring or deleting any information that is exempt from the duty to permit public inspection or copying from an item that otherwise meets the definition of a "record" in section 149.011 of the Revised Code. (14) "Designee," "elected official," and "future official" have the meanings defined in section 109.43 of the Revised Code. (15) "Body-worn camera" means a visual and audio recording device worn on the person of a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer while the correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer is engaged in the performance of official duties. (16) "Dashboard camera" means a visual and audio recording device mounted on a peace officer's vehicle or vessel that is used while the peace officer is engaged in the performance of the peace officer's duties. (17) "Restricted portions of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording" means any visual or audio portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording that shows, communicates, or discloses any of the following: (a) The image or identity of a child or information that could lead to the identification of a child who is a primary subject of the recording when the department of rehabilitation and correction, department of youth services, or the law enforcement agency knows or has reason to know the person is a child based on the department's or law enforcement agency's records or the content of the recording; (b) The death of a person or a deceased person's body, unless the death was caused by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the decedent's executor or administrator has been obtained; (c) The death of a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the decedent was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the decedent's executor or administrator has been obtained; (d) Grievous bodily harm, unless the injury was effected by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (e) An act of severe violence against a person that results in serious physical harm to the person, unless the act and injury was effected by a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer or, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (f) Grievous bodily harm to a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the injured person was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (g) An act of severe violence resulting in serious physical harm against a correctional employee, youth services employee, peace officer, firefighter, paramedic, or other first responder, occurring while the injured person was engaged in the performance of official duties, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the consent of the injured person or the injured person's guardian has been obtained; (h) A person's nude body, unless, subject to division (H)(1) of this section, the person's consent has been obtained; (i) Protected health information, the identity of a person in a health care facility who is not the subject of a correctional, youth services, or law enforcement encounter, or any other information in a health care facility that could identify a person who is not the subject of a correctional, youth services, or law enforcement encounter; (j) Information that could identify the alleged victim of a sex offense, menacing by stalking, or domestic violence; (k) Information, that does not constitute a confidential law enforcement investigatory record, that could identify a person who provides sensitive or confidential information to the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department of youth services, or a law enforcement agency when the disclosure of the person's identity or the information provided could reasonably be expected to threaten or endanger the safety or property of the person or another person; (l) Personal information of a person who is not arrested, cited, charged, or issued a written warning by a peace officer; (m) Proprietary correctional, youth services, or police contingency plans or tactics that are intended to prevent crime and maintain public order and safety; (n) A personal conversation unrelated to work between correctional employees, youth services employees, or peace officers or between a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer and an employee of a law enforcement agency; (o) A conversation between a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer and a member of the public that does not concern correctional, youth services, or law enforcement activities; (p) The interior of a residence, unless the interior of a residence is the location of an adversarial encounter with, or a use of force by, a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer; (q) Any portion of the interior of a private business that is not open to the public, unless an adversarial encounter with, or a use of force by, a correctional employee, youth services employee, or peace officer occurs in that location. As used in division (A)(17) of this section: "Grievous bodily harm" has the same meaning as in section 5924.120 of the Revised Code. "Health care facility" has the same meaning as in section 1337.11 of the Revised Code. "Protected health information" has the same meaning as in 45 C.F.R. 160.103. "Law enforcement agency" means a government entity that employs peace officers to perform law enforcement duties. "Personal information" means any government-issued identification number, date of birth, address, financial information, or criminal justice information from the law enforcement automated data system or similar databases. "Sex offense" has the same meaning as in section 2907.10 of the Revised Code. "Firefighter," "paramedic," and "first responder" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (18) "Attorney work product record" means a record that is not specific investigatory work product or a trial preparation record and that is created by an attorney, or by the agent of an attorney, in reasonable anticipation of or for litigation, trial, or administrative proceedings, when acting in an official capacity on behalf of the state, a political subdivision of the state, a state agency, a public official, or a public employee, that documents the independent thought processes, mental impressions, legal theories, strategies, analysis, or reasoning of an attorney or the agent of an attorney. (19) "Elected official" means a person who is elected or appointed to an elective office of the state or a political subdivision. (20) "Public calendar" means a calendar or appointment book maintained by an elected official to schedule the elected official's activities in relation to the elected official's position as an elected official. "Public calendar" does not include a personal calendar or appointment book maintained solely for an elected official's personal convenience that does not serve to document the elected official's official activities or functions or the official activities or functions of the elected official's public office. (B)(1) Upon request by any person and subject to division (B)(8) of this section, all public records responsive to the request shall be promptly prepared and made available for inspection to the requester at all reasonable times during regular business hours. Subject to division (B)(8) of this section, upon request by any person, a public office or person responsible for public records shall make copies of the requested public record available to the requester at cost and within a reasonable period of time. When considering whether a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office promptly prepared a video record for inspection or provided produced a copy of a video record for production within a reasonable period of time, in addition to any other factors, a court shall consider the time required for a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office to retrieve, download, review, redact, seek legal advice regarding, and produce the video record. Notwithstanding Except as specified in division (B)(11) of this section, notwithstanding any other requirement set forth in Chapter 149. of the Revised Code, a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office may charge a requester the actual cost associated with preparing a video record for inspection or production, not to exceed seventy-five dollars per hour of video produced, nor seven hundred fifty dollars total. As used in this division, "actual cost," with respect to video records only, means all costs incurred by the state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office in reviewing, blurring or otherwise obscuring, redacting, uploading, or producing the video records, including but not limited to the storage medium on which the record is produced, staff time, and any other relevant overhead necessary to comply with the request. A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office may include in its public records policy the requirement that a requester pay the estimated actual cost before beginning the process of preparing a video record for inspection or production. Where a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office imposes such a requirement, its obligation to produce a video or make it available for inspection begins once the estimated actual cost is paid in full by the requester. A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office shall provide the requester with the estimated actual cost within five business days of receipt of the public records request. If the actual cost exceeds the estimated actual cost, a state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office may charge a requester for the difference upon fulfilling a request for video records if the requester is notified in advance that the actual cost may be up to twenty per cent higher than the estimated actual cost. A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office shall not charge a requester a difference that exceeds twenty per cent of the estimated actual cost. If a public record contains information that is exempt from the duty to permit public inspection or to copy the public record, the public office or the person responsible for the public record shall make available all of the information within the public record that is not exempt. When making that public record available for public inspection or copying that public record, the public office or the person responsible for the public record shall notify the requester of any redaction or make the redaction plainly visible. A redaction shall be deemed a denial of a request to inspect or copy the redacted information, except if federal or state law authorizes or requires a public office to make the redaction. When the auditor of state receives a request to inspect or to make a copy of a record that was provided to the auditor of state for purposes of an audit, but the original public office has asserted to the auditor of state that the record is not a public record, the auditor of state may handle the requests by directing the requestor to the original public office that provided the record to the auditor of state. (2) To facilitate broader access to public records, a public office or the person responsible for public records shall organize and maintain public records in a manner that they can be made available for inspection or copying in accordance with division (B) of this section. A public office also shall have available a copy of its current records retention schedule at a location readily available to the public. If a requester makes an ambiguous or overly broad request or has difficulty in making a request for copies or inspection of public records under this section such that the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record cannot reasonably identify what public records are being requested, the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record may deny the request but shall provide the requester with an opportunity to revise the request by informing the requester of the manner in which records are maintained by the public office and accessed in the ordinary course of the public office's or person's duties. (3) If a request is ultimately denied, in part or in whole, the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record shall provide the requester with an explanation, including legal authority, setting forth why the request was denied. If the initial request was provided in writing, the explanation also shall be provided to the requester in writing. The explanation shall not preclude the public office or the person responsible for the requested public record from relying upon additional reasons or legal authority in defending an action commenced under division (C) of this section. (4) Unless specifically required or authorized by state or federal law or in accordance with division (B) of this section, no public office or person responsible for public records may limit or condition the availability of public records by requiring disclosure of the requester's identity or the intended use of the requested public record. Any requirement that the requester disclose the requester's identity or the intended use of the requested public record constitutes a denial of the request. (5) A public office or person responsible for public records may ask a requester to make the request in writing, may ask for the requester's identity, and may inquire about the intended use of the information requested, but may do so only after disclosing to the requester that a written request is not mandatory, that the requester may decline to reveal the requester's identity or the intended use, and when a written request or disclosure of the identity or intended use would benefit the requester by enhancing the ability of the public office or person responsible for public records to identify, locate, or deliver the public records sought by the requester. (6) If any person requests a copy of a public record in accordance with division (B) of this section, the public office or person responsible for the public record may require the requester to pay in advance the cost involved in providing the copy of the public record in accordance with the choice made by the requester under this division. The public office or the person responsible for the public record shall permit the requester to choose to have the public record duplicated upon paper, upon the same medium upon which the public office or person responsible for the public record keeps it, or upon any other medium upon which the public office or person responsible for the public record determines that it reasonably can be duplicated as an integral part of the normal operations of the public office or person responsible for the public record. When the requester makes a choice under this division, the public office or person responsible for the public record shall provide a copy of it in accordance with the choice made by the requester. Nothing in this section requires a public office or person responsible for the public record to allow the requester of a copy of the public record to make the copies of the public record. (7)(a) Upon a request made in accordance with division (B) of this section and subject to division (B)(6) of this section, a public office or person responsible for public records shall transmit a copy of a public record to any person by United States mail or by any other means of delivery or transmission within a reasonable period of time after receiving the request for the copy. The public office or person responsible for the public record may require the person making the request to pay in advance the cost of postage if the copy is transmitted by United States mail or the cost of delivery if the copy is transmitted other than by United States mail, and to pay in advance the costs incurred for other supplies used in the mailing, delivery, or transmission. (b) Any public office may adopt a policy and procedures that it will follow in transmitting, within a reasonable period of time after receiving a request, copies of public records by United States mail or by any other means of delivery or transmission pursuant to division (B)(7) of this section. A public office that adopts a policy and procedures under division (B)(7) of this section shall comply with them in performing its duties under that division. (c) In any policy and procedures adopted under division (B)(7) of this section: (i) A public office may limit the number of records requested by a person that the office will physically deliver by United States mail or by another delivery service to ten per month, unless the person certifies to the office in writing that the person does not intend to use or forward the requested records, or the information contained in them, for commercial purposes; (ii) A public office that chooses to provide some or all of its public records on a web site that is fully accessible to and searchable by members of the public at all times, other than during acts of God outside the public office's control or maintenance, and that charges no fee to search, access, download, or otherwise receive records provided on the web site, may limit to ten per month the number of records requested by a person that the office will deliver in a digital format, unless the requested records are not provided on the web site and unless the person certifies to the office in writing that the person does not intend to use or forward the requested records, or the information contained in them, for commercial purposes. (iii) For purposes of division (B)(7) of this section, "commercial" shall be narrowly construed and does not include reporting or gathering news, reporting or gathering information to assist citizen oversight or understanding of the operation or activities of government, or nonprofit educational research. (8) A public office or person responsible for public records is not required to permit a person who is incarcerated pursuant to a criminal conviction or a juvenile adjudication to inspect or to obtain a copy of any public record concerning a criminal investigation or prosecution or concerning what would be a criminal investigation or prosecution if the subject of the investigation or prosecution were an adult, unless the request to inspect or to obtain a copy of the record is for the purpose of acquiring information that is subject to release as a public record under this section and the judge who imposed the sentence or made the adjudication with respect to the person, or the judge's successor in office, finds that the information sought in the public record is necessary to support what appears to be a justiciable claim of the person. As used in this division, "public record concerning a criminal investigation or prosecution or concerning what would be a criminal investigation or prosecution if the subject of the investigation were an adult" includes, but is not limited to, personnel files and payroll and attendance records of designated public service workers. (9)(a) Upon written request made and signed by a journalist, a public office, or person responsible for public records, having custody of the records of the agency employing a specified designated public service worker shall disclose to the journalist the address of the actual personal residence of the designated public service worker and, if the designated public service worker's spouse, former spouse, or child is employed by a public office, the name and address of the employer of the designated public service worker's spouse, former spouse, or child, and any past, current, and future work schedules of the designated public service worker. The request shall include the journalist's name and title and the name and address of the journalist's employer and shall state that disclosure of the information sought would be in the public interest. (b) Division (B)(9)(a) of this section also applies to journalist requests for: (i) Customer information maintained by a municipally owned or operated public utility, other than social security numbers and any private financial information such as credit reports, payment methods, credit card numbers, and bank account information; (ii) Information about minors involved in a school vehicle accident as provided in division (A)(1)(gg) of this section, other than personal information as defined in section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (iii) A request form submitted to a public office under section 149.45 of the Revised Code; (iv) An affidavit submitted under section 319.28 of the Revised Code. (c) As used in division (B)(9) of this section, "journalist" means a person engaged in, connected with, or employed by any news medium, including a newspaper, magazine, press association, news agency, or wire service, a radio or television station, or a similar medium, for the purpose of gathering, processing, transmitting, compiling, editing, or disseminating information for the general public. (10) Upon a request made by a victim, victim's attorney, or victim's representative, as that term is used in section 2930.02 of the Revised Code, a public office or person responsible for public records shall transmit a copy of a depiction of the victim as described in division (A)(1)(ii) of this section to the victim, victim's attorney, or victim's representative. (11) A state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office shall not charge a fee for preparing a video record for inspection, or producing a copy of a video record, when the requester of the video record is a victim, as defined in Ohio Constitution, Article I, Section 10a, or who is a victim who suffered loss and could seek remedy through a tort action as defined by section 2307.011 of the Revised Code, who reasonably asserts that the video recording relates to the act or omission that caused the victim's harm or loss, or who is the legal counsel or insurer of the victim. A fee under this section may only be waived upon the receipt of an affidavit by the victim or the victim's legal counsel identifying that the use of the video is to investigate harm or damages that may have been captured on the video. As used in this division, "legal counsel of the victim" means an attorney who, at the time of making the request, produces to the state or local law enforcement agency or a prosecuting attorney's office a signed retention agreement or letter of representation that establishes that the attorney is representing the victim. (C)(1) If a person allegedly is aggrieved by the failure of a public office or the person responsible for public records to promptly prepare a public record and to make it available to the person for inspection in accordance with division (B) of this section or by any other failure of a public office or the person responsible for public records to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section, the person allegedly aggrieved may serve pursuant to Rule 4 of the Ohio Rules of Civil Procedure a complaint, on a form prescribed by the clerk of the court of claims, to the public office or person responsible for public records allegedly responsible for the alleged failure. Upon receipt of the complaint of the person allegedly aggrieved, the public office or person responsible for public records has three business days to cure or otherwise address the failure alleged in the complaint. The person allegedly aggrieved shall not file a complaint with a court or commence a mandamus action under this section within the three-day period. Upon the expiration of the three-day period, the person allegedly aggrieved may, subject to the requirements of division (C)(2) of this section, do only one of the following, and not both: (a) File a complaint with the clerk of the court of claims or the clerk of the court of common pleas under section 2743.75 of the Revised Code; (b) Commence a mandamus action to obtain a judgment that orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section, that awards court costs and reasonable attorney's fees to the person that instituted the mandamus action, and, if applicable, that includes an order fixing statutory damages under division (C)(3) of this section. The mandamus action may be commenced in the court of common pleas of the county in which division (B) of this section allegedly was not complied with, in the supreme court pursuant to its original jurisdiction under Section 2 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution, or in the court of appeals for the appellate district in which division (B) of this section allegedly was not complied with pursuant to its original jurisdiction under Section 3 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution. (2) Upon filing a complaint or mandamus action with a court under divisions (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section, a person allegedly aggrieved shall file with the court, in conjunction with the person's complaint or petition, a written affirmation stating that the person properly transmitted a complaint to the public office or person responsible for public records, the failure alleged in the complaint has not been cured or otherwise resolved to the person's satisfaction, and that the complaint was transmitted to the public office or person responsible for public records at least three business days before the filing of the suit. If the person fails to file an affirmation pursuant to this division, the suit shall be dismissed. (3) If a requester transmits a written request by hand delivery, electronic submission, or certified mail to inspect or receive copies of any public record in a manner that fairly describes the public record or class of public records to the public office or person responsible for the requested public records, except as otherwise provided in this section, the requester shall be entitled to recover the amount of statutory damages set forth in this division if a court determines that the public office or the person responsible for public records failed to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section. Statutory damages are not available pursuant to this section to a person committed to the custody of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the United States bureau of prisons, or a child committed to the department of youth services as permitted in Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code. The amount of statutory damages shall be fixed at one hundred dollars for each business day during which the public office or person responsible for the requested public records failed to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section, beginning with the day on which the requester files a mandamus action to recover statutory damages, up to a maximum of one thousand dollars. The award of statutory damages shall not be construed as a penalty, but as compensation for injury arising from lost use of the requested information. The existence of this injury shall be conclusively presumed. The award of statutory damages shall be in addition to all other remedies authorized by this section. The court may reduce an award of statutory damages or not award statutory damages if the court determines both of the following: (a) That, based on the ordinary application of statutory law and case law as it existed at the time of the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records that allegedly constitutes a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section and that was the basis of the mandamus action, a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records did not constitute a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section; (b) That a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records would serve the public policy that underlies the authority that is asserted as permitting that conduct or threatened conduct. (4) In a mandamus action filed under division (C)(1) of this section, the following apply: (a)(i) If the court orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section, the court shall determine and award to the relator all court costs, which shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (ii) If the court makes a determination described in division (C)(4)(b)(iii) of this section, the court shall determine and award to the relator all court costs, which shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (b) If the court renders a judgment that orders the public office or the person responsible for the public record to comply with division (B) of this section or if the court determines any of the following, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees to the relator, subject to division (C)(5) of this section: (i) The public office or the person responsible for the public records failed to respond affirmatively or negatively to the public records request in accordance with the time allowed under division (B) of this section. (ii) The public office or the person responsible for the public records promised to permit the relator to inspect or receive copies of the public records requested within a specified period of time but failed to fulfill that promise within that specified period of time. (iii) The public office or the person responsible for the public records acted in bad faith when the office or person voluntarily made the public records available to the relator for the first time after the relator commenced the mandamus action, but before the court issued any order concluding whether or not the public office or person was required to comply with division (B) of this section. No discovery may be conducted on the issue of the alleged bad faith of the public office or person responsible for the public records. This division shall not be construed as creating a presumption that the public office or the person responsible for the public records acted in bad faith when the office or person voluntarily made the public records available to the relator for the first time after the relator commenced the mandamus action, but before the court issued any order described in this division. (c) The court shall not award attorney's fees to the relator if the court determines both of the following: (i) That, based on the ordinary application of statutory law and case law as it existed at the time of the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records that allegedly constitutes a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section and that was the basis of the mandamus action, a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records did not constitute a failure to comply with an obligation in accordance with division (B) of this section; (ii) That a well-informed public office or person responsible for the requested public records reasonably would believe that the conduct or threatened conduct of the public office or person responsible for the requested public records would serve the public policy that underlies the authority that is asserted as permitting that conduct or threatened conduct. (5) All of the following apply to any award of reasonable attorney's fees awarded under division (C)(4)(b) of this section: (a) The fees shall be construed as remedial and not punitive. (b) The fees awarded shall not exceed the total of the reasonable attorney's fees incurred before the public record was made available to the relator and the fees described in division (C)(5)(c) of this section. (c) Reasonable attorney's fees shall include reasonable fees incurred to produce proof of the reasonableness and amount of the fees and to otherwise litigate entitlement to the fees. (d) The court may reduce the amount of fees awarded if the court determines that, given the factual circumstances involved with the specific public records request, an alternative means should have been pursued to more effectively and efficiently resolve the dispute that was subject to the mandamus action filed under division (C)(1) of this section. (6) If the court does not issue a writ of mandamus under division (C) of this section and the court determines at that time that the bringing of the mandamus action was frivolous conduct as defined in division (A) of section 2323.51 of the Revised Code, the court may award to the public office all court costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees, as determined by the court. (D) Chapter 1347. of the Revised Code does not limit the provisions of this section. (E)(1) To ensure that all employees of public offices are appropriately educated about a public office's obligations under division (B) of this section, all elected officials or their appropriate designees shall attend training approved by the attorney general as provided in section 109.43 of the Revised Code. A future official may satisfy the requirements of this division by attending the training before taking office, provided that the future official may not send a designee in the future official's place. (2) All public offices shall adopt a public records policy in compliance with this section for responding to public records requests. In adopting a public records policy under this division, a public office may obtain guidance from the model public records policy developed and provided to the public office by the attorney general under section 109.43 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the policy may not limit the number of public records that the public office will make available to a single person, may not limit the number of public records that it will make available during a fixed period of time, and may not establish a fixed period of time before it will respond to a request for inspection or copying of public records, unless that period is less than eight hours. The public office shall distribute the public records policy adopted by the public office under this division to the employee of the public office who is the records custodian or records manager or otherwise has custody of the records of that office. The public office shall require that employee to acknowledge receipt of the copy of the public records policy. The public office shall create a poster that describes its public records policy and shall post the poster in a conspicuous place in the public office and in all locations where the public office has branch offices. The public office may post its public records policy on the internet web site of the public office if the public office maintains an internet web site. A public office that has established a manual or handbook of its general policies and procedures for all employees of the public office shall include the public records policy of the public office in the manual or handbook. (F)(1) The bureau of motor vehicles may adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to reasonably limit the number of bulk commercial special extraction requests made by a person for the same records or for updated records during a calendar year. The rules may include provisions for charges to be made for bulk commercial special extraction requests for the actual cost of the bureau, plus special extraction costs, plus ten per cent. The bureau may charge for expenses for redacting information, the release of which is prohibited by law. (2) As used in division (F)(1) of this section: (a) "Actual cost" means the cost of depleted supplies, records storage media costs, actual mailing and alternative delivery costs, or other transmitting costs, and any direct equipment operating and maintenance costs, including actual costs paid to private contractors for copying services. (b) "Bulk commercial special extraction request" means a request for copies of a record for information in a format other than the format already available, or information that cannot be extracted without examination of all items in a records series, class of records, or database by a person who intends to use or forward the copies for surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes. "Bulk commercial special extraction request" does not include a request by a person who gives assurance to the bureau that the person making the request does not intend to use or forward the requested copies for surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes. (c) "Commercial" means profit-seeking production, buying, or selling of any good, service, or other product. (d) "Special extraction costs" means the cost of the time spent by the lowest paid employee competent to perform the task, the actual amount paid to outside private contractors employed by the bureau, or the actual cost incurred to create computer programs to make the special extraction. "Special extraction costs" include any charges paid to a public agency for computer or records services. (3) For purposes of divisions (F)(1) and (2) of this section, "surveys, marketing, solicitation, or resale for commercial purposes" shall be narrowly construed and does not include reporting or gathering news, reporting or gathering information to assist citizen oversight or understanding of the operation or activities of government, or nonprofit educational research. (G) A request by a defendant, counsel of a defendant, or any agent of a defendant in a criminal action that public records related to that action be made available under this section shall be considered a demand for discovery pursuant to the Criminal Rules, except to the extent that the Criminal Rules plainly indicate a contrary intent. The defendant, counsel of the defendant, or agent of the defendant making a request under this division shall serve a copy of the request on the prosecuting attorney, director of law, or other chief legal officer responsible for prosecuting the action. (H)(1) Any portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording described in divisions (A)(17)(b) to (h) of this section may be released by consent of the subject of the recording or a representative of that person, as specified in those divisions, only if either of the following applies: (a) The recording will not be used in connection with any probable or pending criminal proceedings; (b) The recording has been used in connection with a criminal proceeding that was dismissed or for which a judgment has been entered pursuant to Rule 32 of the Rules of Criminal Procedure, and will not be used again in connection with any probable or pending criminal proceedings. (2) If a public office denies a request to release a restricted portion of a body-worn camera or dashboard camera recording, as defined in division (A)(17) of this section, any person may file a mandamus action pursuant to this section or a complaint with the clerk of the court of claims pursuant to section 2743.75 of the Revised Code, requesting the court to order the release of all or portions of the recording. If the court considering the request determines that the filing articulates by clear and convincing evidence that the public interest in the recording substantially outweighs privacy interests and other interests asserted to deny release, the court shall order the public office to release the recording. Sec. 153.01. (A) Whenever any building or structure for the use of the state or any institution supported in whole or in part by the state or in or upon the public works of the state that is administered by the Ohio facilities construction commission or by any other state officer or state agency authorized by law to administer a project, including an educational institution listed in section 3345.50 of the Revised Code, is to be erected or constructed, whenever additions, alterations, or structural or other improvements are to be made, or whenever heating, cooling, or ventilating plants or other equipment is to be installed or material supplied therefor, the estimated cost of which amounts to two hundred thousand dollars or more, or the amount determined pursuant to section 153.53 of the Revised Code or more, each officer, board, or other authority upon which devolves the duty of constructing, erecting, altering, or installing the same, referred to in sections 153.01 to 153.60 of the Revised Code as the public authority, shall cause to be made, by an architect or engineer whose contract of employment shall be prepared and approved by the attorney general, the following: (1) Full and accurate plans, suitable for the use of mechanics and other builders in the construction, improvement, addition, alteration, or installation; (2) Details to scale and full-sized, so drawn and represented as to be easily understood; (3) Definite and complete specifications of the work to be performed, together with directions that will enable a competent mechanic or other builder to carry them out and afford bidders all needful information; (4) A full and accurate estimate of each item of expense and the aggregate cost of those items of expense; (5) A life-cycle cost analysis; (6) Further data as may be required by the Ohio facilities construction commission. In preparing these plans, details, specifications, estimates, analyses, or other data, the public authority may require the architect or engineer to use a building information model system, as long as the system is based on a nationally recognized standard for building information models. As used in this division, "building information model" means a digital representation of physical and functional characteristics of a facility, and electronic files used to design and coordinate the project, whether it is a single model or multiple models used in the aggregate. (B)(1) Division (A) of this section shall not be required with respect to a construction management contract entered into with a construction manager at risk as described in section 9.334 of the Revised Code or a design-build contract entered into with a design-build firm as described in section 153.693 of the Revised Code. (2) Nothing in this chapter shall interfere with the power of the director of transportation to prepare plans for, acquire rights-of-way for, construct, or maintain roads, highways, or bridges, or to let contracts for those purposes. Sec. 153.07. The notice provided for in section 153.06 of the Revised Code shall be published by electronic meansonce each week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, and may be published in other news media in the county where the activity for which bids are submitted is to occur and in such other newspapers as ordered by the Ohio facilities construction commission, the last publication to . The notice shall invite interested parties to submit proposals for consideration and shall be published at least eightfourteen days preceding the day for opening the bids, and in such form and with such phraseology a manner as prescribed by the commission orders. Copies of the plans, details, estimates of cost, and specifications shall be available electronically and open to public inspection at all business hours between the day of the first publication and the day for opening the bids, at the office of the commission where the bids are received, and such other place as may be designated in such notice. Sec. 153.08. On the day and at the place named in the notice provided for in section 153.06 of the Revised Code, the owner referred to in section 153.01 of the Revised Code shall open the bids and shall publicly, with the assistance of the architect or engineer, immediately proceed to tabulate the bids. For a bid filed electronically, the public bid opening may be broadcast by electronic means pursuant to rules established by the Ohio facilities construction commission. A bid shall be invalid and not considered unless a bid guaranty meeting the requirements of section 153.54 of the Revised Code and in the form approved by the commission is filed with such bid. For a bid that is not filed electronically, the bid and bid guaranty shall be filed in one sealed envelope. If the bid and bid guaranty are filed electronically, they must be received electronically before the deadline published pursuant to section 153.06 of the Revised Code. For all bids filed electronically, the original, unaltered bid guaranty shall be made available to the public authority after the public bid opening, which may be achieved by means of an electronic verification and security system established under rules adopted by the Ohio facilities construction commission under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. After investigation, which shall be completed within thirty days, the contract shall be awarded by such owner to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder in accordance with section 9.312 of the Revised Code. No contract shall be entered into until the industrial commission has certified that the person so awarded the contract has complied with sections 4123.01 to 4123.94 of the Revised Code, until, if the bidder so awarded the contract is a foreign corporation, the secretary of state has certified that such corporation is authorized to do business in this state, until, if the bidder so awarded the contract is a person nonresident of this state, such person has filed with the secretary of state a power of attorney designating the secretary of state as its agent for the purpose of accepting service of summons in any action brought under section 153.05 of the Revised Code or under sections 4123.01 to 4123.94 of the Revised Code, and until the contract and bond, if any, are submitted to the attorney general and the attorney general's approval certified thereon. No contract shall be entered into unless the bidder possesses a valid certificate of compliance with affirmative action programs issued pursuant to section 9.47 of the Revised Code and dated no earlier than one hundred eighty days prior to the date fixed for the opening of bids for a particular project. Sec. 153.09. If in the opinion of the owner referred to in section 153.01 of the Revised Code, the award of a contract to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder is not in the best interests of the state, the owner may accept another bid so opened or reject all bids, and advertise for other bids. Such advertisement shall be for such time, in such form, and in by such newspaper electronic media as the Ohio facilities construction commission directs. All contracts shall provide that such owner may make any change in work or materials on the conditions and in the manner provided in sections 153.10 and 153.11 of the Revised Code. Sec. 153.12. (A) With respect to award of any contract for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, alteration, repair, painting, or decoration of a public improvement made by the state, or any county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision, or any public board, commission, authority, instrumentality, or special purpose district of or in the state or a political subdivision or that is authorized by state law, the award, and execution of the contract, shall be made within sixty days after the date on which the bids are opened. The failure to award and execute the contract within sixty days invalidates the entire bid proceedings and all bids submitted, unless the time for awarding and executing the contract is extended by mutual consent of the owner or its representatives and the bidder whose bid the owner accepts and with respect to whom the owner subsequently awards and executes a contract. The public owners referred to in this section shall include, in the plans and specifications for the project for which bids are solicited, the estimate of cost. The bid for which the award is to be made shall be opened at the time and place named in the advertisement for bids, unless extended by the owner or its representative or unless, within seventy-two hours prior to the published time for the opening of bids, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, any modification of the plans or specifications and estimates of cost for the project for which bids are solicited is issued and mailed or otherwise furnished to persons who have obtained plans or specifications for the project, for which the time for opening of bids shall be extended one week, with no further advertising of bids required. The contractor, upon request, is entitled to a notice to proceed with the work by the owner or its representative upon execution of the contract. No contract to which this section applies shall be entered into if the price of the contract, or, if the project involves multiple contracts where the total price of all contracts for the project, is in excess of ten per cent, in the case of a contract made by the state or a public board, commission, authority, or instrumentality of the state, or twenty per cent, in the case of a contract made by a county, township, municipal corporation, school district, special purpose district, or other political subdivision or a public board, commission, authority, or instrumentality of the political subdivision, above the entire estimate thereof, nor shall the entire cost of the construction, reconstruction, repair, painting, decorating, improvement, alteration, addition, or installation, including changes and estimates of expenses for architects or engineers, exceed in the aggregate the amount authorized by law. The unit or lump sum price stated in the contract shall be used in determining the amount to be paid and shall constitute full and final compensation for all the work. Partial payment to the contractor for work performed under the lump sum price shall be based on a schedule prepared by the contractor and approved by the architect or engineer who shall apportion the lump sum price to the major components entering into or forming a part of the work under the lump sum price. Partial payments to the contractor for labor performed under either a unit or lump sum price contract shall be made at the a rate of ninety-two not less than ninety-six per cent of the estimates prepared by the contractor and approved by the architect or engineer. All labor performed after the job is fifty per cent completed shall be paid for at the rate of one hundred per cent of the estimates submitted by the contractor and approved by the architect or engineer. No subcontract shall be paid at a rate lower than the rate being paid to the contractor by the public authority. The amounts and time of payments of any public improvements contract made by the state or any county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision, or any public board, commission, authority, instrumentality, or special purpose district of or in the state or a political subdivision or that is authorized by state law, except as provided in section 5525.19 of the Revised Code, shall be governed by this section and sections 153.13 and 153.14 of the Revised Code. If the time for awarding the contract is extended by mutual consent, or if the owner or its representative fails to issue a timely notice to proceed as required by this section, the owner or its representative shall issue a change order authorizing delay costs to the contractor, which does not invalidate the contract. The amount of such a change order to the owner shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of the contract for change orders or force accounts or, if no such provision is set forth in the contract, the cost to the owner shall be the contractor's actual costs including wages, labor costs other than wages, wage taxes, materials, equipment costs and rentals, insurance, and subcontracts attributable to the delay, plus a reasonable sum for overhead. In the event of a dispute between the owner and the contractor concerning such change order, procedures shall be commenced under the applicable terms of the contract, or, if the contract contains no provision for resolving the dispute, it shall be resolved pursuant to the procedures for arbitration in Chapter 2711. of the Revised Code, except as provided in division (B) of this section. Nothing in this division shall be construed as a limitation upon the authority of the director of transportation granted in Chapter 5525. of the Revised Code. (B) If a dispute arises between the state and a contractor concerning the terms of a public improvement contract let by the state or concerning a breach of the contract, and after administrative remedies provided for in such contract and any alternative dispute resolution procedures provided in accordance with guidelines established by the executive director of the Ohio facilities construction commission are exhausted, the contractor may bring an action to the court of claims in accordance with Chapter 2743. of the Revised Code. The state or the contractor may request the chief justice of the supreme court to appoint a referee or panel of referees in accordance with division (C)(3) of section 2743.03 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "dispute" means a disagreement between the state and the contractor concerning a public improvement contract let by the state. Sec. 153.13. At the time named in the contract for payment to the person with whom it is made, the owner referred to in section 153.01 or 153.12 of the Revised Code shall approve a full, accurate, and detailed estimate of the various kinds of labor performed and material furnished under the contract, with the amount due for each kind of labor and material and the materials and amount due in the aggregate, which estimate shall be based upon actual measurement of such labor and materials, and shall give the amounts of the preceding estimate, and the amount of labor performed and materials furnished since the last estimate. From the date the contract is fifty per cent complete, as evidenced by payments in the amount of at least fifty per cent of the contract to the person with whom the owner has contracted, except in the case of contracts the total cost of which is less than fifteen thousand dollars, all funds retained pursuant to sections 153.12 and 153.14 of the Revised Code for the faithful performance of work shall be deposited in the escrow account designated in section 153.63 of the Revised Code. After the contract is fifty per cent complete, no further funds shall be retained. When the major portion of the project is substantially completed and occupied, or in use, or otherwise accepted, and there exists no other reason to withhold retainage, the retained percentages held in connection with such portion and interest thereon accrued shall, within thirty days of substantial completion of, occupation of, use of, or acceptance of the project, be released from escrow and paid to the primary contractor, withholding only that amount reasonably necessary to assure final completion of the project. Funds in the escrow account not heretofore paid, with accumulated interest, shall be paid to the person with whom the owner has contracted thirty days from the date of completion or either acceptance or occupancy by the owner. Such payments shall be in accordance with division (A)(2) of section 153.63 of the Revised Code. Any retained funds withheld after substantial completion of, occupation of, use of, or acceptance of the project, and pending final completion of the project, and interest thereon accrued shall be paid to the primary contractor not later than thirty days after the date of final completion of the project. Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation upon the authority of the director of transportation granted in Chapter 5525. of the Revised Code. Sec. 153.14. For the construction of those projects, improvements, and public buildings over which the Ohio facilities construction commission has general supervision pursuant to section 123.21 of the Revised Code, the estimates referred to in section 153.13 of the Revised Code shall be filed with the executive director by the owner referred to in section 153.01 or 153.12 of the Revised Code. Upon completion of a project referred to in section 153.13 of the Revised Code or any divisible part thereof, the maintenance and repair of such project or divisible part shall be assumed by the owner referred to in section 153.01 or 153.12 of the Revised Code. In addition to all other payments on account of work performed, there shall be allowed by the owner referred to in section 153.01 or 153.12 of the Revised Code and paid to the contractor a sum at the rate of ninety-two per cent of the invoice costs, not to exceed the bid price in a unit price contract, of material delivered on the site of the work, or a railroad station, siding, or other point in the vicinity of the work, or other approved storage site, provided such materials have been inspected and found to meet the specifications. The balance of such invoiced value shall be paid when such material is incorporated into and becomes a part of such building, construction, addition, improvement, alteration, or installation. When an estimate is allowed on account of material delivered on the site of the work or in the vicinity thereof or under the possession and control of the contractor but not yet incorporated therein, such material shall become the property of the owner under the contract, but if such material is stolen, destroyed, or damaged by casualty before being used, the contractor shall be required to replace it at the contractor's own expense. When the rate of work and amounts involved are so large that it is considered advisable by the owner or contractor, estimates and payments shall be made twice each month. Payment on approved estimates filed with the owner or its representative shall be made within thirty days. Upon the failure of the owner or its representative to make such payments within thirty days, or upon an unauthorized withholding of retainage, there shall be allowed to the contractor, in addition to any other remedies allowed by law, interest on such moneys not paid within thirty days. Interest on the unauthorized withholding of retainage shall be in addition to any interest earned in the escrow account set forth as described in section 153.13 of the Revised Code. The rate of such interest shall be the average of the prime rate established at the commercial banks in the city of over one hundred thousand population that is nearest the construction project. Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation upon the authority of the director of transportation granted in Chapter 5525. of the Revised Code. Sec. 153.501. (A) A public authority may accept a subcontract awarded by a construction manager at risk, a design-build firm, or a general contracting firm, or may reject any such subcontract if the public authority determines that the bidder is not responsible. (B) A public authority may authorize a construction manager at risk or design-build firm to utilize a design-assist firm on any public improvement project without transferring any design liability to the design-assist firm. (C) If the construction manager at risk or design-build firm intends and is permitted by the public authority to self-perform a portion of the work to be performed, the construction manager at risk or design-build firm shall submit a sealed bid to the public authority for the portion of the work prior to accepting and opening any bids for the same work, except when the public authority requests a guaranteed maximum price proposal due at the time of selection. Sec. 153.502. (A) Each construction manager at risk and design-build firm shall establish criteria by which it will prequalify prospective bidders on subcontracts awarded for work to be performed under the construction management or design-build contract. The criteria established by a construction manager at risk or design-build firm shall be subject to the approval of the public authority involved in the project and shall be consistent with the rules adopted by the Ohio facilities construction commission pursuant to section 153.503 of the Revised Code. (B) For each subcontract to be awarded, the construction manager at risk or design-build firm shall identify at least three prospective bidders that are prequalified to bid on that subcontract, except that the construction manager at risk or design-build firm shall identify fewer than three if the construction manager at risk or design-build firm establishes to the satisfaction of the public authority that fewer than three prequalified bidders are available. The public authority shall verify that each prospective bidder meets the prequalification criteria and, subject to division (E) of this section, may eliminate any bidder it determines is not qualified. (C) Once the prospective bidders are prequalified and found acceptable by the public authority, the construction manager at risk or design-build firm shall solicit proposals from each of those bidders. The solicitation and selection of a subcontractor shall be conducted under an open book pricing method. As used in this division, "open book pricing method" has the same meaning as in section 9.33 of the Revised Code, in the case of a construction manager at risk, and the same meaning as in section 153.65 of the Revised Code, in the case of a design-build firm. (D) A construction manager at risk or design-build firm shall not be required to award a subcontract to a low bidder. (E) Except as provided in section 307.921 of the Revised Code, no public authority shall eliminate a bidder as unqualified on the basis that the bidder has not complied with an affirmative action program or a diversity, equity, and inclusion program. This division shall not be construed to affect any set-aside programs for minority business enterprises or EDGE business enterprises, as defined in sections 122.921 and 122.922 of the Revised Code, respectively. Sec. 153.54. (A) Except with respect to a contract described in section 9.334 or 153.693 of the Revised Code, each person bidding for a contract with the state or any political subdivision, district, institution, or other agency thereof, excluding therefrom the department of transportation, for any public improvement shall file with the bid, a bid guaranty in the form of eitherany of the following: (1) A bond in accordance with division (B) of this section for the full amount of the bid; (2) A certified check, cashier's check, or letter of credit pursuant to Chapter 1305. of the Revised Code, in accordance with division (C) of this section. Any such letter of credit is revocable only at the option of the beneficiary state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency. The amount of the certified check, cashier's check, or letter of credit shall be equal to ten per cent of the bid; (3) An electronic verification through an electronic verification and security system described in section 153.08 of the Revised Code, if the state or any political subdivision, district, institution, or other agency thereof accepts bids electronically pursuant to section 153.08 of the Revised Code. (B) A bid guaranty filed pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section shall be conditioned to: (1) Provide that, if the bid is accepted, the bidder, after the awarding or the recommendation for the award of the contract, whichever the contracting authority designates, will enter into a proper contract in accordance with the bid, plans, details, and specifications. If for any reason, other than as authorized by section 9.31 of the Revised Code or division (G) of this section, the bidder fails to enter into the contract, and the contracting authority awards the contract to the next lowest bidder, the bidder and the surety on the bidder's bond are liable to the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency for the difference between the bid and that of the next lowest bidder, or for a penal sum not to exceed ten per cent of the amount of the bond, whichever is less. If the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency does not award the contract to the next lowest bidder but resubmits the project for bidding, the bidder failing to enter into the contract and the surety on the bidder's bond, except as provided in division (G) of this section, are liable to the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency for a penal sum not to exceed ten per cent of the amount of the bid or the costs in connection with the resubmission of printing new contract documents, required advertising, and printing and mailing notices to prospective bidders, whichever is less. (2) Indemnify the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency against all damage suffered by failure to perform the contract according to its provisions and in accordance with the plans, details, and specifications therefor and to pay all lawful claims of subcontractors, material suppliers, and laborers for labor performed or material furnished in carrying forward, performing, or completing the contract; and agree and assent that this undertaking is for the benefit of any subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer having a just claim, as well as for the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency. (C)(1) A bid guaranty filed pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section shall be conditioned to provide that if the bid is accepted, the bidder, after the awarding or the recommendation for the award of the contract, whichever the contracting authority designates, will enter into a proper contract in accordance with the bid, plans, details, specifications, and bills of material. If for any reason, other than as authorized by section 9.31 of the Revised Code or division (G) of this section, the bidder fails to enter into the contract, and the contracting authority awards the contract to the next lowest bidder, the bidder is liable to the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency for the difference between the bidder's bid and that of the next lowest bidder, or for a penal sum not to exceed ten per cent of the amount of the bid, whichever is less. If the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency does not award the contract to the next lowest bidder but resubmits the project for bidding, the bidder failing to enter into the contract, except as provided in division (G) of this section, is liable to the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency for a penal sum not to exceed ten per cent of the amount of the bid or the costs in connection with the resubmission, of printing new contract documents, required advertising, and printing and mailing notices to prospective bidders, whichever is less. If the bidder enters into the contract, the bidder, at the time the contract is entered to, shall file a bond for the amount of the contract to indemnify the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency against all damage suffered by failure to perform the contract according to its provisions and in accordance with the plans, details, and specifications and to pay all lawful claims of subcontractors, material suppliers, and laborers for labor performed or material furnished in carrying forward, performing, or completing the contract; and agree and assent that this undertaking is for the benefit of any subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer having a just claim, as well as for the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency. (2) A construction manager who enters into a contract pursuant to sections 9.33 to 9.333 of the Revised Code, if required by the public authority at the time the construction manager enters into the contract, shall file a letter of credit pursuant to Chapter 1305. of the Revised Code, bond, certified check, or cashier's check, for the value of the construction management contract to indemnify the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency against all damage suffered by the construction manager's failure to perform the contract according to its provisions, and shall agree and assent that this undertaking is for the benefit of the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency. A letter of credit provided by the construction manager is revocable only at the option of the beneficiary state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency. (D) Where the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency accepts a bid but the bidder fails or refuses to enter into a proper contract in accordance with the bid, plans, details, and specifications within ten days after the awarding of the contract, the bidder and the surety on any bond, except as provided in division (G) of this section, are liable for the amount of the difference between the bidder's bid and that of the next lowest bidder, but not in excess of the liability specified in division (B)(1) or (C) of this section. Where the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency then awards the bid to such next lowest bidder and such next lowest bidder also fails or refuses to enter into a proper contract in accordance with the bid, plans, details, and specifications within ten days after the awarding of the contract, the liability of such next lowest bidder, except as provided in division (G) of this section, is the amount of the difference between the bids of such next lowest bidder and the third lowest bidder, but not in excess of the liability specified in division (B)(1) or (C) of this section. Liability on account of an award to any lowest bidder beyond the third lowest bidder shall be determined in like manner. (E) Notwithstanding division (C) of this section, where the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency resubmits the project for bidding, each bidder whose bid was accepted but who failed or refused to enter into a proper contract, except as provided in division (G) of this section, is liable for an equal share of a penal sum in connection with the resubmission, of printing new contract documents, required advertising, and printing and mailing notices to prospective bidders, but no bidder's liability shall exceed the amount of the bidder's bid guaranty. (F) All bid guaranties filed pursuant to this section shall be payable to the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency, be for the benefit of the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency or any person having a right of action thereon, and be deposited with, and held by, the board, officer, or agent contracting on behalf of the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency. All bonds filed pursuant to this section shall be issued by a surety company authorized to do business in this state as surety approved by the board, officer, or agent awarding the contract on behalf of the state, political subdivision, district, institution, or agency. (G) A bidder for a contract with the state or any political subdivision, district, institution, or other agency thereof, excluding therefrom the Ohio department of transportation, for a public improvement costing less than one-half million dollars may withdraw the bid from consideration if the bidder's bid for some other contract with the state or any political subdivision, district, institution, or other agency thereof, excluding therefrom the department of transportation, for the public improvement costing less than one-half million dollars has already been accepted, if the bidder certifies in good faith that the total amount of all the bidder's current contracts is less than one-half million dollars, and if the surety certifies in good faith that the bidder is unable to perform the subsequent contract because to do so would exceed the bidder's bonding capacity. If a bid is withdrawn under authority of this division, the contracting authority may award the contract to the next lowest bidder or reject all bids and resubmit the project for bidding, and neither the bidder nor the surety on the bidder's bond are liable for the difference between the bidder's bid and that of the next lowest bidder, for a penal sum, or for the costs of printing new contract documents, required advertising, and printing and mailing notices to prospective bidders. (H) Bid guaranties filed pursuant to division (A) of this section shall be returned to all unsuccessful bidders immediately after the contract is executed. The bid guaranty filed pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section shall be returned to the successful bidder upon filing of the bond required in division (C) of this section. (I) For the purposes of this section and sections 153.56, 153.57, and 153.571 of the Revised Code, "public improvement," "subcontractor," "material supplier," "laborer," and "materials" have the same meanings as in section 1311.25 of the Revised Code. Sec. 153.59. Every contract for or on behalf of the state, or any township, county, or municipal corporation of the state, for the construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or public work in the state shall contain provisions by which the contractor agrees to both of the following: (A) That, in the hiring of employees for the performance of work under the contract or any subcontract, no contractor, subcontractor, or any person acting on a contractor's or subcontractor's behalf, by reason of race, creed, sex, disability or military status as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, or color, shall discriminate against any citizen of the state in the employment of labor or workers who is qualified and available to perform the work to which the employment relates; (B) That no contractor, subcontractor, or any person on a contractor's or subcontractor's behalf, in any manner, shall discriminate against or intimidate any employee hired for the performance of work under the contract on account of race, creed, sex, disability or military status as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, or color. The department of development shall ensure that no capital moneys appropriated by the general assembly for any purpose shall be expended unless the project for which those moneys are appropriated provides for an affirmative action program for the employment and effective utilization of disadvantaged persons whose disadvantage may arise from cultural, racial, or ethnic background, or other similar cause, including, but not limited to, race, religion, sex, disability or military status as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, national origin, or ancestry. In awarding contracts for capital improvement projects, the department of development shall ensure that equal consideration be given to contractors, subcontractors, or joint venturers who qualify as a minority business enterprise. As used in this section, "minority business enterprise" means a business enterprise that is owned or controlled by one or more socially or economically disadvantaged persons who are residents of this state. "Socially or economically disadvantaged persons" means persons, regardless of marital status, who are members of groups whose disadvantage may arise from discrimination on the basis of race, religion, sex, disability or military status as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, national origin, ancestry, or other similar cause. Sec. 153.63. (A) Any money which is due from the public owner referred to in section 153.12 1311.28 of the Revised Code under a contract entered into under this chapter or entered into under other applicable sections of the Revised Code for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, alteration, repair, painting, or decoration of a public improvement shall, on the day it is due, be paid to the contractor or deposited in an escrow account, whichever is applicable, with one or more banks or building and loan associations in the state selected by mutual agreement between the contractor and the public owner. The agreement shall contain the following provisions: (1) The money shall be deposited in a savings account or the escrow agent shall promptly invest all of the escrowed principal in obligations selected by the escrow agent, as stipulated in the agreement. (2) The escrow agent shall hold the escrowed principal and income until receipt of notice from the public owner and the contractor, or until receipt of an arbitration order or an order of the court of claims specifying the amount of the escrowed principal to be released and the person to whom it is to be released. Upon receipt of the notice or order, the agent shall promptly pay such amount of principal and a proportionate amount of the escrowed income to the person indicated. (3) The escrow agent shall be compensated for its services as agreed to by the public owner and the contractor from the income from the escrow account. The agreement may include other provisions not inconsistent with this section, including, but not limited to granting authority for the escrow agent to commingle the escrowed funds with funds held pursuant to other escrow agreements and limiting the liability of the escrow agent. (B) When the public owner, as defined in division (B) of section 2743.01 of the Revised Code, and the contractor disagree as to the conditions under which money is to be paid under this section, the parties shall apply for a decision by arbitration under the procedures of Chapter 2711. of the Revised Code. When an application is made, neither party shall initiate, and no court shall permit the maintenance of, an action in court for decision of the same issues sought to be determined in the arbitration application. The award made by the arbitrator may include the costs of arbitration. The arbitration shall be binding on all parties. (C) When the public owner, as defined in division (A) of section 2743.01 of the Revised Code, and the contractor disagree as to the conditions under which money is to be paid under this section the contractor shall file an action in the court of claims. (D) If the money required to be paid or deposited under division (A) of this section is not paid or deposited, the governmental entity shall pay to the contractor an amount equal to eight per cent annual interest compounded daily. Sec. 153.693. (A)(A)(1) For every design-build contract, the public authority planning to contract for design-build services, in consultation with the criteria architect or engineer, shall evaluate the statements of qualifications submitted by design-build firms specifically regarding the project, including the design-build firm's proposed architect or engineer of record. (2) For projects valued at less than four million dollars, the public authority may require the design-build firm to submit a statement along with a pricing proposal described in division (B)(2)(h) of this section. The public authority shall provide each design-build firm who desires to submit both a statement and a proposal a pre-proposal meeting to explore the proposals further, in which the public authority shall provide the design-build firm with a description of the project, including the scope and nature of the proposed services and potential technical approaches. After and only after the public authority ranks and selects firms under division (B)(1) of this section, the public authority shall review the pricing proposals submitted by selected firms under this division, and proceed under division (B)(3) of this section, continuing the selection process from there. (B) Following this evaluation, the public authority shall: (1) Select and rank not fewer than three firms which it considers to be the most qualified to provide the required design-build services, except that the public authority shall select and rank fewer than three firms when the public authority determines in writing that fewer than three qualified firms are available; (2) Provide each selected design-build firm with all of the following: (a) A description of the project and project delivery; (b) The design criteria produced by the criteria architect or engineer under section 153.692 of the Revised Code; (c) A preliminary project schedule; (d) A description of any preconstruction services; (e) A description of the proposed design services; (f) A description of a guaranteed maximum price, including the estimated level of design on which such guaranteed maximum price is based; (g) The form of the design-build services contract; (h) A Except for projects under division (A)(2) of this section, a request for a pricing proposal that shall be divided into a design services fee and a preconstruction and design-build services fee. The pricing proposal of each design-build firm shall include at least all of the following: (i) A list of key personnel and consultants for the project; (ii) Design concepts adhering to the design criteria produced by the criteria architect or engineer under section 153.692 of the Revised Code; (iii) The design-build firm's statement of general conditions and estimated contingency requirements; (iv) A preliminary project schedule. (3) Evaluate the pricing proposal submitted by each selected firm and, at its discretion, hold discussions with each firm to further investigate its pricing proposal, including the scope and nature of the firm's proposed services and potential technical approaches; (4) Rank the selected firms based on the public authority's evaluation of the value of each firm's pricing proposal, with such evaluation considering each firm's proposed costs and qualifications; (5) Enter into contract negotiations for design-build services with the design-build firm whose pricing proposal the public authority determines to be the best value under this section. (B)(C) In complying with division (A)(5)(B)(5) of this section, contract negotiations shall be directed toward: (1) Ensuring that the design-build firm and the public authority mutually understand the essential requirements involved in providing the required design-build services, the provisions for the use of contingency funds, and the terms of the contract, including terms related to the possible distribution of savings in the final costs of the project; (2) Ensuring that the design-build firm shall be able to provide the necessary personnel, equipment, and facilities to perform the design-build services within the time required by the design-build construction contract; (3) Agreeing upon a procedure and schedule for determining a guaranteed maximum price using an open book pricing method that shall represent the total maximum amount to be paid by the public authority to the design-build firm for the project and that shall include the costs of all work, the cost of its general conditions, the contingency, and the fee payable to the design-build firm. (C)(D) If the public authority fails to negotiate a contract with the design-build firm whose pricing proposal the public authority determines to be the best value as determined under this section, the public authority shall inform the design-build firm in writing of the termination of negotiations. The public authority may then do the following: (1) Negotiate a contract with a design-build firm ranked next highest under this section following the negotiation procedure described in this section; (2) If negotiations fail with the design-build firm under division (C)(1)(D)(1) of this section, negotiate a contract with the design-build firm ranked next highest under this section following the negotiation procedure described in this section and continue negotiating with the design-build firms selected under this section in the order of their ranking until a contract is negotiated. (D)(E) If the public authority fails to negotiate a contract with a design-build firm whose pricing proposal the public authority determines to be the best value as determined under this section, it may select additional design-build firms to provide pricing proposals to the public authority pursuant to this section or may select an alternative delivery method for the project. (E)(F) The public authority may provide a stipend for pricing proposals received from design-build firms. (F)(G) Nothing in this section affects a public authority's right to accept or reject any or all proposals in whole or in part. Sec. 155.33. (A)(1) Beginning on the effective date of this amendment April 7, 2023, and ending on the effective date of the rules adopted under section 155.34 of the Revised Code, a state agency shall lease, in good faith, a formation within a parcel of land that is owned or controlled by the state agency for the exploration for and development and production of oil or natural gas. The lease shall be on terms that are just and reasonable, as determined by custom and practice in the oil and gas industry, and shall include at least the terms required under divisions (A)(1)(a) to (d) division (A) of section 155.34 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to the effective date of this amendment. The person seeking to lease the formation shall submit to the state agency the proof described in divisions (D)(5)(a) and (b) of this section before entering into the lease. On and after the effective date of the rules adopted under section 155.34 of the Revised Code, a formation within a parcel of land that is owned or controlled by a state agency may be leased for the exploration for and development and production of oil or natural gas only in accordance with divisions (A)(2) to (H) of this section and those rules. (2) On and after the effective date of rules adopted under section 155.34 of the Revised Code, any person or state agency that is interested in leasing a formation within a parcel of land that is owned or controlled by a state agency for the exploration for and the development and production of oil or natural gas may submit to the oil and gas land management commission a nomination that shall include all of the following: (a) The name of the person making the nomination and the person's address, telephone number, and email address; (b) An identification of the formation and parcel of land proposed to be leased that specifies all of the following: (i) The percentage of the interest owned or controlled by the state agency, and whether that interest is divided, undivided, or partial; (ii) The source deed by book and page numbers, including the description and acreage of the parcel and an identification of the county, section, township, and range in which the parcel is located; (iii) A plat map depicting the area in which the parcel is located. (c) If the person making the nomination is not a state agency, a nomination fee of one hundred fifty dollars; (d) The proposed lease bonus that applies to the nomination and any additional proposed gross landowner royalty that applies to the nomination that is in addition to the amount required under division (A)(1)(b) of section 155.34 of the Revised Code; (e) If the person making the nomination is not a state agency, proof of both of the following: (i) That the person has obtained the insurance and financial assurance required under section 1509.07 of the Revised Code; (ii) That the person has registered with and obtained an identification number from the division of oil and gas resources management under section 1509.31 of the Revised Code. (3) In order to encourage the submission of nominations and the responsible and reasonable development of the state's natural resources, only the information submitted under division (A)(2)(b) of this section may be disclosed to the public until a person is selected under division (F) of this section. Until a person is selected under division (F) of this section, all other information submitted under division (A)(2) of this section is confidential, shall not be disclosed by the commission, and is not a public record subject to inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (4) When a nomination is not submitted by a state agency, the nomination is the opening bid for purposes of division (D) of this section. However, the person submitting the nomination may supplement or amend that bid by providing additional information in accordance with that division. (B)(1) Not less than thirty days, but not more than one hundred twenty days following the receipt of a nomination, the commission shall conduct a meeting for the purpose of determining whether to approve or disapprove the nomination for the purpose of leasing a formation within the parcel of land that is identified in the nomination. In making its decision to approve or disapprove the nomination, the commission shall consider all of the following: (a) The economic benefits, including the potential income from an oil or natural gas operation, that would result if the lease of a formation that is the subject of the nomination were approved; (b) Whether the proposed oil or gas operation is compatible with the current uses of the parcel of land that is the subject of the nomination; (c) The environmental impact that would result if the lease of a formation that is the subject of the nomination were approved; (d) Any potential adverse geological impact that would result if the lease of a formation that is the subject of the nomination were approved; (e) Any potential impact to visitors or users of a parcel of land that is the subject of the nomination; (f) Any potential impact to the operations or equipment of a state agency that is a state university or college if the lease of a formation within a parcel of land owned or controlled by the university or college that is the subject of the nomination were executed; (g) Any comments or objections to the nomination submitted to the commission by the state agency that owns or controls the parcel of land on which the proposed oil or natural gas operation would take place; (h) Any comments or objections to the nomination submitted to the commission by residents of this state or other users of the parcel of land that is the subject of the nomination; (i) Any special terms and conditions the state agency included in its comments or objections that the state agency believes are appropriate for the lease of the parcel of land because of specific conditions related to that parcel of land. (2) The commission shall approve or disapprove a nomination not later than two calendar quarters following the receipt of the nomination. The commission shall post notice of the commission's decision on the commission's web site and send notice of the decision by email and by certified mail to the person that submitted the nomination and to the state agency that owns or controls the formation within the parcel of land that is the subject of the nomination. (C) Each calendar quarter, the commission shall proceed to advertise for bids for a lease for a formation within a parcel of land that was the subject of a nomination approved during the previous calendar quarter. The commission shall publish the advertisement on its web site for a period of time established by the commission. The advertisement shall include all of the following: (1) An identification of each formation and parcel of land proposed to be leased that includes all of the information specified in division (A)(2)(b) of this section; (2) The deadline for the submission of bids; (3) A statement that each bid must contain all of the items required under division (D) of this section; (4) A statement that a standard lease form that is consistent with the practices of the oil and natural gas industries and adopted by rule by the commission will be used for the lease of a formation within the parcel of land; (5) Any special terms and conditions that may apply to the lease because of specific conditions related to the parcel of land; (6) The amount of the bid fee that is required to be submitted with a bid; (7) Any other information that the commission considers pertinent to the advertisement for bids. (D) A person interested in leasing a formation within a parcel of land owned or controlled by a state agency for the exploration for and development and production of oil or natural gas may submit a bid to the commission on a parcel by parcel basis that contains all of the following: (1) A bid fee of twenty-five dollars; (2) The name of the person making the bid and the person's address, telephone number, and email address; (3) An identification of the formation and parcel of land for which the bid is being submitted, including all of the information specified in division (A)(2)(b) of this section; (4) The proposed lease bonus that applies to the bid and any additional proposed gross landowner royalty that applies to the bid that is in addition to the amount required under division (A)(1)(b) of section 155.34 of the Revised Code; (5) Proof of both of the following: (a) That the person has obtained the insurance and financial assurance required under section 1509.07 of the Revised Code; (b) That the person has registered with and obtained an identification number from the division of oil and gas resources management under section 1509.31 of the Revised Code. (6) Any other information that the person believes is relevant to the bid. (E) In order to encourage the submission of bids and the responsible and reasonable development of the state's natural resources, the information that is contained in a bid submitted to the commission under this section is confidential, shall not be disclosed by the commission, and is not a public record subject to inspection and copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code until a person is selected under division (F) of this section. The commission shall select the person who submits the highest and best bid, taking into account the financial responsibility of the prospective lessee and the ability of the prospective lessee to perform its obligations under the lease. After the commission selects a person, the commission shall notify the applicable state agency and send the person's bid to the agency. The state agency shall enter into a lease with the person selected by the commission. The state agency shall fully execute the lease not later than thirty days after the commission selects the person with the highest and best bid. (G)(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 155.37 of the Revised Code, all money received by a state agency from signing fees, rentals, and royalty payments for leases entered into under this section shall be paid by the state agency into the state treasury to the credit of the state land royalty fund created in section 131.50 of the Revised Code. (2) All money received from nomination fees and bid fees shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the oil and gas land management commission administration fund created in section 155.35 of the Revised Code. (H) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, a nature preserve as defined in section 1517.01 of the Revised Code that is owned or controlled by a state agency shall not be nominated or leased under this section for the purpose of exploring for and developing and producing oil and natural gas resources. (I) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission and any state agency shall not require as part of a bid or lease either of the following: (1) Any royalty payment in excess of the amount specified in division (A)(1)(b) of section 155.34 of the Revised Code; (2) Any additional payment that the commission or agency is not specifically authorized or required to charge under this section. Sec. 155.34. (A) Not later than one hundred twenty days after September 30, 2021, the The oil and gas land management commission shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing both of the following: (1) A standard lease form that shall be used by a state agency for leases entered into under this chapter, is consistent with the practices of the oil and natural gas industries, and contains all of the following: (a) A prohibition against the use of the surface of the parcel of land for oil and gas development unless the state agency, in its sole discretion, chooses to negotiate and execute a written surface use agreement established under this section; (b) A one-eighth gross landowner royalty; (c) A shut-in royalty provision; (d) A primary term of five years; (d)(e) An option for the lessee to extend the primary term of the lease for an additional three five years by tendering to the state agency the same bonus paid when first entering into the lease. ; (f) A provision that states: "Notwithstanding any other provision of this Lease to the contrary, Lessee is entitled to pay any advanced delay rentals/bonus amounts owed under this Lease within sixty (60) calendar days after Lessee receives a copy of this Lease executed by Lessor." (g) A provision that states: "Notwithstanding any other provision of this Lease to the contrary, in the event that a parcel subject to this Lease was acquired or improved through, or is otherwise encumbered by, a federal grant program, the Primary Term of the Lease shall be tolled until the requirements of the program, and any related grant documents, have been fully satisfied by Lessor and Lessor notifies Lessee in writing of same." (h) A provision that states: "Notwithstanding any other provision of this Lease to the contrary, in the event that a parcel subject to this Lease was acquired or improved through, or is otherwise encumbered by, a federal grant program, Lessee may defer payment of all sums otherwise due and owing under this Lease until the requirements of the program, and any related grant documents, have been fully satisfied by Lessor and Lessor notifies Lessee in writing of same." (i) A provision that states: "Notwithstanding any other provision of this Lease to the contrary, in the event that litigation of any kind or character is filed by a third party that may adversely impact Lessee's ability to conduct operations under the Lease, including an appeal before a court or the oil and gas commission, the Primary Term of the Lease shall be tolled until such time as there is a final, nonappealable order entered in such litigation." (j) A provision that states: "Notwithstanding any other provision of this Lease to the contrary, in the event that litigation of any kind or character is filed by a third party that may adversely impact Lessee's ability to conduct operations under the Lease, including an appeal before a court or the oil and gas commission, Lessee may defer payment of all sums otherwise due and owing under this Lease until a final, nonappealable order is entered in such litigation." (2) Any other procedures necessary to implement sections 155.30 to 155.36 of the Revised Code, subject to division (I) of section 155.33 of the Revised Code. (B) Not later than one hundred twenty days after September 30, 2021, the The commission shall establish a standard surface use agreement that a state agency shall use to authorize the use of the surface of a leased parcel of land. (C) Section 121.95 of the Revised Code does not apply to rules adopted under this section and the commission is not subject to any requirements of that section. Sec. 163.01. As used in sections 163.01 to 163.22 of the Revised Code: (A) "Public agency" means any governmental corporation, unit, organization, instrumentality, or officer authorized by law to appropriate property in the courts of this state. (B) "Private agency" means any corporation, firm, partnership, voluntary association, joint-stock association, or company that is not a public agency and that is authorized by law to appropriate property in the courts of this state. (C) "Agency" means any public agency or private agency. (D) "Court" means the court of common pleas or the probate court of any county in which the property sought to be appropriated is located in whole or in part. (E) "Owner" means any individual, partnership, association, or corporation having any estate, title, or interest in any real property sought to be appropriated. (F) "Real property," "land," or "property" includes any estate, title, or interest in any real property that is authorized to be appropriated by the agency in question, unless the context otherwise requires. (G) "Public utility" has the same meaning as in section 4905.02 of the Revised Code and also includes a public utility owned or operated by one or more municipal corporations, an electric cooperative, and an agency holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity granted by the federal energy regulatory commission. (H)(1) "Public use" does not include any taking that is for conveyance to a private commercial enterprise, economic development, or solely for the purpose of increasing public revenue, unless the property is conveyed or leased to one of the following: (a) A public utility, municipal power agency, or common carrier; (b) A private entity that occupies a port authority transportation facility or an incidental area within a publicly owned and occupied project; (c) A private entity when the agency that takes the property establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the property is a blighted parcel or is included in a blighted area. (2) "Public use" does not include any taking of property for use as a trail for hiking, bicycling, horseback riding, ski touring, canoeing, or other nonmotorized forms of recreational travel. This division does not apply to either of the following: (a) A regional transit authority acting pursuant to section 306.36 of the Revised Code to acquire right-of-way, within one hundred fifty feet of and parallel to a public road, for a transit facility; (b) A public or private agency taking property for the construction of a sidewalk within one hundred fifty feet of, and parallel to, a public road. (3) All of the following are presumed to be public uses: utility facilities, roads, sewers, water lines, public schools, public institutions of higher education, private institutions of higher education that are authorized to appropriate property under section 3333.08 of the Revised Code, public parks, government buildings, port authority transportation facilities, projects by an agency that is a public utility, and similar facilities and uses of land. (I) "Electric cooperative" has the same meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code. (J) "Good faith offer" means the written offer that an agency that is appropriating property must make to the owner of the property pursuant to division (B) of section 163.04 of the Revised Code before commencing an appropriation proceeding. (K) "Goodwill" means the calculable benefits that accrue to a business as a result of its location, reputation for dependability, skill or quality, and any other circumstances that result in probable retention of old, or acquisition of new, patronage. (L) "Municipal power agency" has the same meaning as in section 3734.058 of the Revised Code. (M) "Port authority transportation facility" means any facility developed, controlled, or operated by a port authority for the purpose of providing passenger, cargo, or freight transportation services, such as airports, maritime ports, rail facilities, transit facilities, and support facilities directly related to any airport, maritime port, rail facility, or transit facility. Sec. 164.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Capital improvement" or "capital improvement project" or "project" means the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, planning, and equipping of roads and bridges, appurtenances to roads and bridges to enhance the safety of animal-drawn vehicles, pedestrians, and bicycles, waste water treatment systems, water supply systems, solid waste disposal facilities, and storm water and sanitary collection, storage, and treatment facilities, including real property, interests in real property, facilities, and equipment related or incidental to those facilities. (B) "Local subdivision" means any county, municipal corporation, township, sanitary district, or regional water and sewer district. (C) "Bond proceedings" means the resolutions, orders, trust agreements, indentures, and other agreements, credit facilities and credit enhancement facilities, and amendments and supplements to the foregoing, or any one or more or combination thereof, authorizing, awarding, or providing for the terms and conditions applicable to or providing for the security or liquidity of obligations, and the provisions contained in those obligations. (D) "Bond service charges" means principal, including any mandatory sinking fund or redemption requirements for retirement of obligations, interest and other accreted amounts, and any redemption premium payable on obligations. If not prohibited by the applicable bond proceedings, bond service charges include costs of credit enhancement facilities that are related to, and represent or are intended to provide a source of payment of or limitation on, other bond service charges. (E) "Bond service fund" means the fund, and any accounts in that fund, created by section 164.10 of the Revised Code, including all moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to that fund and accounts as provided in the bond proceedings. (F) "Cost of capital improvement projects" means the costs of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, expanding, improving, and engineering capital improvement projects, and related financing costs. (G) "Credit enhancement facilities" means letters of credit, lines of credit, stand-by, contingent, or firm securities purchase agreements, interest rate hedges including, without limitation, interest rate swaps, insurance or surety arrangements, reserve or guarantee funds, and guarantees, and other arrangements that provide for contingent or direct payment of bond service charges, for security or additional security in the event of nonpayment or default in respect of obligations, or for making or providing funds for making payment of bond service charges to, and at the option and on demand of, holders of obligations or at the option of the issuer under put or similar arrangements, or for otherwise supporting the credit or liquidity of obligations, and includes credit, reimbursement, marketing, remarketing, indexing, carrying, purchase, and subrogation agreements, and other agreements and arrangements for reimbursement of the person providing the credit enhancement facility and the security for that reimbursement. As used in this division, obligations include debt obligations of local subdivisions. (H) "Financing costs" means all costs and expenses relating to the authorization, issuance, sale, delivery, authentication, deposit, custody, clearing, registration, transfer, exchange, fractionalization, replacement, and servicing of obligations, including, without limitation, costs and expenses for or relating to, or payment obligations under, publication and printing, postage and express delivery, official statements, offering circulars, and informational statements, travel and transportation, paying agents, bond registrars, authenticating agents, remarketing agents, custodians, clearing agencies or corporations, securities depositories, financial advisory services, certifications, audits, federal or state regulatory agencies, accounting services, legal services and obtaining approving legal opinions and other legal opinions, credit ratings, original issue discount, credit facilities, and credit enhancement facilities. Financing costs may be paid from any moneys lawfully available for the purpose, including, unless otherwise provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations to which they relate and from the same sources from which bond service charges on the obligations are paid and as though bond service charges. (I) "Issuer" means the treasurer of state, or the officer who by law performs the functions of that officer. (J) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, or other evidences of obligation of the state, including any interest coupons pertaining thereto, issued pursuant to sections 164.09 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. (K) "Special funds" or "funds" means, except where the context does not permit, the bond service fund, and any other funds, including reserve funds, created under the bond proceedings and stated to be special funds in those proceedings, including all moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to the particular fund. Special funds do not include the state capital improvements fund created by section 164.08 of the Revised Code or, if so provided in the bond proceedings, a rebate fund or account established for purposes of federal tax laws. (L) "Net proceeds" means amounts received from the sale of obligations pursuant to this chapter, excluding amounts used to refund or retire outstanding obligations, and does not include amounts required to be deposited in special funds pursuant to the applicable bond proceedings, or financing costs paid from such amounts received. (M) "Local debt support" means a full or partial pledge of support for any local bond issue, the payment of all or a part of the premium for bond insurance obtained from a private insurer, the subsidization of the interest rate on a loan obtained by the a subdivision, or a source of revenue pledged in support of revenue bonds issued by a subdivision. (N) "Principal amount" refers to the aggregate of the amount as stated or provided for in the bond proceedings authorizing the obligations as the amount on which interest or interest equivalent is initially calculated. Sec. 164.05. (A) The director of the Ohio public works commission shall do all of the following: (1) Approve requests for financial assistance from district public works integrating committees and enter into agreements with one or more local subdivisions to provide loans, grants, and local debt support for a capital improvement project if the director determines that: (a) The project is an eligible project pursuant to this chapter; (b) The financial assistance for the project has been properly approved and requested by the district committee of the district which includes the recipient of the loan or grant; (c) The amount of the financial assistance, when added to all other financial assistance provided during the fiscal year for projects within the district, does not exceed that district's allocation of money from the state capital improvements fund for that fiscal year; (d) The district committee has provided such documentation and other evidence as the director may require that the district committee has satisfied the requirements of section 164.06 or 164.14 of the Revised Code; (e) The portion of a district's annual allocation which the director approves in the form of loans and local debt support for eligible projects is consistent with divisions (E) and (F) of this section. (2) Authorize payments to local subdivisions or their contractors for costs incurred for capital improvement projects which have been approved pursuant to this chapter. All requests for payments shall be submitted to the director on forms and in accordance with procedures specified in rules adopted by the director pursuant to division (A)(4) of this section. (3) Retain the services of or employ financial consultants, engineers, accountants, attorneys, and such other employees as the director determines are necessary to carry out the director's duties under this chapter and fix the compensation for their services. From among these employees, the director shall appoint a deputy with the necessary qualifications to act as the director when the director is absent or temporarily unable to carry out the duties of office. (4) Adopt rules establishing the procedures for making applications, reviewing, approving, and rejecting projects for which assistance is authorized under this chapter, and any other rules needed to implement the provisions of this chapter. Such rules shall be adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (5) Provide information and other assistance to local subdivisions and district public works integrating committees in developing their requests for financial assistance for capital improvements under this chapter and encourage cooperation and coordination of requests and the development of multisubdivision projects in order to maximize the benefits that may be derived by districts from each year's allocation; (6) Require local subdivisions, to the extent practicable, to use Ohio products, materials, services, and labor in connection with any capital improvement project financed in whole or in part under this chapter; (7) Notify the director of budget and management of all approved projects, and supply all information necessary to track approved projects through the state accounting system; (8) Appoint the administrator of the Ohio small government capital improvements commission; (9) Do all other acts, enter into contracts, and execute all instruments necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter; (10) Develop a standardized methodology for evaluating local subdivision capital improvement needs that a district public works integrating committee shall consider when addressing a subdivision's project application; (11) Establish a program to provide local subdivisions with technical assistance in preparing project applications. The program shall be designed to assist local subdivisions that lack the financial or technical resources to prepare project applications on their own. (B) When the director of the Ohio public works commission decides to conditionally approve or disapprove projects, the director's decisions and the reasons for which they are made shall be made in writing. These written decisions shall be conclusive for the purposes of the validity and enforceability of such determinations. (C) Fees, charges, rates of interest, times of payment of interest and principal, and other terms, conditions, and provisions of and security for financial assistance provided pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be such as the director determines to be appropriate. If any payments required by a loan agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter are not paid, the funds which would otherwise be apportioned to the local subdivision from the county undivided local government fund, pursuant to sections 5747.51 to 5747.53 of the Revised Code, may, at the direction of the director of the Ohio public works commission, be reduced by the amount payable. The county treasurer shall, at the direction of the director, pay the amount of such reductions to the state capital improvements revolving loan fund. The director may renegotiate a loan repayment schedule with a local subdivision whose payments from the county undivided local government fund could be reduced pursuant to this division, but such a renegotiation may occur only one time with respect to any particular loan agreement. (D) Grants approved for the repair and replacement of existing infrastructure pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed ninety per cent of the estimated total cost of the capital improvement project. Grants approved for new or expanded infrastructure shall not exceed fifty per cent of the estimated cost of the new or expansion elements of the capital improvement project. A local subdivision share of the estimated cost of a capital improvement may consist of any of the following: (1) The reasonable value, as determined by the director or the administrator, of labor, materials, and equipment that will be contributed by the local subdivision in performing the capital improvement project; (2) Moneys received by the local subdivision in any form from an authority, commission, or agency of the United States for use in performing the capital improvement project; (3) Loans made to the local subdivision under this chapter; (4) Engineering costs incurred by the local subdivision in performing engineering activities related to the project. A local subdivision share of the cost of a capital improvement shall not include any amounts awarded to it from the local transportation improvement program fund created in section 164.14 of the Revised Code. (E) Not more than ten per cent of a A district public works integrating committee's committee may determine how much of its annual allocation share pursuant to section 164.08 of the Revised Code may be is awarded to subdivisions only in the form of interest-free, low-interest, market rate of interest, or blended-rate loans and in the form of local debt support. (F) Not more than ten per cent of a district public works integrating committee's annual allocation pursuant to section 164.08 of the Revised Code may be awarded to subdivisions in the form of local debt support. (G) For the period commencing July 1, 1993, and ending June 30, 1999, and for each five-year period thereafter, the total amount of financial assistance awarded under sections 164.01 to 164.08 of the Revised Code for capital improvement projects located wholly or partially within a county shall be equal to at least thirty per cent of the amount of what the county would have been allocated from the obligations authorized to be sold under this chapter during each period, if such amounts had been allocable to each county on a per capita basis. (H)(G) The amount of the annual allocations made pursuant to divisions (B)(1) and (4) of section 164.08 of the Revised Code which can be used for new or expanded infrastructure is limited to twenty per cent. (I)(H) No project shall be approved under this section unless the project is designed to have a useful life of at least seven years. In addition, the average useful life of all projects for which grants or loans are awarded in each district during a program year shall not be less than twenty years. Sec. 164.06. (A) Each district public works integrating committee shall evaluate materials submitted to it by the local subdivisions located in the district concerning capital improvements for which assistance is sought from the state capital improvements fund and shall, pursuant to division (B) of this section, select the requests for financial assistance that will be formally submitted by the district to the director of the Ohio public works commission. In order to provide for the efficient use of the district's state capital improvements fund allocation each year, a district committee shall assist its subdivisions in the preparation and coordination of project plans. (B) In selecting the requests for assistance for capital improvement projects which will be submitted to the director, and in determining the nature, amount, and terms of the assistance that will be requested, a district public works integrating committee shall give priority to capital improvement projects for the repair or replacement of existing infrastructure and which would be unlikely to be undertaken without assistance under this chapter, and shall specifically consider all of the following factors: (1) The infrastructure repair and replacement needs of the district; (2) The age and condition of the system to be repaired or replaced; (3) Whether the project would generate revenue in the form of user fees or assessments; (4) The importance of the project to the health and safety of the citizens of the district; (5) The cost of the project and whether it is consistent with division (G)(F) of section 164.05 of the Revised Code and the district's allocation for grants, loans, and local debt support for that year; (6) The effort and ability of the benefited local subdivisions to assist in financing the project; (7) The availability of federal or other funds for the project; (8) The overall economic health of the particular local subdivision; (9) The adequacy of the planning for the project and the readiness of the applicant to proceed should the project be approved; (10) Any other factors relevant to a particular project. (C) When applying the methodology under division (A)(10) of section 164.05 of the Revised Code, a district public works integrating committee may require a subdivision to submit information on its capital infrastructure as part of an application for assistance in financing a capital improvement project under this section. (D) In addition to reviewing and selecting the projects for which approval will be sought from the director of the Ohio public works commission for financial assistance from the state capital improvements fund, each district public works integrating committee shall appoint a subcommittee of its members that will represent the interests of villages and townships and that will review and select the capital improvement projects which will be submitted by the subcommittee to the administrator of the Ohio small government capital improvements commission for consideration of assistance from the portion of the net proceeds of obligations issued and sold by the treasurer of state which is allocated pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 164.08 of the Revised Code. In reviewing and approving the projects selected by its subcommittee, the administrator, and the Ohio small government capital improvements commission shall be guided by the provisions of division (B) of this section, and shall also take into account the fact that villages and townships may have different public infrastructure needs than larger subdivisions. Sec. 164.08. (A) Except as provided in sections 151.01 and 151.08 or section 164.09 of the Revised Code, the net proceeds of obligations issued and sold by the treasurer of state pursuant to section 164.09 of the Revised Code before September 30, 2000, or pursuant to sections 151.01 and 151.08 of the Revised Code, for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the cost of public infrastructure capital improvement projects of local subdivisions, as provided for in Section 2k, 2m, 2p, or 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and this chapter, shall be paid into the state capital improvements fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. Investment earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. (B) Beginning July 1, 2016, each program year the amount of obligations authorized by the general assembly in accordance with sections 151.01 and 151.08 or section 164.09 of the Revised Code, excluding the proceeds of refunding or renewal obligations, shall be allocated by the director of the Ohio public works commission as follows: (1) First, ten twelve per cent of the amount of obligations authorized shall be allocated to provide financial assistance to villages and to townships with populations in the unincorporated areas of the township of less than five thousand persons, for capital improvements in accordance with section 164.051 and division (D) of section 164.06 of the Revised Code. As used in division (B)(1) of this section, "capital improvements" includes resurfacing and improving roads. (2) Following the allocation required by division (B)(1) of this section, the director may allocate two per cent of the authorized obligations to provide financial assistance to local subdivisions for capital improvement projects which in the judgment of the director of the Ohio public works commission are necessary for the immediate preservation of the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the local subdivision requesting assistance. Starting July 1, 2021, the director may allocate up to six per cent of authorized obligations as provided in this division. (3) The director shall determine the amount of the remaining obligations authorized to be issued and sold that each county would receive if such amounts were allocated on a per capita basis each year. If a county's per capita share for the year would be less than three hundred thousand dollars, the director shall allocate to the district in which that county is located an amount equal to the difference between three hundred thousand dollars and the county's per capita share. (4) After making the allocation required by division (B)(3) of this section, the director shall allocate the remaining amount to each district on a per capita basis. (C)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the state capital improvements revolving loan fund, into which shall be deposited all repayments of loans made to local subdivisions for capital improvements pursuant to this chapter. Investment earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. (2) There may also be deposited in the state capital improvements revolving loan fund moneys obtained from federal or private grants, or from other sources, which are to be used for any of the purposes authorized by this chapter. Such moneys shall be allocated each year in accordance with division (B)(4) of this section. (3) Moneys deposited into the state capital improvements revolving loan fund shall be used to make loans for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the cost of capital improvement projects of local subdivisions. (4) Investment earnings credited to the state capital improvements revolving loan fund that exceed the amounts required to meet estimated federal arbitrage rebate requirements shall be used to pay costs incurred by the public works commission in administering this section. Investment earnings credited to the state capital improvements revolving loan fund that exceed the amounts required to pay for the administrative costs and estimated rebate requirements shall be allocated to each district on a per capita basis. (5) Each program year, loan repayments received and on deposit in the state capital improvements revolving loan fund shall be allocated as follows: (a) Each district public works integrating committee shall be allocated an amount equal to the sum of all loan repayments made to the state capital improvements revolving loan fund by local subdivisions that are part of the district. Moneys not used in a program year may be used in the next program year in the same manner and for the same purpose as originally allocated. (b) Loan repayments made pursuant to projects approved under division (B)(1) of this section shall be used to make loans in accordance with section 164.051 and division (D) of section 164.06 of the Revised Code. Allocations for this purpose made pursuant to division (C)(5) of this section shall be in addition to the allocation provided in division (B)(1) of this section. (c) Loan repayments made pursuant to projects approved under division (B)(2) of this section shall be used to make loans in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section. Allocations for this purpose made pursuant to division (C)(5) of this section shall be in addition to the allocation provided in division (B)(2) of this section. (d) Loans made from the state capital improvements revolving loan fund shall not be limited in their usage by divisions (E), (F), and (G), and (H) of section 164.05 of the Revised Code. (D) Investment earnings credited to the state capital improvements fund that exceed the amounts required to meet estimated federal arbitrage rebate requirements shall be used to pay costs incurred by the public works commission in administering sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. (E) The director of the Ohio public works commission shall notify the director of budget and management of the amounts allocated pursuant to this section and such information shall be entered into the state accounting system. The director of budget and management shall establish appropriation line items as needed to track these allocations. (F) If the amount of a district's allocation in a program year exceeds the amount of financial assistance approved for the district by the commission for that year, the remaining portion of the district's allocation shall be added to the district's allocation pursuant to division (B) of this section for the next succeeding year for use in the same manner and for the same purposes as it was originally allocated, except that any portion of a district's allocation which was available for use on new or expanded infrastructure pursuant to division (H)(G) of section 164.05 of the Revised Code shall be available in succeeding years only for the repair and replacement of existing infrastructure. (G) When an allocation based on population is made by the director pursuant to division (B) of this section, the director shall use the most recent decennial census statistics, and shall not make any reallocations based upon a change in a district's population. Sec. 164.14. (A) The local transportation improvement program fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of moneys credited to it pursuant to sections 117.16 and 5735.051 of the Revised Code, and, subject to the limitations of section 5735.05 of the Revised Code, shall be used to make grants to local subdivisions for projects that have been approved by district public works integrating committees and the Ohio public works commission in accordance with this section. The fund shall be administered by the Ohio public works commission, and shall be allocated each fiscal year on a per capita basis to district public works integrating committees in accordance with the most recent decennial census statistics. Money in the fund may be used to pay reasonable costs incurred by the commission in administering this section. Investment earnings on moneys credited to the fund shall be retained by the fund. (B) Grants awarded under this section may provide up to one hundred per cent of the estimated total cost of the project. (C) No grant shall be awarded for a project under this section unless the project is designed to have a useful life of at least seven years, except that the average useful life of all such projects for which grants are awarded in each district during a fiscal year shall be not less than twenty years. (D) For the period beginning on July 1, 1989, and ending on June 30, 1994, and for each succeeding five-year period, at least one-third of the total amount of money allocated to each district from the local transportation improvement program fund shall be awarded as follows: (1) Forty-two and eight-tenths per cent for projects of municipal corporations; (2) Thirty-seven and two-tenths per cent for projects of counties; (3) Twenty per cent for projects of townships, except that the requirement of division (D)(3) of this section shall not apply in districts where the combined population of the townships in the district is less than five per cent of the population of the district. (E) Each district public works integrating committee shall review, and approve or disapprove requests submitted to it by local subdivisions for assistance from the local transportation improvement program fund. In reviewing projects submitted to it, a district public works integrating committee shall consider the following factors: (1) Whether the project is of critical importance to the safety of the residents of the local subdivision; (2) Whether the project would alleviate serious traffic problems or hazards or would respond to needs caused by rapid growth and development; (3) Whether the project would assist the local subdivision in attaining the transportation infrastructure needed to pursue significant and specific economic development opportunities; (4) The availability of other sources of funding for the project; (5) The adequacy of the planning for the project and the readiness of the local subdivision to proceed should the project be approved; (6) The local subdivision's ability to pay for and history of investing in bridge and highway improvements; (7) The impact of the project on the multijurisdictional highway and bridge needs of the district; (8) The requirements of divisions (A), (B), (C), and (D) of this section; (9) The condition of the infrastructure system proposed for improvement; (10) Any other factors related to the safety, orderly growth, or economic development of the district or local subdivision that the district public works integrating committee considers relevant. A district public works integrating committee or its executive committee may appoint a subcommittee to assist it in carrying out its responsibilities under this section. (F) Every project approved by a district public works integrating committee shall be submitted to the Ohio public works commission for its review and approval or disapproval. The commission shall not approve any project that fails to meet the requirements of this section. (G) Grants awarded from the local transportation improvement program fund shall not be limited in their usage by divisions (D), (E), (F), and (G), and (H) of section 164.05 of the Revised Code. (H) As used in this section, "local subdivision" means a county, municipal corporation, or township. (I) The director of the Ohio public works commission shall notify the director of budget and management of the amounts allocated pursuant to this section, and the allocation information shall be entered into the state accounting system. The director of budget and management shall establish appropriation line items as needed to track these allocations. Sec. 165.04. The bond proceedings may contain provisions which shall be part of the contract with the bondholders as to: (A) Pledging the rentals, revenues, and other income, charges, and moneys therein designated for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and all other payments required to be made by the bond proceedings; (B) Acquisition by gift or purchase, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, improvement, furnishing, equipment, operation, alteration, maintenance, insurance, and repair of the pledged facilities and the duties of the issuing authority with respect thereto; (C) Provisions regarding the purposes to which the proceeds of the bonds may be applied; (D) Terms of the bonds; (E) Maintenance, collection, use and disposition of rentals, revenues, and other income, charges, and moneys received from the lease, sale, or other disposition of the pledged facilities; (F) Terms and conditions under which additional bonds may be issued secured by a pledge of rentals, revenues, and other income, charges, and moneys received from or a mortgage on the same pledged facilities; (G) Terms of any trust agreement or indenture of mortgage securing the bonds including authorization to enter into such agreement or indenture; (H) The deposit, application, safeguarding, and investment of funds of the issuer received or held under the bond proceedings, to which Chapters 131. and 135. and sections 122.57, 122.571, 122.58, and 321.44 of the Revised Code are not applicable. (I) Any other appropriate agreements with the bondholders with respect to the pledged facilities and the rentals, revenues, and other income, charges, and moneys received therefrom;. Sec. 166.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Allowable costs" means all or part of the costs of project facilities, eligible projects, eligible innovation projects, eligible research and development projects, eligible advanced energy projects, or eligible logistics and distribution projects, including costs of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, renovating, enlarging, improving, equipping, or furnishing project facilities, eligible projects, eligible innovation projects, eligible research and development projects, eligible advanced energy projects, or eligible logistics and distribution projects, site clearance and preparation, supplementing and relocating public capital improvements or utility facilities, designs, plans, specifications, surveys, studies, and estimates of costs, expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of assisting an eligible project, an eligible innovation project, an eligible research and development project, an eligible advanced energy project, or an eligible logistics and distribution project, or providing project facilities or facilities related to an eligible project, an eligible innovation project, an eligible research and development project, an eligible advanced energy project, or an eligible logistics and distribution project, architectural, engineering, and legal services fees and expenses, the costs of conducting any other activities as part of a voluntary action, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the establishment or development of an eligible project, an eligible innovation project, an eligible research and development project, an eligible advanced energy project, or an eligible logistics and distribution project, and reimbursement of moneys advanced or applied by any governmental agency or other person for allowable costs. (B) "Allowable innovation costs" includes allowable costs of eligible innovation projects and, in addition, includes the costs of research and development of eligible innovation projects; obtaining or creating any requisite software or computer hardware related to an eligible innovation project or the products or services associated therewith; testing (including, without limitation, quality control activities necessary for initial production), perfecting, and marketing of such products and services; creating and protecting intellectual property related to an eligible innovation project or any products or services related thereto, including costs of securing appropriate patent, trademark, trade secret, trade dress, copyright, or other form of intellectual property protection for an eligible innovation project or related products and services; all to the extent that such expenditures could be capitalized under then-applicable generally accepted accounting principles; and the reimbursement of moneys advanced or applied by any governmental agency or other person for allowable innovation costs. (C) "Eligible innovation project" includes an eligible project, including any project facilities associated with an eligible innovation project and, in addition, includes all tangible and intangible property related to a new product or process based on new technology or the creative application of existing technology, including research and development, product or process testing, quality control, market research, and related activities, that is to be acquired, established, expanded, remodeled, rehabilitated, or modernized for industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research, or any combination thereof, the operation of which, alone or in conjunction with other eligible projects, eligible innovation projects, or innovation property, will create new jobs or preserve existing jobs and employment opportunities and improve the economic welfare of the people of the state. (D) "Eligible project" means project facilities to be acquired, established, expanded, remodeled, rehabilitated, or modernized for industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research, or any combination thereof, the operation of which, alone or in conjunction with other facilities, will create new jobs or preserve existing jobs and employment opportunities and improve the economic welfare of the people of the state. "Eligible project" includes, without limitation, a voluntary action. For purposes of this division, "new jobs" does not include existing jobs transferred from another facility within the state, and "existing jobs" includes only those existing jobs with work places within the municipal corporation or unincorporated area of the county in which the eligible project is located. "Eligible project" does not include project facilities to be acquired, established, expanded, remodeled, rehabilitated, or modernized for industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research, or any combination of industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research, if the project facilities consist solely of point-of-final-purchase retail facilities. If the project facilities consist of both point-of-final-purchase retail facilities and nonretail facilities, only the portion of the project facilities consisting of nonretail facilities is an eligible project. If a warehouse facility is part of a point-of-final-purchase retail facility and supplies only that facility, the warehouse facility is not an eligible project. Catalog distribution facilities are not considered point-of-final-purchase retail facilities for purposes of this paragraph, and are eligible projects. (E) "Eligible research and development project" means an eligible project, including project facilities, comprising, within, or related to, a facility or portion of a facility at which research is undertaken for the purpose of discovering information that is technological in nature and the application of which is intended to be useful in the development of a new or improved product, process, technique, formula, or invention, a new product or process based on new technology, or the creative application of existing technology. (F) "Financial assistance" means inducements under division (B) of section 166.02 of the Revised Code, loan guarantees under section 166.06 of the Revised Code, and direct loans under section 166.07 of the Revised Code. (G) "Governmental action" means any action by a governmental agency relating to the establishment, development, or operation of an eligible project, eligible innovation project, eligible research and development project, eligible advanced energy project, or eligible logistics and distribution project, and project facilities that the governmental agency acting has authority to take or provide for the purpose under law, including, but not limited to, actions relating to contracts and agreements, zoning, building, permits, acquisition and disposition of property, public capital improvements, utility and transportation service, taxation, employee recruitment and training, and liaison and coordination with and among governmental agencies. (H) "Governmental agency" means the state and any state department, division, commission, institution or authority; a municipal corporation, county, or township, and any agency thereof, and any other political subdivision or public corporation or the United States or any agency thereof; any agency, commission, or authority established pursuant to an interstate compact or agreement; and any combination of the above. (I) "Innovation financial assistance" means inducements under division (B) of section 166.12 of the Revised Code, innovation Ohio loan guarantees under section 166.15 of the Revised Code, and innovation Ohio loans under section 166.16 of the Revised Code. (J) "Innovation Ohio loan guarantee reserve requirement" means, at any time, with respect to innovation loan guarantees made under section 166.15 of the Revised Code, a balance in the innovation Ohio loan guarantee fund equal to the greater of twenty per cent of the then-outstanding principal amount of all outstanding innovation loan guarantees made pursuant to section 166.15 of the Revised Code or fifty per cent of the principal amount of the largest outstanding guarantee made pursuant to section 166.15 of the Revised Code. (K) "Innovation property" includes property and also includes software, inventory, licenses, contract rights, goodwill, intellectual property, including without limitation, patents, patent applications, trademarks and service marks, and trade secrets, and other tangible and intangible property, and any rights and interests in or connected to the foregoing. (L) "Loan guarantee reserve requirement" means, at any time, with respect to loan guarantees made under section 166.06 of the Revised Code, a balance in the loan guarantee fund equal to the greater of twenty per cent of the then-outstanding principal amount of all outstanding guarantees made pursuant to section 166.06 of the Revised Code or fifty per cent of the principal amount of the largest outstanding guarantee made pursuant to section 166.06 of the Revised Code. (M) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, or governmental agency, and any combination thereof. (N) "Project facilities" means buildings, structures, and other improvements, and equipment and other property, excluding small tools, supplies, and inventory, and any one, part of, or combination of the above, comprising all or part of, or serving or being incidental to, an eligible project, an eligible innovation project, an eligible research and development project, an eligible advanced energy project, or an eligible logistics and distribution project, including, but not limited to, public capital improvements. (O) "Property" means real and personal property and interests therein. (P) "Public capital improvements" means capital improvements or facilities that any governmental agency has authority to acquire, pay the costs of, own, maintain, or operate, or to contract with other persons to have the same done, including, but not limited to, highways, roads, streets, water and sewer facilities, railroad and other transportation facilities, and air and water pollution control and solid waste disposal facilities. For purposes of this division, "air pollution control facilities" includes, without limitation, solar, geothermal, biofuel, biomass, wind, hydro, wave, and other advanced energy projects as defined in section 3706.25 of the Revised Code. (Q) "Research and development financial assistance" means inducements under section 166.17 of the Revised Code, research and development loans under section 166.21 of the Revised Code, and research and development tax credits under sections 5733.352 and 5747.331 of the Revised Code. (R) "Targeted innovation industry sectors" means industry sectors involving the production or use of advanced materials, instruments, controls and electronics, power and propulsion, biosciences, and information technology, or such other sectors as may be designated by the director of development. (S) "Voluntary action" means a voluntary action, as defined in section 3746.01 of the Revised Code, that is conducted under the voluntary action program established in Chapter 3746. of the Revised Code. (T) "Project financing obligations" means obligations issued pursuant to section 166.08 of the Revised Code other than obligations for which the bond proceedings provide that bond service charges shall be paid from receipts of the state representing gross profit on the sale of spirituous liquor as referred to in division (B)(4) of section 4310.10 4301.10 of the Revised Code. (U) "Regional economic development entity" means an entity that is under contract with the director to administer a loan program under this chapter in a particular area of this state. (V) "Eligible advanced energy project" means an eligible project that is an "advanced energy project" as defined in section 3706.25 of the Revised Code. (W) "Eligible logistics and distribution project" means an eligible project, including project facilities, to be acquired, established, expanded, remodeled, rehabilitated, or modernized for transportation logistics and distribution infrastructure purposes. As used in this division, "transportation logistics and distribution infrastructure purposes" means promoting, providing for, and enabling improvements to the ground, air, and water transportation infrastructure comprising the transportation system in this state, including, without limitation, highways, streets, roads, bridges, railroads carrying freight, and air and water ports and port facilities, and all related supporting facilities. (X) "Professional sports facility" has the same meaning as in section 5516.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 166.02. (A) The general assembly finds that many local areas throughout the state are experiencing economic stagnation or decline, and that the economic development programs provided for in this chapter will constitute deserved, necessary reinvestment by the state in those areas, materially contribute to their economic revitalization, and result in improving the economic welfare of all the people of the state. Accordingly, it is declared to be the public policy of the state, through the operations of this chapter and other applicable laws adopted pursuant to Section 2p or 13 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and other authority vested in the general assembly, to assist in and facilitate the establishment or development of eligible projects or assist and cooperate with any governmental agency in achieving such purpose. (B) In furtherance of such public policy and to implement such purpose, the director of development may: (1) After consultation with appropriate governmental agencies, enter into agreements with persons engaged in industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research and with governmental agencies to induce such persons to acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, enlarge, improve, equip, or furnish, or otherwise develop, eligible projects and make provision therein for project facilities and governmental actions, as authorized by this chapter and other applicable laws, subject to any required actions by the general assembly or the controlling board and subject to applicable local government laws and regulations; (2) Provide for the guarantees and loans as provided for in sections 166.06 and 166.07 of the Revised Code; (3) Subject to release of such moneys by the controlling board, contract for labor and materials needed for, or contract with others, including governmental agencies, to provide, project facilities the allowable costs of which are to be paid for or reimbursed from moneys in the facilities establishment fund, and contract for the operation of such project facilities; (4) Subject to release thereof by the controlling board, from moneys in the facilities establishment fund acquire or contract to acquire by gift, exchange, or purchase, including the obtaining and exercise of purchase options, property, and convey or otherwise dispose of, or provide for the conveyance or disposition of, property so acquired or contracted to be acquired by sale, exchange, lease, lease purchase, conditional or installment sale, transfer, or other disposition, including the grant of an option to purchase, to any governmental agency or to any other person without necessity for competitive bidding and upon such terms and conditions and manner of consideration pursuant to and as the director determines to be appropriate to satisfy the objectives of sections 166.01 to 166.11 of the Revised Code; (5) Retain the services of or employ financial consultants, appraisers, consulting engineers, superintendents, managers, construction and accounting experts, attorneys, and employees, agents, and independent contractors as are necessary in the director's judgment and fix the compensation for their services; (6) Receive and accept from any person grants, gifts, and contributions of money, property, labor, and other things of value, to be held, used and applied only for the purpose for which such grants, gifts, and contributions are made; (7) Enter into appropriate arrangements and agreements with any governmental agency for the taking or provision by that governmental agency of any governmental action; (8) Do all other acts and enter into contracts and execute all instruments necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter; (9) Adopt rules to implement any of the provisions of this chapter applicable to the director. (C) The determinations by the director that facilities constitute eligible projects, that facilities are project facilities, that costs of such facilities are allowable costs, and all other determinations relevant thereto or to an action taken or agreement entered into shall be conclusive for purposes of the validity and enforceability of rights of parties arising from actions taken and agreements entered into under this chapter. (D) Except as otherwise prescribed in this chapter, all expenses and obligations incurred by the director in carrying out the director's powers and in exercising the director's duties under this chapter, shall be payable solely from, as appropriate, moneys in the facilities establishment fund, the loan guarantee fund, the innovation Ohio loan guarantee fund, the innovation Ohio loan fund, the research and development loan fund, the logistics and distribution infrastructure fund, or moneys appropriated for such purpose by the general assembly. This chapter does not authorize the director or the issuing authority under section 166.08 of the Revised Code to incur bonded indebtedness of the state or any political subdivision thereof, or to obligate or pledge moneys raised by taxation for the payment of any bonds or notes issued or guarantees made pursuant to this chapter. (E) Any governmental agency may enter into an agreement with the director, any other governmental agency, or a person to be assisted under this chapter, to take or provide for the purposes of this chapter any governmental action it is authorized to take or provide, and to undertake on behalf and at the request of the director any action which the director is authorized to undertake pursuant to divisions (B)(3), (4), and (5) of this section or divisions (B)(3), (4), and (5) of section 166.12 of the Revised Code. Governmental agencies of the state shall cooperate with and provide assistance to the director of development and the controlling board in the exercise of their respective functions under this chapter. Sec. 166.03. (A) There is hereby created the facilities establishment fund within the state treasury, consisting of proceeds from the issuance of obligations as specified under section 166.08 of the Revised Code; the moneys received by the state from the sources specified in section 166.09 of the Revised Code; service charges imposed under sections 166.06 and 166.07 of the Revised Code; any grants, gifts, or contributions of moneys received by the director of development to be used for loans made under section 166.07 of the Revised Code or for the payment of the allowable costs of project facilities; and all other moneys appropriated or transferred to the fund. Moneys in the loan guarantee fund in excess of the loan guarantee reserve requirement, but subject to the provisions and requirements of any guarantee contracts, may be transferred to the facilities establishment fund by the treasurer of state upon the order of the director of development. Moneys received by the state under Chapter 122. of the Revised Code, to the extent allocable to the utilization of moneys derived from proceeds of the sale of obligations pursuant to section 166.08 of the Revised Code, shall be credited to the facilities establishment fund. All investment earnings on the cash balance in the fund shall be credited to the fund. (B) All moneys appropriated or transferred to the facilities establishment fund may be released at the request of the director of development for payment of allowable costs or the making of loans under section 166.07 of the Revised Code, for transfer to the loan guarantee fund established in section 166.06 of the Revised Code, or for use for the purpose of or transfer to the funds established by sections 122.35, 122.42, 122.54, 122.55, 122.56, 122.561, 122.57, 122.601, and 122.80 of the Revised Code and, until July 1, 2003, the fund established by section 166.031 of the Revised Code, and, until July 1, 2007, the fund established by section 122.26 of the Revised Code, but only for such of those purposes as are within the authorization of Section 13 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, in all cases subject to the approval of the controlling board. (C) The department of development, in the administration of the facilities establishment fund, is encouraged to utilize and promote the utilization of, to the maximum practicable extent, the other existing programs, business incentives, and tax incentives that department is required or authorized to administer or supervise. Sec. 166.08. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Bond proceedings" means the resolution, order, trust agreement, indenture, lease, and other agreements, amendments and supplements to the foregoing, or any one or more or combination thereof, authorizing or providing for the terms and conditions applicable to, or providing for the security or liquidity of, obligations issued pursuant to this section, and the provisions contained in such obligations. (2) "Bond service charges" means principal, including mandatory sinking fund requirements for retirement of obligations, and interest, and redemption premium, if any, required to be paid by the state on obligations. (3) "Bond service fund" means the applicable fund and accounts therein created for and pledged to the payment of bond service charges, which may be, or may be part of, the economic development bond service fund created by division (S) of this section including all moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited thereto. (4) "Issuing authority" means the treasurer of state, or the officer who by law performs the functions of such officer. (5) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, or other evidence of obligation including interest coupons pertaining thereto, issued pursuant to this section. (6) "Pledged receipts" means all receipts of the state representing the gross profit on the sale of spirituous liquor, as referred to in division (B)(4) of section 4301.10 of the Revised Code, after paying all costs and expenses of the division of liquor control and providing an adequate working capital reserve for the division of liquor control as provided in that division, but excluding the sum required by the second paragraph of section 4301.12 of the Revised Code, as in effect on May 2, 1980, to be paid into the state treasury; moneys accruing to the state from the lease, sale, or other disposition, or use, of project facilities, and from the repayment, including interest, of loans made from proceeds received from the sale of obligations; accrued interest received from the sale of obligations; income from the investment of the special funds; and any gifts, grants, donations, and pledges, and receipts therefrom, available for the payment of bond service charges. (7) "Special funds" or "funds" means, except where the context does not permit, the bond service fund, and any other funds, including reserve funds, created under the bond proceedings, and the economic development bond service fund created by division (S) of this section to the extent provided in the bond proceedings, including all moneys and investments, and earnings from investment, credited and to be credited thereto. (B) Subject to the limitations provided in section 166.11 of the Revised Code, the issuing authority, upon the certification by the director of development or, prior to the effective date of this amendment September 29, 2017, upon certification by the Ohio air quality development authority regarding eligible advanced energy projects, to the issuing authority of the amount of moneys or additional moneys needed in the facilities establishment fund, the loan guarantee fund, the innovation Ohio loan fund, the innovation Ohio loan guarantee fund, the research and development loan fund, the logistics and distribution infrastructure fund, the advanced energy research and development fund, or the advanced energy research and development taxable fund, as applicable, for the purpose of paying, or making loans for, allowable costs from the facilities establishment fund, allowable innovation costs from the innovation Ohio loan fund, allowable costs from the research and development loan fund, allowable costs from the logistics and distribution infrastructure fund, allowable costs from the advanced energy research and development fund, or allowable costs from the advanced energy research and development taxable fund, as applicable, or needed for capitalized interest, for funding reserves, and for paying costs and expenses incurred in connection with the issuance, carrying, securing, paying, redeeming, or retirement of the obligations or any obligations refunded thereby, including payment of costs and expenses relating to letters of credit, lines of credit, insurance, put agreements, standby purchase agreements, indexing, marketing, remarketing and administrative arrangements, interest swap or hedging agreements, and any other credit enhancement, liquidity, remarketing, renewal, or refunding arrangements, all of which are authorized by this section, or providing moneys for the loan guarantee fund or the innovation Ohio loan guarantee fund, as provided in this chapter or needed for the purposes of funds established in accordance with or pursuant to sections 122.35, 122.42, 122.54, 122.55, 122.56, 122.561, 122.57, and 122.80 of the Revised Code which are within the authorization of Section 13 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, or, prior to the effective date of this amendment September 29, 2017, with respect to certain eligible advanced energy projects, Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, shall issue obligations of the state under this section in the required amount; provided that such obligations may be issued to satisfy the covenants in contracts of guarantee made under section 166.06 or 166.15 of the Revised Code, notwithstanding limitations otherwise applicable to the issuance of obligations under this section. The proceeds of such obligations, except for the portion to be deposited in special funds, including reserve funds, as may be provided in the bond proceedings, shall as provided in the bond proceedings be deposited by the director of development to the facilities establishment fund, the loan guarantee fund, the innovation Ohio loan guarantee fund, the innovation Ohio loan fund, the research and development loan fund, or the logistics and distribution infrastructure fund, or be deposited by the Ohio air quality development authority prior to the effective date of this amendment September 29, 2017, to the advanced energy research and development fund or the advanced energy research and development taxable fund. Bond proceedings for project financing obligations may provide that the proceeds derived from the issuance of such obligations shall be deposited into such fund or funds provided for in the bond proceedings and, to the extent provided for in the bond proceedings, such proceeds shall be deemed to have been deposited into the facilities establishment fund and transferred to such fund or funds. The issuing authority may appoint trustees, paying agents, and transfer agents and may retain the services of financial advisors, accounting experts, and attorneys, and retain or contract for the services of marketing, remarketing, indexing, and administrative agents, other consultants, and independent contractors, including printing services, as are necessary in the issuing authority's judgment to carry out this section. The costs of such services are allowable costs payable from the facilities establishment fund or the research and development loan fund, allowable innovation costs payable from the innovation Ohio loan fund, allowable costs payable from the logistics and distribution infrastructure fund, or allowable costs payable prior to the effective date of this amendment September 29, 2017, from the advanced energy research and development fund or the advanced energy research and development taxable fund, as applicable. (C) The holders or owners of such obligations shall have no right to have moneys raised by taxation obligated or pledged, and moneys raised by taxation shall not be obligated or pledged, for the payment of bond service charges. Such holders or owners shall have no rights to payment of bond service charges from any moneys accruing to the state from the lease, sale, or other disposition, or use, of project facilities, or from payment of the principal of or interest on loans made, or fees charged for guarantees made, or from any money or property received by the director, treasurer of state, or the state under Chapter 122. of the Revised Code, or from any other use of the proceeds of the sale of the obligations, and no such moneys may be used for the payment of bond service charges, except for accrued interest, capitalized interest, and reserves funded from proceeds received upon the sale of the obligations and except as otherwise expressly provided in the applicable bond proceedings pursuant to written directions by the director. The right of such holders and owners to payment of bond service charges is limited to all or that portion of the pledged receipts and those special funds pledged thereto pursuant to the bond proceedings in accordance with this section, and each such obligation shall bear on its face a statement to that effect. (D) Obligations shall be authorized by resolution or order of the issuing authority and the bond proceedings shall provide for the purpose thereof and the principal amount or amounts, and shall provide for or authorize the manner or agency for determining the principal maturity or maturities, not exceeding twenty-five years from the date of issuance, the interest rate or rates or the maximum interest rate, the date of the obligations and the dates of payment of interest thereon, their denomination, and the establishment within or without the state of a place or places of payment of bond service charges. Sections 9.98 to 9.983 of the Revised Code are applicable to obligations issued under this section, subject to any applicable limitation under section 166.11 of the Revised Code. The purpose of such obligations may be stated in the bond proceedings in terms describing the general purpose or purposes to be served. The bond proceedings also shall provide, subject to the provisions of any other applicable bond proceedings, for the pledge of all, or such part as the issuing authority may determine, of the pledged receipts and the applicable special fund or funds to the payment of bond service charges, which pledges may be made either prior or subordinate to other expenses, claims, or payments, and may be made to secure the obligations on a parity with obligations theretofore or thereafter issued, if and to the extent provided in the bond proceedings. The pledged receipts and special funds so pledged and thereafter received by the state are immediately subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledges is valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind against the state or any governmental agency of the state, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof, and shall create a perfected security interest for all purposes of Chapter 1309. of the Revised Code, without the necessity for separation or delivery of funds or for the filing or recording of the bond proceedings by which such pledge is created or any certificate, statement or other document with respect thereto; and the pledge of such pledged receipts and special funds is effective and the money therefrom and thereof may be applied to the purposes for which pledged without necessity for any act of appropriation. Every pledge, and every covenant and agreement made with respect thereto, made in the bond proceedings may therein be extended to the benefit of the owners and holders of obligations authorized by this section, and to any trustee therefor, for the further security of the payment of the bond service charges. (E) The bond proceedings may contain additional provisions as to: (1) The redemption of obligations prior to maturity at the option of the issuing authority at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as are provided in the bond proceedings; (2) Other terms of the obligations; (3) Limitations on the issuance of additional obligations; (4) The terms of any trust agreement or indenture securing the obligations or under which the same may be issued; (5) The deposit, investment and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of moneys on hand or on deposit, without regard to Chapter 131. or 135. of the Revised Code, but subject to any special provisions of this chapter, with respect to particular funds or moneys, provided that any bank or trust company which acts as depository of any moneys in the special funds may furnish such indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as required by the issuing authority; (6) Any or every provision of the bond proceedings being binding upon such officer, board, commission, authority, agency, department, or other person or body as may from time to time have the authority under law to take such actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by such provision; (7) Any provision that may be made in a trust agreement or indenture; (8) Any other or additional agreements with the holders of the obligations, or the trustee therefor, relating to the obligations or the security therefor, including the assignment of mortgages or other security obtained or to be obtained for loans under section 122.43, 166.07, or 166.16 of the Revised Code. (F) The obligations may have the great seal of the state or a facsimile thereof affixed thereto or printed thereon. The obligations and any coupons pertaining to obligations shall be signed or bear the facsimile signature of the issuing authority. Any obligations or coupons may be executed by the person who, on the date of execution, is the proper issuing authority although on the date of such bonds or coupons such person was not the issuing authority. If the issuing authority whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any such obligation or coupon ceases to be the issuing authority before delivery thereof, such signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the former issuing authority had remained the issuing authority until such delivery; and if the seal to be affixed to obligations has been changed after a facsimile of the seal has been imprinted on such obligations, such facsimile seal shall continue to be sufficient as to such obligations and obligations issued in substitution or exchange therefor. (G) All obligations are negotiable instruments and securities under Chapter 1308. of the Revised Code, subject to the provisions of the bond proceedings as to registration. The obligations may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the issuing authority determines. Provision may be made for the registration of any obligations with coupons attached thereto as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest, their exchange for obligations so registered, and for the conversion or reconversion into obligations with coupons attached thereto of any obligations registered as to both principal and interest, and for reasonable charges for such registration, exchange, conversion, and reconversion. (H) Obligations may be sold at public sale or at private sale, as determined in the bond proceedings. Obligations issued to provide moneys for the loan guarantee fund or the innovation Ohio loan guarantee fund may, as determined by the issuing authority, be sold at private sale, and without publication of a notice of sale. (I) Pending preparation of definitive obligations, the issuing authority may issue interim receipts or certificates which shall be exchanged for such definitive obligations. (J) In the discretion of the issuing authority, obligations may be secured additionally by a trust agreement or indenture between the issuing authority and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having a place of business within the state. Any such agreement or indenture may contain the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of the obligations, any provisions that may be contained in any bond proceedings, and other provisions which are customary or appropriate in an agreement or indenture of such type, including, but not limited to: (1) Maintenance of each pledge, trust agreement, indenture, or other instrument comprising part of the bond proceedings until the state has fully paid the bond service charges on the obligations secured thereby, or provision therefor has been made; (2) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, or any other agreement of the issuing authority made as a part of the contract under which the obligations were issued, enforcement of such payments or agreement by mandamus, the appointment of a receiver, suit in equity, action at law, or any combination of the foregoing; (3) The rights and remedies of the holders of obligations and of the trustee, and provisions for protecting and enforcing them, including limitations on rights of individual holders of obligations; (4) The replacement of any obligations that become mutilated or are destroyed, lost, or stolen; (5) Such other provisions as the trustee and the issuing authority agree upon, including limitations, conditions, or qualifications relating to any of the foregoing. (K) Any holders of obligations or trustees under the bond proceedings, except to the extent that their rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, may by any suitable form of legal proceedings, protect and enforce any rights under the laws of this state or granted by such bond proceedings. Such rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the issuing authority, the director of development, the Ohio air quality development authority, or the division of liquor control required by this chapter or the bond proceedings; to enjoin unlawful activities; and in the event of default with respect to the payment of any bond service charges on any obligations or in the performance of any covenant or agreement on the part of the issuing authority, the director of development, the Ohio air quality development authority, or the division of liquor control in the bond proceedings, to apply to a court having jurisdiction of the cause to appoint a receiver to receive and administer the pledged receipts and special funds, other than those in the custody of the treasurer of state, which are pledged to the payment of the bond service charges on such obligations or which are the subject of the covenant or agreement, with full power to pay, and to provide for payment of bond service charges on, such obligations, and with such powers, subject to the direction of the court, as are accorded receivers in general equity cases, excluding any power to pledge additional revenues or receipts or other income or moneys of the issuing authority or the state or governmental agencies of the state to the payment of such principal and interest and excluding the power to take possession of, mortgage, or cause the sale or otherwise dispose of any project facilities. Each duty of the issuing authority and the issuing authority's officers and employees, and of each governmental agency and its officers, members, or employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings or any agreement or lease, lease-purchase agreement, or loan made under authority of this chapter, and in every agreement by or with the issuing authority, is hereby established as a duty of the issuing authority, and of each such officer, member, or employee having authority to perform such duty, specifically enjoined by the law resulting from an office, trust, or station within the meaning of section 2731.01 of the Revised Code. The person who is at the time the issuing authority, or the issuing authority's officers or employees, are not liable in their personal capacities on any obligations issued by the issuing authority or any agreements of or with the issuing authority. (L) The issuing authority may authorize and issue obligations for the refunding, including funding and retirement, and advance refunding with or without payment or redemption prior to maturity, of any obligations previously issued by the issuing authority. Such obligations may be issued in amounts sufficient for payment of the principal amount of the prior obligations, any redemption premiums thereon, principal maturities of any such obligations maturing prior to the redemption of the remaining obligations on a parity therewith, interest accrued or to accrue to the maturity dates or dates of redemption of such obligations, and any allowable costs including expenses incurred or to be incurred in connection with such issuance and such refunding, funding, and retirement. Subject to the bond proceedings therefor, the portion of proceeds of the sale of obligations issued under this division to be applied to bond service charges on the prior obligations shall be credited to an appropriate account held by the trustee for such prior or new obligations or to the appropriate account in the bond service fund for such obligations. Obligations authorized under this division shall be deemed to be issued for those purposes for which such prior obligations were issued and are subject to the provisions of this section pertaining to other obligations, except as otherwise provided in this section; provided that, unless otherwise authorized by the general assembly, any limitations imposed by the general assembly pursuant to this section with respect to bond service charges applicable to the prior obligations shall be applicable to the obligations issued under this division to refund, fund, advance refund or retire such prior obligations. (M) The authority to issue obligations under this section includes authority to issue obligations in the form of bond anticipation notes and to renew the same from time to time by the issuance of new notes. The holders of such notes or interest coupons pertaining thereto shall have a right to be paid solely from the pledged receipts and special funds that may be pledged to the payment of the bonds anticipated, or from the proceeds of such bonds or renewal notes, or both, as the issuing authority provides in the resolution or order authorizing such notes. Such notes may be additionally secured by covenants of the issuing authority to the effect that the issuing authority and the state will do such or all things necessary for the issuance of such bonds or renewal notes in appropriate amount, and apply the proceeds thereof to the extent necessary, to make full payment of the principal of and interest on such notes at the time or times contemplated, as provided in such resolution or order. For such purpose, the issuing authority may issue bonds or renewal notes in such principal amount and upon such terms as may be necessary to provide funds to pay when required the principal of and interest on such notes, notwithstanding any limitations prescribed by or for purposes of this section. Subject to this division, all provisions for and references to obligations in this section are applicable to notes authorized under this division. The issuing authority in the bond proceedings authorizing the issuance of bond anticipation notes shall set forth for such bonds an estimated interest rate and a schedule of principal payments for such bonds and the annual maturity dates thereof, and for purposes of any limitation on bond service charges prescribed under division (A) of section 166.11 of the Revised Code, the amount of bond service charges on such bond anticipation notes is deemed to be the bond service charges for the bonds anticipated thereby as set forth in the bond proceedings applicable to such notes, but this provision does not modify any authority in this section to pledge receipts and special funds to, and covenant to issue bonds to fund, the payment of principal of and interest and any premium on such notes. (N) Obligations issued under this section are lawful investments for banks, societies for savings, savings and loan associations, deposit guarantee associations, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other special funds of political subdivisions and taxing districts of this state, the commissioners of the sinking fund of the state, the administrator of workers' compensation, the state teachers retirement system, the public employees retirement system, the school employees retirement system, and the Ohio police and fire pension fund, notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code or rules adopted pursuant thereto by any governmental agency of the state with respect to investments by them, and are also acceptable as security for the deposit of public moneys. (O) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in the special funds established by or pursuant to this section may be invested by or on behalf of the issuing authority only in notes, bonds, or other obligations of the United States, or of any agency or instrumentality of the United States, obligations guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States, obligations of this state or any political subdivision of this state, and certificates of deposit of any national bank located in this state and any bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code, subject to inspection by the superintendent of banks. If the law or the instrument creating a trust pursuant to division (J) of this section expressly permits investment in direct obligations of the United States or an agency of the United States, unless expressly prohibited by the instrument, such moneys also may be invested in no-front-end-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of obligations of the United States or an agency of the United States and in repurchase agreements, including those issued by the fiduciary itself, secured by obligations of the United States or an agency of the United States; and in common trust funds established in accordance with section 1111.20 of the Revised Code and consisting exclusively of any such securities, notwithstanding division (A)(4) of that section. The income from such investments shall be credited to such funds as the issuing authority determines, and such investments may be sold at such times as the issuing authority determines or authorizes. (P) Provision may be made in the applicable bond proceedings for the establishment of separate accounts in the bond service fund and for the application of such accounts only to the specified bond service charges on obligations pertinent to such accounts and bond service fund and for other accounts therein within the general purposes of such fund. Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in the several special funds established pursuant to this section shall be disbursed on the order of the treasurer of state, provided that no such order is required for the payment from the bond service fund when due of bond service charges on obligations. (Q) The issuing authority may pledge all, or such portion as the issuing authority determines, of the pledged receipts to the payment of bond service charges on obligations issued under this section, and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves, as provided in the bond proceedings, and make other provisions therein with respect to pledged receipts as authorized by this chapter, which provisions are controlling notwithstanding any other provisions of law pertaining thereto. (R) The issuing authority may covenant in the bond proceedings, and any such covenants are controlling notwithstanding any other provision of law, that the state and applicable officers and governmental agencies of the state, including the general assembly, so long as any obligations are outstanding, shall: (1) Maintain statutory authority for and cause to be charged and collected wholesale and retail prices for spirituous liquor sold by the state or its agents so that the pledged receipts are sufficient in amount to meet bond service charges, and the establishment and maintenance of any reserves and other requirements provided for in the bond proceedings, and, as necessary, to meet covenants contained in contracts of guarantee made under section 166.06 of the Revised Code; (2) Take or permit no action, by statute or otherwise, that would impair the exemption from federal income taxation of the interest on the obligations. (S) There is hereby created the economic development bond service fund, which shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state but shall be separate and apart from and not a part of the state treasury. All moneys received by or on account of the issuing authority or state agencies and required by the applicable bond proceedings, consistent with this section, to be deposited, transferred, or credited to a bond service fund or the economic development bond service fund, and all other moneys transferred or allocated to or received for the purposes of the fund, shall be deposited and credited to such fund and to any separate accounts therein, subject to applicable provisions of the bond proceedings, but without necessity for any act of appropriation. During the period beginning with the date of the first issuance of obligations and continuing during such time as any such obligations are outstanding, and so long as moneys in the pertinent bond service funds are insufficient to pay all bond services charges on such obligations becoming due in each year, a sufficient amount of the gross profit on the sale of spirituous liquor included in pledged receipts are committed and shall be paid to the bond service fund or economic development bond service fund in each year for the purpose of paying the bond service charges becoming due in that year without necessity for further act of appropriation for such purpose and notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Chapter 4301. of the Revised Code. The economic development bond service fund is a trust fund and is hereby pledged to the payment of bond service charges to the extent provided in the applicable bond proceedings, and payment thereof from such fund shall be made or provided for by the treasurer of state in accordance with such bond proceedings without necessity for any act of appropriation. (T) The obligations, the transfer thereof, and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free from taxation within the state. Sec. 166.12. (A) The general assembly finds that in order to maintain and enhance the competitiveness of the Ohio economy and to improve the economic welfare of all of the people of the state, it is necessary to ensure that high-value jobs based on research, technology, and innovation will be available to the people of this state. Further, the general assembly finds that the attraction of such jobs and their presence in this state will materially contribute to the economic welfare of all of the people of the state. Accordingly, it is declared to be the public policy of this state, through the operations under sections 166.01 and 166.12 to 166.16 of the Revised Code, and the loan and loan guarantee provisions contained in those sections, applicable laws adopted pursuant to Section 13 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and other authority vested in the general assembly, to assist in and facilitate the establishment or development of eligible innovation projects or assist and cooperate with any governmental agency in achieving that purpose. (B) In furtherance of that public policy and to implement that purpose, the director of development may: (1) After consultation with appropriate governmental agencies, enter into agreements with persons engaged in industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research and with governmental agencies to induce such persons to acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, enlarge, improve, equip, or furnish, or otherwise develop, eligible innovation projects and make provision therein for project facilities and governmental actions, as authorized by sections 166.01 and 166.12 to 166.16 of the Revised Code and other applicable laws; (2) Provide for innovation Ohio loan guarantees and loans under sections 166.15 and 166.16 of the Revised Code; (3) Subject to the release of such moneys by the controlling board, contract for labor and materials needed for, or contract with others, including governmental agencies, to provide, eligible innovation projects the allowable innovation costs of which are to be paid for or reimbursed from moneys in the innovation Ohio loan fund, and contract for the operation of such eligible innovation projects; (4) Subject to release thereof by the controlling board, from moneys in the innovation Ohio loan fund, acquire or contract to acquire by gift, exchange, or purchase, including the obtaining and exercise of purchase options, innovation property, and convey or otherwise dispose of, or provide for the conveyance or disposition of, innovation property so acquired or contracted to be acquired by sale, exchange, lease, lease purchase, conditional or installment sale, transfer, or other disposition, including the grant of an option to purchase, to any governmental agency or to any other person without necessity for competitive bidding and upon such terms and conditions and manner of consideration pursuant to, and as the director determines to be appropriate to satisfy the objectives of, Chapter 166. of the Revised Code; (5) Retain the services of or employ financial consultants, appraisers, consulting engineers, superintendents, managers, construction and accounting experts, attorneys, and employees, agents, and independent contractors as are necessary in the director's judgment and fix the compensation for their services; (6) Receive and accept from any person grants, gifts, and contributions of money, property, labor, and other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purpose for which such grants, gifts, and contributions are made; (7) Enter into appropriate arrangements and agreements with any governmental agency for the taking or provision by that governmental agency of any governmental action with respect to innovation projects; (8) Do all other acts and enter into contracts and execute all instruments necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of sections 166.01 and 166.12 to 166.16 of the Revised Code; (9) With respect to property, including but not limited to innovation property, take such interests, including but not limited to mortgages, security interests, assignments, and exclusive or non-exclusive licenses, as may be necessary or appropriate under the circumstances, to ensure that innovation property is used within this state and that products or services associated with that innovation property are produced or, in the case of services, delivered, by persons employed within this state; (10) Adopt rules necessary to implement any of the provisions of sections 166.01 and 166.12 to 166.16 of the Revised Code applicable to the director. (C) The determinations by the director that facilities or property constitute eligible innovation projects and that costs of such facilities or property are allowable innovation costs, and all other determinations relevant thereto or to an action taken or agreement entered into, shall be conclusive for purposes of the validity and enforceability of rights of parties arising from actions taken and agreements entered into under sections 166.01 and 166.12 to 166.16 of the Revised Code. Sec. 166.17. (A) The general assembly finds that in order to enhance the economic opportunities available to and improve the economic welfare of all the people of the state, and to maintain and enhance the competitiveness of the Ohio economy, it is necessary to ensure that the people of the state will continue to have access to high-value jobs in technology, and that, to facilitate such continued access, it is necessary to provide incentives to retain and attract businesses that will develop new or improved technologies, processes, and products, or apply existing technologies in new ways. Further, the general assembly finds that the attraction of such jobs and their presence in this state will materially contribute to the economic welfare of all the people of the state. Accordingly, it is declared to be the public policy of this state, through operations under sections 166.17 to 166.21, 5733.352, and 5747.331 of the Revised Code and the provisions for financial assistance contained in those sections, other applicable laws adopted pursuant to Section 13 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and other authority vested in the general assembly, to assist in and facilitate the establishment or development of eligible research and development projects or assist and cooperate with any governmental agency in achieving that purpose. (B) In furtherance of that public policy and to implement that purpose, the director of development may do any of the following: (1) After consultation with appropriate governmental agencies, enter into agreements with persons engaged in industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research and with governmental agencies, to induce such persons to acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, enlarge, improve, equip, furnish, or develop eligible research and development projects, or to enable governmental agencies to acquire, construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, enlarge, improve, equip, furnish, or develop eligible research and development projects for lease to persons engaged in industry, commerce, distribution, development of tourism attractions or professional sports facilities, or research; (2) Provide for loans under section 166.21 of the Revised Code to finance eligible research and development projects; (3) Subject to the release of moneys in the research and development loan fund by the controlling board, contract for labor and materials needed for, or contract with others, including governmental agencies, to provide, eligible research and development projects, the allowable costs of which are to be paid for or reimbursed from such moneys, and contract for the operation of those projects; (4) From moneys in the research and development loan fund, subject to release thereof by the controlling board, acquire or contract to acquire property by gift, exchange, or purchase, including by obtaining and exercising purchase options, and convey or otherwise dispose of, or provide for the conveyance or disposition of, that property by sale, exchange, lease, lease purchase, conditional or installment sale, transfer, or other disposition, including the grant of an option to purchase, to any governmental agency or to any other person without necessity for competitive bidding and upon such terms and conditions and manner of consideration pursuant to, and as the director determines to be appropriate to satisfy the objectives of, Chapter 166. of the Revised Code; (5) Retain the services of or employ financial consultants, appraisers, consulting engineers, superintendents, managers, construction and accounting experts, attorneys, employees, agents, and independent contractors as are necessary in the director's judgment, and fix the compensation for their services; (6) Receive and accept from any person, grants, gifts, and contributions of money, property, labor, and other things of value, to be held, used, and applied only for the purpose for which such grants, gifts, and contributions are made; (7) Enter into arrangements and agreements with any governmental agency for the agency to take or provide any governmental action with respect to eligible research and development projects; (8) Do all other acts, enter into contracts, execute all instruments, and make all certifications necessary or appropriate to carry out sections 166.01, 166.17 to 166.21, 5733.352, and 5747.331 of the Revised Code; (9) With respect to property that is the subject of or related to research and development financial assistance, take such interests, including, but not limited to, mortgages, security interests, leasehold interests, assignments, and exclusive or nonexclusive licenses, as may be necessary or appropriate under the circumstances, to ensure that the property is used within this state and that products or services associated with that property are produced or, in the case of services, delivered, by persons employed within this state; (10) Adopt rules necessary to implement any of the provisions of sections 166.17 to 166.21, 5733.352, and 5747.331 of the Revised Code that are applicable to the director. (C) The determination by the director that facilities or property constitute an eligible research and development project and that the costs of such facilities or property are allowable costs related to the project, and all other determinations relevant thereto, or to an action taken or agreement entered into, shall be conclusive for purposes of the validity and enforceability of rights of parties arising from actions taken and agreements entered into under sections 166.17 to 166.21, 5733.352, and 5747.331 of the Revised Code. Sec. 169.01. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (A) "Financial organization" means any bank, trust company, savings bank, safe deposit company, mutual savings bank without mutual stock, savings and loan association, credit union, or investment company. (B)(1) "Unclaimed funds" means any moneys, rights to moneys, or intangible property, described in section 169.02 of the Revised Code, when, as shown by the records of the holder, the owner has not, within the times provided in section 169.02 of the Revised Code, done any of the following: (a) Increased, decreased, or adjusted the amount of such funds; (b) Assigned, paid premiums, or encumbered such funds; (c) Presented an appropriate record for the crediting of such funds or received payment of such funds by check, draft, or otherwise; (d) Corresponded with the holder concerning such funds; (e) Otherwise indicated an interest in or knowledge of such funds; (f) Transacted business with the holder. (2) "Unclaimed funds" does not include any of the following: (a) Money received or collected under section 9.39 of the Revised Code; (b) Any payment or credit due to a business association from a business association representing sums payable to suppliers, or payment for services rendered, in the course of business, including, but not limited to, checks or memoranda, overpayments, unidentified remittances, nonrefunded overcharges, discounts, refunds, and rebates; (c) Any payment or credit received by a business association from a business association for tangible goods sold, or services performed, in the course of business, including, but not limited to, checks or memoranda, overpayments, unidentified remittances, nonrefunded overcharges, discounts, refunds, and rebates; (d) Either of the following: (i) Any credit or obligation due a retail customer that is represented by a gift certificate, gift card, merchandise credit, or merchandise credit card, redeemable only for goods or services, including gift cards issued by financial organizations or business associations; (ii) Any electronic payment device that is issued by a financial organization or a business association that has no expiration date and meets all of the following conditions: (I) It is purchased or loaded on a prepaid basis for the future purchase or delivery of goods or services. (II) It is redeemable upon presentation to a single merchant or service provider or an affiliated group of merchants or service providers. (III) It is not redeemable for cash in whole or in part. (e) Any open-loop prepaid card that is issued by a financial organization or a business association for which the underlying funds do not expire. For purposes of division (B)(2)(e) of this section, "open-loop prepaid card" means an electronic payment device that meets all of the following conditions: (i) It is purchased or loaded on a prepaid basis for the future purchase or delivery of any goods or services. (ii) It can be used to purchase goods and services at multiple unaffiliated merchants or service providers. (iii) It is not redeemable for cash in whole or in part. (f) Any rewards card. For purposes of division (B)(2)(f) of this section, "rewards card" includes any loyalty, incentive, or promotional type program that is issued by a financial organization or a business association whether represented by a card or electronic record, which program is established for the purposes of providing cardholder awards, rewards, rebates, or other amounts to reward the cardholder for the cardholder's relationship with the entity sponsoring the rewards card, provided that no direct money was paid by the cardholder for the rewards card. "Rewards card" includes both of the following: (i) Cards or electronic records consisting of points, cash, or other tokens of value given to a cardholder as a reward or incentive for engaging in a transaction or a series of transactions; (ii) The unpaid portion of a rewards card when the rewards card is partially loaded by the cardholder with the remaining portion funded as a reward or incentive. A minimal annual fee charged to the cardholder for joining any such loyalty, incentive, or promotional type program shall not be considered direct money paid by the cardholder for the rewards card. For purposes of division (B)(2)(f) of this section, "cardholder" means the holder of a rewards card, regardless of whether the rewards card is represented by a card or by an electronic record. For purposes of division (B)(2) of this section, "business association" means any corporation, joint venture, business trust, limited liability company, partnership, association, or other business entity composed of one or more individuals, whether or not the entity is for profit. (C) "Owner" means any person, or the person's legal representative, entitled to receive or having a legal or equitable interest in or claim against moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property, subject to this chapter. (D)(1) "Holder" means any person that has possession, custody, or control of moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property, or that is indebted to another, if any of the following applies: (a) Such person resides in this state; (b) Such person is formed under the laws of this state; (c) Such person is formed under the laws of the United States and has an office or principal place of business in this state; (d) The records of such person indicate that the last known address of the owner of such moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property is in this state; (e) The records of such person do not indicate the last known address of the owner of the moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property and the entity originating or issuing the moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property in this state or any political subdivision of this state, or is incorporated, organized, created, or otherwise located in this state. Division (D)(1)(e) of this section applies to all moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property that is in the possession, custody, or control of such person on or after July 22, 1994, whether the moneys, rights to moneys, or other intangible property becomes unclaimed funds prior to or on or after that date. (2) "Holder" does not mean any hospital granted tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code or any hospital owned or operated by the state or by any political subdivision. Any entity in order to be exempt from the definition of "holder" pursuant to this division shall make a reasonable, good-faith effort to contact the owner of the unclaimed funds. (E) "Person" includes a natural person; corporation, whether for profit or not for profit; copartnership; unincorporated nonprofit association; public authority; estate; trust; two or more persons having a joint or common interest; eleemosynary organization; fraternal or cooperative association; other legal or community entity; the United States government, including any district, territory, possession, officer, agency, department, authority, instrumentality, board, bureau, or court; or any state or political subdivision thereof, including any officer, agency, board, bureau, commission, division, department, authority, court, or instrumentality. (F) "Mortgage funds" means the mortgage insurance fund created by section 122.561 of the Revised Code, and the housing guarantee fund created by division (D) of section 128.11 of the Revised Code. (G) "Lawful claims" means any vested right a holder of unclaimed funds has against the owner of such unclaimed funds. (H) "Public utility" means any entity defined as such by division (A) of section 745.01 or by section 4905.02 of the Revised Code. (I) "Deposit" means to place money in the custody of a financial organization for the purpose of establishing an income-bearing account by purchase or otherwise. (J) "Income-bearing account" means a time or savings account, whether or not evidenced by a certificate of deposit, or an investment account through which investments are made solely in obligations of the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities or guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or its agencies or instrumentalities, debt securities rated as investment grade by at least two nationally recognized rating services, debt securities which the director of commerce has determined to have been issued for the safety and welfare of the residents of this state, and equity interests in mutual funds that invest solely in some or all of the above-listed securities and involve no general liability, without regard to whether income earned on such accounts, securities, or interests is paid periodically or at the end of a term. (K) "Director of commerce" may be read as the "division of unclaimed funds" or the "superintendent of unclaimed funds." (L) "Attorney unclaimed funds" means any unclaimed funds, as defined in division (B)(1) of this section, that are any of the following: (1) Funds held in interest on lawyer trust accounts pursuant to section 4705.09 of the Revised Code; (2) Funds held in an interest on trust accounts pursuant to section 3953.231 of the Revised Code; (3) Residual settlement funds whether for named or unnamed plaintiffs, received by the division of unclaimed funds, and held, paid out, or allocated by the division pursuant to or consistent with the terms and conditions of the court order authorizing the settlement fund. Sec. 169.05. (A) Every holder required to file a report under section 169.03 of the Revised Code shall, at the time of filing, pay to the director of commerce ten per cent of the aggregate amount of unclaimed funds as shown on the report, except for aggregate amounts of fifty dollars or less in which case one hundred per cent shall be paid. The funds may be deposited by the director in the state treasury to the credit of the unclaimed funds trust fund, which is hereby created, or placed with a financial organization. Any interest earned on money in the trust fund shall be credited to the trust fund. The remainder of the aggregate amount of unclaimed funds as shown on the report, plus earnings accrued to date of payment to the director, shall, at the option of the director, be retained by the holder or paid to the director for deposit as agent for the mortgage funds with a financial organization as defined in section 169.01 of the Revised Code, with the funds to be in income-bearing accounts to the credit of the mortgage funds, or the holder may enter into an agreement with the director specifying the obligations of the United States in which funds are to be invested, and agree to pay the interest on the obligations to the state. Holders retaining any funds not in obligations of the United States shall enter into an agreement with the director specifying the classification of income-bearing account in which the funds will be held and pay the state interest on the funds at a rate equal to the prevailing market rate for similar funds. Moneys that the holder is required to pay to the director rather than to retain may be deposited with the treasurer of state, or placed with a financial organization. Securities and other intangible property transferred to the director shall, within a reasonable time, be converted to cash and the proceeds deposited as provided for other funds. One-half of the The funds evidenced by agreements, in income-bearing accounts, or on deposit with the treasurer of state shall be allocated on the records of the director to the mortgage insurance fund created by section 122.561 of the Revised Code. Out of the remaining half, after allocation of sufficient moneys to the minority business bonding fund to meet the provisions of division (B) of this section, the remainder shall be allocated on the records of the director to the housing development fund created by division (A) of section 175.11 of the Revised Code. (B) The director shall serve as agent for the director of development and as agent for the Ohio housing finance agency in making deposits and withdrawals and maintaining records pertaining to the minority business bonding fund created by section 122.88 of the Revised Code, the mortgage insurance fund, and the housing development fund created by section 175.11 of the Revised Code. Funds from the mortgage insurance fund are available to the director of development when those funds are to be disbursed to prevent or cure, or upon the occurrence of, a default of a mortgage insured pursuant to section 122.451 of the Revised Code. Funds from the housing development fund are available upon request to the Ohio housing finance agency, in an amount not to exceed the funds allocated on the records of the director, for the purposes of section 175.05 of the Revised Code. Funds from the minority business bonding fund are available to the director of development upon request to pay obligations on bonds the director writes pursuant to section 122.88 of the Revised Code; except that, unless the general assembly authorizes additional amounts, the total maximum amount of moneys that may be allocated to the minority business bonding fund under this division is ten million dollars. When funds are to be disbursed, the appropriate agency shall call upon the director to transfer the necessary funds to it. The director shall first withdraw the funds paid by the holders and deposited with the treasurer of state or in a financial institution as agent for the funds. Whenever these funds are inadequate to meet the request, the director shall provide for a withdrawal of funds, within a reasonable time and in the amount necessary to meet the request, from financial institutions in which the funds were retained or placed by a holder and from other holders who have retained funds, in an equitable manner as the director prescribes. In the event that the amount to be withdrawn from any one holder is less than five hundred dollars, the amount to be withdrawn is at the director's discretion. The director shall then transfer to the agency the amount of funds requested. Funds deposited in the unclaimed funds trust fund are subject to call by the director when necessary to pay claims the director allows under section 169.08 of the Revised Code, in accordance with the director's rules, to defray the necessary costs of making publications this chapter requires and to pay other operating and administrative expenses the department of commerce incurs in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The unclaimed funds trust fund shall be assessed a proportionate share of the administrative costs of the department of commerce in accordance with procedures the director of commerce prescribes. The assessment shall be paid from the unclaimed funds trust fund to the division of administration fund. (C) Earnings on the accounts in financial organizations to the credit of the mortgage funds shall, at the option of the financial organization, be credited to the accounts at times and at rates as earnings are paid on other accounts of the same classification held in the financial organization or paid to the director. The director shall be notified annually, and at other times as the director may request, of the amount of the earnings credited to the accounts. Interest on unclaimed funds a holder retains shall be paid to the director or credited as specified in the agreement under which the organization retains the funds. Interest payable to the director under an agreement to invest unclaimed funds in income-bearing accounts or obligations of the United States shall be paid annually by the holder to the director. Any earnings or interest the director receives under this division shall be deposited in and credited to the mortgage funds. Sec. 169.08. (A) The Except as otherwise provided in division (I) of this section, the director of commerce shall pay to the owner or other person who has established the right to payment under this section, funds from the unclaimed funds trust fund in an amount equal to the amount of property delivered or reported to the director, or equal to the net proceeds if the securities or other property have been sold, together with interest earned by the state if required to be paid under division (D) of this section. Any person claiming a property interest in unclaimed funds delivered or reported to the state under Chapter 169. of the Revised Code, including the office of child support in the department of job and family services, pursuant to section 3123.88 of the Revised Code, may file a claim thereto on the form prescribed by the director of commerce. (B) The director shall consider matters relevant to any claim filed under division (A) of this section and shall hold a formal hearing if requested or considered necessary and receive evidence concerning such claim. A finding and decision in writing on each claim filed shall be prepared, stating the substance of any evidence received or heard and the reasons for allowance or disallowance of the claim. The evidence and decision shall be a public record. No Except as otherwise provided in division (I) of this section, no statute of limitations shall bar the allowance of a claim. (C) For the purpose of conducting any hearing, the director may require the attendance of such witnesses and the production of such books, records, and papers as the director desires, and the director may take the depositions of witnesses residing within or without this state in the same manner as is prescribed by law for the taking of depositions in civil actions in the court of common pleas, and for that purpose the director may issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records, or papers, directed to the sheriff of the county where such witness resides or is found, which shall be served and returned. The fees of the sheriff shall be the same as that allowed in the court of common pleas in criminal cases. Witnesses shall be paid the fees and mileage provided for under section 119.094 of the Revised Code. Fees and mileage shall be paid from the unclaimed funds trust fund. (D) Interest Except as otherwise provided in division (I) of this section, interest earned by the state shall be payable to claimants of unclaimed funds held by the state in accordance with final court orders derived from the Sogg v. Zurz, 121 Ohio St.3d 449 (2009), line of cases and final settlement agreement determining payment of interest on unclaimed funds. For properties received by the state on or before July 26, 1991, interest shall be paid at a rate of six per cent per annum from the date the state received the property up to and including July 26, 1991. No interest shall be payable on any properties for the period from July 27, 1991, up to and including August 2, 2000. For properties held by the state on August 3, 2000, or after, interest shall be paid at the applicable required rate per annum for the period held from August 3, 2000, or the date of receipt, whichever is later, up to and including the date the claim is paid. (E) Claims shall be paid from the trust fund. If the amount available in the trust fund is not sufficient to pay pending claims, or other amounts disbursable from the trust fund, the treasurer of state shall certify such fact to the director, who shall then withdraw such amount of funds from the mortgage accounts as the director determines necessary to reestablish the trust fund to a level required to pay anticipated claims but not more than ten per cent of the net unclaimed funds reported to date. The director may withdraw the funds paid to the director by the holders and deposited by the director with the treasurer of state or in a financial institution as agent for such funds. Whenever these funds are inadequate to meet the requirements for the trust fund, the director shall provide for a withdrawal of funds, within a reasonable time, in such amount as is necessary to meet the requirements, from financial institutions in which such funds were retained or placed by a holder and from other holders who have retained funds, in an equitable manner as prescribed by the director. In the event that the amount to be withdrawn from any one such holder is less than five hundred dollars, the amount to be withdrawn shall be at the discretion of the director. Such funds may be reimbursed in the amounts withdrawn when the trust fund has a surplus over the amount required to pay anticipated claims. Whenever the trust fund has a surplus over the amount required to pay anticipated claims, the director may transfer such surplus to the mortgage accounts. (F)(1) If a claim which is allowed under this section relates to funds which have been retained by the reporting holder, and if the funds, on deposit with the treasurer of state pursuant to this chapter, are insufficient to pay claims, the director may notify such holder in writing of the payment of the claim and such holder shall immediately reimburse the state in the amount of such claim. The reimbursement shall be credited to the unclaimed funds trust fund. (2) If a claim that is allowed under this section relates to attorney unclaimed funds that have been recovered by the Ohio access to justice foundation, pursuant to division (A) of section 169.052 of the Revised Code and division (A) of this section, the director shall notify the Ohio access to justice foundation in writing of the payment of the claim and the Ohio access to justice foundation shall immediately reimburse the unclaimed funds trust fund in the amount of such claim inclusive of interest as required by division (D) of this section. The reimbursement shall be credited to the unclaimed funds trust fund. (G) Any person, including the office of child support, adversely affected by a decision of the director may appeal such decision in the manner provided in Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. In the event the claimant prevails, the claimant shall be reimbursed for reasonable attorney's fees and costs. (H) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, any holder who has paid moneys to or entered into an agreement with the director pursuant to section 169.05 of the Revised Code on certified checks, cashiers' checks, bills of exchange, letters of credit, drafts, money orders, or travelers' checks, may make payment to any person entitled thereto, including the office of child support, and upon surrender of the document, except in the case of travelers' checks, and proof of such payment, the director shall reimburse the holder for such payment without interest. (I)(1) Unclaimed funds and interest earned thereon that are first reported to the director under section 169.03 of the Revised Code on or before January 1, 2016, are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state on January 1, 2026, if no valid claim is filed by the owner or another person claiming a right to payment on or before that date. (2) Unclaimed funds and interest first reported to the director after January 1, 2016, are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state on the tenth anniversary of that reporting date if no valid claim is filed by the owner or another person claiming a right to payment on or before the tenth anniversary of that reporting date. (3)(a) All property rights, legal title to, and ownership of unclaimed funds and interest vest solely in the state on the date the unclaimed funds and interest are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state. (b) Notwithstanding division (I)(3)(a) of this section, the former owner or other person claiming a property interest in unclaimed funds that are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state may file a claim for payment of an equivalent amount, together with interest earned by the state if required under division (D) of this section, at any time on or before January 1, 2036. Upon providing sufficient proof of the validity of the owner's or other person's claim, the director shall pay the claim less any expenses and costs incurred by the state in securing full title and ownership of the unclaimed funds. (c) If payment is made on a claim under division (I)(3)(b) of this section, no action thereafter shall be maintained by any other claimant against the state for or on account of the payment of the claim. (d) The director shall pay claims under division (I)(3)(b) of this section from the unclaimed funds trust fund and shall not seek reimbursement for such claims from the Ohio cultural and sports facility performance grant fund created under section 123.282 of the Revised Code or deduct the amount of such claims from future remissions to that fund required by division (I)(4) of this section. (e) Any claim filed after the date the unclaimed funds and interest are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state and after January 1, 2036, is void. (4) On the first days of January and July each year, beginning in 2026, the director shall remit or cause to be remitted all unclaimed funds and interest that are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state to the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio cultural and sports facility performance grant fund created under section 123.282 of the Revised Code. The director shall notify the director of budget and management of all funds and interest remitted under this division. (5) If unclaimed funds and interest that are deemed abandoned and escheat to the state are retained or invested by a holder pursuant to an agreement under division (A) of section 169.05 of the Revised Code, the director shall notify the holder and the holder shall pay the funds and interest to the director in a form and manner determined by the director. (6) The director of commerce shall develop guidelines and procedures to implement division (I) of this section including procedures addressing both of the following: (a) Repayment of unclaimed funds and interest that are invested in non-liquid assets; (b) Ensuring that the balance of the unclaimed funds trust fund is sufficient to meet the state's financial obligations under this chapter. Sec. 169.13. (A)(1) All agreements to pay a fee, compensation, commission, or other remuneration to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of unclaimed funds reported under section 169.03 of the Revised Code, entered into within two years immediately after the date a report is filed under division (D) of section 169.03 of the Revised Code, are invalid. (2) A person interested in entering into an agreement to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of unclaimed funds for remuneration shall not initiate any contact with an owner during the two-year period immediately after the date a report is filed under division (D) of section 169.03 of the Revised Code. Failure to comply with this requirement is grounds for the invalidation of any such agreement between the person and the owner. (B) An agreement entered into any time after such two-year period is valid only if all of the following conditions are met: (1) The aggregate fee, compensation, commission, or other remuneration agreed upon is not in excess of ten per cent of the amount recovered and paid to the owner by the director of budget and management; (2) The agreement is in writing, signed by the owner, and notarized and discloses all of the following items: (a) The name, address, and telephone number of the owner, as shown by the records of the person or entity in possession of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box; (b) The name, address, and telephone number of the owner if the owner's name, address, or telephone number are different from the name, address, or telephone number of the owner as shown by the records of the person or entity in possession of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box; (c) The nature and value of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box; (d) The amount the owner will receive after the fee or compensation has been subtracted; (e) The name and address of the person or entity in possession of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box; (f) That the director of budget and management will pay the unclaimed funds directly to the owner or the director of commerce shall deliver the contents of a safe deposit box directly to the owner; (g) That the person agreeing to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box is not an employee or agent of the director of commerce; (h) That the director of commerce is not a party to the agreement; (i) That the person agreeing to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box holds a valid certificate of registration issued by the director under section 169.16 of the Revised Code; (j) The number designated on that certificate of registration and the date the certificate of registration expires. (3) No agreement described in division (B)(2) of this section shall include a power of attorney for the payment of the unclaimed funds or delivery of the contents of a safe deposit box to any person other than the owner of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box. (4) If the agreement involves recovery of the contents of a safe deposit box, the agreement stipulates that the person receiving any fee, compensation, commission, or other remuneration for engaging in any activity for the purpose of locating, delivering, recovering, or assisting in the recovery of unclaimed funds or other items stored in a safe deposit box on behalf of any other person shall do all of the following: (a) Make arrangements to have an appraiser and the director of commerce view the contents of the safe deposit box together, at a time mutually agreeable to the appraiser and director; (b) State that the value of the property in the safe deposit box is the amount established by the appraiser who viewed the safe deposit box contents; (c) Base the fee, compensation, commission, or other remuneration for locating, delivering, recovering, or assisting in the recovery of unclaimed funds or other items stored in a safe deposit box on the appraised value established by the appraiser who viewed the safe deposit box contents. (C) No person shall receive a fee, compensation, commission, or other remuneration, or engage in any activity for the purpose of locating, delivering, recovering, or assisting in the recovery of unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box, under an agreement that is invalid under this section. (D) A person who receives any fee, compensation, commission, or other remuneration for engaging in any activity for the purpose of locating, delivering, recovering, or assisting in the recovery of unclaimed funds or other items stored in a safe deposit box on behalf of any other person cannot function as an appraiser of the contents of the safe deposit box for purposes of division (B)(4) of this section. (E) The director shall not recognize or make any delivery and the auditor of state office of budget and management shall not make any payment pursuant to any power of attorney between an owner of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box and the person with whom the owner entered into an agreement pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box if that power of attorney is entered into on or after March 23, 2007, and that power of attorney specifically provides for the payment of unclaimed funds or delivery of the contents of a safe deposit box to any person other than the owner of the unclaimed funds or contents of a safe deposit box. Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the payment of unclaimed funds or delivery of the contents of a safe deposit box to the legal representative of the owner of the unclaimed funds or contents of the safe deposit box. Notwithstanding the definition of "owner" specified in division (C) of section 169.01 of the Revised Code, for purposes of the payment of unclaimed funds or delivery of the contents of the safe deposit box, a person with whom an owner entered into an agreement under division (B)(2) of this section is not a legal representative. Sec. 173.38. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Applicant" means a person who is under final consideration for employment with a responsible party in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or is referred to a responsible party by an employment service for such a position. "Applicant" does not include a person being considered for a direct-care position as a volunteer. (2) "Area agency on aging" has the same meaning as in section 173.14 of the Revised Code. (3) "Chief administrator of a responsible party" includes a consumer when the consumer is a responsible party. (4) "Community-based long-term care services" means community-based long-term care services, as defined in section 173.14 of the Revised Code, that are provided under a program the department of aging administers. (5)(4) "Consumer" means an individual who receives community-based long-term care services. (6)(5) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (7)(a)(6)(a) "Direct-care position" means an employment position in which an employee has either or both of the following: (i) In-person contact with one or more consumers; (ii) Access to one or more consumers' personal property or records. (b) "Direct-care position" does not include a any of the following: (i) A person whose sole duties are transporting individuals under Chapter 306. of the Revised Code; (ii) An attorney licensed to practice law in this state; (iii) A person who is not licensed to practice law in this state, but, at the direction of an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, assists the attorney in the attorney's provision of legal services. (8)(7) "Disqualifying offense" means any of the offenses listed or described in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (e) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (9)(8) "Employee" means a person employed by a responsible party in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position and a person who works in such a position due to being referred to a responsible party by an employment service. "Employee" does not include a person who works in a direct-care position as a volunteer. (10)(9) "PASSPORT administrative agency" has the same meaning as in section 173.42 of the Revised Code. (11)(10) "Provider" has the same meaning as in section 173.39 of the Revised Code. (12)(11) "Responsible party" means the following: (a) An area agency on aging in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for employment with the agency in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or is referred to the agency by an employment service for such a position; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is employed by the agency in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or works in such a position due to being referred to the agency by an employment service. (b) A PASSPORT administrative agency in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for employment with the agency in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or is referred to the agency by an employment service for such a position; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is employed by the agency in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or works in such a position due to being referred to the agency by an employment service. (c) A provider in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for employment with the provider in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or is referred to the provider by an employment service for such a position; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is employed by the provider in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or works in such a position due to being referred to the provider by an employment service. (d) A subcontractor in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for employment with the subcontractor in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or is referred to the subcontractor by an employment service for such a position; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is employed by the subcontractor in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position or works in such a position due to being referred to the subcontractor by an employment service. (e) A consumer in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for employment with the consumer in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position for which the consumer, as the employer of record, is to direct the person in the provision of community-based long-term care services the person is to provide the consumer or is referred to the consumer by an employment service for such a position; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is employed by the consumer in a full-time, part-time, or temporary direct-care position for which the consumer, as the employer of record, directs the person in the provision of community-based long-term care services the person provides to the consumer or who works in such a position due to being referred to the consumer by an employment service. (13)(12) "Subcontractor" has the meaning specified in rules adopted under this section. (14)(13) "Volunteer" means a person who serves in a direct-care position without receiving or expecting to receive any form of remuneration other than reimbursement for actual expenses. (15)(14) "Waiver agency" has the same meaning as in section 5164.342 of the Revised Code. (B) This section does not apply to any individual of the following: (1) A person who is subject to a database review or criminal records check under section 173.381 or 3740.11 of the Revised Code or to any individual ; (2) A person who is subject to a criminal records check under section 3721.121 of the Revised Code; (3) A participant-directed provider, but only if the director of aging has conducted a database review of the provider in the same manner that other database reviews are conducted under this section; (4) An ambulette driver employed by an organization licensed under Chapter 4766. of the Revised Code. (C) No responsible party shall employ an applicant or continue to employ an employee in a direct-care position if any of the following apply: (1) A review of the databases listed in division (E) of this section reveals any of the following: (a) That the applicant or employee is included in one or more of the databases listed in divisions (E)(1) to (5) of this section; (b) That there is in the state nurse aide registry established under section 3721.32 of the Revised Code a statement detailing findings by the director of health that the applicant or employee abused, neglected, or exploited a long-term care facility or residential care facility resident or misappropriated property of such a resident; (c) That the applicant or employee is included in one or more of the databases, if any, specified in rules adopted under this section and the rules prohibit the responsible party from employing an applicant or continuing to employ an employee included in such a database in a direct-care position. (2) After the applicant or employee is provided, pursuant to division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and the standard impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section, the applicant or employee fails to complete the form or provide the applicant's or employee's fingerprint impressions on the standard impression sheet. (3) Unless the applicant or employee meets standards specified in rules adopted under this section, the applicant or employee is found by a criminal records check required by this section to have been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. (D) Except as provided by division (G) of this section, the chief administrator of a responsible party shall inform each applicant of both of the following at the time of the applicant's initial application for employment or referral to the responsible party by an employment service for a direct-care position: (1) That a review of the databases listed in division (E) of this section will be conducted to determine whether the responsible party is prohibited by division (C)(1) of this section from employing the applicant in the direct-care position; (2) That, unless the database review reveals that the applicant may not be employed in the direct-care position, a criminal records check of the applicant will be conducted and the applicant is required to provide a set of the applicant's fingerprint impressions as part of the criminal records check. (E) As a condition of employing any applicant in a direct-care position, the chief administrator of a responsible party shall conduct a database review of the applicant in accordance with rules adopted under this section. If rules adopted under this section so require, the chief administrator of a responsible party shall conduct a database review of an employee in accordance with the rules as a condition of continuing to employ the employee in a direct-care position. However, a chief administrator is not required to conduct a database review of an applicant or employee if division (G) of this section applies. A database review shall determine whether the applicant or employee is included in any of the following: (1) The excluded parties list system that is maintained by the United States general services administration pursuant to subpart 9.4 of the federal acquisition regulation and available at the federal web site known as the system for award management; (2) The list of excluded individuals and entities maintained by the office of inspector general in the United States department of health and human services pursuant to the "Social Security Act," sections 1128 and 1156, 42 U.S.C. 1320a-7 and 1320c-5; (3) The registry of developmental disabilities employees established under section 5123.52 of the Revised Code; (4) The internet-based sex offender and child-victim offender database established under division (A)(11) of section 2950.13 of the Revised Code; (5) The internet-based database of inmates established under section 5120.66 of the Revised Code; (6) The state nurse aide registry established under section 3721.32 of the Revised Code; (7) Any other database, if any, specified in rules adopted under this section. (F)(1) As a condition of employing any applicant in a direct-care position, the chief administrator of a responsible party shall request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check of the applicant. If rules adopted under this section so require, the chief administrator of a responsible party shall request that the superintendent conduct a criminal records check of an employee at times specified in the rules as a condition of continuing to employ the employee in a direct-care position. However, the chief administrator is not required to request the criminal records check of the applicant or employee if division (G) of this section applies or the responsible party is prohibited by division (C)(1) of this section from employing the applicant or continuing to employ the employee in a direct-care position. If an applicant or employee for whom a criminal records check request is required by this section does not present proof of having been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date the criminal records check is requested or provide evidence that within that five-year period the superintendent has requested information about the applicant or employee from the federal bureau of investigation in a criminal records check, the chief administrator shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check. Even if an applicant or employee for whom a criminal records check request is required by this section presents proof of having been a resident of this state for the five-year period, the chief administrator may request that the superintendent include information from the federal bureau of investigation in the criminal records check. (2) The chief administrator shall do all of the following: (a) Provide to each applicant and employee for whom a criminal records check request is required by this section a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section; (b) Obtain the completed form and standard impression sheet from the applicant or employee; (c) Forward the completed form and standard impression sheet to the superintendent. (3) A responsible party shall pay to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation the fee prescribed pursuant to division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code for each criminal records check the responsible party requests under this section. A responsible party may charge an applicant a fee not exceeding the amount the responsible party pays to the bureau under this section if both of the following apply: (a) The responsible party notifies the applicant at the time of initial application for employment of the amount of the fee and that, unless the fee is paid, the applicant will not be considered for employment. (b) The medicaid program does not pay the responsible party for the fee it pays to the bureau under this section. (G) Divisions (D) to (F) of this section do not apply with regard to an applicant or employee if the applicant or employee is referred to a responsible party by an employment service that supplies full-time, part-time, or temporary staff for direct-care positions and both of the following apply: (1) The chief administrator of the responsible party receives from the employment service confirmation that a review of the databases listed in division (E) of this section was conducted of the applicant or employee. (2) The chief administrator of the responsible party receives from the employment service, applicant, or employee a report of the results of a criminal records check of the applicant or employee that has been conducted by the superintendent within the one-year period immediately preceding the following: (a) In the case of an applicant, the date of the applicant's referral by the employment service to the responsible party; (b) In the case of an employee, the date by which the responsible party would otherwise have to request a criminal records check of the employee under division (F) of this section. (H)(1) A responsible party may employ conditionally an applicant for whom a criminal records check request is required by this section prior to obtaining the results of the criminal records check if the responsible party is not prohibited by division (C)(1) of this section from employing the applicant in a direct-care position and either of the following applies: (a) The chief administrator of the responsible party requests the criminal records check in accordance with division (F) of this section before conditionally employing the applicant. (b) The applicant is referred to the responsible party by an employment service, the employment service or the applicant provides the chief administrator of the responsible party a letter that is on the letterhead of the employment service, the letter is dated and signed by a supervisor or another designated official of the employment service, and the letter states all of the following: (i) That the employment service has requested the superintendent to conduct a criminal records check regarding the applicant; (ii) That the requested criminal records check is to include a determination of whether the applicant has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense; (iii) That the employment service has not received the results of the criminal records check as of the date set forth on the letter; (iv) That the employment service promptly will send a copy of the results of the criminal records check to the chief administrator of the responsible party when the employment service receives the results. (2) If a responsible party employs an applicant conditionally pursuant to division (H)(1)(b) of this section, the employment service, on its receipt of the results of the criminal records check, promptly shall send a copy of the results to the chief administrator of the responsible party. (3) A responsible party that employs an applicant conditionally pursuant to division (H)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall terminate the applicant's employment if the results of the criminal records check, other than the results of any request for information from the federal bureau of investigation, are not obtained within the period ending sixty days after the date the request for the criminal records check is made. Regardless of when the results of the criminal records check are obtained, if the results indicate that the applicant has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense, the responsible party shall terminate the applicant's employment unless the applicant meets standards specified in rules adopted under this section that permit the responsible party to employ the applicant and the responsible party chooses to employ the applicant. Termination of employment under this division shall be considered just cause for discharge for purposes of division (D)(2) of section 4141.29 of the Revised Code if the applicant makes any attempt to deceive the responsible party about the applicant's criminal record. (I) The report of any criminal records check conducted pursuant to a request made under this section is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person other than the following: (1) The applicant or employee who is the subject of the criminal records check or the applicant's or employee's representative; (2) The chief administrator of the responsible party requesting the criminal records check or the administrator's representative; (3) The administrator of any other facility, agency, or program that provides community-based long-term care services that is owned or operated by the same entity that owns or operates the responsible party that requested the criminal records check; (4) The employment service that requested the criminal records check; (5) The director of aging or a person authorized by the director to monitor a responsible party's compliance with this section; (6) The medicaid director and the staff of the department of medicaid who are involved in the administration of the medicaid program if any of the following apply: (a) In the case of a criminal records check requested by a provider or subcontractor, the provider or subcontractor also is a waiver agency; (b) In the case of a criminal records check requested by an employment service, the employment service makes the request for an applicant or employee the employment service refers to a provider or subcontractor that also is a waiver agency; (c) The criminal records check is requested by a consumer who is acting as a responsible party. (7) A court or hearing officer involved in a case dealing with any of the following: (a) A denial of employment of the applicant or employee; (b) Employment or unemployment benefits of the applicant or employee; (c) A civil or criminal action regarding the medicaid program or a program the department of aging administers. (8) Pursuant to a lawful subpoena or valid court order, any necessary individual not identified in division (I)(7) of this section who is involved in a case dealing with any issue, matter, or action described in division (I)(7)(a), (b), or (c) of this section. (J) In a tort or other civil action for damages that is brought as the result of an injury, death, or loss to person or property caused by an applicant or employee who a responsible party employs in a direct-care position, all of the following shall apply: (1) If the responsible party employed the applicant or employee in good faith and reasonable reliance on the report of a criminal records check requested under this section, the responsible party shall not be found negligent solely because of its reliance on the report, even if the information in the report is determined later to have been incomplete or inaccurate. (2) If the responsible party employed the applicant in good faith on a conditional basis pursuant to division (H) of this section, the responsible party shall not be found negligent solely because it employed the applicant prior to receiving the report of a criminal records check requested under this section. (3) If the responsible party in good faith employed the applicant or employee because the applicant or employee meets standards specified in rules adopted under this section, the responsible party shall not be found negligent solely because the applicant or employee has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. (K) The director of aging shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. (1) The rules may do the following: (a) Require employees to undergo database reviews and criminal records checks under this section; (b) If the rules require employees to undergo database reviews and criminal records checks under this section, exempt one or more classes of employees from the requirements; (c) For the purpose of division (E)(7) of this section, specify other databases that are to be checked as part of a database review conducted under this section. (2) The rules shall specify all of the following: (a) The meaning of the term "subcontractor"; (b) The procedures for conducting database reviews under this section; (c) If the rules require employees to undergo database reviews and criminal records checks under this section, the times at which the database reviews and criminal records checks are to be conducted; (d) If the rules specify other databases to be checked as part of the database reviews, the circumstances under which a responsible party is prohibited from employing an applicant or continuing to employ an employee who is found by a database review to be included in one or more of those databases; (e) Standards that an applicant or employee must meet for a responsible party to be permitted to employ the applicant or continue to employ the employee in a direct-care position if the applicant or employee is found by a criminal records check required by this section to have been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. Sec. 173.381. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Community-based long-term care services" means community-based long-term care services, as defined in section 173.14 of the Revised Code, that are provided under a program the department of aging administers. (2) "Community-based long-term care services certificate" means a certificate issued under section 173.391 of the Revised Code. (3) "Community-based long-term care services contract or grant" means a contract or grant awarded under section 173.392 of the Revised Code. (4) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (5) "Disqualifying offense" means any of the offenses listed or described in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (e) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (6) "Provider" has the same meaning as in section 173.39 of the Revised Code. (7) "Self-employed provider" means a provider who works for the provider's self and has no employees. (B) This section does not apply to any individual who is subject to a database review or criminal records check under of the following: (1) An applicant as defined in section 3740.11 of the Revised Code or an employee as defined in section 3740.01 of the Revised Code; (2) An ambulette driver employed by an organization licensed under Chapter 4766. of the Revised Code; (3) An attorney licensed to practice law in this state; (4) A person who is not licensed to practice law in this state, but who, at the direction of an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, assists the attorney in the attorney's provision of legal services. (C)(1) The department of aging or its designee shall take the following actions when the circumstances specified in division (C)(2) of this section apply: (a) Refuse to issue a community-based long-term care services certificate to a self-employed provider; (b) Revoke a self-employed provider's community-based long-term care services certificate; (c) Refuse to award a community-based long-term care services contract or grant to a self-employed provider; (d) Terminate a self-employed provider's community-based long-term care services contract or grant awarded on or after September 15, 2014. (2) The following are the circumstances that require the department of aging or its designee to take action under division (C)(1) of this section: (a) A review of the databases listed in division (E) of this section reveals any of the following: (i) That the self-employed provider is included in one or more of the databases listed in divisions (E)(1) to (5) of this section; (ii) That there is in the state nurse aide registry established under section 3721.32 of the Revised Code a statement detailing findings by the director of health that the self-employed provider abused, neglected, or exploited a long-term care facility or residential care facility resident or misappropriated property of such a resident; (iii) That the self-employed provider is included in one or more of the databases, if any, specified in rules adopted under this section and the rules require the department or its designee to take action under division (C)(1) of this section if a self-employed provider is included in such a database. (b) After the self-employed provider is provided, pursuant to division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and the standard impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section, the self-employed provider fails to complete the form or provide the self-employed provider's fingerprint impressions on the standard impression sheet. (c) Unless the self-employed provider meets standards specified in rules adopted under this section, the self-employed provider is found by a criminal records check required by this section to have been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. (D) The department of aging or its designee shall inform each self-employed provider of both of the following at the time of the self-employed provider's initial application for a community-based long-term care services certificate or initial bid for a community-based long-term care services contract or grant: (1) That a review of the databases listed in division (E) of this section will be conducted to determine whether the department or its designee is required by division (C) of this section to refuse to issue or award a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to the self-employed provider; (2) That, unless the database review reveals that the department or its designee is required to refuse to issue or award a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to the self-employed provider, a criminal records check of the self-employed provider will be conducted and the self-employed provider is required to provide a set of the self-employed provider's fingerprint impressions as part of the criminal records check. (E) As a condition of issuing or awarding a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to a self-employed provider, the department of aging or its designee shall conduct a database review of the self-employed provider in accordance with rules adopted under this section. If rules adopted under this section so require, the department or its designee shall conduct a database review of a self-employed provider in accordance with the rules as a condition of not revoking or terminating the self-employed provider's community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant. A database review shall determine whether the self-employed provider is included in any of the following: (1) The excluded parties list system that is maintained by the United States general services administration pursuant to subpart 9.4 of the federal acquisition regulation and available at the federal web site known as the system for award management; (2) The list of excluded individuals and entities maintained by the office of inspector general in the United States department of health and human services pursuant to the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1320a-7 and 1320c-5; (3) The registry of developmental disabilities employees established under section 5123.52 of the Revised Code; (4) The internet-based sex offender and child-victim offender database established under division (A)(11) of section 2950.13 of the Revised Code; (5) The internet-based database of inmates established under section 5120.66 of the Revised Code; (6) The state nurse aide registry established under section 3721.32 of the Revised Code; (7) Any other database, if any, specified in rules adopted under this section. (F)(1) As a condition of issuing or awarding a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to a self-employed provider, the department of aging or its designee shall request that the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation conduct a criminal records check of the self-employed provider. If rules adopted under this section so require, the department or its designee shall request that the superintendent conduct a criminal records check of a self-employed provider at times specified in the rules as a condition of not revoking or terminating the self-employed provider's community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant. However, the department or its designee is not required to request the criminal records check of the self-employed provider if the department or its designee, because of circumstances specified in division (C)(2)(a) of this section, is required to refuse to issue or award a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to the self-employed provider or to revoke or terminate the self-employed provider's certificate or contract or grant. If a self-employed provider for whom a criminal records check request is required by this section does not present proof of having been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date the criminal records check is requested or provide evidence that within that five-year period the superintendent has requested information about the self-employed provider from the federal bureau of investigation in a criminal records check, the department or its designee shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as part of the criminal records check. Even if a self-employed provider for whom a criminal records check request is required by this section presents proof of having been a resident of this state for the five-year period, the department or its designee may request that the superintendent include information from the federal bureau of investigation in the criminal records check. (2) The department or its designee shall do all of the following: (a) Provide to each self-employed provider for whom a criminal records check request is required by this section a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section; (b) Obtain the completed form and standard impression sheet from the self-employed provider; (c) Forward the completed form and standard impression sheet to the superintendent. (3) The department or its designee shall pay to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation the fee prescribed pursuant to division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code for each criminal records check of a self-employed provider the department or its designee requests under this section. The department or its designee may charge the self-employed provider a fee that does not exceed the amount the department or its designee pays to the bureau. (G) The report of any criminal records check of a self-employed provider conducted pursuant to a request made under this section is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person other than the following: (1) The self-employed provider or the self-employed provider's representative; (2) The department of aging, the department's designee, or a representative of the department or its designee; (3) The medicaid director and the staff of the department of medicaid who are involved in the administration of the medicaid program if the self-employed provider is to provide, or provides, community-based long-term care services under a component of the medicaid program that the department of aging administers; (4) A court or hearing officer involved in a case dealing with any of the following: (a) A refusal to issue or award a community-based long-term services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to the self-employed provider; (b) A revocation or termination of the self-employed provider's community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant; (c) A civil or criminal action regarding a program the department of aging administers. (5) Pursuant to a lawful subpoena or valid court order, any necessary individual not identified in division (G)(4) of this section who is involved in a case dealing with any issue, matter, or action described in division (G)(4)(a), (b), or (c) of this section. (H) In a tort or other civil action for damages that is brought as the result of an injury, death, or loss to person or property caused by a self-employed provider, both of the following shall apply: (1) If the department of aging or its designee, in good faith and reasonable reliance on the report of a criminal records check requested under this section, issued or awarded a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to the self-employed provider or did not revoke or terminate the self-employed provider's certificate or contract or grant, the department and its designee shall not be found negligent solely because of its reliance on the report, even if the information in the report is determined later to have been incomplete or inaccurate. (2) If the department or its designee in good faith issued or awarded a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to the self-employed provider or did not revoke or terminate the self-employed provider's certificate or contract or grant because the self-employed provider meets standards specified in rules adopted under this section, the department and its designee shall not be found negligent solely because the self-employed provider has been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. (I) The director of aging shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. (1) The rules may do the following: (a) Require self-employed providers who have been issued or awarded community-based long-term care services certificates or community-based long-term care services contracts or grants to undergo database reviews and criminal records checks under this section; (b) If the rules require self-employed providers who have been issued or awarded community-based long-term care services certificates or community-based long-term care services contracts or grants to undergo database reviews and criminal records checks under this section, exempt one or more classes of such self-employed providers from the requirements; (c) For the purpose of division (E)(7) of this section, specify other databases that are to be checked as part of a database review conducted under this section. (2) The rules shall specify all of the following: (a) The procedures for conducting database reviews under this section; (b) If the rules require self-employed providers who have been issued or awarded community-based long-term care services certificates or community-based long-term care services contracts or grants to undergo database reviews and criminal records checks under this section, the times at which the database reviews and criminal records checks are to be conducted; (c) If the rules specify other databases to be checked as part of the database reviews, the circumstances under which the department of aging or its designee is required to refuse to issue or award a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to a self-employed provider or to revoke or terminate a self-employed provider's certificate or contract or grant when the self-employed provider is found by a database review to be included in one or more of those databases; (d) Standards that a self-employed provider must meet for the department or its designee to be permitted to issue or award a community-based long-term care services certificate or community-based long-term care services contract or grant to the self-employed provider or not to revoke or terminate the self-employed provider's certificate or contract or grant if the self-employed provider is found by a criminal records check required by this section to have been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. Sec. 173.391. (A) Subject to section 173.381 of the Revised Code and except as provided in division (I) of this section, the department of aging or its designee shall do all of the following in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code: (1) Certify a provider to provide services, including community-based long-term care services, under a program the department administers if the provider satisfies the requirements for certification established by rules adopted under division (B) of this section and pays the fee, if any, established by rules adopted under division (G) of this section; (2) When required to do so by rules adopted under division (B) of this section, take one or more of the following disciplinary actions against a provider certified under division (A)(1) of this section: (a) Issue a written warning; (b) Require the submission of both of the following: a plan of correction or and evidence of compliance with requirements identified by the department; (c) Suspend referrals; (d) Remove clients; (e) Impose a fiscal sanction such as a civil monetary penalty or an order that unearned funds be repaid; (f) Suspend the certification; (g) Revoke the certification; (h) Impose another sanction. (3) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, hold hearings when there is a dispute between the department or its designee and a provider concerning actions the department or its designee takes regarding a decision not to certify the provider under division (A)(1) of this section or a disciplinary action under divisions (A)(2)(e) to (h) of this section. (B) The director of aging shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing certification requirements and standards for determining which type of disciplinary action to take under division (A)(2) of this section in individual situations. The rules shall establish procedures for all of the following: (1) Ensuring that providers comply with sections 173.38 and 173.381 of the Revised Code; (2) Evaluating the services provided by the providers to ensure that the services are provided in a quality manner advantageous to the individual receiving the services; (3) In a manner consistent with section 173.381 of the Revised Code, determining when to take disciplinary action under division (A)(2) of this section and which disciplinary action to take; (4) Determining what constitutes another sanction for purposes of division (A)(2)(h) of this section. (C) The procedures established in rules adopted under division (B)(2) of this section shall require that all of the following be considered as part of an evaluation described in division (B)(2) of this section: (1) The provider's experience and financial responsibility; (2) The provider's ability to comply with standards for the services, including community-based long-term care services, that the provider provides under a program the department administers; (3) The provider's ability to meet the needs of the individuals served; (4) Any other factor the director considers relevant. (D) The rules adopted under division (B)(3) of this section shall specify that the reasons disciplinary action may be taken under division (A)(2) of this section include good cause, including misfeasance, malfeasance, nonfeasance, confirmed abuse or neglect, financial irresponsibility, or other conduct the director determines is injurious, or poses a threat, to the health or safety of individuals being served. (E) Subject to division (F) of this section, the department is not required to hold hearings under division (A)(3) of this section if any of the following conditions apply: (1) Rules adopted by the director of aging pursuant to this chapter require the provider to be a party to a provider agreement; hold a license, certificate, or permit; or maintain a certification, any of which is required or issued by a state or federal government entity other than the department of aging, and either of the following is the case: (a) The provider agreement has not been entered into or the license, certificate, permit, or certification has not been obtained or maintained. (b) The provider agreement, license, certificate, permit, or certification has been denied, revoked, not renewed, or suspended or has been otherwise restricted. (2) The provider's certification under this section has been denied, suspended, or revoked for any of the following reasons: (a) A government entity of this state, other than the department of aging, has terminated or refused to renew any of the following held by, or has denied any of the following sought by, a provider: a provider agreement, license, certificate, permit, or certification. Division (E)(2)(a) of this section applies regardless of whether the provider has entered into a provider agreement in, or holds a license, certificate, permit, or certification issued by, another state. (b) The provider or a principal owner or manager of the provider who provides direct care has entered a guilty plea for, or has been convicted of, an offense materially related to the medicaid program. (c) A The provider or a principal owner or manager of the provider who provides direct care has entered a guilty plea for, been convicted of, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense listed or described in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (e) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, but only if the provider, principal owner, or manager does not meet standards specified by the director in rules adopted under section 173.38 of the Revised Code. (d) The department or its designee is required by section 173.381 of the Revised Code to deny or revoke the provider's certification. (e) The United States department of health and human services has taken adverse action against the provider and that action impacts the provider's participation in the medicaid program. (f) The provider has failed to enter into or renew a provider agreement with either of the following: the department or the PASSPORT administrative agency, as that term is defined in section 173.42 of the Revised Code, that administers programs on behalf of the department of aging in the region of the state in which the provider is certified to provide services. (g) The provider has not billed or otherwise submitted a claim to the department for payment under the medicaid program in at least two years. (h) The provider denied or failed to provide the department or its designee access to the provider's facilities during the provider's normal business hours for purposes of conducting an audit or structural compliance review. (i) The provider has ceased doing business. (j) The provider has voluntarily relinquished its certification for any reason. (3) The provider's provider agreement with the department of medicaid has been suspended under section 5164.36 of the Revised Code. (4) The provider's provider agreement with the department of medicaid is denied or revoked because the provider or its owner, officer, authorized agent, associate, manager, or employee has been convicted of an offense that caused the provider agreement to be suspended under section 5164.36 of the Revised Code. (F) If the department does not hold hearings when any condition described in division (E) of this section applies, the department shall send a notice to the provider describing a decision not to certify the provider under division (A)(1) of this section or the disciplinary action the department is taking under divisions (A)(2)(e) to (h) of this section. The notice shall be sent to the provider's address that is on record with the department and may be sent by regular or electronic mail. (G) The director of aging may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing a fee to be charged by the department of aging or its designee for certification issued under division (A) of this section. (H) Any amounts collected by the department or its designee under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the provider certification fund, which is hereby created. Money credited to the fund shall be used to pay for services, including community-based long-term care services, to pay for administrative costs associated with provider certification under this section, and to pay for administrative costs related to the publication of the Ohio long-term care consumer guide. (I) The director shall certify a provider in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code if either of the following applies: (1) The provider is licensed or certified in another state. (2) The provider has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a provider of community-based long-term care services under a state program in a state that does not issue that license or certificate. Sec. 173.50. (A) Pursuant to a contract entered into with the department of medicaid as an interagency agreement under section 5162.35 of the Revised Code, the department of aging shall carry out the day-to-day administration of the component of the medicaid program known as the program of all-inclusive care for the elderly or PACE. The department of aging shall carry out its PACE administrative duties in accordance with the provisions of the interagency agreement and all applicable federal laws, including the "Social Security Act," section 1934, 42 U.S.C. 1396u-4. (B) To the extent authorized by rules authorized by section 5162.021 of the Revised Code, the director of aging may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code regarding the PACE program, including rules establishing priorities for enrolling in the program pursuant to section sections 173.501 and 173.503 of the Revised Code. The rules shall address only those issues that are not addressed in rules adopted by the medicaid director for the PACE program. Sec. 173.503. The department of aging shall seek to implement a presumptive eligibility component to the PACE program, under which applicants for PACE may receive services under the program during a temporary period, to begin immediately upon application and a finding of presumptive eligibility, while a PACE organization conducts a full eligibility determination on behalf of the individual. If the individual is determined to be ineligible for PACE, the PACE organization that found the individual presumptively eligible shall be responsible for the costs of PACE services provided to the individual during the presumptive eligibility period. Sec. 173.525. (A)(1) In addition to any other eligibility requirement of this chapter, to be eligible to serve as a personal care aide under the PASSPORT program, an individual must successfully complete thirty hours of pre-service training acceptable to the department of aging. To maintain eligibility, each personal care aide must successfully complete six hours of in-service training acceptable to the department. Such training must be completed every twelve months. (2) In administering the PASSPORT program, the department shall not require a personal care aide to do either any of the following: (a) Complete more than thirty hours of pre-service training; (b) Complete more than six hours of in-service training in a twelve-month period. (B) The department shall not require an individual serving as a home health aide under the PASSPORT program to complete ; (c) Complete more hours of pre-service training or annual in-service training than required by federal law. (C)(B) Only the following may supervise a home health aide or personal care aide under the PASSPORT program: (1) A registered nurse; (2) A licensed practical nurse under the direction of a chiropractor, dentist, optometrist, physician, physician assistant, podiatrist, or registered nurse. Sec. 175.16. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Federal credit" means the tax credit authorized under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. (2) "Credit period," "qualified low-income building," and "qualified basis" have the same meanings as in section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. (3) "Qualified project" means a qualified low-income building that is located in Ohio, is placed in service on or after July 1, 2023, and for which the director reserves a tax credit under division (B) of this section before July 1, 2027. (4) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (5) "Project owner" means a person holding a fee simple interest or a leasehold interest pursuant to a ground lease in the land on which a qualified project sits. (6) "Reserved credit amount" means the amount determined by the director and stipulated in the notice sent to each owner of a qualified project under division (B) of this section. (7) "Annual credit amount" means the amount computed by the director under division (D) of this section prior to issuing an eligibility certificate. (8) "Equity owner" means a direct or indirect owner of a project owner, provided the project owner is a pass-through entity, as determined under applicable state law governing such an entity. (9) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 5701.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Eligibility certificate" means a certificate issued by the director to each owner of a qualified project under division (D) of this section stating the amount of credit that may be claimed for each year of the credit period. (11) "Qualified allocation plan" means the plan developed by the Ohio housing finance agency, as required under section 175.06 of the Revised Code, for evaluating and selecting projects for the federal credit pursuant to the mandates and requirements within section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code. (12) "Internal Revenue Code" has the same meaning as in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (13) "Designated reporter" means the project owner or one of the project owner's equity owners designated pursuant to division (I)(1) of this section. (14) "Director" means the executive director of the Ohio housing finance agency. (B) Except as otherwise provided by this division, the director, upon allocating a federal credit and issuing a binding reservation or letter of eligibility, pursuant to the Ohio housing finance agency's qualified allocation plan, for a qualified low-income building that is located in this state and placed in service on or after July 1, 2023, may reserve a tax credit under this section for the project owners so long as doing so will not result in exceeding the annual credit cap prescribed by division (C) of this section. The director shall not reserve a tax credit under this section after June 30, 2027. The director shall send written notice of the reservation to each project owner. The notice shall state the aggregate credit amount reserved for all years of the qualified project's credit period and stipulate that receipt of the credit is contingent upon issuance of an eligibility certificate and filing the information described in division (I) of this section. Upon receipt of that notice, the owner shall provide the identity of the owner's designated reporter to the director. The director shall determine the credit amount reserved for each qualified project. The reserved credit amount shall not exceed the amount necessary, when combined with the federal credit, to ensure the financial feasibility of the qualified project. The director shall reserve credits in a manner that ensures that a qualified project is creating additional housing units that would not have otherwise been created with other state, federal, or private financing. The director may assess application, processing, and reporting fees to cover the cost of administering the tax credit authorized under this section. (C) The aggregate amount of credits reserved by the director under division (B) of this section in a fiscal year shall not exceed the sum of (1) one hundred million dollars, (2) the amount, if any, by which the credit cap prescribed by this division for the preceding fiscal year exceeds the credits reserved by the director in that year, and (3) the amount of tax credits recaptured or otherwise disallowed under division (G) of this section in the preceding fiscal year. For the purpose of computing and determining compliance with the credit cap prescribed by this division, the credit amount reserved for the project owners of a qualified project is the full amount for all years of the qualified project's credit period. (D) Immediately after approving the final cost certification for a qualified project for which a tax credit under this section is reserved, or upon otherwise determining the qualified basis of the qualified project and the date it was placed into service as required by section 42(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, the director shall compute the annual credit amount and issue an eligibility certificate to each project owner. The director shall send copies of all eligibility certificates issued each calendar year to the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance. The annual credit amount shall equal the lesser of the following: (1) The amount of the federal credit that would be awarded to the project owners for the first year of the credit period if not for the adjustment required under section 42(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code; (2) One-tenth of the reserved credit amount stated in the notice issued under division (B) of this section. (E) Each eligibility certificate shall state the annual credit amount, the years that comprise the credit period, the name, address, and taxpayer identification number of each project owner, each owner's designated reporter, the date the certificate is issued, a unique identifying number, and any additional information prescribed by a rule adopted under division (H) of this section. A project owner, if the project owner is a pass-through entity, shall provide a copy of the eligibility certificate and any information described in division (I) of this section to each equity owner that has been allocated a credit under division (F)(2) of this section, if requested. (F)(1) For each year of a qualified project's credit period, the project owner or an equity owner may claim a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5725.18, 5726.02, 5729.03, 5729.06, or 5747.02 of the Revised Code equal to all or a portion of the annual credit amount stated on the eligibility certificate. The credit shall be claimed in the manner prescribed by section 5725.36, 5726.58, 5729.19, or 5747.83 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (2) If a project owner is a pass-through entity, the annual credit amount for any year of a qualified project's credit period may be allocated by the project owner among one or more equity owners and may be applied by those equity owners against more than one tax, but the total credits claimed in connection with that year of the qualified project's credit period by all project owners and equity owners against all taxes shall not exceed the annual credit amount stated on the eligibility certificate. (3) A project owner or equity owner may claim the credit authorized by this section after the date the qualified project is placed into service but not before the director issues the project owner an eligibility certificate under division (D) of this section and the applicable report required by division (I) of this section is filed by the designated reporter. (4) A project owner or equity owner that claims a tax credit under division (F)(1) of this section shall submit a copy of the eligibility certificate with the project owner's or equity owner's tax return or report. Upon request of the tax commissioner or the superintendent of insurance, any project owner or equity owner claiming a tax credit under this section shall provide the commissioner or superintendent other documentation that may be necessary to verify that the project owner or equity owner is entitled to claim the credit. (5) A project owner that is a pass-through entity may allocate the credit authorized by this section to its equity owners under division (F)(2) of this section in any manner agreed to by such persons regardless of whether such equity owners are eligible for an allocation of the federal credit, whether the allocation of the credit under the terms of the agreement has substantial economic effect within the meaning of section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, and whether any such person is deemed a partner of the project owner or equity owner for federal income tax purposes as long as the equity owner acquired its ownership interest prior to claiming the credit. The allocation shall be allowed without regard to any provision of the Internal Revenue Code, or regulation promulgated pursuant to it, that may be interpreted as contrary to the allocation, including, without limitation, the treatment of the allocation as a disguised sale. An equity owner may assign all or any part of its interest in a qualified project, including its interest in the tax credits authorized by this section, to one or more other equity owners, and each assignee shall be able to claim the credit so long as its interest is acquired prior to the filing of its tax return or report or amended tax return or report claiming the credit and the assignee's ownership interest is identified in the report required by division (I) of this section. (6) Nothing in this section or section 5725.36, 5726.58, 5729.19, or 5747.83 of the Revised Code allows the assignment or transfer of any carryforward of the credit authorized under this section once the annual credit amount is claimed. (G) If any portion of the federal credit allocated to a qualified project is recaptured under section 42(j) of the Internal Revenue Code or is otherwise disallowed, the director shall recapture a proportionate amount of the tax credit claimed pursuant to this section in connection with the same qualified project. If the director determines to recapture such a tax credit, the director shall certify the name of each project owner and the amount to be recaptured to the tax commissioner and to the superintendent of insurance. The commissioner or superintendent shall determine the taxpayer or taxpayers that claimed the credit, the tax against which the credit was claimed, and the amount to be recaptured and make an assessment against the taxpayer or taxpayers under Chapter 5725., 5726., 5729., or 5747. of the Revised Code, as applicable, for the amount of the tax credit to be recaptured. The time limitations on assessments under those chapters do not bar an assessment made under this division. (H) The director, in consultation with the tax commissioner and superintendent of insurance, shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (I)(1) For each calendar year, a designated reporter shall provide the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner in consultation with the superintendent of insurance, all of the following: (a) The name, address, and taxpayer identification number of each project owner and equity owner that has been allocated a portion of the annual credit awarded on the eligibility certificate for that year; (b) The amount of the annual credit allocated to each such project owner and equity owner for such year and the tax against which the credit will be claimed; (c) The total of the amounts listed for each project owner and equity owner under division (I)(1)(b) of this section, demonstrating that the total does not exceed the amount listed on the eligibility certificate for that year. (2) A designated reporter shall notify the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance of any changes to the information reported in division (I)(1) of this section in the time and manner prescribed by the commissioner and superintendent. (3) No credit allocated under this section may be claimed by a project owner or equity owner for a year unless that owner and the amount of the credit allocated to that owner appear on the report required by division (I)(1) of this section for that year. The tax commissioner shall provide a copy of the report, and any subsequent changes to the report, submitted by the designated reporter under division (I) of this section to the superintendent of insurance in the time and manner agreed to by the commissioner and superintendent. Sec. 175.17. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Qualified project" means a project to develop single-family dwellings in this state that satisfies any qualifications established by the director under division (I) of this section. (2) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (3) "Reserved credit amount" means the amount determined by the director and stipulated in the notice sent under division (B) of this section. (4) "Annual credit amount" means the amount computed by the director under division (D) of this section before issuing an eligibility certificate. (5) "Equity owner" means any person who directly or indirectly, through one or more pass-through entities, is a member, partner, or shareholder of a pass-through entity. (6) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 5701.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Eligibility certificate" means a certificate issued by the director to a project development owner under division (D) of this section. (8) "Project development owner" means a unit of government that owns a qualified project. (9) "Affordability period" means the period that commences on the date of sale of a single-family dwelling constructed as part of a qualified project to the initial qualified buyer and continues through subsequent qualified buyers for ten years. (10) "Designated reporter" means the project development owner or one of the owner's direct or indirect partners, members, or shareholders, as selected by the owner under division (B) of this section. (11) "Project development investor" means any person that contributes capital to a qualified project in exchange for an allocation of a tax credit under this section. (12) "Credit period" means the ten-year period that begins in the year the eligibility certificate is issued. (13) "Director" means the executive director of the Ohio housing finance agency. (14) "Unit of government" means a county, township, municipal corporation, regional planning commission, community improvement corporation, economic development corporation, or county land reutilization corporation organized under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code, or port authority. (15) "Project development team" means the group of entities that develops, constructs, reports, appraises, finances, and services the associated properties of a qualified project in partnership with the project development owner. (B)(1) A project development owner may submit an application to the director for a credit reservation under this section on a form and in a manner that the director shall prescribe. On the application, the project development owner shall provide all of the following: (a) The name and address of the project development owner's designated reporter; (b) The names and addresses of all members of the project development team; (c) An estimate of the qualified project's development costs; (d) Any other information as the director may require pursuant to division (I) of this section. The director shall competitively evaluate and approve applications and award tax credit reservations under this section for a qualified project in accordance with the plan adopted under division (I)(1) of this section. The director shall determine the credit amount reserved for each qualified project, which shall not exceed the difference between the total estimated development costs included with the application and the appraised market value of all homes in the finished project, as estimated by the director. The director shall not reserve a credit under this section if doing so would exceed the annual limit prescribed by division (B)(3) of this section. (2) The director shall send written notice of the tax credit reservation to the project development owner of an approved qualified project. The notice shall state the aggregate credit amount reserved for all years of the qualified project's credit period and stipulate that receipt of the credit is contingent upon issuance of an eligibility certificate and filing the information required by division (H) of this section. (3) The amount of credits reserved by the director under division (B) of this section in a fiscal year shall not exceed the sum of (a) fifty million dollars, (b) the amount, if any, by which the credit allocation prescribed by this division for the preceding fiscal year exceeds the credits reserved by the director in that year, and (c) the amount of tax credits recaptured, assessed, and collected by the tax commissioner or superintendent of insurance, and disallowed or subject to reduction under this section in the preceding fiscal year. For the purpose of computing and determining compliance with the credit allocation prescribed by division (B)(3) of this section, the credit amount reserved for the project development owner is the full amount for all years of the qualified project's credit period. (4) The director shall not reserve a tax credit under this section after June 30, 2027. (C) The project development owner shall maintain ownership of a qualified project and associated single-family dwellings until the dwellings are sold to qualified buyers. The project development team shall service the associated properties of a qualified project for the duration of the applicable affordability period. The qualified buyer of a single-family home constructed as part of a qualified project for which a tax credit was reserved under this section shall occupy the home as the buyer's primary residence during the affordability period. (D) Upon completion of a qualified project for which a tax credit was reserved under this section, the project development owner shall notify the director and provide a final development cost certification for approval. After receipt of this notice, the director shall appraise the project's dwellings. Immediately after approving the final cost certification, the director shall compute the amount of the tax credit that may be claimed in each year and issue an eligibility certificate to the project development owner. That annual amount, which shall be stated on the certificate, shall equal one-tenth of the reserved credit amount stated in the notice issued under division (B) of this section, subject to any reduction or increase as the result of the approval of the final cost certification and the appraisal conducted under this division. (E) Each eligibility certificate shall state the annual credit amount, the years that comprise the credit period, the name, address, and the taxpayer identification number of the project development owner, the project development owner's designated reporter, and all members of the project development team along with the date the certificate is issued, a unique identifying number, and any additional information the director may require by rule. The director shall certify a copy of each eligibility certificate to the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance. (F)(1) For each year of a qualified project's credit period, a project development owner may claim a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5725.18, 5726.02, 5729.03, 5729.06, or 5747.02 of the Revised Code equal to all or a portion of the annual credit amount listed on the eligibility certificate. The credit shall be claimed in the manner prescribed by section 5725.37, 5726.60, 5729.20, or 5747.84 of the Revised Code. (2) A project development owner may or, if the owner is not subject to any tax against which the credit authorized under this section may be claimed, shall allocate all or a portion of the annual credit amount for any year of a qualified project's credit period among one or more project development investors. Such allocated credits may be applied by those project development investors or the equity owners of such an investor that is a pass-through entity against more than one tax, as applicable, but the total credits claimed for that year of the qualified project's credit period by all project development investors and equity owners shall not exceed the annual credit amount stated on the eligibility certificate. (3) A project development investor or the equity owner of such an investor that is a pass-through entity may claim the credit authorized by this section after the date the director issues an eligibility certificate under division (D) of this section and the applicable annual report required by division (H) of this section is filed by the designated reporter. (4) A project development investor or equity owner that claims a tax credit under division (F)(2) of this section shall submit a copy of the eligibility certificate with the investor's or equity owner's tax return. Upon request of the tax commissioner or the superintendent of insurance, any project development investor or equity owner claiming a tax credit under that division shall provide the tax commissioner or superintendent other documentation that may be necessary to verify that the project development investor or equity owner is entitled to claim the credit. (G) The director may disallow or recapture any portion of a credit if the project development owner or the project development owner's qualified project does not or ceases to qualify for the credit. If the director determines to recapture such a tax credit, the director shall certify the name of the project development owner, and the amount to be recaptured to the tax commissioner and to the superintendent of insurance. The tax commissioner or superintendent shall determine the taxpayer or taxpayers that claimed the credit, the tax against which the credit was claimed, and the amount to be recaptured and make an assessment against the taxpayer or taxpayers under Chapter 5725., 5726., 5729., or 5747. of the Revised Code, as applicable, for the amount to be recaptured. The time limitations on assessments under those chapters do not bar an assessment made under this division. (H) For each calendar year, a designated reporter shall provide the following information to the director tax commissioner on a form prescribed by the director commissioner in consultation with the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance: (1) A list of each project development investor or equity owner that has been allocated a portion of the annual credit awarded in an eligibility certificate for that year, including the investor or owner's name, address, taxpayer identification number, and the tax against which the credit will be claimed by each. (2) For each project development investor or equity owner, the amount of annual credit that has been allocated for that year. (3) An aggregate list of the credit amount allocated for a qualified project demonstrating that the aggregate annual amount of the credits allocated does not exceed the aggregate annual credit awarded in the eligibility certificate. A designated reporter shall notify the director tax commissioner of any changes to the information reported under division (H) of this section in the time and manner prescribed by the directorcommissioner. The director commissioner shall provide a copy of the report, and any subsequent changes to the report, submitted by the designated reporter under division (H) of this section to the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance in the time and manner prescribed agreed to by the commissioner and superintendent. No credits allocated under this section may be claimed unless the credits are listed on the report required by division (H) of this section. (I)(1) The director shall adopt a plan for competitively awarding tax credits under this section. The plan shall establish the criteria and metrics under which projects will be assessed for qualification and may allocate tax credits in a pooled manner. (2) The director may assess application, processing, and reporting fees to cover the cost of administering this section. (3) The director, in consultation with the tax commissioner and the superintendent of insurance, shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this section in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Such rules may include all of the following: (a) Supplementary definitions as may be necessary to administer this section. (b) Underwriting criteria to assess the risk associated with any application and determine appropriate criteria to deny an application based upon risk. (c) Criteria by which a project development owner shall be responsible for any or all risk associated with a qualified project such as homeowner abandonment, default, foreclosure, or other such risks. (d) Criteria to maintain the affordability of each of a qualified project's single-family dwellings during the affordability period, which may include a deed restriction held by the project development owner for some or all of the amount of the tax credit or any appreciated value of the property. (e) Requirements that the project development owner provide certain capital assets or other investments that contribute to the affordability of the project. (f) Criteria to be used in determining whether an individual is a qualified buyer. (g) Criteria regarding the purchase, ownership, and sale of completed qualified project single-family dwellings. (h) The manner of determining the project's development costs and the appraised market value of qualified project single-family dwellings. (i) Any other qualifications a project must meet to qualify as a qualified project. Sec. 303.12. (A)(1) Amendments to the zoning resolution may be initiated by motion of the county rural zoning commission, by the passage of a resolution by the board of county commissioners, or by the filing of an application by one or more of the owners or lessees of property within the area proposed to be changed or affected by the proposed amendment with the county rural zoning commission. The board of county commissioners may require that the owner or lessee of property filing an application to amend the zoning resolution pay a fee to defray the cost of advertising, mailing, filing with the county recorder, and other expenses. If the board of county commissioners requires such a fee, it shall be required generally, for each application. The board of county commissioners, upon the passage of such a resolution, shall certify it to the county rural zoning commission. (2) Upon the adoption of a motion by the county rural zoning commission, the certification of a resolution by the board of county commissioners to the commission, or the filing of an application by property owners or lessees as described in division (A)(1) of this section with the commission, the commission shall set a date for a public hearing, which date shall not be less than twenty nor more than forty days from the date of adoption of such a motion, the date of the certification of such a resolution, or the date of the filing of such an application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the commission by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing, using at least one of the following methods: (a) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in each township affected by the proposed amendment; (b) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (c) On the web site and social media account of the county. (B) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land, as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, written notice of the hearing shall be mailed by the county rural zoning commission, by first class mail, at least ten days before the date of the public hearing to all owners of property within and contiguous to and directly across the street from the area proposed to be rezoned or redistricted to the addresses of those owners appearing on the county auditor's current tax list. The failure of delivery of that notice shall not invalidate any such amendment. (C) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published and mailed notices shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the county rural zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, resolution, or application is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of these properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, resolution, or application proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the public hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of county commissioners for its action; (8) Any other information requested by the commission. (D) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the county rural zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of county commissioners for its action; (6) Any other information requested by the commission. Hearings shall be held in the county court house or in a public place designated by the commission. (E) Within five days after the adoption of the motion described in division (A) of this section, the certification of the resolution described in division (A) of this section, or the filing of the application described in division (A) of this section, the county rural zoning commission shall transmit a copy of it together with text and map pertaining to it to the county or regional planning commission, if there is such a commission. The county or regional planning commission shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment or the approval of some modification of it and shall submit its recommendation to the county rural zoning commission. The recommendation shall be considered at the public hearing held by the county rural zoning commission on the proposed amendment. The county rural zoning commission, within thirty days after the hearing, shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment, or the approval of some modification of it, and shall submit that recommendation together with the motion, application, or resolution involved, the text and map pertaining to the proposed amendment, and the recommendation of the county or regional planning commission on it to the board of county commissioners. The board of county commissioners, upon receipt of that recommendation, shall set a time for a public hearing on the proposed amendment, which date shall be not more than thirty days from the date of the receipt of that recommendation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the board by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing, using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in the county; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the county. (F) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of county commissioners that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of those properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, application, or resolution proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) Any other information requested by the board. (G) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of county commissioners that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) Any other information requested by the board. (H) Within twenty days after its public hearing, the board of county commissioners shall either adopt or deny the recommendation of the county rural zoning commission or adopt some modification of it. If the board denies or modifies the commission's recommendation, a majority vote of the board shall be required. The Except as provided in division (I) of this section, the proposed amendment, if adopted by the board, shall become effective in thirty days after the date of its adoption, unless, within thirty days after the adoption, there is presented to the board of county commissioners a petition, signed by a number of qualified voters residing in the unincorporated area of the township or part of that unincorporated area included in the zoning plan equal to not less than eight per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in that area at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected, requesting the board to submit the amendment to the electors of that area for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election occurring at least ninety days after the petition is submitted. Each part of this petition shall contain the number and the full and correct title, if any, of the zoning amendment resolution, motion, or application, furnishing the name by which the amendment is known and a brief summary of its contents. In addition to meeting the requirements of this section, each petition shall be governed by the rules specified in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. The form of a petition calling for a zoning referendum and the statement of the circulator shall be substantially as follows: "PETITION FOR ZONING REFERENDUM (if the proposal is identified by a particular name or number, or both, these should be inserted here) ________________________ A proposal to amend the zoning map of the unincorporated area of ______________ Township, ___________________ County, Ohio, adopted _______ (date) __________ (followed by brief summary of the proposal). To the Board of County Commissioners of __________________ County, Ohio: We, the undersigned, being electors residing in the unincorporated area of _______________ Township, included within the _________________ County Zoning Plan, equal to not less than eight per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in the area at the preceding general election at which a governor was elected, request the Board of County Commissioners to submit this amendment of the zoning resolution to the electors of _____________ Township residing within the unincorporated area of the township included in the _______________ County Zoning Resolution, for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election to be held on ________(date)_______, pursuant to section 303.12 of the Revised Code. Street Address Date of Signature or R.F.D. Township Precinct County Signing _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR I, _____________________(name of circulator)___________________, declare under penalty of election falsification that I am an elector of the state of Ohio and reside at the address appearing below my signature; that I am the circulator of the foregoing part petition containing _____(number)_______ signatures; that I have witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of my knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of my knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. _____________________________ (Signature of circulator) _____________________________ - (Address of circulator's - permanent residence in this - state) _____________________________ (City, village, or township, - and zip code) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." No amendment for which such a referendum vote has been requested shall be put into effect unless a majority of the vote cast on the issue is in favor of the amendment. Upon certification by the board of elections that the amendment has been approved by the voters, it shall take immediate effect. Within five working days after an amendment's effective date, the board of county commissioners shall file the text and maps of the amendment in the office of the county recorder and with the regional or county planning commission, if one exists. The failure to file any amendment, or any text and maps, or duplicates of any of these documents, with the office of the county recorder or the county or regional planning commission as required by this section does not invalidate the amendment and is not grounds for an appeal of any decision of the board of zoning appeals. (I) If a proposed amendment establishes or modifies planned-unit development regulations, the following apply in lieu of the contrary provisions of division (H) of this section: (1) The petition shall be signed by a number of registered electors residing in the territory where the planned-unit development regulations apply or will apply equal to not less than thirty-five per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in that territory at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected. (2) The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and validity of the petition not later than thirty days after the petition is certified to the board of elections by the board of county commissioners. (3) If the board of elections determines there is an insufficient number of valid signatures, the board immediately shall notify the person who presented the petition. The person may submit additional signatures not later than ten days after the notification. Sec. 305.021. (A) When there is a vacancy in the county engineer's office as a result of death or resignation and the vacancy cannot be filled by election or appointment as provided in section 305.02 of the Revised Code, or if no one runs for the office of county engineer and, for that reason, the office is vacant, the board of county commissioners may contract with another county's county engineer to exercise the powers and perform the acts, duties, or functions of the county engineer. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the Revised Code or the common law, the same person may serve as the county engineer of more than one county, including adjacent counties, under this section. (B) A county engineer with whom the board contracts shall receive supplemental compensation for services rendered under the contract in an amount equal to that is not less than eighty per cent nor more than one hundred per cent of the compensation specified in sections 325.14 and 325.18 of the Revised Code for the population range of the county in which the engineer is contracted to perform services, prorated for the duration of the contract. The supplemental compensation shall have no effect on the compensation a county engineer receives for serving as county engineer in the county in which the engineer holds office. The duration of the contract shall not extend beyond the last day of the term for which there was a vacancy. Sec. 305.03. (A)(1)(A) Whenever any county officer, except the county auditor or county treasurer, fails to perform the duties of office for ninety thirty consecutive days, except in case of sickness or injury as provided in divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the office shall be deemed vacant. Performing the duties of office includes a county officer appearing in person at the officer's principal office location on at least one out of thirty consecutive days. (2) Whenever any county auditor or county treasurer fails to perform the duties of office for thirty consecutive days, except in case of sickness or injury as provided in divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the office shall be deemed vacant. (B) Whenever any county officer is absent because of sickness or injury, the officer shall cause to be filed with the board of county commissioners a certificate from a physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner of the officer's sickness or injury. If the certificate is not filed with the board within ten days after the expiration of thirty consecutive days, in the case of a county auditor or county treasurer, or within ten days after the expiration of ninety consecutive days of absence, in the case of all other county officers, the office shall be deemed vacant. (C) Whenever a county officer files a certificate under division (B) of this section, but continues to be absent for an additional thirty days commencing immediately after the last day on which this certificate may be filed under division (B) of this section, the office shall be deemed vacant. (D) If at any time two county commissioners in a county are absent and have filed a certificate under division (B) of this section, the county coroner, in addition to performing the duties of coroner, shall serve as county commissioner until at least one of the absent commissioners returns to office or until the office of at least one of the absent commissioners is deemed vacant under this section and the vacancy is filled. If the coroner so requests, the coroner shall be paid a per diem rate for the coroner's service as a commissioner. That per diem rate shall be the annual salary specified by law for a county commissioner of that county whose term of office began in the same year as the coroner's term of office began, divided by the number of days in the year. While the coroner is serving as a county commissioner, the coroner shall be considered an acting county commissioner and shall perform the duties of the office of county commissioner until at least one of the absent commissioners returns to office or until the office of at least one of the absent commissioners is deemed vacant. Before assuming the office of acting county commissioner, the coroner shall take an oath of office as provided in sections 3.22 and 3.23 of the Revised Code. The coroner's service as an acting county commissioner does not constitute the holding of an incompatible public office or employment in violation of any statutory or common law prohibition against the simultaneous holding of more than one public office or employment. The coroner shall give a new bond in the same amount and signed and approved as provided in section 305.04 of the Revised Code. The bond shall be conditioned for the faithful discharge of the coroner's duties as acting county commissioner and for the payment of any loss or damage that the county may sustain by reason of the coroner's failure in those duties. The bond, along with the oath of office and approval of the probate judge indorsed on it, shall be deposited and paid for as provided for the bonds in section 305.04 of the Revised Code. (E) Any vacancy declared under this section shall be filled in the manner provided by section 305.02 of the Revised Code. (F) This section shall not apply to a county officer while in the active military service of the United States. Sec. 306.32. Any county, or any two or more counties, municipal corporations, or townships, or any combination of these, may create a regional transit authority by the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by the board of county commissioners of each county, the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of each township which is to create or to join in the creation of the regional transit authority. The resolution or ordinance shall state: (A) The necessity for the creation of a regional transit authority; (B) The counties, municipal corporations, or townships which are to create or to join in the creation of the regional transit authority; (C) The official name by which the regional transit authority shall be known; (D) The place in which the principal office of the regional transit authority will be located or the manner in which it may be selected; (E) The number, term, and compensation, or method for establishing compensation, of the members of the board of trustees of the regional transit authority. Compensation shall not exceed fifty dollars for each board and committee meeting attended by a member, except that if compensation is provided annually it shall not exceed six thousand dollars for the president of the board or four thousand eight hundred dollars for each other board member. (F) The manner in which vacancies on the board of trustees of the regional transit authority shall be filled; (G) The manner and to what extent the expenses of the regional transit authority shall be apportioned among the counties, municipal corporations, and townships creating it; (H) The purposes, including the kinds of transit facilities, for which the regional transit authority is organized. The regional transit authority provided for in the resolution or ordinance shall be deemed to be created upon the adoption of the resolution or ordinance by the board of county commissioners of each county, the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of each township enumerated in the resolution or ordinance. The resolution or ordinance creating a regional transit authority may be amended to include additional counties, municipal corporations, or townships or for any other purpose, by the adoption of the amendment by the board of county commissioners of each county, the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of each township which has created or joined or proposes to join the regional transit authority. After each county, municipal corporation, and township which has created or joined or proposes to join the regional transit authority has adopted its resolution or ordinance approving inclusion of additional counties, municipal corporations, or townships in the regional transit authority, a copy of each resolution or ordinance shall be filed with the clerk of the board of the county commissioners of each county, the clerk of the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the fiscal officer of the board of trustees of each township proposed to be included in the regional transit authority. The inclusion is effective when all such filing has been completed, unless the regional transit authority to which territory is to be added has authority to levy an ad valorem tax on property, or a sales tax, within its territorial boundaries, in which event the inclusion shall become effective on the sixtieth day after the last such filing is accomplished, unless, prior to the expiration of the sixty-day period, qualified electors residing in the area proposed to be added to the regional transit authority, equal in number to at least ten per cent of the qualified electors from the area who voted for governor at the last gubernatorial election, file a petition of referendum against the inclusion. Any petition of referendum filed under this section shall be filed at the office of the secretary of the board of trustees of the regional transit authority. The person presenting the petition shall be given a receipt containing on it the time of the day, the date, and the purpose of the petition. The secretary of the board of trustees of the regional transit authority shall cause the appropriate board or boards of elections to check the sufficiency of signatures on any petition of referendum filed under this section and, if found to be sufficient, shall present the petition to the board of trustees at a meeting of said board which occurs not later than thirty days following the filing of said petition. Upon presentation to the board of trustees of a petition of referendum against the proposed inclusion, the board of trustees shall promptly certify the proposal to the board or boards of elections for the purpose of having the proposal placed on the ballot at the next general or primary election which occurs not less than ninety days after the date of the meeting of said board, or at a special election, the date of which shall be specified in the certification, which date shall be not less than ninety days after the date of such meeting of the board. Signatures on a petition of referendum may be withdrawn up to and including the meeting of the board of trustees certifying the proposal to the appropriate board or boards of elections. If territory of more than one county, municipal corporation, or township is to be added to the regional transit authority, the electors of the territories of the counties, municipal corporations, or townships which are to be added shall vote as a district, and the majority affirmative vote shall be determined by the vote cast in the district as a whole. If the proposal would extend the levy of an existing property tax to the territory to be added to the regional transit authority, the board of trustees of the regional transit authority and the county auditor shall proceed in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the additional territory has been added to the regional transit authority. Upon certification of a proposal to the appropriate board or boards of elections pursuant to this section, the board or boards of election shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of the question to the electors of the territory to be added to the regional transit authority qualified to vote on the question, and the election shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.191 of the Revised Code, except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within the _________________________ (Name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) be added to __________________________________ (Name) regional transit authority?" and shall a(n) __________ (here insert type of tax or taxes) at a rate not to exceed _____ (here insert maximum tax rate or rates) be levied for all transit purposes?" If the tax is a tax on property, the ballot shall express the levy's estimated annual collections, and the rate shall be expressed numerically in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and the effective rate shall be expressed numerically in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. If the question is approved by at least a majority of the electors voting on the question, the joinder is immediately effective, and the regional transit authority may extend the levy of the tax against all the taxable property within the territory which has been added. If the question is approved at a general election or at a special election occurring prior to the general election but after the fifteenth day of July, the regional transit authority may amend its budget and resolution adopted pursuant to section 5705.34 of the Revised Code, and the levy shall be placed on the current tax list and duplicate and collected as other taxes are collected from all taxable property within the territorial boundaries of the regional transit authority, including the territory within each political subdivision added as a result of the election. The territorial boundaries of a regional transit authority shall be coextensive with the territorial boundaries of the counties, municipal corporations, and townships included within the regional transit authority, provided that the same area may be included in more than one regional transit authority so long as the regional transit authorities are not organized for purposes as provided for in the resolutions or ordinances creating the same, and any amendments to them, relating to the same kinds of transit facilities; and provided further, that if a regional transit authority includes only a portion of an entire county, a regional transit authority for the same purposes may be created in the remaining portion of the same county by resolution of the board of county commissioners acting alone or in conjunction with municipal corporations and townships as provided in this section. No regional transit authority shall be organized after January 1, 1975, to include any area already included in a regional transit authority, except that any regional transit authority organized after June 29, 1974, and having territorial boundaries entirely within a single county shall, upon adoption by the board of county commissioners of the county of a resolution creating a regional transit authority including within its territorial jurisdiction the existing regional transit authority and for purposes including the purposes for which the existing regional transit authority was created, be dissolved and its territory included in such new regional transit authority. Any resolution creating such a new regional transit authority shall make adequate provision for satisfaction of the obligations of the dissolved regional transit authority. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 306.322. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Political subdivision" means a county, a municipal corporation, or a township. (2) "Governing body" means a board of county commissioners of a county, a legislative authority of a municipal corporation, or a board of trustees of a township. (B) For any regional transit authority that levies a property tax and that includes in its membership political subdivisions that are located in a county having a population of at least four hundred thousand according to the most recent federal census, the procedures of this section apply until December 31, 2022, and are in addition to and an alternative to those established in sections 306.32, 306.321, and 306.54 of the Revised Code for joining to the regional transit authority additional political subdivisions. (C) Any political subdivision may adopt a resolution or ordinance proposing to join a regional transit authority described in division (B) of this section. In its resolution or ordinance, the political subdivision may propose joining the regional transit authority for a limited period of three years or without a time limit. (D) The political subdivision proposing to join the regional transit authority shall submit a copy of its resolution or ordinance to the governing body of each political subdivision comprising the regional transit authority. Within thirty days of receiving the resolution or ordinance for inclusion in the regional transit authority, the governing body of each political subdivision shall consider the question of whether to include the additional political subdivision in the regional transit authority, shall adopt a resolution or ordinance approving or rejecting the inclusion of the additional political subdivision, and shall present its resolution or ordinance to the board of trustees of the regional transit authority. If the board of trustees of the regional transit authority proposes to extend the levy of an existing property tax to the territory to be added to the regional transit authority, the board and the county auditor shall proceed in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the additional territory has been added to the regional transit authority. (E) If a majority of the political subdivisions comprising the regional transit authority approve the inclusion of the additional political subdivision under division (D) of this section, the board of trustees of the regional transit authority may proceed as provided in division (K) of this section or as provided in divisions (F) to (J) of this section, as applicable. (F) Not later than the tenth day following the day on which the last ordinance or resolution is presented under division (D) of this section, the board of trustees of the regional transit authority shall notify the political subdivision proposing to join the regional transit authority that it may certify the proposal to the board of elections for the purpose of having the proposal placed on the ballot at the next general election or at a special election conducted on the day of the next primary election that occurs not less than ninety days after the resolution or ordinance is certified to the board of elections. (G) Upon certification of a proposal to the board of elections pursuant to division (F) of this section, the board of elections shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of the question to the electors of the territory to be included in the regional transit authority qualified to vote on the question, and the election shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections for the election of officers of the political subdivision proposing to join the regional transit authority, except that, if the resolution proposed the inclusion without a time limitation the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within the _________________________ (Name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) be added to _________________________ _________ (Name) regional transit authority and shall a(n) __________ (here insert type of tax or taxes) at a rate of taxation not to exceed _____ (here insert maximum tax rate or rates) be levied for all transit purposes?" If the resolution proposed the inclusion with a three-year time limitation, the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within the _________________________ (Name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) be added to _________________________ _________ (Name) regional transit authority for three years and shall a(n) __________ (here insert type of tax or taxes) at a rate of taxation not to exceed _____ (here insert maximum tax rate or rates) be levied for all transit purposes for three years?" In either case, if the tax is a tax on property, the ballot shall express the levy's estimated annual collections, and the rate shall be expressed numerically in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and the effective rate shall be expressed numerically in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. (H) If the question is approved by at least a majority of the electors voting on the question, the addition of the new territory is effective six months from the date of the certification of its passage, and the regional transit authority may extend the levy of the tax against all the taxable property within the territory that was added. If the question is approved at a general election or at a special election occurring prior to the general election but after the fifteenth day of July, the regional transit authority may amend its budget and resolution adopted pursuant to section 5705.34 of the Revised Code, and the levy shall be placed on the current tax list and duplicate and collected as other taxes are collected from all taxable property within the territorial boundaries of the regional transit authority, including the territory within the political subdivision added as a result of the election. If the budget of the regional transit authority is amended pursuant to this paragraph, the county auditor shall prepare and deliver an amended certificate of estimated resources to reflect the change in anticipated revenues of the regional transit authority. (I) If the question is approved by at least a majority of the electors voting on the question, the board of trustees of the regional transit authority immediately shall amend the resolution or ordinance creating the regional transit authority to include the additional political subdivision. (J) If the question approved by a majority of the electors voting on the question added the political subdivision for three years, the territory of the additional political subdivision in the regional transit authority shall be removed from the territory of the regional transit authority three years after the date the territory was added, as determined in the effective date of the election, and shall no longer be a part of that authority without any further action by either the political subdivisions that were included in the authority prior to submitting the question to the electors or of the political subdivision added to the authority as a result of the election. The regional transit authority reduced to its territory as it existed prior to the inclusion of the additional political subdivision shall be entitled to levy and collect any property taxes that it was authorized to levy and collect prior to the enlargement of its territory and for which authorization has not expired, as if the enlargement had not occurred. (K)(1) If a majority of the political subdivisions comprising the regional transit authority approve the inclusion of the additional political subdivision without a time limit under division (D) of this section, the board of trustees of the regional transit authority may adopt a resolution to submit to the electors of the regional transit authority, as it would be enlarged by the inclusion, the question of including the political subdivision in the regional transit authority, of levying a tax under sections 5739.023 and 5741.022 of the Revised Code throughout the territorial boundaries of the regional transit authority as so enlarged, and of repealing the property tax levied by the regional transit authority under section 306.49 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall state all of the following: (a) The date on which the political subdivision is to be included in the regional transit authority; (b) The rate of the tax to be levied under sections 5739.023 and 5741.022 of the Revised Code, the number of years it is to be levied or that it is to be levied for a continuing period of time, and the date on which it shall first be levied, all as provided under section 5739.023 of the Revised Code; (c) The last tax year that the property tax is to be levied under section 306.49 of the Revised Code. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(5) of this section, the political subdivision shall not be joined to the regional transit authority before the first day sales and use tax is levied by the regional transit authority under sections 5739.023 and 5741.022 of the Revised Code. Sales and use tax shall not be levied under those sections on or before the last day of the last tax year the regional transit authority levies property tax under section 306.49 of the Revised Code. (3) The board of trustees of the regional transit authority shall certify the resolution to the board of elections for the purpose of having the proposal placed on the ballot at the next general election or at a special election conducted on the day of the next primary election that occurs not less than ninety days after the resolution is certified to the board of elections. The election shall be held, canvassed, and certified, as provided in section 306.70 of the Revised Code, except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within the _________________ (Name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) be added to _______________ (Name) regional transit authority, shall sales and use tax at a rate not exceeding ________ (Insert tax rate) be levied for all transit purposes throughout the territory of the regional transit authority, and shall the existing property tax levied for transit purposes be repealed?" (4) If the question is approved, the sales and use tax may be levied and collected as is otherwise provided under sections 5739.023 and 5741.022 of the Revised Code on and after the date stated in the resolution. (5) The board of trustees shall appropriate from the first moneys received from the sales and use tax in each year the full amount required in order to pay the principal of and interest on any notes of the regional transit authority issued pursuant to section 306.49 of the Revised Code in anticipation of the collection of the property tax. The board of trustees shall not thereafter levy and collect the property tax unless and to the extent that the levy and collection is necessary to pay the principal of and interest on notes issued in anticipation of the property tax in order to avoid impairing the obligation of the contract between the regional transit authority and the note holders. Such property tax shall be levied only in the territory of the authority as it existed before the political subdivision was joined to the authority. (6) If the question is approved after the fifteenth day of July in any calendar year, the regional transit authority may amend its budget for the current and next fiscal year, and any resolution adopted pursuant to section 5705.34 of the Revised Code, to reflect the imposition of the sales and use tax, and shall amend its budget for the next fiscal year, and any resolution adopted pursuant to section 5705.34 of the Revised Code, to comply with division (K)(5) of this section. If the budget of the regional transit authority is amended pursuant to this division, the county auditor shall prepare and deliver an amended certificate of estimated resources to reflect the change in anticipated revenues of the regional transit authority. (7) If the question is approved, the board of trustees of the regional transit authority immediately shall amend the resolution or ordinance creating the regional transit authority to include the additional political subdivision. (L) As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 306.43. (A) The board of trustees of a regional transit authority or any officer or employee designated by such board may make any contract for the purchase of goods or services, the cost of which does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. When an expenditure, other than for the acquisition of real estate, the discharge of claims, or the acquisition of goods or services under the circumstances described in division (H) of this section, is expected to exceed one hundred thousand dollars, such expenditure shall be made through full and open competition by the use of competitive procedures. The regional transit authority shall use the competitive procedure, as set forth in divisions (B), (C), (D), and (E) of this section, that is most appropriate under the circumstances of the procurement. (B) Competitive sealed bidding is the preferred method of procurement and a regional transit authority shall use that method if all of the following conditions exist: (1) A clear, complete, and adequate description of the goods, services, or work is available; (2) Time permits the solicitation, submission, and evaluation of sealed bids; (3) The award will be made on the basis of price and other price-related factors; (4) It is not necessary to conduct discussions with responding offerors about their bids; (5) There is a reasonable expectation of receiving more than one sealed bid. A regional transit authority shall publish a notice calling for bids once a week for no less than two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the regional transit authority, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. A regional transit authority may require that a bidder for any contract other than a construction contract provide a bid guaranty in the form, quality, and amount considered appropriate by the regional transit authority. The board may let the contract to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder. Where fewer than two responsive bids are received, a regional transit authority may negotiate price with the sole responsive bidder or may rescind the solicitation and procure under division (H)(2) of this section. (C) A regional transit authority may use two-step competitive bidding, consisting of a technical proposal and a separate, subsequent sealed price bid from those submitting acceptable technical proposals, if both of the following conditions exist: (1) A clear, complete, and adequate description of the goods, services, or work is not available, but definite criteria exist for the evaluation of technical proposals; (2) It is necessary to conduct discussions with responding offerors. A regional transit authority shall publish a notice calling for technical proposals once a week for no less than two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the regional transit authority, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. A regional transit authority may require a bid guaranty in the form, quality, and amount the regional transit authority considers appropriate. The board may let the contract to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder. Where fewer than two responsive and responsible bids are received, a regional transit authority may negotiate price with the sole responsive and responsible bidder or may rescind the solicitation and procure under division (H)(2) of this section. (D) A regional transit authority shall make a procurement by competitive proposals if competitive sealed bidding or two-step competitive bidding is not appropriate. A regional transit authority shall publish a notice calling for proposals once a week for no less than two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the regional transit authority, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. A regional transit authority may require a proposal guaranty in the form, quality, and amount considered appropriate by the regional transit authority. The board may let the contract to the proposer making the offer considered most advantageous to the authority. Where fewer than two competent proposals are received, a regional transit authority may negotiate price and terms with the sole proposer or may rescind the solicitation and procure under division (H)(2) of this section. (E)(1) A regional transit authority shall procure the services of an architect or engineer in the manner prescribed by the "Federal Mass Transportation Act of 1987," Public Law No. 100-17, section 316, 101 Stat. 227, 232-234, 49 U.S.C.A. app. 1608 and the services of a construction manager in the manner prescribed by sections 9.33 to 9.332 of the Revised Code. (2) A regional transit authority may procure revenue rolling stock in the manner prescribed by division (B), (C), or (D) of this section. (3) All contracts for construction in excess of one hundred thousand dollars shall be made only after the regional transit authority has published a notice calling for bids once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the regional transit authority, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. The board may award a contract to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder. Where only one responsive and responsible bid is received, the regional transit authority may negotiate price with the sole responsive bidder or may rescind the solicitation. The regional transit authority shall award construction contracts in accordance with sections 153.12 to 153.14 and 153.54 of the Revised Code. Divisions (B) and (C) of this section shall not apply to the award of contracts for construction. (F)(1) As used in division (F)(2) of this section, "simplified acquisition threshold" means the amount set forth in 41 U.S.C. 134. (2) The board may adopt a policy on whether board approval is required to enter into a contract involving expenditures below the simplified acquisition threshold. The board shall approve all contracts involving expenditures at or above the simplified acquisition threshold. (3) All contracts involving expenditures in excess of the amount for which board approval is required shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by or shall refer to plans and specifications for the work to be done. The plans and specifications shall at all times be made and considered part of the contract. For all contracts other than construction contracts, a regional transit authority may require performance, payment, or maintenance guaranties or any combination of such guaranties in the form, quality, and amount it considers appropriate. The contract shall be approved by the board and signed on behalf of the regional transit authority and by the contractor. (G) In making a contract, a regional transit authority may give preference to goods produced in the United States in accordance with the Buy America requirements in the "Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 1982," Public Law No. 97-424, section 165, 96 Stat. 2097, 23 U.S.C.A. 101 note, as amended, and the rules adopted thereunder. The regional transit authority also may give preference to providers of goods produced in and services provided in labor surplus areas as defined by the United States department of labor in 41 U.S.C.A. 401 note, Executive Order No. 12073, August 16, 1978, 43 Fed. Reg. 36873, as amended. (H) Competitive procedures under this section are not required in any of the following circumstances: (1) The board of trustees of a regional transit authority, by a two-thirds affirmative vote of its members, determines that a real and present emergency exists under any of the following conditions, and the board enters its determination and the reasons for it in its proceedings: (a) Affecting safety, welfare, or the ability to deliver transportation services; (b) Arising out of an interruption of contracts essential to the provision of daily transit services; (c) Involving actual physical damage to structures, supplies, equipment, or property. (2) The purchase consists of goods or services, or any combination thereof, and after reasonable inquiry the board or any officer or employee the board designates finds that only one source of supply is reasonably available. (3) The expenditure is for a renewal or renegotiation of a lease or license for telecommunications or electronic data processing equipment, services, or systems, or for the upgrade of such equipment, services, or systems, or for the maintenance thereof as supplied by the original source or its successors or assigns. (4) The purchase of goods or services is made from another political subdivision, public agency, public transit system, regional transit authority, the state, or the federal government, or as a third-party beneficiary under a state or federal procurement contract, or as a participant in a department of administrative services contract under division (B) of section 125.04 of the Revised Code. (5) The sale and leaseback or lease and leaseback of transit facilities is made as provided in division (AA) of section 306.35 of the Revised Code. (6) The purchase substantially involves services of a personal, professional, highly technical, or scientific nature, including but not limited to the services of an attorney, physician, surveyor, appraiser, investigator, court reporter, adjuster, advertising consultant, or licensed broker, or involves the special skills or proprietary knowledge required for the servicing of specialized equipment owned by the regional transit authority. (7) Services or supplies are available from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 4115.31 to 4115.35 section 125.601 of the Revised Code. (8) The purchase consists of the product or services of a public utility. (9) The purchase is for the services of individuals with disabilities to work in the authority's commissaries or cafeterias, and those individuals are supplied by a nonprofit corporation or association whose purpose is to assist individuals with disabilities, whether or not that corporation or association is funded entirely or in part by the federal government, or the purchase is for services provided by a nonprofit corporation or association whose purpose is to assist individuals with disabilities, whether or not that corporation or association is funded entirely or in part by the federal government. For purposes of division (H)(9) of this section, "disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (I) A regional transit authority may enter into blanket purchase agreements for purchases of maintenance, operating, or repair goods or services where the item cost does not exceed five hundred dollars and the annual expenditure does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. (J) Nothing contained in this section prohibits a regional transit authority from participating in intergovernmental cooperative purchasing arrangements. (K) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a regional transit authority shall make a sale or other disposition of property through full and open competition. Except as provided in division (L) of this section, all dispositions of personal property and all grants of real property for terms exceeding five years shall be made by public auction or competitive procedure. (L) The competitive procedures required by division (K) of this section are not required in any of the following circumstances: (1) The grant is a component of a joint development between public and private entities and is intended to enhance or benefit public transit. (2) The grant of a limited use or of a license affecting land is made to an owner of abutting real property. (3) The grant of a limited use is made to a public utility. (4) The grant or disposition is to a department of the federal or state government, to a political subdivision of the state, or to any other governmental entity. (5) Used equipment is traded on the purchase of equipment and the value of the used equipment is a price-related factor in the basis for award for the purchase. (6) The value of the personal property is such that competitive procedures are not appropriate and the property either is sold at its fair market value or is disposed of by gift to a nonprofit entity having the general welfare or education of the public as one of its principal objects. (M) The board of trustees of a regional transit authority, when making a contract funded exclusively by state or local moneys or any combination thereof, shall make a good faith effort to use disadvantaged business enterprise participation to the same extent required under Section 105(f) of the "Surface Transportation Assistance Act of 1982," Public Law No. 97-424, 96 Stat. 2100, and Section 106(c) of the "Surface Transportation and Uniform Relocation Assistance Act of 1987," Public Law No. 100-17, 101 Stat. 145, and the rules adopted thereunder. (N) As used in this section: (1) "Goods" means all things, including specially manufactured goods, that are movable at the time of identification to the contract for sale other than the money in which the price is to be paid, investment securities, and things in action. "Goods" also includes other identified things attached to realty as described in section 1302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) "Services" means the furnishing of labor, time, or effort by a contractor, not involving the delivery of goods or reports other than goods or reports that are merely incidental to the required performance, including but not limited to insurance, bonding, or routine operation, routine repair, or routine maintenance of existing structures, buildings, real property, or equipment, but does not include employment agreements, collective bargaining agreements, or personal services. (3) "Construction" means the process of building, altering, repairing, improving, painting, decorating, or demolishing any structure or building, or other improvements of any kind to any real property owned or leased by a regional transit authority. (4) "Full and open competition" has the same meaning as in the "Office of Federal Procurement Policy Act," Public Law No. 98-369, section 2731, 98 Stat. 1195 (1984), 41 U.S.C.A. 403. (5) A bidder is "responsive" if, applying the criteria of division (A) of section 9.312 of the Revised Code, the bidder is "responsive" as described in that section. (6) A bidder is "responsible" if, applying the criteria of division (B) of section 9.312 of the Revised Code and of the "Office of Federal Procurement Policy Act," Public Law No. 98-369, section 2731, 98 Stat. 1195 (1984), 41 U.S.C.A. 403, the bidder is "responsible" as described in those sections. Sec. 307.05. As used in this section, "emergency medical service organization" has the same meaning as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. A board of county commissioners may operate an ambulance service organization or emergency medical service organization, or, in counties with a population of forty sixty thousand or less, may operate a nonemergency patient transport service organization, or may enter into a contract with one or more counties, townships, municipal corporations, nonprofit corporations, joint emergency medical services districts, fire and ambulance districts, or private ambulance owners, regardless of whether such counties, townships, municipal corporations, nonprofit corporations, joint emergency medical services districts, fire and ambulance districts, or private ambulance owners are located within or without the state, in order to furnish or obtain the services of ambulance service organizations, to furnish or obtain additional services from ambulance service organizations in times of emergency, to furnish or obtain the services of emergency medical service organizations, or, in counties with a population of forty sixty thousand or less, to furnish or obtain services of nonemergency patient transport service organizations, or may enter into a contract with any such entity to furnish or obtain the interchange of services from ambulance or emergency medical service organizations, or, within counties with a population of forty sixty thousand or less, to furnish or obtain the interchange of services from nonemergency patient transport service organizations, within the territories of the contracting subdivisions. Except in the case of a contract with a joint emergency medical services district to obtain the services of emergency medical service organizations, such contracts shall not be entered into with a public agency or nonprofit corporation that receives more than half of its operating funds from governmental entities with the intention of directly competing with the operation of other ambulance service organizations, nonemergency patient transport service organizations, or emergency medical service organizations in the county unless the public agency or nonprofit corporation is awarded the contract after submitting the lowest and best bid to the board of county commissioners. Any county wishing to commence operation of a nonemergency patient transport service organization or wishing to enter into a contract for the first time to furnish or obtain services from a nonemergency patient transport service organization on or after March 1, 1993, including a county in which a private provider has been providing the service, shall demonstrate the need for public funding for the service to, and obtain approval from, the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services or its immediate successor board prior to operating or funding the organization. When such an organization is operated by the board, the organization may be administered by the board, by the county sheriff, or by another county officer or employee designated by the board. All rules, including the determining of reasonable rates, necessary for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of such an organization shall be adopted by the board. A contract for services of an ambulance service, nonemergency patient transport service, or emergency medical service organization shall include the terms, conditions, and stipulations as agreed to by the parties to the contract. It may provide for a fixed annual charge to be paid at the times agreed upon and stipulated in the contract, or for compensation based upon a stipulated price for each run, call, or emergency or the number of persons or pieces of apparatus employed, or the elapsed time of service required in such run, call, or emergency, or any combination thereof. Sec. 307.673. This section applies only in a county in which a tax is levied under section 307.697, 4301.421, 5743.024, or 5743.323 of the Revised Code on July 19, 1995. (A) As used in this section: (1) "County taxes" means taxes levied by a board of county commissioners under division divisions (D) and (E) of section 307.697, division divisions (B) and (C) of section 4301.421, division divisions (C) and (D) of section 5743.024, and section sections 5743.323, 5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code. (2) "Corporation" means a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state and that includes among the purposes for which it is incorporated the authority to acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease, manage, or operate a sports facility. (3) "Cooperative agreement" means an agreement entered into pursuant to this section. (4) "Cost of a sports facility" means the cost of acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, equipping, or improving one or more sports facilities, including reconstructing, rehabilitating, remodeling, and enlarging; the cost of equipping and furnishing such a facility; and all financing costs pertaining thereto, including the cost of engineering, architectural, and other professional services, designs, plans, specifications and surveys, and estimates of costs; the costs of refinancing obligations issued by, or reimbursement of money advanced by, the parties to the cooperative agreement or other persons, the proceeds of which obligations were used to pay the costs of the sports facility; the cost of tests and inspections; the cost of any indemnity or surety bonds and premiums on insurance, all related direct and administrative costs pertaining thereto, fees and expenses of trustees, depositories, and paying agents for the obligations, capitalized interest on the obligations, amounts necessary to establish reserves as required by the obligation proceedings, the reimbursement of money advanced or applied by the parties to the cooperative agreement or other persons for the payment of any item of costs of the sports facility, and all other expenses necessary or incident to planning or determining the feasibility or practicability with respect to the sports facility; and any other such expenses as may be necessary or incident to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, remodeling, renovation, repair, enlargement, improvement, equipping, and furnishing of the sports facility, the financing of the sports facility, placing the sports facility in use and operation, including any one, part of, or combination of such classes of costs and expenses. (5) "Financing costs" has the same meaning as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Obligations" means obligations issued or incurred to pay the cost of a sports facility, including bonds, notes, certificates of indebtedness, commercial paper, and other instruments in writing, anticipatory securities as defined in section 133.01 of the Revised Code, issued or incurred by an issuer pursuant to Chapter 133. or 4582. of the Revised Code or this section, or otherwise, to evidence the issuer's obligation to repay borrowed money, or to pay interest, by, or to pay at any future time other money obligations of, the issuer of the obligations, including obligations of an issuer or lessee to make payments under an installment sale, lease, lease-purchase, or similar agreement. (7) "Owner" means any person that owns or operates a professional athletic or sports team, that is party to a cooperative agreement, or that has a lease or other agreement with a party to a cooperative agreement, and that commits to use the sports facility that is the subject of the cooperative agreement for all of the team's home games for the period specified in that agreement. (8) "Payments," when used with reference to obligations, means payments of the principal, including any mandatory sinking fund deposits and mandatory redemption payments, interest and any redemption premium, and lease rentals, lease-purchase payments and other amounts payable under obligations in the form of installment sale, lease, lease-purchase, or similar agreements. (9) "Person" has the same meaning as defined in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Port authority" means a port authority created under Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code. (11) "Sports facility" means a facility, including a stadium, that is intended to house or provide a site for one or more major league professional athletic or sports teams or activities, together with all spectator facilities, parking facilities, walkways, and auxiliary facilities, real and personal property, property rights, easements, leasehold estates, and interests that may be appropriate for, or used in connection with, the operation of the sports facility. (B) The board of county commissioners of a county, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, a port authority, a corporation, and an owner, or any combination thereof, may enter into one or more cooperative agreements under which the parties enter into one or more of the agreements described in divisions (B)(1) to (5) of this section. (1) The board of county commissioners agrees to do one or more of the following: (a) Levy a tax under division (D) or (E) of section 307.697, division (B) or (C) of section 4301.421, division (C) or (D) of section 5743.024, and or section 5743.323, 5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code and make available all or a portion of the revenue from those taxes for the payment of the cost of the sports facility or to make payments on obligations; (b) Issue or incur obligations of the county pursuant to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code or this section; (c) Make available all or a portion of the revenue from those taxes or of the proceeds from the issuance of those obligations to the municipal corporation, port authority, corporation, or otherwise for the payment of the cost of a sports facility or the payment of obligations; (d) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or management contract with another person, one or more sports facilities; (e) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or a lease with respect to a sports facility, authorize the municipal corporation, port authority, corporation, or owner to administer contracts for designing, planning, acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a sports facility. (2) The port authority agrees to do one or more of the following: (a) Issue or incur obligations of the port authority pursuant to Chapter 133. or 4582. of the Revised Code or this section; (b) Make available all or a portion of the proceeds from the issuance of those obligations to the municipal corporation, county, or corporation for the payment of the cost of a sports facility or the payment of obligations; (c) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or management contract with another person, one or more sports facilities; (d) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or a lease with respect to a sports facility, authorize the municipal corporation, county, corporation, or owner to administer contracts for designing, planning, acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a sports facility. (3) The legislative authority of the municipal corporation agrees to do one or more of the following: (a) Make available the revenue from taxes levied by the legislative authority for the payment of the cost of a sports facility or to make payments on obligations; (b) Issue or incur obligations of the municipal corporation pursuant to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code or otherwise; (c) Make available all or a portion of the proceeds from the issuance of those obligations to the county, port authority, corporation, or otherwise for the payment of the cost of a sports facility or the payment of obligations; (d) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or management contract with another person, one or more sports facilities; (e) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or a lease with respect to a sports facility, authorize the county, port authority, corporation, or owner to administer contracts for designing, planning, acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a sports facility. (4) The corporation agrees to do one or more of the following: (a) Issue or incur obligations; (b) Make available all or a portion of the proceeds from the issuance of those obligations to the county, port authority, municipal corporation, or otherwise for the payment of the cost of a sports facility or the payment of obligations; (c) Acquire, construct, renovate, repair, equip, lease to or from another person, and operate, directly or by a lease or management contract with another person, one or more sports facilities; (d) To the extent provided in the cooperative agreement or a lease with respect to a sports facility, agree that the corporation will administer contracts for designing, planning, acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a sports facility. (5) The owner agrees to do one or more of the following: (a) Use the sports facility that is the subject of the cooperative agreement for all of the home games of the owner's professional athletic or sports team for a specified period; (b) Administer contracts for designing, planning, acquiring, constructing, renovating, repairing, or equipping a sports facility. (C) Any obligations may be secured by a trust agreement between the issuer of obligations and a corporate trustee that is a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company in or outside this state and authorized to exercise corporate trust powers in this state. Proceeds from the issuance of any obligations or the taxes levied and collected by any party to the cooperative agreement may be deposited with and administered by a trustee pursuant to the trust agreement. (D) Any contract for the acquisition, construction, renovation, repair, or equipping of a sports facility entered into, assigned, or assumed under this section shall provide that all laborers and mechanics employed in the acquisition, construction, renovation, repair, or equipping of the sports facility shall be paid at the prevailing rates of wages of laborers and mechanics for the class of work called for, as those wages are determined in accordance with Chapter 4115. of the Revised Code. Sec. 307.696. (A) As used in this section: (1) "County taxes" means taxes levied by the county pursuant to sections 307.697, 4301.421, 5743.024, and 5743.323, 5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code. (2) "Corporation" means a either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation that is organized under the laws of this state for the purposes of operating or constructing and operating a sports facility in the county and that may also be organized under the laws of this state for the additional purposes of conducting redevelopment and economic development activities within the host municipal corporation; (b) A new community authority as defined in section 349.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Sports facility" means a sports facility that is intended to house major league professional athletic teams, including a stadium, together with all parking facilities, walkways, and other auxiliary facilities, real and personal property, property rights, easements, and interests that may be appropriate for, or used in connection with, the operation of the facility. (4) "Construction" includes, but is not limited to, providing fixtures, furnishings, and equipment and providing for capital repairs and improvements. (5) "Debt service charges" means the interest, principal, premium, if any, carrying and redemption charges, and expenses on bonds issued by either the county or the corporation to: (a) Construct a sports facility or provide for related redevelopment or economic development as provided in this section; (b) Acquire real and personal property, property rights, easements, or interests that may be appropriate for, or used in connection with, the operation of the facility; and (c) Make site improvements to real property, including, but not limited to, demolition, excavation, and installation of footers, pilings, and foundations. (6) "Host municipal corporation" means the municipal corporation within the boundaries of which the sports facility is located, and with which a national football league, major league baseball, or national basketball association sports franchise is associated on March 20, 1990. (B) A board of county commissioners of a county that levies a tax under section 307.697, 4301.421, or 5743.024 of the Revised Code may enter into an agreement with a corporation operating in the county, and, if there is a host municipal corporation all or a part of which is located in the county, shall enter into an agreement with a corporation operating in the county and the host municipal corporation, under which: (1)(a) The corporation agrees to construct and operate a sports facility in the county and to pledge and contribute all or any part of the revenues derived from its operation, as specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in division (C)(1) of this section; and (b) The board agrees to levy county taxes and pledge and contribute any part or all of the revenues therefrom, as specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in division (C)(1) of this section; or (2)(a) The corporation agrees to operate a sports facility constructed by the county and to pledge and contribute all or any part of the revenues derived from its operation, as specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in division (C)(2) of this section; and (b) The board agrees to issue revenue bonds of the county, use the proceeds from the sale of the bonds to construct a sports facility in the county, and to levy county taxes and pledge and contribute all or any part of the revenues therefrom, as specified in the agreement, for the purposes described in division (C)(2) of this section; and, if applicable (3) The host municipal corporation agrees to expend the unused pledges and contributions and surplus revenues as described in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section for redevelopment and economic development purposes related to the sports facility. (C)(1) The primary purpose of the pledges and contributions described in division (B)(1) of this section is payment of debt service charges. To the extent the pledges and contributions are not used by the county or corporation for payment of debt service charges, the county or corporation, pursuant to the agreement provided for in division (B) of this section, shall provide the unused pledges and contributions, together with surplus revenues of the sports facility not needed for debt service charges or the operation and maintenance of the sports facility, to the host municipal corporation, or a nonprofit corporation, which may be the corporation acting on behalf of the host municipal corporation, for redevelopment and economic development purposes related to the sports facility. If the county taxes are also levied for the purpose of making permanent improvements, the agreement shall include a schedule of annual pledges and contributions by the county for the payment of debt service charges. The county's pledge and contribution provided for in the agreement shall be for the period stated in the agreement but not to exceed twenty years. The agreement shall provide that any such bonds and notes shall be secured by a trust agreement between the corporation or other bond issuer and a corporate trustee that is a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the state, and the trust agreement shall pledge or assign to the retirement of the bonds or notes, all moneys paid by the county for that purpose under this section. A county tax, all or any part of the revenues from which are pledged under an agreement entered into by a board of county commissioners under this section shall not be subject to diminution by initiative or referendum, or diminution by statute, unless provision is made therein for an adequate substitute therefor reasonably satisfactory to the trustee under the trust agreement that secures the bonds and notes. (2) The primary purpose of the pledges and contributions described in division (B)(2) of this section is payment of debt service charges. To the extent the pledges and contributions are not used by the county for payment of debt service charges, the county or corporation, pursuant to the agreement provided for in division (B) of this section, shall provide the unused pledges and contributions, together with surplus revenues of the sports facility not needed for debt service charges or the operation and maintenance of the sports facility, to the host municipal corporation, or a nonprofit corporation, which may be the corporation, acting on behalf of the host municipal corporation, for redevelopment and economic development purposes related to the sports facility. The corporation's pledge and contribution provided for in the agreement shall be until all of the bonds issued for the construction of the facility have been retired. (D) A pledge of money by a county under this section shall not be indebtedness of the county for purposes of Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. (E) If the terms of the agreement so provide, the board of county commissioners may acquire, make site improvements to, including, but not limited to, demolition, excavation, and installation of footers, pilings, and foundations, and lease real property for the sports facility to a corporation that constructs a sports facility under division (B)(1) of this section. The agreement shall specify the term, which shall not exceed thirty years and shall be on such terms as are set forth in the agreement. The purchase, improvement, and lease may be the subject of an agreement between the county and a municipal corporation located within the county pursuant to section 153.61 or 307.15 of the Revised Code, and are not subject to the limitations of sections 307.02 and 307.09 of the Revised Code. (F) The corporation shall not enter into any construction contract or contract for the purchase of services for use in connection with the construction of a sports facility prior to the corporation's adoption and implementation of a policy on the set aside of contracts for bidding by or award to minority business enterprises, as defined in division (E)(1) of section 122.71 of the Revised Code. Sections 4115.03 to 4115.16 of the Revised Code apply to a sports facility constructed under this section. (G) Not more than one-half of the total costs, including debt service charges and cost of operation, of a project undertaken pursuant to an agreement entered into under division (B) of this section shall be paid from county taxes. Nothing in this section authorizes the use of revenues from county taxes or proceeds from the sale of bonds issued by the board of county commissioners for payment of costs of operation of a sports facility. (H) Division (G) of this section and the twenty-year limitation prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section do not apply in the case of taxes levied pursuant to division (E) of section 307.697 of the Revised Code, division (C) of section 4301.421 of the Revised Code, division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code, division (C) of section 5743.323 of the Revised Code, and sections 5743.511, 5743.521, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or any other section of the Revised Code, revenue from the taxes levied pursuant to those provisions shall be equally divided by the county among the sports facilities that exist within the boundaries of the county during the period that the taxes are levied. Unless documented by an agreement with the applicable owner of a sports facility, such division of revenue shall be made directly by the county treasurer by payment to the respective owners of the sports facilities. Sec. 307.697. (A) For the purpose of section 307.696 of the Revised Code and to pay any or all of the charge the board of elections makes against the county to hold the election on the question of levying the tax, or for those purposes and to provide revenues to the county for permanent improvements, the board of county commissioners of a county may levy a tax not to exceed three dollars on each gallon of spirituous liquor sold to or purchased by liquor permit holders for resale, and sold at retail by the state or pursuant to a transfer agreement entered into under Chapter 4313. of the Revised Code, in the county. The tax shall be levied on the number of gallons so sold. The tax may be levied for any number of years not exceeding twenty. The tax shall be levied pursuant to a resolution of the board of county commissioners approved by a majority of the electors in the county voting on the question of levying the tax, which resolution shall specify the rate of the tax, the number of years the tax will be levied, and the purposes for which the tax is levied. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. If approved by the electors, the tax takes effect on the first day of the month specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. A copy of the resolution levying the tax shall be certified to the division of liquor control at least sixty days prior to the date on which the tax is to become effective. (B) A resolution under this section may be joined on the ballot as a single question with a resolution adopted under section 4301.421 or 5743.024 of the Revised Code to levy a tax for the same purposes, and for the purpose of paying the expenses of administering that tax. (C) The form of the ballot in an election held pursuant to this section or section 4301.421 or 5743.024 of the Revised Code shall be as follows or in any other form acceptable to the secretary of state: "For the purpose of paying not more than one-half of the costs of providing a public sports facility together with related redevelopment and economic development projects, shall (an) excise tax(es) be levied by __________ county at the rate of ______ (dollars on each gallon of spirituous liquor sold in the county, cents per gallon on the sale of beer at wholesale in the county, cents per gallon on the sale of wine and mixed beverages at wholesale in the county, cents per gallon on the sale of cider at wholesale in the county, or mills per cigarette on the sale of cigarettes at wholesale in the county), for ______ years? Yes No " For an election in which questions under this section or section 4301.421 or 5743.024 of the Revised Code are joined as a single question, the form of the ballot shall be as above, except each of the proposed taxes shall be listed. (D) The board of county commissioners of a county in which a tax is imposed under this section on September 29, 2013, the effective date of the amendment of this section by H.B. 59 of the 130th general assembly, may levy a tax for the purpose of section 307.673 of the Revised Code regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement authorized under that section has been entered into prior to the day the resolution adopted under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section is adopted, for the purpose of reimbursing a county for costs incurred in the construction of a sports facility pursuant to an agreement entered into by the county under section 307.696 of the Revised Code, or for the purpose of paying the costs of capital repairs of and improvements to a sports facility, or both. The tax shall be levied and approved in one of the manners prescribed by division (D)(1) or (2) of this section. (1) The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners not later than forty-five days after July 19, 1995. A board of county commissioners approving a tax under division (D)(1) of this section may approve a tax under division (B)(1) of section 4301.421 or division (C)(1) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code at the same time. Subject to the resolution being submitted to a referendum under sections 305.31 to 305.41 of the Revised Code, the resolution shall take effect immediately, but the tax levied pursuant to the resolution shall not be levied prior to the day following the last day that any tax previously levied pursuant to this division may be levied. (2) The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners not later than September 1, 2015, and approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately upon adopting a resolution under division (D)(2) of this section. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as prescribed by division (C) of this section, except that the phrase "paying not more than one-half of the costs of providing a sports facility together with related redevelopment and economic development projects" shall be replaced by the phrase "paying the costs of constructing, renovating, improving, or repairing a sports facility and reimbursing a county for costs incurred by the county in the construction of a sports facility," and the phrase ", beginning __________ (here insert the earliest date the tax would take effect)" shall be appended after "years." A board of county commissioners submitting the question of a tax under division (D)(2) of this section may submit the question of a tax under division (B)(2) of section 4301.421 or division (C)(2) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code as a single question, and the form of the ballot shall include each of the proposed taxes. If approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the tax shall take effect on the day specified on the ballot, which shall not be earlier than the day following the last day that any tax previously levied pursuant to this division may be levied. The rate of a tax levied pursuant to division (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall not exceed the rate specified in division (A) of this section. A tax levied pursuant to division (D)(1) or (2) of this section may be levied for any number of years not exceeding twenty. A board of county commissioners adopting a resolution under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section shall certify a copy of the resolution to the division of liquor control immediately upon adoption of the resolution. (E) The board of county commissioners of a county whose population is greater than one million one hundred thousand but less than one million three hundred thousand may levy a tax under this division for the purpose of section 307.673 of the Revised Code regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement authorized under that section has been entered into prior to the day the resolution adopted under division (E) of this section is adopted, for the purpose of reimbursing a county for costs incurred in the construction of a sports facility pursuant to an agreement entered into by the county under section 307.696 of the Revised Code, or for the purpose of paying the costs of constructing, equipping, furnishing, maintaining, renovating, improving, or repairing a sports facility. The tax may be levied for any number of years or for a continuing period of time. The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of county commissioners and approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately after its adoption. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as follows: "For the purpose of ______ (state the purpose or purposes), shall an excise tax be levied by __________ county at the rate of ______ dollars on each gallon of spirituous liquor sold in the county for ____ (number of years or a continuing period of time), the tax beginning on __________ (the earliest date the tax would take effect)? Yes No " A board of county commissioners submitting the question of a tax under division (E) of this section, may submit the question of a tax under section 5743.511, division (C) of section 4301.421, or division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code, or all, as a single question, provided that each tax is for the same purpose and period of time and the form of the ballot states the rate of each of the proposed taxes. If approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the tax shall take effect on the date specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. The tax levied under division (E) of this section may be approved and take effect before the expiration of the tax levied under division (D) of this section. The tax levied under division (E) of this section shall supersede and replace any tax levied under division (D) of this section, and the tax levied under division (D) of this section shall no longer be levied once the tax levied under division (E) of this section takes effect. The rate of a tax levied pursuant to division (E) of this section shall not exceed six dollars on each gallon of spirituous liquor sold to or purchased by liquor permit holders for resale, and sold at retail by the state or pursuant to a transfer agreement entered into under Chapter 4313. of the Revised Code, in the county. The tax shall be levied on the number of gallons so sold. A board of county commissioners adopting a resolution under division (E) of this section shall certify a copy of the resolution to the division of liquor control and to the tax commissioner immediately upon adoption of the resolution. (F) No tax shall be levied under division (A) of this section on or after September 23, 2008. This division does not apply to a tax levied under division (D) or (E) of this section, and does not prevent the collection of any tax levied under this section before September 23, 2008, so long as that tax remains effective. Sec. 307.86. Anything to be purchased, leased, leased with an option or agreement to purchase, or constructed, including, but not limited to, any product, structure, construction, reconstruction, improvement, maintenance, repair, or service, except the services of an accountant, architect, attorney at law, physician, professional engineer, construction project manager, consultant, surveyor, or appraiser, by or on behalf of the county or contracting authority, as defined in section 307.92 of the Revised Code, at a cost in excess of the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (D) of section 713.23 and in sections 9.48, 125.04, 125.60 to 125.6012, 307.022, 307.041, 307.861, 339.05, 340.036, 4115.31 to 4115.35, 5119.44, 5513.01, 5543.19, 5713.01, and 6137.05 of the Revised Code, shall be obtained through competitive bidding. No purchase, lease, project, or other transaction subject to this section shall be divided into component parts, separate projects, or separate items of work in order to avoid the requirements of this section. However, competitive bidding is not required when any of the following applies: (A) The board of county commissioners, by a unanimous vote of its members, makes a determination that a real and present emergency exists, and that determination and the reasons for it are entered in the minutes of the proceedings of the board, when any of the following applies: (1) The estimated cost is less than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars. (2) There is actual physical disaster to structures, radio communications equipment, or computers. (3) The product to be purchased is personal protective equipment and the purchase is completed during the period of the emergency declared by Executive Order 2020-01D, issued on March 9, 2020. For purposes of this division: "Personal protective equipment" means equipment worn to minimize exposure to hazards that cause workplace injuries and illnesses. "Unanimous vote" means all three members of a board of county commissioners when all three members are present, or two members of the board if only two members, constituting a quorum, are present. Whenever a contract of purchase, lease, or construction is exempted from competitive bidding under division (A)(1) of this section because the estimated cost is less than one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, but the estimated cost is the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code or more, the county or contracting authority shall solicit informal estimates from no fewer than three persons who could perform the contract, before awarding the contract. With regard to each such contract, the county or contracting authority shall maintain a record of such estimates, including the name of each person from whom an estimate is solicited. The county or contracting authority shall maintain the record for the longer of at least one year after the contract is awarded or the amount of time the federal government requires. (B)(1) The purchase consists of supplies or a replacement or supplemental part or parts for a product or equipment owned or leased by the county, and the only source of supply for the supplies, part, or parts is limited to a single supplier. (2) The purchase consists of services related to information technology, such as programming services, that are proprietary or limited to a single source. (C) The purchase is from the federal government, the state, another county or contracting authority of another county, or a board of education, educational service center, township, or municipal corporation. (D) The purchase is made by a county department of job and family services under section 329.04 of the Revised Code and consists of family services duties or workforce development activities or is made by a county board of developmental disabilities under section 5126.05 of the Revised Code and consists of program services, such as direct and ancillary client services, child care, case management services, residential services, and family resource services. (E) The purchase consists of criminal justice services, social services programs, family services, or workforce development activities by the board of county commissioners from nonprofit corporations or associations under programs funded by the federal government or by state grants. (F) The purchase consists of any form of an insurance policy or contract authorized to be issued under Title XXXIX of the Revised Code or any form of health care plan authorized to be issued under Chapter 1751. of the Revised Code, or any combination of such policies, contracts, plans, or services that the contracting authority is authorized to purchase, and the contracting authority does all of the following: (1) Determines that compliance with the requirements of this section would increase, rather than decrease, the cost of the purchase; (2) Requests issuers of the policies, contracts, plans, or services to submit proposals to the contracting authority, in a form prescribed by the contracting authority, setting forth the coverage and cost of the policies, contracts, plans, or services as the contracting authority desires to purchase; (3) Negotiates with the issuers for the purpose of purchasing the policies, contracts, plans, or services at the best and lowest price reasonably possible. (G) The purchase consists of computer hardware, software, or consulting services that are necessary to implement a computerized case management automation project administered by the Ohio prosecuting attorneys association and funded by a grant from the federal government. (H) Child care services are purchased for provision to county employees. (I)(1) Property, including land, buildings, and other real property, is leased for offices, storage, parking, or other purposes, and all of the following apply: (a) The contracting authority is authorized by the Revised Code to lease the property. (b) The contracting authority develops requests for proposals for leasing the property, specifying the criteria that will be considered prior to leasing the property, including the desired size and geographic location of the property. (c) The contracting authority receives responses from prospective lessors with property meeting the criteria specified in the requests for proposals by giving notice in a manner substantially similar to the procedures established for giving notice under section 307.87 of the Revised Code. (d) The contracting authority negotiates with the prospective lessors to obtain a lease at the best and lowest price reasonably possible considering the fair market value of the property and any relocation and operational costs that may be incurred during the period the lease is in effect. (2) The contracting authority may use the services of a real estate appraiser to obtain advice, consultations, or other recommendations regarding the lease of property under this division. (J) The purchase is made pursuant to section 5139.34 or sections 5139.41 to 5139.46 of the Revised Code and is of programs or services that provide case management, treatment, or prevention services to any felony or misdemeanant delinquent, unruly youth, or status offender under the supervision of the juvenile court, including, but not limited to, community residential care, day treatment, services to children in their home, or electronic monitoring. (K) The purchase is made by a public children services agency pursuant to section 307.92 or 5153.16 of the Revised Code and consists of family services, programs, or ancillary services that provide case management, prevention, or treatment services for children at risk of being or alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent children. (L) The purchase is to obtain the services of emergency medical service organizations under a contract made by the board of county commissioners pursuant to section 307.05 of the Revised Code with a joint emergency medical services district. (M) The county contracting authority determines that the use of competitive sealed proposals would be advantageous to the county and the contracting authority complies with section 307.862 of the Revised Code. (N) The purchase consists of used supplies and is made at a public auction. Any issuer of policies, contracts, plans, or services listed in division (F) of this section and any prospective lessor under division (I) of this section may have the issuer's or prospective lessor's name and address, or the name and address of an agent, placed on a special notification list to be kept by the contracting authority, by sending the contracting authority that name and address. The contracting authority shall send notice to all persons listed on the special notification list. Notices shall state the deadline and place for submitting proposals. The contracting authority shall mail the notices at least six weeks prior to the deadline set by the contracting authority for submitting proposals. Every five years the contracting authority may review this list and remove any person from the list after mailing the person notification of that action. Any contracting authority that negotiates a contract under division (F) of this section shall request proposals and negotiate with issuers in accordance with that division at least every three years from the date of the signing of such a contract, unless the parties agree upon terms for extensions or renewals of the contract. Such extension or renewal periods shall not exceed six years from the date the initial contract is signed. Any real estate appraiser employed pursuant to division (I) of this section shall disclose any fees or compensation received from any source in connection with that employment. As used in division (N) of this section, "supplies" means any personal property including equipment, materials, and other tangible assets. Sec. 307.985. Each board of county commissioners shall develop a written transportation work plan that establishes policies regarding the transportation needs of low income residents of the county seeking or striving to retain employment. In developing the transportation work plan, the board shall consult with all of the following: (A) The county department of job and family services; (B) If a regional transit authority created under section 306.32 of the Revised Code serves the county, the regional transit authority; (C) If a community action agency, as defined in section 122.66 5101.311 of the Revised Code, serves the county, the community action agency; (D) As designated by the board of county commissioners, representatives of private non-profit nonprofit and government entities that work with issues related to economic development, employment, and persons with physical disabilities; (E) Other individuals designated by the board of county commissioners. Sec. 308.13. (A) The board of trustees of a regional airport authority or any officer or employee designated by such board may make without competitive bidding any contract for any purchase, lease, lease with option or agreement to purchase any property, or any construction contract for any work, the cost of which shall not exceed the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code. Any purchase, lease, lease with option or agreement to purchase, or construction contract in excess of the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code shall require that a notice calling for bids be published once a week for not less than two consecutive weeks preceding the day of the opening of the bids in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the regional airport authority. The regional airport authority also may cause notice to be inserted in trade papers or other publications designated by it or to be distributed by electronic means, including posting the notice on the internet site on the world wide web of the regional airport authority. If the contracting authority posts the notice on that internet web site, the requirement that a second notice be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the territorial boundaries of the regional airport authority does not apply provided the first notice published in that newspaper meets all of the following requirements: (1) It is published at least two weeks prior to the day of the opening of the bids. (2) It includes a statement that the notice is posted on the internet site on the world wide web of the regional airport authority. (3) It includes the internet address of the internet site on the world wide web of the regional airport authority. (4) It includes instructions describing how the notice may be accessed on the internet site on the world wide web of the regional airport authority. No purchase, lease, project, or other transaction subject to this section shall be divided into component parts, separate projects, or separate items of work in order to avoid the requirements of this section. If the bid is for a contract for the construction, demolition, alteration, repair, or reconstruction of an improvement, it shall meet the requirements of section 153.54 of the Revised Code. If the bid is for any other contract authorized by this section, it shall be accompanied by a good and approved bond with ample security conditioned on the carrying out of the contract as determined by the board. The board may let the contract to the lowest and best bidder. Such contract shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by or shall refer to plans and specifications for the work to be done, as approved by the board. The plans and specifications at all times shall be made and considered part of the contract. The contract shall be approved by the board and signed by its chief executive officer and by the contractor, and shall be executed in duplicate. (B) The competitive bidding procedures described in division (A) of this section do not apply in any of the following circumstances: (1) The board of trustees of a regional airport authority, by a majority vote of its members present at any meeting, determines that a real and present emergency exists under any of the following conditions, and the board enters its determination and the reasons for it in its proceedings: (a) Affecting safety, welfare, or the ability to deliver services; (b) Arising out of an interruption of contracts essential to the provision of daily air services and other services related to the airport; (c) Involving actual physical damage to structures, supplies, equipment, or property requiring immediate repair or replacement. (2) The purchase consists of goods or services, or any combination thereof, and after reasonable inquiry the board or any officer or designee of the board finds that only one source of supply is reasonably available. (3) The expenditure is for a renewal or renegotiation of a lease or license for telecommunications or informational technology equipment, services, or systems, or for the upgrade of such equipment, services, or systems, or for the maintenance thereof as supplied by the original source or its successors or assigns. (4) The purchase of goods or services is made from another political subdivision, public agency, public transit system, regional transit authority, the state, or the federal government, or as a third-party beneficiary under a state or federal procurement contract, or as a participant in a department of administrative services contract under division (B) of section 125.04 of the Revised Code or under an approved purchasing plan of this state. (5) The purchase substantially involves services of a personal, professional, highly technical, or scientific nature, including the services of an attorney, physician, engineer, architect, surveyor, appraiser, investigator, adjuster, advertising consultant, or licensed broker, or involves the special skills or proprietary knowledge required for the operation of the airport owned by the regional transit authority. (6) Services or supplies are available from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 4115.31 125.60 to 4115.35 125.6012 of the Revised Code. (7) The purchase consists of the product or services of a public utility. Sec. 311.14. Upon retiring from office, the sheriff shall pay over to his the sheriff's successor in office all moneys received by such sheriff and remaining in his the sheriff's hands. He The sheriff shall deliver to his the sheriff's successor all evidences of indebtedness and all books, blanks, and stationery belonging to his the sheriff's office. Each sheriff shall demand and receive such books and papers from his the sheriff's predecessor. Before leaving office, the sheriff shall prepare a certificate of transition for the successor sheriff in the form and substance prescribed by the auditor of state. The certificate shall contain an inventory of items delivered in accordance with this section, sections 311.13 and 311.15 of the Revised Code, and other information prescribed by the auditor of state. Before prescribing the inventory of items, accounts, and other information to be contained in the certificate of transition, the auditor of state shall solicit input from county sheriffs. Sec. 317.20. (A) When, in the opinion of the board of county commissioners, sectional indexes are needed and it so directs, in addition to the indexes provided for in section 317.18 of the Revised Code, the board may provide for making, in books prepared for that purpose, sectional indexes to the records of all real estate in the county beginning with some designated year and continuing through the period of years that the board specifies. The sectional indexes shall place under the heads of the original surveyed sections or surveys, parts of a section or survey, squares, subdivisions, permanent parcel numbers provided for under section 319.28 of the Revised Code, or lots, on the left-hand page or on the upper portion of that page of the index book, the name of the grantor, then the name of the grantee, then the number and page of the record in which the instrument is found recorded, then the character of the instrument, and then a pertinent description of the interest in property conveyed by the deed, lease, or assignment of lease, and shall place under similar headings on the right-hand page or on the lower portion of that page of the index book, beginning at the bottom, all the mortgages, liens, notices provided for in sections 5301.51, 5301.52, and 5301.56 of the Revised Code, or other encumbrances affecting the real estate. (B) The compensation for the services rendered under this section shall be paid from the general revenue fund of the county, and no additional levy shall be made in consequence of the services. (C) If the board of county commissioners decides to have sectional indexes made, it shall advertise for three consecutive weeks for sealed proposals to do the work provided for in this section, using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the county; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the county. The board shall contract with the lowest and best bidder, and shall require the successful bidder to give a bond for the faithful performance of the contract in the sum that the board fixes. The work shall be done to the acceptance of the auditor of state upon allowance by the board. The board may reject any and all bids for the work, provided that no more than five cents shall be paid for each entry of each tract or lot of land. (D) When the sectional indexes are brought up and completed, the county recorder shall maintain the indexes and comply with division (E) of this section in connection with registered land. (E)(1) As used in division (E) of this section, "housing accommodations" and "restrictive covenant" have the same meanings as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (2) In connection with any transfer of registered land that occurs on and after March 30, 1999, in accordance with Chapters 5309. and 5310. of the Revised Code, the county recorder shall delete from the sectional indexes maintained under this section all references to any restrictive covenant that appears to apply to the transferred registered land, if any inclusion of the restrictive covenant in a transfer, rental, or lease of housing accommodations, any honoring or exercising of the restrictive covenant, or any attempt to honor or exercise the restrictive covenant constitutes an unlawful discriminatory practice under division (H)(9) of section 4112.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 319.04. (A) Each county auditor who is elected to a full term of office shall attend and successfully complete at least sixteen hours of continuing education courses during the first year of the auditor's term of office, and complete at least another eight hours of such courses by the end of that term. Each such county auditor shall include at least two hours of ethics and substance-abuse training in the total twenty-four hours of required courses. To be counted toward the twenty-four hours required by this section, a course must be approved by the county auditors association of Ohio. Any county auditor who teaches an approved course shall be entitled to credit for the course in the same manner as if the county auditor had attended the course. That association shall record and, upon request, verify the completion of required course work for each county auditor, and issue a statement to each county auditor of the number of hours of continuing education the county auditor has successfully completed. Each year the association shall send a list of the continuing education courses, and the number of hours each county auditor has successfully completed, to the auditor of state and the tax commissioner, and shall provide a copy of this list to any other individual who requests it. The auditor of state shall issue a certificate of completion to each county auditor who completes the continuing education courses required by this section. The auditor of state association shall issue a "notice of "failure to complete" to any county auditor required to complete continuing education courses under this section who fails to successfully complete at least sixteen hours of continuing education courses during the first year of the county auditor's term of office or to complete a total of at least twenty-four hours of such courses by the end of that term. This notice is for informational purposes only and does not affect any individual's ability to hold the office of county auditor. The county auditor shall retain the documentation of any initial or continuing education courses completed. The auditor of state shall audit for compliance with this section. (B) Each board of county commissioners shall approve, from money appropriated to the county auditor, a reasonable amount requested by the county auditor of its county to cover the costs the county auditor must incur to meet the requirements of division (A) of this section, including registration fees, lodging and meal expenses, and travel expenses. Sec. 319.202. Before the county auditor indorses any real property conveyance or manufactured or mobile home conveyance presented to the auditor pursuant to section 319.20 of the Revised Code or registers any manufactured or mobile home conveyance pursuant to section 4503.061 of the Revised Code, the grantee or the grantee's representative shall submit, either electronically or three written copies of, a statement, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, and other information as the county auditor may require, declaring the value of real property or manufactured or mobile home conveyed, except that when the transfer is exempt under division (G)(3) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code only a statement of the reason for the exemption shall be required. Each statement submitted under this section shall contain the information required under divisions (A) and , (B), and (C) of this section. (A) Each statement submitted under this section shall include or otherwise be accompanied by a statement advising the grantee of the eligibility requirements for the reduction in taxes authorized under division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code and of the duty imposed by division (C)(1) of section 323.153 of the Revised Code on the grantee to notify the county auditor if the grantee no longer qualifies for the reduction. (B) Each statement submitted under this section shall either: (1) Contain an affirmation by the grantee that the grantor has been asked by the grantee or the grantee's representative whether to the best of the grantor's knowledge either the preceding or the current year's taxes on the real property or the current or following year's taxes on the manufactured or mobile home conveyed will be reduced under division (A) of section 323.152 or under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code and that the grantor indicated that to the best of the grantor's knowledge the taxes will not be so reduced; or (2) Be accompanied by a sworn or affirmed instrument stating: (a) To the best of the grantor's knowledge the real property or the manufactured or mobile home that is the subject of the conveyance is eligible for and will receive a reduction in taxes for or payable in the current year under division (A) of section 323.152 or under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code and that the reduction or reductions will be reflected in the grantee's taxes; (b) The estimated amount of such reductions that will be reflected in the grantee's taxes; (c) That the grantor and the grantee have considered and accounted for the total estimated amount of such reductions to the satisfaction of both the grantee and the grantor. The auditor shall indorse the instrument, return it to the grantee or the grantee's representative, and provide a copy of the indorsed instrument to the grantor or the grantor's representative. (B)(C) Each statement submitted under this section shall either: (1) Contain an affirmation by the grantee that the grantor has been asked by the grantee or the grantee's representative whether to the best of the grantor's knowledge the real property conveyed qualified for the current agricultural use valuation under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code either for the preceding or the current year and that the grantor indicated that to the best of the grantor's knowledge the property conveyed was not so qualified; or (2) Be accompanied by a sworn or affirmed instrument stating: (a) To the best of the grantor's knowledge the real property conveyed was qualified for the current agricultural use valuation under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code either for the preceding or the current year; (b) To the extent that the property will not continue to qualify for the current agricultural use valuation either for the current or the succeeding year, that the property will be subject to a recoupment charge equal to the tax savings in accordance with section 5713.34 of the Revised Code; (c) That the grantor and the grantee have considered and accounted for the total estimated amount of such recoupment, if any, to the satisfaction of both the grantee and the grantor. The auditor shall indorse the instrument, forward it to the grantee or the grantee's representative, and provide a copy of the indorsed instrument to the grantor or the grantor's representative. (C)(D) The grantor shall pay the fee required by division (G)(3) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code; and, in the event the board of county commissioners of the county has levied a real property or a manufactured home transfer tax pursuant to Chapter 322. of the Revised Code, the amount required by the real property or manufactured home transfer tax so levied. If the conveyance is exempt from the fee provided for in division (G)(3) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code and the tax, if any, levied pursuant to Chapter 322. of the Revised Code, the reason for such exemption shall be shown on the statement. "Value" means, in the case of any deed or certificate of title not a gift in whole or part, the amount of the full consideration therefor, paid or to be paid for the real estate or manufactured or mobile home described in the deed or title, including the amount of any mortgage or vendor's lien thereon. If property sold under a land installment contract is conveyed by the seller under such contract to a third party and the contract has been of record at least twelve months prior to the date of conveyance, "value" means the unpaid balance owed to the seller under the contract at the time of the conveyance, but the statement shall set forth the amount paid under such contract prior to the date of conveyance. In the case of a gift in whole or part, "value" means the estimated price the real estate or manufactured or mobile home described in the deed or certificate of title would bring in the open market and under the then existing and prevailing market conditions in a sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer, both conversant with the property and with prevailing general price levels. No person shall willfully falsify the value of property conveyed. (D)(E) The auditor shall indorse each conveyance on its face to indicate the amount of the conveyance fee and compliance with this section and if the property is residential rental property include a statement that the grantee shall file with the county auditor the information required under division (A) or (C) of section 5323.02 of the Revised Code. The auditor shall retain the original copy of the statement of value, forward to the tax commissioner one copy on which shall be noted the most recent assessed value of the property, and furnish one copy to the grantee or the grantee's representative. (E)(F) In order to achieve uniform administration and collection of the transfer fee required by division (G)(3) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules for the administration and enforcement of the levy and collection of such fee. (F)(G) As used in this section, "residential rental property" has the same meaning as in section 5323.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 319.301. (A) The reductions required by division (D) of this section do not apply to any of the following: (1) Taxes levied at whatever rate is required to produce a specified amount of tax money, including a tax levied under section 5705.199 or 5748.09 of the Revised Code, or an amount to pay debt charges; (2) Taxes levied within the one per cent limitation imposed by Section 2 of Article XII, Ohio Constitution; (3) Taxes provided for by the charter of a municipal corporation. (B) As used in this section: (1) "Real property" includes real property owned by a railroad. (2) "Carryover property" means all real property on the current year's tax list except: (a) Land and improvements that were not taxed by the district in both the preceding year and the current year; (b) Land and improvements that were not in the same class in both the preceding year and the current year. (3) "Effective tax rate" means with respect to each class of property: (a) The sum of the total taxes that would have been charged and payable for current expenses against real property in that class if each of the district's taxes were reduced for the current year under division (D)(1) of this section without regard to the application of division (E)(3) of this section divided by (b) The taxable value of all real property in that class. (4) "Taxes charged and payable" means the taxes charged and payable prior to any reduction required by section 319.302 of the Revised Code. (C) The tax commissioner shall make the determinations required by this section each year, without regard to whether a taxing district has territory in a county to which section 5715.24 of the Revised Code applies for that year. Separate determinations shall be made for each of the two classes established pursuant to section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. (D) With respect to each tax authorized to be levied by each taxing district, the tax commissioner, annually, shall do both of the following: (1) Determine by what percentage, if any, the sums levied by such tax against the carryover property in each class would have to be reduced for the tax to levy the same number of dollars against such property in that class in the current year as were charged against such property by such tax in the preceding year subsequent to the reduction made under this section but before the reduction made under section 319.302 of the Revised Code. In the case of a tax levied for the first time that is not a renewal of an existing tax, the commissioner shall determine by what percentage the sums that would otherwise be levied by such tax against carryover property in each class would have to be reduced to equal the amount that would have been levied if the full rate thereof had been imposed against the total taxable value of such property in the preceding tax year. A tax or portion of a tax that is designated a replacement levy under section 5705.192 of the Revised Code is not a renewal of an existing tax for purposes of this division. (2) Certify each percentage determined in division (D)(1) of this section, as adjusted under division (E) of this section, and the class of property to which that percentage applies to the auditor of each county in which the district has territory. The auditor, after complying with section 319.30 of the Revised Code, shall reduce the sum to be levied by such tax against each parcel of real property in the district by the percentage so certified for its class. Certification shall be made by the first day of September except in the case of a tax levied for the first time, in which case certification shall be made within fifteen days of the date the county auditor submits the information necessary to make the required determination. (E)(1) As used in division (E)(2) of this section, "pre-1982 joint vocational taxes" means, with respect to a class of property, the difference between the following amounts: (a) The taxes charged and payable in tax year 1981 against the property in that class for the current expenses of the joint vocational school district of which the school district is a part after making all reductions under this section; (b) Two-tenths of one per cent of the taxable value of all real property in that class. If the amount in division (E)(1)(b) of this section exceeds the amount in division (E)(1)(a) of this section, the pre-1982 joint vocational taxes shall be zero. As used in divisions (E)(2) and (3) of this section, "taxes charged and payable" has the same meaning as in division (B)(4) of this section and excludes any tax charged and payable in 1985 or thereafter under sections 5705.194 to 5705.197 or section 5705.199, 5705.213, 5705.219, or 5748.09 of the Revised Code. (2) If in the case of a school district other than a joint vocational or cooperative education school district any percentage required to be used in division (D)(2) of this section for either class of property could cause the total taxes charged and payable for current expenses to be less than two per cent of the taxable value of all real property in that class that is subject to taxation by the district, the commissioner shall determine what percentages would cause the district's total taxes charged and payable for current expenses against that class, after all reductions that would otherwise be made under this section, to equal, when combined with the pre-1982 joint vocational taxes against that class, the lesser of the following: (a) The sum of the rates at which those taxes are authorized to be levied; (b) Two per cent of the taxable value of the property in that class. The auditor shall use such percentages in making the reduction required by this section for that class. (3) If in the case of a joint vocational school district any percentage required to be used in division (D)(2) of this section for either class of property could cause the total taxes charged and payable for current expenses for that class to be less than two-tenths of one per cent of the taxable value of that class, the commissioner shall determine what percentages would cause the district's total taxes charged and payable for current expenses for that class, after all reductions that would otherwise be made under this section, to equal that amount. The auditor shall use such percentages in making the reductions required by this section for that class. (4) If a school district is affected by division (E)(2) or (3) of this section for either class of property, and additional current expense taxes are levied or are included in the definition of taxes charged and payable, then, for the first tax year those taxes are levied or included, the reduction computed under division (D) of this section for that district shall be computed as though the sums of current expenses taxes levied for the district and charged against that class in the preceding tax year were equivalent to two per cent or two-tenths of one per cent, respectively, of the taxable value of all real property in that class. (F) No reduction shall be made under this section in the rate at which any tax is levied. (G) The commissioner may order a county auditor to furnish any information the commissioner needs to make the determinations required under division (D) or (E) of this section, and the auditor shall supply the information in the form and by the date specified in the order. If the auditor fails to comply with an order issued under this division, except for good cause as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner shall withhold from such county or taxing district therein fifty per cent of state revenues to local governments pursuant to section 5747.50 of the Revised Code or shall direct the department of education and workforce to withhold therefrom fifty per cent of state revenues to school districts pursuant to Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall withhold the distribution of such revenues until the county auditor has complied with this division, and the department shall withhold the distribution of such revenues until the commissioner has notified the department that the county auditor has complied with this division. (H) If the commissioner is unable to certify a tax reduction factor for either class of property in a taxing district located in more than one county by the last day of November because information required under division (G) of this section is unavailable, the commissioner may compute and certify an estimated tax reduction factor for that district for that class. The estimated factor shall be based upon an estimate of the unavailable information. Upon receipt of the actual information for a taxing district that received an estimated tax reduction factor, the commissioner shall compute the actual tax reduction factor and use that factor to compute the taxes that should have been charged and payable against each parcel of property for the year for which the estimated reduction factor was used. The amount by which the estimated factor resulted in an overpayment or underpayment in taxes on any parcel shall be added to or subtracted from the amount due on that parcel in the ensuing tax year. A percentage or a tax reduction factor determined or computed by the commissioner under this section shall be used solely for the purpose of reducing the sums to be levied by the tax to which it applies for the year for which it was determined or computed. It shall not be used in making any tax computations for any ensuing tax year. (I) In making the determinations under division (D)(1) of this section, the tax commissioner shall take account of changes in the taxable value of carryover property resulting from complaints filed under section 5715.19 of the Revised Code for determinations made for the tax year in which such changes are reported to the commissioner. Such changes shall be reported to the commissioner on the first abstract of real property filed with the commissioner under section 5715.23 of the Revised Code following the date on which the complaint is finally determined by the board of revision or by a court or other authority with jurisdiction on appeal. The tax commissioner shall account for such changes in making the determinations only for the tax year in which the change in valuation is reported. Such a valuation change shall not be used to recompute the percentages determined under division (D)(1) of this section for any prior tax year. Sec. 319.302. (A)(1) Real property that is not intended primarily for use in a business activity shall qualify for a partial exemption from real property taxation. For purposes of this partial exemption, "business activity" includes all uses of real property, except farming; leasing property for farming; occupying or holding property improved with single-family, two-family, or three-family dwellings; leasing property improved with single-family, two-family, or three-family dwellings; or holding vacant land that the county auditor determines will be used for farming or to develop single-family, two-family, or three-family dwellings. For purposes of this partial exemption, "farming" does not include land used for the commercial production of timber that is receiving the tax benefit under section 5713.23 or 5713.31 of the Revised Code and all improvements connected with such commercial production of timber. (2) Each year, the county auditor shall review each parcel of real property to determine whether it qualifies for the partial exemption provided for by this section as of the first day of January of the current tax year. (B) After complying with section 319.301 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall reduce the remaining sums to be levied by qualifying levies against each parcel of real property that is listed on the general tax list and duplicate of real and public utility property for the current tax year and that qualifies for partial exemption under division (A) of this section, and against each manufactured and mobile home that is taxed pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code and that is on the manufactured home tax list for the current tax year, by ten per cent, to provide a partial exemption for that parcel or home. For the purposes of this division: (1) "Qualifying levy" means a levy approved at an election held before September 29, 2013; a levy within the ten-mill limitation; a levy provided for by the charter of a municipal corporation that was levied on the tax list for tax year 2013; a subsequent renewal of any such levy; or a subsequent substitute for such a levy under section 5705.199 of the Revised Code. (2) "Qualifying levy" does not include any replacement imposed under section 5705.192 of the Revised Code, as it existed before the effective date of this amendment, of any levy described in division (B)(1) of this section. (C) Except as otherwise provided in sections 323.152, 323.158, 323.16, 505.06, and 715.263 of the Revised Code, the amount of the taxes remaining after any such reduction shall be the real and public utility property taxes charged and payable on each parcel of real property, including property that does not qualify for partial exemption under division (A) of this section, and the manufactured home tax charged and payable on each manufactured or mobile home, and shall be the amounts certified to the county treasurer for collection. Upon receipt of the real and public utility property tax duplicate, the treasurer shall certify to the tax commissioner the total amount by which the real property taxes were reduced under this section, as shown on the duplicate. Such reduction shall not directly or indirectly affect the determination of the principal amount of notes that may be issued in anticipation of any tax levies or the amount of bonds or notes for any planned improvements. If after application of sections 5705.31 and 5705.32 of the Revised Code and other applicable provisions of law, including divisions (F) and (I) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, there would be insufficient funds for payment of debt charges on bonds or notes payable from taxes reduced by this section, the reduction of taxes provided for in this section shall be adjusted to the extent necessary to provide funds from such taxes. (D) The tax commissioner may adopt rules governing the administration of the partial exemption provided for by this section. (E) The determination of whether property qualifies for partial exemption under division (A) of this section is solely for the purpose of allowing the partial exemption under division (B) of this section. Sec. 319.304. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Homestead" has the same meaning as in section 323.151 of the Revised Code and also includes a manufactured or mobile home that is owned and occupied as a home by an individual whose domicile is in this state. (2) "Homestead exemption" means a reduction authorized under section 4503.065 or division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (3) "Income threshold" means the total income threshold applicable for the tax year under division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of section 323.152 or division (A)(2)(a)(iii) or (A)(2)(c)(iii) of section 4503.065 of the Revised Code. (B) A board of county commissioners, by resolution, may authorize a reduction in the real property taxes or manufactured home taxes charged and payable against every homestead in the county subject to a homestead exemption for the tax year. The board shall certify a copy of the resolution, or a copy of any resolution repealing the reduction's authorization, to the county auditor and tax commissioner within thirty days after its adoption. If the resolution is adopted on or before the first day of July of a tax year, the reduction shall first apply or cease to apply, in the case of real property taxes, to that tax year or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, the following tax year. If the resolution is adopted after the first day of July of a tax year, the reduction shall first apply or cease to apply, in the case of real property taxes, to the following tax year or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, the second succeeding tax year. (C) The reduction shall equal the same amount as the homestead's applicable homestead exemption for the tax year and shall be applied concurrently with the homestead exemption. Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this section, no application shall be required under section 323.153 or 4503.066 of the Revised Code for a homestead to obtain a reduction authorized by this section, but the reduction is otherwise subject to the same provisions as provided in sections 323.151 to 323.159 or sections 4503.064 to 4503.069 of the Revised Code as are applicable to a homestead exemption. The amount of any reduction authorized under this section shall not be reimbursed as provided in section 323.156 or 4503.068 of the Revised Code. (D) A homestead that is subject to the homestead exemption authorized under division (A)(1) of section 323.152 or division (A) of section 4503.065 of the Revised Code shall not qualify for a reduction under this section unless the person owning and occupying the homestead or occupying the homestead, in the case of a housing cooperative, has a total income that does not exceed the income threshold applicable to that tax year. If the person has not already reported the person's total income under section 323.153 or 4503.066 of the Revised Code for the purpose of the homestead exemption, the person shall not be eligible to receive a reduction under this section unless the person files an application verifying the person's total income in accordance with that applicable section. The county auditor shall furnish such person a continuing application under that section, which the person shall use to report changes in total income in accordance with the applicable section. Sec. 321.03. (A) At the request of the county treasurer, a board of county commissioners may enter into a contract with any financial institution under which the financial institution, in accordance with the terms of the contract, receives at a post office box any type of payment or fee owed or payable to the county, opens the mail delivered to that box, processes the checks and other payments received in such mail and deposits them into the treasurer's account, and provides the county treasurer daily receipt information with respect to such payments. The contract may provide for the financial institution to receive at the post office box those payments and fees specifically named in the contract or all payments and fees payable to the county, including, but not limited to, utility, sewer, water, refuse collection, waste disposal, and airport fees, but in any case excluding taxes. The contract shall not be entered into unless: (A) There is attached to the contract a certification by the auditor of state that the financial institution and the treasurer have given assurances satisfactory to the auditor of state that the records of the financial institution, to the extent that they relate to payments covered by the contract, shall be subject to examination by the auditor of state to the same extent as if the services that the financial institution has agreed to perform were being performed by the treasurer. (B)(1) The contract is awarded in accordance with sections 307.86 to 307.92 of the Revised Code. (C)(2) The treasurer's surety bond includes within its coverage any loss that might occur as the result of the contract. (D)(3) The provisions of the contract do not conflict with accounting and reporting requirements prescribed by the auditor of state. (B) The records of the financial institution are subject to examination by the auditor of state to the same extent as if the services that the financial institution has agreed to perform were being performed by the treasurer. Sec. 323.131. (A) Each tax bill prepared and mailed or delivered under section 323.13 of the Revised Code shall be in the form and contain the information required by the tax commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe different forms for each county and may authorize the county auditor to make up tax bills and tax receipts to be used by the county treasurer. For any county in which the board of county commissioners has granted a partial property tax exemption on homesteads under section 323.158 of the Revised Code, the commissioner shall require that the tax bills for those homesteads include a notice of the amount of the tax reduction that results from the partial exemption. In addition to the information required by the commissioner, each tax bill shall contain the following information: (1) The taxes levied and the taxes charged and payable against the property; (2) The effective tax rate. The words "effective tax rate" shall appear in boldface type. (3) The following notices: (a) "Notice: If the taxes are not paid within sixty days from the date they are certified delinquent, the property is subject to foreclosure for tax delinquency." Failure to provide such notice has no effect upon the validity of any tax foreclosure to which a property is subjected. (b) "Notice: If the taxes charged against this parcel have been reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax reduction for residences occupied by the owner but the property is not a residence occupied by the owner, the owner must notify the county auditor's office not later than March 31 of the year following the year for which the taxes are due. Failure to do so may result in the owner being convicted of a fourth degree misdemeanor, which is punishable by imprisonment up to 30 days, a fine up to $250, or both, and in the owner having to repay the amount by which the taxes were erroneously or illegally reduced, plus any interest that may apply. If the taxes charged against this parcel have not been reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax reduction and the parcel includes a residence occupied by the owner, the parcel may qualify for the tax reduction. To obtain an application for the tax reduction or further information, the owner may contact the county auditor's office at __________ (insert the address and telephone number of the county auditor's office)." (4) For a tract or lot on the real property tax suspension list under section 319.48 of the Revised Code, the following notice: "Notice: The taxes shown due on this bill are for the current year only. Delinquent taxes, penalties, and interest also are due on this property. Contact the county treasurer to learn the total amount due." (5) For a property, the tax liability of which has been reduced under section 5705.316 of the Revised Code for the current tax year, the following notice: "Notice: The school district taxes shown due on this bill are reduced only for the current year due to the school district's excess carry-over balance." The tax bill shall not contain or be mailed or delivered with any information or material that is not required by this section or that is not authorized by section 321.45 of the Revised Code or by the tax commissioner. (B) If the property is residential rental property, the tax bill shall contain a statement that the owner of the residential rental property shall file with the county auditor the information required under division (A) or (C) of section 5323.02 of the Revised Code. (C) Each county auditor and treasurer shall post on their respective web sites, or on the county's web site, the percentage of property taxes charged by each taxing unit and, in the case of the county as a taxing unit, the percentage of taxes charged by the county for each of the county purposes for which taxes are charged. (D) As used in this section, "residential rental property" has the same meaning as in section 5323.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 323.152. In addition to the reduction in taxes required under section sections 319.302 and 319.304 of the Revised Code, taxes shall be reduced as provided in divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (A)(1)(a) Division (A)(1) of this section applies to any of the following persons: (i) A person who is permanently and totally disabled; (ii) A person who is sixty-five years of age or older; (iii) A person who is the surviving spouse of a deceased person who was permanently and totally disabled or sixty-five years of age or older and who applied and qualified for a reduction in taxes under this division in the year of death, provided the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine but not sixty-five or more years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies. (b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a person to whom division (A)(1) of this section applies shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal one of the following amounts, as applicable to the person: (i) If the person received a reduction under division (A)(1) of this section for tax year 2006, the greater of the reduction for that tax year or the amount computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section; (ii) If the person received, for any homestead, a reduction under division (A)(1) of this section for tax year 2013 or under division (A) of section 4503.065 of the Revised Code for tax year 2014 or the person is the surviving spouse of such a person and the surviving spouse is at least fifty-nine years of age on the date the deceased spouse dies, the amount computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. (iii) If the person is not described in division (A)(1)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section and the person's total income does not exceed thirty thousand dollars, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, the amount computed under division (A)(1)(c) of this section. (c) The amount of the reduction under division (A)(1)(c) of this section equals the product of the following: (i) Twenty-five thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section; (ii) The assessment percentage established by the tax commissioner under division (B) of section 5715.01 of the Revised Code, not to exceed thirty-five per cent; (iii) The effective tax rate used to calculate the taxes charged against the property for the current year, where "effective tax rate" is defined as in section 323.08 of the Revised Code; (iv) The quantity equal to one minus the sum of the percentage reductions in taxes received by the property for the current tax year under section 319.302 of the Revised Code and division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (d) The tax commissioner shall adjust the total income threshold described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) and the reduction amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(i), (A)(2), and (A)(3) of this section by completing the following calculations in September of each year: (i) Determine the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce from the first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last day of December of the preceding calendar year; (ii) Multiply that percentage increase by the total income threshold or reduction amount for the current tax year, as applicable; (iii) Add the resulting product to the total income threshold or the reduction amount, as applicable, for the current tax year; (iv) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars. The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from each adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first day of December each year. The certified total income threshold amount applies to the following tax year for persons described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. The certified reduction amount applies to the following tax year. The commissioner shall not make the applicable adjustment in any calendar year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the total income threshold or the reduction amount for the current tax year. (2)(a) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(b), or (3) of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by a disabled veteran. (b) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran shall be reduced for each year an application for exemption is approved. The reduction shall equal to the amount of the reduction authorized under division (A)(2)(a) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1), (2)(a), or (3) of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under division (A)(2)(b) of this section beginning in one of the following tax years: (i) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(1) of section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the year the disabled veteran dies; (ii) For a surviving spouse described in division (L)(2) of section 323.151 of the Revised Code, the first year on the first day of January of which the total disability rating described in division (F) of that section has been received for the deceased spouse. In either case, the reduction shall continue through the tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. (3) Real property taxes on a homestead owned and occupied, or a homestead in a housing cooperative occupied, by the surviving spouse of a public service officer killed in the line of duty shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The reduction shall equal the product obtained by multiplying fifty thousand dollars of the true value of the property in money, as adjusted under division (A)(1)(d) of this section, by the amounts described in divisions (A)(1)(c)(ii) to (iv) of this section. The reduction is in lieu of any reduction under section 323.158 of the Revised Code or division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. The reduction applies to only one homestead owned and occupied by such a surviving spouse. A homestead qualifies for a reduction in taxes under division (A)(3) of this section for the tax year in which the public service officer dies through the tax year in which the surviving spouse dies or remarries. (B)(1) As used in division (B) of this section, "qualifying levy" has the same meaning as in section 319.302 of the Revised Code. (2) To provide a partial exemption, real property taxes on any homestead, and manufactured home taxes on any manufactured or mobile home on which a manufactured home tax is assessed pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, shall be reduced for each year for which an application for the reduction has been approved. The amount of the reduction shall equal two and one-half per cent of the amount of taxes to be levied by qualifying levies on the homestead or the manufactured or mobile home after applying section 319.301 of the Revised Code. For the purposes of this division, "qualifying levy" has the same meaning as in section 319.302 of the Revised Code. (3) A board of county commissioners, by resolution, may authorize a partial exemption from the real property taxes or manufactured home taxes on any property or manufactured or mobile home that receives the partial exemption under division (B)(2) of this section. The resolution shall specify the amount of the partial exemption, which may equal up to two and one-half per cent of the amount of taxes to be levied by qualifying levies on the property or home after applying section 319.301 of the Revised Code. The partial exemption shall be applied concurrently with the partial exemption under division (B)(2) of this section, and no application shall be required under section 323.153 of the Revised Code to obtain the partial exemption authorized pursuant to this section. The board shall certify a copy of the resolution, or a copy of any resolution repealing the partial exemption's authorization, to the county auditor and tax commissioner within thirty days after its adoption. If the resolution is adopted on or before the first day of July of a tax year, the partial exemption shall first apply or cease to apply, in the case of real property taxes, to that tax year or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, the following tax year. If the resolution is adopted after the first day of July of a tax year, the partial exemption shall first apply or cease to apply, in the case of real property taxes, to the following tax year or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, the second succeeding tax year. (C) The reductions granted by this section do not apply to special assessments or respread of assessments levied against the homestead, and if there is a transfer of ownership subsequent to the filing of an application for a reduction in taxes, such reductions are not forfeited for such year by virtue of such transfer. (D) The reductions in taxable value referred to in this section shall be applied solely as a factor for the purpose of computing the reduction of taxes under this section and shall not affect the total value of property in any subdivision or taxing district as listed and assessed for taxation on the tax lists and duplicates, or any direct or indirect limitations on indebtedness of a subdivision or taxing district. If after application of sections 5705.31 and 5705.32 of the Revised Code, including the allocation of all levies within the ten-mill limitation to debt charges to the extent therein provided, there would be insufficient funds for payment of debt charges not provided for by levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation, the reduction of taxes provided for in sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code shall be proportionately adjusted to the extent necessary to provide such funds from levies within the ten-mill limitation. (E) No reduction shall be made on the taxes due on the homestead of any person convicted of violating division (D) or (E) of section 323.153 of the Revised Code for a period of three years following the conviction. Sec. 323.153. (A) To obtain a reduction in real property taxes under division (A) or (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code or in manufactured home taxes under division (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, the owner shall file an application with the county auditor of the county in which the owner's homestead is located. To obtain a reduction in real property taxes under division (A) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, the occupant of a homestead in a housing cooperative shall file an application with the nonprofit corporation that owns and operates the housing cooperative, in accordance with this paragraph. Not later than the first day of March each year, the corporation shall obtain applications from the county auditor's office and provide one to each new occupant. Not later than the first day of May, any occupant who may be eligible for a reduction in taxes under division (A) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall submit the completed application to the corporation. Not later than the fifteenth day of May, the corporation shall file all completed applications, and the information required by division (B) of section 323.159 of the Revised Code, with the county auditor of the county in which the occupants' homesteads are located. Continuing applications shall be furnished to an occupant in the manner provided in division (C)(4) of this section. (1) An application for reduction based upon a physical disability shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a physician, and an application for reduction based upon a mental disability shall be accompanied by a certificate signed by a physician or psychologist licensed to practice in this state, attesting to the fact that the applicant is permanently and totally disabled. The certificate shall be in a form that the tax commissioner requires and shall include the definition of permanently and totally disabled as set forth in section 323.151 of the Revised Code. An application for reduction based upon a disability certified as permanent and total by a state or federal agency having the function of so classifying persons shall be accompanied by a certificate from that agency. An application by a disabled veteran or the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran for the reduction under division (A)(2)(a) or (b) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be accompanied by a letter or other written confirmation from the United States department of veterans affairs, or its predecessor or successor agency, showing that the veteran qualifies as a disabled veteran. An application by the surviving spouse of a public service officer killed in the line of duty for the reduction under division (A)(3) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be accompanied by a letter or other written confirmation from an employee or officer of the board of trustees of a retirement or pension fund in this state or another state or from the chief or other chief executive of the department, agency, or other employer for which the public service officer served when killed in the line of duty affirming that the public service officer was killed in the line of duty. An application for a reduction under division (A) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code constitutes a continuing application for a reduction in taxes for each year in which the dwelling is the applicant's homestead. (2) An application for a reduction in taxes under division (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be filed only if the homestead or manufactured or mobile home was transferred in the preceding year or did not qualify for and receive the reduction in taxes under that division for the preceding tax year. The application for homesteads transferred in the preceding year shall be incorporated into any form used by the county auditor to administer the tax law in respect to the conveyance of real property pursuant to section 319.20 of the Revised Code or of used manufactured homes or used mobile homes as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code. The owner of a manufactured or mobile home who has elected under division (D)(4) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code to be taxed under division (D)(2) of that section for the ensuing year may file the application at the time of making that election. The application shall contain a statement that failure by the applicant to affirm on the application that the dwelling on the property conveyed is the applicant's homestead prohibits the owner from receiving the reduction in taxes until a proper application is filed within the period prescribed by division (A)(3) of this section. Such an application constitutes a continuing application for a reduction in taxes for each year in which the dwelling is the applicant's homestead. (3) Failure to receive a new application filed under division (A)(1) or (2) or notification under division (C) of this section after an application for reduction has been approved is prima-facie evidence that the original applicant is entitled to the reduction in taxes calculated on the basis of the information contained in the original application. The original application and any subsequent application, including any late application, shall be in the form of a signed statement and shall be filed on or before the thirty-first day of December of the year for which the reduction is sought. The original application and any subsequent application for a reduction in manufactured home taxes shall be filed in the year preceding the year for which the reduction is sought. The statement shall be on a form, devised and supplied by the tax commissioner, which shall require no more information than is necessary to establish the applicant's eligibility for the reduction in taxes and the amount of the reduction, and, except for homesteads that are units in a housing cooperative, shall include an affirmation by the applicant that ownership of the homestead was not acquired from a person, other than the applicant's spouse, related to the owner by consanguinity or affinity for the purpose of qualifying for the real property or manufactured home tax reduction provided for in division (A) or (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. The form shall contain a statement that conviction of willfully falsifying information to obtain a reduction in taxes or failing to comply with division (C) of this section results in the revocation of the right to the reduction for a period of three years. In the case of an application for a reduction in taxes for persons described in division (A)(1)(b)(iii) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, the form shall contain a statement that signing the application constitutes a delegation of authority by the applicant to the tax commissioner or the county auditor, individually or in consultation with each other, to examine any tax or financial records relating to the income of the applicant as stated on the application for the purpose of determining eligibility for the exemption or a possible violation of division (D) or (E) of this section. (B) A late application for a tax reduction for the year preceding the year in which an original application is filed, or for a reduction in manufactured home taxes for the year in which an original application is filed, may be filed with the original application. If the county auditor determines the information contained in the late application is correct, the auditor shall determine the amount of the reduction in taxes to which the applicant would have been entitled for the preceding tax year had the applicant's application been timely filed and approved in that year. The amount of such reduction shall be treated by the auditor as an overpayment of taxes by the applicant and shall be refunded in the manner prescribed in section 5715.22 of the Revised Code for making refunds of overpayments. The county auditor shall certify the total amount of the reductions in taxes made in the current year under this division to the tax commissioner, who shall treat the full amount thereof as a reduction in taxes for the preceding tax year and shall make reimbursement to the county therefor in the manner prescribed by section 323.156 of the Revised Code, from money appropriated for that purpose. (C)(1) If, in any year after an application has been filed under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, the owner does not qualify for a reduction in taxes on the homestead or on the manufactured or mobile home set forth on such application, the owner shall notify the county auditor that the owner is not qualified for a reduction in taxes. (2) If, in any year after an application has been filed under division (A)(1) of this section, the occupant of a homestead in a housing cooperative does not qualify for a reduction in taxes on the homestead, the occupant shall notify the county auditor that the occupant is not qualified for a reduction in taxes or file a new application under division (A)(1) of this section. (3) If the county auditor or county treasurer discovers that an owner of property or occupant of a homestead in a housing cooperative not entitled to the reduction in taxes under division (A) or (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code failed to notify the county auditor as required by division (C)(1) or (2) of this section, a charge shall be imposed against the property in the amount by which taxes were reduced under that division for each tax year the county auditor ascertains that the property was not entitled to the reduction and was owned by the current owner or, in the case of a homestead in a housing cooperative, occupied by the current occupant. Interest shall accrue in the manner prescribed by division (B) of section 323.121 or division (G)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code on the amount by which taxes were reduced for each such tax year as if the reduction became delinquent taxes at the close of the last day the second installment of taxes for that tax year could be paid without penalty. The county auditor shall notify the owner or occupant, by ordinary mail, of the charge, of the owner's or occupant's right to appeal the charge, and of the manner in which the owner or occupant may appeal. The owner or occupant may appeal the imposition of the charge and interest by filing an appeal with the county board of revision not later than the last day prescribed for payment of real and public utility property taxes under section 323.12 of the Revised Code following receipt of the notice and occurring at least ninety days after receipt of the notice. The appeal shall be treated in the same manner as a complaint relating to the valuation or assessment of real property under Chapter 5715. of the Revised Code. The charge and any interest shall be collected as other delinquent taxes. (4) Each year during January, the county auditor shall furnish by ordinary mail a continuing application to each person receiving a reduction under division (A) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. The continuing application shall be used to report changes in total income, ownership, occupancy, disability, and other information earlier furnished the auditor relative to the reduction in taxes on the property. The continuing application shall be returned to the auditor not later than the thirty-first day of December; provided, that if such changes do not affect the status of the homestead exemption or the amount of the reduction to which the owner is entitled under division (A) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code or to which the occupant is entitled under section 323.159 of the Revised Code, the application does not need to be returned. (5) Each year during February, the county auditor, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, shall furnish by ordinary mail an original application to the owner, as of the first day of January of that year, of a homestead or a manufactured or mobile home that transferred during the preceding calendar year and that qualified for and received a reduction in taxes under division (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code for the preceding tax year. In order to receive the reduction under that division, the owner shall file the application with the county auditor not later than the thirty-first day of December. If the application is not timely filed, the auditor shall not grant a reduction in taxes for the homestead for the current year, and shall notify the owner that the reduction in taxes has not been granted, in the same manner prescribed under section 323.154 of the Revised Code for notification of denial of an application. Failure of an owner to receive an application does not excuse the failure of the owner to file an original application. The county auditor is not required to furnish an application under this paragraph for any homestead for which application has previously been made on a form incorporated into any form used by the county auditor to administer the tax law in respect to the conveyance of real property or of used manufactured homes or used mobile homes, and an owner who previously has applied on such a form is not required to return an application furnished under this paragraph. (D) No person shall knowingly make a false statement for the purpose of obtaining a reduction in the person's real property or manufactured home taxes under section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (E) No person shall knowingly fail to notify the county auditor of changes required by division (C) of this section that have the effect of maintaining or securing a reduction in taxes under section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (F) No person shall knowingly make a false statement or certification attesting to any person's physical or mental condition for purposes of qualifying such person for tax relief pursuant to sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code. Sec. 323.155. The tax bill prescribed under section 323.131 of the Revised Code shall indicate the net amount of taxes due following the reductions in taxes under sections 319.301, 319.302, 319.304, 323.152, and 323.16 of the Revised Code. Any reduction in taxes under section 323.152 of the Revised Code shall be disregarded as income or resources in determining eligibility for any program or calculating any payment under Title LI of the Revised Code. Sec. 323.156. (A) Within thirty days after a settlement of taxes under divisions (A) and (C) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, the county treasurer shall certify to the tax commissioner one-half of the total amount of taxes on real property that were reduced pursuant to divisions (A) and (B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code for the preceding tax year. The commissioner, within thirty days of the receipt of such certifications, shall provide for payment to the county treasurer, from the general revenue fund, of the amount certified, which shall be credited upon receipt to the county's undivided income tax fund, and an amount equal to two per cent of the amount by which taxes were reduced, which shall be credited upon receipt to the county general fund as a payment to the county auditor and treasurer for the costs of administering the exemption provided under sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code. (B) On or before the second Monday in September of each year, the county treasurer shall certify to the tax commissioner the total amount by which the manufactured home taxes levied in that year were reduced pursuant to division (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, as evidenced by the certificates of reduction and the tax duplicate certified to the county treasurer by the county auditor. The commissioner, within ninety days after the receipt of such certifications, shall provide for payment to the county treasurer, from the general revenue fund, of the amount certified, which shall be credited upon receipt to the county's undivided income tax fund, and an amount equal to two per cent of the amount by which taxes were reduced, which shall be credited upon receipt to the county general fund as a payment to the county auditor and treasurer for the costs of administering the exemption provided under sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code. (C) Immediately upon receipt of funds into the county undivided income tax fund under this section, the auditor shall distribute the full amount thereof among the taxing districts in the county as though the total had been paid as taxes by each person for whom taxes were reduced under sections 323.151 to 323.159 of the Revised Code. Sec. 323.158. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying county" means a county to which both of the following apply: (1) At least one major league professional athletic team plays its home schedule in the county for the season beginning in 1996; (2) The majority of the electors of the county, voting at an election held in 1996, approved a referendum on a resolution of the board of county commissioners levying a sales and use tax under sections 5739.026 and 5741.023 of the Revised Code. (B) On or before December 31, 1996, the board of county commissioners of a qualifying county may adopt a resolution under this section. The resolution shall grant a partial real property tax exemption to each homestead in the county that also receives the tax reduction under division (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. The partial exemption shall take the form of the reduction by a specified percentage each year of the real property taxes on the homestead. The resolution shall specify the percentage, which may be any amount. The board may include in the resolution a condition that the partial exemption will apply only upon the receipt by the county of additional revenue from a source specified in the resolution. The resolution shall specify the tax year in which the partial exemption first applies, which may be the tax year in which the resolution takes effect as long as the resolution takes effect before the county auditor certifies the tax duplicate of real and public utility property for that tax year to the county treasurer. Upon adopting the resolution, the board shall certify copies of it to the county auditor and the tax commissioner. (C) After complying with sections 319.301, 319.302, 319.304, and 323.152 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall reduce the remaining sum to be levied against a homestead by the percentage called for in the resolution adopted under division (B) of this section. The auditor shall certify the amount of taxes remaining after the reduction to the county treasurer for collection as the real property taxes charged and payable on the homestead. (D) For each tax year, the county auditor shall certify to the board of county commissioners the total amount by which real property taxes were reduced under this section. At the time of each semi-annual settlement of real property taxes between the county auditor and county treasurer, the board of county commissioners shall pay to the auditor one-half of that total amount. Upon receipt of the payment, the county auditor shall distribute it among the various taxing districts in the county as if it had been levied, collected, and settled as real property taxes. The board of county commissioners shall make the payment from the county general fund or from any other county revenue that may be used for that purpose. In making the payment, the board may use revenue from taxes levied by the county to provide additional general revenue under sections 5739.021 and 5741.021 of the Revised Code or to provide additional revenue for the county general fund under sections 5739.026 and 5741.023 of the Revised Code. (E) The partial exemption under this section shall not directly or indirectly affect the determination of the principal amount of notes that may be issued in anticipation of a tax levy or the amount of securities that may be issued for any permanent improvements authorized in conjunction with a tax levy. (F) At any time, the board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution amending or repealing the partial exemption granted under this section. Upon adopting a resolution amending or repealing the partial exemption, the board shall certify copies of it to the county auditor and the tax commissioner. The resolution shall specify the tax year in which the amendment or repeal first applies, which may be the tax year in which the resolution takes effect as long as the resolution takes effect before the county auditor certifies the tax duplicate of real and public utility property for that tax year to the county treasurer. (G) If a person files a late application for a tax reduction under division (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code for the preceding year, and is granted the reduction, the person also shall receive the reduction under this section for the preceding year. The county auditor shall credit the amount of the reduction against the person's current year taxes, and shall include the amount of the reduction in the amount certified to the board of county commissioners under division (D) of this section. Sec. 323.611. (A) At the request of the county treasurer, a board of county commissioners may enter into a contract with any financial institution under which the financial institution, in accordance with the terms of the contract, receives real property and manufactured home tax payments at a post office box, opens the mail delivered to that box, processes the checks and other payments received in such mail and deposits them into the treasurer's account, and provides the county treasurer daily receipt information with respect to such payments. The contract shall not be entered into unless: (A) There is attached to the contract a certification by the auditor of state that the financial institution and the treasurer have given assurances satisfactory to the auditor of state that the records of the financial institution, to the extent that they relate to tax payments covered by the contract, shall be subject to audit by the auditor of state to the same extent as if the services for which the financial institution has agreed to perform were being performed by the treasurer; (B)(1) The contract is awarded in accordance with sections 307.86 to 307.92 of the Revised Code; (C)(2) The treasurer's surety bond includes within its coverage any loss that might occur as the result of the contract; (D)(3) The provisions of the contract do not conflict with accounting and reporting requirements prescribed by the auditor of state. (B) The records of the financial institution are subject to examination by the auditor of state to the same extent as if the services that the financial institution has agreed to perform were being performed by the treasurer of state. Sec. 325.18. (A) The salary amounts under sections 325.06 and 325.11 of the Revised Code shall be increased as follows: (1) Beginning in calendar year 2020 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 20282025, the salary amounts under sections 325.06 and 325.11 of the Revised Code shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (2) Beginning in calendar year 2026 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029, by five per cent. (B) The salary amounts under sections 325.03, 325.04, 325.08, 325.09, 325.10, 325.14, and 325.15 of the Revised Code shall be increased as follows: (1) Beginning in calendar year 2021 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 20282025, the salary amounts under sections 325.03, 325.04, 325.08, 325.09, 325.10, 325.14, and 325.15 of the Revised Code shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (2) Beginning in calendar year 2026 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029, by five per cent. (C) Notwithstanding this section and sections 325.06, 325.11, 325.14, and 325.15 of the Revised Code, when computing a salary for any elected county officer under any of those sections, if the population range for the class under which the officer is to be compensated is not the same as the population range for that class for any other such elected county office, the class at which the officer's salary is determined shall be the highest class at which any officer from that same county is compensated under the population range applicable to that officer. Sec. 325.25. Upon (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, upon notifying the board of county commissioners, any appointing authority of a county office, department, commission, board, or body, or of a common pleas court, county court, or county-operated municipal court as defined in section 1901.03 of the Revised Code, may establish a program to recognize outstanding employee performance. The program may include, but is not limited to, cash awards, additional paid leave, or other additional benefits as the appointing authority considers appropriate, so long as the . (B)(1) The costs of the program do shall not exceed the total amount of compensation fixed by the board of county commissioners for the office, department, commission, board, or body or for the common pleas court, county court, or county-operated municipal court. (2) Unless authorized in writing by the board of county commissioners, the total amount of cash awards shall not exceed, per employee in any calendar year, ten per cent of the compensation the employee receives that calendar year. Sec. 340.01. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Addiction," "addiction services," "alcohol and drug addiction services," "alcohol use disorder," "certifiable services and supports," "community addiction services provider," "community mental health services provider," "drug addiction," "gambling addiction services," "included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports," "mental health services," "mental illness," "recovery housing residence," and "recovery supports" have the same meanings as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Medication-assisted treatment" means alcohol and drug addiction services that are accompanied by medication approved by the United States food and drug administration for the treatment of alcohol use disorder or drug addiction, prevention of relapse, or both. (B) An alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district shall be established in any county or combination of counties having a population of at least fifty thousand. With the approval of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, any county or combination of counties having a population of less than fifty thousand may establish such a district. Districts comprising more than one county shall be known as joint-county districts. The board of county commissioners of any county participating in a joint-county district may submit a resolution requesting withdrawal from the district together with a comprehensive plan or plans that are in compliance with rules adopted by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.22 of the Revised Code to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, to the boards of county commissioners of each county in the district, and to the director. The plan or plans shall include all of the following: proposed bylaws for the operation of the newly established district; a list of potential board members; a list of the behavioral health services available in the newly established district, including inpatient, outpatient, prevention, and housing services; equitable adjustment and division of all services, assets, property, debts, and obligations of the former joint-county district; a plan ensuring no disruption in behavioral health services in the newly established district; and provision for the employment of an executive director of the newly established district. The director shall approve the plan not later than one year after the date the resolution was adopted by the board of county commissioners. No county participating in a joint-county district may withdraw from the district without the consent of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services nor earlier than one year after the submission of such resolution unless all of the participating counties agree to an earlier withdrawal. Any county withdrawing from a joint-county district shall continue to have levied against its tax list and duplicate any tax levied by the district during the period in which the county was a member of the district until such time as the levy expires or is renewed or replaced. (C) For any tax levied under section 5705.19 of the Revised Code by a board of a joint-county district formed on or after April 3, 2023, revenue from the tax shall only be expended for the benefit of the residents of the county from which the revenue is derived. For the purpose of this division, a joint-county district is not formed by virtue of a county joining or withdrawing from a district or if a joint-county service district merges with another joint-county district. Sec. 340.011. (A) This chapter shall be interpreted to accomplish all of the following: (1) Establish a unified system of treatment for persons with mental illnesses and persons with addictions; (2) Establish a community support system available for every alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district; (3) Protect the personal liberty of persons with mental illnesses so that they may be treated in the least restrictive environment; (4) Encourage the development of high quality, cost effective, and comprehensive services, including culturally sensitive services; (5) Foster the development of comprehensive community mental health services, based on recognized local needs, especially for persons with severe mental disabilities; (6) Ensure that services provided meet minimum standards established by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (7) Promote the delivery of high quality and cost-effective addiction and mental health services; (8) Promote the participation of persons receiving mental health services and addiction services in the planning, delivery, and evaluation of these services. (B) Nothing in Chapter 340., 5119., or 5122. of the Revised Code shall be construed as requiring a board of county commissioners to provide resources beyond the total amount set forth in a budget and list of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports required by section 340.08 of the Revised Code and approved by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 340.02. (A) For each alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district, there shall be appointed a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. As provided in this section, the board shall consist of eighteen members, fifteen members, fourteen members, twelve members, or nine members. In a single-county district, the size of the board shall be determined by the board of county commissioners representing the county that constitutes the district. In a joint-county district, the size of the board shall be determined jointly by all of the boards of county commissioners representing the counties that constitute the district. The determination of board size shall be made by selecting one of the options described in division (B) of this section. After an option is selected and implemented, a subsequent determination of board size may be made, except that subsequent determinations shall not occur more frequently than once every four calendar years. If a selected option would result in a change in board size, before the option may be implemented the board of county commissioners or boards of county commissioners, as the case may be, shall send a representative to a meeting of the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to solicit feedback about the matter. After considering any feedback received, the board or boards of county commissioners may proceed with implementing the change in board size. If the change results in a reduction of board members, the reduction shall be implemented by not filling vacancies as they occur. To implement a selected option that would result in the establishment of a new board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or in a change in size of an existing board, the board or boards of county commissioners, as the case may be, shall adopt a resolution specifying the board size that has been selected. The board or boards of county commissioners also shall notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services of the board size that has been selected. (B)(1) In the case of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that is established on or after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, any of the following options may be selected for purposes of division (A) of this section: (a) To establish the board as an eighteen-member board; (b) To establish the board as a fifteen-member board; (c) To establish the board as a fourteen-member board; (d) To establish the board as a twelve-member board; (e) To establish the board as a nine-member board; (f) To change the board's size after it has been established by selecting a number of members that is eighteen, fifteen, fourteen, twelve, or nine, as the case may be. (2) In the case of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that existed immediately prior to the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, either of the following options may be selected for purposes of division (A) of this section: (a) To continue the board's operation as an eighteen-member or fourteen-member board, as a board of that size was authorized prior to the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, in which case no further action is required; (b) To change the board's size by selecting a number of members that is eighteen, fifteen, fourteen, twelve, or nine as the case may be. (C) All members shall be residents of the service district. The membership shall, as nearly as possible, reflect the composition of the population of the service district as to race and sex. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall appoint one-third of the members of the board and the board of county commissioners shall appoint two-thirds of the members. In a joint-county district, the board of county commissioners of each participating county shall appoint members in as nearly as possible the same proportion as that county's population bears to the total population of the district, except that at least one member shall be appointed from each participating county. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall ensure that at least one member of the board is a clinician with experience in the delivery of mental health services, at least one member of the board is a person who has received or is receiving mental health services, at least one member of the board is a parent or other relative of such a person, at least one member of the board is a clinician with experience in the delivery of addiction services, at least one member of the board is a person who has received or is receiving addiction services, and at least one member of the board is a parent or other relative of such a person. A single member who meets both qualifications may fulfill the requirement for a clinician with experience in the delivery of mental health services and a clinician with experience in the delivery of addiction services. No member or employee of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall serve as a member of the board of any provider with which the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services has entered into a contract for the provision of services or facilities. No member of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall be an employee of any provider with which the board has entered into a contract for the provision of services or facilities. No person shall be an employee of a board and such a provider unless the board and provider both agree in writing. No person shall serve as a member of the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services whose spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law serves as a member of the board of any provider with which the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services has entered into a contract for the provision of services or facilities. No person shall serve as a member or employee of the board whose spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, stepparent, stepchild, stepbrother, stepsister, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law serves as a county commissioner of a county or counties in the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district. Each year each board member shall attend at least one inservice training session provided or approved by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Each member shall be appointed for a term of four years, commencing the first day of July, except that when a board is established on or after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, the initial appointments shall be staggered among the members as equally as possible with terms of two years, three years, and four years. No member shall serve more than two consecutive four-year terms under the same appointing authority. A member may serve for three consecutive terms under the same appointing authority only if one of the terms is for less than two years. A member who has served two consecutive four-year terms or three consecutive terms totaling less than ten years is eligible for reappointment by the same appointing authority one year following the end of the second or third term, respectively. When a vacancy occurs, appointment for the expired or unexpired term shall be made in the same manner as an original appointment. The board shall notify the appointing authority either by certified mail or, if the board has record of an internet identifier of record associated with the authority, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record of any vacancy and shall fill the vacancy within sixty days following that notice. As used in this paragraph, "internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. Any member of the board may be removed from office by the appointing authority at will. Before a member may be removed at will, the member shall be informed in writing of the proposed removal and afforded an opportunity for a public hearing. Upon the absence of a member within one year from either four board meetings or from two board meetings without prior notice, the board shall notify the appointing authority, which may vacate the appointment and appoint another person to complete the member's term. Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, as defined by rules of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Sec. 340.021. (A) In an alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district where the board of county commissioners has established an alcohol and drug addiction services board, the community mental health board established under former section 340.02 of the Revised Code shall serve as the entity responsible for providing mental health services in the county. A community mental health board has all the powers, duties, and obligations of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services with regard to mental health services. An alcohol and drug addiction services board has all the powers, duties, and obligations of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services with regard to addiction services. Any provision of the Revised Code that refers to a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services with regard to mental health services also refers to a community mental health board and any provision that refers to a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services with regard to alcohol and drug addiction services also refers to an alcohol and drug addiction services board. An alcohol and drug addiction services board shall consist of eighteen members or fourteen members, at the election of the board. Not later than January 1, 2014, each alcohol and drug addiction services board shall notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services of its election to operate as an eighteen-member board or to operate as a fourteen-member board. The election shall be final. Failure to provide notice of its election to the department on or before January 1, 2014, shall constitute an election to continue to operate as an eighteen-member board. If an existing board provides timely notice of its election to operate as a fourteen-member board, the number of board members may decline from eighteen to fourteen by attrition as current members' terms expire. However, the composition of the board must reflect the requirements set forth in this section and in applicable provisions of section 340.02 of the Revised Code for fourteen-member boards. For boards operating as eighteen-member boards, six members shall be appointed by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services and twelve members shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall ensure that at least one member of the board is a person who has received or is receiving services for alcohol, drug, or gambling addiction, at least one member is a parent or relative of such a person, and at least one member is a clinician with experience in the delivery of addiction services. The membership of the board shall, as nearly as possible, reflect the composition of the population of the service district as to race and sex. Members shall be residents of the service district and shall be interested in alcohol, drug, or gambling addiction services. Requirements for membership, including prohibitions against certain family and business relationships, and terms of office shall be the same as those for members of boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. A community mental health board shall consist of eighteen members or fourteen members, at the election of the board. Not later than January 1, 2014, each community mental health board shall notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services of its election to operate as an eighteen-member board or to operate as a fourteen-member board. The election shall be final. Failure to provide notice of its election to the department on or before January 1, 2014, shall constitute an election to continue to operate as an eighteen-member board. If an existing board provides timely notice of its election to operate as a fourteen-member board, the number of board members may decline from eighteen to fourteen by attrition as current members' terms expire. However, the composition of the board must reflect the requirements set forth in this section and in applicable provisions of section 340.02 of the Revised Code for fourteen-member boards. For boards operating as eighteen-member boards, six members shall be appointed by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services and twelve members shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall ensure that at least one member of the board is a person who has received or is receiving mental health services, at least one member is a parent or relative of such a person, and at least one member is a clinician with experience in the delivery of mental health services. The membership of the board as nearly as possible shall reflect the composition of the population of the service district as to race and sex. Members shall be residents of the service district and shall be interested in mental health services. Requirements for membership, including prohibitions against certain family and business relationships, and terms of office shall be the same as those for members of boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. (B)(1) If a board of county commissioners subject to division (A) of this section did not adopt a final resolution providing for a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services on or before July 1, 2007, the board of county commissioners may establish a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services on or after September 23, 2008. To establish the board, the board of county commissioners shall adopt a resolution providing for the board's establishment. The composition of the board, the procedures for appointing members, and all other matters related to the board and its members are subject to section 340.02 of the Revised Code, with the following exceptions: (a) For initial appointments to the board, the county's community mental health board and alcohol and drug addiction services board shall jointly recommend members of those boards for reappointment and shall submit the recommendations to the board of county commissioners and the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (b) The appointing authorities shall appoint the initial members from among the members jointly recommended under division (B)(1)(a) of this section unless the appointment is otherwise prohibited by law. (2) If a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services is established pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, the board has the same rights, privileges, immunities, powers, and duties that were possessed by the county's community mental health board and alcohol and drug addiction services board. When the board is established, all property and obligations of the community mental health board and alcohol and drug addiction services board shall be transferred to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. Sec. 340.022. Notwithstanding the procedures established by section 340.02 of the Revised Code for determining the size of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, the size of a board shall be determined in accordance with this section in both of the following circumstances: (A)(1) If the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services during the period beginning January 1, 2021, and ending December 31, 2022, grants approval to a board of county commissioners of a county with a population of at least seventy thousand but not more than eighty thousand, according to data from the 2010 federal census, to withdraw from a joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district pursuant to section 340.01 of the Revised Code, the size of the board shall be determined by the board of county commissioners representing the county that constitutes the single-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district created as a result of the withdrawal. The determination shall be made from among the options that may be selected under division (A)(2) of this section. Once an option is selected, the board of county commissioners shall adopt a resolution specifying the selection that has been made and shall notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. After the resolution is adopted and the department is notified, the determination of size is final. (2) In the case of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that is established on or after the date the director grants the approval to withdraw described in division (A)(1) of this section, either of the following options may be selected by the board of county commissioners when making the determination required under that division: (a) To establish the board as an eighteen-member board; (b) To establish the board as a fourteen-member board. (3) When a board is established on or after September 30, 2021, the initial appointments shall be staggered among the members as equally as possible with terms of two years, three years, and four years. (B)(1) If a county with a population of at least thirty-five thousand but not more than forty-five thousand, according to data from the 2010 federal census, joins an existing alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district during the period beginning on June 30, 2021, and ending June 30, 2023, the existing board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving that district may elect to expand its membership to eighteen members if the existing board has fourteen members. (2) The option to expand the board, as provided in division (B)(1) of this section, is available only during the twelve-month period beginning on the date the county with a population of at least thirty-five thousand but not more than forty-five thousand joins the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district served by the board. The additional members shall be appointed in the manner specified in section 340.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 340.03. (A) Subject to rules issued by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services after consultation with relevant constituencies as required by division (A)(10) of section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall: (1) Serve as the community addiction and mental health planning agency for the county or counties under its jurisdiction, and in so doing it shall: (a) Evaluate the need for facility services, addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports; (b) In cooperation with other local and regional planning and funding bodies and with relevant ethnic organizations, evaluate strengths and challenges and set priorities for addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports. A board shall include treatment and prevention services when setting priorities for addiction services and mental health services. When a board sets priorities for addiction services, the board shall consult with the county commissioners of the counties in the board's service district regarding the services described in section 340.15 of the Revised Code and shall give priority to those services, except that those services shall not have a priority over services provided to pregnant women under programs developed in relation to the mandate established in section 5119.17 of the Revised Code. (c) In accordance with guidelines issued by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services under division (F) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code, annually develop and submit to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services a community addiction and mental health plan that addresses both of the following: (i) The needs of all residents of the service district currently receiving inpatient services in state-operated hospitals, the needs of other populations as required by state or federal law or programs, and the needs of all children subject to a determination made pursuant to section 121.38 of the Revised Code; (ii) The department's priorities for facility services, addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports during the period for which the plan will be in effect. The department shall inform all of the boards of the department's priorities in a timely manner that enables the boards to know the department's priorities before the boards develop and submit the plans. In alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service districts that have separate alcohol and drug addiction services and community mental health boards, the alcohol and drug addiction services board shall submit a community addiction plan and the community mental health board shall submit a community mental health plan. Each board shall consult with its counterpart in developing its plan and address the interaction between the local addiction and mental health systems and populations with regard to needs and priorities in developing its plan. The department shall approve or disapprove the plan, in whole or in part, in accordance with division (G) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. Eligibility for state and federal funding shall be contingent upon an approved plan or relevant part of a plan. If a board determines that it is necessary to amend an approved plan, the board shall submit a proposed amendment to the director. The director shall approve or disapprove all or part of the amendment in accordance with division (H) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. The board shall operate in accordance with the plan approved by the department. (d) Promote, arrange, and implement working agreements with social service agencies, both public and private, and with judicial agencies. (2) Investigate, or request another agency to investigate, any complaint alleging abuse or neglect of any person receiving addiction services, mental health services, or recovery supports from a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider or alleging abuse or neglect of a resident receiving addiction services or with mental illness or severe mental disability residing in a residential facility licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code. If the investigation substantiates the charge of abuse or neglect, the board shall take whatever action it determines is necessary to correct the situation, including notification of the appropriate authorities. Upon request, the board shall provide information about such investigations to the department. (3) For the purpose of section 5119.36 of the Revised Code, cooperate with the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services in visiting and evaluating whether the certifiable services and supports of a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider satisfy the certification standards established by rules adopted under that section. In addition, a board may provide input and recommendations to the department when an application for certification or the renewal of a certification has been submitted by a provider or when a provider is being investigated by the department, if the board, in either of those circumstances, is aware of information that would be beneficial to the department's consideration of the matter. (4) In accordance with criteria established under division (D) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code, conduct program audits that review and evaluate the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports provided by community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers under contract with the board and submit the board's findings and recommendations to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (5) In accordance with section 5119.34 of the Revised Code, review an application for a residential facility license and provide to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services any information about the applicant or facility that the board would like the department to consider in reviewing the application; (6) Audit, in accordance with rules adopted by the auditor of state pursuant to section 117.20 of the Revised Code, at least annually all programs, addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports provided under contract with the board. In so doing, the board may contract for or employ the services of private auditors. A copy of the fiscal audit report shall be provided to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, the auditor of state, and the county auditor of each county in the board's district. (7) Recruit and promote local financial support for addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports from private and public sources; (8) In accordance with guidelines issued by the department as necessary to comply with state and federal laws pertaining to financial assistance, approve fee schedules and related charges or adopt a unit cost schedule or other methods of payment for addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports provided by community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers that have contracted with the board under section 340.036 of the Revised Code; (9) Submit to the director and the county commissioners of the county or counties served by the board, and make available to the public, an annual report of the addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports under the jurisdiction of the board, including a fiscal accounting; (10) Establish a method for evaluating referrals for court-ordered treatment and affidavits filed pursuant to section 5122.11 of the Revised Code in order to assist the probate division of the court of common pleas in determining whether there is probable cause that a respondent is subject to court-ordered treatment and whether alternatives to hospitalization are available and appropriate; (11) Designate the treatment services, provider, facility, or other placement for each person involuntarily committed to the board pursuant to Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code. The board shall provide the least restrictive and most appropriate alternative that is available for any person involuntarily committed to it and shall assure that the list of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports submitted and approved in accordance with division (B) of section 340.08 of the Revised Code are available to persons with severe mental disabilities residing within its service district. The board shall establish the procedure for authorizing payment for the services and supports, which may include prior authorization in appropriate circumstances. In accordance with section 340.037 of the Revised Code, the board may provide addiction services and mental health services directly to a person with a severe mental disability when life or safety is endangered and when no community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider is available to provide the service. (12) Ensure that housing built, subsidized, renovated, rented, owned, or leased by the board or a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider has been approved as meeting minimum fire safety standards and that persons residing in the housing have access to appropriate and necessary services, including culturally relevant services, from a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider. This division does not apply to residential facilities licensed pursuant to section 5119.34 of the Revised Code. (13) Establish a mechanism for obtaining advice and involvement of persons receiving addiction services, mental health services, or recovery supports on matters pertaining to services and supports in the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district; (14) Perform the duties required by rules adopted under section 5119.22 of the Revised Code regarding referrals by the board or community mental health services providers under contract with the board of individuals with mental illness or severe mental disability to class two residential facilities licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code and effective arrangements for ongoing mental health services for the individuals. The board is accountable in the manner specified in the rules for ensuring that the ongoing mental health services are effectively arranged for the individuals. (B) Each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall establish such rules, operating procedures, standards, and bylaws, and perform such other duties as may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. (C) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services may receive by gift, grant, devise, or bequest any moneys, lands, or property for the benefit of the purposes for which the board is established, and may hold and apply it according to the terms of the gift, grant, or bequest. All money received, including accrued interest, by gift, grant, or bequest shall be deposited in the treasury of the county, the treasurer of which is custodian of the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services funds to the credit of the board and shall be available for use by the board for purposes stated by the donor or grantor. (D) No member or employee of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall be liable for injury or damages caused by any action or inaction taken within the scope of the member's official duties or the employee's employment, whether or not such action or inaction is expressly authorized by this section or any other section of the Revised Code, unless such action or inaction constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code applies to any action or inaction by a member or employee of a board taken within the scope of the member's official duties or employee's employment. For the purposes of this division, the conduct of a member or employee shall not be considered willful or wanton misconduct if the member or employee acted in good faith and in a manner that the member or employee reasonably believed was in or was not opposed to the best interests of the board and, with respect to any criminal action or proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful. (E) The meetings held by any committee established by a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall be considered to be meetings of a public body subject to section 121.22 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services may establish a rule, operating procedure, standard, or bylaw to allow the executive director of the board to execute both of the following types of contracts valued at twenty-five thousand dollars or less, as determined by the board, on behalf of the board without the board's prior approval: (a) Emergency contracts for clinical services or recovery support services; (b) Standard service contracts pertaining to the board's operations. (2) If a board establishes a rule, operating procedure, standard, or bylaw under division (F)(1) of this section, both of the following shall be the case: (a) The board shall define the scope of contracts described in divisions (F)(1)(a) and (b) of this section in that rule, operating procedure, standard, or bylaw. (b) The board shall disclose the existence of a contract executed pursuant to the rule, operating procedure, standard, or bylaw at the first board meeting that occurs after the contract was executed and ensure that a record of that disclosure is included in the written minutes of that meeting. Sec. 340.032. Subject to rules adopted by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services after consultation with relevant constituencies as required by division (A)(10) of section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall do all of the following: (A) Establish, to the extent resources are available, a community-based continuum of care that includes all of the following as essential elements: (1) Prevention and wellness management services; (2) At least both of the following outreach and engagement activities: (a) Locating persons in need of addiction services and persons in need of mental health services to inform them of available addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports; (b) Helping persons who receive addiction services and persons who receive mental health services obtain services necessary to meet basic human needs for food, clothing, shelter, medical care, personal safety, and income. (3) Assessment services; (4) Care coordination; (5) Residential services; (6) At least the following outpatient services: (a) Nonintensive; (b) Intensive, such as partial hospitalization and assertive community treatment; (c) Withdrawal management; (d) Emergency and crisis. (7) Where appropriate, at least the following inpatient services: (a) Psychiatric care; (b) Medically managed alcohol or drug treatment. (8) At least all of the following recovery supports: (a) Peer support; (b) A wide range of housing and support services, including recovery housing residences; (c) Employment, vocational, and educational opportunities; (d) Assistance with social, personal, and living skills; (e) Multiple paths to recovery such as twelve-step approaches and parent advocacy connection; (f) Support, assistance, consultation, and education for families, friends, and persons receiving addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports. (9) In accordance with section 340.033 of the Revised Code, an array of addiction services and recovery supports for all levels of opioid and co-occurring drug addiction; (10) Any additional elements the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, pursuant to section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, determines are necessary to establish the community-based continuum of care. (B) Ensure that the rights of persons receiving any elements of the community-based continuum of care are protected; (C) Ensure that persons receiving any elements of the community-based continuum of care are able to utilize grievance procedures applicable to the elements. Sec. 340.034. All of the following apply to recovery housing residences required by section 340.033 of the Revised Code to be part of included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports: (A) A recovery housing residence shall comply with the requirements of being monitored by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under sections 5119.39 to 5119.396 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted under section 5119.397 of the Revised Code, but the residence is not subject to residential facility licensure by the department under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code. (B) A recovery housing residence shall not be operated by a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services unless any of the following applies: (1) The board operated the recovery housing residence on July 1, 2017. (2) The board utilizes local funds in the development or operation of the recovery housing residence. (3) The board determines that there is a need for the board to assume operation of the recovery housing residence, such as when an existing operator of the residence goes out of business and the board considers the assumption of operation of the residence to be in the best interest of the community. (C) A recovery housing residence shall have protocols for all of the following: (1) Administrative oversight; (2) Quality standards; (3) Policies and procedures, including house rules, for its residents to which the residents must agree to adhere. (D) Family members of a resident of a recovery housing residence may reside in the residence to the extent permitted by protocols of the residence. (E) A recovery housing residence shall not limit a resident's duration of stay to an arbitrary or fixed amount of time. Instead, each resident's duration of stay shall be determined by the resident's needs, progress, and willingness to abide by the residence's protocols, in collaboration with the residence's operator, and, if appropriate, in consultation and integration with a community addiction services provider. (F) A recovery housing residence may permit its residents to receive medication-assisted treatment. (G) A resident of a recovery housing residence may receive addiction services that are certified by the department under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. Sec. 340.036. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section and rules adopted by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services after consultation with relevant constituencies as required by division (A)(10) of section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall enter into contracts with all of the following: (1) Public and private facilities for the operation of facility services; (2) Community addiction services providers for addiction services and recovery supports; (3) Community mental health services providers for mental health services and recovery supports. (B) No board shall do any of the following: (1) Contract with a residential facility required to be licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code unless the facility is so licensed; (2) Contract with a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider for certifiable services and supports unless the certifiable services and supports are certified under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code; (3) Contract with a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider for recovery supports that are required by the director to meet quality criteria or core competencies unless the recovery supports meet the criteria or competencies. (C) When a board contracts with a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider for addiction services, mental health services, or recovery supports, all of the following apply: (1) The board shall consider both of the following: (a) The cost effectiveness and quality of the provider's services and supports; (b) Continuity of care. (2) The board may review cost elements, including salary costs, of the services and supports. (3) The board may establish, in a way that is most effective and efficient in meeting local needs, a utilization review process as part of the contract. (4) The board may contract with a government entity, for-profit entity, or nonprofit entity. Any such entity may be faith-based. (D) If a party to a contract entered into under this section proposes not to renew the contract or proposes substantial changes in contract terms, the other party shall be given written notice at least one hundred twenty days before the expiration date of the contract. During the first sixty days of this one-hundred-twenty-day period, both parties shall attempt to resolve any dispute through good faith collaboration and negotiation in order to continue to provide services and supports to persons in need. If the dispute has not been resolved sixty days before the expiration date of the contract, either party may notify the director of the unresolved dispute. The director may require both parties to submit the dispute to another entity with the cost to be shared by the parties. Not later than twenty days before the expiration date of the contract or a later date to which both parties agree, the other entity shall issue to the parties and director recommendations on how the dispute may be resolved. The director shall adopt rules establishing the procedures of this dispute resolution process. (E) Section 307.86 of the Revised Code does not apply to contracts entered into under this section. Sec. 340.037. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section and rules adopted by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services after consultation with relevant constituencies as required by division (A)(10) of section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services may operate a facility or provide an addiction service or mental health service if both of the following apply: (1) The director gives the board prior approval; (2) There is no other qualified private or public facility, community addiction services provider, or community mental health services provider that is immediately available and willing to operate such a facility or provide the service. (B)(1) In an emergency situation, a board may operate a facility or provide an addiction service or mental health service in order to provide essential services for the duration of the emergency. (2) In a service district with a population of at least one hundred thousand but less than five hundred thousand, a board may operate a facility or provide an addiction service or mental health service for not longer than one year. (3) In a service district with a population of less than one hundred thousand, a board may operate a facility or provide an addiction service or mental health service for not longer than one year, except that the board may operate a facility or provide an addiction service or mental health service for more than one year with the prior approval of both of the following: (a) The director; (b) The board of county commissioners with jurisdiction over the service district or, if the service district is a joint-county district, a majority of the boards of county commissioners with jurisdiction over the district. (C) The director shall not do any of the following: (1) Except in an emergency situation, give a board approval to operate a facility or provide an addiction service or mental health service unless the director determines that it is not feasible to have the department operate the facility or provide the service; (2) Give a board that serves a service district with a population of less than one hundred thousand approval to operate a facility or provide an addiction service or mental health service unless the director determines that the board will provide greater administrative efficiency and more or better services than would be available if the board contracted with a private or public facility, community addiction services provider, or community mental health services provider; (3) Give a board approval to operate a facility previously operated by a person or other government entity unless the board has established to the director's satisfaction that the person or other government entity cannot effectively operate the facility or that the person or other government entity has requested the board to take over operation of the facility; (4) Give a board approval to provide an addiction service or mental health service previously provided by a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider unless the board has established to the director's satisfaction that the provider cannot effectively provide the service or that the provider has requested the board to take over providing the service. (D) The director shall review and evaluate a board's operation of a facility and provision of addiction services or mental health services under this section. (E) Nothing in this section authorizes a board to administer or direct the daily operation of any facility, community addiction services provider, or community mental health services provider. However, a facility or provider may contract with a board to receive administrative services or staff direction from the board under the direction of the governing body of the facility or provider. Sec. 340.04. Each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall employ a qualified mental health or addiction services professional with experience in administration or a professional administrator with experience in mental health services or addiction services to serve as executive director of the board and shall prescribe the director's duties. The board shall fix the compensation of the executive director. In addition to such compensation, the director shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the director's official duties. The board, by majority vote of the full membership, may remove the director for cause at any time, contingent upon any written contract between the board and the executive director, upon written charges, after an opportunity has been afforded the director for a hearing before the board on request. The board may delegate to its executive director the authority to act in its behalf in the performance of its administrative duties. As used in this section, "mental health professional" and "addiction services professional" mean an individual who is qualified to work with persons with mental illnesses or persons receiving addiction services, pursuant to standards established by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 340.041. In addition to such other duties as may be lawfully imposed, the executive director of a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall: (A) Serve as executive officer of the board and, subject to the prior approval of the board for each contract, except contracts, if any, to which division (F) of section 340.03 of the Revised Code applies, execute contracts on its behalf; (B) Supervise addiction services, mental health services, recovery supports, and facilities provided, operated, contracted, or supported by the board to the extent of determining that services, supports, and facilities are being administered in conformity with this chapter and rules of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (C) Provide consultation to community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers; (D) Recommend to the board the changes necessary to increase the effectiveness of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports and other matters necessary or desirable to carry out this chapter; (E) Employ and remove from office such employees and consultants in the classified civil service and, subject to the approval of the board, employ and remove from office such other employees and consultants as may be necessary for the work of the board, and fix their compensation and reimbursement within the limits set by the salary schedule and the budget approved by the board; (F) Encourage the development and expansion of preventive, treatment, and consultative services, as well as recovery supports, in the fields of addiction services and mental health services with emphasis on continuity of care; (G) Prepare for board approval an annual report of the addiction services, mental health services, recovery supports, and facilities under the jurisdiction of the board, including a fiscal accounting of all services and supports; (H) Conduct such studies as may be necessary and practicable for the promotion of mental health, promotion of addiction services, and the prevention of mental illness, emotional disorders, and addiction; (I) Authorize the county auditor, or in a joint-county district the county auditor designated as the auditor for the district, to issue warrants for the payment of board obligations approved by the board, provided that all payments from funds distributed to the board by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services are in accordance with the budget submitted pursuant to section 340.08 of the Revised Code, as approved by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Sec. 340.05. If a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider receives a complaint alleging abuse or neglect of an individual with mental illness or severe mental disability, or an individual receiving addiction services, who resides in a residential facility licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code, the provider shall report the complaint to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district in which the residential facility is located. A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that receives such a report from a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider of such a complaint shall report the complaint to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services for the purpose of the director conducting an investigation under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code. The board may enter the facility with or without the director and, if the health and safety of a resident is in immediate danger, take any necessary action to protect the resident. The board's action shall not violate any resident's rights specified in rules adopted by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code. The board shall immediately report to the director regarding the board's actions under this section. Sec. 340.07. The board of county commissioners of any county participating in an alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district or joint-county district, upon receipt from the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services of a resolution so requesting, may appropriate money to such board for the operation, lease, acquisition, construction, renovation, and maintenance of community addiction services providers, community mental health services providers, and facilities in accordance with the budget required by section 340.08 of the Revised Code and approved by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services pursuant to section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 340.08. In accordance with rules or guidelines issued by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall do all of the following: (A) Submit to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services a proposed budget of receipts and expenditures for all federal, state, and local moneys the board expects to receive. (1) The proposed budget shall identify funds the board has available for included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports. (2) The proposed budget shall identify funds the board and public children services agencies in the board's service district have available to fund jointly the services described in section 340.15 of the Revised Code. (3) The board's proposed budget for expenditures of state and federal funds distributed to the board by the department shall be deemed an application for funds, and the department shall approve or disapprove the budget for these expenditures in whole or in part in accordance with division (G) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. If a board determines that it is necessary to amend an approved budget, the board shall submit a proposed amendment to the director. The director shall approve or disapprove all or part of the amendment in accordance with division (H) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. (B) Submit to the department a proposed list of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports the board intends to make available. The board shall include the services and supports required by section 340.032 of the Revised Code to be included in the community-based continuum of care and the services required by section 340.15 of the Revised Code. The board shall explain the manner in which the board intends to make such services and supports available. The list shall be compatible with the budget submitted pursuant to division (A) of this section. The department shall approve or disapprove the list in whole or in part in accordance with division (G) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. If a board determines that it is necessary to amend an approved list, the board shall submit a proposed amendment to the director. The director shall approve or disapprove all or part of the amendment in accordance with division (H) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. (C) Enter into a continuity of care agreement with the state institution operated by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and designated as the institution serving the district encompassing the board's service district. The continuity of care agreement shall outline the department's and the board's responsibilities to plan for and coordinate with each other to address the needs of board residents who are patients in the institution, with an emphasis on managing appropriate hospital bed day use and discharge planning. The continuity of care agreement shall not require the board to provide addiction services, mental health services, or recovery supports other than those on the list of services and supports submitted by the board pursuant to division (B) of this section and approved by the department in accordance with division (G) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. (D) In conjunction with the department, operate a coordinated system for tracking and monitoring persons found not guilty by reason of insanity and committed pursuant to section 2945.40 of the Revised Code who have been granted a conditional release and persons found incompetent to stand trial and committed pursuant to section 2945.39 of the Revised Code who have been granted a conditional release. The system shall do all of the following: (1) Centralize responsibility for the tracking of those persons; (2) Provide for uniformity in monitoring those persons; (3) Provide a mechanism to allow prompt rehospitalization, reinstitutionalization, or detention when a violation of the conditional release or decompensation occurs. (E) Submit to the department a report summarizing all of the following: (1) Complaints and grievances received by the board concerning the rights of persons seeking or receiving addiction services, mental health services, or recovery supports; (2) Investigations of the complaints and grievances; (3) Outcomes of the investigations. (F) Provide to the department information to be submitted to the community behavioral health information system or systems established by the department under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code. (G) Annually, and upon any change in membership, submit to the department a list of all current members of the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, including the appointing authority for each member, and the member's specific qualification for appointment pursuant to section 340.02 or 340.021 of the Revised Code, if applicable. (H) Submit to the department other information as is reasonably required for purposes of the department's operations, service evaluation, reporting activities, research, system administration, and oversight. (I) Annually update and publish on the board's web site a list of all opioid treatment programs licensed under section 5119.37 of the Revised Code that are operating within the board's district, based on information obtained from any of the following: (1) The federal substance abuse and mental health services administration's opioid treatment program directory; (2) A resource directory created by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (3) The list maintained by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services pursuant to division (P) of section 5119.37 of the Revised Code. Sec. 340.09. (A) Using funds the general assembly appropriates for these purposes, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall provide any county assistance for one or more of the following: (1) The operation of the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the county; (2) The provision of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports included in the board's list of services and supports required by section 340.08 of the Revised Code and approved by the department under section 5119.22 of the Revised Code; (3) The provision of approved support functions; (4) The partnership in, or support for, approved community-based continuum of care-related activities. (B) Support functions may include the following: (1) Consultation; (2) Research; (3) Administrative; (4) Referral and information; (5) Training; (6) Service and program evaluation. Sec. 340.12. As used in this section, "disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. No board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or any community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider under contract with such a board shall discriminate in the provision of addiction services, mental health services, or recovery supports under its authority, in employment, or under a contract on the basis of race, color, religion, ancestry, military status, sex, age, national origin, or disability. Each board, community addiction services provider, and community mental health services provider shall have a written affirmative action program. The affirmative action program shall include goals for the employment and effective utilization of, including contracts with, members of economically disadvantaged groups as defined in division (E)(1) of section 122.71 of the Revised Code in percentages reflecting as nearly as possible the composition of the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district served by the board. Each board and provider shall file a description of the affirmative action program and a progress report on its implementation with the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Sec. 340.13. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Minority business enterprise" has the same meaning as in section 122.71 of the Revised Code. (2) "EDGE business enterprise" has the same meaning as in section 122.922 of the Revised Code. (B) Any minority business enterprise that desires to bid on a contract under division (C) of this section shall first apply to the department of development for certification as a minority business enterprise. Any EDGE business enterprise that desires to bid on a contract under division (D) of this section shall first apply to the department of development for certification as an EDGE business enterprise. The director of development shall approve the application of any minority business enterprise or EDGE business enterprise that complies with the rules adopted under section 122.71 or 122.922 of the Revised Code, respectively. The director shall prepare and maintain a list of minority business enterprises and EDGE business enterprises certified under those sections. (C) From the contracts to be awarded for the purchases of equipment, materials, supplies, or services, other than contracts entered into under section 340.036 of the Revised Code, each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall select a number of contracts with an aggregate value of approximately fifteen per cent of the total estimated value of contracts to be awarded in the current fiscal year. The board shall set aside the contracts so selected for bidding by minority business enterprises only. The bidding procedures for such contracts shall be the same as for all other contracts awarded under section 307.86 of the Revised Code, except that only minority business enterprises certified and listed pursuant to division (B) of this section shall be qualified to submit bids. (D) To the extent that a board is authorized to enter into contracts for construction, the board shall strive to attain a yearly contract dollar procurement goal the aggregate value of which equals approximately five per cent of the aggregate value of construction contracts for the current fiscal year for EDGE business enterprises only. (E)(1) In the case of contracts set aside under division (C) of this section, if no bid is submitted by a minority business enterprise, the contract shall be awarded according to normal bidding procedures. The board shall from time to time set aside such additional contracts as are necessary to replace those contracts previously set aside on which no minority business enterprise bid. (2) If a board, after having made a good faith effort, is unable to comply with the goal of procurement for contracting with EDGE business enterprises pursuant to division (D) of this section, the board may apply in writing, on a form prescribed by the department of administrative services, to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services for a waiver or modification of the goal. (F) This section does not preclude any minority business enterprise or EDGE business enterprise from bidding on any other contract not specifically set aside for minority business enterprises or subject to procurement goals for EDGE business enterprises. (G) Within ninety days after the beginning of each fiscal year, each board shall file a report with the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services that shows for that fiscal year the name of each minority business enterprise and EDGE business enterprise with which the board entered into a contract, the value and type of each such contract, the total value of contracts awarded under divisions (C) and (D) of this section, the total value of contracts awarded for the purchases of equipment, materials, supplies, or services, other than contracts entered into under section 340.036 of the Revised Code, and the total value of contracts entered into for construction. (H) Any person who intentionally misrepresents self as owning, controlling, operating, or participating in a minority business enterprise or an EDGE business enterprise for the purpose of obtaining contracts or any other benefits under this section shall be guilty of theft by deception as provided for in section 2913.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 340.16. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and the department of medicaid shall adopt rules that establish requirements and procedures for prior notification and service coordination between public children services agencies and boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services when a public children services agency refers a child in its custody to a board for services funded by the board. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 345.01. (A) As used in this chapter, "the county auditor's appraised market value" has the same meaning as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The taxing authority of any municipal corporation, township, or county, at any time not less than one hundred days prior to a general election in any year, by a vote of two-thirds of all members of the taxing authority, may, and upon presentation to the clerk or fiscal officer, as the case may be, of the taxing authority of a petition signed by not less than two per cent of the electors of the political subdivision, as shown at the preceding general election held in the subdivision, shall, declare by resolution that the amount of taxes which may be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the necessary requirements of the subdivision, and that it is necessary to levy taxes in excess of the limitation for either or both of the following purposes: (1) For purchasing a site, and for erecting, equipping, and furnishing, or for establishing a memorial to commemorate the services of all members and veterans of the armed forces of the United States; (2) For the operation and maintenance of a memorial, and for the functions related to it. The resolution shall be confined to the purposes set forth in this section, and shall specify the amount of increase in rate which it is necessary to levy, expressed both in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, the purpose of the rate increase, and the number of years during which the increase shall be in effect. The increase may include a levy upon the tax duplicate of the current year. The number of years shall be any number not exceeding ten. The question of an increase in tax rate under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section may be submitted to the electors on one ballot. The total tax for the purposes included in this section shall not, in any year, exceed one mill of each dollar of taxable value. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution, other than that provided for in the notice of election, shall be necessary. Sec. 345.03. A copy of any resolution adopted under section 345.01 of the Revised Code shall be certified within five days by the taxing authority and not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the election, to the county board of elections, and such board shall submit the proposal to the electors of the subdivision at the succeeding general election. The board shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of such question to the electors of the subdivision, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in like manner as regular elections in such subdivision. Notice of the election shall be published once not less than two weeks prior to such election using at least one of the following methods: (A) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the county; (B) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (C) On the web site and social media account of the county. The notice shall set out the purpose of the proposed increase in rate, the levy's estimated annual collections, the amount of the increase expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the number of years during which such increase will be in effect, and the time and place of holding such election. Sec. 345.04. The form of the ballot cast at a general election, as provided by sections 345.01 to 345.03 of the Revised Code, shall be: "An additional tax for the benefit of (name of subdivision) for the purpose of (state purpose stated in the resolution), that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _____ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_____ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for (the number of years the levy is to run). For the Tax Levy Against the Tax Levy " If the tax is to be placed on the current tax list, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after the statement of the number of years the levy is to run, the phrase ", commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)." The question covered by the resolution shall be submitted to the electors as a separate proposition, but it may be printed on the same ballot with any other proposition submitted at the same election other than the election of officers. More than one such question may be submitted at the same election. Sec. 349.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "New community" means a community or development of property in relation to an existing community planned so that the resulting community includes facilities for the conduct of industrial, commercial, residential, cultural, educational, and recreational activities, and designed in accordance with planning concepts for the placement of utility, open space, and other supportive facilities. (B) "New community development program" means a program for the development of a new community characterized by well-balanced and diversified land use patterns and which includes land acquisition and land development, the acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of community facilities, and the provision of services authorized in this chapter. A new community development program may take into account any existing community in relation to which a new community is developed for purposes of being characterized by well-balanced and diversified land use patterns. (C) "New community district" means the area of land described by the developer in the petition as set forth in division (A) of section 349.03 of the Revised Code for development as a new community and any lands added to the district by amendment of the resolution establishing the community authority. (D) "New community authority" means a body corporate and politic in this state, established pursuant to section 349.03 of the Revised Code and governed by a board of trustees as provided in section 349.04 of the Revised Code. (E) "Developer" means any person, organized for carrying out a new community development program who owns or controls, through leases of at least seventy-five years' duration, options, or contracts to purchase, the land within a new community district, or any municipal corporation, township, county, or port authority that owns the land within a new community district, or has the ability to acquire such land, either by voluntary acquisition or condemnation in order to eliminate slum, blighted, and deteriorated or deteriorating areas and to prevent the recurrence thereof. "Developer" may also mean a person, municipal corporation, township, county, or port authority that controls land within a new community district through leases of at least seventy-five years' duration. "Developer" includes a lessor that continues to own and control land for purposes of this chapter pursuant to leases with a ninety-nine-year renewable term, so long as all both of the following apply: (1) The developer's new community district consists of at least five leases described in this section. (2) The leases are subject to forfeiture for all of the following: (a) Failing to pay taxes and assessments; (b) Failing to pay an annual fee of up to one per cent of rent for sanitary purposes and improvements made to streets; (c) Failing to keep the premises as required by sanitary and police regulations of the developer. (3) The new community authority is established on or before December 31, 2024. (F) "Organizational board of commissioners" means any of the following: (1) For a new community district that is located in only one county, the board of county commissioners of that county; (2) For a new community district that is located in more than one county, a board consisting of the members of the board of county commissioners of each of the counties in which the district is located, provided that action of the board shall require a majority vote of the members of each separate board of county commissioners; (3) For a new community district that is located entirely within the boundaries of a municipal corporation or for a new community district where more than half of the new community district is located within the boundaries of the most populous municipal corporation of a county, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation; (4) For a new community district that is comprised entirely of unincorporated territory within the boundaries of a township with a population of at least five thousand, and which is located in a county with a population of at least two hundred thousand and not more than four hundred thousand, or located within the boundaries of a limited home rule township that adopted a resolution under section 5709.73 of the Revised Code before January 1, 1995, and which is located in a county with a population of more than four hundred thousand, the board of township trustees of the township; (5) In the event that more than one body meets the definitions set forth in divisions (F)(1) to (4) of this section, "organizational board of commissioners" means the organizational board of commissioners with which the original petition was filed or another body meeting the definitions set forth in divisions (F)(1) to (4) of this section appointed in a resolution adopted by the organizational board of commissioners with which the original petition was filed. (G) "Land acquisition" means the acquisition of real property and interests in real property as part of a new community development program. (H) "Land development" means the process of clearing and grading land, making, installing, or constructing water distribution systems, sewers, sewage collection systems, steam, gas, and electric lines, roads, streets, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, storm drainage facilities, and other installations or work, whether within or without the new community district, and the construction of community facilities. (I) "Community facilities" means all real property, buildings, structures, or other facilities, including related fixtures, equipment, and furnishings, to be owned, operated, financed, constructed, and maintained under this chapter or in furtherance of community activities, whether within or without the new community district, including public, community, village, neighborhood, or town buildings, centers and plazas, auditoriums, child care centers, recreation halls, educational facilities, health care facilities including hospital facilities as defined in section 140.01 of the Revised Code, telecommunications facilities, including all facilities necessary to provide telecommunications service as defined in section 4927.01 of the Revised Code, recreational facilities, natural resource facilities, including parks and other open space land, lakes and streams, cultural facilities, community streets and off-street parking facilities, pathway and bikeway systems, pedestrian underpasses and overpasses, lighting facilities, design amenities, or other community facilities, and buildings needed in connection with water supply or sewage disposal installations, or energy facilities including those for renewable or sustainable energy sources, and steam, gas, or electric lines or installation. (J) "Cost" as applied to a new community development program means all costs related to land acquisition and land development, the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of community facilities and offices of the community authority, and of providing furnishings and equipment therefor, financing charges including interest prior to and during construction and for the duration of the new community development program, planning expenses, engineering expenses, administrative expenses including working capital, and all other expenses necessary and incident to the carrying forward of the new community development program. (K) "Income source" means any and all sources of income to the community authority, including community development charges of which the new community authority is the beneficiary as provided in section 349.07 of the Revised Code, rentals, user fees and other charges received by the new community authority, any gift or grant received, any moneys received from any funds invested by or on behalf of the new community authority, and proceeds from the sale or lease of land and community facilities. (L) "Community development charge" means: (1) A dollar amount which shall be determined on the basis of the assessed valuation of real property or interests in real property in a new community district, the income of the residents of such property subject to such charge under section 349.07 of the Revised Code, if such property is devoted to residential uses or to the profits, gross receipts, or other revenues of any business including, but not limited to, rentals received from leases of real property located in the district, a uniform or other fee on each parcel of such real property in a new community district, or any combination of the foregoing bases. (2) If a new community authority imposes a community development charge determined on the basis of rentals received from leases of real property, improvements of any real property located in the new community district and subject to that charge may not be exempted from taxation under section 5709.40, 5709.41, 5709.45, 5709.48, 5709.73, or 5709.78 of the Revised Code. (M) "Proximate community" means the following: (1) For a new community district other than a new community district described in division (M)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, any city that, as of the date of filing of the petition under section 349.03 of the Revised Code, is the city with the greatest population located in the county in which the proposed new community district is located, is the city with the greatest population located in an adjoining county if any portion of such city is within five miles of any part of the boundaries of such district, or exercises extraterritorial subdivision authority under section 711.09 of the Revised Code with respect to any part of such district. (2) A municipal corporation in which, at the time of filing the petition under section 349.03 of the Revised Code, any portion of the proposed new community district is located. (3) For a new community district other than a new community district described in division (M)(2) or (4) of this section, if at the time of filing the petition under section 349.03 of the Revised Code, more than one-half of the proposed district is contained within a joint economic development district created under sections 715.70 to 715.83 of the Revised Code, the township containing the greatest portion of the territory of the joint economic development district. (4) For a new community district other than a new community district described in division (M)(2) or (3) of this section, if at the time of filing the petition under section 343.03 349.03 of the Revised Code the proposed new community district is comprised entirely of unincorporated territory within the boundaries of a township with a population of at least five thousand, and which is located in a county with a population of at least two hundred thousand and not more than four hundred thousand, or located within the boundaries of a limited home rule township that adopted a resolution under section 5709.73 of the Revised Code before January 1, 1995, and which is located in a county with a population of more than four hundred thousand, the township in which the proposed new community district is located. (N) "Community activities" means cultural, educational, governmental, recreational, residential, industrial, commercial, distribution and research activities, or any combination thereof. Sec. 355.04. A local healthier buckeye council shall report the following information to the joint medicaid oversight committee created in section 103.41 of the Revised Codelegislative service commission: (A) Notification that the local council has been established and information regarding the council's organization, plan, and activities; (B) Information regarding enrollment or outcome data collected under division (E) of section 355.03 of the Revised Code; (C) Recommendations regarding the best practices for the administration and delivery of publicly funded assistance programs or other services or programs provided by council members or the entities the members represent; (D) Recommendations regarding the best practices in care coordination. Sec. 501.09. The lessee of land appropriated for ministerial purposes which land is leased for ninety-nine years, renewable forever, or the lessee of such land the lease of which has been renewed for a like term may purchase the fee simple title to the land for an amount equal to the rent for one year. The receipt of all rents due and an amount equal to the rent for one year from a lessee is deemed an offer to purchase the land, which offer the board of education of the school district for whose benefit the land has been allocated shall accept. The school board shall cancel the lease and prepare a deed in fee simple to the land, which the governor shall execute and the secretary of state shall countersign. The lessee of land appropriated for school purposes which land is leased for ninety-nine years, renewable forever, or the lessee of land the lease of which has been renewed for a like term may purchase the fee simple title to the land for an amount equal to the quotient of the annual rent divided by five one-hundredths. Upon receipt of that amount, if all unpaid rent due from the lessee for past years has been paid, the school board shall cancel the lease, and the auditor of state department of administrative services shall prepare a deed in fee simple to the land, which the governor shall execute and the secretary of state shall countersign. Moneys received from the sale of any land shall be paid to the school district for whose benefit the land has been allocated. Sec. 501.11. When the successful bidder at the sale provided in this chapter makes payment to the school district selling the land, the school district shall certify receipt of such payment to the auditor of statedepartment of administrative services. Following the payment to the school district, the auditor of state department of administrative services shall prepare a deed, conveying such lands in fee simple to the successful bidder, and deliver it to the governor, together with his certificate, under the seal of the auditor of state,a certification signed by the director of administrative services that all papers required by law have been properly filed, that the proceedings are according to law, and that the purchase money is fully paid. When signed by the governor, countersigned by the secretary of state, and sealed with the great seal of the state, such deed shall be returned to the auditor of state who department of administrative services, which shall deliver it to the grantee. Sec. 504.14. In a township that adopts a limited home rule government, resolutions may be proposed by initiative petition by the electors in the unincorporated area of the township and adopted by election by these electors, and resolutions adopted by the board of township trustees may be submitted to these electors for their approval or rejection by referendum, under the same circumstances and in the same manner as provided by sections 731.28 to 731.40 of the Revised Code for municipal corporations, except that both of the following apply: (A) Initiative and referendum petitions shall be filed with the township fiscal officer, who shall perform the duties imposed under those sections upon the city auditor or village clerk. (B) Initiative and referendum petitions shall contain the signatures of not less than ten thirty-five per cent of the total number of electors in the unincorporated area of the township who voted for the office of governor at the most recent general election for that office in that area of the township. Sec. 505.24. (A) In calendar year 2018, each township trustee is entitled to compensation in an amount for each day of service in the business of the township, to be paid from the township treasury as follows: (1) In townships having a budget of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less, forty dollars and forty-one cents per day for not more than two hundred days; (2) In townships having a budget of more than two hundred fifty thousand but not more than five hundred thousand dollars, forty-six dollars and eighty cents per day for not more than two hundred days; (3) In townships having a budget of more than five hundred thousand but not more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, forty-nine dollars and sixty-three cents per day for not more than two hundred days; (4) In townships having a budget of more than seven hundred fifty thousand but not more than one million five hundred thousand dollars, fifty-six dollars and seventy-one cents per day for not more than two hundred days; (5) In townships having a budget of more than one million five hundred thousand but not more than three million five hundred thousand dollars, sixty-two dollars and thirty-nine cents per day for not more than two hundred days; (6) In townships having a budget of more than three million five hundred thousand but not more than six million dollars, sixty-eight dollars and six cents per day for not more than two hundred days; (7) In townships having a budget of more than six million but not more than ten million dollars, eighty-eight dollars and nineteen cents per day for not more than two hundred days; (8) In townships having a budget of more than ten million dollars, one hundred thirteen dollars and thirty-eight cents per day for not more than two hundred days. (B) The amounts paid as specified in division (A) of this section shall be increased as follows: (1) In calendar year 2019 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 20282025, the amounts paid as specified in division (A) of this section shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (2) In calendar year 2026 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029, by five per cent. (C) Whenever members of a board of township trustees are compensated per diem and not by annual salary, the board shall establish, by resolution, a method by which each member of the board shall periodically notify the township fiscal officer of the number of days spent in the service of the township and the kinds of services rendered on those days. The per diem compensation shall be paid from the township general fund or from other township funds in such proportions as the kinds of services performed may require. The notice shall be filed with the township fiscal officer and preserved for inspection by any persons interested. By unanimous vote, a board of township trustees may adopt a method of compensation consisting of an annual salary to be paid in equal monthly payments. If the office of trustee is held by more than one person during any calendar year, each person holding the office shall receive payments for only those months, and any fractions of those months, during which the person holds the office. The amount of the annual salary approved by the board shall be no more than the maximum amount that could be received annually by a trustee if the trustee were paid on a per diem basis as specified in this division, and shall be paid from the township general fund or from other township funds in such proportions as the board may specify by resolution. Each trustee shall certify the percentage of time spent working on matters to be paid from the township general fund and from other township funds in such proportions as the kinds of services performed. A board of township trustees that has adopted a salary method of compensation may return to a method of compensation on a per diem basis as specified in this division by a majority vote. Any change in the method of compensation shall be effective on the first day of January of the year following the year during which the board has voted to change the method of compensation. Sec. 505.37. (A) The board of township trustees may establish all necessary rules to guard against the occurrence of fires and to protect the property and lives of the citizens against damage and accidents, and may purchase, lease, lease with an option to purchase, or otherwise provide any fire apparatus, mechanical resuscitators, underwater rescue and recovery equipment, or other fire equipment, appliances, materials, fire hydrants, and water supply for fire-fighting and fire and rescue purposes that seems advisable to the board. The board shall provide for the care and maintenance of such fire equipment, and, for these purposes, may purchase, lease, lease with an option to purchase, or construct and maintain necessary buildings, and it may establish and maintain lines of fire-alarm communications within the limits of the township. The board may employ one or more persons to maintain and operate such fire equipment, or it may enter into an agreement with a volunteer fire company for the use and operation of the equipment. The board may compensate the members of a volunteer fire company on any basis and in any amount that it considers equitable. When the estimated cost to purchase fire apparatus, mechanical resuscitators, underwater rescue and recovery equipment, or other fire equipment, appliances, materials, fire hydrants, buildings, or fire-alarm communications equipment or services exceeds the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code, the contract shall be let by competitive bidding. No purchase or other transaction subject to this section shall be divided into component parts in order to avoid the requirements of this section. When competitive bidding is required, the board shall advertise once a week for not less than two consecutive weeks using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the township; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the township. The board may also cause notice to be inserted in trade papers or other publications designated by it or to be distributed by electronic means, including posting the notice on the board's internet web site. The advertisement shall include the time, date, and place where the clerk of the township, or the clerk's designee, will read bids publicly. The time, date, and place of bid openings may be extended to a later date by the board of township trustees, provided that written or oral notice of the change shall be given to all persons who have received or requested specifications not later than ninety-six hours prior to the original time and date fixed for the opening. The board may reject all the bids or accept the lowest and best bid, provided that the successful bidder meets the requirements of section 153.54 of the Revised Code when the contract is for the construction, demolition, alteration, repair, or reconstruction of an improvement. (B) The boards of township trustees of any two or more townships, or the legislative authorities of any two or more political subdivisions, or any combination of these, may, through joint action, unite in the joint purchase, lease, lease with an option to purchase, maintenance, use, and operation of fire equipment described in division (A) of this section, or for any other purpose designated in sections 505.37 to 505.42 of the Revised Code, and may prorate the expense of the joint action on any terms that are mutually agreed upon. (C) The board of township trustees of any township may, by resolution, whenever it is expedient and necessary to guard against the occurrence of fires or to protect the property and lives of the citizens against damages resulting from their occurrence, create a fire district of any portions of the township that it considers necessary. The board may purchase, lease, lease with an option to purchase, or otherwise provide any fire apparatus, mechanical resuscitators, underwater rescue and recovery equipment, or other fire equipment, appliances, materials, fire hydrants, and water supply for fire-fighting and fire and rescue purposes, or may contract for the fire protection for the fire district as provided in section 9.60 of the Revised Code. The fire district so created shall be given a separate name by which it shall be known. Additional unincorporated territory of the township may be added to a fire district upon the board's adoption of a resolution authorizing the addition. A municipal corporation, or a portion of a municipal corporation, that is within or adjoining the township may be added to a fire district upon the board's adoption of a resolution authorizing the addition and the municipal legislative authority's adoption of a resolution or ordinance requesting the addition of the municipal corporation or a portion of the municipal corporation to the fire district. If the township fire district imposes a tax, additional unincorporated territory of the township or a municipal corporation or a portion of a municipal corporation that is within or adjoining the township shall become part of the fire district only after all of the following have occurred: (1) Adoption by the board of township trustees of a resolution approving the expansion of the territorial limits of the district and, if the resolution proposes to add a municipal corporation or a portion of a municipal corporation, adoption by the municipal legislative authority of a resolution or ordinance requesting the addition of the municipal corporation or a portion of the municipal corporation to the district; (2) Adoption by the board of township trustees of a resolution recommending the extension of the tax to the additional territory; (3) The board requests and obtains from the county auditor the information required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, in the manner prescribed in that section, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the additional territory has been added to the fire district. (4) Approval of the tax by the electors of the territory proposed for addition to the district. Each resolution of the board adopted under division (C)(2) of this section shall state the name of the fire district, a description of the territory to be added, the rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the effective rate, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, and termination date of the tax, which shall be the rate, effective rate, and termination date of the tax currently in effect in the fire district. The board of trustees shall certify each resolution adopted under division (C)(2) of this section and the county auditor's certification under division (C)(3) of this section to the board of elections in accordance with section 5705.19 of the Revised Code. The election required under division (C)(4) of this section shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within ________________________ (description of the proposed territory to be added) be added to ________________________ (name) fire district, and a property tax, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_________ (here insert effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be in effect for __________ (here insert the number of years the tax is to be in effect or "a continuing period of time," as applicable)?" If the question is approved by at least a majority of the electors voting on it, the joinder shall be effective as of the first day of July of the year following approval, and on that date, the township fire district tax shall be extended to the taxable property within the territory that has been added. If the territory that has been added is a municipal corporation or portion thereof and if it had adopted a tax levy for fire purposes, the levy is terminated on the effective date of the joinder in the area of the municipal corporation added to the district. Any municipal corporation may withdraw from a township fire district created under division (C) of this section by the adoption by the municipal legislative authority of a resolution or ordinance ordering withdrawal. On the first day of July of the year following the adoption of the resolution or ordinance of withdrawal, the withdrawing municipal corporation or the portion thereof ceases to be a part of the district, and the power of the fire district to levy a tax upon taxable property in the withdrawing municipal corporation or the portion thereof terminates, except that the fire district shall continue to levy and collect taxes for the payment of indebtedness within the territory of the fire district as it was composed at the time the indebtedness was incurred. Upon the withdrawal of any municipal corporation from a township fire district created under division (C) of this section, the county auditor shall ascertain, apportion, and order a division of the funds on hand, moneys and taxes in the process of collection except for taxes levied for the payment of indebtedness, credits, and real and personal property, either in money or in kind, on the basis of the valuation of the respective tax duplicates of the withdrawing municipal corporation and the remaining territory of the fire district. A board of township trustees may remove unincorporated territory of the township from the fire district upon the adoption of a resolution authorizing the removal. On the first day of July of the year following the adoption of the resolution, the unincorporated township territory described in the resolution ceases to be a part of the district, and the power of the fire district to levy a tax upon taxable property in that territory terminates, except that the fire district shall continue to levy and collect taxes for the payment of indebtedness within the territory of the fire district as it was composed at the time the indebtedness was incurred. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. (D) The board of township trustees of any township, the board of fire district trustees of a fire district created under section 505.371 of the Revised Code, or the legislative authority of any municipal corporation may purchase, lease, or lease with an option to purchase the necessary fire equipment described in division (A) of this section, buildings, and sites for the township, fire district, or municipal corporation and issue securities for that purpose with maximum maturities as provided in section 133.20 of the Revised Code. The board of township trustees, board of fire district trustees, or legislative authority may also construct any buildings necessary to house fire equipment and issue securities for that purpose with maximum maturities as provided in section 133.20 of the Revised Code. The board of township trustees, board of fire district trustees, or legislative authority may issue the securities of the township, fire district, or municipal corporation, signed by the board or designated officer of the municipal corporation and attested by the signature of the township fiscal officer, fire district clerk, or municipal clerk, covering any deferred payments and payable at the times provided, which securities shall bear interest not to exceed the rate determined as provided in section 9.95 of the Revised Code, and shall not be subject to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. The legislation authorizing the issuance of the securities shall provide for levying and collecting annually by taxation, amounts sufficient to pay the interest on and principal of the securities. The securities shall be offered for sale on the open market or given to the vendor or contractor if no sale is made. Section 505.40 of the Revised Code does not apply to any securities issued, or any lease with an option to purchase entered into, in accordance with this division. (E) A board of township trustees of any township or a board of fire district trustees of a fire district created under section 505.371 of the Revised Code may purchase a policy or policies of liability insurance for the officers, employees, and appointees of the fire department, fire district, or joint fire district governed by the board that includes personal injury liability coverage as to the civil liability of those officers, employees, and appointees for false arrest, detention, or imprisonment, malicious prosecution, libel, slander, defamation or other violation of the right of privacy, wrongful entry or eviction, or other invasion of the right of private occupancy, arising out of the performance of their duties. When a board of township trustees cannot, by deed of gift or by purchase and upon terms it considers reasonable, procure land for a township fire station that is needed in order to respond in reasonable time to a fire or medical emergency, the board may appropriate land for that purpose under sections 163.01 to 163.22 of the Revised Code. If it is necessary to acquire additional adjacent land for enlarging or improving the fire station, the board may purchase, appropriate, or accept a deed of gift for the land for these purposes. (F) As used in this division, "emergency medical service organization" has the same meaning as in section 4766.01 of the Revised Code. A board of township trustees, by adoption of an appropriate resolution, may choose to have the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services license any emergency medical service organization it operates. If the board adopts such a resolution, Chapter 4766. of the Revised Code, except for sections 4766.06 and 4766.99 of the Revised Code, applies to the organization. All rules adopted under the applicable sections of that chapter also apply to the organization. A board of township trustees, by adoption of an appropriate resolution, may remove its emergency medical service organization from the jurisdiction of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services. Sec. 505.48. (A) The board of township trustees of any township may, by resolution adopted by two-thirds of the members of the board, create a township police district comprised of all or a portion of the unincorporated territory of the township as the resolution may specify. If the township police district does not include all of the unincorporated territory of the township, the resolution creating the district shall contain a complete and accurate description of the territory of the district and a separate and distinct name for the district. At any time not less than one hundred twenty days after a township police district is created and operative, the territorial limits of the district may be altered in the manner provided in division (B) of this section or, if applicable, as provided in section 505.482 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 505.481 of the Revised Code, the territorial limits of a township police district may be altered by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the board of township trustees. If the township police district imposes a tax, any territory proposed for addition to the district shall become part of the district only after all of the following have occurred: (1) Adoption by two-thirds vote of the board of township trustees of a resolution approving the expansion of the territorial limits of the district; (2) Adoption by a two-thirds vote of the board of township trustees of a resolution recommending the extension of the tax to the additional territory; (3) The board requests and obtains from the county auditor the information required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, in the same manner required under that section, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the additional territory has been added to the township police district. (4) Approval of the tax by the electors of the territory proposed for addition to the district. Each resolution of the board adopted under division (B)(2) of this section shall state the name of the township police district, a description of the territory to be added, the rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the effective rate, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, and termination date of the tax, which shall be the rate, effective rate, and termination date of the tax currently in effect in the district. The board of trustees shall certify each resolution adopted under division (B)(2) of this section and the county auditor's certification under division (B)(3) of this section to the board of elections in accordance with section 5705.19 of the Revised Code. The election required under division (B)(4) of this section shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within __________________________ (description of the proposed territory to be added) be added to ________________ (name) township police district, and a property tax, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ (here insert effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be in effect for __________ (here insert the number of years the tax is to be in effect or "a continuing period of time," as applicable)?" If the question is approved by at least a majority of the electors voting on it, the joinder shall be effective as of the first day of January of the year following approval, and, on that date, the township police district tax shall be extended to the taxable property within the territory that has been added. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 505.481. (A) If a township police district does not include all the unincorporated territory of the township, the remaining unincorporated territory of the township may be added to the district by a resolution adopted by a unanimous vote of the board of township trustees to place the issue of expansion of the district on the ballot for the electors of the entire unincorporated territory of the township. The resolution shall state whether the proposed township police district initially will hire personnel as provided in section 505.49 of the Revised Code or contract for the provision of police protection services or additional police protection services as provided in section 505.43 or 505.50 of the Revised Code. If the board proposes to levy a tax throughout all of the unincorporated territory of the township, the board shall request and obtain from the county auditor the information required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the unincorporated territory has been added to the township police district. The ballot measure shall provide for the addition into a new district of all the unincorporated territory of the township not already included in the township police district and for the levy of any tax then imposed by the district throughout the unincorporated territory of the township. If the measure includes a tax, the measure shall state the rate of the tax, which need not be the same rate of any tax imposed by the existing district, to be imposed in the district resulting from approval of the measure, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the effective rate, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, the last year in which the tax will be levied or that it will be levied for a continuous period of time, and the county auditor's estimate of the levy's annual collections. (B) The election on the measure shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read substantially as follows: "Shall the unincorporated territory within ____________ (name of the township) not already included within the ___________ (name of township police district) be added to the township police district to create the ___________ (name of new township police district) township police district?" The name of the proposed township police district shall be separate and distinct from the name of the existing township police district. If a tax is imposed in the existing township police district, the question shall be modified by adding, at the end of the question, the following: ", and shall a property tax be levied in the new township police district, replacing the tax in the existing township police district, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_________ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for _______ (number of years the tax will be levied, or "a continuing period of time")." If the measure is not approved by a majority of the electors voting on it, the township police district shall continue to occupy its existing territory until altered as provided in this section or section 505.48 of the Revised Code, and any existing tax imposed under section 505.51 of the Revised Code shall remain in effect in the existing district at the existing rate and for as long as provided in the resolution under the authority of which the tax is levied. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 507.09. (A) In calendar year 2018, the township fiscal officer shall be entitled to compensation as follows: (1) In townships having a budget of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less, ten thousand nine hundred eighteen dollars; (2) In townships having a budget of more than two hundred fifty thousand but not more than five hundred thousand dollars, fourteen thousand thirty-nine dollars; (3) In townships having a budget of more than five hundred thousand but not more than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, fifteen thousand five hundred ninety-seven dollars; (4) In townships having a budget of more than seven hundred fifty thousand but not more than one million five hundred thousand dollars, eighteen thousand seven hundred seventeen dollars; (5) In townships having a budget of more than one million five hundred thousand but not more than three million five hundred thousand dollars, twenty-one thousand eight hundred thirty-six dollars; (6) In townships having a budget of more than three million five hundred thousand but not more than six million dollars, twenty-three thousand three hundred ninety-six dollars; (7) In townships having a budget of more than six million but not more than ten million dollars, twenty-six thousand eight hundred fifty-two dollars; (8) In townships having a budget of more than ten million dollars, thirty-one thousand sixty-four dollars. (B) The compensation determined under division (A) of this section shall be increased as follows: (1) In calendar year 2019 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 20282025, the compensation determined under division (A) of this section shall be increased by one and three-quarters per cent; (2) In calendar year 2026 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029, by five per cent. (C) Any township fiscal officer may elect to receive less than the compensation the fiscal officer is entitled to under this section. Any township fiscal officer electing to do this shall so notify the board of township trustees in writing, and the board shall include this notice in the minutes of its next board meeting. (D) The compensation of the township fiscal officer shall be paid in equal monthly payments. If the office of township fiscal officer is held by more than one person during any calendar year, each person holding the office shall receive payments for only those months, and any fractions of those months, during which the person holds the office. A township fiscal officer may be compensated from the township general fund or from other township funds based on the proportion of time the township fiscal officer spends providing services related to each fund. A township fiscal officer must document the amount of time the township fiscal officer spends providing services related to each fund by certification specifying the percentage of time spent working on matters to be paid from the township general fund or from other township funds in such proportions as the kinds of services performed. Sec. 507.12. (A) To enhance the background and working knowledge of township fiscal officers in government accounting, budgeting and financing, financial report preparation, cybersecurity, and the rules adopted by the auditor of state, bulletins or other information published by the auditor of state, and any other subject deemed appropriate by the auditor of state, the auditor of state shall conduct education programs and continuing education courses for individuals elected or appointed for the first time to the office of township fiscal officer, and shall conduct continuing education courses for individuals who continue to hold the office in a subsequent term. The Ohio township association also may conduct such initial education programs and continuing education courses if approved by the auditor of state. The auditor of state, in conjunction with the Ohio township association, shall determine the manner and content of the initial education programs and continuing education courses. (B) A newly elected or appointed township fiscal officer shall complete at least six hours of initial education programs before commencing, or during the first year of, office. A township fiscal officer who participates in a training program held under section 117.44 of the Revised Code may apply those hours taken before commencing office to the six hours of initial education programs required under this division. (C)(1) In addition to the six hours of initial education required under division (B) of this section, a newly elected township fiscal officer shall complete at least a total of eighteen continuing education hours during the township fiscal officer's first term of office. (2) A township fiscal officer who is elected to a subsequent term of office shall complete twelve hours of continuing education courses in each subsequent term of office. (3) The auditor of state shall adopt rules specifying the initial education programs and continuing education courses that are required for a township fiscal officer who has been appointed to fill a vacancy. The requirements shall be proportionally equivalent, based on the time remaining in the vacated office, to the requirements for a newly elected township fiscal officer. (4) At least two hours of ethics instruction shall be included in the continuing education hours required by divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section. (5) A township fiscal officer who participates in a training program or seminar established under section 109.43 of the Revised Code may apply the three hours of training to the continuing education hours required by divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section. (D)(1) A certified public accountant who serves as a township fiscal officer may apply to the continuing education hours required by division (C) of this section any hours of continuing education completed under section 4701.11 of the Revised Code after being elected or appointed as a township fiscal officer. (2) A township fiscal officer may apply to the continuing education hours required by division (C) of this section any hours of continuing education completed under section 135.22 of the Revised Code after being elected or appointed as a township fiscal officer. (3) A township fiscal officer who teaches an approved continuing education course under division (C) of this section is entitled to credit for the course in the same manner as if the township fiscal officer had attended the course. (E) The auditor of state shall adopt rules for verifying the completion of initial education programs and continuing education courses required under this section. The auditor of state shall issue a certificate of completion to each township fiscal officer who completes the initial education programs and continuing education courses. The auditor of state shall issue a "failure to complete" notice to any township fiscal officer who is required to complete initial education programs and continuing education courses under this section, but who fails to do so. The notice is for informational purposes only and does not affect any individual's ability to hold the office of township fiscal officer. The township fiscal officer shall retain the documentation of any initial or continuing education courses completed. The auditor of state shall audit for compliance with this section. (F) Each board of township trustees shall approve a reasonable amount requested by the township fiscal officer to cover the costs the township fiscal officer is required to incur to meet the requirements of this section, including registration fees, lodging and meal expenses, and travel expenses. Sec. 511.28. A copy of any resolution for a tax levy adopted by the township board of park commissioners as provided in section 511.27 of the Revised Code shall be certified by the clerk of the board of park commissioners to the board of elections of the proper county, together with a certified copy of the resolution approving the levy, passed by the board of township trustees if such a resolution is required by division (C) of section 511.27 of the Revised Code, and the county auditor's certification, not less than ninety days before a general or primary election in any year. The board of elections shall submit the proposal to the electors as provided in section 511.27 of the Revised Code at the succeeding general or primary election. A resolution to renew an existing levy may not be placed on the ballot unless the question is submitted at the general election held during the last year the tax to be renewed may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate, or at any election held in the ensuing year. The board of park commissioners shall cause notice that the vote will be taken to be published once a week for two consecutive weeks prior to the election in a newspaper of general circulation, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, in the county within which the park district is located. Additionally, if the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post that notice on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice shall state the purpose of the proposed levy, the levy's estimated annual collections, the levy's annual rate or, if applicable, the levy's effective rate, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value as well as the annual rate expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the number of consecutive years during which the levy shall be in effect, and the time and place of the election. The form of the ballots cast at the election shall be: "An additional tax for the benefit of (name of township park district) __________ for the purpose of (purpose stated in the order of the board) __________, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for (number of years the levy is to run) __________ FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " If the levy submitted is a proposal to renew, increase, or decrease an existing levy, the form of the ballot specified in this section shall be changed by substituting for the words "An additional" at the beginning of the form, the words "A renewal of a" in the case of a proposal to renew an existing levy in the same amount; the words "A renewal of __________ mills and an increase of __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value to constitute a" in the case of an increase; or the words "A renewal of part of an existing levy, being a reduction of __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, to constitute a" in the case of a decrease in the rate of the existing levy. Additionally, the effective rate, in lieu of the rate, shall be expressed for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. If the tax is to be placed on the current tax list, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after the statement of the number of years the levy is to run, the phrase ", commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)." The question covered by the order shall be submitted as a separate proposition, but may be printed on the same ballot with any other proposition submitted at the same election, other than the election of officers. More than one such question may be submitted at the same election. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 511.34. In townships composed of islands, and on one of which islands lands have been conveyed in trust for the benefit of the inhabitants of the island for use as a park, and a board of park trustees has been provided for the control of the park, the board of township trustees may create a tax district of the island to raise funds by taxation as provided under divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (A) For the care and maintenance of parks on the island, the board of township trustees annually may levy a tax, not to exceed one mill for each one dollar of taxable value, upon all the taxable property in the district. The tax shall be in addition to all other levies authorized by law, and subject to no limitation on tax rates except as provided in this division. The proceeds of the tax levy shall be expended by the board of township trustees for the purpose of the care and maintenance of the parks, and shall be paid out of the township treasury upon the orders of the board of park trustees. (B) For the purpose of acquiring additional land for use as a park, the board of township trustees may levy a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation on all taxable property in the district. The tax shall be proposed by resolution adopted by two-thirds of the members of the board of township trustees. The resolution shall specify the purpose and rate of the tax and the number of years the tax will be levied, which shall not exceed five years, and which may include a levy on the current tax list and duplicate. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. The board of township trustees shall certify a copy of the resolution to the proper board of elections not later than ninety days before the primary or general election in the township, and the board of elections shall submit the question of the tax to the voters of the district at the succeeding primary or general election. The board of elections shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of the question to the electors of the district, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in the township for the election of officers. Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the township once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, notice of the election also shall be posted on that web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice shall state the purpose of the tax, the levy's estimated annual collections, the proposed rate of the tax expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value and mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the number of years the tax will be in effect, the first year the tax will be levied, and the time and place of the election. The form of the ballots cast at an election held under this division shall be as follows: "An additional tax for the benefit of _________ (name of the township) for the purpose of acquiring additional park land, that the county auditor estimates will collect $____ annually, at a rate of _________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for _________ (number of years the levy is to run) beginning in ___________ (first year the tax will be levied). FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " The question shall be submitted as a separate proposition but may be printed on the same ballot with any other proposition submitted at the same election other than the election of officers. More than one such question may be submitted at the same election. If the levy is approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the board of elections shall certify the result of the election to the tax commissioner. In the first year of the levy, the tax shall be extended on the tax lists after the February settlement following the election. If the tax is to be placed on the tax lists of the current year as specified in the resolution, the board of elections shall certify the result of the election immediately after the canvass to the board of township trustees, which shall forthwith make the necessary levy and certify the levy to the county auditor, who shall extend the levy on the tax lists for collection. After the first year of the levy, the levy shall be included in the annual tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" has the same meaning as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 513.18. In the event any township, contiguous to a joint township hospital district, desires to become a part of such district in existence under sections 513.07 to 513.18 of the Revised Code, its board of township trustees, by a two-thirds favorable vote of the members of such board, after the existing joint township hospital board has, by a majority favorable vote of the members thereof, approved the terms under which such township proposes to join the district, shall become a part of the joint township district hospital board under such terms and with all the rights, privileges, and responsibilities enjoyed by and extended to the existing members of the hospital board under such sections, including representation on the board of hospital governors by the appointment of an elector of such township as a member thereof. If the terms under which such township proposes to join the hospital district involve a tax levy for the purpose of sharing the existing obligations, including bonded indebtedness, of the district or the necessary operating expenses of such hospital, such township shall not become a part of the district until its electors have approved such levy as provided in this section. In such a case, the board of township trustees and the county auditor shall proceed in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the township has been added to the hospital district. Upon request of the board of township trustees of the township proposing to join such district, by resolution approved by a two-thirds vote of its members, the board of elections of the county in which the township lies shall place upon the ballot for submission to the electorate of such township at the next primary or general election occurring not less than ninety nor more than one hundred thirty-five days after such request is received from the board of township trustees the question of levying a tax, not to exceed one mill outside the ten-mill limitation, for a period of not to exceed five years, to provide funds for the payment of the township's share of the necessary expenses incurred in the operation of such hospital, or the question of levying a tax to pay the township's share of the existing obligations, including bonded indebtedness, of the district, or both questions may be submitted at the same primary or general election. The question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall _____ (name of township) be added to the _____ (name of joint township hospital district), and property tax be levied for the purpose of _____ (purpose of tax), that the county auditor estimates will collect $______ annually, at a rate not exceeding _____ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_____ (rate or effective rate, as applicable) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, to be in effect for _____ (number of years the tax is to be in effect)?" If a majority of the electors voting on the propositions vote in favor thereof, the county auditor shall place such levies on the tax duplicate against the property in the township, which township shall thereby become a part of said joint township hospital district. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 519.12. (A)(1) Amendments to the zoning resolution may be initiated by motion of the township zoning commission, by the passage of a resolution by the board of township trustees, or by the filing of an application by one or more of the owners or lessees of property within the area proposed to be changed or affected by the proposed amendment with the township zoning commission. The board of township trustees may require that the owner or lessee of property filing an application to amend the zoning resolution pay a fee to defray the cost of advertising, mailing, filing with the county recorder, and other expenses. If the board of township trustees requires such a fee, it shall be required generally, for each application. The board of township trustees, upon the passage of such a resolution, shall certify it to the township zoning commission. (2) Upon the adoption of a motion by the township zoning commission, the certification of a resolution by the board of township trustees to the commission, or the filing of an application by property owners or lessees as described in division (A)(1) of this section with the commission, the commission shall set a date for a public hearing, which date shall not be less than twenty nor more than forty days from the date of the certification of such a resolution, the date of adoption of such a motion, or the date of the filing of such an application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the commission by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing using at least one of the following methods: (a) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in the township; (b) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (c) On the web site and social media account of the township. (B) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land, as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, written notice of the hearing shall be mailed by the township zoning commission, by first class mail, at least ten days before the date of the public hearing to all owners of property within and contiguous to and directly across the street from the area proposed to be rezoned or redistricted to the addresses of those owners appearing on the county auditor's current tax list. The failure of delivery of that notice shall not invalidate any such amendment. (C) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published and mailed notices shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the township zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, resolution, or application is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of those properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, resolution, or application proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of township trustees for its action; (8) Any other information requested by the commission. (D) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the township zoning commission that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) A statement that, after the conclusion of the hearing, the matter will be submitted to the board of township trustees for its action; (6) Any other information requested by the commission. (E)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (E)(1)(b) of this section, within five days after the adoption of the motion described in division (A) of this section, the certification of the resolution described in division (A) of this section, or the filing of the application described in division (A) of this section, the township zoning commission shall transmit a copy of it together with text and map pertaining to it to the county or regional planning commission, if there is such a commission, for approval, disapproval, or suggestions. The county or regional planning commission shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment or the approval of some modification of it and shall submit its recommendation to the township zoning commission. The recommendation shall be considered at the public hearing held by the township zoning commission on the proposed amendment. (b) The township zoning commission of a township that has adopted a limited home rule government under Chapter 504. of the Revised Code is not subject to division (E)(1)(a) of this section but may choose to comply with division (E)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The township zoning commission, within thirty days after the hearing, shall recommend the approval or denial of the proposed amendment, or the approval of some modification of it, and submit that recommendation together with the motion, application, or resolution involved, the text and map pertaining to the proposed amendment, and the recommendation of the county or regional planning commission on it to the board of township trustees. (3) The board of township trustees, upon receipt of that recommendation, shall set a time for a public hearing on the proposed amendment, which date shall not be more than thirty days from the date of the receipt of that recommendation. Notice of the hearing shall be given by the board by one publication at least ten days before the date of the hearing using at least one of the following methods: (a) In the print or digital edition of one or more newspapers of general circulation in the township; (b) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (c) On the web site and social media account of the township. (F) If the proposed amendment intends to rezone or redistrict ten or fewer parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of township trustees that will be conducting the hearing; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) A list of the addresses of all properties to be rezoned or redistricted by the proposed amendment and of the names of owners of those properties, as they appear on the county auditor's current tax list; (4) The present zoning classification of property named in the proposed amendment and the proposed zoning classification of that property; (5) The time and place where the motion, application, or resolution proposing to amend the zoning resolution will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (6) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication, by mail, or by both publication and mail; (7) Any other information requested by the board. (G) If the proposed amendment alters the text of the zoning resolution, or rezones or redistricts more than ten parcels of land as listed on the county auditor's current tax list, the published notice shall set forth the time, date, and place of the public hearing and include all of the following: (1) The name of the board of township trustees that will be conducting the hearing on the proposed amendment; (2) A statement indicating that the motion, application, or resolution is an amendment to the zoning resolution; (3) The time and place where the text and maps of the proposed amendment will be available for examination for a period of at least ten days prior to the hearing; (4) The name of the person responsible for giving notice of the hearing by publication; (5) Any other information requested by the board. (H) Within twenty days after its public hearing, the board of township trustees shall either adopt or deny the recommendations of the township zoning commission or adopt some modification of them. If the board denies or modifies the commission's recommendations, a majority vote of the board shall be required. The Except as provided in division (J) of this section, the proposed amendment, if adopted by the board, shall become effective in thirty days after the date of its adoption, unless, within thirty days after the adoption, there is presented to the board of township trustees a petition, signed by a number of registered electors residing in the unincorporated area of the township or part of that unincorporated area included in the zoning plan equal to not less than fifteen thirty-five per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in that area at the most recent general election at which a governor was elected, requesting the board of township trustees to submit the amendment to the electors of that area for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election that occurs at least ninety days after the petition is filed. Each part of this petition shall contain the number and the full and correct title, if any, of the zoning amendment resolution, motion, or application, furnishing the name by which the amendment is known and a brief summary of its contents. In addition to meeting the requirements of this section, each petition shall be governed by the rules specified in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. The form of a petition calling for a zoning referendum and the statement of the circulator shall be substantially as follows: "PETITION FOR ZONING REFERENDUM (if the proposal is identified by a particular name or number, or both, these should be inserted here) _______________________ A proposal to amend the zoning map of the unincorporated area of _____________ Township, _________________ County, Ohio, adopted _____(date)_____ (followed by brief summary of the proposal). To the Board of Township Trustees of _____________________ Township, _________________ County, Ohio: We, the undersigned, being electors residing in the unincorporated area of _______________________ Township, included within the _____________ Township Zoning Plan, equal to not less than fifteen per cent of the total vote cast for all candidates for governor in the area at the preceding general election at which a governor was elected, request the Board of Township Trustees to submit this amendment of the zoning resolution to the electors of ________________________ Township residing within the unincorporated area of the township included in the __________________ Township Zoning Resolution, for approval or rejection at a special election to be held on the day of the primary or general election to be held on _____(date)_____, pursuant to section 519.12 of the Revised Code. Street Address Date of Signature or R.F.D. Township Precinct County Signing __________________________________________________________________________________________________________________________ STATEMENT OF CIRCULATOR I, _____________(name of circulator)__________, declare under penalty of election falsification that I am an elector of the state of Ohio and reside at the address appearing below my signature; that I am the circulator of the foregoing part petition containing _______(number)_______ signatures; that I have witnessed the affixing of every signature; that all signers were to the best of my knowledge and belief qualified to sign; and that every signature is to the best of my knowledge and belief the signature of the person whose signature it purports to be or of an attorney in fact acting pursuant to section 3501.382 of the Revised Code. ___________________________________ (Signature of circulator) ___________________________________ (Address of circulator's permanent residence in this state) ___________________________________ (City, village, or township, and zip code) WHOEVER COMMITS ELECTION FALSIFICATION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY OF THE FIFTH DEGREE." The petition shall be filed with the board of township trustees and shall be accompanied by an appropriate map of the area affected by the zoning proposal. Within two weeks after receiving a petition filed under this section, the board of township trustees shall certify the petition to the board of elections. A petition filed under this section shall be certified to the board of elections not less than ninety days prior to the election at which the question is to be voted upon. The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and validity of each petition certified to it by a board of township trustees under this section. If the board of elections determines that a petition is sufficient and valid, the question shall be voted upon at a special election to be held on the day of the next primary or general election that occurs at least ninety days after the date the petition is filed with the board of township trustees, regardless of whether any election will be held to nominate or elect candidates on that day. No amendment for which such a referendum vote has been requested shall be put into effect unless a majority of the vote cast on the issue is in favor of the amendment. Upon certification by the board of elections that the amendment has been approved by the voters, it shall take immediate effect. (I) Within five working days after an amendment's effective date, the board of township trustees shall file the text and maps of the amendment in the office of the county recorder and with the county or regional planning commission, if one exists. The failure to file any amendment, or any text and maps, or duplicates of any of these documents, with the office of the county recorder or the county or regional planning commission as required by this section does not invalidate the amendment and is not grounds for an appeal of any decision of the board of zoning appeals. (J)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the Revised Code, a decision of the board of township trustees to adopt a proposed amendment to the zoning text or map to rezone, redistrict, or otherwise make an amendment related to, any property involved in a megaproject as defined in section 122.17 of the Revised Code shall take effect immediately upon adoption and is exempt from the referendum procedures in division (H) of this section. (2) If a proposed amendment establishes or modifies planned-unit development regulations, the following apply in lieu of the contrary provisions of division (H) of this section: (a) The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and validity of the petition not later than thirty days after the petition is certified to the board of elections by the board of township trustees. (b) If the board of elections determines there is an insufficient number of valid signatures, the board immediately shall notify the person who presented the petition. The person may submit additional signatures not later than ten days after the notification. Sec. 523.06. If a merger agreement is entered into as required by section 523.04 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply. If a merger agreement is not entered into under section 523.04 of the Revised Code, the merger agreement shall contain all of the terms and conditions specified in this section. If a partial merger agreement is entered into under section 523.04 of the Revised Code, this section applies only to the extent any term or condition that is required by section 523.04 of the Revised Code to be addressed in the merger agreement is not addressed therein. The terms and conditions of a merger agreement to which this section applies shall be as follows: (A) All members of each board of township trustees shall serve as board members of the new township. At the first general election for township officers occurring not less than ninety days after a merger is approved, the electors of the new township shall elect three township trustees with staggered terms of office. The first terms of office following the election shall be modified to an even number of years not to exceed four to allow subsequent elections for the office to be held in the same year as other township officers. (B) The township fiscal officer of the largest township, by population, shall be the township fiscal officer for the new township. At the first general election for township officers occurring not less than ninety days after the merger, the electors shall elect a township fiscal officer, whose first term of office shall be modified to an even number of years not to exceed four to allow subsequent elections for that office to be held in the same year as other township fiscal officers. (C) Voted property tax levies shall remain in effect for the parcels of real property to which they applied prior to the merger, and the merger shall not affect the proceeds of a tax levy pledged for the retirement of any debt obligation. Upon expiration of a property tax levy, the levy may only be replaced or renewed by vote of the electors in the manner provided by law, to apply to real property within the boundaries of the new township. If the millage levied inside the ten-mill limitation of each township merged is different, the board of township trustees of the new township shall immediately equalize the millage for the entire new township. (D) For purposes of the retirement of all debt obligations of each township merged, the township fiscal officer shall continue to track parcels of real property and the tax revenue generated on those parcels by the tax districts that were in place prior to the merger, and shall provide that information on an annual basis to the board of township trustees of the new township. Debt obligations that existed at the time of the merger shall be retired from the revenue generated from the parcels of real property that made up the township that incurred the debt before the merger. (E)(1) With respect to any agreement entered into under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code that covers any of the employees of the townships merged under this chapter, the state employment relations board, within one hundred twenty days after the date the merger is approved, shall designate the appropriate bargaining units for the employees of the new township in accordance with section 4117.06 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding the recognition procedures prescribed in section 4117.05 and division (A) of section 4117.07 of the Revised Code, the board shall conduct a representation election with respect to each bargaining unit designated under this division in accordance with divisions (B) and (C) of section 4117.07 of the Revised Code. If an exclusive representative is selected through this election, the exclusive representative shall negotiate and enter into an agreement with the new township in accordance with Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. Until the parties reach an agreement, any agreement in effect on the date of the merger shall apply to the employees that were in the bargaining unit that is covered by the agreement. An agreement in existence on the date of the merger is terminated on the effective date of an agreement negotiated under this division. (2) If an exclusive representative is not selected, any agreement in effect on the date of the merger shall apply to the employees that were in the bargaining unit that is covered by the agreement and shall expire on its terms. (3) Each agreement entered into under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code on or after the effective date of this section September 29, 2011, involving a new township shall contain a provision regarding the designation of an exclusive representative and bargaining units for the new township as described in division (E) of this section. (4) In addition to the laws listed in division (A) of section 4117.10 of the Revised Code that prevail over conflicting agreements between employee organizations and public employers, division (E) of this section prevails over any conflicting provisions of agreements between employee organizations and public employers that are entered into on or after the effective date of this section September 29, 2011, pursuant to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. (5) As used in division (E) of this section, "employee organization" and "exclusive representative" have the same meanings as in section 4117.01 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) If the boundaries of the new township are not coextensive with a special purpose district, the new township shall remain in the existing special purpose district as a successor to the original township, unless the special purpose district is dissolved. The board of township trustees of the new township may place a question on the ballot at the next general election held after the merger to conform the boundaries, dissolve the special purpose district, or absorb the special purpose district into the new township on the terms specified in the resolution that places the question on the ballot for approval of the electors of the new township. (2) As used in division (F) of this section, "special purpose district" means any geographic or political jurisdiction that is created under law by a township merged. (G) Zoning codes that existed at the time of the merger shall remain in effect after the merger, and the townships that existed before the merger shall be treated as administrative districts within the new township for the purposes of zoning. Sec. 703.331. (A) Not later than the last day of the year that is immediately after the year the results of a federal decennial census are released, the county auditor, county treasurer, and one member of the board of county commissioners selected by the board of county commissioners, jointly shall evaluate each village located within the county to determine if, over the approximate ten year period beginning the day the results of the preceding federal decennial census were released and ending the day the most recent federal decennial census results were released, both of the following are true: (1) The village itself provided, the village contracted with a private nongovernmental entity to provide, or the village contracted with a regional council of governments as defined in section 167.01 of the Revised Code that includes three or more political subdivisions at least two of which are municipal corporations to provide, at least five of the following services: (a) Police protection; (b) Fire-fighting services; (c) Garbage collection; (d) Water service; (e) Sewer service; (f) Emergency medical services; (g) Road maintenance; (h) Park services or other recreation services; (i) Human services; (j) A public library established and operated solely by the village; (k) Electric service. (2) At each election at which an elected village position was voted upon, at least one candidate appeared on the ballot for each elected village position. If a village is located in more than one county, the village shall be evaluated only by the county officials of the county wherein the largest portion of the population of the village resides. (B) Before beginning the evaluation, the county officials shall request, in writing, information from each village to assist the officials in making their determination. The request shall indicate the applicable evaluation period. Each village shall submit the information, in the manner requested by the county officials, not later than thirty days after receiving the request. The village shall include information about the services provided over the evaluation period, the manner by which such services were provided, a copy of the final appropriation budget or budgets applicable to the evaluation period, information on candidates on the ballot for village elected offices during the evaluation period, any documentation regarding the matters in division (A) of this section during the evaluation period, and any other information specifically requested by the county officials. After receiving the information, if necessary, the county officials may request additional information, which the village shall provide not later than ten days after receiving the request. The county officials shall base their finding on the information provided from the village. (C) The county officials shall notify the legislative authority of the village of the county officials' finding not later than the last day of the year that is immediately after the year the results of a federal decennial census are released. (D) If the county officials find a village failed to provide services or field candidates as specified in division (A) of this section, the county officials shall file the finding with the board of elections of the county in which the largest portion of the population of the village resides. The board of elections shall submit the question "Shall the village of __________ surrender its corporate powers?" for the approval or rejection of the electors of the village at the next general election, in any year, occurring after the period ending ninety days after the filing of the finding with the board. If the result of the election is in favor of the surrender, the board of elections shall certify the results to the secretary of state, the auditor of state, and the county recorder, who shall record it in their respective offices. (E) The procedure in this section is in addition to the procedure under section 703.33 of the Revised Code for the dissolution of a village. Sec. 703.34. (A) As used in this section, "condition for the dissolution of a village" means any of the following: (1) The village has been declared to be in a fiscal emergency under Chapter 118. of the Revised Code and has been in fiscal emergency for at least three consecutive years with little or no improvement on the conditions that caused the fiscal emergency declaration. (2) The village has failed to properly follow applicable election laws for at least two consecutive election cycles for any one elected office in the village. (3) The village has been declared during an audit conducted under section 117.11 of the Revised Code to be unauditable under section 117.41 of the Revised Code in at least two consecutive audits. (4) The village does not provide at least two services typically provided by municipal government, such as police or fire protection, garbage collection, water or sewer service, emergency medical services, road maintenance, or similar services. "Services" does not include any administrative service or legislative action. (5) The village has failed for any fiscal year to adopt the tax budget required by section 5705.28 of the Revised Code. (6) A village elected official has been convicted of theft in office, either under section 2921.41 of the Revised Code or an equivalent criminal statute at the federal level, at least two times in a period of ten years. The convicted official with respect to those convictions may be the same person or different persons. (B) If the auditor of state finds, in an audit report issued under division (A) or (B) of section 117.11 of the Revised Code of a village that has a population of one five hundred fifty persons or less and consists of less than two square miles, that the village meets at least two conditions for the dissolution of a village, the auditor of state shall send a certified copy of the report together with a letter to the attorney general requesting the attorney general to institute legal action to dissolve the village in accordance with division (C) of this section. The report and letter shall be sent to the attorney general within ten business days after the auditor of state's transmittal of the report to the village. The audit report transmitted to the village shall be accompanied by a notice to the village of the auditor's intent to refer the report to the attorney general for legal action in accordance with this section. (C) Within twenty days of receipt of the auditor of state's report and letter, the attorney general may file a legal action in the court of common pleas on behalf of the state to request the dissolution of the village that is the subject of the audit report. If a legal action is filed, the court shall hold a hearing within ninety days after the date the attorney general files the legal action with the court. Notice of the hearing shall be filed with the attorney general, the clerk of the village that is the subject of the action, and each fiscal officer of a township located wholly or partly within the village. At the hearing on dissolution, the court shall determine if the village has a population of one five hundred fifty persons or less, consists of less than two square miles, and meets at least two conditions for the dissolution of a village. If the court so finds, the court shall order the dissolution of the village, which shall proceed in accordance with sections 703.31 to 703.39 of the Revised Code. The attorney general shall file a certified copy of the court's order of dissolution with the secretary of state and the county recorder of the county in which the village is situated, who shall record it in their respective offices. (D) For purposes of this section, the population of a village shall be the population determined either at the last preceding federal decennial census or according to population estimates certified by the department of development between decennial censuses. (E) The procedure in this section is in addition to the procedure of section 703.33 of the Revised Code for the dissolution of a village. Sec. 717.051. Any multi-level off-street parking structure that is not tax exempt under section 717.05 of the Revised Code and is acquired in fee or by lease or constructed by a municipal corporation that qualifies as an impacted city, as defined in division (C) of section 1728.01 of the Revised Code, at the time of the initial application for exemption provided for in this section or so acquired or constructed by, a county within the corporate boundaries of such an impacted city, a new community authority, or a port authority, and the land on which the parking structure is situated, is hereby declared to be a public purpose and may, at the option of the impacted city or municipal corporation, the county, the new community authority, or the port authority, be made the subject of an application for exemption and shall be exempt from taxation for such period as the parking structure is owned or leased by such municipal corporation or , county and is available to members of the general public on a daily or monthly or other subscription basis, provided such period of exemption shall not exceed twenty years from September 30, 1974, or the date acquisition or construction of such structure is completed, whichever shall occur later, new community authority, or port authority. Any such exemption shall be claimed and allowed in the same or similar manner as in the case of other real property exemptions. In the event that an exemption status changes during a tax year, the procedure for the apportionment of the taxes for said year shall be the same as in the case of other changes in the exemption status during the tax year. Sec. 718.01. Any term used in this chapter that is not otherwise defined in this chapter has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in laws of the United States relating to federal income taxation or in Title LVII of the Revised Code, unless a different meaning is clearly required. Except as provided in section 718.81 of the Revised Code, if a term used in this chapter that is not otherwise defined in this chapter is used in a comparable context in both the laws of the United States relating to federal income tax and in Title LVII of the Revised Code and the use is not consistent, then the use of the term in the laws of the United States relating to federal income tax shall control over the use of the term in Title LVII of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in section 718.81 of the Revised Code, as used in this chapter: (A)(1) "Municipal taxable income" means the following: (a) For a person other than an individual, income apportioned or sitused to the municipal corporation under section 718.02 of the Revised Code, as applicable, reduced by any pre-2017 net operating loss carryforward available to the person for the municipal corporation. (b)(i) For an individual who is a resident of a municipal corporation other than a qualified municipal corporation, income reduced by exempt income to the extent otherwise included in income, then reduced as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, and further reduced by any pre-2017 net operating loss carryforward available to the individual for the municipal corporation. (ii) For an individual who is a resident of a qualified municipal corporation, Ohio adjusted gross income reduced by income exempted, and increased by deductions excluded, by the qualified municipal corporation from the qualified municipal corporation's tax. If a qualified municipal corporation, on or before December 31, 2013, exempts income earned by individuals who are not residents of the qualified municipal corporation and net profit of persons that are not wholly located within the qualified municipal corporation, such individual or person shall have no municipal taxable income for the purposes of the tax levied by the qualified municipal corporation and may be exempted by the qualified municipal corporation from the requirements of section 718.03 of the Revised Code. (c) For an individual who is a nonresident of a municipal corporation, income reduced by exempt income to the extent otherwise included in income and then, as applicable, apportioned or sitused to the municipal corporation under section 718.02 of the Revised Code, then reduced as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, and further reduced by any pre-2017 net operating loss carryforward available to the individual for the municipal corporation. (2) In computing the municipal taxable income of a taxpayer who is an individual, the taxpayer may subtract, as provided in division (A)(1)(b)(i) or (c) of this section, the amount of the individual's employee business expenses reported on the individual's form 2106 that the individual deducted for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year, subject to the limitation imposed by section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code. For the municipal corporation in which the taxpayer is a resident, the taxpayer may deduct all such expenses allowed for federal income tax purposes. For a municipal corporation in which the taxpayer is not a resident, the taxpayer may deduct such expenses only to the extent the expenses are related to the taxpayer's performance of personal services in that nonresident municipal corporation. (B) "Income" means the following: (1)(a) For residents, all income, salaries, qualifying wages, commissions, and other compensation from whatever source earned or received by the resident, including the resident's distributive share of the net profit of pass-through entities owned directly or indirectly by the resident and any net profit of the resident, except as provided in division (D)(5) of this section. (b) For the purposes of division (B)(1)(a) of this section: (i) Any net operating loss of the resident incurred in the taxable year and the resident's distributive share of any net operating loss generated in the same taxable year and attributable to the resident's ownership interest in a pass-through entity shall be allowed as a deduction, for that taxable year and the following five taxable years, against any other net profit of the resident or the resident's distributive share of any net profit attributable to the resident's ownership interest in a pass-through entity until fully utilized, subject to division (B)(1)(d) of this section; (ii) The resident's distributive share of the net profit of each pass-through entity owned directly or indirectly by the resident shall be calculated without regard to any net operating loss that is carried forward by that entity from a prior taxable year and applied to reduce the entity's net profit for the current taxable year. (c) Division (B)(1)(b) of this section does not apply with respect to any net profit or net operating loss attributable to an ownership interest in an S corporation unless shareholders' distributive shares of net profits from S corporations are subject to tax in the municipal corporation as provided in division (C)(14)(b) or (c) of this section. (d) Any amount of a net operating loss used to reduce a taxpayer's net profit for a taxable year shall reduce the amount of net operating loss that may be carried forward to any subsequent year for use by that taxpayer. In no event shall the cumulative deductions for all taxable years with respect to a taxpayer's net operating loss exceed the original amount of that net operating loss available to that taxpayer. (2) In the case of nonresidents, all income, salaries, qualifying wages, commissions, and other compensation from whatever source earned or received by the nonresident for work done, services performed or rendered, or activities conducted in the municipal corporation, including any net profit of the nonresident, but excluding the nonresident's distributive share of the net profit or loss of only pass-through entities owned directly or indirectly by the nonresident. (3) For taxpayers that are not individuals, net profit of the taxpayer; (4) Lottery, sweepstakes, gambling and sports winnings, winnings from games of chance, and prizes and awards. If the taxpayer is a professional gambler for federal income tax purposes, the taxpayer may deduct related wagering losses and expenses to the extent authorized under the Internal Revenue Code and claimed against such winnings. (C) "Exempt income" means all of the following: (1) The military pay or allowances of members of the armed forces of the United States or members of their reserve components, including the national guard of any state;. As used in division (C)(1) of this section, "armed forces" has the same meaning as in 10 U.S.C. 101. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(2)(b) of this section, intangible income; (b) A municipal corporation that taxed any type of intangible income on March 29, 1988, pursuant to Section 3 of S.B. 238 of the 116th general assembly, may continue to tax that type of income if a majority of the electors of the municipal corporation voting on the question of whether to permit the taxation of that type of intangible income after 1988 voted in favor thereof at an election held on November 8, 1988. (3) Social security benefits, railroad retirement benefits, unemployment compensation, pensions, retirement benefit payments, payments from annuities, and similar payments made to an employee or to the beneficiary of an employee under a retirement program or plan, disability payments received from private industry or local, state, or federal governments or from charitable, religious or educational organizations, and the proceeds of sickness, accident, or liability insurance policies. As used in division (C)(3) of this section, "unemployment compensation" does not include supplemental unemployment compensation described in section 3402(o)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. (4) The income of religious, fraternal, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational institutions to the extent such income is derived from tax-exempt real estate, tax-exempt tangible or intangible property, or tax-exempt activities. (5) Compensation paid under section 3501.28 or 3501.36 of the Revised Code to a person serving as a precinct election official to the extent that such compensation does not exceed one thousand dollars for the taxable year. Such compensation in excess of one thousand dollars for the taxable year may be subject to taxation by a municipal corporation. A municipal corporation shall not require the payer of such compensation to withhold any tax from that compensation. (6) Dues, contributions, and similar payments received by charitable, religious, educational, or literary organizations or labor unions, lodges, and similar organizations; (7) Alimony and child support received; (8) Compensation for personal injuries or for damages to property from insurance proceeds or otherwise, excluding compensation paid for lost salaries or wages or compensation from punitive damages; (9) Income of a public utility when that public utility is subject to the tax levied under section 5727.24 or 5727.30 of the Revised Code. Division (C)(9) of this section does not apply for purposes of Chapter 5745. of the Revised Code. (10) Gains from involuntary conversions, interest on federal obligations, items of income subject to a tax levied by the state and that a municipal corporation is specifically prohibited by law from taxing, and income of a decedent's estate during the period of administration except such income from the operation of a trade or business; (11) Compensation or allowances excluded from federal gross income under section 107 of the Internal Revenue Code; (12) Employee compensation that is not qualifying wages as defined in division (R) of this section; (13) Compensation paid to a person employed within the boundaries of a United States air force base under the jurisdiction of the United States air force that is used for the housing of members of the United States air force and is a center for air force operations, unless the person is subject to taxation because of residence or domicile. If the compensation is subject to taxation because of residence or domicile, tax on such income shall be payable only to the municipal corporation of residence or domicile. (14)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(14)(b) or (c) of this section, an S corporation shareholder's distributive share of net profits of the S corporation, other than any part of the distributive share of net profits that represents wages as defined in section 3121(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or net earnings from self-employment as defined in section 1402(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. (b) If, pursuant to division (H) of former section 718.01 of the Revised Code as it existed before March 11, 2004, a majority of the electors of a municipal corporation voted in favor of the question at an election held on November 4, 2003, the municipal corporation may continue after 2002 to tax an S corporation shareholder's distributive share of net profits of an S corporation. (c) If, on December 6, 2002, a municipal corporation was imposing, assessing, and collecting a tax on an S corporation shareholder's distributive share of net profits of the S corporation to the extent the distributive share would be allocated or apportioned to this state under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 5733.05 of the Revised Code if the S corporation were a corporation subject to taxes imposed under Chapter 5733. of the Revised Code, the municipal corporation may continue to impose the tax on such distributive shares to the extent such shares would be so allocated or apportioned to this state only until December 31, 2004, unless a majority of the electors of the municipal corporation voting on the question of continuing to tax such shares after that date voted in favor of that question at an election held November 2, 2004. If a majority of those electors voted in favor of the question, the municipal corporation may continue after December 31, 2004, to impose the tax on such distributive shares only to the extent such shares would be so allocated or apportioned to this state. (d) A municipal corporation shall be deemed to have elected to tax S corporation shareholders' distributive shares of net profits of the S corporation in the hands of the shareholders if a majority of the electors of a municipal corporation voted in favor of a question at an election held under division (C)(14)(b) or (c) of this section. The municipal corporation shall specify by resolution or ordinance that the tax applies to the distributive share of a shareholder of an S corporation in the hands of the shareholder of the S corporation. (15) The income of individuals under eighteen years of age. (16)(a) Except as provided in divisions (C)(16)(b), (c), and (d) of this section, qualifying wages described in division (B)(1) or (E) of section 718.011 of the Revised Code to the extent the qualifying wages are not subject to withholding for the municipal corporation under either of those divisions. (b) The exemption provided in division (C)(16)(a) of this section does not apply with respect to the municipal corporation in which the employee resided at the time the employee earned the qualifying wages. (c) The exemption provided in division (C)(16)(a) of this section does not apply to qualifying wages that an employer elects to withhold under division (D)(2) of section 718.011 of the Revised Code. (d) The exemption provided in division (C)(16)(a) of this section does not apply to qualifying wages if both of the following conditions apply: (i) For qualifying wages described in division (B)(1) of section 718.011 of the Revised Code, the employee's employer withholds and remits tax on the qualifying wages to the municipal corporation in which the employee's principal place of work is situated, or, for qualifying wages described in division (E) of section 718.011 of the Revised Code, the employee's employer withholds and remits tax on the qualifying wages to the municipal corporation in which the employer's fixed location is located; (ii) The employee receives a refund of the tax described in division (C)(16)(d)(i) of this section on the basis of the employee not performing services in that municipal corporation. (17)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(17)(b) or (c) of this section, compensation that is not qualifying wages paid to a nonresident individual for personal services performed in the municipal corporation on not more than twenty days in a taxable year. (b) The exemption provided in division (C)(17)(a) of this section does not apply under either of the following circumstances: (i) The individual's base of operation is located in the municipal corporation. (ii) The individual is a professional athlete, professional entertainer, or public figure, and the compensation is paid for the performance of services in the individual's capacity as a professional athlete, professional entertainer, or public figure. For purposes of division (C)(17)(b)(ii) of this section, "professional athlete," "professional entertainer," and "public figure" have the same meanings as in section 718.011 of the Revised Code. (c) Compensation to which division (C)(17) of this section applies shall be treated as earned or received at the individual's base of operation. If the individual does not have a base of operation, the compensation shall be treated as earned or received where the individual is domiciled. (d) For purposes of division (C)(17) of this section, "base of operation" means the location where an individual owns or rents an office, storefront, or similar facility to which the individual regularly reports and at which the individual regularly performs personal services for compensation. (18) Compensation paid to a person for personal services performed for a political subdivision on property owned by the political subdivision, regardless of whether the compensation is received by an employee of the subdivision or another person performing services for the subdivision under a contract with the subdivision, if the property on which services are performed is annexed to a municipal corporation pursuant to section 709.023 of the Revised Code on or after March 27, 2013, unless the person is subject to such taxation because of residence. If the compensation is subject to taxation because of residence, municipal income tax shall be payable only to the municipal corporation of residence. (19) In the case of a tax administered, collected, and enforced by a municipal corporation pursuant to an agreement with the board of directors of a joint economic development district under section 715.72 of the Revised Code, the net profits of a business, and the income of the employees of that business, exempted from the tax under division (Q) of that section. (20) All of the following: (a) Income derived from disaster work conducted in this state by an out-of-state disaster business during a disaster response period pursuant to a qualifying solicitation received by the business; (b) Income of a qualifying employee described in division (A)(14)(a) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code, to the extent such income is derived from disaster work conducted in this state by the employee during a disaster response period pursuant to a qualifying solicitation received by the employee's employer; (c) Income of a qualifying employee described in division (A)(14)(b) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code, to the extent such income is derived from disaster work conducted in this state by the employee during a disaster response period on critical infrastructure owned or used by the employee's employer. (21) Income the taxation of which is prohibited by the constitution or laws of the United States. Any item of income that is exempt income of a pass-through entity under division (C) of this section is exempt income of each owner of the pass-through entity to the extent of that owner's distributive or proportionate share of that item of the entity's income. (D)(1) "Net profit" for a person who is an individual means the individual's net profit required to be reported on schedule C, schedule E, or schedule F reduced by any net operating loss carried forward. For the purposes of division (D)(1) of this section, the net operating loss carried forward shall be calculated and deducted in the same manner as provided in division (D)(3) of this section. (2) "Net profit" for a person other than an individual means adjusted federal taxable income reduced by any net operating loss incurred by the person in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2017, subject to the limitations of division (D)(3) of this section. (3)(a) The amount of such net operating loss shall be deducted from net profit to the extent necessary to reduce municipal taxable income to zero, with any remaining unused portion of the net operating loss carried forward to not more than five consecutive taxable years following the taxable year in which the loss was incurred, but in no case for more years than necessary for the deduction to be fully utilized. (b) No person shall use the deduction allowed by division (D)(3) of this section to offset qualifying wages. (c)(i) For taxable years beginning in 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, or 2022, a person may not deduct, for purposes of an income tax levied by a municipal corporation that levies an income tax before January 1, 2016, more than fifty per cent of the amount of the deduction otherwise allowed by division (D)(3) of this section. (ii) For taxable years beginning in 2023 or thereafter, a person may deduct, for purposes of an income tax levied by a municipal corporation that levies an income tax before January 1, 2016, the full amount allowed by division (D)(3) of this section without regard to the limitation of division (D)(3)(c)(i) of this section. (d) Any pre-2017 net operating loss carryforward deduction that is available may be utilized before a taxpayer may deduct any amount pursuant to division (D)(3) of this section. (e) Nothing in division (D)(3)(c)(i) of this section precludes a person from carrying forward, for use with respect to any return filed for a taxable year beginning after 2018, any amount of net operating loss that was not fully utilized by operation of division (D)(3)(c)(i) of this section. To the extent that an amount of net operating loss that was not fully utilized in one or more taxable years by operation of division (D)(3)(c)(i) of this section is carried forward for use with respect to a return filed for a taxable year beginning in 2019, 2020, 2021, or 2022, the limitation described in division (D)(3)(c)(i) of this section shall apply to the amount carried forward. (4) For the purposes of this chapter, and notwithstanding division (D)(2) of this section, net profit of a disregarded entity shall not be taxable as against that disregarded entity, but shall instead be included in the net profit of the owner of the disregarded entity. (5) For the purposes of this chapter, and notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the net profit of a publicly traded partnership that makes the election described in division (D)(5) of this section shall be taxed as if the partnership were a C corporation, and shall not be treated as the net profit or income of any owner of the partnership. A publicly traded partnership that is treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes and that is subject to tax on its net profits in one or more municipal corporations in this state may elect to be treated as a C corporation for municipal income tax purposes. The publicly traded partnership shall make the election in every municipal corporation in which the partnership is subject to taxation on its net profits. The election shall be made on the annual tax return filed in each such municipal corporation. The publicly traded partnership shall not be required to file the election with any municipal corporation in which the partnership is not subject to taxation on its net profits, but division (D)(5) of this section applies to all municipal corporations in which an individual owner of the partnership resides. (E) "Adjusted federal taxable income," for a person required to file as a C corporation, or for a person that has elected to be taxed as a C corporation under division (D)(5) of this section, means a C corporation's federal taxable income before net operating losses and special deductions as determined under the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted as follows: (1) Deduct intangible income to the extent included in federal taxable income. The deduction shall be allowed regardless of whether the intangible income relates to assets used in a trade or business or assets held for the production of income. (2) Add an amount equal to five per cent of intangible income deducted under division (E)(1) of this section, but excluding that portion of intangible income directly related to the sale, exchange, or other disposition of property described in section 1221 of the Internal Revenue Code; (3) Add any losses allowed as a deduction in the computation of federal taxable income if the losses directly relate to the sale, exchange, or other disposition of an asset described in section 1221 or 1231 of the Internal Revenue Code; (4)(a) Except as provided in division (E)(4)(b) of this section, deduct income and gain included in federal taxable income to the extent the income and gain directly relate to the sale, exchange, or other disposition of an asset described in section 1221 or 1231 of the Internal Revenue Code; (b) Division (E)(4)(a) of this section does not apply to the extent the income or gain is income or gain described in section 1245 or 1250 of the Internal Revenue Code. (5) Add taxes on or measured by net income allowed as a deduction in the computation of federal taxable income; (6) In the case of a real estate investment trust or regulated investment company, add all amounts with respect to dividends to, distributions to, or amounts set aside for or credited to the benefit of investors and allowed as a deduction in the computation of federal taxable income; (7) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal taxable income, any income derived from a transfer agreement or from the enterprise transferred under that agreement under section 4313.02 of the Revised Code; (8) Deduct exempt income to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing adjusted federal taxable income. (9) Deduct any net profit of a pass-through entity owned directly or indirectly by the taxpayer and included in the taxpayer's federal taxable income unless an affiliated group of corporations includes that net profit in the group's federal taxable income in accordance with division (E)(3)(b) of section 718.06 of the Revised Code. (10) Add any loss incurred by a pass-through entity owned directly or indirectly by the taxpayer and included in the taxpayer's federal taxable income unless an affiliated group of corporations includes that loss in the group's federal taxable income in accordance with division (E)(3)(b) of section 718.06 of the Revised Code. If the taxpayer is not a C corporation, is not a disregarded entity that has made the election described in division (L)(2) of this section, is not a publicly traded partnership that has made the election described in division (D)(5) of this section, and is not an individual, the taxpayer shall compute adjusted federal taxable income under this section as if the taxpayer were a C corporation, except guaranteed payments and other similar amounts paid or accrued to a partner, former partner, shareholder, former shareholder, member, or former member shall not be allowed as a deductible expense unless such payments are a pension or retirement benefit payment paid to a retired partner, retired shareholder, or retired member or are in consideration for the use of capital and treated as payment of interest under section 469 of the Internal Revenue Code or United States treasury regulations. Amounts paid or accrued to a qualified self-employed retirement plan with respect to a partner, former partner, shareholder, former shareholder, member, or former member of the taxpayer, amounts paid or accrued to or for health insurance for a partner, former partner, shareholder, former shareholder, member, or former member, and amounts paid or accrued to or for life insurance for a partner, former partner, shareholder, former shareholder, member, or former member shall not be allowed as a deduction. Nothing in division (E) of this section shall be construed as allowing the taxpayer to add or deduct any amount more than once or shall be construed as allowing any taxpayer to deduct any amount paid to or accrued for purposes of federal self-employment tax. (F) "Schedule C" means internal revenue service schedule C (form 1040) filed by a taxpayer pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code. (G) "Schedule E" means internal revenue service schedule E (form 1040) filed by a taxpayer pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code. (H) "Schedule F" means internal revenue service schedule F (form 1040) filed by a taxpayer pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code. (I) "Internal Revenue Code" has the same meaning as in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (J) "Resident" means an individual who is domiciled in the municipal corporation as determined under section 718.012 of the Revised Code. (K) "Nonresident" means an individual that is not a resident. (L)(1) "Taxpayer" means a person subject to a tax levied on income by a municipal corporation in accordance with this chapter. "Taxpayer" does not include a grantor trust or, except as provided in division (L)(2)(a) of this section, a disregarded entity. (2)(a) A single member limited liability company that is a disregarded entity for federal tax purposes may be a separate taxpayer from its single member in all Ohio municipal corporations in which it either filed as a separate taxpayer or did not file for its taxable year ending in 2003, if all of the following conditions are met: (i) The limited liability company's single member is also a limited liability company. (ii) The limited liability company and its single member were formed and doing business in one or more Ohio municipal corporations for at least five years before January 1, 2004. (iii) Not later than December 31, 2004, the limited liability company and its single member each made an election to be treated as a separate taxpayer under division (L) of this section as this section existed on December 31, 2004. (iv) The limited liability company was not formed for the purpose of evading or reducing Ohio municipal corporation income tax liability of the limited liability company or its single member. (v) The Ohio municipal corporation that was the primary place of business of the sole member of the limited liability company consented to the election. (b) For purposes of division (L)(2)(a)(v) of this section, a municipal corporation was the primary place of business of a limited liability company if, for the limited liability company's taxable year ending in 2003, its income tax liability was greater in that municipal corporation than in any other municipal corporation in Ohio, and that tax liability to that municipal corporation for its taxable year ending in 2003 was at least four hundred thousand dollars. (M) "Person" includes individuals, firms, companies, joint stock companies, business trusts, estates, trusts, partnerships, limited liability partnerships, limited liability companies, associations, C corporations, S corporations, governmental entities, and any other entity. (N) "Pass-through entity" means a partnership not treated as an association taxable as a C corporation for federal income tax purposes, a limited liability company not treated as an association taxable as a C corporation for federal income tax purposes, an S corporation, or any other class of entity from which the income or profits of the entity are given pass-through treatment for federal income tax purposes. "Pass-through entity" does not include a trust, estate, grantor of a grantor trust, or disregarded entity. (O) "S corporation" means a person that has made an election under subchapter S of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code for its taxable year. (P) "Single member limited liability company" means a limited liability company that has one direct member. (Q) "Limited liability company" means a limited liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, or the laws of another state. (R) "Qualifying wages" means wages, as defined in section 3121(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, without regard to any wage limitations, adjusted as follows: (1) Deduct the following amounts: (a) Any amount included in wages if the amount constitutes compensation attributable to a plan or program described in section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code. (b) Any amount included in wages if the amount constitutes payment on account of a disability related to sickness or an accident paid by a party unrelated to the employer, agent of an employer, or other payer. (c) Any amount attributable to a nonqualified deferred compensation plan or program described in section 3121(v)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code if the compensation is included in wages and the municipal corporation has, by resolution or ordinance adopted before January 1, 2016, exempted the amount from withholding and tax. (d) Any amount included in wages if the amount arises from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of a stock option, the exercise of a stock option, or the sale, exchange, or other disposition of stock purchased under a stock option and the municipal corporation has, by resolution or ordinance adopted before January 1, 2016, exempted the amount from withholding and tax. (e) Any amount included in wages that is exempt income. (2) Add the following amounts: (a) Any amount not included in wages solely because the employee was employed by the employer before April 1, 1986. (b) Any amount not included in wages because the amount arises from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of a stock option, the exercise of a stock option, or the sale, exchange, or other disposition of stock purchased under a stock option and the municipal corporation has not, by resolution or ordinance, exempted the amount from withholding and tax adopted before January 1, 2016. Division (R)(2)(b) of this section applies only to those amounts constituting ordinary income. (c) Any amount not included in wages if the amount is an amount described in section 401(k), 403(b), or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code. Division (R)(2)(c) of this section applies only to employee contributions and employee deferrals. (d) Any amount that is supplemental unemployment compensation benefits described in section 3402(o)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and not included in wages. (e) Any amount received that is treated as self-employment income for federal tax purposes in accordance with section 1402(a)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code. (f) Any amount not included in wages if all of the following apply: (i) For the taxable year the amount is employee compensation that is earned outside of the United States and that either is included in the taxpayer's gross income for federal income tax purposes or would have been included in the taxpayer's gross income for such purposes if the taxpayer did not elect to exclude the income under section 911 of the Internal Revenue Code; (ii) For no preceding taxable year did the amount constitute wages as defined in section 3121(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; (iii) For no succeeding taxable year will the amount constitute wages; and (iv) For any taxable year the amount has not otherwise been added to wages pursuant to either division (R)(2) of this section or section 718.03 of the Revised Code, as that section existed before the effective date of H.B. 5 of the 130th general assembly, March 23, 2015. (S) "Intangible income" means income of any of the following types: income yield, interest, capital gains, dividends, or other income arising from the ownership, sale, exchange, or other disposition of intangible property including, but not limited to, investments, deposits, money, or credits as those terms are defined in Chapter 5701. of the Revised Code, and patents, copyrights, trademarks, tradenames, investments in real estate investment trusts, investments in regulated investment companies, and appreciation on deferred compensation. "Intangible income" does not include prizes, awards, or other income associated with any lottery winnings, gambling winnings, or other similar games of chance. (T) "Taxable year" means the corresponding tax reporting period as prescribed for the taxpayer under the Internal Revenue Code. (U)(1) "Tax administrator" means, subject to division (U)(2) of this section, the individual charged with direct responsibility for administration of an income tax levied by a municipal corporation in accordance with this chapter, and also includes the following: (a) A municipal corporation acting as the agent of another municipal corporation; (b) A person retained by a municipal corporation to administer a tax levied by the municipal corporation, but only if the municipal corporation does not compensate the person in whole or in part on a contingency basis; (c) The central collection agency or the regional income tax agency or their successors in interest, or another entity organized to perform functions similar to those performed by the central collection agency and the regional income tax agency. (2) "Tax administrator" does not include the tax commissioner. (3) A private individual or entity serving in any position described in division (U)(1)(b) or (c) of this section shall have no access to criminal history record information. (V) "Employer" means a person that is an employer for federal income tax purposes. (W) "Employee" means an individual who is an employee for federal income tax purposes. (X) "Other payer" means any person, other than an individual's employer or the employer's agent, that pays an individual any amount included in the federal gross income of the individual. "Other payer" includes casino operators and video lottery terminal sales agents. (Y) "Calendar quarter" means the three-month period ending on the last day of March, June, September, or December. (Z) "Form 2106" means internal revenue service form 2106 filed by a taxpayer pursuant to the Internal Revenue Code. (AA) "Municipal corporation" includes a joint economic development district or joint economic development zone that levies an income tax under section 715.691, 715.70, 715.71, or 715.72 of the Revised Code. (BB) "Disregarded entity" means a single member limited liability company, a qualifying subchapter S subsidiary, or another entity if the company, subsidiary, or entity is a disregarded entity for federal income tax purposes. (CC) "Generic form" means an electronic or paper form that is not prescribed by a particular municipal corporation and that is designed for reporting taxes withheld by an employer, agent of an employer, or other payer, estimated municipal income taxes, or annual municipal income tax liability or for filing a refund claim. (DD) "Tax return preparer" means any individual described in section 7701(a)(36) of the Internal Revenue Code and 26 C.F.R. 301.7701-15. (EE) "Ohio business gateway" means the online computer network system created under section 125.30 of the Revised Code or any successor electronic filing and payment system. (FF) "Local board of tax review" and "board of tax review" mean the entity created under section 718.11 of the Revised Code. (GG) "Net operating loss" means a loss incurred by a person in the operation of a trade or business. "Net operating loss" does not include unutilized losses resulting from basis limitations, at-risk limitations, or passive activity loss limitations. (HH) "Casino operator" and "casino facility" have the same meanings as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (II) "Video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (JJ) "Video lottery terminal sales agent" means a lottery sales agent licensed under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code to conduct video lottery terminals on behalf of the state pursuant to section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Postal service" means the United States postal service. (LL) "Certified mail," "express mail," "United States mail," "postal service," and similar terms include any delivery service authorized pursuant to section 5703.056 of the Revised Code. (MM) "Postmark date," "date of postmark," and similar terms include the date recorded and marked in the manner described in division (B)(3) of section 5703.056 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Related member" means a person that, with respect to the taxpayer during all or any portion of the taxable year, is either a related entity, a component member as defined in section 1563(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, or a person to or from whom there is attribution of stock ownership in accordance with section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue Code except, for purposes of determining whether a person is a related member under this division, "twenty per cent" shall be substituted for "5 percent" wherever "5 percent" appears in section 1563(e) of the Internal Revenue Code. (OO) "Related entity" means any of the following: (1) An individual stockholder, or a member of the stockholder's family enumerated in section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code, if the stockholder and the members of the stockholder's family own directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at least fifty per cent of the value of the taxpayer's outstanding stock; (2) A stockholder, or a stockholder's partnership, estate, trust, or corporation, if the stockholder and the stockholder's partnerships, estates, trusts, or corporations own directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, in the aggregate, at least fifty per cent of the value of the taxpayer's outstanding stock; (3) A corporation, or a party related to the corporation in a manner that would require an attribution of stock from the corporation to the party or from the party to the corporation under division (OO)(4) of this section, provided the taxpayer owns directly, indirectly, beneficially, or constructively, at least fifty per cent of the value of the corporation's outstanding stock; (4) The attribution rules described in section 318 of the Internal Revenue Code apply for the purpose of determining whether the ownership requirements in divisions (OO)(1) to (3) of this section have been met. (PP)(1) "Assessment" means a written finding by the tax administrator that a person has underpaid municipal income tax, or owes penalty and interest, or any combination of tax, penalty, or interest, to the municipal corporation that commences the person's time limitation for making an appeal to the local board of tax review pursuant to section 718.11 of the Revised Code, and has "ASSESSMENT" written in all capital letters at the top of such finding. (2) "Assessment" does not include an informal notice denying a request for refund issued under division (B)(3) of section 718.19 of the Revised Code, a billing statement notifying a taxpayer of current or past-due balances owed to the municipal corporation, a tax administrator's request for additional information, a notification to the taxpayer of mathematical errors, or a tax administrator's other written correspondence to a person or taxpayer that does not meet the criteria prescribed by division (PP)(1) of this section. (QQ) "Taxpayers' rights and responsibilities" means the rights provided to taxpayers in sections 718.11, 718.12, 718.19, 718.23, 718.36, 718.37, 718.38, 5717.011, and 5717.03 of the Revised Code and the responsibilities of taxpayers to file, report, withhold, remit, and pay municipal income tax and otherwise comply with Chapter 718. of the Revised Code and resolutions, ordinances, and rules adopted by a municipal corporation for the imposition and administration of a municipal income tax. (RR) "Qualified municipal corporation" means a municipal corporation that, by resolution or ordinance adopted on or before December 31, 2011, adopted Ohio adjusted gross income, as defined by section 5747.01 of the Revised Code, as the income subject to tax for the purposes of imposing a municipal income tax. (SS)(1) "Pre-2017 net operating loss carryforward" means any net operating loss incurred in a taxable year beginning before January 1, 2017, to the extent such loss was permitted, by a resolution or ordinance of the municipal corporation that was adopted by the municipal corporation before January 1, 2016, to be carried forward and utilized to offset income or net profit generated in such municipal corporation in future taxable years. (2) For the purpose of calculating municipal taxable income, any pre-2017 net operating loss carryforward may be carried forward to any taxable year, including taxable years beginning in 2017 or thereafter, for the number of taxable years provided in the resolution or ordinance or until fully utilized, whichever is earlier. (TT) "Small employer" means any employer that had total revenue of less than five hundred thousand dollars during the preceding taxable year. For purposes of this division, "total revenue" means receipts of any type or kind, including, but not limited to, sales receipts; payments; rents; profits; gains, dividends, and other investment income; compensation; commissions; premiums; money; property; grants; contributions; donations; gifts; program service revenue; patient service revenue; premiums; fees, including premium fees and service fees; tuition payments; unrelated business revenue; reimbursements; any type of payment from a governmental unit, including grants and other allocations; and any other similar receipts reported for federal income tax purposes or under generally accepted accounting principles. "Small employer" does not include the federal government; any state government, including any state agency or instrumentality; any political subdivision; or any entity treated as a government for financial accounting and reporting purposes. (UU) "Audit" means the examination of a person or the inspection of the books, records, memoranda, or accounts of a person for the purpose of determining liability for a municipal income tax. (VV) "Publicly traded partnership" means any partnership, an interest in which is regularly traded on an established securities market. A "publicly traded partnership" may have any number of partners. (WW) "Tax commissioner" means the tax commissioner appointed under section 121.03 of the Revised Code. (XX) "Out-of-state disaster business," "qualifying solicitation," "qualifying employee," "disaster work," "critical infrastructure," and "disaster response period" have the same meanings as in section 5703.94 of the Revised Code. (YY) "Pension" means a retirement benefit plan, regardless of whether the plan satisfies the qualifications described under section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, including amounts that are taxable under the "Federal Insurance Contributions Act," Chapter 21 of the Internal Revenue Code, excluding employee contributions and elective deferrals, and regardless of whether such amounts are paid in the same taxable year in which the amounts are included in the employee's wages, as defined by section 3121(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. (ZZ) "Retirement benefit plan" means an arrangement whereby an entity provides benefits to individuals either on or after their termination of service because of retirement or disability. "Retirement benefit plan" does not include wage continuation payments, severance payments, or payments made for accrued personal or vacation time. Sec. 718.031. As used in this section, "sports gaming facility" and "type B sports gaming proprietor" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code and "lottery sports gaming" has "video lottery terminal" and "video lottery sales agent" have the same meaning meanings as in section 3770.23 3770.10 of the Revised Code. (A) A municipal corporation shall require the following persons to withhold and remit municipal income tax with respect to amounts other than qualifying wages as provided in this section: (1) A casino facility or a casino operator, as defined in Section 6(C)(9) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, and section 3772.01 of the Revised Code, respectively; (2) A video lottery sales agent conducting video lottery terminals on behalf of the state; (3) A type B sports gaming proprietor offering sports gaming at a sports gaming facility. (B) If a person's winnings at a casino facility or sports gaming facility are an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall deduct and withhold municipal income tax from the person's winnings at the rate of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation in which the casino facility or sports gaming facility is located. (C) Amounts deducted and withheld by a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor are held in trust for the benefit of the municipal corporation to which the tax is owed. (1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file a return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation, providing the name, address, and social security number of the person from whose winnings amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the preceding calendar month, the amount of the winnings from which each such amount was withheld, the type of casino gaming or sports gaming that resulted in such winnings, and any other information required by the tax administrator. With this return, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically to the municipal corporation all amounts deducted and withheld during the preceding month. (2) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file an annual return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation in which the casino facility or sports gaming facility is located, indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If the name, address, or social security number of a person or the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person was omitted on a monthly return for that reporting period, that information shall be indicated on the annual return. (3) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall issue an information return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The information return shall show the total amount of municipal income tax deducted from the person's winnings during the preceding year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall provide to the tax administrator a copy of each information return issued under this division. The administrator may require that such copies be transmitted electronically. (4) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor that fails to file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld shall be personally liable for the amount withheld and not remitted. Such personal liability extends to any penalty and interest imposed for the late filing of a return or the late payment of tax deducted and withheld. (5) If a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor sells the casino facility or sports gaming facility, or otherwise quits the casino or sports gaming business, the amounts deducted and withheld along with any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The successor shall withhold an amount of the purchase money that is sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld along with any penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor casino operator or sports gaming proprietor produces either of the following: (a) A receipt from the tax administrator showing that the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid; (b) A certificate from the tax administrator indicating that no amounts are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable for the payment of the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon. (6) The failure of a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's winnings does not relieve that person from liability for the municipal income tax with respect to those winnings. (D) If a person's prize award from a video lottery terminal or from lottery sports gaming offered in a video lottery terminal facility is an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, the video lottery sales agent shall deduct and withhold municipal income tax from the person's prize award at the rate of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation in which the video lottery terminal facility is located. (E) Amounts deducted and withheld by a video lottery sales agent are held in trust for the benefit of the municipal corporation to which the tax is owed. (1) The video lottery sales agent shall issue to a person from whose prize award an amount has been deducted and withheld a receipt for the amount deducted and withheld, and shall obtain from the person receiving a prize award the person's name, address, and social security number in order to facilitate the preparation of returns required by this section. (2) On or before the tenth day of each month, the video lottery sales agent shall file a return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation providing the names, addresses, and social security numbers of the persons from whose prize awards amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the preceding calendar month, the amount of the prize award from which each such amount was withheld, and any other information required by the tax administrator. With the return, the video lottery sales agent shall remit electronically to the tax administrator all amounts deducted and withheld during the preceding month. (3) A video lottery sales agent shall maintain a record of all receipts issued under division (E) of this section and shall make those records available to the tax administrator upon request. Such records shall be maintained in accordance with section 5747.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted pursuant thereto. (4) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, each video lottery terminal sales agent shall file an annual return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation in which the facility is located indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The video lottery sales agent shall remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If the name, address, or social security number of a person or the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person was omitted on a monthly return for that reporting period, that information shall be indicated on the annual return. (5) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a video lottery sales agent shall issue an information return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The information return shall show the total amount of municipal income tax deducted and withheld from the person's prize award by the video lottery sales agent during the preceding year. A video lottery sales agent shall provide to the tax administrator of the municipal corporation a copy of each information return issued under this division. The tax administrator may require that such copies be transmitted electronically. (6) A video lottery sales agent who fails to file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld is personally liable for the amount deducted and withheld and not remitted. Such personal liability extends to any penalty and interest imposed for the late filing of a return or the late payment of tax deducted and withheld. (F) If a video lottery sales agent ceases to operate video lottery terminals, the amounts deducted and withheld along with any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The successor of the video lottery sales agent that purchases the video lottery terminals from the agent shall withhold an amount from the purchase money that is sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld and any penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor video lottery sales agent operator produces either of the following: (1) A receipt from the tax administrator showing that the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid; (2) A certificate from the tax administrator indicating that no amounts are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable for the payment of the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon. (G) The failure of a video lottery sales agent to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's prize award does not relieve that person from liability for the municipal income tax with respect to that prize award. (H) If a casino operator, sports gaming proprietor, or video lottery sales agent files a return late, fails to file a return, remits amounts deducted and withheld late, or fails to remit amounts deducted and withheld as required under this section, the tax administrator of a municipal corporation may impose the following applicable penalty: (1) For the late remittance of, or failure to remit, tax deducted and withheld under this section, a penalty equal to fifty per cent of the tax deducted and withheld; (2) For the failure to file, or the late filing of, a monthly or annual return, a penalty of five hundred dollars for each return not filed or filed late. Interest shall accrue on past due amounts deducted and withheld at the rate prescribed in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. (I) Amounts deducted and withheld on behalf of a municipal corporation shall be allowed as a credit against payment of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation and shall be treated as taxes paid for purposes of section 718.08 of the Revised Code. This division applies only to the person for whom the amount is deducted and withheld. (J) The tax administrator shall prescribe the forms of the receipts and returns required under this section. Sec. 718.05. (A) An annual return with respect to the income tax levied by a municipal corporation shall be completed and filed by every taxpayer for any taxable year for which the taxpayer is liable for the tax. If the total credit allowed against the tax as described in division (D) of section 718.04 of the Revised Code for the year is equal to or exceeds the tax imposed by the municipal corporation, no return shall be required unless the municipal ordinance or resolution levying the tax requires the filing of a return in such circumstances. (B) If an individual is deceased, any return or notice required of that individual shall be completed and filed by that decedent's executor, administrator, or other person charged with the property of that decedent. (C) If an individual is unable to complete and file a return or notice required by a municipal corporation in accordance with this chapter, the return or notice required of that individual shall be completed and filed by the individual's duly authorized agent, guardian, conservator, fiduciary, or other person charged with the care of the person or property of that individual. (D) Returns or notices required of an estate or a trust shall be completed and filed by the fiduciary of the estate or trust. (E) No municipal corporation shall deny spouses the ability to file a joint return. (F)(1) Each return required to be filed under this section shall contain the signature of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's duly authorized agent and of the person who prepared the return for the taxpayer, and shall include the taxpayer's social security number or taxpayer identification number. Each return shall be verified by a declaration under penalty of perjury. (2) A tax administrator may require a taxpayer who is an individual to include, with each annual return, amended return, or request for refund required under this section, copies of only the following documents: all of the taxpayer's Internal Revenue Service form W-2, "Wage and Tax Statements," including all information reported on the taxpayer's federal W-2, as well as taxable wages reported or withheld for any municipal corporation; the taxpayer's Internal Revenue Service form 1040 or, in the case of a return or request required by a qualified municipal corporation, Ohio form IT-1040; and, with respect to an amended tax return or refund request, any other documentation necessary to support the refund request or the adjustments made in the amended return. An individual taxpayer who files the annual return required by this section electronically is not required to provide paper copies of any of the foregoing to the tax administrator unless the tax administrator requests such copies after the return has been filed. (3) A tax administrator may require a taxpayer that is not an individual to include, with each annual net profit return, amended net profit return, or request for refund required under this section, copies of only the following documents: the taxpayer's Internal Revenue Service form 1041, form 1065, form 1120, form 1120-REIT, form 1120F, or form 1120S, and, with respect to an amended tax return or refund request, any other documentation necessary to support the refund request or the adjustments made in the amended return. A taxpayer that is not an individual and that files an annual net profit return electronically through the Ohio business gateway or in some other manner shall either mail the documents required under this division to the tax administrator at the time of filing or, if electronic submission is available, submit the documents electronically through the Ohio business gateway. The department of taxation shall publish a method of electronically submitting the documents required under this division through the Ohio business gateway on or before January 1, 2016. The department shall transmit all documents submitted electronically under this division to the appropriate tax administrator. (4) After a taxpayer files a tax return, the tax administrator may request, and the taxpayer shall provide, any information, statements, or documents required by the municipal corporation to determine and verify the taxpayer's municipal income tax liability. The requirements imposed under division (F) of this section apply regardless of whether the taxpayer files on a generic form or on a form prescribed by the tax administrator. (G)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each individual income tax return required to be filed under this section shall be completed and filed as required by the tax administrator on or before the date prescribed for the filing of state individual income tax returns under division (G) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code. The taxpayer shall complete and file the return or notice on forms prescribed by the tax administrator or on generic forms, together with remittance made payable to the municipal corporation or tax administrator. No remittance is required if the amount shown to be due is ten dollars or less. A municipal corporation shall not require a qualifying employee whose income consists exclusively of exempt income described in division (C)(20)(b) or (c) of section 718.01 of the Revised Code to file a return under this section. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, each annual net profit return required to be filed under this section by a taxpayer that is not an individual shall be completed and filed as required by the tax administrator on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the end of the taxpayer's taxable year unless the taxpayer's unextended federal income tax return is due after that date, in which case the annual net profit return shall be completed and filed on or before the taxpayer's federal income tax return due date. The taxpayer shall complete and file the return or notice on forms prescribed by the tax administrator or on generic forms, together with remittance made payable to the municipal corporation or tax administrator. No remittance is required if the amount shown to be due is ten dollars or less. (2)(a) Any taxpayer that has duly requested an automatic six-month extension for filing the taxpayer's federal income tax return shall automatically receive an extension for the filing of a municipal income tax return. The extended due date of the municipal income tax return for a taxpayer that is an individual shall be the fifteenth day of the tenth month after the last day of the taxable year to which the return relates. The extended due date of the municipal income tax return for a taxpayer that is not an individual shall be the fifteenth day of the eleventh month after the last day of the taxable year to which the return relates. (b) A taxpayer that has not requested or received a six-month extension for filing the taxpayer's federal income tax return may request that the tax administrator grant the taxpayer a six-month extension of the date for filing the taxpayer's municipal income tax return. If the request is received by the tax administrator on or before the date the municipal income tax return is due, the tax administrator shall grant the taxpayer's requested extension. (c) An extension of time to file under division (G)(2) of this section is not an extension of the time to pay any tax due unless the tax administrator grants an extension of that date. (3) If the tax commissioner extends for all taxpayers the date for filing state income tax returns under division (G) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, a taxpayer shall automatically receive an extension for the filing of a municipal income tax return. The extended due date of the municipal income tax return shall be the same as the extended due date of the state income tax return. (4) If the tax administrator considers it necessary in order to ensure the payment of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation in accordance with this chapter, the tax administrator may require taxpayers to file returns and make payments otherwise than as provided in this section, including taxpayers not otherwise required to file annual returns. (5) If a taxpayer receives an extension for the filing of a municipal income tax return under division (G)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, the tax administrator shall not make any inquiry or send any notice to the taxpayer with regard to the return on or before the date the taxpayer files the return or on or before the extended due date to file the return, whichever occurs first. If a tax administrator violates division (G)(5) of this section, the municipal corporation shall reimburse the taxpayer for any reasonable costs incurred to respond to such inquiry or notice, up to one hundred fifty dollars. Division (G)(5) of this section does not apply to an extension received under division (G)(2) of this section if the tax administrator has actual knowledge that the taxpayer failed to file for a federal extension as required to receive the extension under division (G)(2)(a) of this section or failed to file for an extension under division (G)(2)(b) of this section. (6) To the extent that any provision in this division conflicts with any provision in section 718.052 of the Revised Code, the provision in that section prevails. (H)(1) For taxable years beginning after 2015, a municipal corporation shall not require a taxpayer to remit tax with respect to net profits if the amount due is less than ten dollars. (2) Except as provided in division (H)(3) of this section, any taxpayer not required to remit tax to a municipal corporation for a taxable year pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section shall file with the municipal corporation an annual net profit return under division (F)(3) of this section. (3) A municipal corporation shall not require a person to file a net profit return under this section if the person's income consists exclusively of exempt income described in division (C)(20)(a) of section 718.01 of the Revised Code. (I)(1) If any report, claim, statement, or other document required to be filed, or any payment required to be made, within a prescribed period or on or before a prescribed date under this chapter is delivered after that period or that date by United States mail to the tax administrator or other municipal official with which the report, claim, statement, or other document is required to be filed, or to which the payment is required to be made, the date of the postmark stamped on the cover in which the report, claim, statement, or other document, or payment is mailed shall be deemed to be the date of delivery or the date of payment. "The date of postmark" means, in the event there is more than one date on the cover, the earliest date imprinted on the cover by the postal service. (2) If a payment under this chapter is made by electronic funds transfer, the payment shall be considered to be made on the date of the timestamp assigned by the first electronic system receiving that payment. (J) The amounts withheld by an employer, the agent of an employer, or an other payer as described in section 718.03 of the Revised Code shall be allowed to the recipient of the compensation as credits against payment of the tax imposed on the recipient by the municipal corporation, unless the amounts withheld were not remitted to the municipal corporation and the recipient colluded with the employer, agent, or other payer in connection with the failure to remit the amounts withheld. (K) Each return required by a municipal corporation to be filed in accordance with this section shall include a box that the taxpayer may check to authorize another person, including a tax return preparer who prepared the return, to communicate with the tax administrator about matters pertaining to the return. The return or instructions accompanying the return shall indicate that by checking the box the taxpayer authorizes the tax administrator to contact the preparer or other person concerning questions that arise during the examination or other review of the return and authorizes the preparer or other person only to provide the tax administrator with information that is missing from the return, to contact the tax administrator for information about the examination or other review of the return or the status of the taxpayer's refund or payments, and to respond to notices about mathematical errors, offsets, or return preparation that the taxpayer has received from the tax administrator and has shown to the preparer or other person. (L) The tax administrator of a municipal corporation shall accept for filing a generic form of any income tax return, report, or document required by the municipal corporation in accordance with this chapter, provided that the generic form, once completed and filed, contains all of the information required by ordinance, resolution, or rules adopted by the municipal corporation or tax administrator, and provided that the taxpayer or tax return preparer filing the generic form otherwise complies with the provisions of this chapter and of the municipal corporation ordinance or resolution governing the filing of returns, reports, or documents. (M) When income tax returns, reports, or other documents require the signature of a tax return preparer, the tax administrator shall accept a facsimile of such a signature in lieu of a manual signature. (N)(1) As used in this division, "worksite location" has the same meaning as in section 718.011 of the Revised Code. (2) A person may notify a tax administrator that the person does not expect to be a taxpayer with respect to the municipal corporation for a taxable year if both of the following conditions apply: (a) The person was required to file a tax return with the municipal corporation for the immediately preceding taxable year because the person performed services at a worksite location within that municipal corporation. (b) The person no longer provides services in the municipal corporation and does not expect to be subject to the municipal corporation's income tax for the taxable year. The person shall provide the notice in a signed affidavit that briefly explains the person's circumstances, including the location of the previous worksite location and the last date on which the person performed services or made any sales within the municipal corporation. The affidavit also shall include the following statement: "The affiant has no plans to perform any services within the municipal corporation, make any sales in the municipal corporation, or otherwise become subject to the tax levied by the municipal corporation during the taxable year. If the affiant does become subject to the tax levied by the municipal corporation for the taxable year, the affiant agrees to be considered a taxpayer and to properly register as a taxpayer with the municipal corporation if such a registration is required by the municipal corporation's resolutions, ordinances, or rules." The person shall sign the affidavit under penalty of perjury. (c) If a person submits an affidavit described in division (N)(2) of this section, the tax administrator shall not require the person to file any tax return for the taxable year unless the tax administrator possesses information that conflicts with the affidavit or if the circumstances described in the affidavit change. Nothing in division (N) of this section prohibits the tax administrator from performing an audit of the person. Sec. 718.12. (A)(1)(a) Civil actions to recover municipal income taxes and penalties and interest on municipal income taxes shall be brought within the later of: (i) Three years after the tax return, including any valid extension, was due or the return was filed, whichever is later; or (ii) One year after the conclusion of the qualifying deferral period, if any. (b) The time limit described in division (A)(1)(a) of this section may be extended at any time if both the tax administrator and the employer, agent of the employer, other payer, or taxpayer consent in writing to the extension. Any extension shall also extend for the same period of time the time limit described in division (C) of this section. (2) As used in this section, "qualifying deferral period" means a period of time beginning and ending as follows: (a) Beginning on the date a person who is aggrieved by an assessment files with a local board of tax review the request described in section 718.11 of the Revised Code. That date shall not be affected by any subsequent decision, finding, or holding by any administrative body or court that the local board of tax review with which the aggrieved person filed the request did not have jurisdiction to affirm, reverse, or modify the assessment or any part of that assessment. (b) Ending the later of the sixtieth day after the date on which the final determination of the local board of tax review becomes final or, if any party appeals from the determination of the local board of tax review, the sixtieth day after the date on which the final determination of the local board of tax review is either ultimately affirmed in whole or in part or ultimately reversed and no further appeal of either that affirmation, in whole or in part, or that reversal is available or taken. (B) Prosecutions for an offense made punishable under a resolution or ordinance imposing an income tax shall be commenced within three years after the commission of the offense, provided that in the case of fraud, failure to file a return, or the omission of twenty-five per cent or more of income required to be reported, prosecutions may be commenced within six years after the commission of the offense. (C) A claim for a refund of municipal income taxes shall be brought within the time limitation provided in section 718.19 of the Revised Code. (D) Interest shall be allowed and paid on any overpayment by a taxpayer of any municipal income tax obligation from the date of the overpayment until the date of the refund of the overpayment, except that if any overpayment is refunded within ninety days after the final filing date of the annual return or ninety days after the completed return is filed, whichever is later, no interest shall be allowed on the refund. For the purpose of computing the payment of interest on amounts overpaid, no amount of tax for any taxable year shall be considered to have been paid before the date on which the return on which the tax is reported is due, without regard to any extension of time for filing that return. Interest shall be paid at the interest rate described in division (A)(5) of section 718.27 of the Revised Code. (E) Within sixty days after the final determination of any federal or state tax liability affecting the taxpayer's municipal tax liability, that taxpayer shall make and file an amended municipal return showing income subject to the municipal income tax based upon such final determination of federal or state tax liability, and pay any additional municipal income tax shown due thereon or make a claim for refund of any overpayment, unless the tax or overpayment is less than ten dollars. (F)(1) Notwithstanding the fact that an appeal is pending, the petitioner may pay all or a portion of the assessment that is the subject of the appeal. The acceptance of a payment by the municipal corporation does not prejudice any claim for refund upon final determination of the appeal. (2) If upon final determination of the appeal an error in the assessment is corrected by the tax administrator, upon an appeal so filed or pursuant to a final determination of the local board of tax review created under section 718.11 of the Revised Code, of the Ohio board of tax appeals, or any court to which the decision of the Ohio board of tax appeals has been appealed, so that the amount due from the party assessed under the corrected assessment is less than the amount paid, there shall be issued to the appellant or to the appellant's assigns or legal representative a refund in the amount of the overpayment as provided by section 718.19 of the Revised Code, with interest on that amount as provided by division (D) of this section. (G) No civil action to recover municipal income tax or related penalties or interest shall be brought during either of the following time periods: (1) The period during which a taxpayer has a right to appeal the imposition of that tax or interest or those penalties; (2) The period during which an appeal related to the imposition of that tax or interest or those penalties is pending. Sec. 718.13. (A) Any information gained as a result of returns, investigations, hearings, or verifications required or authorized by this chapter or by a charter or ordinance of a municipal corporation levying an income tax pursuant to this chapter is confidential, and no person shall access or disclose such information except in accordance with a proper judicial order or in connection with the performance of that person's official duties or the official business of the municipal corporation as authorized by this chapter or the charter or ordinance authorizing the levy. The tax administrator of the municipal corporation or a designee thereof may furnish copies of returns filed or otherwise received under this chapter and other related tax information to the internal revenue service, the tax commissioner, and tax administrators of other municipal corporations. (B) This section does not prohibit a municipal corporation from publishing or disclosing statistics in a form that does not disclose information with respect to particular taxpayers. (C) A municipal corporation may provide tax information related to municipal income tax revenues derived from a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district, as authorized under section 123.281 of the Revised Code, to the department of taxation and the fiscal officer of a governmental agency, as defined in division (F) of section 123.28 of the Revised Code, that owns, or holds a sufficient ownership in, a major sports facility located within the territorial boundaries of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district. Sec. 718.19. (A) Upon receipt of a request for a refund, the tax administrator of a municipal corporation, in accordance with this section, shall refund to employers, agents of employers, other payers, or taxpayers, with respect to any income or withholding tax levied by the municipal corporation: (1) Overpayments of more than ten dollars; (2) Amounts paid erroneously if the refund requested exceeds ten dollars. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, requests for refund shall be filed with the tax administrator, on the form prescribed by the tax administrator within three years after the tax return, including any valid extension, was due or paid, whichever is later. The tax administrator may require the requestor to file with the request any documentation that substantiates the requestor's claim for a refund. (2) On filing of the refund request, the tax administrator shall determine the amount of refund due and certify such amount to the appropriate municipal corporation official for payment. Except as provided in division (B)(3) of this section, the administrator shall issue an assessment to any taxpayer whose request for refund is fully or partially denied. The assessment shall state the amount of the refund that was denied, the reasons for the denial, and instructions for appealing the assessment. (3) If a tax administrator denies in whole or in part a refund request included within the taxpayer's originally filed annual income tax return, the tax administrator shall notify the taxpayer, in writing, of the amount of the refund that was denied, the reasons for the denial, and instructions for requesting an assessment that may be appealed under section 718.11 of the Revised Code. (C) A request for a refund that is received after the last day for filing specified in division (B) of this section shall be considered to have been filed in a timely manner if any of the following situations exist: (1) The request is delivered by the postal service, and the earliest postal service postmark on the cover in which the request is enclosed is not later than the last day for filing the request. (2) The request is delivered by the postal service, the only postmark on the cover in which the request is enclosed was affixed by a private postal meter, the date of that postmark is not later than the last day for filing the request, and the request is received within seven days of such last day. (3) The request is delivered by the postal service, no postmark date was affixed to the cover in which the request is enclosed or the date of the postmark so affixed is not legible, and the request is received within seven days of the last day for making the request. (D) As used in this section, "withholding tax" has the same meaning as in section 718.27 of the Revised Code. Sec. 718.85. (A)(1) For each taxable year, every taxpayer shall file an annual return. Such return, along with the amount of tax shown to be due on the return less the amount paid for the taxable year under section 718.88 of the Revised Code, shall be submitted to the tax commissioner, on a form and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner, on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following the end of the taxpayer's taxable year unless a taxpayer's unextended federal income tax return is due after that date, in which case the annual return shall be submitted on or before the taxpayer's federal income tax return due date. (2) The remittance shall be made payable to the treasurer of state and in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner. If the amount payable with the tax return is ten dollars or less, no remittance is required. (B) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all amounts the commissioner receives pursuant to sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code. The treasurer shall credit such amounts to the municipal net profit tax fund which is hereby created in the state treasury. (C)(1) Each return required to be filed under this section shall contain the signature of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's duly authorized agent and of the person who prepared the return for the taxpayer, and shall include the taxpayer's identification number. Each return shall be verified by a declaration under penalty of perjury. (2)(a) The tax commissioner may require a taxpayer to include, with each annual tax return, amended return, or request for refund filed with the commissioner under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code, copies of any relevant documents or other information. (b) A taxpayer that files an annual tax return electronically through the Ohio business gateway or in another manner as prescribed by the tax commissioner shall either submit the documents required under this division electronically as prescribed at the time of filing or, if electronic submission is not available, mail the documents to the tax commissioner. The department of taxation shall publish a method of electronically submitting the documents required under this division on or before January 1, 2019. (3) After a taxpayer files a tax return, the tax commissioner may request, and the taxpayer shall provide, any information, statements, or documents required to determine and verify the taxpayer's municipal income tax. (D)(1)(a) Any taxpayer that has duly requested an automatic extension for filing the taxpayer's federal income tax return shall automatically receive an extension for the filing of a tax return with the commissioner under this section. The extended due date of the return shall be the fifteenth day of the eleventh month after the last day of the taxable year to which the return relates. (b) A taxpayer that has not requested or received a six-month extension for filing the taxpayer's federal income tax return may request that the commissioner grant the taxpayer a six-month seven-month extension of the date for filing the taxpayer's tax return. If the commissioner receives the request on or before the date the tax return is due, the commissioner shall grant the taxpayer's extension request. (c) An extension of time to file under division (D)(1) of this section is not an extension of the time to pay any tax due unless the tax commissioner grants an extension of that date. (2) If the commissioner considers it necessary in order to ensure payment of a tax imposed in accordance with section 718.04 of the Revised Code, the commissioner may require taxpayers to file returns and make payments otherwise than as provided in this section, including taxpayers not otherwise required to file annual returns. (3) If a taxpayer receives an extension for the filing of a tax return under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section, the commissioner shall not make any inquiry or send any notice to the taxpayer with regard to the return on or before the date the taxpayer files the return or on or before the extended due date to file the return, whichever occurs first. Division (D)(3) of this section does not apply to an extension received under division (D)(1) of this section if the commissioner has actual knowledge that the taxpayer failed to file for a federal extension as required to receive the extension under division (D)(1)(a) of this section or failed to file for an extension under division (D)(1)(b) of this section. (E) Each return required to be filed in accordance with this section shall include a box that the taxpayer may check to authorize another person, including a tax return preparer who prepared the return, to communicate with the tax commissioner about matters pertaining to the return. The return or instructions accompanying the return shall indicate that by checking the box the taxpayer authorizes the commissioner to contact the preparer or other person concerning questions that arise during the examination or other review of the return and authorizes the preparer or other person only to provide the commissioner with information that is missing from the return, to contact the commissioner for information about the examination or other review of the return or the status of the taxpayer's refund or payments, and to respond to notices about mathematical errors, offsets, or return preparation that the taxpayer has received from the commissioner and has shown to the preparer or other person. (F) When income tax returns or other documents require the signature of a tax return preparer, the tax commissioner shall accept a facsimile or electronic version of such a signature in lieu of a manual signature. Sec. 718.88. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Combined tax liability" means the total amount of a taxpayer's income tax liabilities to all municipal corporations in this state for a taxable year. (2) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that the taxpayer reasonably estimates to be the taxpayer's combined tax liability for the current taxable year. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, every taxpayer shall make a declaration of estimated taxes for the current taxable year, on the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, if the amount payable as estimated taxes is at least two hundred dollars. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, a taxpayer having a taxable year of less than twelve months shall make a declaration under rules prescribed by the commissioner. (3) The declaration of estimated taxes shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year or on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the taxpayer becomes subject to tax for the first time. (4) The tax commissioner may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of taxpayers after finding that the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. (C) Each taxpayer shall file the declaration of estimated taxes with, and remit estimated taxes to, the tax commissioner at the times and in the amounts prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section. Remitted taxes shall be made payable to the treasurer of state. (1) The required portion of the combined tax liability for the taxable year that shall be paid through estimated taxes shall be as follows: (a) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year; (b) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the beginning of the taxable year, forty-five per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year; (c) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the beginning of the taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year; (d) On or before the fifteenth day of the twelfth month of the taxable year, ninety per cent of the combined tax liability for the taxable year. (2) If the taxpayer determines that its declaration of estimated taxes will not accurately reflect the taxpayer's tax liability for the taxable year, the taxpayer shall increase or decrease, as appropriate, its subsequent payments in equal installments to result in a more accurate payment of estimated taxes. (3)(a) Each taxpayer shall report on the declaration of estimated taxes the portion of the remittance that the taxpayer estimates that it owes to each municipal corporation for the taxable year. (b) Upon receiving a payment of estimated taxes under this section, the commissioner shall immediately forward the payment to the treasurer of state. The treasurer shall credit the payment in the same manner as in division (B) of section 718.85 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) In the case of any underpayment of estimated taxes, there shall be added the tax commissioner may add to the taxes an amount determined at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment for the period of underpayment, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (E) of this section. The amount of the underpayment shall be determined as follows: (a) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (b) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, forty-five per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (c) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (d) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, ninety per cent of the combined tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. (2) The period of the underpayment shall run from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the date on which the payment is made. For purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently due. (3) All amounts collected under this section shall be considered as taxes collected under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code and shall be credited and distributed to municipal corporations in accordance with section 718.83 of the Revised Code. (E) An underpayment of any portion of a combined tax liability shall be due to reasonable cause and the penalty imposed by this section shall not be added to the taxes for the taxable year if any of the following apply: (1) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least ninety per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during the year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due. (2) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the taxpayer for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the taxpayer filed a municipal income tax return for that year. Sec. 718.90. (A) If any taxpayer required to file a return under section 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code fails to file the return within the time prescribed, files an incorrect return, or fails to remit the full amount of the tax due for the period covered by the return, the tax commissioner may make an assessment against the taxpayer for any deficiency for the period for which the return or tax is due, based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. The tax commissioner shall not make or issue an assessment against a taxpayer more than three years after the later of the date the return subject to assessment was required to be filed or the date the return was filed. Such time limit may be extended if both the taxpayer and the commissioner consent in writing to the extension. Any such extension shall extend the three-year time limit in section 718.91 of the Revised Code for the same period of time. There shall be no bar or limit to an assessment against a taxpayer that fails to file a return subject to assessment as required by sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code, or that files a fraudulent return. The commissioner shall give the taxpayer assessed written notice of the assessment as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the taxpayer assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the authorized agent of the taxpayer assessed having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the taxpayer to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the taxpayer's objections, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the taxpayer has an office or place of business in this state, the county in which the taxpayer's statutory agent is located, or Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment against the taxpayer assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for municipal income taxes," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by issuing an assessment under this section. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, all money collected under this section shall be credited to the municipal net profit tax fund and distributed to the municipal corporation to which the money is owed based on the assessment issued under this section. (2) The attorney general may assess collection costs as authorized under section 109.08, 109.081, or 131.02 of the Revised Code on amounts collected under this section, which shall be credited to the attorney general claims fund created under section 109.081 of the Revised Code. (E) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the taxpayer liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (C) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the taxpayer assessed or the taxpayer's legal representative in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the taxpayer assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (B) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (F) Notwithstanding the fact that a petition for reassessment is pending, the taxpayer may pay all or a portion of the assessment that is the subject of the petition. The acceptance of a payment by the treasurer of state does not prejudice any claim for refund upon final determination of the petition. If upon final determination of the petition an error in the assessment is corrected by the tax commissioner, upon petition so filed or pursuant to a decision of the board of tax appeals or any court to which the determination or decision has been appealed, so that the amount due from the taxpayer under the corrected assessment is less than the portion paid, there shall be issued to the taxpayer, its assigns, or legal representative a refund in the amount of the overpayment as provided by section 718.91 of the Revised Code, with interest on that amount as provided by that section. Sec. 718.91. (A) An application to refund to a taxpayer amounts that were overpaid, paid illegally or erroneously, or paid on an illegal or erroneous assessment pursuant to sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code shall be filed with the tax commissioner within three years after the date of the illegal, erroneous, or excessive payment, the date the return to which the payment relates was due including any valid extension, or within any additional period allowed by division (A) of section 718.90 of the Revised Code, whichever is later. The application shall be filed in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner. (B)(1) On the filing of a refund application, the tax commissioner shall determine the amount of refund to which the applicant is entitled. The amount determined shall be based on the amount overpaid per return or assessment. If the amount is greater than ten dollars and not less than that claimed, the commissioner shall certify that amount to the director of budget and management and the treasurer of state for payment from the tax refund fund created in section 5703.052 of the Revised Code. If the amount is greater than ten dollars but less than that claimed, the commissioner shall proceed in accordance with section 5703.70 of the Revised Code. (2) Upon issuance of a refund under this section, the commissioner shall notify each municipal corporation of the amount refunded to the taxpayer attributable to that municipal corporation, which shall be deducted from the municipal corporation's next distribution under section 718.83 of the Revised Code. (C) Any portion of a refund determined under division (B) of this section that is not issued within ninety days after such determination shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the ninety-first day after such determination until the day the refund is paid or credited. On an illegal or erroneous assessment, interest shall be paid at that rate from the date of payment on the illegal or erroneous assessment until the day the refund is paid or credited. Sec. 731.14. All contracts made by the legislative authority of a village shall be executed in the name of the village and signed on its behalf by the mayor and clerk. Except where the contract is for equipment, services, materials, or supplies to be purchased under division (D) of section 713.23 or section 125.04 or 5513.01 of the Revised Code, available from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 4115.31 to 4115.35 of the Revised Code, or required to be purchased from a qualified nonprofit agency under sections 125.60 to 125.6012 of the Revised Code, when any expenditure, other than the compensation of persons employed in the village, exceeds the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code, such contracts shall be in writing and made with the lowest and best bidder after advertising once a week for not less than two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the village. The legislative authority may also cause notice to be inserted in trade papers or other publications designated by it or to be distributed by electronic means, including posting the notice on the legislative authority's internet web site. If the legislative authority posts the notice on its web site, it may eliminate the second notice otherwise required to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the village, provided that the first notice published in such newspaper meets all of the following requirements: (A) It is published at least two weeks before the opening of bids. (B) It includes a statement that the notice is posted on the legislative authority's internet web site. (C) It includes the internet address of the legislative authority's internet web site. (D) It includes instructions describing how the notice may be accessed on the legislative authority's internet web site. The bids shall be opened and shall be publicly read by the clerk of the village or a person designated by the clerk at the time, date, and place specified in the advertisement to bidders or specifications. The time, date, and place of bid openings may be extended to a later date by the legislative authority of the village, provided that written or oral notice of the change shall be given to all persons who have received or requested specifications no later than ninety-six hours prior to the original time and date fixed for the opening. This section does not apply to those villages that have provided for the appointment of a village administrator under section 735.271 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "personal protective equipment" means equipment worn to minimize exposure to hazards that cause workplace injuries and illnesses. Sec. 731.141. In those villages that have established the position of village administrator, as provided by section 735.271 of the Revised Code, the village administrator shall make contracts, purchase supplies and materials, and provide labor for any work under the administrator's supervision involving not more than the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code. When an expenditure, other than the compensation of persons employed by the village, exceeds the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code, the expenditure shall first be authorized and directed by ordinance of the legislative authority of the village. When so authorized and directed, except where the contract is for equipment, services, materials, or supplies to be purchased under division (D) of section 713.23 or section 125.04 or 5513.01 of the Revised Code, available from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 4115.31 to 4115.35 of the Revised Code, or required to be purchased from a qualified nonprofit agency under sections 125.60 to 125.6012 of the Revised Code, the village administrator shall make a written contract with the lowest and best bidder after advertisement for not less than two nor more than four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the village or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. The bids shall be opened and shall be publicly read by the village administrator or a person designated by the village administrator at the time, date, and place as specified in the advertisement to bidders or specifications. The time, date, and place of bid openings may be extended to a later date by the village administrator, provided that written or oral notice of the change shall be given to all persons who have received or requested specifications no later than ninety-six hours prior to the original time and date fixed for the opening. All contracts shall be executed in the name of the village and signed on its behalf by the village administrator and the clerk. No expenditure subject to this section shall be divided into component parts, separate projects, or separate items of work in order to avoid the requirements of this section. The legislative authority of a village may provide, by ordinance, for central purchasing for all offices, departments, divisions, boards, and commissions of the village, under the direction of the village administrator, who shall make contracts, purchase supplies or materials, and provide labor for any work of the village in the manner provided by this section. Sec. 731.29. Any ordinance or other measure passed by the legislative authority of a municipal corporation shall be subject to the referendum except as provided by section 731.30 of the Revised Code. No ordinance or other measure shall go into effect until thirty days after it is filed with the mayor of a city or passed by the legislative authority in a village, except as provided by such section. When Except as provided in section 731.291 of the Revised Code, when a petition, signed by ten thirty-five per cent of the number of electors who voted for governor at the most recent general election for the office of governor in the municipal corporation, is filed with the city auditor or village clerk within thirty days after any ordinance or other measure is filed with the mayor or passed by the legislative authority of a village, or in case the mayor has vetoed the ordinance or any measure and returned it to council, such petition may be filed within thirty days after the council has passed the ordinance or measure over the veto, ordering that such ordinance or measure be submitted to the electors of such municipal corporation for their approval or rejection, such auditor or clerk shall, after ten days, and not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of election, transmit a certified copy of the text of the ordinance or measure to the board of elections. The auditor or clerk shall transmit the petition to the board together with the certified copy of the ordinance or measure. The board shall examine all signatures on the petition to determine the number of electors of the municipal corporation who signed the petition. The board shall return the petition to the auditor or clerk within ten days after receiving it, together with a statement attesting to the number of such electors who signed the petition. The board shall submit the ordinance or measure to the electors of the municipal corporation, for their approval or rejection, at the next general election occurring subsequent to ninety days after the auditor or clerk certifies the sufficiency and validity of the petition to the board of elections. No such ordinance or measure shall go into effect until approved by the majority of those voting upon it. Sections 731.28 to 731.41 of the Revised Code do not prevent a municipal corporation, after the passage of any ordinance or other measure, from proceeding at once to give any notice or make any publication required by such ordinance or other measure. As used in this section, "certified copy" means a copy containing a written statement attesting that it is a true and exact reproduction of the original ordinance or other measure. Sec. 731.291. If a proposed ordinance establishes or modifies planned-unit development regulations, the following apply in lieu of the contrary provisions of section 731.29 of the Revised Code: (A) The board of elections shall determine the sufficiency and validity of the petition not later than thirty days after the petition is certified to the board of elections by the auditor or clerk. (B) If the board of elections determines there is an insufficient number of valid signatures, the board immediately shall notify the person who presented the petition. The person may submit additional signatures not later than ten days after the notification. Sec. 733.81. (A) As used in this section, "fiscal officer" means the city auditor, city treasurer, village fiscal officer, village clerk-treasurer, village clerk, and, in the case of a municipal corporation having a charter that designates an officer who, by virtue of the charter, has duties and functions similar to those of the city or village officers referred to in this section, the officer so designated by the charter. (B) To enhance the background and working knowledge of fiscal officers in government accounting, budgeting and financing, financial report preparation, cybersecurity, and the rules adopted by the auditor of state, bulletins or other information published by the auditor of state, and any other subject deemed appropriate by the auditor of state, the auditor of state shall conduct education programs and continuing education courses for individuals elected or appointed for the first time to the office of fiscal officer, and shall conduct continuing education courses for individuals who continue to hold the office in a subsequent term. The Ohio municipal league also may conduct such initial education programs and continuing education courses if approved by the auditor of state. The auditor of state, in conjunction with the Ohio municipal league, shall determine the manner and content of the initial education programs and continuing education courses. (C) A newly elected or appointed fiscal officer shall complete at least six hours of initial education programs before commencing, or during the first year of, office. A fiscal officer who participates in a training program held under section 117.44 of the Revised Code may apply those hours taken before commencing office to the six hours of initial education programs required under this division. (D)(1) In addition to the six hours of initial education required under division (B) of this section, a newly elected or appointed fiscal officer shall complete at least a total of eighteen continuing education hours during the fiscal officer's first term of office. (2) An elected or appointed fiscal officer who retains office for a subsequent term shall complete twelve hours of continuing education courses in each subsequent term of office. (3) The auditor of state shall adopt rules consistent with division (B) of this section specifying the initial education programs and continuing education courses that are required requirements for a fiscal officer who has been appointed. The requirements shall be proportionally equivalent, based on the time remaining in the vacated office, to the requirements for a newly elected or appointed fiscal officer. (4) At least two hours of ethics instruction shall be included in the continuing education hours required by divisions (D)(1) and (2) of this section. (5) A fiscal officer who participates in a training program or seminar established under section 109.43 of the Revised Code may apply the three hours of training to the continuing education hours required by divisions (D)(1) and (2) of this section. (E)(1) A certified public accountant who serves as a fiscal officer may apply to the continuing education hours required by division (D) of this section any hours of continuing education completed under section 4701.11 of the Revised Code after being elected or appointed as a fiscal officer. (2) A fiscal officer may apply to the continuing education hours required by division (D) of this section any hours of continuing education completed under section 135.22 of the Revised Code after being elected or appointed as a fiscal officer. (3) A fiscal officer who teaches an approved continuing education course under division (D) of this section is entitled to credit for the course in the same manner as if the fiscal officer had attended the course. (F) The auditor of state shall adopt rules for verifying the completion of initial education programs and continuing education courses required under this section for each category of fiscal officer. The auditor of state shall issue a certificate of completion to each fiscal officer who completes the initial education programs and continuing education courses. The auditor of state shall issue a "failure to complete" notice to any fiscal officer who is required to complete initial education programs and continuing education courses under this section, but who fails to do so. The notice is for informational purposes only and does not affect any individual's ability to hold the office to which the individual was elected or appointed. The fiscal officer shall retain the documentation of any initial or continuing education courses completed. The auditor of state shall audit for compliance with this section. (G) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation shall approve a reasonable amount requested by the fiscal officer to cover the costs the fiscal officer is required to incur to meet the requirements of this section, including registration fees, lodging and meal expenses, and travel expenses. Sec. 735.05. The director of public service may make any contract, purchase supplies or material, or provide labor for any work under the supervision of the department of public service involving not more than the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code. When an expenditure within the department, other than the compensation of persons employed in the department, exceeds the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code, the expenditure shall first be authorized and directed by ordinance of the city legislative authority. When so authorized and directed, except where the contract is for equipment, services, materials, or supplies to be purchased under division (D) of section 713.23 or section 125.04 or 5513.01 of the Revised Code or available from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 4115.31 to 4115.35 section 125.601 of the Revised Code, the director shall make a written contract with the lowest and best bidder after advertisement for not less than two nor more than four consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. No expenditure subject to this section shall be divided into component parts, separate projects, or separate items of work in order to avoid the requirements of this section. Sec. 742.043. (A) No person shall knowingly fail to file a complete and accurate campaign finance statement or independent expenditure statement in accordance with section 742.042 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, during the course of a person seeking nomination for, and during any campaign for, election to the board of trustees of the police and fire pension fund, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the nomination or the outcome of the campaign do any of the following by means of campaign materials, an advertisement on radio or television or in a newspaper or periodical, a public speech, press release, or otherwise: (1) With regard to a candidate, identify the candidate in a manner that implies that the candidate is a member of the board or use the term "re-elect" when the candidate is not currently a member of the board; (2) Make a false statement concerning the formal schooling or training completed or attempted by a candidate; a degree, diploma, certificate, scholarship, grant, award, prize, or honor received, earned, or held by a candidate; or the period of time during which a candidate attended any school, college, community technical school, or institution; (3) Make a false statement concerning the professional, occupational, or vocational licenses held by a candidate, or concerning any position the candidate held for which the candidate received a salary or wages; (4) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been indicted or convicted of a theft offense, extortion, or other crime involving financial corruption or moral turpitude; (5) Make a statement that a candidate has been indicted for any crime or has been the subject of a finding by the Ohio elections commission, the secretary of state, or the Ohio election integrity commission without disclosing the outcome of any legal proceedings resulting from the indictment or finding; (6) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has a record of treatment or confinement for mental disorder; (7) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been subjected to military discipline for criminal misconduct or dishonorably discharged from the armed services; (8) Falsely identify the source of a statement, issue statements under the name of another person without authorization, or falsely state the endorsement of or opposition to a candidate by a person or publication; (9) Make a false statement concerning the voting record of a candidate or board member; (10) Post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise disseminate a false statement concerning a candidate, either knowing the same to be false or with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not, if the statement is designed to promote the election, nomination, or defeat of the candidate. Sec. 742.044. The secretary of state, or any person acting on personal knowledge and subject to the penalties of perjury, may file a A complaint with the Ohio elections commission alleging a violation of section 742.043 of the Revised Code may be filed in accordance with section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. The complaint shall be made on a form prescribed and provided by the commission. On receipt of a complaint under this section, the commission shall hold a hearing open to the public to determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. The commission may administer oaths and issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. On the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold contempt proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. The commission shall provide the person accused of the violation at least seven days prior notice of the time, date, and place of the hearing. The accused may be represented by an attorney and shall have an opportunity to present evidence, call witnesses, and cross-examine witnesses. At the hearing, the commission shall determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. If the commission determines that a violation of division (A) of section 742.043 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall either impose a fine under section 742.99 of the Revised Code or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose the fine. If the commission determines that a violation of division (B) of section 742.043 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall impose the fine described in section 742.99 of the Revised Code, refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor, or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose a fine or refer the matter to a prosecutor. Sec. 742.99. (A) Whoever violates section 742.043 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of the violation. (B) Whoever violates division (B) of section 742.043 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for not more than six months or fined not more than five thousand dollars, or both. (C) Fines imposed by the Ohio elections commission under this section shall be paid into the Ohio elections commission fund created under section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 749.31. Except where the contract is for equipment, services, materials, or supplies available from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 4115.31 to 4115.35 section 125.601 of the Revised Code, the board of hospital trustees shall enter into a contract for work or supplies where the estimated cost exceeds fifty thousand dollars with the lowest and best bidder. Where the contract is for other than the construction, demolition, alteration, repair, or reconstruction of an improvement, the board shall enter into the contract when the bidder gives bond to the board, with such security as the board approves, that the bidder will perform the work and furnish materials or supplies in accordance with the contract. On the failure of such bidder within a reasonable time, to be fixed by the board, to enter into bond with such security, a contract may be made with the next lowest and best bidder, and so on until a contract is effected by a contractor giving such bond. The board may reject any bid. Sec. 755.181. The legislative authority of any municipal corporation, township, township park district, county, or school district desiring to join a joint recreation district created under section 755.14 of the Revised Code may, by resolution, petition the joint recreation district board of trustees for membership. If the joint recreation district does not impose a tax, the petitioning subdivision becomes a member upon approval by the joint recreation district's board of trustees. If the joint recreation district imposes a tax, the petitioning subdivision becomes a member after approval by the joint recreation district's board of trustees and after approval of the tax by the electors of the petitioning subdivision. In such a case, the joint recreation district's board of trustees and the county auditor shall proceed as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the subdivision's territory has been added to the joint recreation district. Upon certification by the board of trustees of the joint recreation district to the appropriate boards of election, the boards of election shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of the question to the electors of the petitioning subdivision qualified to vote thereon. The election shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within _______________ (Name of the subdivision to be added) be added to ____________________ (Name) joint recreation district, and a property tax, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _________________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_______________ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be in effect for _________________ (here insert the number of years the tax is to be in effect)?" If the question is approved by at least a majority of the electors voting on it, the joinder shall be effective as of the first day of January of the year following approval, and on that date, the joint recreation district tax shall be extended to the taxable property within the territory that has been added. The legislative authority of any subdivision that is a member of a joint recreation district may withdraw from it upon certification of a resolution proclaiming a withdrawal to the joint recreation district's board of trustees. Any subdivision withdrawing from a joint recreation district shall continue to have levied against its tax duplicate any tax levied by the district on the effective date of the withdrawal until it expires or is renewed. Members of a joint recreation district's board of trustees who represent the withdrawing subdivision are deemed to have resigned their position upon certification of a withdrawal resolution. Upon the withdrawal of any subdivision from a joint recreation district, the county auditor shall ascertain, apportion, and order a division of the funds on hand, moneys and taxes in the process of collection, except for taxes levied for the payment of indebtedness, credits, and real and personal property, either in money or in kind, on the basis of the valuation of the respective tax duplicates of the withdrawing subdivision and the remaining territory of the joint recreation district. When the number of subdivisions comprising a joint recreation district is reduced to one, the joint recreation district ceases to exist, and the funds, credits, and property remaining after apportionments to withdrawing subdivisions shall be assumed by the one remaining subdivision. When a joint recreation district ceases to exist and indebtedness remains unpaid, the board of county commissioners shall continue to levy and collect taxes for the payment of that indebtedness within the territory of the joint recreation district as it was comprised at the time the indebtedness was incurred. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 901.43. (A) As used in this section, "certificate of free sale" means a document issued by the director of agriculture that certifies to states and countries receiving the listed product that the product being exported is freely marketed without restriction in the United States. (B) The director of agriculture may authorize any department of agriculture laboratory to perform a laboratory service for any person, organization, political subdivision, state agency, federal agency, or other entity, whether public or private. The director shall adopt and enforce rules to provide for the rendering of a laboratory service. (B)(C) The director may charge a reasonable fee for the performance of a laboratory service, except when the service is performed on an official sample taken by the director acting pursuant to Title IX, Chapter 3715., or Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code; by a board of health acting as the licensor of retail food establishments or food service operations under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code; or by the director of health acting as the licensor of food service operations under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code. The director of agriculture shall adopt rules specifying what constitutes an official sample. The director shall publish a list of laboratory services offered, together with the fee for each service. (C)(D) The director may enter into a contract with any person, organization, political subdivision, state agency, federal agency, or other entity for the provision of a laboratory service. (D)(1)(E)(1) The director may adopt rules establishing standards for accreditation of laboratories and laboratory services and in doing so may adopt by reference existing or recognized standards or practices. (2) The director may inspect and accredit laboratories and laboratory services, and may charge a reasonable fee for the inspections and accreditation. (E)(1)(F)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the animal and consumer protection laboratory fund. Moneys from the following sources shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the fund: all moneys collected by the director under this section that are from fees generated by a laboratory service performed by the department and related to the diseases of animals, all moneys so collected that are from fees generated for the inspection and accreditation of laboratories and laboratory services related to the diseases of animals, all moneys collected by the director under this section that are from fees generated by a laboratory service performed by the consumer protection laboratory, all moneys so collected that are from fees generated for the inspection and accreditation of laboratories and laboratory services not related to weights and measures, money received by the director under sections 947.01 to 947.06 of the Revised Code, and all moneys collected under Chapters 943. and Chapter 953. of the Revised Code that are not credited to the animal and consumer protection fund created in section 943.26 of the Revised Code. The director may use the moneys held in the fund to pay the expenses necessary to operate the animal industry laboratory and the consumer protection laboratory, including the purchase of supplies and equipment. (2) All moneys collected by the director under this section that are from fees generated by a laboratory service performed by the weights and measures laboratory, and all moneys so collected that are from fees generated for the inspection and accreditation of laboratories and laboratory services related to weights and measures, shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the weights and measures laboratory fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The moneys held in the fund may be used to pay the expenses necessary to operate the division of weights and measures, including the purchase of supplies and equipment. (G)(1) The director may authorize any department of agriculture division or program to issue a certificate of free sale to any person, organization, political subdivision, state agency, federal agency, or other entity, whether public or private. The director may charge a fee of fifty dollars for issuance of a certificate of free sale. The director shall adopt and enforce rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to provide for the issuance of the certificates of free sale. (2) All money collected by the director under this section that is from fees related to the issuance of certificates of free sale shall be credited to the appropriate program fund administered by the department. (H)(1) Information, reports, and other records furnished, procured, or used in any department of agriculture laboratory to perform a laboratory service is not a public record. Any details that would identify a particular person, business, or premises that submitted a specimen to any such laboratory shall be treated as confidential and shall not be disclosed, unless the director elects to share such information with one of the following: (a) A local, state, or federal agency for use in the discharge of such agency's official public duties; (b) An institution of higher education. The director may enter into an agreement with a local, state, or federal agency or with an institution of higher education that requires information shared under division (H)(1) of this section to be kept confidential. (2) The director may prepare and publish statistical information without disclosing details that would identify a particular person or business client. Sec. 904.02. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio livestock care standards board consisting of the following members: (1) The director of agriculture, who shall be the chairperson of the board; (2) Ten members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The ten members shall be residents of this state and shall include the following: (a) One member representing family farms; (b) One member who is knowledgeable about food safety in this state; (c) Two members representing statewide organizations that represent farmers; (d) One member who is a veterinarian licensed under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code; (e) The state veterinarian in the department of agriculture; (f) The dean of the agriculture department of a college or university located in this state; (g) Two members of the public representing consumers in this state; (h) One member representing a county humane society organized under Chapter 1717. of the Revised Code. (3) One member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives who shall be a family farmer; (4) One member appointed by the president of the senate who shall be a family farmer. Not more than seven members appointed to the board at any given time shall be of the same political party. (B)(1) The governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate shall make appointments to the board not later than forty-five days after the effective date of this section March 31, 2010. (2) The following initial members of the board appointed by the governor shall be appointed for a term ending January 25, 2011: (a) The member representing family farmers; (b) The dean of the agriculture department of a college or university located in this state; (c) The member who is a veterinarian licensed under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code; (d) One of the members of the public representing consumers in this state. (3) The following initial members of the board shall be appointed for a term ending January 15, 2012: (a) The member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives who is a family farmer; (b) One of the members representing a statewide organization that represents farmers; (c) The member representing a county humane society organized under Chapter 1717. of the Revised Code; (d) The member who is knowledgeable about food safety in this state. (4) The following initial members of the board shall be appointed for a term ending January 15, 2013: (a) The member appointed by the president of the senate who is a family farmer; (b) One of the members of the public representing consumers in this state; (c) One of the members representing a statewide organization that represents farmers. (C) After the initial terms served in accordance with division (B) of this section, terms of office shall be for three years with each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term that it succeeds. However, the terms for the director of agriculture and the state veterinarian shall coincide with the length of time that the person holds the position of director or state veterinarian, as applicable. If the director or the state veterinarian resigns or that person's employment is terminated, the director or state veterinarian, as applicable, shall cease to serve on the board, and the successor of the director or state veterinarian shall then serve on the board in accordance with this section. Every other member shall hold office from the date of the member's appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Vacancies on the board shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of one hundred eighty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. A member may be reappointed upon the expiration of the member's term. (D) The board shall hold at least three regular meetings each year and may hold additional meetings at times that the chairperson or a majority of the board members considers appropriate. At the three regular meetings held by the board each year, the board shall conduct a review of the rules governing the care and well-being of livestock that have been or are proposed to be adopted under section 904.03 of the Revised Code. At the first meeting of the board in each calendar year, the director shall designate one member of the board to serve as its vice-chairperson. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum. The board may act only if a quorum is present and only by majority vote of that quorum. A vacancy on the board does not impair the right of the other members to exercise all of the board's powers. (E) Serving as an appointed member of the board does not constitute holding a public office or position of employment under the laws of this state and does not constitute grounds for removal of public officers or employees from their offices or positions of employment. (F) Appointed members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services. Members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members. The expenses shall be paid from the Ohio livestock care standards animal and consumer protection fund created in section 904.06 943.26 of the Revised Code. The expenses shall be paid in accordance with the rules and requirements adopted by the department of administrative services that are applicable to state employees. (G) The board may create committees that it considers appropriate to make recommendations to the board. Committees may include non-board members. Sec. 904.04. (A) In order to assist the Ohio livestock care standards board in the administration and enforcement of this chapter, the director of agriculture shall do all of the following: (1) Hire all employees of the board, including an executive director. Employees of the board shall be in the unclassified civil service, serve at the pleasure of the director of agriculture, and be compensated with money from the Ohio livestock care standards animal and consumer protection fund created in section 904.06 943.26 of the Revised Code. (2) Enter into contracts on behalf of the board; (3) Do all of the following with regard to rules governing the care and well-being of livestock adopted by the board under section 904.03 of the Revised Code: (a) Process and submit the rules to the joint committee on agency rule review pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code; (b) Contract for surveys and analyses; (c) Perform any other activities that assist the board in adopting the rules. (4) Publish and distribute information related to livestock care, including educational materials, to livestock producers and members of the public; (5) Investigate complaints regarding violations of the rules adopted under section 904.03 of the Revised Code in accordance with the authority granted by this chapter, sections 901.25 to 901.29 of the Revised Code, and rules adopted under this chapter and section 901.03 of the Revised Code; (6) Enforce the rules adopted under section 904.03 of the Revised Code and levy the civil penalties established by those rules. The director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a temporary or permanent injunction or other appropriate relief for violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it. For purposes of this division, the court of competent jurisdiction shall be either the court of common pleas of Licking county or the court of common pleas of the county where the violation is occurring. Money collected from civil penalties levied under division (A)(6) of this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund. (7) Perform any other duties necessary to assist the board in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. (B) With the consent of the premises owner and, if the premises owner is different from the livestock owner, the livestock owner, the director or the director's authorized representative may enter at all reasonable times on any premises for the purpose of determining compliance with the rules adopted under section 904.03 of the Revised Code. If the director or the director's authorized representative is denied access to the premises and the director or the director's authorized representative suspects that those rules are not being complied with, the director may apply for a search warrant authorizing access from a court of competent jurisdiction. The court shall issue the search warrant if there is probable cause. Probable cause may be based on hearsay, provided that there is substantial basis for believing the source is credible and there is factual basis for the information. Upon entry on premises in accordance with this division, the director or the director's authorized representative shall observe biosecurity measures in order to prevent spreading disease and infecting livestock. Sec. 905.32. (A) No person shall manufacture or distribute in this state any type of fertilizer until a license to manufacture or distribute has been obtained by the manufacturer or distributor from the department of agriculture upon payment of a five-dollar fifty-dollar fee: (1) For each fixed (permanent) location at which fertilizer is manufactured in this state; (2) For each mobile unit used to manufacture fertilizer in this state; (3) For each location out of the state from which fertilizer is distributed into this state; (4) For each location in this state from which fertilizer is distributed in this state. All licenses shall be valid for one year beginning on the first day of December of a calendar year through the thirtieth day of November of the following calendar year. A renewal application for a license shall be submitted no later than the thirtieth day of November each year. A person who submits a renewal application for a license after the thirtieth day of November shall include with the application a late filing fee of ten twenty-five dollars. (B) An application for a license shall include: (1) The name and address of the licensee; (2) The name and address of each bulk distribution point in the state, not licensed for fertilizer manufacture and distribution. The name and address shown on the license shall be shown on all labels, pertinent invoices, and bulk storage for fertilizers distributed by the licensee in this state. (C) The licensee shall inform the director of agriculture in writing of additional distribution points established during the period of the license. (D) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 905.57. (A) All information furnished to or procured by the director of agriculture under section 905.56 of the Revised Code is for the exclusive use and information of the director in the discharge of his official duties and is not open to the public nor to be used in any court in any action or proceeding therein unless the director is a party to such action or proceeding, but such information may be consolidated in statistical tables and published by the director in statistical form, without disclosing details of information furnished by any particular person. (B) No person shall willfully divulge any information secured while in the employ of the department of agriculture, with respect to the transactions, property, files, records, or papers of the department, or with respect to the business of any manufacturer, seller, or distributor of agricultural liming material to any person other than the director or the superior of such employee, or when called upon to testify in an action or proceeding to which the director is a party. Sec. 907.13. No person shall label agricultural, vegetable, or flower seed that is intended for sale in this state unless the person holds a valid seed labeler permit that has been issued by the director of agriculture in accordance with this section. A person who wishes to obtain a seed labeler permit shall file an application with the director on a form that the director provides and shall submit a permit fee in the amount of ten fifty dollars. Such a person who labels seed under more than one name or at more than one address shall obtain a separate seed labeler permit and pay a separate permit fee for each name and address. The applicant shall include the applicant's full name and address on the application together with any additional information that the director requires by rules adopted under section 907.10 of the Revised Code. If the applicant's address is not within this state or it does not represent a location in this state where the director can collect samples of the applicant's seed for analysis, then the applicant shall include on the application an address within this state where samples of the applicant's seed may be collected for those purposes or shall agree to provide the director or the director's authorized representative with seeds for sampling upon request. Upon receipt of a complete application accompanied by the ten-dollar fifty-dollar permit fee, the director shall issue a seed labeler's permit to the applicant. All seed labeler permits that are issued under this section shall expire on the thirty-first day of December January of each year regardless of the date on which a permit was issued during that yearthe previous one-year period. Each person who obtains a seed labeler permit shall label the seed that the person intends for sale in this state in accordance with the requirements established in sections 907.01 to 907.17 of the Revised Code. Each person who holds a valid seed labeler permit shall keep the permit posted in a conspicuous place in the principal seed room from which the person sells seed and shall comply with the reporting and fee requirements that are established in section 907.14 of the Revised Code. All money collected under this section shall be credited to the commercial feed and seed fund created in section 923.46 of the Revised Code. Sec. 907.14. (A) A person who holds a valid seed labeler permit issued under section 907.13 of the Revised Code shall report to the director of agriculture concerning the amount of seed that the person sells in this state. The report shall be made semiannually annually on a form that the director prescribes and provides. One semiannual The report shall be filed with the director prior to the first day of February of each year with respect to all sales that the person made during the period from the first day of July January to the thirty-first day of December of the preceding previous year. The second semiannual report shall be filed prior to the first day of August of each year with respect to all sales that the person made during the period from the first day of January to the thirtieth day of June of that year. (B) A person who holds a valid seed labeler permit shall include with each semiannual annual report a seed fee based on the amount of the seed that the person sold during that reporting period as follows: (1) For soybeans and small grains, including barley, oats, rye, wheat, triticale, and spelt, four cents per one hundred pounds; (2) For corn and grain sorghum, five cents per one hundred pounds; (3)(a) For any of the following seed sold at wholesale or retail or on consignment or commission, two per cent of the wholesale value of the containers of seed or, if the seed is not sold wholesale, two per cent of the retail value of the containers of seed: (i) Vegetable and flower seed sold in containers, other than hermetically sealed containers, of eight ounces or less; (ii) Flower seed sold in hermetically sealed containers that contain fewer than three hundred seeds; (iii) Vegetable seed sold in hermetically sealed containers that contain fewer than one thousand seeds. (b) The fees established pursuant to divisions (B)(3)(a)(ii) and (iii) of this section apply to both of the following: (i) Seed sold in hermetically sealed containers that contain the amount of seeds specified in division (B)(3)(a)(ii) or (iii) of this section, as applicable; (ii) Seed sold in hermetically sealed containers that do not clearly state the number of seeds that they contain. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(3)(b)(ii) of this section, if the weight of seed in a container, or the quantity of seed in a container, exceeds the applicable weight or quantity specified in division (B)(3)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, the fee established in division (B)(4) of this section applies. (4) For alfalfa, clover, grass, native grass, mixtures containing any of these, and all agricultural, vegetable, and flower seeds not specified in divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section, ten cents per one hundred pounds. If the total amount of the seed fee that is due is less than five fifty dollars, the person shall pay the minimum seed no fee, which is five dollars. (C) For each failure to report in full the amount of seed sold or to submit the required seed fees in full by the due date, a person who holds a valid seed labeler permit shall pay a penalty of ten per cent of the amount due or fifty dollars, whichever is greater. Failure to pay either the fee or the penalty within thirty days after the due date is cause for suspension or revocation by the director of the seed labeler permit or refusal, without a hearing, to issue a subsequent seed labeler permit for which the person applies. (D) This section does not apply to governmental entities that donate seed for conservation purposes. (E) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the commercial feed and seed fund created in section 923.46 of the Revised Code. Sec. 909.01. As used in sections 909.01 to 909.18 of the Revised Code: (A) "Person" includes corporations, companies, societies, associations, partnerships, any individual or combination of individuals, or any institution, park, or other public agency administered by the state or by any district, county, municipal corporation, or other governmental subdivision thereof. When construing or enforcing such sections, the act, omission, or failure of any officer, agent, servant, or other individual acting for or employed by any person as above defined within the scope of his the person's employment or office is deemed to be the act, omission, or failure of such person, as well as that of the officer, agent, servant, or other employee. (B) "Bees" means any stage of any species of the genus Apis. (C) "Bee diseases" means any infectious or contagious disease that is pathogenic or parasitic and affects the eggs, or the larval, pupal, or adult stages, of bees. (D) "Apiary" means any place where one or more colonies or nuclei of bees are kept. (E) "Queen rearing apiaries" means any apiary in which queen beesqueens are reared raised or purchased for sale, trade, or gift; or otherwise distributed or used to create, for sale, trade or gift, nucs, packages, or colonies. (F) "Hive" means any modern frame hive, box hive, box, barrel, log gum, skep, or any other natural or artificial receptacle, or any part thereof, that may be used as a domicile for bees. (G) "Equipment" means any used hives or parts thereof, used frames, used honey houses, used tools, used machines, or used devices employed in the handling or manipulation of bees, honey, or beeswax, or any used container for honey or beeswax that may be used in any apiary. (H) "Serious bee diseases" means any bee disease the director of agriculture determines to be a threat to the beekeeping industry within the state. (I) "Africanized honey bees" means any bees identified by the United States department of agriculture by approved identification methods to be classified as Apis mellifera scutellata. (J) "Swarm" means a population of bees that is not permanently established. (K) "Colony" means the hive and its equipment, including bees, combs, and brood. (L) "Compliance agreement" means a written agreement between the department of agriculture and any person engaged in queen rearing in which the person agrees to comply with stipulated requirements. (M) "Nuc" means a small colony of bees in a hive box to which all of the following applies: (1) The hive box contains three to five frames. (2) The hive box contains a laying queen bee and the queen's progeny in egg, larval, pupa, and adult stages. (3) The small colony has honey and a viable population sufficient enough to develop into a full-sized colony. Sec. 909.02. Any person owning or possessing bees shall on or before the first day of June of each year, or thereafter within ten thirty days after coming into ownership or possession of bees, or upon moving bees into this state from outside the state, file with the director of agriculture an application for registration setting forth the exact location of his the person's apiaries and the number of colonies of bees in each apiary, together with such other information as is required by the director, and accompanied by a registration fee of five dollars for each separate apiary owned or possessed by him at time of registration. Any person who submits his application after the dates specified by this section, or after the dates specified in rules adopted by the director, shall be subject to a ten-dollar late filing fee in addition to the five-dollar registration fee. Upon acceptance of the application, the director shall issue to such person a certificate of registration. All certificates registrations issued in accordance with this section expire on the following thirty-first day of May next following date of issuance or renewal, and shall be renewed according to the standard renewal procedure of sections 4745.01 to 4745.03 of the Revised Code. No person shall maintain an apiary located on premises other than that of his residence unless such the apiary is registered under this section and identifiable by an apiary name or identification number assigned to such person by the director. Such identification number shall be posted in a conspicuous location in the apiary. The moving, raising, and production of bees, beeswax, honey, and honey products shall be deemed an agricultural pursuit. Sec. 909.07. The board of county commissioners may appropriate such funds as it deems sufficient for the inspection of apiaries in its county. It may appoint appoint, with the consent and concurrence of the director of agriculture, a deputy apiarist with the consent and concurrence of the director of agriculture, said deputy to serve during the pleasure of said board except as specified in this section. Such Except as otherwise specified in this section, a deputy serves at the pleasure of the applicable board of county commissioners. A deputy apiarist shall be paid such a salary as the board of county commissioners determine for each day, or for each half day of determines for inspection work actually done, together with such and other expenses as are necessarily incurred in the doing of the directly related to inspection work. Before the board approves said the salary and expenses for payment, such the deputy apiarist shall submit the same to the director for his approvalreview. Such A deputy apiarist shall work under the direction of the director and shall be responsible to him for the enforcement of sections 909.01 to 909.18, inclusive, of the Revised Codeinspection of apiaries in assigned counties prescribed by the department of agriculture and for the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The The director may terminate the appointment of any deputy upon submitting to the board a statement that such deputy has shown himself to be apiarist if there is evidence that the deputy has been unethical, negligent, incompetent, inefficient, or untrustworthy in the discharge of his official duties. Such A deputy apiarist shall furnish to the director such reports as are required and upon blanks furnished by him the director. A duplicate of such reports shall be presented to the board each time that a statement of salary and expense is presented for payment. Sec. 909.08. Each person within the state engaged in the rearing of that intends to sell, trade, gift, or otherwise distribute queen bees for sale or gift, before the first day of April of each year, packaged bees, nucs, or colonies shall file with the director department of agriculture a request for the inspection of hiscertification of all of the person's queen rearing apiaries where queen bees are rearedfor which certification is requested. Each request shall be accompanied by a certification fee of fifty dollars or an amount specified in rules adopted by the director of agriculture. The director shall may require all queen rearing apiaries to be inspected as specified in rules adopted by the director at least once each year. If the inspection results in the diagnosis of any serious bee disease or pest or indicates the presence of Africanized honey bees, the owner thereof shall not ship, sell, or give away any queen sell, trade, gift, or otherwise distribute any bees until he has the diagnosed problem has been controlled or eradicated the disease or bees to the satisfaction of the director. When such serious bee diseases or bees pests have been controlled or eradicated in the queen rearing apiary, or if no serious bee disease or pest is diagnosed or Africanized honey bees are found, the director shall may issue a an official certificate, signed by the state apiarist, a copy of which . A copy of the certificate shall be attached to each package or shipment ofincluded with each queen bees mailed or shipped, nuc, or colony provided by the producer. The certificate shall be valid for, but not to exceed, one yearexpire on the thirty-first day of May of the following year and may be renewed annually. The use of tags or other devices bearing an invalid or altered certificate and the misuse of any valid certificate is prohibited. Sec. 909.09. No person shall sell, offer for sale, give, offer to give, barter, or offer to barter trade, or otherwise distribute any bees, honeycombs, or used beekeeping equipment without a permit from the director of agriculturethat contains a serious bee disease or pest. Upon request, the state or a deputy apiarist may issue a transfer permit if, upon inspection, the item is determined to be apparently free from serious bee diseases and pests. The permit, or a copy of it, shall may accompany any such transfer of ownership. The director may refuse to issue the permit until he finds it is found by inspection that any africanized honey bees are eradicated from and any serious bee diseases and pests are controlled or eradicated from the bees, honeycombs, or used beekeeping equipment. This section does not apply to the transfer of ownership of honeycomb for human consumption. Sec. 909.13. The director of agriculture, in accordance with sections 119.01 to 119.13, inclusive, of the Revised Code, may suspend or revoke any registration, certificate, or permit issued under sections 909.01 to 909.18, inclusive, of the Revised Codethis chapter, or a compliance agreement entered into under this chapter, for cause, including any violation of such sections this chapter or nonconformity with any rule or order promulgated under such sections in accordance with sections 119.01 to 119.13, inclusive, of the Revised Codethis chapter. There shall be no revocation of a compliance agreement, registration, certificate, or permit until the compliance agreement holder, registrant, or certificate or permit holder first is given an opportunity for a hearing by the director in regard thereto in accordance with sections 119.01 to 119.13, inclusive, of the Revised Code. An appeal may be taken from the action of the director in revocation of a compliance agreement, registration, certificate, or permit to the court of common pleas as provided in section 119.12 of the Revised Code. Sec. 911.02. Each person, firm, partnership, or corporation that owns or operates a bakery shall register each bakery that it owns or operates with the director of agriculture. For the registration, the owner or operator of each bakery shall pay an annual fee of thirty dollars for a production capacity of one thousand pounds of bakery product per hour or less and an annual fee of thirty dollars for each one thousand pounds of bakery product per hour capacity, or part thereof, in excess of one thousand pounds of bakery product per hourtwo hundred dollars. Any person who owns or operates a home bakery with only one oven, in a stove of ordinary home kitchen design and located in a home, used for the baking of baked goods to be sold, shall pay a sum of ten dollars annually for registration regardless of the capacity of the home bakery oven. The registration shall be renewed annually by the thirtieth day of September and shall be renewed according to the standard renewal procedure of Chapter 4745. of the Revised Code. The registration of the bakery shall show the location, including municipal corporation, street, and number, the name of the owner, and the name of the operator. The application for registration shall be made on a form prescribed and provided by the director. All moneys received from registration fees and fines collected under sections 911.01 to 911.20 of the Revised Code shall be deposited with the treasurer of state to the credit of the food safety fund created in section 915.24 of the Revised Code. All annual renewal registration fees required by this section shall be paid by the applicant for the renewal to the treasurer of state for deposit into the food safety fund. No bakery product that is manufactured in an out-of-state bakery shall be sold or offered for sale within this state unless the bakery is in compliance with sections 911.01 to 911.20 of the Revised Code, and is registered, having paid the annual registration fee. Registration of out-of-state bakeries is not required if a reciprocal agreement is in effect whereby a bakery located in this state is not subject to a license or registration fee by the receiving state or a political subdivision thereof. Sec. 913.23. (A) The director of agriculture may issue licenses as required by sections 913.22 to 913.28 of the Revised Code, may make the inspections and registrations required by those sections, and may prescribe the form of application to be filed under this section. (B) No person shall manufacture or bottle for sale within this state any soft drink in closed containers unless the person has a license issued by the director. Upon receipt of an application for such a license, the director shall examine the products and the place of manufacture where the business is to be conducted, to determine whether the products and place comply with sections 913.22 to 913.28 of the Revised Code. Upon finding there is compliance, and upon payment of a license fee of two hundred dollars, the director shall issue a license authorizing the applicant to manufacture or bottle for sale such soft drinks, subject to sections 913.22 to 913.28 of the Revised Code. The license shall expire on the last day of March of each year unless renewed. (C) No soft drink that is manufactured or bottled out of the state shall be sold or offered for sale within this state unless the soft drink and the plant in which the soft drink is manufactured or bottled are found by the director to comply with sections 913.22 to 913.28 of the Revised Code, and are registered by the director, which shall be upon a like application as provided in division (B) of this section. An annual registration fee of two hundred dollars shall be paid to the director by each applicant under this division. The registration shall be renewed annually, and the registration fee paid with the application for annual renewal. Registration of out-of-state soft drink manufacturers or bottlers or syrup and extract manufacturers is not required if a reciprocal agreement is in effect whereby a soft drink manufacturer or bottler or syrup and extract manufacturer located in this state is not subject to a license or registration fee by another state or a political subdivision thereof. (D) No person, other than a manufacturer or bottler holding a soft drink plant license under this section, shall sell, offer for sale, use, or have in the person's possession with intent to sell, any soda water syrup or extract or soft drink syrup, to be used in making, drawing, or dispensing soda water or other soft drinks, without first registering the person's name and address, the name and address of the manufacturer of the syrup or extract, the number and variety of such syrups or extracts intended to be sold, and the trade name or brand of those products, with the director, together with such samples of the syrups or extracts as the director requests for analysis. The person also shall pay to the department of agriculture at the time of making registration a license fee of one hundred dollars. No license shall be granted by the director unless the director determines that the syrup or extract is free from all harmful drugs and other ingredients that, as used, may be injurious to health. The registration shall be renewed annually upon like terms. If any manufacturer, bottler, agent, or seller is licensed or has registered the manufacturer's, bottler's, agent's, or seller's name and product as required by this section and has paid the manufacturer's, bottler's, agent's, or seller's fee, the manufacturer's, bottler's, agent's, or seller's distributor, retail agent, or retail seller using the products shall not be required to pay that fee. This section does not apply to local sellers of soft drinks as to syrups and extracts made by themselves for their own use exclusively. (E) All moneys received under sections 913.22 to 913.28 of the Revised Code shall be deposited with the treasurer of state to the credit of the food safety fund created in section 915.24 of the Revised Code. (F)(E) The director may revoke any license or registration issued under sections 913.22 to 913.28 of the Revised Code, whenever the director determines that those sections have been violated. When a license has been revoked, the licensee shall discontinue the manufacture and sale of soft drinks or other products for which the license was issued. When a registration has been revoked, the registrant shall discontinue the sale within this state of the registrant's products until those sections have been complied with and a new license or registration has been issued. The director may suspend any such license or registration temporarily, pending compliance with such conditions required by those sections as the director prescribes. Sec. 915.16. The license fee for an establishment is fifty two hundred dollars. Any operator operating in connection with a cold-storage warehouse holding a license under section 915.02 of the Revised Code is not required to secure an additional license under section 915.15 of the Revised Code so long as the operator continues to be licensed as a cold-storage warehouse; but the operator shall comply with sections 915.14 to 915.24 of the Revised Code, and all rules and regulations promulgated thereunder. The license issued shall be in such form as the department of agriculture prescribes. Licenses shall be valid until the last day of November following initial issuance or renewal and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. The original license or a certified copy thereof shall be conspicuously displayed by the operator in the establishment. Sec. 915.24. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the food safety fund. All of the following moneys shall be credited to the fund: (1) Bakery registration fees and fines received under sections 911.02 to 911.20 of the Revised Code; (2) Cannery license fees and renewal fees received under sections 913.01 to 913.05 of the Revised Code; (3) Moneys received under sections 913.22 to 913.28 of the Revised Code; (4) License fees, fines, and penalties recovered for the violation of sections 915.01 to 915.12 of the Revised Code; (5) License fees collected under sections 915.14 to 915.23 of the Revised Code; (6) License fees, other fees, and fines collected by or for the director of agriculture under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code; (7) Fees collected under section 3715.04 of the Revised Code for the issuance of certificates of health and freesale; (8) Registration fees and other fees collected by the director of agriculture under section 3715.041 of the Revised Code; (9) Money received from contracts or cooperative agreements with any agency of the United States government, or any other public or private agency or organization, for either of the following: (a) The performance of the prescribed duties of the department of agriculture under this chapter and Chapters 911., 913., 925., 3715., and 3717. of the Revised Code; (b) Accomplishing cooperative projects within the scope of such duties. (B) The director of agriculture shall use the moneys deposited into the food safety fund to administer and enforce the laws pursuant to which the moneys were collected. Sec. 921.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Active ingredient" means any ingredient that will prevent, destroy, kill, repel, control, or mitigate any pest, or that will act as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant. (B) "Adulterated" shall apply to any pesticide if its strength or purity is less than or greater than the professed standard or quality as expressed on its labeling or under which it is sold, if any substance has been substituted wholly or in part for the pesticide, or if any valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in part abstracted. (C) "Agricultural commodity" means any plant or part thereof or animal or animal product, produced for commercial use by a person, including farmers, ranchers, vineyardists, plant propagators, Christmas tree growers, aquaculturists, floriculturists, orchardists, foresters, or other comparable persons, primarily for the sale, consumption, propagation, or other use, by humans or animals. (D) "Aircraft" means any device used or designed for navigation or flight in the air, except a parachute or other device used primarily as safety equipment. (E) "Animal" means all vertebrate and invertebrate species, including, but not limited to, humans and other mammals, birds, fish, and shellfish. (F) "Authorized diagnostic inspection" means a diagnostic inspection conducted by a commercial applicator in the pesticide-use category in which the commercial applicator is licensed under this chapter. (G) "Beneficial insects" means those insects that, during their life cycle, are effective pollinators of plants, are parasites or predators of pests, or are otherwise beneficial. (H) "Brand" means any word, name, symbol, device, or combination thereof, that serves to distinguish the pesticide manufactured or distributed by one person from that manufactured or distributed by any other person. (I) "Pesticide applicator" means a commercial applicator or a private applicator. (J) "Private applicator" means an individual who is licensed under section 921.11 of the Revised Code. (K) "Commercial applicator" means an individual who is licensed under section 921.06 of the Revised Code to apply pesticides or to conduct authorized diagnostic inspections. (L) "Competent" means properly qualified as evidenced by passing the general examination and each applicable pesticide-use category examination for the pesticide-use categories in which a person applies pesticides and, in the case of a person who is a commercial applicator, conducts diagnostic inspections and by meeting any other criteria established by rule. (M) "Federal act" means the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act," 61 Stat. 163 (1947), 7 U.S.C.A. 136, as amended. (N) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for causing the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant, with or without causing abscission. (O) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for artificially accelerating the drying of plant tissue. (P) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance, other than a firearm, that is intended for trapping, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or any other form of plant or animal life, other than human beings and other than bacteria, virus, or other microorganism on or in living human beings or other living animals. "Device" does not include equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold separately therefrom. (Q) "Direct supervision" means either of the following, as applicable: (1) Unless , unless otherwise prescribed by its labeling, a general use pesticide is considered to be applied under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator, if it is applied by a trained serviceperson acting under the instructions and control of a commercial applicator. (2) Unless otherwise prescribed by its labeling, a restricted use pesticide is considered to be applied under the direct supervision of a private applicator, if it is applied by an immediate family member or a subordinate employee of that private applicator acting under the instructions and control of the private applicator, who is responsible for the actions of that immediate family member or subordinate employee and who is available when needed, even though the private applicator is not physically present at the time and place the restricted use pesticide application is occurring. (R) "Directly supervise" means providing direct supervision under division (Q)(1) or (2) or both of those divisions (Q) of this section, as applicable. (S) "Distribute" means to offer or hold for sale, sell, barter, ship, deliver for shipment, or receive and, having so received, to deliver or offer to deliver, pesticides in this state. "Distribute" does not mean to hold for use, apply, or use pesticides or dilutions of pesticides, except when a pesticide dealer holds for use, applies, or uses pesticides or dilutions of pesticides in the course of business with a commercial applicator who is employed by that pesticide dealer. (T) "Environment" includes water, air, land, and all plants and human beings and other animals living therein, and the interrelationships that exist among them. (U) "Fungus" means any nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophyte, which is any nonchlorophyll-bearing plant of a lower order than mosses and liverworts, as for example, rust, smut, mildew, mold, yeast, and bacteria, except those on or in living human beings or other animals, or processed food, beverages, or pharmaceuticals. (V) "General use pesticide" means a pesticide that is classified for general use under the federal act. (W) "Ground equipment" means any device, other than aircraft, used on land or water to apply pesticides in any form. (X) "Immediate family" means a person's spouse residing in the person's household, brothers and sisters of the whole or of the half blood, children, including adopted children, parents, and grandparents. (Y) "Incidental use" or "incidentally use" means the application of a general use pesticide on an occasional, isolated, site-specific basis in order to avoid immediate personal harm. "Incidental use" or "incidentally use" does not mean regular, routine, or maintenance application of a general use pesticide. (Z)(Y) "Inert ingredient" means an ingredient that is not active. (AA)(Z) "Ingredient statement" means a statement of the name and percentage of each active ingredient, together with the total percentage of inert ingredients. When the pesticide contains arsenic in any form, the ingredient statement shall include percentages of total and water soluble arsenic, each calculated as elemental arsenic. (BB)(AA) "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate animals generally having the body more or less obviously segmented, for the most part belonging to the class insecta, including, but not limited to, beetles, bugs, bees, and flies, and to other allied classes of arthropods, including, but not limited to, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and wood lice. (CC)(BB) "Integrated pest management" means a sustainable approach to managing pests by combining biological, cultural, physical, and chemical tools in a way that minimizes economic, health, and environmental risks. (DD)(CC) "Label" means the written, printed, or graphic matter on, or attached to the pesticide or device, or any of its containers or wrappers. (EE)(DD) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter: (1) Accompanying the pesticide product or device at any time; (2) To which reference is made on the label or in literature accompanying the pesticide product or device, except when accurate, nonmisleading reference is made to current official publications of the United States environmental protection agency, the United States department of agriculture or interior, the United States department of health and human services, state experiment stations, state agricultural colleges, or other similar federal or state institutions or official agencies, authorized by law to conduct research in the field of pesticides; (3) Including all brochures, technical and sales bulletins, and all advertising material. (FF)(EE) "Licensure" includes certification as used in the federal act. (GG)(FF) "Misbranded" applies, if the conditions of either division (GG)(1)(FF)(1) or (2) of this section are satisfied as follows: (1) To any pesticide or device, if at least one of the following occurs: (a) Its labeling bears any statement, design, or graphic representation relative thereto or to its ingredients that is false or misleading in any particular. (b) It is an imitation of or is distributed under the name of another pesticide or device. (c) Any word, statement, or other information required to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or graphic matter in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use. (2) To any pesticide, if at least one of the following occurs: (a) The labeling of a restricted use pesticide does not contain a statement that it is a restricted use pesticide. (b) The labeling accompanying it does not contain directions for use that are necessary for effecting the purpose for which the pesticide is intended and, if complied with, together with any requirements imposed by the federal act, that are adequate to protect the environment. (c) The label does not bear all of the following: (i) The name, brand, or trademark under which the pesticide is distributed; (ii) An ingredient statement on the part of the immediate container and on the outside container and wrapper of the retail package, if any, through which the ingredient statement on the immediate container cannot be clearly read, which is presented or displayed under customary conditions of purchase, provided that the ingredient statement may appear prominently on another part of the container as permitted by the amended federal act or by the director; (iii) A warning or caution statement that may be necessary and that, if complied with together with any requirement imposed under the federal act, would be adequate to protect the environment; (iv) The net weight or measure of the contents, subject to such reasonable variations as the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency or the director of agriculture may permit; (v) The name and address of the manufacturer, registrant, or person for whom manufactured; (vi) The United States environmental protection agency registration number assigned to each establishment in which the pesticide was produced and the agency registration number assigned to it, as required by regulations under the federal act. (d) The pesticide contains any substance or substances in quantities highly toxic to human beings unless the label bears, in addition to other label requirements, all of the following: (i) The skull and crossbones; (ii) The word "poison" in red prominently displayed on a background of distinctly contrasting color; (iii) A statement of an antidote or a practical or emergency medical treatment, first aid or otherwise, in case of poisoning by the pesticide. (e) It is contained in a package or other container or wrapping that does not conform to the standard established by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency. (HH)(GG) "Nematodes" means invertebrate animals of the phylum nemathelminthes and class nematoda, which are unsegmented, round worms with elongated, fusiform, or sac-like bodies covered with cuticle, and that inhabit soil, water, plants, or plant parts and also may be called nema or eel-worms. (II)(HH) "Pest" means a harmful, destructive, or nuisance insect, fungus, rodent, nematode, bacterium, bird, snail, weed, or parasitic plant or a harmful or destructive form of plant or animal life or virus, or any plant or animal species that the director declares to be a pest, except viruses, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in living animals, including human beings. (JJ)(II) "Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for either of the following: (1) Preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest; (2) Use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant. "Pesticide" includes a pest monitoring system designated by rule. (KK)(JJ) "Pesticide dealer" means any person who distributes restricted use pesticides or pesticides whose uses or distribution are further restricted by the director to the ultimate user or to a commercial applicator who is employed by that pesticide dealer. (LL)(KK) "Pesticide business" means a person who performs pesticide business activities. (MM)(LL) "Pesticide business activities" means any of the following: (1) The application of pesticides to the property of another for hire; (2) The solicitation to apply pesticides; (3) The conducting of authorized diagnostic inspections. (NN) "Pesticide business registered location" means a location at which pesticide business activities are conducted and that is registered through the issuance of a license to a pesticide business under section 921.09 of the Revised Code. (OO)(MM) "Pesticide-use category" means a specialized field of pesticide application or of diagnostic inspection as defined by rule. (PP)(NN) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of substances, intended, through physiological action, for accelerating or retarding the growth or rate of maturation, or for otherwise altering the behavior of plants or the produce thereof, but does not include substances to the extent that they are intended as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or soil amendments. (QQ)(OO) "Product name" means a coined or specific designation applied to an individual pesticide of a fixed combination and derivation. (RR)(PP) "Registrant" means a person who has registered a pesticide under this chapter. (SS)(QQ) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or pesticide use classified by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency for use only by a pesticide applicator or by an individual working under the direct supervision of a pesticide applicator. (TT)(RR) "Rule" means a rule adopted under section 921.16 of the Revised Code. (UU)(SS) "Sell or sale" means exchange of ownership or transfer of custody. (VV)(TT) "State restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or pesticides classified by the director subsequent to a hearing held in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for use only by pesticide applicators or individuals working under their direct supervision. (WW)(UU) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment" means any unreasonable risk to human beings or the environment taking into account the economic, social, and environmental benefits and costs of the use of any pesticide. (XX)(VV) "Trained serviceperson" means an employee of a pesticide business, other business, agency of the United States government, state agency, or political subdivision who has been trained to apply general use pesticides while under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator. (YY)(WW) "Weed" means any plant that grows where not wanted. (ZZ)(XX) "Wildlife" means all living things that are neither human, domesticated, or pests, including, but not limited to, mammals, birds, and aquatic life. (AAA)(YY) "Trade secret" and "confidential business information" mean any formula, plan, pattern, process, tool, mechanism, compound, procedure, production date, or compilation of information that is not patented, that is known only to certain individuals within a commercial concern, and that gives its user an opportunity to obtain a business advantage over competitors who do not know or use it. Sec. 921.02. (A) No person shall distribute a pesticide within this state unless the pesticide is registered with the director of agriculture under this chapter. Registrations shall be issued for a period of time established by rule and shall be renewed in accordance with deadlines established by rule. Registration is not required if a pesticide is shipped from one plant or warehouse to another plant or warehouse operated by the same person and used solely at that plant or warehouse as a constituent part to make a pesticide that is registered under this chapter, or if the pesticide is distributed under the provisions of an experimental use permit issued under section 921.03 of the Revised Code or an experimental use permit issued by the United States environmental protection agency. (B) The applicant for registration of a pesticide shall file a statement with the director on a form provided by the director, which shall include all of the following: (1) The name and address of the applicant and the name and address of the person whose name will appear on the label, if other than the applicant's name; (2) The brand and product name of the pesticide; (3) Any necessary information required for completion of the department of agriculture's application for registration, including the agency registration number; (4) A complete copy of the labeling accompanying the pesticide and a statement of all claims to be made for it, including the directions for use and the use classification as provided for in the federal act. (C) The director, when the director considers it necessary in the administration of this chapter, may require the submission of the complete formula of any pesticide including the active and inert ingredients. (D) The director may require a full description of the tests made and the results thereof upon which the claims are based for any pesticide. The director shall not consider any data submitted in support of an application, without permission of the applicant, in support of any other application for registration unless the other applicant first has offered to pay reasonable compensation for producing the test data to be relied upon and the data are not protected from disclosure by section 921.04 of the Revised Code. In the case of a renewal of registration, a statement shall be required only with respect to information that is different from that furnished when the pesticide was registered or last registered. (E) The director may require any other information to be submitted with an application. Any applicant may designate any portion of the required registration information as a trade secret or confidential business information. Upon receipt of any required registration information designated as a trade secret or confidential business information, the director shall consider the designated information as confidential and shall not reveal or cause to be revealed any such designated information without the consent of the applicants, except to persons directly involved in the registration process described in this section or as required by law. (F) Beginning January 1, 2007, each Each applicant shall pay a nonrefundable registration and inspection fee of one two hundred fifty dollars for each product name and brand registered for the company whose name appears on the label. If an applicant files for a renewal of registration after the deadline established by rule, the applicant shall pay a penalty fee of seventy-five one hundred twenty-five dollars for each product name and brand registered for the applicant. The penalty fee shall be added to the original fee and paid before the renewal registration is issued. In addition to any other remedy available under this chapter, if a pesticide that is not registered pursuant to this section is distributed within this state, the person required to register the pesticide shall do so and shall pay a penalty fee of seventy-five one hundred twenty-five dollars for each product name and brand registered for the applicant. The penalty fee shall be added to the original fee of one two hundred fifty dollars and paid before the registration is issued. (G) Provided that the state is authorized by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency to register pesticides to meet special local needs, the director shall require the information set forth under divisions (B), (C), (D), and (E) of this section and shall register any such pesticide after determining that all of the following conditions are met: (1) Its composition is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it. (2) Its labeling and other material required to be submitted comply with the requirements of the federal act and of this chapter, and rules adopted thereunder. (3) It will perform its intended function without unreasonable adverse effects on the environment. (4) When used in accordance with widespread and commonly recognized practice, it will not generally cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment. (5) The classification for general or restricted use is in conformity with the federal act. The director shall not make any lack of essentiality a criterion for denying the registration of any pesticide. When two pesticides meet the requirements of division (G) of this section, the director shall not register one in preference to the other. (H)(1) The director may refuse to register a pesticide if the application for registration fails to comply with this section. (2) The director may suspend or revoke a pesticide registration after a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for a pesticide that fails to meet the claims made for it on its label. (3) The director may immediately suspend a pesticide registration, prior to a hearing, when the director believes that the pesticide poses an immediate hazard to human or animal health or a hazard to the environment. Not later than fifteen days after suspending the registration, the director shall determine whether the pesticide poses such a hazard. If the director determines that no hazard exists, the director shall lift the suspension of the registration. If the director determines that a hazard exists, the director shall revoke the registration in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (I) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.06. (A)(1) No individual shall do any of the following without having a commercial applicator license issued by the director of agriculture: (a) Apply pesticides for a pesticide business without direct supervision; (b) Apply pesticides as part of the individual's duties while acting as an employee of the United States government, a state, county, township, or municipal corporation, or a park district, port authority, or sanitary district created under Chapter 1545., 4582., or 6115. of the Revised Code, respectively; (c) Apply restricted use pesticides. Division (A)(1)(c) of this section does not apply to a private applicator or an immediate family member or a subordinate employee of a private applicator who is acting under the direct supervision of that private applicator. (d) If the individual is the owner of a business other than a pesticide business or an employee of such an owner, apply pesticides at any of the following publicly accessible sites that are located on the property: (i) Food service operations that are licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code; (ii) Retail food establishments that are licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code; (iii) Golf courses; (iv) Rental properties of more than four apartment units at one location; (v) Hospitals or medical facilities as defined in section 3701.01 of the Revised Code; (vi) Child care centers or licensed school child programs as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; (vii) Facilities owned or operated by a school district established under Chapter 3311. of the Revised Code, including an educational service center, a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school that meets minimum standards established by the director of education and workforce; (viii) State institutions of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, nonprofit institutions holding a certificate of authorization pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, institutions holding a certificate of registration from the state board of career colleges and schools and program authorization for an associate or bachelor's degree program issued under section 3332.05 of the Revised Code, and private institutions exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code; (ix) Food processing establishments as defined in section 3715.021 of the Revised Code; (x) Any other site designated by rule. (e) Conduct authorized diagnostic inspections. (2) Divisions (A)(1)(a) to (d) of this section do not apply to an individual who is acting as a trained serviceperson under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator. (3) Licenses shall be issued for a period of time established by rule and shall be renewed in accordance with deadlines established by rule. The fee for each such license shall be established by rule. If a license is not issued or renewed, the application fee shall be retained by the state as payment for the reasonable expense of processing the application. The director shall by rule classify by pesticide-use category licenses to be issued under this section. A single license may include more than one pesticide-use category. No individual shall be required to pay an additional license fee if the individual is licensed for more than one category. The fee for each license or renewal does not apply to an applicant who is an employee of the department of agriculture whose job duties require licensure as a commercial applicator as a condition of employment. (B) Application for a commercial applicator license shall be made on a form prescribed by the director. Each application for a license shall state the pesticide-use category or categories of license for which the applicant is applying and other information that the director determines essential to the administration of this chapter. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, if the director finds that the applicant is competent to apply pesticides and conduct diagnostic inspections and that the applicant has passed both the general examination and each applicable pesticide-use category examination as required under division (A) of section 921.12 of the Revised Code, the director shall issue a commercial applicator license limited to the pesticide-use category or categories for which the applicant is found to be competent. If the director rejects an application, the director may explain why the application was rejected, describe the additional requirements necessary for the applicant to obtain a license, and return the application. The applicant may resubmit the application without payment of any additional fee. (2) The director shall issue a commercial applicator license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (a) The individual holds a commercial applicator license in another state. (b) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a commercial applicator in a state that does not issue that license. A license issued under this division shall be limited to the pesticide-use category or categories for which the applicant is licensed in another state or has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification in that state. (D)(1) A person who is a commercial applicator shall be deemed to hold a private applicator's license for purposes of applying pesticides on agricultural commodities that are produced by the commercial applicator. (2) A commercial applicator shall apply pesticides only in the pesticide-use category or categories in which the applicator is licensed under this chapter. (E) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.09. (A)(1) No person shall own or operate a pesticide business without obtaining a license from the director of agriculture. Licenses shall be issued for a period of time established by rule and shall be renewed in accordance with deadlines established by rule. (2) A person applying for a pesticide business license shall register obtain a license for each location that is owned by the person and used for the purpose of engaging in the pesticide business. (B) Any person who owns or operates a pesticide business outside of this state, but engages in the business of applying pesticides to properties of another for hire in this state, shall obtain a license for the person's principal out-of-state location from the director. In addition, the person shall register obtain a license for each location that is owned by the person in this state and used for the purpose of engaging in the pesticide business. (C)(1) The person applying for a pesticide business license shall file a statement with the director, on a form provided by the director, that shall include all of the following: (a) The address of the principal place of business of the pesticide business; (b) The address of each location that concerning which the person intends to register obtain a license under division (A)(2) or (B) of this section; (c) Any other information that the director determines necessary and that the director requires by rule. (2) Each applicant shall pay a license fee established by rule for the pesticide principal place of business plus an additional fee established by rule for each pesticide business registered location specified in the application. The license may be renewed upon payment of a renewal fee for the principal place of business established by rule plus an additional fee established by rule for each pesticide business registered location. A copy of the license shall be maintained and conspicuously displayed at each such pesticide business location. (3) The issuance of a pesticide business license constitutes registration licensure of any pesticide business location identified in the application under division (C)(1) of this section. (4) The owner or operator of a pesticide business shall notify the director not later than fifteen days after any change occurs in the information required under division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (D) The owner or operator of a pesticide business shall employ at least one commercial applicator for each pesticide business registered location the owner or operator owns or operates. (E) The owner or operator of a pesticide business is responsible for the acts of each employee in the handling, application, and use of pesticides and in the conducting of diagnostic inspections. The pesticide business license is subject to denial, modification, suspension, or revocation after a hearing for any violation of this chapter or any rule adopted or order issued under it. The director may levy against the owner or operator any civil penalties authorized by division (B) of section 921.16 of the Revised Code for any violation of this chapter or any rule adopted or order issued under it that is committed by the owner or operator or by the owner's or operator's officer, employee, or agent. (F) The director may modify a license issued under this section by one of the following methods: (1) Revoking a licensee's authority to operate out of a particular pesticide business registered location listed under division (C)(1)(b) of this section; (2) Preventing a licensee from operating within a specific pesticide-use category. (G) The director may deny a pesticide business license to any person whose pesticide business license has been revoked within the previous thirty-six months. (H) Each pesticide business registered location that is owned by a pesticide business is subject to inspection by the director. (I) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.11. (A)(1)(A) As used in this section, "use" means any of the following: (1) Performing pre-application activities involving mixing and loading the pesticide; (2) Applying the pesticide by a commercial applicator or private applicator; (3) Performing other pesticide-related activities, including transporting or storing pesticide containers that have been opened, cleaning equipment, and disposing of excess pesticides, spray mix, equipment wash waters, pesticide containers, and other pesticide-containing materials. (B) No individual shall apply use restricted use pesticides unless the individual is one of the following: (a)(1) Licensed under section 921.06 of the Revised Code; (b)(2) Licensed under division (B)(C) of this section; (c) A trained serviceperson who is acting under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator; (d) An immediate family member or a subordinate employee of a private applicator who is acting under the direct supervision of that private applicator. (2) No individual shall directly supervise the application of a restricted use pesticide unless the individual is one of the following: (a) Licensed under section 921.06 of the Revised Code; (b) Licensed under division (B) of this section. (B)(1)(C)(1) Subject to division (B)(2)(C)(2) of this section, the director of agriculture shall adopt rules to establish standards and procedures for the licensure of private applicators. An individual shall apply for a private applicator license to the director, on forms prescribed by the director. The individual shall include in the application the pesticide-use category or categories of the license for which the individual is applying and any other information that the director determines is essential to the administration of this chapter. The fee for each license shall be established by rule. Licenses shall be issued for a period of time established by rule and shall be renewed in accordance with deadlines established by rule. If a license is not issued or renewed, the state shall retain any fee submitted as payment for reasonable expenses of processing the application. (2) The director shall issue a private applicator license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (a) The individual holds a private applicator license in another state. (b) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a private applicator in a state that does not issue that license. A license issued under this division shall be limited to the pesticide-use category or categories for which the applicant is licensed in another state or has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification in that state. (C)(D) An individual who is licensed under this section shall use or directly supervise the use of a restricted use pesticide only for the purpose of producing agricultural commodities on property that is owned or rented by the individual or the individual's employer. (D)(E) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.12. (A)(A)(1) The director of agriculture shall require each applicant for a license by examination under section 921.06 or 921.11 of the Revised Code to be examined on the applicant's knowledge and competency in each of the following: (1)(a) This chapter and rules adopted under it; (2)(b) The proper use, handling, and application of pesticides and, if the applicant is applying for a license under section 921.06 of the Revised Code, in the conducting of diagnostic inspections in the pesticide-use categories for which the applicant has applied. (2) An applicant shall pay an examination fee of thirty dollars. (B) Each application for renewal of a license provided for in section 921.06 of the Revised Code shall be filed prior to the deadline established by rule. If filed after the deadline, a penalty of fifty per cent shall be assessed and added to the original fee and shall be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is issued. However, if a license issued under section 921.06 or 921.11 of the Revised Code is not renewed within one hundred eighty days after the date of expiration, the licensee shall be required to take another examination on this chapter and rules adopted under it and on the proper use, handling, and application of pesticides and, if applicable, the proper conducting of diagnostic inspections in the pesticide-use categories for which the licensee has been licensed. (C) A person who fails to pass an examination under division (A) or (B) of this section is not entitled to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for that failure. (D) The holder of a commercial applicator license may renew the license within one hundred eighty days after the date of expiration without re-examination unless the director determines that a new examination is necessary to insure that the holder continues to meet the requirements of changing technology and to assure a continuing level of competence and ability to use pesticides safely and properly. (E) The holder of a private applicator license may renew the license within one hundred eighty days after the date of expiration without re-examination unless the director determines that a new examination is necessary to insure that the holder continues to meet the requirements of changing technology and to assure a continuing level of competence and ability to use pesticides safely and properly. (F) Instead of requiring a commercial applicator or private applicator to complete re-examination successfully under division (D) or (E) of this section, the director may require, in accordance with criteria established by rule, the commercial applicator or private applicator to participate in training programs that are designed to foster knowledge of new technology and to ensure a continuing level of competence and ability to use pesticides safely and properly. The director or the director's representative may provide the training or may authorize a third party to do so. In order for such authorization to occur, the third party and its training program shall comply with standards and requirements established by rule. Sec. 921.13. (A) Any person who is acting in the capacity of a pesticide dealer or who advertises or assumes to act as a pesticide dealer at any time shall obtain a pesticide dealer license from the director of agriculture. Licenses shall be issued for a period of time established by rule and shall be renewed in accordance with deadlines established by rule. A license is required for each location or outlet within this state from which the person distributes pesticides. Any pesticide dealer who has no pesticide dealer outlets in this state and who distributes restricted use pesticides directly into this state shall obtain a pesticide dealer license from the director for the pesticide dealer's principal out-of-state location or outlet and for each sales person operating in the state. The applicant shall include a license fee established by rule with the application for a license. The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the director. Each pesticide dealer shall submit maintain records to the director of all of the restricted use pesticides the pesticide dealer has distributed, as specified by the director, and duplicate the records shall be retained by the pesticide dealer for a period of time established by rules. (B) This section does not apply to any federal, state, county, or municipal agency that provides pesticides for its own programs. (C) Each licensed pesticide dealer is responsible for the acts of each employee in the solicitation and sale of pesticides and all claims and recommendations for use of pesticides. The pesticide dealer's license is subject to denial, suspension, or revocation after a hearing for any violation of this chapter whether committed by the pesticide dealer or by the pesticide dealer's officer, agent, or employee. (D) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.14. (A) Each commercial applicator shall keep a record of both of the following: (1) All diagnostic inspections conducted to determine infestations of pests as required by rules adopted under division (C) of section 921.16 of the Revised Code; (2) All pesticide applications made by the applicator and by any trained serviceperson acting under the applicator's direct supervision as required by rules adopted under division (C) of section 921.16 of the Revised Code. Each commercial applicator shall submit copies of the records required under division (A) of this section to the pesticide business, other business, state agency, or political subdivision that employs the commercial applicator. (B) Each pesticide business, other business, state agency, or political subdivision that receives copies of records under division (A) of this section shall retain them for a period of time established by rule. (C) Each private applicator shall keep a record of all restricted use pesticide applications made by the applicator or under the applicator's direct supervision as required by rules adopted under division (C) of section 921.16 of the Revised Code. In addition, each private applicator shall maintain the record for a period of three years from the date of the restricted use pesticide application to which that record refers or for any longer period that the director of agriculture determines necessary. Sec. 921.16. (A) The director of agriculture shall adopt rules the director determines necessary for the effective enforcement and administration of this chapter. The rules may relate to, but are not limited to, the time, place, manner, and methods of application, materials, and amounts and concentrations of application of pesticides, may restrict or prohibit the use of pesticides in designated areas during specified periods of time, and shall encompass all reasonable factors that the director determines necessary to minimize or prevent damage to the environment. In addition, the rules shall establish the deadlines and time periods for registration, registration renewal, late registration renewal, and failure to register under section 921.02 of the Revised Code; the fees for registration, registration renewal, late registration renewal, and failure to register under section 921.02 of the Revised Code that shall apply until the fees that are established under that section take effect on January 1, 2007; and the fees, deadlines, and time periods for licensure and license renewal under sections 921.06, 921.09, 921.11, and 921.13 of the Revised Code. (B) The director shall adopt rules that establish a schedule of civil penalties for violations of this chapter, or any rule or order adopted or issued under it, provided that the civil penalty for a first violation shall not exceed five thousand dollars and the civil penalty for each subsequent violation shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. In determining the amount of a civil penalty for a violation, the director shall consider factors relevant to the severity of the violation, including past violations and the amount of actual or potential damage to the environment or to human beings. All money collected under this division shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. (C) The director shall adopt rules that set forth the conditions under which the director: (1) Requires that notice or posting be given of a proposed application of a pesticide; (2) Requires inspection, condemnation, or repair of equipment used to apply a pesticide; (3) Will suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue any pesticide registration for a violation of this chapter; (4) Requires safe handling, transportation, storage, display, distribution, and disposal of pesticides and their containers; (5) Ensures the protection of the health and safety of agricultural workers storing, handling, or applying pesticides, and all residents of agricultural labor camps, as that term is defined in section 3733.41 of the Revised Code, who are living or working in the vicinity of pesticide-treated areas; (6) Requires a record to be kept of all pesticide applications made by each commercial applicator and of all general use applications made by any trained serviceperson acting under the commercial applicator's direct supervision and of all restricted use pesticide applications made by each private applicator and by any immediate family member or subordinate employee of that private applicator who is acting under the private applicator's direct supervision as required under section 921.14 of the Revised Code; (7) Determines the pesticide-use categories of diagnostic inspections that must be conducted by a commercial applicator; (8) Requires a record to be kept of all diagnostic inspections conducted by each commercial applicator and by any trained service person. (D) The director shall prescribe standards for the licensure of applicators of pesticides consistent with those prescribed by the federal act and the regulations adopted under it or prescribe standards that are more restrictive than those prescribed by the federal act and the regulations adopted under it. The standards may relate to the use of a pesticide or to an individual's pesticide-use category. The director shall take into consideration standards of the United States environmental protection agency. (E) The director may adopt rules setting forth the conditions under which the director will: (1) Collect and examine samples of pesticides or devices; (2) Specify classes of devices that shall be subject to this chapter; (3) Prescribe other necessary registration information. (F) The director may adopt rules that do either or both of the following: (1) Designate, in addition to those restricted uses so classified by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency, restricted uses of pesticides for the state or for designated areas within the state and, if the director considers it necessary, to further restrict such use; (2) Define what constitutes "acting under the instructions and control of a commercial applicator" as used in the definition of "direct supervision" in division (Q)(1)(Q) of section 921.01 of the Revised Code. In adopting a rule under division (F)(2) of this section, the director shall consider the factors associated with the use of pesticide in the various pesticide-use categories. Based on consideration of the factors, the director may define "acting under the instructions and control of a commercial applicator" to include communications between a commercial applicator and a trained serviceperson that are conducted via landline telephone or a means of wireless communication. Any rules adopted under division (F)(2) of this section shall be drafted in consultation with representatives of the pesticide industry. (G) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the director shall not adopt any rule under this chapter that is inconsistent with the requirements of the federal act and regulations adopted thereunder. (H) The director, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may declare as a pest any form of plant or animal life, other than human beings and other than bacteria, viruses, and other microorganisms on or in living human beings or other living animals, that is injurious to health or the environment. (I) The director may make reports to the United States environmental protection agency, in the form and containing the information the agency may require. (J) The director shall adopt rules for the application, use, storage, and disposal of pesticides if, in the director's judgment, existing programs of the United States environmental protection agency necessitate such rules or pesticide labels do not sufficiently address issues or situations identified by the department of agriculture or interested state agencies. (K) The director shall adopt rules establishing all of the following: (1) Standards, requirements, and procedures for the examination and re-examination of commercial applicators and private applicators; (2) With respect to training programs that the director may require commercial applicators and private applicators to complete: (a) Standards and requirements that a training program must satisfy in order to be offered by the director or the director's representative or in order to be approved by the director if a third party wishes to offer it; (b) Eligibility standards and requirements that must be satisfied by third parties who wish to provide the training programs; (c) Procedures that third parties must follow in order to submit a proposed training program to the director for approval; (d) Criteria that the director must consider when determining whether to authorize a commercial applicator or private applicator to participate in a training program instead of being required to pass a re-examination. (3) Training requirements for a trained serviceperson. (L) The director shall adopt all rules under this chapter in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.23. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the director of agriculture may suspend, prior to a hearing, for not longer than ten thirty days, and after the opportunity for a hearing may deny, suspend, revoke, refuse to renew, or modify any provision of any license, permit, or registration issued pursuant to this chapter if the director finds that the applicant or the holder of a license, permit, or registration is no longer qualified, has violated any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under it, has entered into an administrative or judicial settlement under the federal act, has been found guilty of violating the federal act, or has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or of a felony. (B) The director shall not deny a license, permit, or registration issued pursuant to this chapter because an applicant was convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.24. No person shall do any of the following: (A) Apply, use, directly supervise such application or use, or recommend a pesticide for use inconsistent with the pesticide's labeling, treatment standards, or other restrictions imposed by the director of agriculture; (B) Act as a commercial applicator without being licensed to do so; (C) Use any restricted use pesticide, unless the person is licensed to do so, is a trained serviceperson acting under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator, or is an immediate family member or a subordinate employee of a private applicator under the direct supervision of that private applicator under this chapter; (D) Refuse or fail to keep or maintain records required by the director in rules adopted under this chapter, or to make reports when and as required by the director in rules adopted under this chapter; (E) Falsely or fraudulently represent the effect of pesticides or methods to be utilized; (F) Apply known ineffective or improper materials; (G) Operate in a negligent manner, which includes the operation of faulty or unsafe equipment; (H) Impersonate any federal, state, county, or municipal official; (I) Make false or fraudulent records, invoices, or reports; (J) Fail to provide training to trained servicepersons in the application of general use pesticides; (K) Fail to provide direct supervision as specified in rules adopted under division (C) of section 921.16 of the Revised Code; (L) Distribute a misbranded or adulterated pesticide; (M) Use fraud or misrepresentation in making application for a license or registration or renewal of a license or registration; (N) Refuse, fail, or neglect to comply with any limitation or restriction of a license or registration issued under this chapter or rules adopted thereunder; (O) Aid or abet a licensee or another person in violating this chapter or rules adopted thereunder; (P) Make a false or misleading statement in an inspection concerning any infestation of pests or the use of pesticides; (Q) Refuse or fail to comply with this chapter, the rules adopted thereunder, or any lawful order of the director; (R) Distribute restricted use pesticides to the ultimate user without a pesticide dealer's license; (S) Except as provided in division (F) of section 921.26 of the Revised Code, distribute restricted use pesticides to an ultimate user who is not licensed under section 921.06 or 921.11 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under this chapter; (T) Use any pesticide that is under an experimental use permit contrary to the provisions of the permit; (U) Engage in fraudulent business practices; (V) Dispose of any pesticide product or container in such a manner as to have unreasonable adverse effects on the environment; (W) Display any pesticide in any manner to produce unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, or to contaminate adjacent food, feed, or other products; (X) Apply any pesticide by aircraft without being licensed as a commercial applicator; (Y) Distribute a pesticide that is not registered with the director; (Z) Fail to properly supervise a trained serviceperson. Sec. 923.42. (A) No person who manufactures commercial feed or customer-formula feed, or whose name appears on the label of any commercial feed or customer-formula feed as a distributor shall distribute in this state any type of commercial feed unless hethe person is registered with the director of agriculture on a form provided by the director that identifies the manufacturer's or distributor's name, place of business, and location of each manufacturing facility in this statein accordance with this section. A manufacturer and distributor shall annually register, on a form prescribed by the director of agriculture, and pay a registration fee of fifty dollars. The person shall file the registration not later than February first of each year. A registration expires January thirty-first of the following year. (B) The director shall assign to each manufacturer or distributor registered under division (A) of this section a permanent registration number. (C) The director may revoke or suspend a registration or refuse to register a person upon a finding that the manufacturer, distributor, or person violated any provision of sections 923.41 to 923.55 of the Revised Code or any rule adopted under those sections. No registration shall be revoked, suspended, or refused until the manufacturer, distributor, or person has an opportunity to appear at an adjudication hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (C) For purposes of this section, "manufacturer" includes an exempt buyer. Sec. 923.44. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (A)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the first distributor of a commercial feed shall pay the director of agriculture a semiannual an annual inspection fee at the rate of twenty-five cents per ton, with a minimum payment of twenty-five dollars, on all commercial feeds distributed by the first distributor in this state. The department of agriculture shall not collect inspection fees on the first two hundred tons of commercial feed sold in a calendar year. (2) The semiannual annual inspection fee required under division (A)(1) of this section shall not be paid by the first distributor of a commercial feed if the distribution is made to an exempt buyer who shall be responsible for the fee. The director shall establish an exempt list consisting of those buyers who are responsible for the fee. (3) The semiannual annual inspection fee shall not be paid on a commercial feed if the fee has been paid by a previous distributor. (4) The semiannual annual inspection fee shall not be paid on customer-formula feed if the fee has been paid on the commercial feeds that are used as components in that customer-formula feed. (B) Each distributor or exempt buyer who is required to pay a fee under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall file a semiannual an annual statement with the director that includes the number of net tons of commercial feed distributed by the distributor or exempt buyer in this state, within thirty days after the thirtieth day of June and within thirty days after the thirty-first day of December, respectively, of each for the previous calendar year. The distributor or exempt buyer shall file the statement with the distributor's or exempt buyer's registration required under section 923.42 of the Revised Code. The inspection fee at the rate stated in division (A)(1) of this section shall accompany the statement. For a tonnage report that is not filed or payment of inspection fees that is not made within fifteen days after by the due date established in section 923.42 of the Revised Code, a penalty of ten per cent of the amount due, with a minimum penalty of or fifty dollars, whichever is greater, shall be assessed against the distributor or exempt buyer. The amount of fees due, plus penalty, shall constitute a debt and become the basis of a judgment against the distributor or exempt buyer. (C) No information furnished under this section shall be disclosed by an employee of the department of agriculture in such a way as to divulge the operation of any person required to make such a report. (D) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the commercial feed and seed fund created in section 923.46 of the Revised Code. Sec. 923.51. No person shall commit any of the following acts or cause to be committed any of the following acts: (A) Adulterate commercial feed or distribute adulterated commercial feed; (B) Adulterate pet food or distribute adulterated pet food; (C) Misbrand commercial feed or distribute misbranded commercial feed; (D) Adulterate any agricultural commodity such as whole seed, hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks, or hulls and feed it to animals or distribute any such commodity that is adulterated; (E) Remove or dispose of a commercial feed in violation of a withdrawal from distribution order or a condemnation and confiscation order issued under section 923.52 or 923.53 of the Revised Code or any rules adopted under those sections; (F) Use for the person's own advantage, or reveal except to the director of agriculture or the director's agent or to the courts when relevant in any judicial proceeding under sections 923.41 to 923.55 of the Revised Code or any rules adopted under those sections, any information acquired under the authority of those sections of the Revised Code or rules adopted under those sections that as a trade secret is entitled to protection; (G) Fail or refuse to register as required under section 923.42 of the Revised Code or any rule adopted under that section; (H) Fail to pay inspection fees or file semiannual annual reports as required under section 923.44 of the Revised Code or any rule adopted under that section. Sec. 924.01. As used in sections 924.01 to 924.16 and 924.40 to 924.55 of the Revised Code: (A) "Agricultural commodity" means any food, fiber, feed, animal, or plant, or group of foods, fibers, feeds, animals, or plants that the director of agriculture determines to be of the same nature, in either a natural or a processed state. "Agricultural commodity" does not include any of the following: (1) Grain, as defined in section 924.20 of the Revised Code; (2) Soybeans; (3) Hemp, as defined in section 928.01 of the Revised Code; (4) Pork, as defined in section 924.212 of the Revised Code. (B) "Distributor" means any person who sells, offers for sale, markets, or distributes an agricultural commodity that the person has purchased or acquired directly from a producer, or that the person markets on behalf of a producer. (C) "Handler" means any person who is in the business of packing, grading, selling, offering for sale, or marketing any agricultural commodity in commercial quantities as defined in a marketing program. (D) "Marketing program" means a program that is established by order of the director pursuant to this chapter, to improve or expand the market for an agricultural commodity. (E) "Operating committee" means a committee established to administer a marketing program for an agricultural commodity. (F) "Person" means any natural person, partnership, sole proprietorship, limited liability company, corporation, society, agricultural cooperative as defined in section 1729.01 of the Revised Code, association, or fiduciary. (G) "Processor" means any person who is in the business of grading, packaging, packing, canning, freezing, dehydrating, fermenting, distilling, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing, juicing, or in any other way preserving or changing the form of any agricultural commodity. (H) "Producer" means any person who is in the business of producing, or causing to be produced, any agricultural commodity for commercial sale, except that when used in reference to nursery stock, "producer" also means a distributor, processor, handler, or retailer of nursery stock. Sec. 924.212. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Pork" means the flesh of a porcine animal. (2) "Pork product" means a product produced or processed in whole or in part from pork. (3) "Producer" means a person who raises porcine animals in this state for sale in commerce. (B) The pork marketing program is established to promote the sale of pork and pork products. However, the pork marketing program shall not operate unless the national pork checkoff program created by the "Pork Promotion, Research, and Consumer Information Act of 1985," 7 U.S.C. 4801 et seq. is no longer in operation. Except as provided in this division and divisions (C) to (F) of this section, the procedures, requirements, and other provisions that are established under sections 924.20 to 924.30 of the Revised Code and rules that apply to the grain marketing program apply to the pork marketing program. For purposes of that application, references in those sections to "grain" are deemed to be replaced with references to "pork." (C) Not later than one hundred twenty days after the national pork checkoff program is no longer in operation, the Ohio pork council, or its successor, shall do both of the following: (1) Accept the names of persons as nominees to serve on a pork marketing program operating committee. In accepting nominations and placing names on the ballot, the Ohio pork council, or its successor, shall follow the procedures established in rules. (2) Hold an election to determine the membership of the operating committee. In the election, eligible producers may cast votes in person or mail ballots to polling places designated by the director of agriculture. The Ohio pork council, or its successor, shall establish a three-day period during which eligible producers may vote in person during normal business hours at the designated polling places. The director or another appropriate person shall send a ballot by ordinary first-class mail to an eligible producer who requests a ballot. An eligible producer shall make such a request by calling a toll-free telephone number designated by the director, by contacting one of the designated polling places, or by any additional method that the director may provide. A ballot returned by mail is not valid if it is postmarked later than the third day of the election period established by the Ohio pork council or its successor. For the purposes of an election of members of the pork marketing program operating committee, the director shall cause a ballot request form to be published at least thirty days before the beginning of the election period in at least two appropriate periodicals designated by the director and shall make the form available for reproduction to any interested group or association. (D) The pork marketing program operating committee consists of the following twelve members: (1) The director of agriculture, who shall be an ex-officio, non-voting member, or the director's designee; (2) The executive vice-president of the Ohio pork council or its successor; (3) Four members appointed by the director of agriculture who are pork producers. When making such appointments, the director shall give consideration to Ohio pork producers who are representatives on the national pork board; (4) Six members elected in accordance with section 924.22 of the Revised Code, except that the elections shall occur by district, with one member elected from each district. The districts are as follows: (a) District one: Allen, Defiance, Fulton, Henry, Paulding, Putnam, Van Wert, and Williams counties; (b) District two: Crawford, Erie, Hancock, Huron, Lucas, Marion, Ottawa, Richland, Sandusky, Seneca, Wood, and Wyandot counties; (c) District three: Auglaize, Mercer, Hardin, Logan, and Shelby counties; (d) District four: Ashland, Ashtabula, Carroll, Columbiana, Coshocton, Cuyahoga, Delaware, Geauga, Harrison, Holmes, Jefferson, Knox, Lake, Licking, Lorain, Mahoning, Medina, Morrow, Portage, Stark, Summit, Tuscarawas, Trumbull, Union, and Wayne counties; (e) District five: Butler, Darke, Hamilton, Miami, Montgomery, and Preble counties; (f) District six: Adams, Athens, Belmont, Brown, Champaign, Clark, Clermont, Clinton, Fairfield, Fayette, Franklin, Gallia, Greene, Guernsey, Highland, Hocking, Jackson, Lawrence, Madison, Meigs, Monroe, Morgan, Muskingum, Noble, Perry, Pickaway, Pike, Ross, Scioto, Vinton, Warren, and Washington counties. Except for the director, or the director's designee, all members of the pork marketing program operating committee are voting members. (E) Following the election of the initial members of the operating committee, all future elections for the pork marketing program shall occur in accordance with the pork marketing program's by-laws drafted and adopted by the pork marketing program operating committee. Such by-laws shall be adopted by the operating committee within one year after the creation of the pork marketing program. (F)(1) With regard to the levying of assessments under section 924.26 of the Revised Code, the assessment on pork shall be the lesser of the following: (a) Twenty-five one hundredths of one per cent of the market value of the porcine animal, pork, or pork product sold or imported; (b) An amount established by the operating committee at the initial meeting of the operating committee through an initial order. The operating committee may increase the rate of an assessment after the initial order by not more than one-tenth of one per cent per year. (3) If assessments are levied under the national pork checkoff program created by the "Pork Promotion, Research, and Consumer Information Act of 1985," 7 U.S.C. 4801 et seq., no assessments shall be levied for purposes of the pork marketing program established under this section. (4) The operating committee may determine if a refund of an assessment is permitted. Sec. 924.30. (A) No person shall knowingly fail or refuse to withhold or remit an assessment levied under section 924.212 or 924.26 of the Revised Code. (B) Before instituting an enforcement action for a violation of this section, the director of agriculture shall give the alleged violator an opportunity to present the alleged violator's views to the director as to why the action should not be instituted. Sec. 924.51. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio grape industries committee consisting of nine ten members. The members shall be the director of agriculture or the director's designee, who shall chair the committee, the superintendent of liquor control or the superintendent's designee, the chief of the division of markets of the department of agriculture, the viticulture extension specialist of the Ohio agricultural research and development center, who shall be a nonvoting member, and five seven members who shall be residents of this state and appointed by the director of agriculture in accordance with division (B) of this section. At no time shall the director appoint more than five seven members to the committee. (B) Of the five seven members of the committee appointed by the director of agriculture, not less than twothree, but not more than three four shall be persons who receive income from the production of grapes or grape products. Not less than twothree, but not more than three four members shall be persons who receive income from the production of wine from raw grape or fruit products in either raw fruit or fresh juice form. The terms for each appointed member of the committee shall be for three years, commencing on the first day of January and ending on the thirty-first day of December. No appointed member shall serve more than two consecutive terms. The director may remove any appointed member for cause. (C) Members shall be appointed to fill vacancies caused by death, resignation, or removal in the same manner prescribed for regular appointment to the committee. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the term. Any member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of that member's term until that member's successor takes office, or until a period of one hundred eighty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. (D) All members of the committee are entitled to their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members, payable from moneys received from the Ohio grape industries fund created under section 924.54 of the Revised Code. (E) A majority of the committee constitutes a quorum. Sec. 927.53. (A) Each collector or dealer who sells, offers, or exposes for sale, or distributes nursery stock within this state, or ships nursery stock to other states, shall pay an annual license fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars to the director of agriculture for each place of business the collector or dealer operates. (B)(1) Each dealer shall furnish the director, annually, an affidavit that the dealer will buy and sell only nursery stock which has been inspected and certified by an official state or federal inspector. (2) Each dealer's license expires on the thirty-first day of December of each year. Each licensed dealer shall apply for renewal of the dealer's license prior to the first day of January of each year and in accordance with the standard renewal procedure of sections 4745.01 to 4745.03 of the Revised Code. (C) Each licensed nurseryperson shall post conspicuously in the nurseryperson's principal place of business, the certificate which is issued to the nurseryperson in accordance with section 927.61 of the Revised Code. (D) Each licensed nurseryperson, or dealer, shall post conspicuously in each place of business, each certificate or license which is issued to the nurseryperson or dealer in compliance with this section or section 927.61 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Each nurseryperson who produces, sells, offers for sale, or distributes woody nursery stock within the state, or ships woody nursery stock to other states, shall pay to the director an annual inspection fee of one two hundred dollars plus eleven fifteen dollars per acre, or fraction thereof, of growing nursery stock in intensive production areas and seven ten dollars per acre, or fraction thereof, of growing nursery stock in nonintensive production areas, as applicable. (2) Each nurseryperson who limits production and sales of nursery stock to brambles, herbaceous, perennial, and other nonwoody plants, shall pay to the director an inspection fee of one hundred dollars, plus eleven dollars per acre, or fraction thereof, of growing nursery stock in intensive and nonintensive production areas. (F) The fees collected under this section shall be credited to the plant pest program fund created in section 927.54 of the Revised Code. Sec. 928.02. (A)(1) The director of agriculture shall may establish a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation and shall establish a program to monitor and regulate hemp processing in this state. Under the (2) If the director establishes a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation in this state and subsequently intends to transfer authority to the United States department of agriculture to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation in this state, the director shall take whatever actions necessary to effectuate such transfer. (3) If the director implements a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation under division (A)(1) of this section, the director shall issue hemp cultivation licenses and hemp processing licenses in accordance with rules adopted under section 928.03 of the Revised Code. (2) As (4) If the director implements a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation under division (A)(1) of this section and as authorized by the director, the department of agriculture or a university may cultivate or process hemp without a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license for research purposes. (5) As authorized by the director, the department of agriculture or a university may process hemp without a hemp processing license for research purposes. (B) Except If the director implements a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation under division (A)(1) of this section and except as authorized under division (A)(2)(A)(4) or (E) of this section, any person that wishes to cultivate hemp shall apply for and obtain a hemp cultivation license from the director in accordance with rules adopted under section 928.03 of the Revised Code. Except as authorized under division (A)(2)(A)(5) or (E) of this section, any person that wishes to process hemp shall apply for and obtain a hemp processing license from the director in accordance with those rules. Such licenses are valid for three years unless earlier suspended or revoked by the director. (C) The department, a university, or any person may, without a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license, possess, buy, or sell hemp or a hemp product. (D) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, the addition of hemp or a hemp product to any other product does not adulterate that other product. (E) The If the director implements a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation under division (A)(1) of this section, the director shall issue a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (1) The individual holds the applicable license in another state. (2) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a hemp cultivator or hemp processor in a state that does not issue the applicable license. (F) The director shall issue a hemp processing license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (1) The individual holds the applicable license in another state. (2) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a hemp processor in a state that does not issue the applicable license. Sec. 928.03. The director of agriculture, in consultation with the governor and attorney general, shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing standards and procedures for the regulation of hemp processing. The director also shall adopt such rules, in consultation with the governor and attorney general, regarding hemp cultivation and processingif the director implements a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation under division (A)(1) of section 928.02 of the Revised Code. The rules shall include all of the following: (A) The form of an application for a hemp cultivation license and hemp processing license and the information required to be included in each license application; (B) The amount of an initial application fee that an applicant shall submit along with an application for a hemp cultivation license or a hemp processing license, and the amount of an annual license fee that a licensee shall submit for a hemp cultivation license or a hemp processing license. In adopting rules under division (B) of this section, the director shall ensure both of the following: (1) That the amount of the application fee and annual license fee does not exceed an amount sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the department of agriculture to administer and enforce this chapter; (2) That there is one uniform application fee and one uniform annual license fee that applies to all applicants for a hemp cultivation license. (C) Requirements and procedures concerning background investigations of each applicant for a hemp cultivation license and each applicant for a hemp processing license. The director shall include both of the following in the rules adopted under this division: (1) A requirement that each applicant comply with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code; (2) Provisions that prohibit the director from issuing a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license to an applicant that has not complied with those sections. (D) Requirements regarding the experience, equipment, facilities, or land necessary to obtain a hemp cultivation license; (E) Requirements and procedures regarding standards of financial responsibility for each applicant for a hemp processing license. (F) Procedures and requirements for the issuance, renewal, denial, suspension, and revocation of a hemp cultivation license and hemp processing license, including providing for a hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code with regard to such a denial, suspension, or revocation; (G) Grounds for the denial, suspension, and revocation of a hemp cultivation license and of a hemp processing license, including a requirement that the director revoke a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license, for a period of ten years, of any person who pleads guilty to or is convicted of a felony relating to a controlled substance; (H) A requirement that the director shall not issue a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license to any person who has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of a felony relating to a controlled substance in the ten years immediately prior to the submission of the application for a license; (I) A requirement that any person that materially falsifies information in an application for a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license is ineligible to receive either license; (J) A practice for maintaining relevant information regarding land on which hemp is cultivated by hemp cultivation licensees, including a legal description of the land, in accordance with applicable federal law; (K) Requirements prohibiting a hemp cultivation licensee and a hemp processing licensee from cultivating or processing marihuana; (L) A procedure for testing, using post-decarboxylation or other similarly reliable methods, delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of plants and products for purposes of determining compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it; (M) Requirements and procedures for the issuance, administration, and enforcement of corrective action plans issued under this chapter; (N) A procedure for conducting annual inspections of, at a minimum, a random sample of hemp cultivation license holders to verify that plants are not being cultivated in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it; (O) A procedure for conducting annual inspections of, at a minimum, a random sample of hemp processing license holders to verify that such license holders are not operating in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it; (P) A procedure for complying with enforcement procedures required under federal law; (Q) A procedure for the effective disposal of all of the following: (1) Plants, whether growing or not, cultivated in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it; (2) Products derived from plants cultivated in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it; (3) Products produced in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it. (R) Requirements and procedures governing the production, storage, and disposal of hemp byproducts. For the purposes of this chapter and notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, "hemp product" includes a byproduct, produced as a result of processing hemp, that contains a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of more than three-tenths per cent, provided that the byproduct is produced, stored, and disposed of in accordance with rules adopted under division (R) of this section. (S) Procedures for sharing information regarding hemp cultivation license holders with the secretary of the USDA; (T) A setback distance requirement that specifies the distance that a hemp cultivation license holder shall locate hemp plants from a location where medical marijuana is being cultivated. The requirement does not apply to a hemp cultivation license holder with regard to a medical marijuana cultivator that locates medical marijuana within the established setback distance requirement after the hemp cultivation license holder begins operation. (U) Annual reporting requirements and procedures for hemp cultivation license holders and hemp processing license holders; (V) Recordkeeping and documentation maintenance requirements and procedures for hemp cultivation license holders and hemp processing license holders; (W) Fees for the laboratory testing of plants and products; (X) Standards for the testing and labeling of hemp and hemp products; (Y) Requirements prohibiting the processing of hemp in a building used as a personal residence or on land that is zoned for residential use; (Z) Production standards and manufacturing practices for processing hemp; (AA) Procedures and requirements for the transportation and storage of both hemp and hemp products; (BB) Any other requirements or procedures necessary to administer and enforce this chapter. Sec. 928.04. (A) Except as authorized under division (A)(2)(A)(4) or (5) of section 928.02 of the Revised Code, no person shall cultivate hemp without a hemp cultivation license issued by the director of agriculture under this chapter, if the director implements a program to monitor and regulate hemp cultivation under division (A)(1) of section 928.02 of the Revised Code, or process hemp without a hemp processing license issued by the director of agriculture under this chapter. (B) No person who holds a hemp cultivation license or hemp processing license issued by the director under this chapter shall violate this chapter or rules adopted under it. (C) No person subject to a corrective action plan issued by the director of agriculture under section 928.05 of the Revised Code shall fail to comply with the plan. (D) No person shall transport hemp or a hemp product in violation of rules adopted under section 928.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 935.06. (A) Not later than ninety days after receipt of an application under section 935.05 of the Revised Code, the director of agriculture shall issue or deny a wildlife shelter permit. The director shall issue a permit to an applicant only if all of the following apply: (1) The applicant is eighteen years of age or older. (2) The applicant has registered the dangerous wild animal or animals that are the subject of the application under section 935.04 of the Revised Code. (3) The applicant is in compliance with the standards of care established in rules adopted under division (A)(2) of section 935.17 of the Revised Code. (4) The applicant has sterilized each male dangerous wild animal that is possessed by the applicant. However, a dangerous wild animal is not required to be sterilized if a veterinarian that is qualified to provide veterinary care to the dangerous wild animal determines that the sterilization is medically contraindicated and the applicant has submitted a copy of the veterinarian's written determination with the applicant's application. (5) The applicant has signed an affidavit attesting that the applicant will not allow members of the public to be in physical contact with a dangerous wild animal possessed by the applicant. Division (A)(5) of this section does not apply to an employee of the applicant or a volunteer who has entered into a written agreement with the applicant to work for or volunteer for the applicant and assists in the care of a dangerous wild animal or animals specified in division (C)(20) of section 935.01 of the Revised Code possessed by the applicant if the care is provided under the direction of the applicant. (6) The applicant has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code and a criminal records check performed in accordance with division (B) of this section. (7) The facility at which a dangerous wild animal or dangerous wild animals will be maintained under the permit consists of at least one acre. Division (A)(7) of this section does not apply to either of the following: (a) Dangerous wild animals specified in division (C)(20) of section 935.01 of the Revised Code; (b) An applicant to whom the director issues a written waiver stating that the acreage requirement does not apply to the applicant. (8) The applicant has signed an affidavit attesting that the facility at which a dangerous wild animal or dangerous wild animals will be maintained under the permit and the conditions in which each dangerous wild animal will be kept in that facility are in compliance with this chapter and rules. (9) The applicant has submitted a complete application that meets the requirements established in section 935.05 of the Revised Code. (10) The applicant has submitted the applicable fee under section 935.05 of the Revised Code. If a permit is issued, the director shall assign a unique identification number to the permit. (B) Prior to issuing or denying a wildlife shelter permit, the director shall submit a request to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in the office of the attorney general for a criminal records check of the applicant for the permit. Upon receipt of a request, the superintendent of the bureau shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the applicant previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (1) A felony drug abuse offense; (2) An offense of violence that is a felony; (3) A violation of section 959.13 or 959.131 of the Revised Code or of section 2927.21 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to its repeal by S.B. 310 of the 129th general assembly. The applicant is responsible for paying all costs associated with the criminal records check. (C) If a permit application is denied, two hundred fifty dollars of the permit application fee shall be retained by the director as payment for the reasonable expense of processing the application, and the remainder of the fee shall be returned to the applicant. (D) Not later than the first day of December of each year, a permit holder shall apply to the director, on a form prescribed and provided by the director, for a renewal of the permit if the permit holder intends to retain possession of the dangerous wild animal or animals that are identified in the permit. Not later than thirty days after receipt of an application for renewal, the director shall renew or deny the renewal of the permit. The director shall renew the permit if the permit holder complies with this chapter and rules and pays a renewal fee in the same amount as the fee established for the initial permit in section 935.05 of the Revised Code. If a renewal permit is denied, two hundred fifty dollars of the renewal fee shall be retained by the director as payment for the reasonable expense of processing the application, and the remainder of the renewal fee shall be returned to the applicant. (E) If the director denies an application for a permit or a renewal of a permit, the director shall notify the person of the denial, the grounds for the denial, and the person's right to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (F) If a person does not appeal the determination of the director to deny an application for a permit or a renewal of a permit or if the determination of the director is affirmed under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, not later than thirty days after the decision not to appeal or after the determination is affirmed, as applicable, the person shall transfer the dangerous wild animal or animals that the person possesses to a humane society, wildlife sanctuary, rescue facility, facility that is an accredited member of either the association of zoos and aquariums or the zoological association of America, or facility that is located in another state and that complies with that state's applicable laws. After the transfer has occurred, the person shall submit proof to the director that the dangerous wild animal or animals were transferred and shall specify the society, sanctuary, or facility to which the animal or animals were transferred. The person is responsible for all costs associated with the transfer of the dangerous wild animal or animals. (G) If a person that has been issued a wildlife shelter permit under this section or a wildlife propagation permit under section 935.07 of the Revised Code dies, the person's next of kin shall do one of the following: (1) If the next of kin wishes to possess the dangerous wild animal or animals, obtain a wildlife shelter permit under this section or a wildlife propagation permit under section 935.07 of the Revised Code, as applicable. That next of kin shall comply with this chapter and rules, except that, with respect to the next of kin's initial permit, the person need not pay the applicable permit application fee. (2) If the deceased person has a last will and testament that specifies that the dangerous wild animal or animals possessed by the person are to be transferred to another person that has been issued a wildlife shelter permit, wildlife propagation permit, or rescue facility permit issued under this chapter, transfer the dangerous wild animal or animals to the applicable permit holder; (3) Transfer the dangerous wild animal or animals that were possessed by the deceased person in accordance with division (F) of this section. (H) All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the dangerous and restricted animal and consumer protection fund created in section 935.25 943.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 935.07. (A) A person that possesses a registered dangerous wild animal in this state on October 1, 2013, that wishes to continue to possess the dangerous wild animal on and after January 1, 2014, and that intends to propagate the animal solely for the purposes of a species survival program that complies with rules shall apply for a wildlife propagation permit under this section. An applicant need apply for only one permit regardless of the number of dangerous wild animals that the applicant possesses. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an applicant for a wildlife propagation permit shall comply with the requirements and procedures established in sections 935.05 and 935.06 of the Revised Code. The application fee for a wildlife propagation permit shall be one of the following, as applicable: (1) One thousand dollars if the applicant possesses not more than fifty dangerous wild animals; (2) Three thousand dollars if the applicant possesses more than fifty dangerous wild animals. (C) The facility at which a dangerous wild animal or dangerous wild animals will be maintained under a wildlife propagation permit shall consist of at least two acres. Division (C) of this section does not apply to either of the following: (1) Dangerous wild animals specified in division (C)(20) of section 935.01 of the Revised Code; (2) An applicant to whom the director of agriculture issues a written waiver stating that the acreage requirement does not apply to the applicant. (D) All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the dangerous and restricted animal and consumer protection fund created in section 935.25 943.26 of the Revised Code. (E) Division (A)(4) of section 935.06 of the Revised Code does not apply to an applicant for a wildlife propagation permit. Sec. 935.09. (A) Not later than ninety days after receipt of an application under section 935.08 of the Revised Code, the director of agriculture shall issue or deny a restricted snake possession permit. The director shall issue a permit to an applicant only if all of the following apply: (1) The applicant is eighteen years of age or older. (2) The applicant has signed an affidavit attesting that the applicant will not allow members of the public to be in physical contact with a restricted snake possessed by the applicant. Division (A)(2) of this section does not apply to either of the following: (a) An applicant that displays a restricted snake or snakes specified in division (L)(1) of section 935.01 of the Revised Code to a primary or secondary school age student; (b) An employee of the applicant or a volunteer who has entered into a written agreement with the applicant to work for or volunteer for the applicant and assists in the care of a restricted snake or snakes possessed by the applicant if the care is provided under the direction of the applicant. (3) The applicant has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony drug abuse offense, an offense of violence that is a felony, or a violation of section 959.13 or 959.131 of the Revised Code or of section 2927.21 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to its repeal by S.B. 310 of the 129th general assembly, as determined by a criminal records check performed in accordance with division (B) of this section. (4) The applicant has signed an affidavit attesting that the facility at which a restricted snake or snakes will be maintained under the permit and the conditions in which each restricted snake will be kept in that facility are in compliance with this chapter and rules. (5) The applicant has submitted a complete application that meets the requirements established in section 935.08 of the Revised Code. (6) The applicant has submitted the application fee established in section 935.08 of the Revised Code. If a permit is issued, the director shall assign a unique identification number to the permit. (B) Prior to issuing or denying a restricted snake possession permit, the director shall submit a request to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in the office of the attorney general for a criminal records check of the applicant for the permit. Upon receipt of a request, the superintendent of the bureau shall conduct a criminal records check in the manner described in division (B) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code to determine whether any information exists that indicates that the applicant previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (1) A felony drug abuse offense; (2) An offense of violence that is a felony; (3) A violation of section 959.13 or 959.131 of the Revised Code or of section 2927.21 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to its repeal by S.B. 310 of the 129th general assembly. The applicant is responsible for paying all costs associated with the criminal records check. (C) If a permit application is denied, seventy-five dollars of the permit application fee shall be retained by the director as payment for the reasonable expense of processing the application, and the remainder of the fee shall be returned to the applicant. (D) Not later than the first day of December of each year, a permit holder shall apply to the director, on a form prescribed and provided by the director, for a renewal of the permit if the permit holder intends to retain possession of the restricted snake or snakes that are identified in the permit. Not later than thirty days after receipt of an application for renewal, the director shall renew or deny the renewal of the permit. The director shall renew the permit if the permit holder complies with this chapter and rules and pays a renewal fee in the same amount as the fee established for the initial permit in section 935.08 of the Revised Code. If a renewal permit is denied, seventy-five dollars of the renewal fee shall be retained by the director as payment for the reasonable expense of processing the application, and the remainder of the renewal fee shall be returned to the applicant. (E) If the director denies an application for a permit or a renewal of a permit, the director shall notify the person of the denial, the grounds for the denial, and the person's right to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (F) If a person does not appeal the determination of the director to deny an application for a permit or a renewal of a permit or if the determination of the director is affirmed under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, not later than thirty days after the decision not to appeal or after the determination is affirmed, as applicable, the person shall transfer the restricted snake or snakes that the person possesses to a humane society, wildlife sanctuary, facility that is an accredited member of either the association of zoos and aquariums or the zoological association of America, or facility that is located in another state and that complies with that state's applicable laws. After the transfer has occurred, the person shall submit proof to the director that the restricted snake or snakes were transferred and shall specify the society, sanctuary, or facility to which the snake or snakes were transferred. The person is responsible for all costs associated with the transfer of the restricted snake or snakes. (G) If a person that has been issued a restricted snake possession permit under this section or a restricted snake propagation permit under section 935.10 of the Revised Code dies, the person's next of kin shall do one of the following: (1) If the next of kin wishes to possess the restricted snake or snakes, obtain a restricted snake possession permit under this section or a restricted snake propagation permit under section 935.10 of the Revised Code, as applicable. That next of kin shall comply with this chapter and rules, except that, with respect to the next of kin's initial permit, the person need not pay the applicable permit application fee. (2) If the deceased person has a last will and testament that specifies that the restricted snake or snakes possessed by the person are to be transferred to another person that has been issued a restricted snake possession permit under this section or a restricted snake propagation permit issued under section 935.10 of the Revised Code, transfer the restricted snake or snakes to the applicable permit holder; (3) Transfer the restricted snake or snakes that were possessed by the deceased person in accordance with division (F) of this section. (H) All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the dangerous and restricted animal and consumer protection fund created in section 935.25 943.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 935.10. (A)(1) A person that possesses a restricted snake in this state prior to January 1, 2014, that wishes to continue to possess the restricted snake on and after that date, and that intends to propagate, sell, trade, or otherwise transfer the snake shall obtain a restricted snake propagation permit under this section not later than January 1, 2014. (2) A person that acquires a restricted snake in this state on or after January 1, 2014, and that intends to propagate, sell, trade, or otherwise transfer the snake shall obtain a restricted snake propagation permit under this section not later than one hundred twenty days after acquiring the snake. (3) An applicant need apply for only one permit regardless of the number of restricted snakes that the applicant possesses. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an applicant for a restricted snake propagation permit shall comply with the requirements and procedures established in sections 935.08 and 935.09 of the Revised Code. The application fee for a restricted snake propagation permit shall be three hundred dollars. (C) If a permit application is denied, one hundred fifty dollars of the permit application fee shall be retained by the director of agriculture as payment for the reasonable expense of processing the application, and the remainder of the fee shall be returned to the applicant. (D) All fees collected under this section shall be credited to the dangerous and restricted animal and consumer protection fund created in section 935.25 943.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 935.16. (A) If a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake escapes, the person that possesses the animal or snake immediately shall notify both of the following: (1) The sheriff of the county and the chief law enforcement officer of the township or municipal corporation where the escape occurred; (2) The division of animal health in the department of agriculture by means of the twenty-four-hour telephone number that is maintained by the division. (B)(1) A law enforcement officer or natural resources law enforcement officer may destroy a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake that has escaped and that poses a threat to public safety. (2) A law enforcement officer or natural resources law enforcement officer that destroys an escaped dangerous wild animal or restricted snake pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section is not liable for damages in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from the destruction of the animal or snake. (C) The person that possesses a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake that escapes is responsible for all reasonable costs associated with the capture or destruction of the animal or snake. The person shall reimburse the political subdivision that employs the law enforcement officer who captured or destroyed the dangerous wild animal or restricted snake for the costs incurred in capturing or destroying the animal or snake. However, if the law enforcement officer is a state highway patrol trooper or if a natural resources law enforcement officer captured or destroyed the dangerous wild animal or restricted snake, the person shall reimburse the state highway patrol or department of natural resources, as applicable, for those costs. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, money collected under division (C) of this section shall be credited to a special fund, which is hereby created in the applicable political subdivision. Money in the special fund shall be used exclusively for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and rules. (2) Money collected under division (C) of this section for costs incurred by a state highway patrol trooper or a natural resources law enforcement officer under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the dangerous and restricted animal and consumer protection fund created in section 935.25 943.26 of the Revised Code. (3) If law enforcement officers from more than one jurisdiction assist in the capture or destruction of a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake, the money collected shall be proportionally distributed to each political subdivision's special fund and the dangerous and restricted animal fund, if applicable. Sec. 935.17. The director of agriculture shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish all of the following: (A) Both of the following concerning the registration of dangerous wild animals under section 935.04 of the Revised Code: (1) Any additional information that must be included with a registration; (2) Standards for the care and housing of registered dangerous wild animals, including standards for the proper care of each species of dangerous wild animal and caging and fencing of the animals. The director shall adopt rules under division (A) of this section not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section September 5, 2012. (B) Standards for the care and well-being of dangerous wild animals specified in divisions (C)(1) to (19) of section 935.01 of the Revised Code that are possessed by the holders of wildlife shelter permits and wildlife propagation permits issued under this chapter. The standards shall govern at least sanitation for, provision of health care for, and feeding, caging, housing, and fencing of dangerous wild animals. In adopting rules under this division, the director shall consider the following factors: (1) Best management practices for the care and well-being of dangerous wild animals; (2) Public health and safety; (3) Biosecurity; (4) The prevention of disease; (5) Animal morbidity and mortality data; (6) Generally accepted veterinary medical practices; (7) Standards adopted by the association of zoos and aquariums; (8) Standards adopted by the zoological association of America; (9) Standards established in the federal animal welfare act; (10) Ethical standards established by the American veterinary medical association; (11) Any other factors that the director considers necessary for the proper care and well-being of dangerous wild animals in this state. (C) Standards for the housing of dangerous wild animals specified in division (C)(20) of section 935.01 of the Revised Code that are possessed by the holders of wildlife shelter permits and wildlife propagation permits issued under this chapter; (D) All of the following concerning applications for permits issued under sections 935.06 and 935.07 of the Revised Code: (1) Any additional information that must be included with a permit application; (2) Criteria for determining what constitutes a species survival program for the purposes of division (A) of section 935.07 of the Revised Code and requirements and procedures that are necessary to determine if a program meets those criteria; (3) The content of the examination specified in division (B)(6) of section 935.05 of the Revised Code. The rules shall require the examination to test an applicant's knowledge on topics that include proper diet, health care, exercise needs, and housing of the species of dangerous wild animal or animals that are the subject of the application. (4) Procedures and requirements concerning the administration of the examination specified in division (B)(6) of section 935.05 of the Revised Code. (E) All of the following concerning applications for permits issued under sections 935.09 and 935.10 of the Revised Code: (1) Any additional information that must be included with a permit application; (2) The content of the examination specified in division (B)(5) of section 935.08 of the Revised Code. The rules shall require the examination to test an applicant's knowledge on topics that include proper diet, health care, and housing of the species of restricted snake or snakes that are the subject of the application. (3) Procedures and requirements concerning the administration of the examination specified in division (B)(5) of section 935.08 of the Revised Code. (F) Both of the following concerning applications for permits issued under section 935.101 of the Revised Code: (1) Information that must be included in a permit application; (2) Criteria and procedures for the issuance or denial of a permit. (G) Standards for the care and well-being of dangerous wild animals that are possessed by the holders of permits issued under section 935.101 of the Revised Code. The standards shall govern at least sanitation for, provision of health care for, and feeding, caging, housing, and fencing of dangerous wild animals. In adopting the rules, the director may consider the standards of care and housing established in rules adopted under division (B) of this section and section 935.12 of the Revised Code. (H) Procedures and requirements governing the maintenance of records under section 935.15 of the Revised Code; (I) Standards for signs that are required to be posted and displayed in accordance with section 935.18 of the Revised Code; (J) The amount of civil penalties that may be assessed under section 935.24 of the Revised Code; (K) Procedures and requirements governing the distribution of money under division (B)(4) of section 935.25 of the Revised Code from the dangerous and restricted animal fund created in that section; (L) Any other provisions necessary to administer and enforce this chapter. Sec. 935.20. (A) On and after January 1, 2014, the director of agriculture immediately shall cause an investigation to be conducted if the director has reason to believe that one of the following may be occurring: (1) A dangerous wild animal is possessed by a person who has not been issued a wildlife shelter permit, wildlife propagation permit, or rescue facility permit under this chapter. (2) A restricted snake is possessed by a person that has not been issued a restricted snake possession permit or restricted snake propagation permit under this chapter. (3) A dangerous wild animal or restricted snake is being treated or kept in a manner that is in violation of this chapter or rules. For purposes of the investigation, the director or the director's designee may order the animal or snake that is the subject of the notification to be quarantined or may order the transfer of the animal or snake to a facility that is on the list maintained by the director under this section. If the director's designee orders the animal or snake to be quarantined or transferred, the designee shall provide a copy of the order to the director. (B) The director shall attempt to notify the person owning or possessing an animal or snake that has been ordered to be quarantined or transferred under division (A) of this section. The notice shall be delivered in person or by certified mail. The director also may post a copy of a quarantine order at two conspicuous locations on the premises where the animal or snake is quarantined. The director shall maintain a copy of an order issued under this section and evidence that the director attempted to notify the person owning or possessing the animal or snake. (C) A quarantine or transfer order issued under this section shall contain all of the following: (1) The name and address of the person owning or possessing the animal or snake, if known; (2) A description of the quarantined or transferred animal or snake; (3) A description of the premises affected by the quarantine or transfer; (4) The reason for the quarantine or transfer; (5) Any terms and conditions of the quarantine or transfer; (6) A notice that a person adversely affected by the order may request a hearing to review the order. (D) A person that is adversely affected by a quarantine or transfer order pertaining to a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake owned or possessed by the person, within thirty days after the order is issued, may request in writing an adjudication in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. A request for an adjudication does not stay a quarantine or transfer order. (E) The owner of or person possessing a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake that was quarantined or transferred under division (A) of this section shall be responsible for all reasonable costs associated with the quarantine or transfer, including the costs of transportation, housing, food, and veterinary care for the animal or snake. If such an owner or person is unable to pay for the reasonable costs, the director shall certify the costs to the county auditor to be assessed against any property of the owner or person and thereby made a lien upon it and collected as other taxes. All money from the collection of liens under this division shall be credited in accordance with division (J) of this section. (F) If the state veterinarian determines that a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake that was quarantined or transferred under division (A) of this section is infected with or exposed to a dangerously contagious or infectious disease or is seriously injured, the state veterinarian shall so notify the director. The director may order the animal or snake to be humanely euthanized by a veterinarian if the state veterinarian has indicated that euthanization is medically necessary. (G) A quarantine or transfer order issued under this section shall remain in effect until one of the following occurs: (1) The director, after reviewing the results of the investigation conducted under division (A) of this section, issues a written notice of release. (2) A court of competent jurisdiction orders the quarantine or transfer order to be terminated in a proceeding conducted under division (H) of this section. (3) A court of competent jurisdiction orders the seizure of the dangerous wild animal or restricted snake in a proceeding conducted under division (H) of this section. (H) If, after reviewing the results of an investigation concerning a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake conducted under division (A) of this section and after resolution of any proceeding conducted under division (D) of this section, the director determines that a circumstance described in division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section is or was occurring, the director shall initiate, in a court of competent jurisdiction, a proceeding for the permanent seizure of the animal or snake, as applicable. If the court affirms the director's determination that a circumstance described in division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section is or was occurring, the court shall order the animal or snake seized and shall order the method of disposition of the animal or snake. The court may order the person owning or possessing the animal or snake to pay all reasonable costs associated with the seizure and, if applicable, the costs associated with the quarantine or transfer of the animal or snake, including the costs of transportation, housing, food, and veterinary care of the animal or snake. If the court does not affirm the director's determination, the court shall order the quarantine or transfer order to be terminated and the animal or snake to be returned to the person owning or possessing it, if applicable. (I) The director may authorize any of the following to conduct an investigation and order the quarantine or transfer of a dangerous wild animal or restricted snake under division (A) of this section: (1) Employees of the department of agriculture; (2) Natural resources law enforcement officers with the consent of the director of natural resources; (3) Employees of the department of health with the consent of the director of health; (4) Employees of a board of health with the consent of the board; (5) Humane society agents appointed under section 1717.06 of the Revised Code with the consent of the humane society; (6) Law enforcement officers with the consent of the sheriff of the county or the chief law enforcement officer of the township or municipal corporation, as applicable, by whom the law enforcement officers are employed; (7) Law enforcement officers who are state highway patrol troopers with the consent of the superintendent of the state highway patrol. (J) Money collected for reimbursement of costs associated with the quarantine or transfer of dangerous wild animals and restricted snakes under this section shall be credited to one of the following funds, as applicable: (1) If the animal or snake was quarantined or transferred by an employee of the department of agriculture or the department of health, a natural resources law enforcement officer, or a law enforcement officer who is a state highway patrol trooper, the dangerous and restricted animal and consumer protection fund created in section 935.25 943.26 of the Revised Code; (2) If the animal or snake was quarantined or transferred by an employee of a board of health, a special fund, which is hereby created in each health district, that shall be used exclusively for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and rules; (3) If the animal or snake was quarantined or transferred by a humane society agent, a special fund, which is hereby created in each county that has a humane society, that shall be used exclusively for the administration and enforcement of this chapter and rules; (4) If the animal or snake was quarantined or transferred by a law enforcement officer who is not a state highway patrol trooper, the special fund that is created in the political subdivision that employs the law enforcement officer in division (D) of section 935.16 of the Revised Code. (K) The director shall maintain a list of facilities inside and outside the state that the director determines are eligible to accept dangerous wild animals and restricted snakes for the purposes of this section. Sec. 935.24. (A) The attorney general, upon request of the director of agriculture, shall bring an action for injunction against any person who has violated, is violating, or is threatening to violate this chapter or rules. The court of common pleas in which an action for injunction is filed has jurisdiction to and shall grant preliminary and permanent injunctive relief upon a showing that the person against whom the action is brought has violated, is violating, or is threatening to violate this chapter or rules. (B)(1) The director may assess a civil penalty against any person that the director determines is not in compliance with this chapter or rules. (2) The director shall afford the person an opportunity for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to challenge the director's determination that the person is not in compliance with this chapter or rules. However, the person may waive the right to an adjudication. (3) If the opportunity for an adjudication is waived or if, after an adjudication, the director determines that a violation has occurred or is occurring, the director may issue an order and assess a civil penalty in an amount established in rules against the violator. The order and the assessment of the civil penalty may be appealed in accordance with section 119.12 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding any other section of the Revised Code, money resulting from any action taken under this section shall be credited to the dangerous and restricted animal and consumer protection fund created in section 935.25 943.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 943.04. (A) Fees for the initial issuance of any license issued pursuant to sections 943.02, 943.03, and 943.031 of the Revised Code, shall be paid to the department of agriculture. (B) All annual renewal fees for the licenses shall be paid by the applicant for the renewal of a license on or before the thirty-first day of March of each year to the treasurer of state. Except for license fees for small dealers, the fees shall be based on the number of head of livestock purchased, sold, or exchanged, in this state, whichever is the greatest, during the preceding calendar year. Those fees for dealers or brokers shall be as follows: Less than 1,000 head __________ $50.00 per annum; For 1,001 to 10,000 head __________ $125.00 per annum; For more than 10,000 head __________ $250.00 per annum. In the event a dealer or broker operates more than one place where livestock is purchased, sold, or exchanged, a fee shall be paid for each place, but only the original purchase, sale, or exchange shall be counted in computing the amount of the fee to be paid for each place operated by the dealer or broker. Shipment between yards owned or operated by the dealer or broker shall be exempt. A late fee of one hundred dollars shall be paid for each dealer or broker license renewal application that is received after the thirty-first day of March each year. (C)(1) A fee of twenty-five fifty dollars shall be paid by each small dealer. If a small dealer operates more than one place where livestock is purchased, sold, or exchanged, a fee shall be paid for each place, but only the original purchase, sale, or exchange shall be counted in computing the amount of fee to be paid for each place operated by the small dealer. Shipment between yards owned or operated by the small dealer shall be exempt. (2) A late fee of twenty-five one hundred dollars shall be paid for each small dealer license renewal application that is received after the thirty-first day of March each year. (D) A fee of twenty thirty dollars shall be paid by each licensed weigher and each employee that is appointed by a small dealer, dealer, or broker as provided in section 943.02 of the Revised Code. (E) A fee of ten dollars shall be paid by each licensed weigher. (F) All money collected under section 943.03 of the Revised Code and under this section shall be credited to the animal and consumer protection laboratory fund created in section 901.43 943.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 943.16. All fines imposed and collected under section 943.99 of the Revised Code shall be credited to the animal and consumer protection laboratory fund created in section 901.43 943.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 943.26. The animal and consumer protection fund is created in the state treasury.Notwithstanding section 943.04 of the Revised Code, The fund shall consist of livestock dealer or broker fees and civil penalties collected under this chapter, all money collected through the issuance of licenses to captive whitetail deer licensees under this chapter and all money collected under section 942.04 of the Revised Code shall be credited to the animal and consumer protection fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury and any other money credited to it under the Revised Code. The director of agriculture shall use money in the fund to administer Chapter 942. and sections 943.20 to 943.26 of the Revised Code and rules and Chapters 935. and 942. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under those chapters. Sec. 943.27. (A) The director of agriculture, after providing an opportunity for an adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may assess a civil penalty against a person who has violated or is in violation of sections 943.01 to 943.10 and 943.12 to 943.17 of the Revised Code. If the director assesses a civil penalty, the director shall do so as follows: (1) In an amount not exceeding five hundred dollars if, within five years of the violation, the director has not previously assessed a civil penalty against the person under this section; (2) In an amount not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars if, within five years of the violation, the director has previously assessed one civil penalty against the person under this section; (3) In an amount not exceeding ten thousand dollars if, within five years of the violation, the director has previously assessed two or more civil penalties against the person under this section. (B) Money collected under division (A) of this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the animal and consumer protection fund created in section 943.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 943.99. (A) Whoever violates section 943.11 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. (B) Whoever violates sections 943.01 to 943.10 and 943.12 to 943.17 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 956.07. (A) A person who is applying for an annual license to operate a high volume breeder or to act as or perform the functions of a dog broker under section 956.04 or 956.05 of the Revised Code, as applicable, shall include with the application for a license a nonrefundable license application fee. The application fees are as follows: (1) For a high volume breeder: (a) One hundred fifty dollars if the high volume breeder annually sells at least forty, but not more than sixty puppies to the public; (b) Two hundred fifty dollars if the high volume breeder annually sells at least sixty-one, but not more than one hundred fifty puppies to the public; (c) Three hundred fifty dollars if the high volume breeder annually sells at least one hundred fifty-one, but not more than two hundred fifty puppies to the public; (d) Five hundred dollars if the high volume breeder annually sells at least two hundred fifty-one, but not more than three hundred fifty puppies to the public; (e) Seven hundred fifty dollars if the high volume breeder annually sells three hundred fifty-one or more puppies to the public; (f) If divisions (A)(1)(a) to (e) of this section do not apply, one hundred and fifty dollars if either of the following applies: (i) The high volume breeder sells five or more adult dogs or puppies to a dog broker or pet store. (ii) The high volume breeder keeps, houses, and maintains, at any given time in a calendar year, more than forty puppies that are under four months of age, that have been bred on the premises of the establishment, and that have been primarily kept, housed, and maintained from birth on the premises of the establishment. (2) For a dog broker, five hundred dollars. (B) Money collected by the director of agriculture from each application fee submitted under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the high volume breeder kennel control license commercial dog breeding fund created in section 956.18 of the Revised Code. The director shall use fifty dollars of the application fee submitted by a high volume breeder under this section or an amount equal to the fee charged for the registration of a kennel under section 955.14 of the Revised Code in the county in which the high volume breeder is located or will be located, whichever is greater, to reimburse that county. The county auditor shall deposit the transferred money into that county's dog and kennel fund created under section 955.20 of the Revised Code. Sec. 956.10. (A)(1) At least once annually, the director of agriculture or the director's authorized representative shall inspect a high volume breeder that is subject to licensure under this chapter and rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code to ensure compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it, including the standards of care established in rules adopted under that section. (2) The director or the director's authorized representative shall inspect a boarding kennel when the director or the director's authorized representative has received information that the boarding kennel is breeding dogs and may be subject to licensure under this chapter and rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code. (B) The director or the director's authorized representative may do any of the following: (1) Upon receiving a complaint, inspect a high volume breeder that is subject to licensure under this chapter and rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code to ensure compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it; (2) Upon the request of a member of the public, a public official, or an animal shelter for dogs, inspect any facility at which a person is acting as or performing the functions of a dog broker to ensure such compliance; (3) Upon receiving a complaint, inspect an animal rescue for dogs to ensure compliance with section 956.06 of the Revised Code and applicable rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code; (4) Conduct an inspection under this section during regular business hours without providing notice in advance. (C) Inspections shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code. A record of each inspection shall be made by the director or the director's authorized representative who is responsible for the inspection in accordance with those rules. (D) The director or the director's authorized representative, upon proper identification and upon stating the purpose and necessity of an inspection, may enter at reasonable times on any public or private property, real or personal, to inspect or investigate and to examine or copy records in order to determine compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it. The director, the director's authorized representative, or the attorney general upon the request of the director may apply to the appropriate court in the county in which inspection will occur for an appropriate court order or search warrant as necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter and rules adopted under it. (E) No owner or operator of a high volume breeder, person acting as or performing the functions of a dog broker, owner or operator of a boarding kennel, or owner or operator of an animal rescue for dogs shall interfere with an inspection or refuse to allow the director or the director's authorized representative full access to all areas where dogs are kept or cared for. If entry is refused or inspection or investigation is refused, hindered, or thwarted by a high volume breeder or dog broker, the director may suspend or revoke the breeder's or broker's license in accordance with this chapter. (F)(1) The director may enter into a contract or agreement with a veterinarian to conduct inspections under this section. The veterinarian shall be considered the director's authorized representative for the purposes of this section. (2) A veterinarian with whom the director has entered into a contract or agreement under division (F)(1) of this section may inspect a high volume breeder with whom the veterinarian has established a veterinary-client-patient relationship as described in section 4741.04 of the Revised Code only every other year. (3) If the director determines that a veterinarian with whom the director has entered into a contract or agreement under division (F)(1) of this section has falsified any information submitted to the director pursuant to an inspection, the director shall inform the veterinary medical licensing board created by Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code of the falsification. (G)(1) If entry that is authorized by division (D) of this section is refused or if an inspection or investigation is refused, hindered, or thwarted by intimidation or otherwise and if the director, an authorized representative of the director, or the attorney general applies for and obtains a court order or a search warrant under division (D) of this section to conduct the inspection or investigation, the owner or operator of the premises where entry was refused or inspection or investigation was refused, hindered, or thwarted, if found guilty of violating this chapter or rules adopted under it, is liable to the director for all of the following: (a) The reasonable costs incurred by the director for the regular salaries and fringe benefit costs of personnel assigned to conduct the inspection or investigation from the time the court order or search warrant was issued until the court order or search warrant is executed; (b) The salary, fringe benefits, and travel expenses of the director, an authorized representative of the director, or the attorney general incurred in obtaining the court order or search warrant; and (c) Expenses necessarily incurred for the assistance of local law enforcement officers in executing the court order or search warrant. (2) In the application for a court order or a search warrant, the director, the director's authorized representative, or the attorney general may request and the court, in its order granting the court order or search warrant, may order the owner or operator of the premises, if found guilty of violating this chapter or rules adopted under it, to reimburse the director for any of the costs described in division (G)(1) of this section that the court finds reasonable. From money recovered under this division, the director shall do all of the following: (a) Reimburse the attorney general for the costs incurred by the attorney general in connection with proceedings for obtaining the court order or search warrant; (b) Reimburse the political subdivision in which the premises is located for the assistance of its law enforcement officers in executing the court order or search warrant; (c) Deposit the remainder in the state treasury to the credit of the high volume breeder kennel control license commercial dog breeding fund created in section 956.18 of the Revised Code. (H) A dog warden appointed under Chapter 955. of the Revised Code or an agent of a humane society entering on public or private property to make investigations and inspections in accordance with Chapter 955. or 1717. of the Revised Code, as applicable, shall report any violations of this chapter and rules adopted under it to the director or the director's authorized representative. Sec. 956.13. (A) The director of agriculture, after providing an opportunity for an adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may assess a civil penalty against a person who has violated or is violating sections 956.01 to 956.18 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code. (B) A person who is assessed a civil penalty under this section is liable for a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars for a first violation, not more than five thousand dollars for a second violation, and not more than ten thousand dollars for a third or subsequent violation. Each day that a violation continues constitutes a separate violation. (C) Any person assessed a civil penalty under this section shall pay the amount prescribed to the department of agriculture. The department shall remit all money collected under this section to the treasurer of state for deposit in the high volume breeder kennel control license commercial dog breeding fund created under section 956.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 956.16. The director of agriculture, the director's authorized representative, or the attorney general may require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, papers, and dogs that are needed either by the director or the attorney general or by any party to a hearing before the director and for that purpose may issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records, papers, or dogs. The subpoena shall be served by personal service or by certified mail. If the subpoena is returned because of inability to deliver, or if no return is received within thirty days after the date of mailing, the subpoena may be served by ordinary mail. If no return of ordinary mail is received within thirty days after the date of mailing, service shall be deemed to have been made. If the subpoena is returned because of inability to deliver, the director or the attorney general may designate a person or persons to effect either personal or residence service on the witness. The person designated to effect personal or residence service under this section may be the sheriff of the county in which the witness resides or may be found or any other duly designated person. The fees and mileage of the person serving the subpoena shall be the same as those allowed by the courts of common pleas in criminal cases and shall be paid from the funds of the department of agriculture. Fees and mileage for the witness shall be the same as those allowed for witnesses by the courts of common pleas in criminal cases and, upon request of the witness following the hearing, shall be paid from the money in the high volume breeder kennel control license commercial dog breeding fund created in section 956.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 956.18. (A) All money collected by the director of agriculture from late renewal fees under section 956.06, license fees under section 956.07, and civil penalties assessed under section 956.13 of the Revised Code fees and civil penalties under this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the high volume breeder kennel control license commercial dog breeding fund, which is hereby created. The fund shall also consist of money appropriated to it. (B) The director shall use the money in the fund for the purpose of administering sections 956.01 to 956.18 of the Revised Code this chapter and rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code that apply to those sections it. Sec. 956.21. (A) The director of agriculture may issue a pet store license to an owner or operator of a pet store when the owner or operator does all of the following: (1) Applies for a license in accordance with this section and rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code; (2) Affirms in writing that the owner or operator will maintain compliance with the applicable requirements established under section 959.20 of the Revised Code; (3) Submits with the application for a pet store license a fee of five hundred dollars. (B) The director of agriculture may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this section for a violation of division (A), (B), or (C) of section 956.20 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code. The denial, suspension, or revocation of a license is not effective until the licensee is given written notice of the violation, a reasonable amount of time to correct the violation, if possible, and an opportunity for a hearing. The director also may refuse to issue a license under division (B) of this section if the applicant has violated division (A), (B), or (C) of section 956.20 of the Revised Code or the rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code during the thirty-six-month period prior to submitting an application for the license. (C) Any license issued under this section is valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance. A pet store license must be renewed annually in the manner provided in rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code. (D) Money collected by the director of agriculture from each application fee submitted under this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the pet store license commercial dog breeding fund created in section 956.181 956.18 of the Revised Code. (E) No owner, operator, or manager of a pet store shall negligently display, offer for sale, deliver, barter, auction, broker, give away, transfer, or sell any live dog from a pet store in this state unless a license has been issued for the pet store by the director of agriculture in accordance with this section and rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 956.22. (A) The director of agriculture, after providing an opportunity for an adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may assess a civil penalty against a person who has violated or is violating division (A), (B), or (C) of section 956.20 of the Revised Code or division (E) of section 956.21 of the Revised Code. (B) The person who is assessed a civil penalty under this section is liable for a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars for a first violation, not more than five thousand dollars for a second violation, and not more than ten thousand dollars for a third or subsequent violation. (C) Any person assessed a civil penalty under this section shall pay the amount prescribed to the department of agriculture. The department shall remit all money collected under this section to the treasurer of state for deposit in the pet store license commercial dog breeding fund created under section 956.181 956.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 956.23. The regulation of pet stores is a matter of general statewide interest that requires statewide regulation. Sections 956.181 956.19 to 956.23 of the Revised Code and section 956.99 of the Revised Code constitute a comprehensive plan with respect to all aspects of the regulation of pet stores. Accordingly, it is the intent of the general assembly to preempt any local ordinance, resolution, or other law adopted to regulate the sale, delivery, barter, auction, broker, or transfer of a dog to a person from a pet store. Sec. 1310.251. (A)(1) As used in this section, "excess wear and use waiver" means a contractual agreement that is part of, or a separate addendum to, a lease agreement for use of a motor vehicle, under which the lessor agrees, with or without a separate charge, to do one or both of the following: (a) Cancel or waive all or part of amounts that may become due under a lessee's lease agreement as a result of excess wear and use of a motor vehicle; (b) Cancel or waive amounts due for excess mileage. (2) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code and also includes utility vehicles and under-speed vehicles as defined in that section. (B) The terms of a related motor vehicle lease shall not be conditioned upon the consumer's payment for any excess wear and use waiver. Excess wear and use waivers may be discounted or given at no extra charge in connection with the purchase of other noncredit related goods or services. (C) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, an excess wear and use waiver is not an insurance product. Sec. 1311.04. (A)(1) Prior to the performance of any labor or work or the furnishing of any materials for an improvement on real property which may give rise to a mechanics' lien under sections 1311.01 to 1311.22 of the Revised Code, the owner, part owner, or lessee who contracts for the labor, work, or materials shall record in the office of the county recorder for each county in which the real property to be improved is located a notice of commencement in substantially the form specified in division (B) of this section. (2) Only one notice of commencement is required to be filed for a single improvement and if more than one notice of commencement is filed for a single improvement, all notices filed after the original notice shall be deemed to be amendments to the original notice. If an owner, part owner, or lessee contracts with additional original contractors, lenders, or sureties not identified in the original notice of commencement filed for the improvement, the owner, part owner, or lessee shall amend the original notice of commencement to identify the additional original contractors, lenders, and sureties. The date of the filing of the amended notice is the date of the filing of the original notice of commencement. (B) The notice of commencement required under division (A) of this section shall contain, in affidavit form, all of the following information: (1) The legal description of the real property on which the improvement is to be made. For purposes of this division, a description sufficient to describe the real property for the purpose of conveyance, or contained in the instrument by which the owner, part owner, or lessee took title, is a legal description. (2) A brief description of the improvement to be performed on the property containing sufficient specificity to permit lien claimants to identify the improvement; (3) The name, address, and capacity of the owner, part owner, or lessee of the real property contracting for the improvement; (4) The name and address of the fee owner of the real property, if the person contracting for the improvement is a land contract vendee or lessee; (5) The name and address of the owner's, part owner's, or lessee's designee, if any; (6) The name and address of all original contractors, except that if the notice of commencement is recorded for an improvement involving a single- or double-family dwelling and if more than one original contractor is involved, instead of listing each original contractor, the owner shall state that multiple original contractors are involved in the improvement; (7) The date the owner, part owner, or lessee first executed a contract with an original contractor for the improvement; (8) The name and address of all lending institutions which provide financing for the improvements, if any; (9) The name and address of all sureties on any bond which guarantee payment of the original contractor's obligations under the contract for the improvement, if any; (10) The following statement: "To Lien Claimants and Subsequent Purchasers: Take notice that labor or work is about to begin on or materials are about to be furnished for an improvement to the real property described in this instrument. A person having a mechanics' lien may preserve the lien by providing a notice of furnishing to the above-named designee and the above-named designee's original contractor, if any, and by timely recording an affidavit pursuant to section 1311.06 of the Revised Code. A copy of this notice may be obtained upon making a written request by certified mail to the above-named owner, part owner, lessee, designee, or the person with whom you have contracted." (11) The name and address of the person preparing the notice; (12) The following statement: "The expiration date for this notice of commencement is four years from the date of recording unless a different date is specified herein." (12) (13) An affidavit of the owner, part owner, or lessee or the agent of the owner, part owner, or lessee which verifies the notice. (C) If the notice of commencement furnished by or for an owner, part owner, or lessee contains incorrect information, the owner, part owner, or lessee is liable for any loss of lien rights of a lien claimant and any actual expenses incurred by the lien claimant in maintaining lien rights, including attorney's fees, if the loss and expenses incurred are a direct result of the lien claimant's reliance on the incorrect information. Any lien claimant who has included incorrect information in the claimant's affidavit for a lien under section 1311.06 of the Revised Code, as a result of incorrect information contained in the notice of commencement, may file for record an amended affidavit for a lien. The amended affidavit shall contain all of the information required by section 1311.06 of the Revised Code for an original affidavit. The lien claimant shall serve a copy of the amended affidavit on the owner, part owner, or lessee as provided in section 1311.07 of the Revised Code. The lien claimant may file the amended affidavit for record at any time during the time that the lien acquired by the original affidavit continues in effect under section 1311.13 of the Revised Code. In no event shall the amended affidavit extend such time period. The filing of an amended affidavit does not constitute a waiver of the rights granted by this division. (D) Within ten days after the date a subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer serves a written request upon the owner, part owner, or lessee, or designee for a copy of the notice of commencement, the owner, part owner, lessee, or designee shall serve a copy of the notice of commencement to the requesting subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer. (E) Within ten days after the date a subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer serves a written request for a copy of the notice of commencement upon the original contractor who has been provided with a notice of commencement from the owner, part owner, or lessee, or designee and with whom the subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer has a direct contract, the original contractor shall serve a copy of the notice of commencement to the requesting subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer. (F) Within ten days after the date a subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer serves a written request for a copy of the notice of commencement upon the subcontractor who has been provided with a notice of commencement from the owner, part owner, lessee, designee, or original contractor and with whom the subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer has a direct contract, the subcontractor shall serve a copy of the notice of commencement upon the requesting subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, the owner, part owner, lessee, or designee shall post and maintain posted a copy of the notice of commencement in a conspicuous place on the real property described in the notice during the course of the actual physical improvement to the real property. (2) No owner, part owner, lessee, or designee, has to post a copy of the notice of commencement on the real property described in the notice for an improvement that is the subject of a home purchase contract. (H) The owner, part owner, lessee, or designee shall serve a copy of the notice of commencement upon the original contractor. If the owner, part owner, lessee, or designee fails to serve a copy of the notice of commencement upon the original contractor, the owner, part owner, or lessee is liable to the original contractor for all actual expenses incurred by the original contractor in obtaining the information otherwise provided by the notice of commencement. (I) If the owner, part owner, lessee, or designee fails to record the notice of commencement in accordance with this section, the time within which a subcontractor or material supplier may serve a notice of furnishing as required by section 1311.05 of the Revised Code is extended until twenty-one days after the notice of commencement has been recorded. A subcontractor or material supplier need not serve a notice of furnishing to preserve lien rights for the period before the notice of commencement is recorded. (J) If the owner, part owner, lessee, or designee fails to serve, upon written request, the notice of commencement in accordance with this section, the time within which a subcontractor or material supplier may serve a notice of furnishing as required by section 1311.05 of the Revised Code is extended until twenty-one days after the notice of commencement actually has been served to the subcontractor or material supplier. The owner, part owner, or lessee who fails to serve the notice pursuant to this section is liable to any subcontractor or material supplier who becomes a lien claimant for all actual expenses incurred by the lien claimant in obtaining the information that would have been contained in the notice. (K) If an owner, part owner, lessee, or designee fails to post or maintain a copy of the notice of commencement as required by division (G)(1) of this section, the owner, part owner, or lessee is liable to a subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer who becomes a lien claimant for all actual expenses incurred by the lien claimant in obtaining the information otherwise provided by the posting. (L) If an original contractor or subcontractor who has been provided with a notice of commencement fails to serve a copy of the notice of commencement to any subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer who requests it, the original contractor or subcontractor who fails to serve the copy of the notice is liable to the subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer who made the request for all costs incurred by the subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer in obtaining the information contained in the notice of commencement, provided that an original contractor or subcontractor who fails to provide the notice upon request is not liable under this division to any subcontractor, material supplier, or laborer with whom the original contractor or subcontractor is not in direct privity of contract. (M)(1) If after the first work, labor, or material has been performed on or furnished to the improvement, the owner, part owner, lessee, or designee fails to serve, record, or post a notice of commencement as required by this section, the original contractor may, in writing, request the owner, part owner, lessee, or designee to serve, record, or post the notice. If an owner, part owner, lessee, or the designee of an owner, part owner, or lessee fails or refuses to serve, record, or post a notice of commencement within ten days of receipt of a request, the owner, part owner, or lessee is liable for the owner's, part owner's, or lessee's failure or refusal and for the designee's failure or refusal, without recourse to the original contractor for all damages, costs, and expenses which result from the filing of a valid mechanics' lien to the extent that the lien, damages, costs, and expenses could have been avoided through proper payment. (2) Nothing in this division shall be interpreted as to either of the following: (a) Relieving an original contractor from the duty to pay the original contractor's subcontractors, material suppliers, and laborers for labor or work performed or materials furnished pursuant to a contract directly with the original contractor; (b) Obligating an owner, part owner, or lessee to pay for work or labor performed or materials furnished by subcontractors, material suppliers, or laborers pursuant to direct contracts with the original contractor. (N)(1) If the owner, part owner, or lessee fails to record a notice of commencement or an amended notice, any person holding a mortgage on the real property to be improved may record a notice of commencement or an amended notice on behalf of the owner, part owner, or lessee. If the owner, part owner, or lessee fails to record a notice of commencement or an amended notice within the later of ten days after the performance of any labor or work or the furnishing of any material for an improvement on real property which gives rise to a mechanics' lien under sections 1311.01 to 1311.22 of the Revised Code or three days after service of a demand to record the notice or amended notice by the original contractor, the original contractor may record a notice of commencement or an amended notice on behalf of the owner, part owner, or lessee. (2) If the original contractor or a mortgage holder has recorded a notice of commencement or an amended notice on behalf of the owner, part owner, or lessee, the owner, part owner, or lessee is liable to the original contractor or mortgage holder for all costs and expenses incurred in obtaining the information contained in the notice of commencement or an amended notice and all costs incurred in the preparation and recording of the notice of commencement or an amended notice. (3) Unless required to file the notice of commencement or an amended notice on behalf of the owner, part owner, or lessee, the party filing a written notice of commencement or amended notice on behalf of the owner, part owner, or lessee is not liable to the owner, part owner, or lessee for any errors contained in the notice of commencement or amended notice. (4) If a mortgage holder or an original contractor records a notice of commencement or amended notice on behalf of an owner, part owner, or lessee, such fact must be included on the notice or amended notice. (O) This section does not apply to a home construction contract as defined in section 1311.011 of the Revised Code, except that when a lending institution as defined in division (A)(3) of section 1311.011 of the Revised Code requires that a notice of commencement be recorded as part of the financing for a home construction contract, which is secured in whole or in part by a mortgage on real estate upon which the improvements are to be constructed, the owner, part owner, or lessee may file a notice of commencement pursuant to this section by recording the notice of commencement in the county recorder's office of the county where the owner, part owner, or lessee's property is located. If the property is located in more than one county, the owner, part owner, or lessee shall record the notice of commencement in the county recorders' office of each county in which the property is located. If the owner, part owner, or lessee files a notice of commencement pursuant to this division, the attachment, continuance, and priority provisions of section 1311.13 of the Revised Code apply to that improvement, but the notice of furnishing requirements specified in section 1311.05 of the Revised Code do not apply to that improvement. (P) The county recorder of the county where a notice of commencement is filed for record shall endorse the date and hour of its filing and cause it to be recorded as mechanics' liens are recorded, and collect the same fees for recording the notice of commencement as are provided in section 317.32 of the Revised Code. The recorder shall index the real property described in the notice of commencement and shall index the names of all owners, part owners, lessees, and land contract vendees in the direct index and the names of all original contractors in the reverse index as provided for in section 317.18 of the Revised Code. (Q) Notwithstanding this section, if the owner, part owner, or lessee is a telephone company, an electric light company, a gas company, a water works company, all as defined in section 4905.03 of the Revised Code, or a subsidiary or affiliate thereof, the owner, part owner, or lessee may, but is not required to, record a notice of commencement pursuant to division (A) of this section, and is not required to serve, post, and provide copies of a notice of commencement pursuant to divisions (D), (G), and (H) of this section unless such owner, part owner, or lessee elects to record the notice of commencement. If the owner, part owner, or lessee elects to record the notice of commencement and the improvement extends beyond one parcel of real property or one county, the owner, part owner, or lessee may, in lieu of using the legal description required in division (B)(1) of this section, use a description which reasonably describes the real property on which the improvement is to be made. Any description used other than the description specified in division (B)(1) of this section shall refer to the township and county in which the improvement is located, the name and route number of any local, state, or federal highway near the improvement, if any, the post office address of the real property, if any, and the name by which the owner, part owner, or lessee refers to the improvement. If an owner, part owner, or lessee elects not to record, serve, post, or provide copies of a notice of commencement pursuant to divisions (A), (D), (G)(1), and (H) of this section, the owner, part owner, or lessee is subject to all applicable liabilities pursuant to divisions (C), (H), (J), (K), (M), and (N) of this section. (R) If an owner, part owner, lessee, or designee fails to record a notice of commencement in accordance with this section, no subcontractor or material supplier who performs labor or work upon or furnishes material in furtherance of that improvement has to serve a notice of furnishing in accordance with section 1311.05 of the Revised Code in order to preserve the subcontractor's or material supplier's lien rights. (S) A notice of commencement filed as provided herein expires six four years after its filing date unless the notice of commencement or amendments made to the notice of commencement specify otherwise. (T)(1) An owner, part owner, or lessee of real property who contracts for an improvement, or that person's agent may, upon completion of the improvement, submit an affidavit to the office of the county recorder for each county in which the real property that was improved is located stating all of the following: (a) The name, address, and capacity of the owner, part owner, or lessee, or the agent of the owner, part owner, or lessee of the real property; (b) The recording reference for the previously filed notice of commencement; (c) That the improvement is complete. (2) Upon receipt of an affidavit described in division (T)(1) of this section, the county recorder of the county where the affidavit is submitted shall indicate in the official records that the notice of commencement has expired. (3) The owner, part owner, or lessee of the real property who contracted for the improvement shall serve a copy of the recorded affidavit submitted pursuant to division (T)(1) of this section, by regular mail, upon the original contractor as well as any subcontractor or lower tier project participant that served a notice of furnishing pursuant to section 1311.05 of the Revised Code. (4) Service, lack of service, or a deficiency in service of the recorded affidavit under division (T)(3) of this section does not: (a) Affect the expiration of the notice of commencement; (b) Extend the rights of any party seeking to file an affidavit of mechanic's lien; (c) Affect any time periods or other rights, requirements, or limitations that are set forth in this chapter. (U) The expiration of a notice of commencement pursuant to division (S) or (T)(2) of this section does not affect the attachment, continuance, or priority of any lien under sections 1311.13, 1311.14, and 1311.15 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1311.252. (A) Prior to the performance of any labor or work or the furnishing of any materials in furtherance of a public improvement, the public authority shall prepare a notice of commencement in substantially the form specified in division (B) of this section which shall be made readily available to the public upon request. (B) The notice of commencement required under division (A) of this section shall contain in affidavit form all of the following information: (1) The name, location, and a number, if any, used by the public authority to identify the public improvement sufficient to permit the public improvement to be identified; (2) The name and address of the public authority; (3) The name, address, and trade of all principal contractors; (4) The date the public authority first executed a contract with a principal contractor for the public improvement; (5) The name and address of the sureties for all principal contractors; (6) The name and address of the representative of the public authority upon whom service shall be made for the purposes of serving an affidavit pursuant to section 1311.26 of the Revised Code. (C) If the notice of commencement is not made available to the public prior to the commencement of work on the public improvement or if the notice of commencement furnished by the public authority contains incorrect information which the claimant relies upon to his the claimant's detriment, the unavailability of the notice or the incorrect notice shall not adversely affect the rights of any claimant under sections 1311.25 to 1311.32 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1317.05. (A) Any retail seller who, in any retail installment contract, has agreed to purchase insurance for the retail buyer and to extend credit for the price thereof, excluding single interest insurance, shall, prior to the due date of the first installment of the retail installment contract, deliver to the retail buyer personally, or mail or cause to be mailed to the retail buyer at the retail buyer's address as shown on the retail installment contract, the policy of insurance, or in lieu thereof a certificate of insurance, or the retail buyer is not liable on the retail buyer's retail installment contract until the policy, or certificate of insurance, is received, or full refund is made of the insurance premium. If the premium for insurance of like kind and amount, as fixed in the published manual of a recognized standard rating bureau designated by the retail seller, is less than the amount charged the retail buyer as fixed in the written instrument in compliance with division (D) of section 1317.04 of the Revised Code, the retail buyer may deduct an amount equal to three times the difference from the amount owed the retail seller, or the retail seller's successor in interest. Sections 1317.01 to 1317.11 of the Revised Code do not impair the authority of the superintendent of insurance to grant, renew, or revoke licenses, nor do said sections authorize anyone other than a licensee of the division of insurance to directly or indirectly receive any part of the amount charged for insurance in connection with any retail installment sale. (B) As used in this division, "debt cancellation or debt suspension product" means a contractual agreement in which a retail seller, or its assignee, agrees for a separate charge to cancel or waive all or a part of amounts due on a retail buyer's retail installment contract in the event of a total physical damage loss or unrecovered theft of the motor vehicle that is the subject of the contract. "Debt cancellation or debt suspension product" includes a guaranteed asset protection waiver, guaranteed auto protection waiver, or other similarly named agreement. A "debt cancellation or debt suspension product" may also provide, with or without a separate charge, a benefit that waives an amount, or provides a borrower with a credit, towards the purchase of a replacement motor vehicle. A debt cancellation or debt suspension product, and an addendum to a retail installment contract containing a debt cancellation or debt suspension product, shall be considered a part of the retail installment contract and shall remain a part of that contract upon the assignment, sale, or transfer of that contract. The charge for any optional debt cancellation or debt suspension product shall be listed as a specific good and shall not be considered a finance charge or interest. The purchase price and the terms of the debt cancellation or debt suspension product shall be disclosed in writing to the buyer. The extension of credit, terms of the credit, or the terms of the related motor vehicle sale or lease shall not be conditioned on the purchase of the debt cancellation or debt suspension product. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a debt cancellation or debt suspension product shall not be considered insurance. (C) Single interest insurance shall be listed as a specific good in a retail installment contract. (D) As used in this section, "single interest insurance" means insurance that covers only the interest of the holder of the retail installment contract. Sec. 1317.06. (A) A retail seller at the time of making any retail installment sale may charge and contract for the payment of a finance charge by the retail buyer and collect and receive the same, which shall not exceed the greater of the following: (1) A base finance charge at the rate of eight dollars per one hundred dollars per year on the principal balance of the retail installment contract. On retail installment contracts providing for principal balances less than, nor not in multiples of one hundred dollars, or for installment payments extending for a period less than or greater than one year, said finance charge shall be computed proportionately. In addition to the base finance charge, the retail seller may charge and contract for a service charge of fifty cents per month for the first fifty dollar unit or fraction thereof, of the principal balance for each month of the term of the installment contract; and an additional service charge of twenty-five cents per month for each of the next five fifty dollar units or fraction thereof, of the principal balance for each month of the term of the installment contract. This paragraph applies only to retail installment contracts with a principal balance of seven hundred dollars or less. (2) A pre-computed base finance charge not in excess of the amount obtained by applying the rate of one and one-half per cent per month to the unpaid portion of the unpaid principal balance determined to be outstanding from time to time according to the terms and schedule of payments of the retail installment contract executed in connection with such retail installment sale. Such base finance charge and service charges may be computed on a basis of a full month for any fractional period in excess of ten days. For a fractional period of a month not in excess of ten days, there shall be no base finance charge or service charge. Sections 1317.01 to 1317.11 of the Revised Code do not apply to any sale in which the base finance and service charge does not exceed the sum of fifteen dollars. (B) Every retail seller may, at the time of making any retail installment sale, contract for the payment by the retail buyer of lawful delinquent charges as follows: (1) No charges shall be made for delinquent payments less than ten days late. (2) Five cents for each dollar for a delinquent payment that is more than ten days late may be charged, but in no event shall a delinquent charge for any one installment exceed three dollars. A provision for the payment of interest on any installment not paid in full on or before its scheduled due date at a rate not to exceed one and one-half per cent interest per month is not a delinquent charge and is expressly authorized. (C)(C)(1) No retail installment contract arising out of a consumer transaction and requiring the payment of the charges authorized by this section shall be executed unless the combined total of the cash price and all finance charges and service charges is required to be paid according to a one of the following: (a) A schedule of substantially equal consecutive installments, except where the contract contains a provision allowing the buyer to refinance the contract under terms no less favorable than those of the original contract after making the refund credit required by section 1317.09 of the Revised Code; (b) A schedule of periodic installments in which no scheduled installment is more than fifty per cent greater than any other scheduled installment, except where the contract contains a provision allowing the buyer to refinance the contract under terms not less favorable than those of the original contract after making the refund credit required by section 1317.09 of the Revised Code. No (2) No seller shall, pursuant to any provision in a retail installment contract arising out of a consumer transaction, accelerate any payments on account of a default in the making of an installment payment that has not continued for at least thirty days. Division (C) of this section does not apply to the extent that the payment schedule is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the buyer. Sec. 1321.21. All fees, charges, penalties, and forfeitures collected under Chapters 1321., 1322., 4712., 4727., and 4728., sections 1315.21 to 1315.30, and sections 1349.25 to 1349.37 of the Revised Code shall be paid to the superintendent of financial institutions and shall be deposited by the superintendent into the state treasury to the credit of the consumer finance fund, which is hereby created. The fund may be expended or obligated by the superintendent for the defrayment of the costs of administration of Chapters 1321., 1322., 4712., 4727., and 4728., sections 1315.21 to 1315.30, and sections 1349.25 to 1349.37 of the Revised Code by the division of financial institutions. All actual and necessary expenses incurred by the superintendent, including any services rendered by the department of commerce for the division's administration of Chapters 1321., 1322., 4712., 4727., and 4728., sections 1315.21 to 1315.30, and sections 1349.25 to 1349.37 of the Revised Code, shall be paid from the fund. The fund shall be assessed a proportionate share of the administrative costs of the department and the division. The proportionate share of the administrative costs of the division of financial institutions shall be determined in accordance with procedures prescribed by the superintendent. Such assessment shall be paid from the consumer finance fund to the division of administration fund or the financial institutions fund. Periodically, in accordance with a schedule the director establishes by rule, but at least once every three months, the director of budget and management shall transfer five per cent of all charges, penalties, and forfeitures received into the consumer finance fund to the financial literacy education fund created under section 121.085 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1347.08. (A) Every state or local agency that maintains a personal information system, upon the request and the proper identification of any person who is the subject of personal information in the system, shall: (1) Inform the person of the existence of any personal information in the system of which the person is the subject; (2) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (E)(2) of this section, permit the person, the person's legal guardian, or an attorney who presents a signed written authorization made by the person, to inspect all personal information in the system of which the person is the subject; (3) Inform the person about the types of uses made of the personal information, including the identity of any users usually granted access to the system. (B) Any person who wishes to exercise a right provided by this section may be accompanied by another individual of the person's choice. (C)(1) A state or local agency, upon request, shall disclose medical, psychiatric, or psychological information to a person who is the subject of the information or to the person's legal guardian, unless one of the following determines for the agency that the disclosure of the information is likely to have an adverse effect on the person: a physician, including such a person who specializes as a psychiatrist; an advanced practice registered nurse, including such a person who specializes as a psychiatric-mental health nurse practitioner or psychiatric clinical nurse specialist; or a psychologist. If such a determination is made, the information shall be released to one of the following who is designated by the person or by the person's legal guardian: a physician, including such a person who specializes as a psychiatrist; an advanced practice registered nurse, including such a person who specializes as a psychiatric-mental health nurse practitioner or psychiatric clinical nurse specialist; or a psychologist. (2) Upon the signed written request of a licensed attorney at law, a licensed physician, or an advanced practice registered nurse designated by the inmate, together with the signed written request of an inmate of a correctional institution under the administration of the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department shall disclose medical information to the designated attorney, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse as provided in division (C) of section 5120.21 of the Revised Code. (D) If an individual who is authorized to inspect personal information that is maintained in a personal information system requests the state or local agency that maintains the system to provide a copy of any personal information that the individual is authorized to inspect, the agency shall provide a copy of the personal information to the individual. Each state and local agency may establish reasonable fees for the service of copying, upon request, personal information that is maintained by the agency. (E)(1) This section regulates access to personal information that is maintained in a personal information system by persons who are the subject of the information, but does not limit the authority of any person, including a person who is the subject of personal information maintained in a personal information system, to inspect or have copied, pursuant to section 149.43 of the Revised Code, a public record as defined in that section. (2) This section does not provide a person who is the subject of personal information maintained in a personal information system, the person's legal guardian, or an attorney authorized by the person, with a right to inspect or have copied, or require an agency that maintains a personal information system to permit the inspection of or to copy, a confidential law enforcement investigatory record or trial preparation record, as defined in divisions (A)(2) and (4) of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (F) This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) The contents of an adoption file maintained by the department of health under sections 3705.12 to 3705.124 of the Revised Code; (2) Information contained in the putative father registry established by section 3107.062 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the information is held by the department of job and family services children and youth or, pursuant to section 3111.69 of the Revised Code, the office of child support in the department of job and family services or a child support enforcement agency; (3) Papers, records, and books that pertain to an adoption and that are subject to inspection in accordance with section 3107.17 of the Revised Code; (4) Records specified in division (A) of section 3107.52 of the Revised Code; (5) Records that identify an individual described in division (A)(1) of section 3721.031 of the Revised Code, or that would tend to identify such an individual; (6) Files and records that have been expunged under division (D)(1) or (2) of section 3721.23 of the Revised Code; (7) Records that identify an individual described in division (A)(1) of section 3721.25 of the Revised Code, or that would tend to identify such an individual; (8) Records that identify an individual described in division (A)(1) of section 5165.88 of the Revised Code, or that would tend to identify such an individual; (9) Test materials, examinations, or evaluation tools used in an examination for licensure as a nursing home administrator that the board of executives of long-term services and supports administers under section 4751.15 of the Revised Code or contracts under that section with a private or government entity to administer; (10) Information contained in a database established and maintained pursuant to section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code; (11) Information contained in a database established and maintained pursuant to section 5101.631 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1349.10. (A)(1) "Cable service provider" has the same meaning as in section 1332.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Cloud service provider" means a third-party company offering a cloud-based platform, infrastructure, application, or storage services. (3) "Direct-to-home satellite service" has the same meaning as in 47 U.S.C. 303, as amended. (4) "Identifying information" means photo identification or public or private transactional data. (5) "Interactive computer service" has the same meaning as in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 230, as amended. (6) "Internet provider" means a provider of internet service, including all of the following: (a) Broadband service, however defined or classified by the federal communications commission; (b) Information service or telecommunications service, both as defined in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 153, as amended; (c) Internet protocol-enabled services, as defined in section 4927.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Mobile service" and "telecommunications carrier" have the same meanings as in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 153, as amended. (8) "Organization" means both of the following: (a) A commercial establishment that, for any form of consideration, has as a significant or substantial portion of its stock-in-trade in, derives a significant or substantial portion of its revenues from, devotes a significant or substantial portion of its content or advertising to, or maintains a substantial section of its sales or online content display space for the sale, rental, or viewing of materials that are obscene or harmful to juveniles; (b) A commercial establishment as defined in section 2907.38 of the Revised Code. An establishment may have other principal business purposes that do not involve selling, delivering, furnishing, disseminating, providing, exhibiting, or presenting any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet and still be categorized as an organization subject to this section. The existence of other principal business purposes does not exempt an establishment from being categorized as an organization subject to this section, so long as one of its principal business purposes involves selling, delivering, furnishing, disseminating, providing, exhibiting, or presenting any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet. (9) "Photo identification" has the same meaning as in section 3501.01 of the Revised Code and includes any government-issued identification issued by another state, district, country, or sovereignty. (10) "Reasonable age verification methods" means the following: (a) Verifying that the person attempting to access the material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles is eighteen years of age or older through the use of a commercial age verification system that uses photo identification or public or private transactional data to verify the person's age; (b) Using third-party and governmental databases that use a commercial age verification system that uses photo identification or public or private transactional data to verify the person's age. (11) "Transactional data" means a sequence of information that documents an exchange, agreement, or transfer between a person, organization, or third party for the purpose of satisfying a request or event. "Transactional data" includes mortgage, educational, and employment records. (12) "Video service provider" has the same meaning as in section 1332.21 of the Revised Code. (B) An organization that sells, delivers, furnishes, disseminates, provides, exhibits, or presents any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet shall do all of the following: (1) Verify that any person attempting to access the material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles is eighteen years of age or older through reasonable age verification methods; (2) Verify that any person creating an account or subscription to access any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles is eighteen years of age or older through reasonable age verification methods. The organization shall reverify the age of the person every two years thereafter. (3)(a) Utilize a geofence system maintained and monitored by a licensed location-based technology provider to dynamically monitor the geolocation of persons attempting to access or creating an account or subscription to access the material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles; (b) The location-based technology provider shall perform a geolocation check to dynamically monitor the person attempting to access or creating an account or subscription to access the material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles and the person's location. (c) If the location-based technology provider determines that a person is located in this state, the organization that sells, delivers, furnishes, disseminates, provides, exhibits, or presents any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet shall block that person until the person's age has been verified using reasonable age verification methods. (4) Implement a notification mechanism to alert persons attempting to access or creating an account or subscription to access the material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles, of a geolocation check failure. (C)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, an organization that sells, delivers, furnishes, disseminates, provides, exhibits, or presents any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet and verifies the age of the person creating an account or subscription to access the material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet shall do the following: (i) Immediately delete all information gathered for the purpose of age verification after the age verification is completed, except the information maintained for account and subscription access and for billing purposes; (ii) Upon the request of the account holder or subscriber, immediately delete the data maintained for user access to the account or subscription and for billing purposes; (iii) Develop and maintain a data privacy policy compliant with federal and state law and maintain data in a manner that is reasonably secure. (b) On the expiration of two years after the creation of the account or subscription, the organization shall immediately delete all information relative to the creation of the user's account or subscription and any information maintained for billing purposes, unless the account holder or subscriber renews the account or subscription. (2) An organization that sells, delivers, furnishes, disseminates, provides, exhibits, or presents any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet and verifies the age of the person attempting to access the material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet shall do both of the following: (a) Immediately delete all information gathered for the purpose of age verification after age verification is completed; (b) Develop and maintain a data privacy policy compliant with federal and state law and maintain data in a manner that is reasonably secure. (3) An organization described in division (C)(1) or (2) of this section shall immediately delete any identifying information, except the information required for the purpose of granting a person access to the account or subscription and for billing the account or subscription, that is used for age verification of the person attempting to access or creating an account or subscription to access any material or performance on the internet that is obscene or harmful to juveniles after age verification is completed. (4) An organization as described in division (C)(1) or (2) of this section shall not transfer any information collected, except for the purpose of age verification. Any party who receives transferred information for age verification purposes shall immediately delete all information gathered for the purpose of age verification after age verification is completed. (D) This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) A person who, while employed or contracted by a newspaper, magazine, press association, news agency, news wire service, radio or television station, or similar media, is gathering, processing, transmitting, compiling, editing, or disseminating information for the general public; (2) A provider of an interactive computer service; (3) A mobile service; (4) An internet provider; (5) A cable service provider; (6) A direct-to-home satellite service; (7) A video service provider; (8) A cloud service provider. Sec. 1349.101. (A) The attorney general may bring a civil action against an organization that sells, delivers, furnishes, disseminates, provides, exhibits, or presents any material or performance that is obscene or harmful to juveniles on the internet that fails to comply with the requirements under divisions (B)(1) or (2) or (C)(1) or (2) of section 1349.10 of the Revised Code and as a result of that failure a minor gains access to the material or performance. Before initiating such an enforcement action, the attorney general shall provide written notice to the organization identifying and explaining the basis for each instance of alleged violation. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this section, the attorney general shall not commence an enforcement action if the organization, within forty-five days after notice of the alleged violation is sent, does both of the following: (1) Cures all violations described in the notice: (2) Provides the attorney general with a written statement indicating that the violations are cured and agreeing to refrain from further noncompliance of the requirements under divisions (B)(1) or (2) or (C)(1) or (2) of section 1349.10 of the Revised Code. (C) If the organization does not timely respond or continues to fail to comply with the requirements under divisions (B)(1) or (2) or (C)(1) or (2) of section 1349.10 of the Revised Code after receiving the notice, the attorney general may initiate the enforcement action and seek injunctive relief. (D) Division (B) of this section does not apply if the organization fails to timely comply with all of the requirements described in the notice or commits subsequent violations of the same type after curing the initial violation under that division. Notwithstanding division (C) of this section, if an organization commits a subsequent violation of the same type after reporting that the initial violation is cured, the attorney general may bring a civil action at any time after sending notice of the violation under division (A) of this section. (E) Nothing in this section shall be construed to provide a private right of action. The attorney general has the exclusive authority to enforce this section. Sec. 1501.022. (A) As used in this section, "local government" means a municipal corporation that is located on an island in Lake Erie and that includes resort attractions and activities. (B) If the department of natural resources does not provide emergency response services, garbage and debris removal services, or snow removal services on state park land or at facilities owned or managed by the department, the director of natural resources shall enter into a contract with a local government for the local government to provide such services. (C) If the director requests a local government to provide any other service besides such services described in division (B) of this section on state park land or at facilities owned or managed by the department, the director shall enter into a contract with a local government for the local government to provide such services. (D) A contract entered into under this section shall include a term providing for the department to reimburse the local government for services provided and administrative costs associated with providing such services. Sec. 1501.023. (A) As used in this section, "historical site" means a site that has been designated by the Ohio history connection with a brown historical marker sign and has significance with respect to the state's oil and gas history. (B) The department of natural resources shall not physically work on or alter a historical site without the consent of every member of all of the following entities: (1) The board of county commissioners of the county in which the historical site is located; (2) The historical society of the county in which the historical site is located; (3) The technical advisory council created under section 1509.38 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1501.46. Except as otherwise provided in federal law, in circumstances in which the department of natural resources conducts, or contracts with a third party to conduct, dredging operations in the waters of the state, no license, registration, or certification is required for an individual to operate the dredging equipment or watercraft associated with such operations. Sec. 1501.47. The program support fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of payments from divisions within the department of natural resources and any other payments received by the department related to the purposes of the fund. The director of natural resources shall use the money in the fund to support centralized service support offices of the department. Sec. 1509.02. There is hereby created in the department of natural resources the division of oil and gas resources management, which shall be administered by the chief of the division of oil and gas resources management. The division has sole and exclusive authority to regulate the permitting, location, and spacing of oil and gas wells and production operations within the state, excepting only those activities regulated under federal laws for which oversight has been delegated to the environmental protection agency and activities regulated under sections 6111.02 to 6111.028 of the Revised Code. The regulation of oil and gas activities is a matter of general statewide interest that requires uniform statewide regulation, and this chapter and rules adopted under it constitute a comprehensive plan with respect to all aspects of the locating, drilling, well stimulation, completing, and operating of oil and gas wells within this state, including site construction and restoration, permitting related to those activities, and the disposal of wastes from those wells. In order to assist the division in the furtherance of its sole and exclusive authority as established in this section, the chief may enter into cooperative agreements with other state agencies for advice and consultation, including visitations at the surface location of a well on behalf of the division. Such cooperative agreements do not confer on other state agencies any authority to administer or enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it. In addition, such cooperative agreements shall not be construed to dilute or diminish the division's sole and exclusive authority as established in this section. Nothing in this section affects the authority granted to the director of transportation and local authorities in section 723.01 or 4513.34 of the Revised Code, provided that the authority granted under those sections shall not be exercised in a manner that discriminates against, unfairly impedes, or obstructs oil and gas activities and operations regulated under this chapter. The chief shall not hold any other public office, nor shall the chief be engaged in any occupation or business that might interfere with or be inconsistent with the duties as chief. Money collected by the chief pursuant to sections 1509.06, 1509.061, 1509.062, 1509.071, 1509.13, 1509.22, 1509.222, 1509.28, 1509.34, 1509.50, and 5749.02 of the Revised Code, all civil penalties paid under section 1509.33 of the Revised Code, and, notwithstanding any section of the Revised Code relating to the distribution or crediting of fines for violations of the Revised Code, all fines imposed under divisions (A) and (B) of section 1509.99 of the Revised Code and fines imposed under divisions (C) and (D) of section 1509.99 of the Revised Code for all violations prosecuted by the attorney general and for violations prosecuted by prosecuting attorneys that do not involve the transportation of brine by vehicle shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the oil and gas well fund, which is hereby created. Fines imposed under divisions (C) and (D) of section 1509.99 of the Revised Code for violations prosecuted by prosecuting attorneys that involve the transportation of brine by vehicle and penalties associated with a compliance agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the county treasury of the county where the violation occurred. The fund shall be used solely and exclusively for the purposes enumerated in division (B) of section 1509.071 of the Revised Code, payments to the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund created in section 1509.075 of the Revised Code, for the expenses of the division associated with the administration of this chapter and Chapter 1571. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under them, and for expenses that are critical and necessary for the protection of human health and safety and the environment related to oil and gas production in this state. The expenses of the division in excess of the moneys available in the fund shall be paid from general revenue fund appropriations to the department. Sec. 1509.07. (A)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) or (A)(2) of this section, an owner of any well, except an exempt Mississippian well or an exempt domestic well, shall obtain liability insurance coverage from a company authorized or approved to do business in this state in an amount of not less than one million dollars bodily injury coverage and property damage coverage to pay damages for injury to persons or damage to property caused by the drilling, operation, or plugging of all the owner's wells in this state. However, if any well is located within an urbanized area, the owner shall obtain liability insurance coverage in an amount of not less than three million dollars for bodily injury coverage and property damage coverage to pay damages for injury to persons or damage to property caused by the drilling, operation, or plugging of all of the owner's wells in this state. (b) A board of county commissioners of a county that is an owner of a well or a board of township trustees of a township that is an owner of a well may elect to satisfy the liability coverage requirements specified in division (A)(1)(a) of this section by participating in a joint self-insurance pool in accordance with the requirements established under section 2744.081 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (A)(1)(b) of this section shall be construed to allow an entity, other than a county or township, to participate in a joint self-insurance pool to satisfy the liability coverage requirements specified in division (A)(1)(a) of this section. (2) An owner of a horizontal well shall obtain liability insurance coverage from an insurer authorized to write such insurance in this state or from an insurer approved to write such insurance in this state under section 3905.33 of the Revised Code in an amount of not less than five million dollars bodily injury coverage and property damage coverage to pay damages for injury to persons or damage to property caused by the production operations of all the owner's wells in this state. The insurance policy shall include a reasonable level of coverage available for an environmental endorsement. (3) An owner shall maintain the coverage required under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section until all the owner's wells are plugged and abandoned or are transferred to an owner who has obtained insurance as required under this section and who is not under a notice of material and substantial violation or under a suspension order. The owner shall provide proof of liability insurance coverage to the chief of the division of oil and gas resources management upon request. Upon failure of the owner to provide that proof when requested, the chief may order the suspension of any outstanding permits and operations of the owner until the owner provides proof of the required insurance coverage. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an owner of any well, before being issued a permit under section 1509.06 of the Revised Code or before operating or producing from a well, shall execute and file with the division of oil and gas resources management a surety bond conditioned on compliance with the restoration requirements of section 1509.072, the plugging requirements of section 1509.12, the permit provisions of section 1509.13 of the Revised Code, and all rules and orders of the chief relating thereto, in an amount set by rule of the chief. (2) The owner may deposit with the chief, instead of a surety bond, cash in an amount equal to the surety bond as prescribed pursuant to this section or negotiable certificates of deposit or irrevocable letters of credit, issued by any bank organized or transacting business in this state, having a cash value equal to or greater than the amount of the surety bond as prescribed pursuant to this section. Cash or certificates of deposit shall be deposited upon the same terms as those upon which surety bonds may be deposited. If the owner deposits cash, the cash shall be credited to the performance cash bond refunds fund created in section 1501.16 of the Revised Code. If the owner deposits certificates of deposit, the chief shall require the bank that issued any such certificate to pledge securities of a cash value equal to the amount of the certificate that is in excess of the amount insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation. The securities shall be security for the repayment of the certificate of deposit. Upon a deposit of cash, certificates of deposit, or letters of credit with the chief, the chief shall hold them in trust for the purposes for which they have been deposited. (3) Instead of a surety bond, the chief may accept proof of financial responsibility consisting of a sworn financial statement showing a net financial worth within this state equal to twice the amount of the bond for which it substitutes and, as may be required by the chief, a list of producing properties of the owner within this state or other evidence showing ability and intent to comply with the law and rules concerning restoration and plugging that may be required by rule of the chief. The owner of an exempt Mississippian well is not required to file scheduled updates of the financial documents, but shall file updates of those documents if requested to do so by the chief. The owner of a nonexempt Mississippian well shall file updates of the financial documents in accordance with a schedule established by rule of the chief. The chief, upon determining that an owner for whom the chief has accepted proof of financial responsibility instead of bond cannot demonstrate financial responsibility, shall order that the owner execute and file a bond or deposit cash, certificates of deposit, or irrevocable letters of credit as required by this section for the wells specified in the order within ten days of receipt of the order. If the order is not complied with, all wells of the owner that are specified in the order and for which no bond is filed or cash, certificates of deposit, or letters of credit are deposited shall be plugged. No owner shall fail or refuse to plug such a well. Each day on which such a well remains unplugged thereafter constitutes a separate offense. (4) The surety bond provided for in this section shall be executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state. The chief shall not approve any bond until it is personally signed and acknowledged by both principal and surety, or as to either by the principal's or surety's attorney in fact, with a certified copy of the power of attorney attached thereto. The chief shall not approve a bond unless there is attached a certificate of the superintendent of insurance that the company is authorized to transact a fidelity and surety business in this state. All bonds shall be given in a form to be prescribed by the chief and shall run to the state as obligee. (5) An owner of an exempt Mississippian well or an exempt domestic well, in lieu of filing a surety bond, cash in an amount equal to the surety bond, certificates of deposit, irrevocable letters of credit, or a sworn financial statement, may file a one-time fee of fifty dollars, which shall be deposited in the oil and gas well plugging resolution and remediation fund created in section 1509.071 1509.075 of the Revised Code. (C) An owner, operator, producer, or other person shall not operate a well or produce from a well at any time if the owner, operator, producer, or other person has not satisfied the requirements established in this section. Sec. 1509.071. (A) When the chief of the division of oil and gas resources management finds that an owner has failed to comply with a final nonappealable order issued or compliance agreement entered into under section 1509.04, the restoration requirements of section 1509.072, plugging requirements of section 1509.12, or permit provisions of section 1509.13 of the Revised Code, or rules and orders relating thereto, the chief shall make a finding of that fact and declare any surety bond filed to ensure compliance with those sections and rules forfeited in the amount set by rule of the chief. The chief thereupon shall certify the total forfeiture to the attorney general, who shall proceed to collect the amount of the forfeiture. In addition, the chief may require an owner, operator, producer, or other person who forfeited a surety bond to post a new surety bond in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars for a single well, thirty thousand dollars for two wells, or fifty thousand dollars for three or more wells. In lieu of total forfeiture, the surety or owner, at the surety's or owner's option, may cause the well to be properly plugged and abandoned and the area properly restored or pay to the treasurer of state the cost of plugging and abandonment. (B)(1) All moneys collected because of forfeitures of bonds as provided in this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the oil and gas well fund created in section 1509.02 of the Revised Code. For purposes of promoting the competent management and conservation of the state's oil and natural gas resources and the proper and lawful plugging of historic oil and gas wells for which there is no known responsible owner, the chief annually shall spend not less than thirty per cent of the revenue credited to the oil and gas well fund during the previous fiscal year for both of the following purposes: (a) In accordance with division (E) of this section, to plug orphaned wells or to restore the land surface properly as required in section 1509.072 of the Revised Code; (b) In accordance with division (F) of this section, to correct conditions that the chief reasonably has determined are causing imminent health or safety risks at an orphaned well or associated with a well for which the owner has not initiated a corrective action within a reasonable period of time as determined by the chief after the chief has attempted to notify the owner. (2) Expenditures from the oil and gas well fund and oil and gas resolution and remediation fund shall be made only for lawful purposes. In additionExcept as otherwise provided in divisions (B)(2) and (D) of section 1509.075 of the Revised Code, expenditures from the fund those funds shall not be made to purchase real property or to remove a structure in order to access a well. The director of budget and management, in consultation with the chief, shall establish an accounting code for purposes of tracking expenditures made as required under this division. (C)(1) If a landowner discovers a well on the landowner's real property and the landowner is not the owner of the well, the landowner may report the existence of the well in writing to the chief. (2) If the chief receives a written report from a landowner of the discovery of a well previously unknown to the division, the chief shall inspect the well not later than thirty days after the date of receipt of the landowner's report. (3) The chief shall establish a scoring matrix for use in determining the priority of plugging wells or restoring land surfaces at orphaned well sites for purposes of this section. The matrix shall include a classification system that categorizes orphaned wells as high priority, medium priority, and low priority. (4) The chief shall use the matrix developed under division (C)(3) of this section to prioritize plugging and land restoration projects under this section. The chief may add additional orphaned wells to a project regardless of classification. (D)(1) After determining that a well is an orphaned well, the chief shall do all of the following: (a) Make a reasonable attempt to determine from the records in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the well is located the identity of the current owner of the land on which the well is located, the identity of each person owning a right or interest in the oil or gas mineral interests, and the identities of the persons having a lien upon any of the equipment appurtenant to the well. For purposes of division (D)(1)(a) of this section, the chief is not required to review records in the office of the county recorder that are older than forty years from the date on which the chief made the determination that the well is an orphaned well. (b) Mail notice to each person identified in division (D)(1)(a) of this section; (c) Include in the notice to each person having a lien upon any equipment appurtenant to the well, a statement informing the person that the well is to be plugged and offering the person the opportunity to remove that equipment from the well site at the person's own expense in order to avoid forfeiture of the equipment to this state; (d) Publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the well is located that the well is to be plugged or post the notice on the department of natural resources web site. (2) If the current address of a person identified in division (D)(1)(a) of this section cannot be determined, or if a notice provided by mail to a person under division (D)(1)(b) of this section is returned undeliverable, the notice published under division (D)(1)(d) of this section constitutes sufficient notice to the person. (3) If none of the persons described in division (D)(1)(a) of this section removes equipment from the well within thirty days after the mailing of the notice or publication or posting of notice described in division (D)(1)(d) of this section, whichever is later, all equipment appurtenant to the well is hereby declared to be forfeited to this state without compensation and without the necessity for any action by the state for use to defray the cost of plugging the well and restoring the land surface at the well site. (E) The chief may expend money from the oil and gas well fund and the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund for the purpose of division (B)(1)(a) of this section, and such expenditures shall be made in accordance with either of the following: (1) The chief may make expenditures pursuant to contracts entered into by either the chief or another agency of the state with persons who agree to furnish the materials, equipment, work, and labor as specified and provided in such a contract for activities associated with the restoration or plugging of an orphaned well as determined by the chief. If another agency of the state enters into the contract, the chief shall prepare the scope of work for the restoration or plugging of the well. The activities may include excavation to uncover a well, methods to locate a well, analyzing the well, stabilizing or other work conducted prior to plugging the well, drilling out or cleanout of wellbores to remove material from a well, plugging operations, installation of vault and vent systems, including associated engineering certifications and permits, removal of associated equipment, restoration of property, replugging of previously plugged orphaned wells or wells for which final restoration was completed under section 1509.072 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it, and repair of damage to property that is caused by such activities. The chief may make expenditures for salaries, maintenance, equipment, or other administrative purposes, for costs directly attributed to locating, analyzing, stabilizing, designing, plugging, remediating, or restoring an orphaned well, and for determining if a well is an orphaned well. Agents or employees of persons contracting with the chief to locate, analyze, stabilize, design, plug, remediate, or restore a well may enter upon any land, public or private, on which the well is located, or on adjacent parcels needed for access, for the purpose of performing the work. Prior to such entry, the chief shall give to the following persons written notice of the existence of a contract to locate, analyze, stabilize, design, plug, remediate, or restore a well, the names of the persons with whom the contract is made, and the date that the project will commence: the owner of the well, the owner of the land upon which the well is located, the owner of the land of an adjacent parcel that will be entered upon, and, if the well is located in the same township as or in a township adjacent to the excavations and workings of a mine and the owner or lessee of that mine has provided written notice identifying those townships to the chief at any time during the immediately preceding three years, the owner or lessee of the mine. The chief may include in the notice to the owner or lessee of the mine additional information, such as authorization to plug an orphaned well under section 1509.151 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) The owner of the land on which at least one orphaned well is located who has received notice under division (D)(1)(b) of this section may plug any such orphaned well and be reimbursed by the division of oil and gas resources management for the reasonable cost of plugging such wells. In order to plug the orphaned wells, the landowner shall submit an application to the chief on a form prescribed by the chief and approved by the technical advisory council on oil and gas created in section 1509.38 of the Revised Code. The application, at a minimum, shall require the landowner to provide the same information as is required to be included in the application for a permit to plug and abandon under section 1509.13 of the Revised Code. The application shall be accompanied by a copy of a proposed contract to plug and abandon the orphaned wells prepared by a contractor regularly engaged in the business of plugging oil and gas wells. The proposed contract shall require the contractor to furnish all of the materials, equipment, work, and labor necessary to plug the orphaned wells properly and restore the site including the removal of all associated equipment and shall specify the price for doing the work. The contractor shall be insured. Expenditures made under division (E)(2)(a) of this section shall be consistent with the expenditures for activities described in division (E)(1) of this section. In addition, expenditures made under division (E)(2) of this section are not subject to section 127.16 of the Revised Code. The application constitutes an application for a permit to plug the well for the purposes of section 1509.13 of the Revised Code and the applicant is not required to submit the fee otherwise required under that section. (b) Within thirty days after receiving an application and accompanying proposed contract under division (E)(2)(a) of this section, the chief shall determine whether the plugging would comply with the applicable requirements of this chapter and applicable rules adopted and orders issued under it and whether the cost of the plugging under the proposed contract is reasonable. If the chief determines that the proposed plugging would comply with those requirements and that the proposed cost of the plugging is reasonable, the chief shall notify the landowner of that determination and issue to the landowner a permit to plug the well under section 1509.13 of the Revised Code. The chief may disapprove an application submitted under division (E)(2)(a) of this section if the chief determines that the proposed plugging would not comply with the applicable requirements of this chapter and applicable rules adopted and orders issued under it, that the cost of the plugging under the proposed contract is unreasonable, or that the proposed contract is not a bona fide, arm's length contract. (c) After receiving the chief's notice of the approval of the application and permit to plug and abandon a well under division (E)(2)(b) of this section, the landowner may enter into the proposed contract to plug the well. (d) Upon determining that the plugging has been completed in compliance with the applicable requirements of this chapter and applicable rules adopted and orders issued under it, the chief shall pay the contractor for the cost of the plugging and restoration as set forth in the proposed contract approved by the chief and changes or costs approved by the chief. The payment shall be paid from the oil and gas well fund or the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund. The chief shall only make payments for purposes of division (E)(2) of this section pursuant to a proper invoice as defined under section 125.01 of the Revised Code. (e) If the chief determines that the plugging was not completed in accordance with the applicable requirements, the chief shall not pay the contractor or landowner for the cost of the plugging. (f) If any equipment was removed from the well during the plugging and sold, the chief shall deduct the sale amount of the equipment from the payment to the contractor. (g) Changes made to a contract executed under division (E)(2) of this section due to unanticipated conditions may be presented to the chief in the form of a written request for approval of the additional costs prior to completion of the work. The chief shall determine if the changes are necessary to comply with this chapter and rules adopted and orders issued under it and if the cost of the changes are reasonable. The chief shall provide to the contractor a written decision regarding the proposed changes. If the chief determines that the changes are not necessary or that the costs are not reasonable, the chief may either deny the request or establish the amount of the cost that the chief approves. Work completed prior to receipt of written approval from the chief is not eligible for payment, unless waived by the chief. (3) The chief may establish an annual limit on the number of wells that may be plugged under division (E)(2) of this section or an annual limit on the expenditures to be made under that division. The chief may reject an application submitted under division (E)(2) of this section if the chief determines that the plugging of other wells take priority. (4) As used in division (E)(2) of this section, "plug" and "plugging" include the plugging of the well, replugging of a previously plugged orphaned well or a well for which final restoration was completed under section 1509.072 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it, drilling out or cleanout of a well bore to remove material from a well, installation of casings, installation of a vault and vent, restoration, and the restoration of the land surface disturbed by the plugging. (F)(1) Expenditures from the oil and gas well fund or the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund for the purpose of division (B)(1)(b) of this section may be made pursuant to contracts entered into by either the chief or another agency of the state with persons who agree to furnish the materials, equipment, work, and labor as specified and provided in such a contract. The competitive bidding requirements of Chapter 153. of the Revised Code do not apply if the chief reasonably determines that a situation exists requiring immediate action for the correction of the applicable health or safety risk. A contract or purchase of materials for purposes of addressing the emergency situation is not subject to division (B) of section 127.16 of the Revised Code. The chief, designated representatives of the chief, and agents or employees of persons contracting with the chief to locate, analyze, stabilize, design, plug, remediate, or restore a well under this division may enter upon any land, public or private, on which the well is located, or on parcels needed for access, for the purpose of performing the work. (2) The chief shall issue an order that requires the owner of a well to pay the actual documented costs of a corrective action that is described in division (B)(1)(b) of this section concerning the well. The chief shall transmit the money so recovered to the treasurer of state who shall deposit the money in the state treasury to the credit of the oil and gas well resolution and remediation fund. (G) Contracts entered into by either the chief or another agency of the state under this section are not subject to any of the following: (1) Chapter 4115. of the Revised Code; (2) Chapter 153. of the Revised Code; (3) Section 4733.17 of the Revised Code. (H) The owner of land on which a well is located who has received notice under division (D)(1)(b) of this section, in lieu of plugging the well in accordance with division (E)(2) of this section, may cause ownership of the well to be transferred in accordance with section 1509.31 of the Revised Code. If a well is transferred, the owner to whom it is transferred shall comply with this chapter and rules adopted under it and shall take title to and possession of the equipment appurtenant to the well that has been identified by the chief as having been abandoned by the former owner of the well. (I) The chief may engage in cooperative projects under this section with any agency of this state, another state, or the United States; any other governmental agencies; any state university or college as defined in section 3345.27 of the Revised Code; or a nonprofit corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. A contract entered into for purposes of a cooperative project is not subject to division (B) of section 127.16 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) On or before the close of each calendar quarter, the chief shall submit a written report to the technical advisory council established under section 1509.38 of the Revised Code describing the efforts of the division of oil and gas resources management to plug orphaned wells during the immediately preceding calendar quarter. The chief also shall include in the report all of the following information: (a) The total number of known orphaned wells in the state and the total number in each county of the state; (b) The total number of newly discovered orphaned wells during the immediately preceding calendar quarter; (c) The total number of wells plugged in accordance with this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter; (d) The total number of wells plugged in accordance with this section and the estimated average and indirect costs of plugging activities conducted under this section prior to the date of the report; (e) The number of wells approved for plugging in accordance with this section and the estimated average and indirect costs of plugging activities conducted under this section during the immediately preceding calendar quarter. (2) Not later than the thirty-first day of March of each year, the chief and the technical advisory council shall jointly provide a report containing, at a minimum, the information required to be included in the quarterly reports during the previous one-year period to all of the following: (a) The speaker of the house of representatives; (b) The president of the senate; (c) The chair of the committee of the house of representatives responsible for energy and natural resources issues; (d) The chair of the committee of the senate responsible for energy and natural resources issues. Sec. 1509.075. (A) The oil and gas resolution and remediation fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of moneys transferred to it from the oil and gas well fund and any money deposited into it under sections 1509.07 and 1509.071 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, at the beginning of each fiscal year, the treasurer of state shall transfer to the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund the amount of money in the oil and gas well fund that is in excess of the total amount appropriated to the oil and gas well fund for that fiscal year. (B)(1) Money in the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund shall be used by the chief of the division of oil and gas resources management for the plugging of orphaned wells under this chapter. (2) The chief may use money in the fund for expenses that are critical and necessary for the protection of human health and safety and the environment related to oil and gas production in this state. (3) The treasurer of state shall disburse moneys from the fund quarterly on order of the chief. (C) The treasurer of state may invest any portion of the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund not needed for immediate use in the same manner as, and subject to all provisions of law with respect to the investment of, state funds. (D) Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the fund and reserved for use by the director of natural resources. The director may order the treasurer of state to disburse interest from the fund for any purpose of the department of natural resources, subject to the approval of the technical advisory council on oil and gas, as provided in section 1509.38 of the Revised Code. The director shall provide the treasurer of state with written notice of the council's approval before the treasurer of state may disburse money from the fund. (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no money shall be transferred out of the fund by the director of budget and management or the controlling board to any other fund, including the general revenue fund. The fund shall not be used for any purpose not specified in law. Sec. 1509.13. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of this section and division (E)(1) of section 1509.071 of the Revised Code, no person shall plug and abandon a well without having a permit to do so issued by the chief of the division of oil and gas resources management. The permit shall be issued by the chief in accordance with this chapter and shall be valid for a period of twenty-four months from the date of issue. (2) The holder of a valid permit issued under section 1509.06 of the Revised Code may receive approval from an oil and gas resources inspector to plug and abandon the well associated with that permit, without obtaining the permit required under division (A) of this section, if either of the following apply: (a) The well was drilled to total depth and the well cannot or will not be completed. (b) The well is a lost hole or dry hole. (3) A permit holder plugging a well pursuant to division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall plug the well within thirty days of receipt of approval from the oil and gas resources inspector. (4) A permit holder plugging a well pursuant to division (A)(2)(b) of this section shall plug the well immediately after determining that the well is a lost hole or dry hole in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter. (B) The application for a permit to plug and abandon shall be filed as many days in advance as will be necessary for an oil and gas resources inspector or, if the well is located in a coal bearing township, both a deputy mine inspector and an oil and gas resources inspector to be present at the plugging. The application shall be filed with the chief upon a form that the chief prescribes and shall contain the following information: (1) The name and address of the applicant; (2) The signature of the applicant or the applicant's authorized agent. When an authorized agent signs an application, it shall be accompanied by a certified copy of the appointment as that agent. (3) The location of the well identified by section or lot number, city, village, township, and county; (4) Designation of well by name and number; (5) The total depth of the well to be plugged; (6) The date and amount of last production from the well; (7) Other information that the chief may require. (C) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2)(a) of section 1509.071 of the Revised Code, the application shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of two hundred fifty dollars. Unless waived by an oil and gas resources inspector, the owner of a well or the owner's authorized representative shall notify an oil and gas resources inspector at least twenty-four hours prior to the commencement of the plugging of a well. No well shall be plugged and abandoned without an oil and gas resources inspector present unless permission has been granted by the chief. The owner of a well that has produced oil or gas shall give written notice at the same time to the owner of the land upon which the well is located and to all lessors that receive gas from the well pursuant to an agreement. If the well penetrates or passes within one hundred feet of the excavations and workings of a mine, the owner of the well shall give written notice to the owner or lessee of that mine of the intention to abandon the well and of the time when the owner of the well will be prepared to commence plugging it. (D) An applicant may file a request with the chief for expedited review of an application for a permit to plug and abandon a well. The chief may refuse to accept a request for expedited review if, in the chief's judgment, acceptance of the request will prevent the issuance, within twenty-one days of filing, of permits for which applications filed under section 1509.06 of the Revised Code are pending. In addition to a complete application for a permit that meets the requirements of this section and the permit fee prescribed by this section, if applicable, a request for expedited review shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars unless the chief has ordered the applicant to plug and abandon the well. When a request for expedited review is filed, the chief shall immediately begin to process the application and shall issue a permit within seven days of the filing of the request unless the chief, by order, denies the application. (E)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2) of this section, any person undertaking the plugging of a well for which a permit has been issued under this section shall obtain insurance for bodily injury coverage and property damage coverage in the amount established under section 1509.07 of the Revised Code to pay for damages or injury to property or person, including damages caused by the plugging of the well. The person shall electronically submit proof of insurance to the chief upon the chief's request. (2) Division (E)(1) of this section does not apply to a person already required to maintain an insurance policy under section 1509.07 of the Revised Code. (F) This section does not apply to a well plugged or abandoned in compliance with section 1571.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1509.36. Any person adversely affected by an order by the chief of the division of oil and gas resources management may appeal to the oil and gas commission for an order vacating or modifying the order. The person so appealing to the commission shall be known as appellant and the chief shall be known as appellee. Appellant and appellee shall be deemed to be parties to the appeal. The appeal shall be in writing and shall set forth the order complained of and the grounds upon which the appeal is based. The appeal shall be filed with the commission within thirty days after the date upon which the person to whom the order was issued received the order and, for all other persons adversely affected by the order, within thirty days after the date of the order complained of. Notice of the filing of the appeal shall be filed with the chief within three days after the appeal is filed with the commission. Upon the filing of the appeal, the commission may decide the appeal, in whole or in part, without a hearing when, in its judgment, it is appropriate to do so. If the commission decides to hold a hearing, the commission promptly shall fix the time and place at which the hearing on the appeal will be held, and shall give the appellant and the chief at least ten days' written notice thereof by mail. The commission may postpone or continue any hearing upon its own motion or upon application of the appellant or of the chief. The filing of an appeal provided for in this section does not automatically suspend or stay execution of the order appealed from, but upon application by the appellant the commission may suspend or stay the execution pending determination of the appeal upon such terms as the commission considers proper. Either party to the appeal or any interested person who, pursuant to commission rules has been granted permission to appear, may submit such evidence as the commission considers admissible. For the purpose of conducting a hearing on an appeal, the commission may require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers, and it may, and at the request of any party it shall, issue subpoenas for witnesses or subpoenas duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records, or papers, directed to the sheriffs of the counties where the witnesses are found. The subpoenas shall be served and returned in the same manner as subpoenas in criminal cases are served and returned. The fees of sheriffs shall be the same as those allowed by the court of common pleas in criminal cases. Witnesses shall be paid the fees and mileage provided for under section 119.094 of the Revised Code. Such fees and mileage expenses incurred at the request of appellant shall be paid in advance by the appellant, and the remainder of those expenses shall be paid out of funds appropriated for the expenses of the division of oil and gas resources management. In case of disobedience or neglect of any subpoena served on any person, or the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which the witness may be lawfully interrogated, the court of common pleas of the county in which the disobedience, neglect, or refusal occurs, or any judge thereof, on application of the commission or any member thereof, shall compel obedience by attachment proceedings for contempt as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued from that court or a refusal to testify therein. Witnesses at such hearings shall testify under oath, and any member of the commission may administer oaths or affirmations to persons who so testify. At If a hearing occurs and at the request of any party to the appeal, a record of the testimony and other evidence submitted shall be taken by an official court reporter at the expense of the party making the request for the record. The record shall include all of the testimony and other evidence and the rulings on the admissibility thereof presented at the hearing. The commission shall pass upon the admissibility of evidence, but any party may at the time object to the admission of any evidence and except to the rulings of the commission thereon, and if the commission refuses to admit evidence the party offering same may make a proffer thereof, and such proffer shall be made a part of the record of the hearing. If upon completion of the hearing the commission finds that the order appealed from was lawful and reasonable, it shall make a written order affirming the order appealed from; if the commission finds that the order was unreasonable or unlawful, it shall make a written order vacating the order appealed from and making the order that it finds the chief should have made. Every order made by the commission shall contain a written finding by the commission of the facts upon which the order is based. Notice of the making of the order shall be given forthwith to each party to the appeal by mailing a certified copy thereof to each such party by certified mail. The order of the commission is final unless vacated by the court of common pleas of Franklin county in an appeal as provided for in section 1509.37 of the Revised Code. Sections 1509.01 to 1509.37 of the Revised Code, providing for appeals relating to orders by the chief or by the commission, or relating to rules adopted by the chief, do not constitute the exclusive procedure that any person who believes the person's rights to be unlawfully affected by those sections or any official action taken thereunder must pursue in order to protect and preserve those rights, nor do those sections constitute a procedure that that person must pursue before that person may lawfully appeal to the courts to protect and preserve those rights. Sec. 1509.38. (A) There is hereby created in the division of oil and gas resources management a technical advisory council on oil and gas, which shall consist of eight members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Three members shall be independent oil or gas producers, operators, or their representatives, operating and producing primarily in this state, three members shall be oil or gas producers, operators, or their representatives having substantial oil and gas producing operations in this state and at least one other state, one member shall represent the public, and one member shall represent persons having landowners' royalty interests in oil and gas production. All members shall be residents of this state, and all members, except the members representing the public and persons having landowners' royalty interests, shall have at least five years of practical or technical experience in oil or gas drilling and production. Not more than one member may represent any one company, producer, or operator. (B) Terms of office shall be for three years, commencing on the first day of February and ending on the thirty-first day of January. Each member shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. A vacancy in the office of a member shall be filled by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. Any member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. (C) The council shall select from among its members a chairperson, a vice-chairperson, and a secretary. All members are entitled to their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members, payable from the appropriations for the division. (D) The governor may remove any member for inefficiency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office. (E) The council shall hold at least one regular meeting in each quarter of a calendar year and shall keep a record of its proceedings. Special meetings may be called by the chairperson and shall be called by the chairperson upon receipt of a written request signed by two or more members of the council. A written notice of the time and place of each meeting shall be sent to each member of the council. Five members constitute a quorum, and no action of the council is valid unless five members concur. (F) The council, when requested by the chief of the division of oil and gas resources management, shall consult with and advise the chief and perform other duties that may be lawfully delegated to it by the chief. The council may participate in hearings held by the chief under this chapter and has powers of approval as provided in sections 1509.24 and 1509.25 of the Revised Code. The council shall conduct the activities required, and exercise the authority granted, under Chapter 1510. of the Revised Code. (G) If the council receives a request from the director of natural resources to approve an expenditure from the oil and gas resolution and remediation fund for purposes of division (D) of section 1509.075 of the Revised Code, the council shall vote to approve or deny that expenditure. The council shall notify the director in writing of the approval or denial. (H) The council, upon receiving a request from the chairperson of the oil and gas commission under division (C) of section 1509.35 of the Revised Code, immediately shall prepare and provide to the chairperson a list of its members who may serve as temporary members of the oil and gas commission as provided in that division. Sec. 1513.371. The long-term abandoned mine reclamation fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall be administered by the chief of the division of mineral resources management and consist of grants awarded by the United States secretary of the interior from the federal abandoned mine reclamation fund pursuant to the federal "Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act," Pub. L. No. 177-58. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The fund shall be used for abatement of the causes and treatment of the effects of acid mine drainage resulting from coal mine practices, including the following: (A) The costs of building, operating, maintaining, and rehabilitating acid mine drainage treatment systems; (B) The prevention, abatement, and control of subsidence; (C) The prevention, abatement, and control of coal mine fires. Sec. 1517.11. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the natural areas and preserves fund, which shall consist of moneys transferred into it under section 5747.113 of the Revised Code and of contributions made directly to it. Any person may contribute directly to the fund in addition to or independently of the income tax refund contribution system established in that section. (B) Moneys in the fund shall be disbursed pursuant to vouchers approved by the director of natural resources for use by the division of natural areas and preserves solely for the following purposes: (A)(1) The acquisition of new or expanded natural areas and nature preserves and scenic river lands; (B)(2) Facility development in natural areas and nature preserves and scenic river lands; (C)(3) Special projects, including, but not limited to, biological inventories, research grants, and the production of interpretive material related to natural areas and nature preserves and scenic river lands; (D)(4) Routine maintenance for health and safety purposes. (C) Money in the fund also may be used for the purposes of administering a system of wild, scenic, and recreational rivers, scenic river lands, and facilities or improvements associated with such rivers and lands. (D) Moneys appropriated from the fund shall not be used to fund salaries of permanent employees or administrative costs. (E) All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. (F) The chief of the division of natural areas and preserves may sell any of the following: (1) Items related to or that promote Ohio's native plants and animals, unique ecology and geology, and general ecological preservation and conservation such as pins, apparel, stickers, books, bulletins, maps, publications, calendars, and other educational articles and division branded merchandise; (2) Items pertaining to Ohio's ecology including native plants and seeds of native plants. (G) All moneys received under division (F) of this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the natural areas and preserves fund created under this section. Sec. 1531.01. As used in this chapter and Chapter 1533. of the Revised Code: (A) "Person" means a person as defined in section 1.59 of the Revised Code or a company; an employee, agent, or officer of such a person or company; a combination of individuals; the state; a political subdivision of the state; an interstate body created by a compact; or the federal government or a department, agency, or instrumentality of it. (B) "Resident" means either of the following: (1) An individual who has resided in this state for not less than six months preceding the date of making application for a license or permit; (2) An individual who is a full-time student enrolled in an accredited Ohio public or private college or university and who resides in this state at the time the individual makes application for a license or permit and who attests to the individual's full-time student status in a manner determined by the chief of the division of wildlife. (C) "Nonresident" means any individual who does not qualify as a resident. (D) "Division rule" or "rule" means any rule adopted by the chief of the division of wildlife under section 1531.10 of the Revised Code unless the context indicates otherwise. (E) "Closed season" means that period of time during which the taking of wild animals protected by this chapter and Chapter 1533. of the Revised Code is prohibited. (F) "Open season" means that period of time during which the taking of wild animals protected by this chapter and Chapter 1533. of the Revised Code is permitted. (G) "Take or taking" includes pursuing, shooting, hunting, killing, trapping, angling, fishing with a trotline, or netting any clam, mussel, crayfish, aquatic insect, fish, frog, turtle, wild bird, or wild quadruped, and any lesser act, such as wounding, or placing, setting, drawing, or using any other device for killing or capturing any wild animal, whether it results in killing or capturing the animal or not. "Take or taking" includes every attempt to kill or capture and every act of assistance to any other person in killing or capturing or attempting to kill or capture a wild animal. (H) "Possession" means both actual and constructive possession and any control of things referred to. (I) "Bag limit" means the number, measurement, or weight of any kind of crayfish, aquatic insects, fish, frogs, turtles, wild birds, and wild quadrupeds permitted to be taken. (J) "Transport and transportation" means carrying or moving or causing to be carried or moved. (K) "Sell and sale" means barter, exchange, or offer or expose for sale. (L) "Whole to include part" means that every provision relating to any wild animal protected by this chapter and Chapter 1533. of the Revised Code applies to any part of the wild animal with the same effect as it applies to the whole. (M) "Angling" means fishing with not more than two hand lines, not more than two units of rod and line, or a combination of not more than one hand line and one rod and line, either in hand or under control at any time while fishing. The hand line or rod and line shall have attached to it not more than three baited hooks, not more than three artificial fly rod lures, or one artificial bait casting lure equipped with not more than three sets of three hooks each. (N) "Trotline" means a device for catching fish that consists of a line having suspended from it, at frequent intervals, vertical lines with hooks attached. (O) "Fish" means a cold-blooded vertebrate having fins. (P) "Measurement of fish" means length from the end of the nose to the longest tip or end of the tail. (Q) "Wild birds" includes game birds and nongame birds. (R) "Game" includes game birds, game quadrupeds, and fur-bearing animals. (S) "Game birds" includes mourning doves, ringneck pheasants, bobwhite quail, ruffed grouse, sharp-tailed grouse, pinnated grouse, wild turkey, Hungarian partridge, Chukar partridge, woodcocks, black-breasted plover, golden plover, Wilson's snipe or jacksnipe, greater and lesser yellowlegs, rail, coots, gallinules, duck, geese, brant, and crows. (T) "Nongame birds" includes all other wild birds not included and defined as game birds or migratory game birds. (U) "Wild quadrupeds" includes game quadrupeds, fur-bearing animals, and wild boar or feral swine. (V) "Game quadrupeds" includes cottontail rabbits, gray squirrels, black squirrels, fox squirrels, red squirrels, flying squirrels, chipmunks, groundhogs or woodchucks, white-tailed deer, elk, and black bears. (W) "Fur-bearing animals" includes minks, weasels, raccoons, skunks, opossums, muskrats, fox, beavers, badgers, otters, coyotes, and bobcats. (X) "Wild animals" includes mollusks, crustaceans, aquatic insects, fish, reptiles, amphibians, wild birds, wild quadrupeds, and all other wild mammals, but does not include domestic deer. (Y) "Hunting" means pursuing, shooting, killing, following after or on the trail of, lying in wait for, shooting at, or wounding wild birds or wild quadrupeds while employing any device commonly used to kill or wound wild birds or wild quadrupeds whether or not the acts result in killing or wounding. "Hunting" includes every attempt to kill or wound and every act of assistance to any other person in killing or wounding or attempting to kill or wound wild birds or wild quadrupeds. (Z) "Trapping" means securing or attempting to secure possession of a wild bird or wild quadruped by means of setting, placing, drawing, or using any device that is designed to close upon, hold fast, confine, or otherwise capture a wild bird or wild quadruped whether or not the means results in capture. "Trapping" includes every act of assistance to any other person in capturing wild birds or wild quadrupeds by means of the device whether or not the means results in capture. (AA) "Muskrat spear" means any device used in spearing muskrats. (BB) "Channels and passages" means those narrow bodies of water lying between islands or between an island and the mainland in Lake Erie. (CC) "Island" means a rock or land elevation above the waters of Lake Erie having an area of five or more acres above water. (DD) "Reef" means an elevation of rock, either broken or in place, or gravel shown by the latest United States chart to be above the common level of the surrounding bottom of the lake, other than the rock bottom, or in place forming the base or foundation rock of an island or mainland and sloping from the shore of it. "Reef" also means all elevations shown by that chart to be above the common level of the sloping base or foundation rock of an island or mainland, whether running from the shore of an island or parallel with the contour of the shore of an island or in any other way and whether formed by rock, broken or in place, or from gravel. (EE) "Fur farm" means any area used exclusively for raising fur-bearing animals or in addition thereto used for hunting game, the boundaries of which are plainly marked as such. (FF) "Waters" includes any lake, pond, reservoir, stream, channel, lagoon, or other body of water, or any part thereof, whether natural or artificial. (GG) "Crib" or "car" refers to that particular compartment of the net from which the fish are taken when the net is lifted. (HH) "Commercial fish" means those species of fish permitted to be taken, possessed, bought, or sold unless otherwise restricted by the Revised Code or division rule and are alewife (Alosa pseudoharengus), American eel (Anguilla rostrata), bowfin (Amia calva), burbot (Lota lota), carp (Cyprinus carpio), smallmouth buffalo (Ictiobus bubalus), bigmouth buffalo (Ictiobus cyprinellus), black bullhead (Ictalurus melas), yellow bullhead (Ictalurus natalis), brown bullhead (Ictalurus nebulosus), channel catfish (Ictalurus punctatus), flathead catfish (Pylodictis olivaris), whitefish (Coregonus sp.), cisco (Coregonus sp.), freshwater drum or sheepshead (Aplodinotus grunniens), gar (Lepisosteus sp.), gizzard shad (Dorosoma cepedianum), goldfish (Carassius auratus), lake trout (Salvelinus namaycush), mooneye (Hiodon tergisus), quillback (Carpiodes cyprinus), smelt (Allosmerus elongatus, Hypomesus sp., Osmerus sp., Spirinchus sp.), sturgeon (Acipenser sp., Scaphirhynchus sp.), sucker other than buffalo and quillback (Carpiodes sp., Catostomus sp., Hypentelium sp., Minytrema sp., Moxostoma sp.), white bass (Morone chrysops), white perch (Roccus americanus), and yellow perch (Perca flavescens). When the common name of a fish is used in this chapter or Chapter 1533. of the Revised Code, it refers to the fish designated by the scientific name in this definition. (II) "Fishing" means taking or attempting to take fish by any method, and all other acts such as placing, setting, drawing, or using any device commonly used to take fish whether resulting in a taking or not. (JJ) "Fillet" means the pieces of flesh taken or cut from both sides of a fish, joined to form one piece of flesh. (KK) "Part fillet" means a piece of flesh taken or cut from one side of a fish. (LL) "Round" when used in describing fish means with head and tail intact. (MM) "Migrate" means the transit or movement of fish to or from one place to another as a result of natural forces or instinct and includes, but is not limited to, movement of fish induced or caused by changes in the water flow. (NN) "Spreader bar" means a brail or rigid bar placed across the entire width of the back, at the top and bottom of the cars in all trap, crib, and fyke nets for the purpose of keeping the meshes hanging squarely while the nets are fishing. (OO) "Fishing guide" means any person who, for consideration or hire, operates a boat, rents, leases, or otherwise furnishes angling devices, ice fishing shanties or shelters of any kind, or other fishing equipment, and accompanies, guides, directs, or assists any other person in order for the other person to engage in fishing. (PP) "Net" means fishing devices with meshes composed of twine or synthetic material and includes, but is not limited to, trap nets, fyke nets, crib nets, carp aprons, dip nets, and seines, except minnow seines and minnow dip nets. (QQ) "Commercial fishing gear" means seines, trap nets, fyke nets, dip nets, carp aprons, trotlines, other similar gear, and any boat used in conjunction with that gear, but does not include gill nets. (RR) "Native wildlife" means any species of the animal kingdom indigenous to this state. (SS) "Gill net" means a single section of fabric or netting seamed to a float line at the top and a lead line at the bottom, which is designed to entangle fish in the net openings as they swim into it. (TT) "Tag fishing tournament" means a contest in which a participant pays a fee, or gives other valuable consideration, for a chance to win a prize by virtue of catching a tagged or otherwise specifically marked fish within a limited period of time. (UU) "Tenant" means an individual who resides on land for which the individual pays rent and whose annual income is primarily derived from agricultural production conducted on that land, as "agricultural production" is defined in section 929.01 of the Revised Code. (VV) "Nonnative wildlife" means any wild animal not indigenous to this state, but does not include domestic deer. (WW) "Reptiles" includes common musk turtle (sternotherus odoratus), common snapping turtle (Chelydra serpentina serpentina), spotted turtle (Clemmys guttata), eastern box turtle (Terrapene carolina carolina), Blanding's turtle (Emydoidea blandingii), common map turtle (Graptemys geographica), ouachita map turtle (Graptemys pseudogeographica ouachitensis), midland painted turtle (Chrysemys picta marginata), red-eared slider (Trachemys scripta elegans), eastern spiny softshell turtle (Apalone spinifera spinifera), midland smooth softshell turtle (Apalone mutica mutica), northern fence lizard (Sceloporus undulatus hyacinthinus), ground skink (Scincella lateralis), five-lined skink (Eumeces fasciatus), broadhead skink (Eumeces laticeps), northern coal skink (Eumeces anthracinus anthracinus), European wall lizard (Podarcis muralis), queen snake (Regina septemvittata), Kirtland's snake (Clonophis kirtlandii), northern water snake (Nerodia sipedon sipedon), Lake Erie watersnake (Nerodia sipedon insularum), copperbelly water snake (Nerodia erythrogaster neglecta), northern brown snake (Storeria dekayi dekayi), midland brown snake (Storeria dekayi wrightorum), northern redbelly snake (Storeria occipitomaculata occipitomaculata), eastern garter snake (Thamnophis sirtalis sirtalis), eastern plains garter snake (Thamnophis radix radix), Butler's garter snake (Thamnophis butleri), shorthead garter snake (Thamnophis brachystoma), eastern ribbon snake (Thamnophis sauritus sauritus), northern ribbon snake (Thamnophis sauritus septentrionalis), eastern hognose snake (Heterodon platirhinos), eastern smooth earth snake (Virginia valeriae valeriae), northern ringneck snake (Diadophis punctatus edwardsii), midwest worm snake (Carphophis amoenus helenae), eastern worm snake (Carphophis amoenus amoenus), black racer (Coluber constrictor constrictor), blue racer (Coluber constrictor foxii), rough green snake (opheodrys aestivus), smooth green snake (opheodrys vernalis vernalis), black rat snake (Elaphe obsoleta obsoleta), eastern fox snake (Elaphe vulpina gloydi), black kingsnake (Lampropeltis getula nigra), eastern milk snake (Lampropeltis triangulum triangulum), northern copperhead (Agkistrodon contortrix mokasen), eastern massasauga (Sistrurus catenatus catenatus), and timber rattlesnake (Crotalus horridus horridus). (XX) "Amphibians" includes eastern hellbender (Crytpobranchus alleganiensis alleganiensis), mudpuppy (Necturus maculosus maculosus), red-spotted newt (Notophthalmus viridescens viridescens), Jefferson salamander (Ambystoma jeffersonianum), spotted salamander (Ambystoma maculatum), blue-spotted salamander (Ambystoma laterale), smallmouth salamander (Ambystoma texanum), streamside salamander (Ambystoma barbouri), marbled salamander (Ambystoma opacum), eastern tiger salamander (Ambystoma tigrinum tigrinum), northern dusky salamander (Desmognathus fuscus fuscus), mountain dusky salamander (Desmognathus ochrophaeus), redback salamander (Plethodon cinereus), ravine salamander (Plethodon richmondi), northern slimy salamander (Plethodon glutinosus), Wehrle's salamander (Plethodon wehrlei), four-toed salamander (Hemidactylium scutatum), Kentucky spring salamander (Gyrinophilus porphyriticus duryi), northern spring salamander (Gyrinophilus porphyriticus porphyriticus), mud salamander (Pseudotriton montanus), northern red salamander (Pseudotriton ruber ruber), green salamander (Aneides aeneus), northern two-lined salamander (Eurycea bislineata), longtail salamander (Eurycea longicauda longicauda), cave salamander (Eurycea lucifuga), southern two-lined salamander (Eurycea cirrigera), Fowler's toad (Bufo woodhousii fowleri), American toad (Bufo americanus), eastern spadefoot (Scaphiopus holbrookii), Blanchard's cricket frog (Acris crepitans blanchardi), northern spring peeper (Pseudacris crucifer crucifer), gray treefrog (Hyla versicolor), Cope's gray treefrog (Hyla chrysoscelis), western chorus frog (Pseudacris triseriata triseriata), mountain chorus frog (Pseudacris brachyphona), bullfrog (Rana catesbeiana), green frog (Rana clamitans melanota), northern leopard frog (Rana pipiens), pickerel frog (Rana palustris), southern leopard frog (Rana utricularia), and wood frog (Rana sylvatica). (YY) "Deer" means white-tailed deer (Oddocoileus virginianus). (ZZ) "Domestic deer" means nonnative deer that have been legally acquired or their offspring and that are held in private ownership for primarily agricultural purposes. (AAA) "Migratory game bird" includes waterfowl (Anatidae); doves (Columbidae); cranes (Gruidae); cormorants (Phalacrocoracidea); rails, coots, and gallinules (Rallidae); and woodcock and snipe (Scolopacidae). (BBB) "Accompany" means to go along with another person while staying within a distance from the person that enables uninterrupted, unaided visual and auditory communication. (CCC) "All-purpose vehicle" means any vehicle that is designed primarily for cross-country travel on land, water, or land and water and that is steered by wheels, caterpillar treads, or a combination of wheels and caterpillar treads and includes vehicles that operate on a cushion of air, vehicles commonly known as all-terrain vehicles, all-season vehicles, mini-bikes, and trail bikes. (DDD) "Wholly enclosed preserve" means an area of land that is surrounded by a fence that is at least six feet in height, unless otherwise specified in division rule, and is constructed of a woven wire mesh, or another enclosure that the division of wildlife may approve, where game birds, game quadrupeds, reptiles, amphibians, or fur-bearing animals are raised and may be sold under the authority of a commercial propagating license or captive white-tailed deer propagation license obtained under section 1533.71 of the Revised Code. (EEE) "Commercial bird shooting preserve" means an area of land where game birds are released and hunted by shooting as authorized by a commercial bird shooting preserve license obtained under section 1533.72 of the Revised Code. (FFF) "Wild animal hunting preserve" means an area of land where game, captive white-tailed deer, and nonnative wildlife, other than game birds, are released and hunted as authorized by a wild animal hunting preserve license obtained under section 1533.721 of the Revised Code. (GGG) "Captive white-tailed deer" means legally acquired deer that are held in private ownership at a facility licensed under section 943.03 or 943.031 of the Revised Code and under section 1533.71 or 1533.721 of the Revised Code. (HHH) "Wild boar" or "feral swine" means either a hog, boar, or pig that appears to be untamed, undomesticated, or in a wild state. "Wild boar" or "feral swine" includes both of the following: (1) Members Except for Sus scrofa domesticus that is legally confined or held in captivity, members of the family suidae, including both all of the following: (a) Wild pig, wild hog, feral hog, and feral pig; (b) Old world swine, razorbacks, European wild boar, and Russian wild boar, and any hybrids or crossbreeds thereof; (c) Wild pig, wild hog, feral hog, or feral pig that appear contained in a wild animal hunting preserve licensed under section 1533.721 of the Revised Code or a wholly enclosed preserve for hunting or trapping. (2) Members of the family tayassuidae, including collared peccary and javelina, and any hybrids or crossbreeds of members of the family tayassuideatayassuidae. Sec. 1533.10. (A) Except as provided in this section or division (A)(2) of section 1533.12 or section 1533.73 or 1533.731 of the Revised Code, no person shall hunt any wild bird or wild quadruped without a hunting license. Each day that any person hunts within the state without procuring such a license constitutes a separate offense. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, division (A) of section 1533.12 of the Revised Code, or in rules adopted under division (B) of that section, each applicant for a hunting license shall pay an annual fee for each annual license in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Hunting license - resident $18.00 B Hunting license - nonresident that is not a resident of a reciprocal state, ages 18 and older $174.00 C Hunting license - nonresident that is a resident of a reciprocal state, ages 18 and older $18.00 D Apprentice hunting license - resident $18.00 E Apprentice hunting license - nonresident that is not a resident of a reciprocal state $174.00 F Apprentice hunting license - nonresident that is a resident of a reciprocal state $18.00 G Youth hunting license - resident and nonresident $9.00 H Apprentice youth hunting license - resident $9.00 I Senior hunting license - resident $9.00 J Apprentice senior hunting license - resident $9.00 (2) Apprentice resident hunting licenses, apprentice youth hunting licenses, apprentice senior hunting licenses, and apprentice nonresident hunting licenses are subject to the requirements established under section 1533.102 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. (3) As used in division (B)(1) of this section: (a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of eighteen years at the time of application for a license. (b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six years of age or older at the time of application for a license. (c) "Reciprocal state" means a state that is a party to an agreement under section 1533.91 of the Revised Code. (C) A resident of this state who owns lands in the state and the owner's parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt on the lands without a hunting license. A resident of any other state who owns real property in this state, and the spouse and children living with the property owner, may hunt on that property without a license, provided that the state of residence of the real property owner allows residents of this state owning real property in that state, and the spouse and children living with the property owner, to hunt without a license. If the owner of land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability partnership that consists of three or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an individual member or partner who is a resident of this state and the member's or partner's parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt on the land owned by the limited liability company or limited liability partnership without a hunting license. In addition, if the owner of land in this state is a trust that has a total of three or fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an individual who is a trustee or beneficiary and who is a resident of this state and the individual's parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt on the land owned by the trust without a hunting license. The tenant and children of the tenant, residing on lands in the state, may hunt on them without a hunting license. (D) The chief of the division of wildlife may issue a small game hunting license expiring three days from the effective date of the license to a nonresident of the state, the fee for which is thirty-nine dollars. No person shall take or possess deer, wild turkeys, fur-bearing animals, ducks, geese, brant, or any nongame animal while possessing only a small game hunting license. A small game hunting license or an apprentice nonresident hunting license does not authorize the taking or possessing of ducks, geese, or brant without having obtained, in addition to the small game hunting license or the apprentice nonresident hunting license, a wetlands habitat stamp as provided in section 1533.112 of the Revised Code. A small game hunting license or an apprentice nonresident hunting license does not authorize the taking or possessing of deer, wild turkeys, or fur-bearing animals. A nonresident of the state who wishes to take or possess deer, wild turkeys, or fur-bearing animals in this state shall procure, respectively, a deer or wild turkey permit as provided in section 1533.11 of the Revised Code or a fur taker permit as provided in section 1533.111 of the Revised Code in addition to a nonresident hunting license, an apprentice nonresident hunting license, a special youth hunting license, or an apprentice youth hunting license, as applicable, as provided in this section. (E) No person shall procure or attempt to procure a hunting license by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or any false statement. (F)(1) This section does not authorize the taking and possessing of deer or wild turkeys without first having obtained, in addition to the hunting license required by this section, a deer or wild turkey permit as provided in section 1533.11 of the Revised Code or the taking and possessing of ducks, geese, or brant without first having obtained, in addition to the hunting license required by this section, a wetlands habitat stamp as provided in section 1533.112 of the Revised Code. (2) This section does not authorize the hunting or trapping of fur-bearing animals without first having obtained, in addition to a hunting license required by this section, a fur taker permit as provided in section 1533.111 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) No hunting license shall be issued unless it is accompanied by a written explanation of the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised Code and the penalty for its violation, including a description of terms of imprisonment and fines that may be imposed. (2) No hunting license, other than an apprentice hunting license, shall be issued unless the applicant presents to the agent authorized to issue the license a previously held hunting license or evidence of having held such a license in content and manner approved by the chief, a certificate of completion issued upon completion of a hunter education and conservation course approved by the chief, or evidence of equivalent training in content and manner approved by the chief. A previously held apprentice hunting license does not satisfy the requirement concerning the presentation of a previously held hunting license or evidence of it. (3) No person shall issue a hunting license, except an apprentice hunting license, to any person who fails to present the evidence required by this section. No person shall purchase or obtain a hunting license, other than an apprentice hunting license, without presenting to the issuing agent the evidence required by this section. Issuance of a hunting license in violation of the requirements of this section is an offense by both the purchaser of the illegally obtained hunting license and the clerk or agent who issued the hunting license. Any hunting license issued in violation of this section is void. (H) The chief, with approval of the wildlife council, shall adopt rules prescribing a hunter education and conservation course for first-time hunting license buyers, other than buyers of apprentice hunting licenses, and for volunteer instructors. The course shall consist of subjects including, but not limited to, hunter safety and health, use of hunting implements, hunting tradition and ethics, the hunter and conservation, the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised Code along with the penalty for its violation, including a description of terms of imprisonment and fines that may be imposed, and other law relating to hunting. Authorized personnel of the division or volunteer instructors approved by the chief shall conduct such courses with such frequency and at such locations throughout the state as to reasonably meet the needs of license applicants. The chief shall issue a certificate of completion to each person who successfully completes the course and passes an examination prescribed by the chief. Sec. 1533.11. (A)(1) Except as provided in this section or section 1533.731 of the Revised Code, no person shall hunt deer on lands of another without first obtaining an annual deer permit. Except as provided in this section, no person shall hunt wild turkeys on lands of another without first obtaining an annual wild turkey permit. A deer or wild turkey permit is valid during the hunting license year in which the permit is purchased. Except as provided in rules adopted under division (B) of section 1533.12 of the Revised Code, each applicant for a deer or wild turkey permit shall pay an annual fee for each permit in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Deer permit – resident $30.00 B Deer permit – nonresident $74.00 $210.00 C Youth deer permit – resident and nonresident $15.00 D Senior deer permit – resident $11.00 E Wild turkey permit – resident $30.00 F Wild turkey permit – nonresident $37.00 G Youth wild turkey permit – resident and nonresident $15.00 H Senior wild turkey permit – resident $11.00 (2) As used in division (A)(1) of this section: (a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of eighteen years at the time of application for a permit. (b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six years of age or older at the time of application for a permit. (3) The money received shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the wildlife fund, created in section 1531.17 of the Revised Code, exclusively for the use of the division of wildlife in the acquisition and development of land for deer or wild turkey management, for investigating deer or wild turkey problems, and for the stocking, management, and protection of deer or wild turkey. (4) Every person, while hunting deer or wild turkey on lands of another, shall carry the person's deer or wild turkey permit and exhibit it to any enforcement officer so requesting. Failure to so carry and exhibit such a permit constitutes an offense under this section. (5) The chief of the division of wildlife shall adopt any additional rules the chief considers necessary to carry out this section and section 1533.10 of the Revised Code. (6) An owner who is a resident of this state or an owner who is exempt from obtaining a hunting license under section 1533.10 of the Revised Code and the spouse, parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age of the owner of lands in this state may hunt deer or wild turkey thereon without a deer or wild turkey permit. If the owner of land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability partnership that consists of three or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an individual member or partner who is a resident of this state and the member's or partner's parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt deer or wild turkey on the land owned by the limited liability company or limited liability partnership without a deer or wild turkey permit. In addition, if the owner of land in this state is a trust that has a total of three or fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an individual who is a trustee or beneficiary and who is a resident of this state and the individual's parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt deer or wild turkey on the land owned by the trust without a deer or wild turkey permit. The tenant and children of the tenant may hunt deer or wild turkey on lands where they reside without a deer or wild turkey permit. (B) A deer or wild turkey permit is not transferable. No person shall carry a deer or wild turkey permit issued in the name of another person. (C) The wildlife refunds fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money received from application fees for deer permits that are not issued. Money in the fund shall be used to make refunds of such application fees. (D) If the division establishes a system for the electronic submission of information regarding deer or wild turkey that are taken, the division shall allow the owner and the children of the owner of lands in this state to use the owner's name or address for purposes of submitting that information electronically via that system. Sec. 1533.111. (A) Except as provided in this section or division (A)(2) of section 1533.12 of the Revised Code, no person shall hunt or trap fur-bearing animals on land of another without first obtaining some type of an annual fur taker permit. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in rules adopted under division (B) of section 1533.12 of the Revised Code, each applicant for a fur taker permit or an apprentice fur taker permit shall pay an annual fee for each annual permit in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Fur taker permit $14.00 B Apprentice fur taker permit $14.00 C Senior fur taker permit – resident only $7.00 D Apprentice senior fur taker permit – resident only $7.00 E Special youth fur taker permit $7.00 F Apprentice youth fur taker permit $7.00 (2) As used in division (B)(1) of this section: (a) "Youth" means an applicant who is under the age of eighteen years at the time of application for a permit. (b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six years of age or older at the time of application for a permit. (C) Each type of fur taker permit is valid during the hunting license year in which the permit is purchased. The money received shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the fund established in section 1533.15 of the Revised Code. Apprentice fur taker permits and apprentice youth fur taker permits are subject to the requirements established under section 1533.102 of the Revised Code and rules adopted pursuant to it. (D)(1) No person shall issue a fur taker permit to an applicant unless it is accompanied by a written explanation of the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised Code and the penalty for its violation, including a description of terms of imprisonment and fines that may be imposed. (2) No person shall issue a fur taker permit, other than an apprentice fur taker permit or an apprentice youth fur taker permit, to an applicant unless the applicant presents to the agent authorized to issue a fur taker permit a previously held hunting license or trapping or fur taker permit or evidence of having held such a license or permit in content and manner approved by the chief of the division of wildlife, a certificate of completion issued upon completion of a trapper education course approved by the chief, or evidence of equivalent training in content and manner approved by the chief. A previously held apprentice hunting license, apprentice fur taker permit, or apprentice youth fur taker permit does not satisfy the requirement concerning the presentation of a previously held hunting license or fur taker permit or evidence of such a license or permit. (3) No person shall issue a fur taker permit, other than an apprentice fur taker permit or an apprentice youth fur taker permit, to any person who fails to present the evidence required by this section. No person shall purchase or obtain a fur taker permit, other than an apprentice fur taker permit or an apprentice youth fur taker permit, without presenting to the issuing agent the evidence required by this section. Issuance of a fur taker permit in violation of the requirements of this section is an offense by both the purchaser of the illegally obtained permit and the clerk or agent who issued the permit. Any fur taker permit issued in violation of this section is void. (E) The chief, with approval of the wildlife council, shall adopt rules prescribing a trapper education course for first-time fur taker permit buyers, other than buyers of apprentice fur taker permits or apprentice youth fur taker permits, and for volunteer instructors. The course shall consist of subjects that include, but are not limited to, trapping techniques, animal habits and identification, trapping tradition and ethics, the trapper and conservation, the law in section 1533.17 of the Revised Code along with the penalty for its violation, including a description of terms of imprisonment and fines that may be imposed, and other law relating to trapping. Authorized personnel of the division of wildlife or volunteer instructors approved by the chief shall conduct the courses with such frequency and at such locations throughout the state as to reasonably meet the needs of permit applicants. The chief shall issue a certificate of completion to each person who successfully completes the course and passes an examination prescribed by the chief. (F) Every person, while hunting or trapping fur-bearing animals on lands of another, shall carry the person's fur taker permit with the person's signature written on the permit. Failure to carry such a signed permit constitutes an offense under this section. The chief shall adopt any additional rules the chief considers necessary to carry out this section. (G) An owner who is a resident of this state or an owner who is exempt from obtaining a hunting license under section 1533.10 of the Revised Code and the spouse, parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age of the owner of lands in this state may hunt or trap fur-bearing animals thereon without a fur taker permit. If the owner of land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability partnership that consists of three or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an individual member or partner who is a resident of this state and the member's or partner's parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt or trap fur-bearing animals on the land owned by the limited liability company or limited liability partnership without a fur taker permit. In addition, if the owner of land in this state is a trust that has a total of three or fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an individual who is a trustee or beneficiary and who is a resident of this state and the individual's parents, children of any age, and grandchildren under eighteen years of age may hunt or trap fur-bearing animals on the land owned by the trust without a fur taker permit. The tenant and children of the tenant may hunt or trap fur-bearing animals on lands where they reside without a fur taker permit. (H) A fur taker permit is not transferable. No person shall carry a fur taker permit issued in the name of another person. (I) A fur taker permit entitles a nonresident to take from this state fur-bearing animals taken and possessed by the nonresident as provided by law or division rule. Sec. 1533.13. Hunting and fishing licenses, wetlands habitat stamps, deer and wild turkey permits, fur taker permits, and any other licenses, permits, or stamps that are required under this chapter or Chapter 1531. of the Revised Code and any reissued license, permit, or stamp may be issued by the clerk of the court of common pleas, village clerks, township fiscal officers, and other authorized agents designated by the chief of the division of wildlife. When required by the chief, a clerk, fiscal officer, or other agent shall give bond in the manner provided by the chief. All bonds, reports, except records prescribed by the auditor of state, and moneys received by those persons shall be handled under rules adopted by the director of natural resources. The premium of any bond prescribed by the chief under this section may be paid by the chief. Any person who is designated and authorized by the chief to issue licenses, stamps, and permits as provided in this section, except the clerk of the court of common pleas, a village clerk, and a township fiscal officer, shall pay to the chief a premium in an amount that represents the person's portion of the premium paid by the chief under this section, which amount shall be established by the chief and approved by the wildlife council created under section 1531.03 of the Revised Code. The chief shall pay all moneys that the chief receives as premiums under this section into the state treasury to the credit of the wildlife fund created under section 1531.17 of the Revised Code. Every authorized agent, for the purpose of issuing hunting and fishing licenses, wetlands habitat stamps, deer and wild turkey permits, and fur taker permits, may administer oaths to and take affidavits from applicants for the licenses, stamps, or permits when required. An authorized agent may appoint deputies to perform any acts that the agent is authorized to perform, consistent with division rules. Every applicant for a hunting or fishing license, wetlands habitat stamp, deer or wild turkey permit, or fur taker permit, unless otherwise provided by division rule, shall provide the applicant's name, date of birth, weight, height, and place of residence and any other information that the chief may require. The clerk, fiscal officer, or other agent authorized to issue licenses, stamps, and permits shall charge each applicant a fee of one dollar or four per cent of the cost of the license, stamp, or permit, whichever is greater, for taking the information provided by the applicant and issuing the license, stamp, or permit. The application, license, stamp, permit, and other blanks required by this section shall be prepared and furnished by the chief, in the form the chief provides, to the clerk, fiscal officer, or other agent authorized to issue them. The licenses and permits shall be issued to applicants by the clerk, fiscal officer, or other agent. The record of licenses and permits kept by the clerks, fiscal officers, and other agents shall be uniform throughout the state and in the form or manner as the auditor of state prescribes and shall be open at all reasonable hours to the inspection of any person. Unless otherwise provided by division rule, each annual hunting license, deer or wild turkey permit, and fur taker permit issued shall remain in force until the first day of March. Application for any such license or permit may be made and a license or permit issued prior to the date upon which it becomes effective. The chief may require an applicant who wishes to purchase a license, stamp, or permit by mail or telephone or via the internet to pay a nominal fee for postage and handling and credit card transactions. The court before whom a violator of any laws or division rules for the protection of wild animals is tried, as a part of the punishment, shall revoke the license, stamp, or permit of any person convicted. The license, stamp, or permit fee paid by that person shall not be returned to the person. The person shall not procure or use any other license, stamp, or permit or engage in hunting wild animals or trapping fur-bearing animals during the period of revocation as ordered by the court. No person under sixteen years of age shall engage in hunting unless accompanied by the person's parent or another adult person. Sec. 1533.131. The chief of the division of wildlife may sell gift certificates that may be used to obtain hunting and fishing , pay for, or purchase licenses, fur taker, deer, and wild turkey permits, and wetlands habitat stamps, user fees, and conservation-related items provided for under this chapter or Chapter 1531. of the Revised Code. For the purposes of this section, the The chief shall may adopt rules in accordance with section 1531.10 of the Revised Code doing necessary to administer this section, including all of the following: (A) Providing that a gift certificate may be used to obtain a resident or nonresident hunting license under section 1533.10 of the Revised Code, a resident or nonresident fishing license under section 1533.32 of the Revised Code, a fur taker permit under section 1533.111 of the Revised Code, a deer or wild turkey permit under section 1533.11 of the Revised Code, a wetlands habitat stamp under section 1533.112 of the Revised Code, or a combination of those licenses, permits, and stampsDesignating which licenses, permits, stamps, user fees, and conservation-related items may be obtained, paid for, or purchased with a gift certificate; (B) Prescribing the form for the gift certificates; (C) Authorizing persons who are designated and authorized under section 1533.13 of the Revised Code to sell licenses and permits under this chapter also to sell gift certificates under this section; (D) Establishing fees for the gift certificates, which shall equal the total of the fee for a resident or nonresident hunting license, a resident or nonresident fishing license, a fur taker permit, a deer or wild turkey permit, a wetlands habitat stamp, or a combination of those licenses, permits, and stamp, as applicable, and the fee established under section 1533.13 of the Revised Code; (E) Requiring gift certificates to expire one year after the date of purchase. Nothing in this section or rules adopted under it relieves an individual who receives a gift certificate for a hunting license from complying with the requirement established under section 1533.10 of the Revised Code to present, when applying for the license, a previously held hunting license or evidence of having held such a license in content and manner approved by the chief, a certificate of completion issued upon completion of a hunter education and conservation course approved by the chief, or evidence of equivalent training in content and manner approved by the chief. Nothing in this section or rules adopted under it relieves an individual who receives a gift certificate for a fur taker permit from complying with the requirements established under section 1533.111 of the Revised Code to present, when applying for the permit, a previously held hunting license or trapping or fur taker permit or evidence of having held such a license or permit in content and manner approved by the chief, a certificate of completion issued upon completion of a trapper education course approved by the chief, or evidence of equivalent training in content and manner approved by the chief. Sec. 1533.32. (A) Except as provided in this section or division (A)(2) or (C) of section 1533.12 of the Revised Code or as exempted at the discretion of the chief of the division of wildlife, no person, including nonresidents, shall take or catch any fish by angling in any of the waters in the state or engage in fishing in those waters without a license. No person shall take or catch frogs or turtles without a valid fishing license, except as provided in this section. Persons fishing in privately owned ponds, lakes, or reservoirs to or from which fish are not accustomed to migrate are exempt from the license requirements set forth in this section. Persons fishing in privately owned ponds, lakes, or reservoirs that are open to public fishing through an agreement or lease with the division of wildlife shall comply with the license requirements set forth in this section. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in rules adopted under division (B) of section 1533.12 of the Revised Code, each applicant for a fishing license shall pay a fee for each license in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Annual fishing license – resident $24.00 B Annual fishing license – nonresident that is not a resident of a reciprocal state $49.00 $74.00 C Annual fishing license – nonresident that is a resident of a reciprocal state $24.00 D Annual senior fishing license – resident $9.00 E Three-day tourist fishing license – nonresident that is not a resident of a reciprocal state $24.00 $50.00 F One-day fishing license - resident $13.00 G One-day fishing license - nonresident that is not a resident of a reciprocal state $26.00 H One-day fishing license - nonresident that is a resident of a reciprocal state $13.00 (2) As used in division (B)(1) of this section: (a) "Reciprocal state" means a state that is a party to an agreement under section 1533.91 of the Revised Code. (b) "Senior" means an applicant who is sixty-six years of age or older at the time of application for a license. (3) Any person under the age of sixteen years may take or catch frogs and turtles and take or catch fish by angling without a license. (C)(1) The chief of the division of wildlife may issue a tourist's license expiring three days from the effective date of the license to a resident of a state that is not a party to an agreement under section 1533.91 of the Revised Code. (2) The chief shall adopt rules under section 1531.10 of the Revised Code providing for the issuance of a one-day fishing license to a resident of this state or of any other state. A one-day fishing license shall allow the holder to take or catch fish by angling in the waters in the state, engage in fishing in those waters, or take or catch frogs or turtles in those waters for one day without obtaining an annual license or a tourist's license under this section. At the request of a holder of a one-day fishing license who wishes to obtain an annual license, a clerk or agent authorized to issue licenses under section 1533.13 of the Revised Code, not later than the last day on which the one-day license would be valid if it were an annual license, shall credit the amount of the fee paid for the one-day license toward the fee charged for the annual license if so authorized by the chief. The clerk or agent shall issue the annual license upon presentation of the one-day license and payment of a fee in an amount equal to the difference between the fee for the annual license and the fee for the one-day license. (3) Unless otherwise provided by division rule, each annual license shall begin on the date of issuance and expire a year from the date of issuance. (4) Unless otherwise provided by division rule, each multi-year license issued in accordance with section 1533.321 of the Revised Code shall begin on the date of issuance and expire three years, five years, or ten years from the date of issuance, as applicable. (5) No person shall alter a fishing license or possess a fishing license that has been altered. (6) No person shall procure or attempt to procure a fishing license by fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or any false statement. (7) A resident of this state who owns land over, through, upon, or along which any water flows or stands, except where the land is in or borders on state parks or state-owned lakes, together with the members of the immediate families of such owners, may take frogs and turtles and may take or catch fish of the kind permitted to be taken or caught therefrom without procuring a license provided for in this section. This exemption extends to tenants actually residing upon such lands and to the members of the immediate families of the tenants. A resident of any other state who owns land in this state over, through, upon, or along which any water flows or stands, except where the land is in or borders on state parks or state-owned lakes, and the spouse and children living with the owner, may take frogs and turtles and may take or catch fish of the kind permitted to be taken or caught from that water without obtaining a license under this section, provided that the state of residence of the owner allows residents of this state owning real property in that state, and the spouse and children living with such a property owner, to take frogs and turtles and take or catch fish without a license. If the owner of such land in this state is a limited liability company or a limited liability partnership that consists of three or fewer individual members or partners, as applicable, an individual member or partner who is a resident of this state and the member's or partner's children of any age may take frogs and turtles and may take or catch fish of the kind permitted to be taken or caught therefrom without procuring a license provided for in this section. In addition, if the owner of such land in this state is a trust that has a total of three or fewer trustees and beneficiaries, an individual who is a trustee or beneficiary and who is a resident of this state and the individual's children of any age may take frogs and turtles and may take or catch fish of the kind permitted to be taken or caught therefrom without procuring a license provided for in this section. Residents of state or county institutions, charitable institutions, and military homes in this state may take frogs and turtles without procuring the required license, provided that a member of the institution or home has an identification card, which shall be carried on that person when fishing. (8) Every fisher required to be licensed, while fishing or taking or attempting to take frogs or turtles, shall carry the license and exhibit it to any person. Failure to so carry and exhibit the license constitutes an offense under this section. Sec. 1545.041. (A) Any township park district created pursuant to section 511.18 of the Revised Code that includes park land located outside the township in which the park district was established may be converted under the procedures provided in this section into a park district to be operated and maintained as provided for in this chapter, provided that there is no existing park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code in the county in which the township park district is located. The proposed park district shall include within its boundary all townships and municipal corporations in which lands owned by the township park district seeking conversion are located, and may include any other townships and municipal corporations in the county in which the township park district is located. (B) Conversion of a township park district into a park district operated and maintained under this chapter shall be initiated by a resolution adopted by the board of park commissioners of the park district. Any resolution initiating a conversion shall include the following: (1) The name of the township park district seeking conversion; (2) The name of the proposed park district; (3) An accurate description of the territory to be included in the proposed district; (4) An accurate map or plat of the proposed park district. The resolution may also include a proposed tax levy for the operation and maintenance of the proposed park district. If such a tax levy is proposed, the resolution shall specify the annual rate of the tax, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value and in mills for each dollar of taxable value, and the number of consecutive years the levy will be in effect. The annual rate of such a tax may not be higher than the total combined millage of all levies then in effect for the benefit of the township park district named in the resolution. (C) Upon adoption of the resolution provided for in division (B) of this section, the board of park commissioners of the township park district seeking conversion under this section shall certify the resolution to the county auditor, who shall certify to the board the information required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, in the same manner as required under that section. The board shall certify the resolution and the county auditor's certification to the board of elections of the county in which the park district is located no later than four p.m. of the seventy-fifth day before the day of the election at which the question will be voted upon. Upon certification of the resolution to the board, the board of elections shall make the necessary arrangements to submit the question of conversion of the township park into a park district operated and maintained under Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code, to the electors qualified to vote at the next primary or general election who reside in the territory of the proposed park district. The question shall provide for a tax levy if such a levy is specified in the resolution. (D) The ballot submitted to the electors as provided in division (C) of this section shall contain the following language: "Shall the _______________ (name of the township park district seeking conversion) be converted into a park district to be operated and maintained under Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code under the name of _______________ (name of proposed park district), which park district shall include the following townships and municipal corporations: (Name townships and municipal corporations) Approval of the proposed conversion will result in the termination of all existing tax levies voted for the benefit of _______________ (name of the township park district sought to be converted) and in the levy of a new tax for the operation and maintenance of ______________ (name of proposed park district), that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for _____ (number of years the millage is to be imposed) years, commencing on the ______ (year) tax duplicate. For the proposed conversion Against the proposed conversion " (E) If the proposed conversion is approved by at least a majority of the electors voting on the proposal, the township park district that seeks conversion shall become a park district subject to Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code effective the first day of January following approval by the voters. The park district shall have the name specified in the resolution, and effective the first day of January following approval by the voters, the following shall occur: (1) The indebtedness of the former township park district shall be assumed by the new park district; (2) All rights, assets, properties, and other interests of the former township park district shall become vested in the new park district, including the rights to any tax revenues previously vested in the former township park district; provided, that all tax levies in excess of the ten mill limitation approved for the benefit of the former township park district shall be removed from the tax lists after the February settlement next succeeding the conversion. Any tax levy approved in connection with the conversion shall be certified as provided in section 5705.25 of the Revised Code. (3) The members of the board of park commissioners of the former township park district shall be the members of the board of park commissioners of the new park district, with all the same powers and duties as if appointed under section 1545.05 of the Revised Code. The term of each such commissioner shall expire on the first day of January of the year following the year in which his term would have expired under section 511.19 of the Revised Code. Thereafter, commissioners shall be appointed pursuant to section 1545.05 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" has the same meaning as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1545.21. (A) The board of park commissioners, by resolution, may submit to the electors of the park district the question of levying taxes for the use of the district. The resolution shall declare the necessity of levying such taxes, shall specify the purpose for which such taxes shall be used, the annual rate proposed, and the number of consecutive years the rate shall be levied. Such resolution shall be forthwith certified to the board of elections in each county in which any part of such district is located, not later than the ninetieth day before the day of the election, and the question of the levy of taxes as provided in such resolution shall be submitted to the electors of the district at a special election to be held on whichever of the following occurs first: (1) The day of the next general election; (2) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in May in any calendar year, except that if a presidential primary election is held in that calendar year, then the day of that election. A resolution to renew, renew and increase, or renew and decrease any existing levy shall not be placed on the ballot unless the question is submitted at the general election held during the last year the tax to be renewed may be extended on the tax list, or at any election described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section in the ensuing year. Such a resolution may specify that the renewal, increase, or decrease of the existing levy shall be extended on the tax list for the tax year specified in the resolution, which may be the last year the existing levy may be extended on the list for the ensuing year. If the renewal, increase, or decrease is to be extended on the tax list for the last tax year the existing levy would otherwise be extended, the existing levy shall not be extended on the tax list for that last year unless the question of the renewal, increase, or decrease is not approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, in which case the existing levy shall be extended on the tax list for that last year. Except as otherwise prescribed in division (B) of this section, the ballot shall set forth the purpose for which the taxes shall be levied, the levy's estimated annual collections, the annual rate of levy, expressed in mills for each dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, and the number of years of such levy. If the tax is to be placed on the current tax list, the form of the ballot shall state that the tax will be levied in the current tax year and shall indicate the first calendar year the tax will be due. (B)(1) (B) If the resolution of the board of park commissioners provides that an existing levy will be renewed, increased, or decreased upon the passage of the ballot question, the form of the ballot shall be the same as prescribed for such levies in divisions (B) and (C) of section 5705.25 of the Revised Code. (2) If the resolution of the board of park commissioners provides that an existing levy will be canceled upon the passage of the new levy, the board shall request that the county auditor, in addition to the information the auditor is required to certify under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, certify the effective rate of the existing levy. In such an instance, the ballot must include a statement that: "an existing levy of ___ mills (stating the original levy millage) for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $___ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised value, having ___ years remaining, will be canceled and replaced upon the passage of this levy." In such case, the ballot may refer to the new levy as a "replacement levy" if the new millage does not exceed the original millage of the levy being canceled or as a "replacement and additional levy" if the new millage exceeds the original millage of the levy being canceled. (C) If a majority of the electors voting upon the question of such levy vote in favor thereof, such taxes shall be levied and shall be in addition to the taxes authorized by section 1545.20 of the Revised Code, and all other taxes authorized by law. The rate submitted to the electors at any one time shall not exceed two mills annually upon each dollar of taxable value unless the purpose of the levy includes providing operating revenues for one of Ohio's major metropolitan zoos, as defined in section 4503.74 of the Revised Code, in which case the rate shall not exceed three mills annually upon each dollar of taxable value. When a tax levy has been authorized as provided in this section or in section 1545.041 of the Revised Code, the board of park commissioners may issue bonds pursuant to section 133.24 of the Revised Code in anticipation of the collection of such levy, provided that such bonds shall be issued only for the purpose of acquiring and improving lands. Such levy, when collected, shall be applied in payment of the bonds so issued and the interest thereon. The amount of bonds so issued and outstanding at any time shall not exceed one per cent of the total taxable value in such district. Such bonds shall bear interest at a rate not to exceed the rate determined as provided in section 9.95 of the Revised Code. (D) As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1546.04. (A) Except as provided in this section, the chief of the division of parks and watercraft, with the approval of the director of natural resources, shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are necessary for the proper management of state parks, bodies of water, and the lands adjacent to them under its jurisdiction and control, including rules: (1) Governing opening and closing times and dates of state parks; (2) Establishing fees and charges for use of facilities in state parks; (3) Governing camps, camping, and fees for camps and camping; (4) Governing the application for and rental of, rental fees for, and the use of cottages; (5) Relating to public use of state park lands, and governing the operation of motor vehicles, including speeds and parking on those lands; (6) Governing all advertising within state parks and requirements for the operation of places selling tangible personal property and food service sales on lands and waters under the control of the division. The rules shall establish uniform requirements for those operations and sales. (7) Providing uniform standards relating to the size, type, location, construction, and maintenance of structures and devices used for fishing or moorage of watercraft, rowboats, sailboats, and powercraft over waters under the control of the division and establishing reasonable fees for the construction of, and annual use permits for, those structures and devices; (8) Governing state beaches, swimming, inflatable devices, and fees for them; (9) Governing the removal and disposition of any watercraft, rowboat, sailboat, or powercraft left unattended for more than seven days on any lands or waters under the control of the division; (10) Governing the establishment and collection of check collection charges for checks that are returned to the division or dishonored for any reason; (11) Governing natural resources officers in all parks and bodies of water and lands adjacent to those bodies under the supervision and control of the division as are necessary to the proper management of such parks and bodies of water. (B) The chief shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing a discount program for all persons who are issued a golden buckeye card under section 173.06 of the Revised Code. The discount program shall provide a discount for all park services and rentals, but shall not provide a discount for the purchase of merchandise. (C) The chief, with the approval of the director of natural resources, may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish all of the following: (1) Requirements governing the administration of state parks; (2) Requirements considered necessary by the chief to supplement the identification, operation, titling, use, registration, and numbering of watercraft or vessels as provided in Chapters 1547. and 1548. of the Revised Code; (3) Requirements governing the navigation of vessels on waters in this state, including rules regarding steering and sailing, the conduct of vessels in sight of one another or in restricted visibility, lights and shapes of lights used on vessels, and sound and light signals. As the chief considers necessary, the chief shall ensure that those rules are consistent with and equivalent to the regulations and interpretive rulings governing inland waters adopted or issued under the "Inland Navigational Rules Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 3415, 33 U.S.C. 151, 1604, 1605, 1608, 2001 to 2008, and 2071 to 2073. (4) Requirements and procedures governing vessel safety inspection checkpoints, including procedures that comply with statutory and constitutional provisions governing searches and seizures by law enforcement officers; (5) Fees and charges for all of the following: (a) Boating skill development classes and other educational classes; (b) Law enforcement services provided at special events when the services are in addition to normal enforcement duties; (c) Inspections of vessels or motors conducted under Chapter 1547. or Chapter 1548. of the Revised Code. (D) The chief shall not adopt rules under this section establishing fees or charges for parking a motor vehicle in a state park or for admission to a state park. (E) If the chief adopts rules under this section for the issuance of a permit for preventing or limiting ice formation on the surface of water that is located in a state park on property owned or managed by the division, the chief shall not levy a fee for the issuance of the permit. Sec. 1546.25. The park lodges, maintenance, and repair fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money received from contractual agreements with service providers and concessionaires for state park lodges, restaurants, and marinas. The chief of the division of parks and watercraft shall use money in the fund to pay maintenance and repair costs for facilities operated by concessionaires and service providers at state park lodges, restaurants, and marinas. Sec. 1546.26. The parks and watercraft holding fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money received by the division of parks and watercraft from gift card sales, credit card sales, and sales conducted at field locations. With regard to gift card sales, the chief of the division of parks and watercraft shall transfer money in the parks and watercraft holding fund to the appropriate fund after gift certificates and gift cards are redeemed. Sec. 1547.54. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 1547.542 of the Revised Code, the owner of every watercraft requiring registration under this chapter shall file an application for a triennial registration certificate with the chief of the division of parks and watercraft on forms that shall be provided by the chief or by an electronic means approved by the chief. The application shall be signed by the following: (a) If the watercraft is owned by two persons under joint ownership with right of survivorship established under section 2131.12 of the Revised Code, by both of those persons as owners of the watercraft. The signatures may be done by electronic signature if the owners themselves are renewing the registration and there are no changes in the registration information since the issuance of the immediately preceding registration certificate. In all other instances, the signatures shall be done manually. (b) If the watercraft is owned by a minor, by the minor and a parent or legal guardian. The signatures may be done by electronic signature if the parent or legal guardian and the minor themselves are renewing the registration and there are no changes in the registration information since the issuance of the immediately preceding registration certificate. In all other instances, the signatures shall be done manually. (c) In all other cases, by the owner of the watercraft. The signature may be done by electronic signature if the owner is renewing the registration personally and there are no changes in the registration information since the issuance of the immediately preceding registration certificate. In all other instances, the signatures shall be done manually. (2) An application for a triennial registration of a watercraft filed under division (A)(1) of this section shall be accompanied by the following fee: (a) For canoes, rowboats, and inflatable watercraft that are numbered under section 1547.53 of the Revised Code, twelve dollars; (b) For canoes, row boats, and inflatable watercraft that are not numbered under section 1547.53 of the Revised Code, seventeen dollars; (c) For class A watercraft, including motorized canoes,thirty dollars; (d) For class 1 watercraft, forty-five dollars; (e) For class 2 watercraft, sixty dollars; (f) For class 3 watercraft, seventy-five dollars; (g) For class 4 watercraft, ninety dollars. (3) For the purpose of registration, any watercraft operated by means of power, sail, or any other mechanical or electrical means of propulsion, except motorized canoes,shall be registered by length as prescribed in this section. (4) If an application for registration is filed by two persons as owners under division (A)(1)(a) of this section, the person who is listed first on the title shall serve as and perform the duties of the "owner" and shall be considered the person "in whose name the watercraft is registered" for purposes of divisions (B) to (R) of this section and for purposes of all other sections in this chapter. (B) All registration certificates issued under this section are valid for three years and are renewable on a triennial basis unless sooner terminated or discontinued in accordance with this chapter. The renewal date shall be printed on the registration certificate. A registration certificate may be renewed by the owner in the manner prescribed by the chief. All fees shall be charged according to a proration of the time remaining in the registration cycle to the nearest year. (C) In addition to the fees set forth in this section, the chief, or any authorized agent, shall charge an additional writing fee of three dollars for any registration certificate the chief or authorized agent issues. When the registration certificate is issued by an authorized agent, the additional writing fee of three dollars shall be retained by the issuing agent. When the registration certificate is issued by the chief, the additional writing fee of three dollars shall be deposited to the credit of the waterways safety fund established in section 1547.75 of the Revised Code. (D) In addition to the fees established in this section, watercraft that are not powercraft shall be charged a waterways conservation assessment fee of five dollars. The fee shall be collected at the time of the issuance of a triennial watercraft registration under division (A)(2) of this section and deposited in the state treasury and credited to a distinct account in the waterways safety fund created in section 1547.75 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Upon receipt of the application in approved form, the chief shall enter the same upon the records of the office of the division of parks and watercraft, assign a number to the watercraft if a number is required under section 1547.53 of the Revised Code, and issue to the applicant a registration certificate. If a number is assigned by the chief, it shall be set forth on the certificate. The registration certificate, in physical or digital form, shall be on the watercraft for which it is issued and available at all times for inspection whenever the watercraft is in operation, except that livery operators may retain the registration certificate at the livery where it shall remain available for inspection at all times and except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2) of this section. (2) A person who is operating on the waters of this state a canoe, kayak, rowboat, or inflatable watercraft meeting the definition of a paddlecraft that has not been numbered under section 1547.53 of the Revised Code and who is stopped by a law enforcement officer in the enforcement of this chapter or rules shall present to the officer, not later than seventy-two hours after being stopped, a registration certificate, in physical or digital form. The registration certificate shall have been obtained under this section for the canoe, kayak, rowboat, or inflatable watercraft meeting the definition of a paddlecraft prior to the time that it was stopped. Failure of the person to present the registration certificate within seventy-two hours constitutes prima-facie evidence of a violation of this section. (F) No person shall issue or be issued a registration certificate for a watercraft that is required to be issued a certificate of title under Chapter 1548. of the Revised Code except upon presentation of a certificate of title for the watercraft as provided in that chapter, proof of current documentation by the United States coast guard, a renewal registration form provided by the division of parks and watercraft, or a certificate of registration issued under this section that has expired if there is no change in the ownership or description of the watercraft. (G) Whenever the ownership of a watercraft changes, a new application form together with the prescribed fee shall be filed with the chief or the chief's agent and a new registration certificate shall be issued. The application shall be signed manually by the person or persons specified in divisions (A)(1)(a) to (c) of this section and shall be accompanied by a two-dollar transfer fee. Any remaining time on the registration shall be transferred. An authorized agent of the chief shall charge an additional writing fee of three dollars, which shall be retained by the issuing agent. If the certificate is issued by the chief, an additional writing fee of three dollars for each certificate issued shall be collected and deposited to the credit of the waterways safety fund. (H) If an agency of the United States has in force an overall system of identification numbering for watercraft or certain types of watercraft within the United States, the numbering system employed by the division shall be in conformity with that system. (I)(1) The chief may assign any registration certificates to any authorized agent for the assignment of the registration certificates. If a person accepts that authorization, the person may be assigned a block of numbers and certificates that upon assignment, in conformity with this chapter and Chapter 1548. of the Revised Code and with rules, shall be valid as if assigned directly by the division. Any person so designated as an agent by the chief shall post with the division security as may be required by the director of natural resources. The chief may issue an order temporarily or permanently restricting or suspending an agent's authorization without a hearing if the chief finds that the agent has violated this chapter or Chapter 1548. of the Revised Code, rules, or any agreements prescribed by the chief. (2) A clerk of the court of common pleas may apply for designation as an authorized agent of the chief. The division shall accept the clerk's bond that is required under section 2303.02 of the Revised Code for any security that is required for agents under this division, provided that the bond includes a rider or other provision specifically covering the clerk's duties as an authorized agent of the chief. (J) All records of the division made or kept pursuant to this section shall be public records. Those records shall be available for inspection at reasonable hours and in a manner compatible with normal operations of the division. (K) The owner shall furnish the division notice within fifteen days of the following: (1) The transfer, other than through the creation of a security interest in any watercraft, of all or any part of the owner's interest or, if the watercraft is owned by two persons under joint ownership with right of survivorship established under section 2131.12 of the Revised Code, of all or any part of the joint interest of either of the two persons. The transfer shall not terminate the registration certificate. (2) Any change in the address appearing on the certificate. As a part of the notification, the owner shall furnish the chief with the owner's new address. (3) The destruction or abandonment of the watercraft. (L) The chief may issue duplicate registration certificates or duplicate tags to owners of currently registered watercraft, the fee for which shall be four dollars. (M) If the chief finds that a registration certificate previously issued to an owner is in error to a degree that would impair its basic purpose and use, the chief may issue a corrected certificate to the owner without charge. (N) No authorized agent shall issue and no person shall receive or accept from an authorized agent a registration certificate assigned to the authorized agent under division (I) of this section unless the exact month, day, and year of issue are plainly written on the certificate by the agent. Certificates issued with incorrect dates of issue are void from the time they are issued. (O) The chief, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules governing the renewal of watercraft registrations by electronic means. (P) As used in this section: (1) "Disabled veteran" means a person who is included in either of the following categories: (a) Because of a service-connected disability, has been or is awarded funds for the purchase of a motor vehicle under the "Disabled Veterans' and Servicemen's Automobile Assistance Act of 1970," 84 Stat. 1998, 38 U.S.C. 1901, and amendments thereto; (b) Has a service-connected disability rated at one hundred per cent by the veterans administration. (2) "Prisoner of war" means any regularly appointed, enrolled, enlisted, or inducted member of the military forces of the United States who was captured, separated, and incarcerated by an enemy of the United States at any time, and any regularly appointed, enrolled, or enlisted member of the military forces of Great Britain, France, Australia, Belgium, Brazil, Canada, China, Denmark, Greece, the Netherlands, New Zealand, Norway, Poland, South Africa, or the republics formerly associated with the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics or Yugoslavia who was a citizen of the United States at the time of the appointment, enrollment, or enlistment, and was captured, separated, and incarcerated by an enemy of this country during World War II. (Q) Any disabled veteran, congressional medal of honor awardee, or prisoner of war may apply to the chief for a certificate of registration, or for a renewal of the certificate of registration, without the payment of any fee required by this section. The application for a certificate of registration shall be accompanied by evidence of disability or by documentary evidence in support of a congressional medal of honor that the chief requires by rule. The application for a certificate of registration by any person who has been a prisoner of war shall be accompanied by written evidence in the form of a record of separation, a letter from one of the armed forces of a country listed in division (P)(2) of this section, or other evidence that the chief may require by rule, that the person was honorably discharged or is currently residing in this state on active duty with one of the branches of the armed forces of the United States, or was a prisoner of war and was honorably discharged or received an equivalent discharge or release from one of the armed forces of a country listed in division (P)(2) of this section. (R) Annually by the fifteenth day of January, the director of natural resources shall determine the amount of fees that would have been collected in the prior calendar year for each certificate of registration issued or renewed pursuant to division (Q) of this section and shall certify the total amount of foregone revenue to the director of budget and management for reimbursement. The director of budget and management shall transfer the amount certified from the general revenue fund to the waterways safety fund. Sec. 1548.06. (A)(1) Application for a certificate of title for a watercraft or outboard motor shall be made upon a form prescribed by the chief of the division of parks and watercraft and shall be sworn to before a notary public or other officer empowered to administer oaths. The application shall be filed with the clerk of any court of common pleas. An application for a certificate of title may be filed electronically by any electronic means approved by the chief in any county with the clerk of the court of common pleas of that county. The application shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in section 1548.10 of the Revised Code. The fee shall be retained by the clerk who issues the certificate of title and shall be distributed in accordance with that section. If a clerk of a court of common pleas, other than the clerk of the court of common pleas of an applicant's county of residence, issues a certificate of title to the applicant, the clerk shall transmit data related to the transaction to the automated title processing system. (2) If a certificate of title previously has been issued for the watercraft or outboard motor, the application for a certificate of title also shall be accompanied by the certificate of title duly assigned unless otherwise provided in this chapter. If a certificate of title previously has not been issued for the watercraft or outboard motor in this state, the application, unless otherwise provided in this chapter, shall be accompanied by a manufacturer's or importer's certificate; by a sworn statement of ownership if the watercraft or outboard motor was purchased by the applicant on or before October 9, 1963, or if the watercraft is less than fourteen feet long with a permanently affixed mechanical means of propulsion and was purchased by the applicant on or before January 1, 2000; or by a certificate of title, bill of sale, or other evidence of ownership required by the law of another state from which the watercraft or outboard motor was brought into this state. Evidence of ownership of a watercraft or outboard motor for which an Ohio certificate of title previously has not been issued and which watercraft or outboard motor does not have permanently affixed to it a manufacturer's serial number shall be accompanied by the certificate of assignment of a hull identification number assigned by the chief as provided in section 1548.07 of the Revised Code. (3) The clerk shall retain the evidence of title presented by the applicant and on which the certificate of title is issued, except that, if an application for a certificate of title is filed electronically, by a vendor on behalf of a purchaser of a watercraft or outboard motor, the clerk shall retain the completed electronic record to which the vendor converted the certificate of title application and other required documents. The chief, after consultation with the attorney general, shall adopt rules that govern the location at which, and the manner in which, are stored the actual application and all other documents relating to the sale of a watercraft or outboard motor when a vendor files the application for a certificate of title electronically on behalf of a purchaser. (B) The clerk shall use reasonable diligence in ascertaining whether the facts in the application are true by checking the application and documents accompanying it or the electronic record to which a vendor converted the application and accompanying documents with the records of watercraft and outboard motors in the clerk's office. If the clerk is satisfied that the applicant is the owner of the watercraft or outboard motor and that the application is in the proper form, the clerk shall issue a physical certificate of title over the clerk's signature and sealed with the clerk's seal unless the applicant specifically requests the clerk not to issue a physical certificate of title and instead to issue an electronic certificate of title. However, if the evidence indicates and an investigation shows that one or more Ohio titles already exist for the watercraft or outboard motor, the chief may cause the redundant title or titles to be canceled. (C) In the case of the sale of a watercraft or outboard motor by a vendor to a general purchaser or user, the certificate of title shall be obtained in the name of the purchaser by the vendor upon application signed by the purchaser. In all other cases, the certificate shall be obtained by the purchaser. In all cases of transfer of watercraft or outboard motors, the application for certificate of title shall be filed within thirty days after the later of the date of purchase or assignment of ownership of the watercraft or outboard motor. If the application for certificate of title is not filed within thirty days after the later of the date of purchase or assignment of ownership of the watercraft or outboard motor, the clerk shall charge a late penalty fee of five dollars in addition to the fee prescribed by section 1548.10 of the Revised Code. The clerk shall retain the entire amount of each late penalty fee. (D) The clerk shall refuse to accept an application for certificate of title unless the applicant either tenders with the application payment of all taxes levied by or pursuant to Chapter 5739. or 5741. of the Revised Code based on the applicant's county of residence less, in the case of a sale by a vendor, any discount to which the vendor is entitled under section 5739.12 of the Revised Code, or submits any of the following: (1) A receipt issued by the tax commissioner or a clerk of courts showing payment of the tax; (2) A copy of the unit certificate of exemption completed by the purchaser at the time of sale as provided in section 5739.03 of the Revised Code; (3) An exemption certificate, in a form prescribed by the tax commissioner, that specifies why the purchase is not subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5739. or 5741. of the Revised Code. Payment of the tax shall be in accordance with rules issued by the tax commissioner, and the clerk shall issue a receipt in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner to any applicant who tenders payment of the tax with the application for the certificate of title. (E)(1) For receiving and disbursing the taxes paid to the clerk by a resident of the clerk's county, the clerk may retain a poundage fee of one and one one-hundredth per cent of the taxes collected, which shall be paid into the certificate of title administration fund created by section 325.33 of the Revised Code. The clerk shall not retain a poundage fee from payments of taxes by persons who do not reside in the clerk's county. (2) A clerk, however, may retain from the taxes paid to the clerk an amount equal to the poundage fees associated with certificates of title issued by other clerks of courts of common pleas to applicants who reside in the first clerk's county. The chief of the division of parks and watercraft, in consultation with the tax commissioner and the clerks of the courts of common pleas, shall develop a report from the automated title processing system that informs each clerk of the amount of the poundage fees that the clerk is permitted to retain from those taxes because of certificates of title issued by the clerks of other counties to applicants who reside in the first clerk's county. (F) In the case of casual sales of watercraft or outboard motors that are subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5739. or 5741. of the Revised Code, the purchase price for the purpose of determining the tax shall be the purchase price on an affidavit executed and filed with the clerk by the vendor on a form to be prescribed by the chief, which shall be prima-facie evidence of the price for the determination of the tax. In addition to the information required by section 1548.08 of the Revised Code, each certificate of title shall contain in bold lettering the following notification and statements: "WARNING TO TRANSFEROR AND TRANSFEREE (SELLER AND BUYER). You are required by law to state the true selling price. A false statement is a violation of section 2921.13 of the Revised Code and is punishable by six months imprisonment or a fine of up to one thousand dollars, or both. All transfers are audited by the department of taxation. The seller and buyer must provide any information requested by the department of taxation. The buyer may be assessed any additional tax found to be due." (G) Each county clerk of courts shall forward to the tax commissioner registrar of motor vehicles, in a manner prescribed by the tax commissioner, all sales and use tax collections resulting from sales of titled watercraft and outboard motors during a calendar week on or before the Friday following the close of that week. If, on any Friday, the offices of the clerk of courts or the state are not open for business, the tax shall be forwarded to the commissioner registrar on or before the next day on which the offices are open. Every remittance of tax under this division shall be accompanied by a remittance report in such form as the commissioner, in consultation with the director of public safety, prescribes. If the tax due for any week is not remitted by a clerk of courts as required under this division, the clerk shall forfeit the poundage fees for the sales made during that week. The commissioner may require the clerks of courts to transmit tax collections and remittance reports electronically. (H) For purposes of a transfer of a certificate of title, if the clerk is satisfied that a secured party has discharged a lien but has not canceled the lien notation with a clerk, the clerk may cancel the lien notation on the automated title processing system and notify the clerk of the county of origin. (I) Every clerk shall have the capability to transact by electronic means all procedures and transactions relating to the issuance of watercraft or outboard motor certificates of title that are described in the Revised Code as being accomplished by electronic means. Sec. 1561.13. The chief of the division of mineral resources management shall conduct examinations for offices and positions in the division of mineral resources management, and for mine forepersons, mine electricians, shot firers, and surface mine blasters, and fire bosses, as follows: (A) Division of mineral resources management: (1) Deputy mine inspectors of underground mines; (2) Deputy mine inspectors of surface mines; (3) Electrical inspectors; (4) Superintendent of rescue stations; (5) Assistant superintendents of rescue stations; (6) Mine chemists at a division laboratory if the chief chooses to operate a laboratory. (B) Mine forepersons: (1) Mine foreperson of gaseous mines; (2) Mine foreperson of nongaseous mines; (3) Mine foreperson of surface mines. (C) Forepersons: (1) Foreperson of gaseous mines; (2) Foreperson of nongaseous mines; (3) Foreperson of surface maintenance facilities at underground or surface mines; (4) Foreperson of surface mines. (D) Fire bosses. (E) Mine electricians. (F)(E) Surface mine blasters. (G) Shot firers. The chief annually shall provide for the examination of candidates for appointment or promotion as deputy mine inspectors and such other positions and offices set forth in division (A) of this section as are necessary. Special examinations may be held whenever it becomes necessary to make appointments to any of those positions. The chief shall provide for the examination of persons seeking certificates of competency as mine forepersons, forepersons, mine electricians, shot firers, and surface mine blasters, and fire bosses quarterly or more often as required, needed and at such times and places within the state as shall, in the judgment of the chief, afford the best facilities to the greatest number of applicants. Public notice shall be given through the press or otherwise, not less than ten days in advance, announcing the time and place at which examinations under this section are to be held. The examinations provided for in this section shall be conducted under rules adopted under section 1561.05 of the Revised Code and conditions prescribed by the chief. Any rules that relate to particular candidates shall, upon application of any candidate, be furnished to the candidate by the chief; they shall also be of uniform application to all candidates in the several groups. Sec. 1561.16. (A) As used in this section and sections 1561.17 to 1561.21 1561.20 of the Revised Code, "actual practical experience" means previous employment that involved a person's regular presence in the type of mining operation in which the experience is required to exist; participation in functions relating to the hazards involved in and the utilization of equipment, tools, and work crews and individuals for that type of mining; and regular exposure to the methods, procedures, and safety laws applicable to that type of mining. Credit of up to one year for a portion of the required experience time may be given upon documentation to the chief of the division of mineral resources management of an educational degree in a field related to mining. Credit of up to two years of the required experience time may be given upon presentation to the chief of proof of graduation from an accredited school of mines or mining after a four-year course of study with employment in the mining industry during interim breaks during the school years. (B) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, a person who applies for a certificate as a mine foreperson of gaseous mines shall be able to read and write the English language; shall have had at least five years' actual practical experience in the underground workings of a gaseous mine or the equivalent thereof in the judgment of the chief; and shall have had practical experience obtained by actual contact with gas in mines and have knowledge of the dangers and nature of noxious and explosive gases and ventilation of gaseous mines. An applicant for a certificate as a foreperson of gaseous mines shall meet the same requirements, except that the applicant shall have had at least three years' actual practical experience in the underground workings of a gaseous mine or the equivalent thereof in the judgment of the chief. Each applicant for examination shall pay a fee established in rules adopted under this section to the chief on the first day of such examination. (C) A person who has been issued a certificate as a mine foreperson or a foreperson of a gaseous mine and who has not worked in an underground coal mine for a period of more than two calendar years shall apply for and obtain recertification from the chief in accordance with rules adopted under this section before performing the duties of a mine foreperson or a foreperson of a gaseous mine. An applicant for recertification shall pay a fee established in rules adopted under this section at the time of application for recertification. (D) A person who has been issued a certificate as a mine foreperson or a foreperson of a gaseous mine and who has not worked in an underground coal mine for a period of one or more calendar years shall successfully complete a retraining course in accordance with rules adopted under this section before performing the duties of a mine foreperson or a foreperson of a gaseous mine. (E) The chief, in consultation with a statewide association representing the coal mining industry and a statewide association representing employees of coal mines, shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that do all of the following: (1) Prescribe requirements, criteria, and procedures for the recertification of a mine foreperson or a foreperson of a gaseous mine who has not worked in an underground coal mine for a period of more than two calendar years; (2) Prescribe requirements, criteria, and procedures for the retraining of a mine foreperson or a foreperson of a gaseous mine who has not worked in an underground coal mine for a period of one or more calendar years; (3) Establish fees for the examination and recertification of mine forepersons or forepersons of gaseous mines under this section; (4) Prescribe any other requirements, criteria, and procedures that the chief determines are necessary to administer this section. (F) Any money collected under this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the mining regulation and safety fund created in section 1513.30 of the Revised Code. (G) The chief shall issue a certificate as a foreperson of gaseous mines in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license or certificate in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a foreperson of gaseous mines in a state that does not issue that license or certificate. Sec. 1561.23. (A) The chief of the division of mineral resources management shall issue the following certificates to those applicants who pass their examination: (1) Certificates for mine forepersons of gaseous mines; (2) Certificates for mine forepersons of nongaseous mines; (3) Certificates for forepersons of gaseous mines; (4) Certificates for forepersons of nongaseous mines; (5) Certificates for forepersons of surface maintenance facilities of underground or surface mines; (6) Certificates for mine forepersons of surface mines; (7)(6) Certificates for forepersons of surface mines; (8) Certificates for fire bosses; (9)(7) Certificates for mine electricians; (10)(8) Certificates for surface mine blasters; (11) Certificates for shot firers. (B) Applicants for certificates shall make application to the chief, on a form provided by the chief, for examination. All applicants shall be able to read and write the English language intelligently, and shall furnish the chief with a certificate as to the length and description of their practical experience and satisfactory evidence of their ability to perform the duties of the position for which they make application for examination. (C) The chief may issue a certificate to an applicant for mine foreperson, foreperson, or mine electrician who holds a valid certification or other authorization from a state with which the department of natural resources has a reciprocal agreement for the certification or other authorization. However, the applicant shall pass an examination on this chapter and rules adopted under it or on any other relevant material that the chief determines to be appropriate. A mine foreperson, foreperson, or mine electrician who has been issued a temporary certificate under section 1565.06 of the Revised Code prior to the effective date of this amendment September 30, 2021, and who holds a valid certification or other authorization from a state with which the department has a reciprocal agreement for the certification or other authorization may continue to operate under the temporary certificate until it expires or the chief suspends or revokes it. (D) Except as provided in sections 1561.16 and 1561.17 of the Revised Code, any certificate issued by the former mine examining board prior to October 29, 1995, shall remain in effect notwithstanding the new classifications of certificates established by this section. Sec. 1561.46. Fees received by the chief of the division of mineral resources management under sections 1561.16 to 1561.22 1561.20 of the Revised Code shall be paid by the chief into the state treasury to the credit of the mining regulation and safety fund created in section 1513.30 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1561.48. All money collected under sections 1561.14, 1561.16, 1561.17, 1561.18, 1561.19, 1561.20, 1561.21, 1561.22, 1561.45, and 1561.46 of the Revised Code shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the mining regulation and safety fund created by section 1513.30 of the Revised Code. The department of natural resources shall use the money in the fund to pay the operating expenses of the division of mineral resources management. Sec. 1701.04. (A) Any person, singly or jointly with others, and without regard to residence, domicile, or state of incorporation, may form a corporation by signing and filing with the secretary of state articles of incorporation that shall set forth all of the following: (1) The name of the corporation, which shall be in compliance with division (A) of section 1701.05 of the Revised Code; (2) The place in this state where the principal office of the corporation is to be located; (3) The authorized number and the par value per share of shares with par value, and the authorized number of shares without par value, except that the articles of a banking, safe deposit, trust, or insurance corporation shall not authorize shares without par value; the express terms, if any, of the shares; and, if the shares are classified, the designation of each class, the authorized number and par value per share, if any, of the shares of each class, and the express terms of the shares of each class; (4) If the corporation is to have an initial stated capital, the amount of that stated capital. (B) The articles also may set forth any of the following: (1) The names of the individuals who are to serve as initial directors; (2) The purpose or purposes for which the corporation is formed, but in the absence of a statement of the purpose or purposes or except as expressly set forth in such statement, the purpose for which any corporation is formed is to engage in any lawful act or activity for which a corporation may be formed under this chapter, and all lawful acts and activities of the corporation are within the purposes of the corporation; (3) Any priority or other method for balancing the purposes for which the corporation is formed; (4) Any lawful provision for the purpose of defining, limiting, or regulating the exercise of the authority of the corporation, the incorporators, the directors, the officers, the shareholders, or the holders of any class of shares; (5) Any provision that may be set forth in the regulations; (6) A provision specifying the period of existence of the corporation if it is to be otherwise than perpetual; (7) A provision eliminating the right of every shareholder to vote cumulatively in the election of directors; (8) Any additional provision permitted by this chapter. (C) A written appointment of a statutory agent for the purposes set forth in section 1701.07 of the Revised Code shall be filed with the articles, unless the corporation belongs to one of the classes mentioned in division (O)(N) of that section. (D) The legal existence of the corporation begins upon the filing of the articles or on a later date specified in the articles that is not more than ninety days after filing, and, unless the articles otherwise provide, its period of existence shall be perpetual. Sec. 1701.07. (A) Every corporation shall have and maintain an agent, sometimes referred to as the "statutory agent," upon whom any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by statute to be served upon a corporation may be served. The agent shall be one of the following: (1) A natural person who is a resident of this state; (2) A domestic or foreign corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited partnership association, professional association, business trust, or unincorporated nonprofit association that has a business address in this state. If the agent is an entity other than a domestic corporation, the agent shall meet the requirements of Title XVII of the Revised Code for an entity of the agent's type to transact business or exercise privileges in this state. (B) The secretary of state shall not accept original articles for filing unless there is filed with the articles a written appointment of an agent that is signed by the incorporators of the corporation or a majority of them and a written acceptance of the appointment that is signed by the agent. In all other cases, the corporation shall appoint the agent and shall file in the office of the secretary of state a written appointment of the agent that is signed by any authorized officer of the corporation and a written acceptance of the appointment that is either the original acceptance signed by the agent or a photocopy, facsimile, or similar reproduction of the original acceptance signed by the agent. (C)(1) The written appointment of an agent shall set forth the name and address in this state of the agent, including the street and number of the agent's primary residence in this state or, if the agent is not a natural person, the agent's usual place of business in this state, and shall otherwise be in such form as the secretary of state prescribes. The secretary of state shall keep a record of the names of corporations, and the names and addresses of their respective agents. (2) As used in division (C)(1) of this section, "usual place of business" means a place in this state that is customarily open during normal business hours and where an individual is generally present who is authorized to perform the services of a registered agent, including accepting service of process and other notifications for the person serving as a statutory agent. "Usual place of business" does not include a post office box, regardless of whether that post office box has an associated street address. (D) If any agent dies, removes from the state, or resigns, the corporation shall forthwith appoint another agent and file with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a written appointment of the agent. (E) If the agent changes the agent's address from that appearing upon the record in the office of the secretary of state, the corporation or the agent shall forthwith file with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a written statement setting forth the new address. (F) An agent may resign by filing with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a written notice to that effect that is signed by the agent and by sending a copy of the notice to the corporation at the current or last known address of its principal office on or prior to the date the notice is filed with the secretary of state. The notice shall set forth the name of the corporation, the name and current address of the agent, the current or last known address, including the street and number or other particular description, of the corporation's principal office, the resignation of the agent, and a statement that a copy of the notice has been sent to the corporation within the time and in the manner prescribed by this division. Upon the expiration of thirty days after the filing, the authority of the agent shall terminate. (G) A corporation may revoke the appointment of an agent by filing with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a written appointment of another agent and a statement that the appointment of the former agent is revoked. (H) Any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by statute to be served upon a corporation may be served upon the corporation by delivering a copy of it to its agent, if a natural person, or by delivering a copy of it at the address of its agent in this state, as the address appears upon the record in the office of the secretary of state. If (1) the agent cannot be found, or (2) the agent no longer has that address, or (3) the corporation has failed to maintain an agent as required by this section, and if in any such case the party desiring that the process, notice, or demand be served, or the agent or representative of the party, shall have filed with the secretary of state an affidavit stating that one of the foregoing conditions exists and stating the most recent address of the corporation that the party after diligent search has been able to ascertain, then service of process, notice, or demand upon the secretary of state, as the agent of the corporation, may be initiated by delivering to the secretary of state or at the secretary of state's office quadruplicate copies of such process, notice, or demand and by paying to the secretary of state a fee of five dollars. The secretary of state shall forthwith give notice of the delivery to the corporation at its principal office as shown upon the record in the secretary of state's office and at any different address shown on its last franchise tax report filed in this state, or to the corporation at any different address set forth in the above mentioned affidavit, and shall forward to the corporation at said addresses, by certified mail, with request for return receipt, a copy of the process, notice, or demand; and thereupon service upon the corporation shall be deemed to have been made. (I) The secretary of state shall keep a record of each process, notice, and demand delivered to the secretary of state or at the secretary of state's office under this section or any other law of this state that authorizes service upon the secretary of state, and shall record the time of the delivery and the action thereafter with respect thereto. (J) This section does not limit or affect the right to serve any process, notice, or demand upon a corporation in any other manner permitted by law. (K) Every corporation shall state in each annual report filed by it with the department of taxation the name and address of its statutory agent. (L) Except when an original appointment of an agent is filed with the original articles, a written appointment of an agent or a written statement filed by a corporation with the secretary of state shall be signed by any authorized officer of the corporation or by the incorporators of the corporation or a majority of them if no directors have been elected. (M) (L) For filing a written appointment of an agent other than one filed with original articles, and for filing a statement of change of address of an agent, the secretary of state shall charge and collect the fee specified in division (R) of section 111.16 of the Revised Code. (N) (M) Upon the failure of a corporation to appoint another agent or to file a statement of change of address of an agent, the secretary of state shall give notice thereof by ordinary or electronic mail to the corporation at the electronic mail address provided to the secretary of state, or at the address set forth in the notice of resignation or on the last franchise tax return filed in this state by the corporation. Unless the default is cured within thirty days after the mailing by the secretary of state of the notice or within any further period of time that the secretary of state grants, upon the expiration of that period of time from the date of the mailing, the articles of the corporation shall be canceled without further notice or action by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall make a notation of the cancellation on the secretary of state's records. A corporation whose articles have been canceled may be reinstated by filing, within two years of the cancellation, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, an application for reinstatement and the required appointment of agent or required statement, and by paying the filing fee specified in division (Q) of section 111.16 of the Revised Code. The rights, privileges, and franchises of a corporation whose articles have been reinstated are subject to section 1701.922 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall furnish the tax commissioner a monthly list of all corporations canceled and reinstated under this division. (O) (N) This section does not apply to banks, trust companies, insurance companies, or any corporation defined under the laws of this state as a public utility for taxation purposes. Sec. 1703.041. (A) Every foreign corporation for profit that is licensed to transact business in this state, and every foreign nonprofit corporation that is licensed to exercise its privileges in this state, shall have and maintain an agent, sometimes referred to as the "designated agent," upon whom process against the corporation may be served within this state. The agent shall be one of the following: (1) A natural person who is a resident of this state; (2) A domestic or foreign corporation, nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited partnership association, professional association, business trust, or unincorporated nonprofit association that has a business address in this state. If the agent is an entity other than a domestic corporation, the agent shall meet the requirements of Title XVII of the Revised Code for an entity of the agent's type to transact business or exercise privileges in this state. (B)(1) The written appointment of a designated agent shall set forth the name and address of the agent, including the street and number of the agent's primary residence in this state or, if the agent is not a natural person, the agent's usual place of business in this state, and shall otherwise be in such form as the secretary of state prescribes. The secretary of state shall keep a record of the names of such foreign corporations and the names and addresses of their respective agents. (2) As used in division (B)(1) of this section, "usual place of business" means a place in this state that is customarily open during normal business hours and where an individual is generally present who is authorized to perform the services of a registered agent, including accepting service of process and other notifications for the person serving as a statutory agent. "Usual place of business" does not include a post office box, regardless of whether that post office box has an associated street address. (C) If the designated agent dies, removes from the state, or resigns, the foreign corporation shall forthwith appoint another agent and file in the office of the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a written appointment of the new agent. (D) If the designated agent changes the agent's address from that appearing upon the record in the office of the secretary of state, the foreign corporation or the designated agent in its behalf shall forthwith file with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a written statement setting forth the agent's new address. (E) A designated agent may resign by filing with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a signed statement to that effect. The secretary of state shall forthwith mail a copy of the statement to the foreign corporation at its principal office as shown by the record in the secretary of state's office. Upon the expiration of sixty days after the filing, the authority of the agent shall terminate. (F) A foreign corporation may revoke the appointment of a designated agent by filing with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a written appointment of another agent and a statement that the appointment of the former agent is revoked. (G) Process may be served upon a foreign corporation by delivering a copy of it to its designated agent, if a natural person, or by delivering a copy of it at the address of its agent in this state, as the address appears upon the record in the office of the secretary of state. (H) This section does not limit or affect the right to serve process upon a foreign corporation in any other manner permitted by law. (I) Every foreign corporation for profit shall state in each annual report filed by it with the department of taxation the name and address of its designated agent in this state. Sec. 1707.01. As used in this chapter: (A) Whenever the context requires it, "division" or "division of securities" may be read as "director of commerce" or as "commissioner of securities." (B) "Security" means any certificate or instrument, or any oral, written, or electronic agreement, understanding, or opportunity, that represents title to or interest in, or is secured by any lien or charge upon, the capital, assets, profits, property, or credit of any person or of any public or governmental body, subdivision, or agency. It includes shares of stock, certificates for shares of stock, an uncertificated security, membership interests in limited liability companies, voting-trust certificates, warrants and options to purchase securities, subscription rights, interim receipts, interim certificates, promissory notes, all forms of commercial paper, evidences of indebtedness, bonds, debentures, land trust certificates, fee certificates, leasehold certificates, syndicate certificates, endowment certificates, interests in or under profit-sharing or participation agreements, interests in or under oil, gas, or mining leases, preorganization or reorganization subscriptions, preorganization certificates, reorganization certificates, interests in any trust or pretended trust, any investment contract, any life settlement interest, any instrument evidencing a promise or an agreement to pay money, warehouse receipts for intoxicating liquor, and the currency of any government other than those of the United States and Canada, but sections 1707.01 to 1707.50 of the Revised Code do not apply to the sale of real estate. (C)(1) "Sale" has the full meaning of "sale" as applied by or accepted in courts of law or equity, and includes every disposition, or attempt to dispose, of a security or of an interest in a security. "Sale" also includes a contract to sell, an exchange, an attempt to sell, an option of sale, a solicitation of a sale, a solicitation of an offer to buy, a subscription, or an offer to sell, directly or indirectly, by agent, circular, pamphlet, advertisement, or otherwise. (2) "Sell" means any act by which a sale is made. (3) The use of advertisements, circulars, or pamphlets in connection with the sale of securities in this state exclusively to the purchasers specified in division (D) of section 1707.03 of the Revised Code is not a sale when the advertisements, circulars, and pamphlets describing and offering those securities bear a readily legible legend in substance as follows: "This offer is made on behalf of dealers licensed under sections 1707.01 to 1707.50 of the Revised Code, and is confined in this state exclusively to institutional investors and licensed dealers." (4) The offering of securities by any person in conjunction with a licensed dealer by use of advertisement, circular, or pamphlet is not a sale if that person does not otherwise attempt to sell securities in this state. (5) Any security given with, or as a bonus on account of, any purchase of securities is conclusively presumed to constitute a part of the subject of that purchase and has been "sold." (6) "Sale" by an owner, pledgee, or mortgagee, or by a person acting in a representative capacity, includes sale on behalf of such party by an agent, including a licensed dealer or salesperson. (D) "Person," except as otherwise provided in this chapter, means a natural person, firm, partnership, limited partnership, partnership association, syndicate, joint-stock company, unincorporated association, trust or trustee except where the trust was created or the trustee designated by law or judicial authority or by a will, and a corporation or limited liability company organized under the laws of any state, any foreign government, or any political subdivision of a state or foreign government. (E)(1) "Dealer," except as otherwise provided in this chapter, means every person, other than a salesperson, who engages or professes to engage, in this state, for either all or part of the person's time, directly or indirectly, either in the business of the sale of securities for the person's own account, or in the business of the purchase or sale of securities for the account of others in the reasonable expectation of receiving a commission, fee, or other remuneration as a result of engaging in the purchase and sale of securities. "Dealer" does not mean any of the following: (a) Any issuer, including any officer, director, employee, or trustee of, or member or manager of, or partner in, or any general partner of, any issuer, that sells, offers for sale, or does any act in furtherance of the sale of a security that represents an economic interest in that issuer, provided no commission, fee, or other similar remuneration is paid to or received by the issuer for the sale; (b) Any licensed attorney, public accountant, or firm of such attorneys or accountants, whose activities are incidental to the practice of the attorney's, accountant's, or firm's profession; (c) Any person that, for the account of others, engages in the purchase or sale of securities that are issued and outstanding before such purchase and sale, if a majority or more of the equity interest of an issuer is sold in that transaction, and if, in the case of a corporation, the securities sold in that transaction represent a majority or more of the voting power of the corporation in the election of directors; (d) Any person that brings an issuer together with a potential investor and whose compensation is not directly or indirectly based on the sale of any securities by the issuer to the investor; (e) Any bank; (f) Any person that the division of securities by rule exempts from the definition of "dealer" under division (E)(1) of this section. (2) "Licensed dealer" means a dealer licensed under this chapter. (F)(1) "Salesman" or "salesperson" means every natural person, other than a dealer, who is employed, authorized, or appointed by a dealer to sell securities within this state. (2) The general partners of a partnership, and the executive officers of a corporation or unincorporated association, licensed as a dealer are not salespersons within the meaning of this definition, nor are clerical or other employees of an issuer or dealer that are employed for work to which the sale of securities is secondary and incidental; but the division of securities may require a license from any such partner, executive officer, or employee if it determines that protection of the public necessitates the licensing. (3) "Licensed salesperson" means a salesperson licensed under this chapter. (G) "Issuer" means every person who has issued, proposes to issue, or issues any security. (H) "Director" means each director or trustee of a corporation, each trustee of a trust, each general partner of a partnership, except a partnership association, each manager of a partnership association, and any person vested with managerial or directory power over an issuer not having a board of directors or trustees. (I) "Incorporator" means any incorporator of a corporation and any organizer of, or any person participating, other than in a representative or professional capacity, in the organization of an unincorporated issuer. (J) "Fraud," "fraudulent," "fraudulent acts," "fraudulent practices," or "fraudulent transactions" means anything recognized on or after July 22, 1929, as such in courts of law or equity; any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud or to obtain money or property by means of any false pretense, representation, or promise; any fictitious or pretended purchase or sale of securities; and any act, practice, transaction, or course of business relating to the purchase or sale of securities that is fraudulent or that has operated or would operate as a fraud upon the seller or purchaser. (K) Except as otherwise specifically provided, whenever any classification or computation is based upon "par value," as applied to securities without par value, the average of the aggregate consideration received or to be received by the issuer for each class of those securities shall be used as the basis for that classification or computation. (L)(1) "Intangible property" means patents, copyrights, secret processes, formulas, services, good will, promotion and organization fees and expenses, trademarks, trade brands, trade names, licenses, franchises, any other assets treated as intangible according to generally accepted accounting principles, and securities, accounts receivable, or contract rights having no readily determinable value. (2) "Tangible property" means all property other than intangible property and includes securities, accounts receivable, and contract rights, when the securities, accounts receivable, or contract rights have a readily determinable value. (M) "Public utilities" means those utilities defined in sections 4905.02, 4905.03, 4907.02, and 4907.03 of the Revised Code; in the case of a foreign corporation, it means those utilities defined as public utilities by the laws of its domicile; and in the case of any other foreign issuer, it means those utilities defined as public utilities by the laws of the situs of its principal place of business. The term always includes railroads whether or not they are so defined as public utilities. (N) "State" means any state of the United States, any territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, and any province of Canada. (O) "Bank" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union that is incorporated or organized under the laws of the United States, any state of the United States, Canada, or any province of Canada and that is subject to regulation or supervision by that country, state, or province. (P) "Include," when used in a definition, does not exclude other things or persons otherwise within the meaning of the term defined. (Q)(1) "Registration by description" means that the requirements of section 1707.08 of the Revised Code have been complied with. (2) "Registration by qualification" means that the requirements of sections 1707.09 and 1707.11 of the Revised Code have been complied with. (3) "Registration by coordination" means that there has been compliance with section 1707.091 of the Revised Code. Reference in this chapter to registration by qualification also includes registration by coordination unless the context otherwise indicates. (R) "Intoxicating liquor" includes all liquids and compounds that contain more than three and two-tenths per cent of alcohol by weight and are fit for use for beverage purposes. (S) "Institutional investor" means any of the following, whether acting for itself or for others in a fiduciary capacity: (1) A bank or international banking institution; (2) An insurance company; (3) A separate account of an insurance company; (4) An investment company as defined in the "Investment Company Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80a-3; (5) A broker-dealer registered under the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934," 15 U.S.C. 78o, as amended, or licensed by the division of securities as a dealer; (6) An employee pension, profit-sharing, or benefit plan if the plan has total assets in excess of ten million dollars or its investment decisions are made by a named fiduciary, as defined in the "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974," 29 U.S.C. 1001, that is one of the following: (a) A broker-dealer registered under the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934," 15 U.S.C. 78o, as amended; (b) An investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80b-3; (c) An investment adviser registered under this chapter, a bank, or an insurance company. (7) A plan established and maintained by a state, a political subdivision of a state, or an agency or instrumentality of a state or a political subdivision of a state for the benefit of its employees, if the plan has total assets in excess of ten million dollars or its investment decisions are made by a duly designated public official or by a named fiduciary, as defined in the "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974," 29 U.S.C. 1001, that is one of the following: (a) A broker-dealer registered under the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934," 15 U.S.C. 78o, as amended; (b) An investment adviser registered or exempt from registration under the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80b-3; (c) An investment adviser registered under this chapter, a bank, or an insurance company. (8) A trust, if it has total assets in excess of ten million dollars, its trustee is a bank, and its participants are exclusively plans of the types identified in division (S)(6) or (7) of this section, regardless of the size of their assets, except a trust that includes as participants self-directed individual retirement accounts or similar self-directed plans; (9) An organization described in section 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, corporation, Massachusetts trust or similar business trust, limited liability company, or partnership, not formed for the specific purpose of acquiring the securities offered, with total assets in excess of ten million dollars; (10) A small business investment company licensed by the small business administration under section 301(c) of the "Small Business Investment Act of 1958," 15 U.S.C. 681(c), with total assets in excess of ten million dollars; (11) A private business development company as defined in section 202(a)(22) of the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80b-2(a)(22), with total assets in excess of ten million dollars; (12) A federal covered investment adviser acting for its own account; (13) A "qualified institutional buyer" as defined in 17 C.F.R. 230.144A(a)(1), other than 17 C.F.R. 230.144A(a)(1)(H); (14) A "major U.S. institutional investor" as defined in 17 C.F.R. 240.15a-6(b)(4)(i); (15) Any other person, other than an individual, of institutional character with total assets in excess of ten million dollars not organized for the specific purpose of evading this chapter; (16) Any other person specified by rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. (T) A reference to a statute of the United States or to a rule, regulation, or form promulgated by the securities and exchange commission or by another federal agency means the statute, rule, regulation, or form as it exists at the time of the act, omission, event, or transaction to which it is applied under this chapter. (U) "Securities and exchange commission" means the securities and exchange commission established by the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. (V)(1) "Control bid" means the purchase of or offer to purchase any equity security of a subject company from a resident of this state if either of the following applies: (a) After the purchase of that security, the offeror would be directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of more than ten per cent of any class of the issued and outstanding equity securities of the issuer. (b) The offeror is the subject company, there is a pending control bid by a person other than the issuer, and the number of the issued and outstanding shares of the subject company would be reduced by more than ten per cent. (2) For purposes of division (V)(1) of this section, "control bid" does not include any of the following: (a) A bid made by a dealer for the dealer's own account in the ordinary course of business of buying and selling securities; (b) An offer to acquire any equity security solely in exchange for any other security, or the acquisition of any equity security pursuant to an offer, for the sole account of the offeror, in good faith and not for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this chapter, and not involving any public offering of the other security within the meaning of Section 4 of Title I of the "Securities Act of 1933," 48 Stat. 77, 15 U.S.C.A. 77d(2), as amended; (c) Any other offer to acquire any equity security, or the acquisition of any equity security pursuant to an offer, for the sole account of the offeror, from not more than fifty persons, in good faith and not for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this chapter. (W) "Offeror" means a person who makes, or in any way participates or aids in making, a control bid and includes persons acting jointly or in concert, or who intend to exercise jointly or in concert any voting rights attached to the securities for which the control bid is made and also includes any subject company making a control bid for its own securities. (X)(1) "Investment adviser" means any person who, for compensation, engages in the business of advising others, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities, or who, for compensation and as a part of regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports concerning securities. (2) "Investment adviser" does not mean any of the following: (a) Any attorney, accountant, engineer, or teacher, whose performance of investment advisory services described in division (X)(1) of this section is solely incidental to the practice of the attorney's, accountant's, engineer's, or teacher's profession; (b) A publisher of any bona fide newspaper, news magazine, or business or financial publication of general and regular circulation; (c) A person who acts solely as an investment adviser representative; (d) A bank holding company, as defined in the "Bank Holding Company Act of 1956," 70 Stat. 133, 12 U.S.C. 1841, that is not an investment company; (e) A bank, or any receiver, conservator, or other liquidating agent of a bank; (f) Any licensed dealer or licensed salesperson whose performance of investment advisory services described in division (X)(1) of this section is solely incidental to the conduct of the dealer's or salesperson's business as a licensed dealer or licensed salesperson and who receives no special compensation for the services; (g) Any person, the advice, analyses, or reports of which do not relate to securities other than securities that are direct obligations of, or obligations guaranteed as to principal or interest by, the United States, or securities issued or guaranteed by corporations in which the United States has a direct or indirect interest, and that have been designated by the secretary of the treasury as exempt securities as defined in the "Securities Exchange Act of 1934," 48 Stat. 881, 15 U.S.C. 78c; (h) Any person that is excluded from the definition of investment adviser pursuant to section 202(a)(11)(A) to (E) of the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80b-2(a)(11), or that has received an order from the securities and exchange commission under section 202(a)(11)(F) of the "Investment Advisers Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80b-2(a)(11)(F), declaring that the person is not within the intent of section 202(a)(11) of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940. (i) A person who acts solely as a state retirement system investment officer or as a bureau of workers' compensation chief investment officer; (j) Any other person that the division designates by rule, if the division finds that the designation is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors or clients and consistent with the purposes fairly intended by the policy and provisions of this chapter. (Y)(1) "Subject company" means an issuer that satisfies both of the following: (a) Its principal place of business or its principal executive office is located in this state, or it owns or controls assets located within this state that have a fair market value of at least one million dollars. (b) More than ten per cent of its beneficial or record equity security holders are resident in this state, more than ten per cent of its equity securities are owned beneficially or of record by residents in this state, or more than one thousand of its beneficial or record equity security holders are resident in this state. (2) The division of securities may adopt rules to establish more specific application of the provisions set forth in division (Y)(1) of this section. Notwithstanding the provisions set forth in division (Y)(1) of this section and any rules adopted under this division, the division, by rule or in an adjudicatory proceeding, may make a determination that an issuer does not constitute a "subject company" under division (Y)(1) of this section if appropriate review of control bids involving the issuer is to be made by any regulatory authority of another jurisdiction. (Z) "Beneficial owner" includes any person who directly or indirectly through any contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship has or shares, or otherwise has or shares, the power to vote or direct the voting of a security or the power to dispose of, or direct the disposition of, the security. "Beneficial ownership" includes the right, exercisable within sixty days, to acquire any security through the exercise of any option, warrant, or right, the conversion of any convertible security, or otherwise. Any security subject to any such option, warrant, right, or conversion privilege held by any person shall be deemed to be outstanding for the purpose of computing the percentage of outstanding securities of the class owned by that person, but shall not be deemed to be outstanding for the purpose of computing the percentage of the class owned by any other person. A person shall be deemed the beneficial owner of any security beneficially owned by any relative or spouse or relative of the spouse residing in the home of that person, any trust or estate in which that person owns ten per cent or more of the total beneficial interest or serves as trustee or executor, any corporation or entity in which that person owns ten per cent or more of the equity, and any affiliate or associate of that person. (AA) "Offeree" means the beneficial or record owner of any security that an offeror acquires or offers to acquire in connection with a control bid. (BB) "Equity security" means any share or similar security, or any security convertible into any such security, or carrying any warrant or right to subscribe to or purchase any such security, or any such warrant or right, or any other security that, for the protection of security holders, is treated as an equity security pursuant to rules of the division of securities. (CC)(1) "Investment adviser representative" means a supervised person of an investment adviser, provided that the supervised person has more than five clients who are natural persons other than excepted persons defined in division (EE) of this section, and that more than ten per cent of the supervised person's clients are natural persons other than excepted persons defined in division (EE) of this section. "Investment adviser representative" does not mean any of the following: (a) A supervised person that does not on a regular basis solicit, meet with, or otherwise communicate with clients of the investment adviser; (b) A supervised person that provides only investment advisory services described in division (X)(1) of this section by means of written materials or oral statements that do not purport to meet the objectives or needs of specific individuals or accounts; (c) Any other person that the division designates by rule, if the division finds that the designation is necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors or clients and is consistent with the provisions fairly intended by the policy and provisions of this chapter. (2) For the purpose of the calculation of clients in division (CC)(1) of this section, a natural person and the following persons are deemed a single client: Any minor child of the natural person; any relative, spouse, or relative of the spouse of the natural person who has the same principal residence as the natural person; all accounts of which the natural person or the persons referred to in division (CC)(2) of this section are the only primary beneficiaries; and all trusts of which the natural person or persons referred to in division (CC)(2) of this section are the only primary beneficiaries. Persons who are not residents of the United States need not be included in the calculation of clients under division (CC)(1) of this section. (3) If subsequent to March 18, 1999, amendments are enacted or adopted defining "investment adviser representative" for purposes of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 or additional rules or regulations are promulgated by the securities and exchange commission regarding the definition of "investment adviser representative" for purposes of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, the division of securities shall, by rule, adopt the substance of the amendments, rules, or regulations, unless the division finds that the amendments, rules, or regulations are not necessary for the protection of investors or in the public interest. (DD) "Supervised person" means a natural person who is any of the following: (1) A partner, officer, or director of an investment adviser, or other person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions with respect to an investment adviser; (2) An employee of an investment adviser; (3) A person who provides investment advisory services described in division (X)(1) of this section on behalf of the investment adviser and is subject to the supervision and control of the investment adviser. (EE) "Excepted person" means a natural person to whom any of the following applies: (1) Immediately after entering into the investment advisory contract with the investment adviser, the person has at least seven hundred fifty thousand dollars under the management of the investment adviser. (2) The investment adviser reasonably believes either of the following at the time the investment advisory contract is entered into with the person: (a) The person has a net worth, together with assets held jointly with a spouse, of more than one million five hundred thousand dollars. (b) The person is a qualified purchaser as defined in division (FF) of this section. (3) Immediately prior to entering into an investment advisory contract with the investment adviser, the person is either of the following: (a) An executive officer, director, trustee, general partner, or person serving in a similar capacity, of the investment adviser; (b) An employee of the investment adviser, other than an employee performing solely clerical, secretarial, or administrative functions or duties for the investment adviser, which employee, in connection with the employee's regular functions or duties, participates in the investment activities of the investment adviser, provided that, for at least twelve months, the employee has been performing such nonclerical, nonsecretarial, or nonadministrative functions or duties for or on behalf of the investment adviser or performing substantially similar functions or duties for or on behalf of another company. If subsequent to March 18, 1999, amendments are enacted or adopted defining "excepted person" for purposes of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 or additional rules or regulations are promulgated by the securities and exchange commission regarding the definition of "excepted person" for purposes of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, the division of securities shall, by rule, adopt the substance of the amendments, rules, or regulations, unless the division finds that the amendments, rules, or regulations are not necessary for the protection of investors or in the public interest. (FF)(1) "Qualified purchaser" means either of the following: (a) A natural person who owns not less than five million dollars in investments as defined by rule by the division of securities; (b) A natural person, acting for the person's own account or accounts of other qualified purchasers, who in the aggregate owns and invests on a discretionary basis, not less than twenty-five million dollars in investments as defined by rule by the division of securities. (2) If subsequent to March 18, 1999, amendments are enacted or adopted defining "qualified purchaser" for purposes of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 or additional rules or regulations are promulgated by the securities and exchange commission regarding the definition of "qualified purchaser" for purposes of the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, the division of securities shall, by rule, adopt the amendments, rules, or regulations, unless the division finds that the amendments, rules, or regulations are not necessary for the protection of investors or in the public interest. (GG)(1) "Purchase" has the full meaning of "purchase" as applied by or accepted in courts of law or equity and includes every acquisition of, or attempt to acquire, a security or an interest in a security. "Purchase" also includes a contract to purchase, an exchange, an attempt to purchase, an option to purchase, a solicitation of a purchase, a solicitation of an offer to sell, a subscription, or an offer to purchase, directly or indirectly, by agent, circular, pamphlet, advertisement, or otherwise. (2) "Purchase" means any act by which a purchase is made. (3) Any security given with, or as a bonus on account of, any purchase of securities is conclusively presumed to constitute a part of the subject of that purchase. (HH) "Life settlement interest" means the entire interest or any fractional interest in an insurance policy or certificate of insurance, or in an insurance benefit under such a policy or certificate, that is the subject of a life settlement contract. For purposes of this division, "life settlement contract" means an agreement for the purchase, sale, assignment, transfer, devise, or bequest of any portion of the death benefit or ownership of any life insurance policy or contract, in return for consideration or any other thing of value that is less than the expected death benefit of the life insurance policy or contract. "Life settlement contract" includes a viatical settlement contract as defined in section 3916.01 of the Revised Code, but does not include any of the following: (1) A loan by an insurer under the terms of a life insurance policy, including, but not limited to, a loan secured by the cash value of the policy; (2) An agreement with a bank that takes an assignment of a life insurance policy as collateral for a loan; (3) The provision of accelerated benefits as defined in section 3915.21 of the Revised Code; (4) Any agreement between an insurer and a reinsurer; (5) An agreement by an individual to purchase an existing life insurance policy or contract from the original owner of the policy or contract, if the individual does not enter into more than one life settlement contract per calendar year; (6) The initial purchase of an insurance policy or certificate of insurance from its owner by a viatical settlement provider, as defined in section 3916.01 of the Revised Code, that is licensed under Chapter 3916. of the Revised Code. (II) "State retirement system" means the public employees retirement system, Ohio police and fire pension fund, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, and state highway patrol retirement system. (JJ) "State retirement system investment officer" means an individual employed by a state retirement system as a chief investment officer, assistant investment officer, or the person in charge of a class of assets or in a position that is substantially equivalent to chief investment officer, assistant investment officer, or person in charge of a class of assets. (KK) "Bureau of workers' compensation chief investment officer" means an individual employed by the administrator of workers' compensation as a chief investment officer or in a position that is substantially equivalent to a chief investment officer. (LL) "Bank holding company" has the same meaning as in the "Bank Holding Company Act of 1956," 12 U.S.C. 1841. (MM) "Savings and loan holding company" has the same meaning as in 12 U.S.C. 1467a. Sec. 1707.14. (A) No person shall act as a dealer, unless the person is licensed as a dealer by the division of securities, except when at least one of the following cases applies: (1) When the person is transacting business through or with a licensed dealer; (2) When the securities are the subject matter of one or more transactions enumerated in divisions (B) to (L), (O) to (R), and (U) to (Y) of section 1707.03, or in section 1707.06 of the Revised Code, except when a commission, discount, or other remuneration is paid or given in consideration with transactions enumerated in divisions (O), (Q), (W), (X), and (Y) of section 1707.03, or in section 1707.06 of the Revised Code; (3)(3)(a) When the person is an issuer selling securities issued by it or by its subsidiary, if such securities are specified under division (G) or (I) of section 1707.02, or under section 1707.04 of the Revised Code; (b) As used in division (A)(3) of this section, "person" includes a bank holding company and a savings and loan holding company. (4) When the person is participating in transactions exempt, under section 1707.34 of the Revised Code, from this chapter; (5) When the person has no place of business in this state, is registered with the securities and exchange commission, and the only transactions effected in this state are with institutional investors. (B) Each dealer that in any twelve-month or shorter period, alone or with any other dealer with which it is affiliated, has total revenues of one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more derived from the business of buying, selling, or otherwise dealing in securities, and that at any time during such period has one hundred or more retail securities customers, shall be registered as a broker or dealer with the securities and exchange commission under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, except the following entities: (1) A bank; (2) A dealer that enters into and is in compliance with an undertaking accepted by the division, in which the dealer agrees that it will not engage in any transaction involving the buying, selling, or otherwise dealing in securities with any natural person in this state, except for transactions involving either of the following: (a) Securities of corporations or associations that have qualified for treatment as nonprofit organizations pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 501, as amended; (b) Securities or transactions that are described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of this section. (C) Every dealer that must be registered as a broker or dealer with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to division (B) of this section shall become so registered no later than ninety days after the date on which the dealer meets the requirements for such registration. (D) The division by rule may exempt any dealer from complying with the licensing or registration requirements of this section, if the division finds that such licensing or registration is not necessary for the protection of investors or in the public interest. (E) As used in division (B) of this section, "retail securities customer" means a person that purchases from or through or sells securities to or through a dealer, and that is not an officer, a director, a principal, a general partner, or an employee of, the dealer. Each of the following is deemed to be a single retail securities customer: (1) A husband and wife; (2) A minor child and the minor child's parent or legal guardian; (3) A corporation, a partnership, an association or other unincorporated entity, a joint stock company, or a trust. Sec. 1707.47. (A) As used in this section and section 1707.471 of the Revised Code: (1) "Claimant" means a person that files an application for restitution assistance on behalf of a victim. (2) "Final order" means a final administrative order issued by the division of securities or a final court order in a civil or criminal proceeding initiated by the division. (3) "Victim" means a purchaser identified in a final order that has suffered a pecuniary loss as the result of a violation of this chapter or any rules adopted thereunder, or, in the case of a deceased purchaser so identified, the purchaser's surviving spouse or dependent children. (B) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Ohio investor recovery fund, which shall consist of all cash transfers from the division of securities fund, created in section 1707.37 of the Revised Code, not to exceed an aggregate total of two million five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. Money in the Ohio investor recovery fund shall be used for the purposes identified in division (C) of this section. (C) The division shall use the Ohio investor recovery fund only to pay awards of restitution assistance and any expenses incurred in administering this section. (D)(1) If the Ohio investor recovery fund is reduced below two hundred fifty thousand dollars due to payment in full of restitution assistance awards that become final during a month, the division shall suspend payment of further claims that become final during that month and the following two months. (2) At the end of the suspension period described in division (D)(1) of this section, the division shall pay the suspended claims. If the Ohio investor recovery fund would be exhausted by payment in full of the suspended claims, the amount paid to each claimant shall be prorated according to the amount remaining in the Ohio investor recovery fund at the end of the suspension period. (E) The state shall not be liable for a determination made by the division under this section except to the extent that money is available in the Ohio investor recovery fund on the date the award is calculated. (F) The following victims are eligible for restitution assistance: (1) A natural person who is a resident of this state; (2) A person, other than a natural person, that is domiciled in Ohio. (G) The division shall not award restitution assistance as follows: (1) To more than one claimant per victim; (2) To a claimant on behalf of a victim that has received the full amount of restitution owed from the person ordered to pay restitution to the victim in the final order before the application for restitution assistance from the fund is filed; (3) To a claimant if the final order identifies no pecuniary loss to the victim on whose behalf the application is made; (4) To a claimant on behalf of a victim that assisted in the commission of the violation of this chapter; (5) If the portion of the final order giving rise to a restitution order or otherwise establishing a pecuniary loss to the victim is overturned on appeal. (H) If, after the division has made a restitution assistance award from the Ohio investor recovery fund under this section, the restitution award in the final order is overturned on appeal and all legal remedies have been exhausted, then the claimant shall forfeit the restitution assistance award. Sec. 1711.30. Before issuing bonds under section 1711.28 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners, by resolution, shall submit to the qualified electors of the county at the next general election for county officers, held not less than ninety days after receiving from the county agricultural society the notice provided for in section 1711.25 of the Revised Code, the question of issuing and selling such bonds in such amount and denomination as are necessary for the purpose in view, and shall certify a copy of such resolution to the county board of elections. The county board of elections shall place the question of issuing and selling such bonds upon the ballot and make all other necessary arrangements for the submission, at the time fixed by such resolution, of such question to such electors. The votes cast at such election upon such question must be counted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner, except as provided by law, as votes cast for county officers. Fifteen days' notice of such submission shall be given by the county board of elections, by publication once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, stating the amount of bonds to be issued, the purpose for which they are to be issued, and the time and places of holding such election. If the resolution proposes the levy of a tax under section 1711.29 of the Revised Code, the notice shall include the rate of the tax in both mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. The question must be stated on the ballot as follows: "For the issue of county fair bonds, yes"; "For the issue of county fair bonds, no." If the resolution proposes the levy of a tax under section 1711.29 of the Revised Code, the question appearing on the ballot shall include the rate of the tax in both mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. If the majority of those voting upon the question of issuing the bonds vote in favor thereof, then and only then shall they be issued and the tax provided for in section 1711.29 of the Revised Code be levied. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" has the same meaning as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1713.03. The chancellor of higher education shall establish standards for certificates of authorization to be issued to institutions as defined in section 1713.01 of the Revised Code, to private institutions exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code, and to schools holding certificates of registration issued by the state board of career colleges and schools pursuant to division (C) of section 3332.05 of the Revised Code. A certificate of authorization may permit an institution or school to award one or more types of degrees. The standards for a certificate of authorization may include, for various types of institutions, schools, or degrees, minimum qualifications for faculty, library, laboratories, and other facilities as adopted and published by the chancellor. The standards shall be adopted by the chancellor pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. An institution or school shall apply to the chancellor for a certificate of authorization on forms containing such information as is prescribed by the chancellor. Each institution or school with a certificate of authorization shall file an annual report with the chancellor in such form and containing such information as the chancellor prescribes. The annual report shall include disclosure of any contract entered with an online program manager, as described in section 1713.032 of the Revised Code. The chancellor shall adopt a rule under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing fees to pay the cost of reviewing an application for a certificate of authorization, which the institution or school shall pay when it applies for a certificate of authorization, and establishing fees, which an institution or school shall pay, for any further reviews the chancellor determines necessary upon examining an institution's or school's annual report. Sec. 1713.032. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Online program manager" means an entity that is not an institution of higher education as defined under "The Higher Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 1001, that enters into an agreement with a private institution of higher education to provide marketing and recruitment services and at least one additional service, including course design, technology, or faculty training, to support an online degree program. (2) "Private institution of higher education" means a private institution of higher education with a certificate of authorization, or seeking authorization, from the chancellor of higher education under Chapter 1713. of Revised Code. (B) If a private institution of higher education enters a contract with an online program manager, the institution shall ensure the contract is in compliance with relevant program standards and requirements. (C) A private institution of higher education that enters into a contract with an online program manager shall post on each online degree program web site it maintains that it utilizes an online program manager for services. The institution shall require the online program manager to identify itself when providing services to students. (D) A contract between a private institution of higher education and an online program manager is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (E) A private institution of higher education shall not permit an online program manager to control, make decisions regarding, administer, or disburse student financial aid. Sec. 1713.033. Each institution or school with a certificate of authorization issued under this chapter annually shall certify to the chancellor of higher education, on a date and in the form and manner determined by the chancellor, a plan to preserve student records indefinitely if the institution or school was to cease operations. The plan shall include the designation and signed confirmation of an official custodian of student records. If the chancellor determines it necessary, the chancellor may require an institution or school to produce an executed agreement with the designated custodian of student records, paid in full, to ensure the institution's or school's plan can be implemented. The chancellor may consult with the higher learning commission, the state board of career colleges and schools, and other appropriate entities to establish plans, processes, and procedures for institutions and schools to provide indefinite access to student records. Sec. 1713.041. (A) Each institution or school authorized to offer courses or degrees under a certificate of authorization annually shall provide to the chancellor of higher education all of the following: (1) Verification of current accreditation status and a copy of the most recent institutional report from the institution's accrediting organization; (2) A plan to preserve student records indefinitely in the event of closure of the institution or discontinuation of service. The plan shall include a method by which students and alumni of the institution may retrieve student records by request. The plan also shall include a designation and signed confirmation of an official custodian of student records. Student records preserved under the plan shall include, but not be limited to: (a) Academic transcripts; (b) Financial aid documents; (c) International student forms; (d) Tax information. (3) The following program information: (a) A list of current degree programs offered by the institution in this state; (b) The results of any external degree program evaluations conducted in the last year; (c) A list of any degree programs that have been eliminated in the last year; (4) The latest financial statement for the most recent fiscal year compiled and audited by an independent certified public accountant, including any management letters provided by the independent auditor; (5) Any other information requested by the chancellor. (B) If an institution or school fails to submit the information required under division (A) of this section or if the chancellor finds that the information submitted under that division is insufficient, the chancellor may suspend, withdraw, or revoke an institution or school's institutional authorization or a program's authorization. (C) Each institution or school shall immediately notify the chancellor if the institution or school does any of the following: (1) Receives notice from the federal government or an institutional accrediting organization that the institution or school is subject to heightened reporting standards or special monitoring status, such as the United States department of education's heightened cash monitoring process; (2) Receives preliminary or final accreditation findings; (3) Becomes the subject of an investigation by a government agency related to the institution's academic quality, financial stability, or student consumer protection; (4) Fails to make any payments to applicable retirement systems; (5) Fails to make any scheduled payroll payments; (6) Fails to make any payments to vendors when due as a result of a cash deficiency or a substantial deficiency in the payment processing system of the institution; (7) Fails to make any scheduled payment of principal or interest for short- or long-term debt; (8) Makes budget revisions resulting in a substantially reduced ending fund balance or larger deficit; (9) Becomes aware of significant negative variance between the most recently adopted annual budget and actual revenues or expenses as projected at the end of the fiscal year. (D) A document received by the chancellor under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section that is confidential under federal law is not subject to release under a public record request until such time as the document is released publicly by the appropriate entity. Further, financial documentation of the institution or school received by the chancellor under this section is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1901.123. (A)(1) Subject to reimbursement under division (B) of this section, the The treasurer of the county in which a county-operated municipal court or other municipal court is located shall pay the per diem compensation to which an acting judge appointed pursuant to division (A)(2)(a), (B)(1), or (C)(1) of section 1901.121 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 1901.122 of the Revised Code. (2) The treasurer of the county in which a county-operated municipal court or other municipal court is located shall pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge assigned pursuant to division (A)(1), (A)(2)(b), (B)(2), (C)(2), or (D) of section 1901.121 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (B)(1) or (4) of section 1901.122 of the Revised Code. (3) Subject to reimbursement under division (B) of this section, the treasurer of the county in which a county-operated municipal court or other municipal court is located shall pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge assigned pursuant to division (A)(1), (A)(2)(b), (B)(2), (C)(2), or (D) of section 1901.121 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 1901.122 of the Revised Code. (4) Subject to reimbursement under division (C) of this section, the supreme court shall pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge assigned pursuant to division (A)(1), (A)(2)(b), (B)(2), (C)(2), or (D) of section 1901.121 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 1901.122 of the Revised Code. (B) A county that, pursuant to division (A)(1) or (3)(A)(3) of this section, is required to pay the per diem compensation to which an acting judge or assigned judge is entitled, shall submit to the administrative director of the supreme court quarterly requests for reimbursements of the state portion of the per diem amounts so paid. The requests shall include verifications of the payment of those amounts and an affidavit from the acting judge or assigned judge stating the days and hours worked. The administrative director shall cause reimbursements of the state portion of the per diem amounts paid to be issued to the county if the administrative director verifies that those amounts were, in fact, so paid. If the county fails to submit a request within one year after the per diem compensation was paid, the administrative director shall refuse to cause reimbursement to be issued. (C) If the supreme court, pursuant to division (A)(4) of this section, is required to pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge is entitled, annually, on the first day of August, the administrative director of the supreme court shall issue a billing to the county treasurer of any county to which such a judge was assigned to a municipal court for reimbursement of the county or local portion of the per diem compensation previously paid by the supreme court for the twelve-month period preceding the last day of June. The county or local portion of the per diem compensation shall be that part of each per diem paid by the state which is proportional to the county or local shares of the total compensation of a resident judge of such court. The county treasurer shall forward the payment within thirty days. After forwarding the payment, the county treasurer shall seek reimbursement from the applicable local municipalities as appropriate. Sec. 1901.26. (A) Subject to division (E) of this section, costs in a municipal court shall be fixed and taxed as follows: (1)(a) The municipal court shall require an advance deposit for the filing of any new civil action or proceeding when required by division (C) of this section, subject to its waiver pursuant to that division, and in all other cases, by rule, shall establish a schedule of fees and costs to be taxed in any civil or criminal action or proceeding. (b)(i) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation may by ordinance establish a schedule of fees to be taxed as costs in any civil, criminal, or traffic action or proceeding in a municipal court for the performance by officers or other employees of the municipal corporation's police department or marshal's office of any of the services specified in sections 311.17 and 509.15 of the Revised Code. No fee in the schedule shall be higher than the fee specified in section 311.17 of the Revised Code for the performance of the same service by the sheriff. If a fee established in the schedule conflicts with a fee for the same service established in another section of the Revised Code or a rule of court, the fee established in the other section of the Revised Code or the rule of court shall apply. (ii) When an officer or employee of a municipal police department or marshal's office performs in a civil, criminal, or traffic action or proceeding in a municipal court a service specified in section 311.17 or 509.15 of the Revised Code for which a taxable fee has been established under this or any other section of the Revised Code, the applicable legal fees and any other extraordinary expenses, including overtime, provided for the service shall be taxed as costs in the case. The clerk of the court shall pay those legal fees and other expenses, when collected, into the general fund of the municipal corporation that employs the officer or employee. (iii) If a bailiff of a municipal court performs in a civil, criminal, or traffic action or proceeding in that court a service specified in section 311.17 or 509.15 of the Revised Code for which a taxable fee has been established under this section or any other section of the Revised Code, the fee for the service is the same and is taxable to the same extent as if the service had been performed by an officer or employee of the police department or marshal's office of the municipal corporation in which the court is located. The clerk of that court shall pay the fee, when collected, into the general fund of the entity or entities that fund the bailiff's salary, in the same prorated amount as the salary is funded. (iv) Division (A)(1)(b) of this section does not authorize or require any officer or employee of a police department or marshal's office of a municipal corporation or any bailiff of a municipal court to perform any service not otherwise authorized by law. (2) The municipal court, by rule, may require an advance deposit for the filing of any civil action or proceeding and publication fees as provided in section 2701.09 of the Revised Code. The court shall waive the requirement for advance deposit for a party that the court determines qualifies as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. (3) When a jury trial is demanded in any civil action or proceeding, the party making the demand may be required to make an advance deposit as fixed by rule of court, unless the court determines that the party qualifies as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. If a jury is called, the fees of a jury shall be taxed as costs. (4) In any civil or criminal action or proceeding, each witness shall receive twelve dollars for each full day's attendance and six dollars for each half day's attendance. Each witness in a municipal court that is not a county-operated municipal court also shall receive fifty and one-half cents for each mile necessarily traveled to and from the witness's place of residence to the action or proceeding. (5) A reasonable charge for driving, towing, carting, storing, keeping, and preserving motor vehicles and other personal property recovered or seized in any proceeding may be taxed as part of the costs in a trial of the cause, in an amount that shall be fixed by rule of court. (6) Chattel property seized under any writ or process issued by the court shall be preserved pending final disposition for the benefit of all persons interested and may be placed in storage when necessary or proper for that preservation. The custodian of any chattel property so stored shall not be required to part with the possession of the property until a reasonable charge, to be fixed by the court, is paid. (7) The municipal court, as it determines, may refund all deposits and advance payments of fees and costs, including those for jurors and summoning jurors, when they have been paid by the losing party. (8) Charges for the publication of legal notices required by statute or order of court may be taxed as part of the costs, as provided by section 7.13 of the Revised Code. (B)(1)(a) The municipal court may determine that, for the efficient operation of the court, additional funds are necessary to acquire and pay for special projects of the court including, but not limited to, the acquisition of additional facilities or the rehabilitation of existing facilities, the acquisition of equipment, the hiring and training of staff, community service programs, mediation or dispute resolution services, the employment of magistrates, the training and education of judges, acting judges, and magistrates, and other related services. Upon that determination, the court by rule may charge a fee, in addition to all other court costs, on the filing of each criminal cause, civil action or proceeding, or judgment by confession. Fees collected by a court for special projects of the court under this division shall not be used for training or education that takes place outside of the state. (b) If the municipal court offers a special program or service in cases of a specific type, the municipal court by rule may assess an additional charge in a case of that type, over and above court costs, to cover the special program or service. The municipal court shall adjust the special assessment periodically, but not retroactively, so that the amount assessed in those cases does not exceed the actual cost of providing the service or program. (c) Any fee or charge assessed under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section on the filing of a civil action or proceeding shall be waived if the court determines that the person on whom the fee or charge is assessed qualifies as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. (d) All moneys collected under division (B) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer if the court is a county-operated municipal court or to the city treasurer if the court is not a county-operated municipal court for deposit into either a general special projects fund or a fund established for a specific special project. Moneys from a fund of that nature shall be disbursed upon an order of the court in an amount no greater than the actual cost to the court of a project. If a specific fund is terminated because of the discontinuance of a program or service established under division (B) of this section, the municipal court may order that moneys remaining in the fund be transferred to an account established under this division for a similar purpose. (2) As used in division (B) of this section: (a) "Criminal cause" means a charge alleging the violation of a statute or ordinance, or subsection of a statute or ordinance, that requires a separate finding of fact or a separate plea before disposition and of which the defendant may be found guilty, whether filed as part of a multiple charge on a single summons, citation, or complaint or as a separate charge on a single summons, citation, or complaint. "Criminal cause" does not include separate violations of the same statute or ordinance, or subsection of the same statute or ordinance, unless each charge is filed on a separate summons, citation, or complaint. (b) "Civil action or proceeding" means any civil litigation that must be determined by judgment entry. (C) The municipal court shall collect in all its divisions except the small claims division the sum of twenty-six dollars as additional filing fees in each new civil action or proceeding for the charitable public purpose of providing financial assistance to legal aid societies that operate within the state and to support the office of the state public defender. The municipal court shall collect in its small claims division the sum of eleven dollars as additional filing fees in each new civil action or proceeding for the charitable public purpose of providing financial assistance to legal aid societies that operate within the state and to support the office of the state public defender. This division does not apply to any execution on a judgment, proceeding in aid of execution, or other post-judgment proceeding arising out of a civil action. The filing fees required to be collected under this division shall be in addition to any other court costs imposed in the action or proceeding and shall be collected at the time of the filing of the action or proceeding. The court shall not waive the payment of the additional filing fees in a new civil action or proceeding unless the court waives the advanced payment of all filing fees in the action or proceeding for the party that the court determines is qualified as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. All such moneys collected during a month except for an amount equal to up to one per cent of those moneys retained to cover administrative costs shall be transmitted on or before the twentieth day of the following month by the clerk of the court to the treasurer of state in a manner prescribed by the treasurer of state or by the Ohio access to justice foundation. The treasurer of state shall deposit four per cent of the funds collected under this division to the credit of the civil case filing fee fund established under section 120.07 of the Revised Code and ninety-six per cent of the funds collected under this division to the credit of the legal aid fund established under section 120.52 of the Revised Code. The court may retain up to one per cent of the moneys it collects under this division to cover administrative costs, including the hiring of any additional personnel necessary to implement this division. If the court fails to transmit to the treasurer of state the moneys the court collects under this division in a manner prescribed by the treasurer of state or by the Ohio access to justice foundation, the court shall forfeit the moneys the court retains under this division to cover administrative costs, including the hiring of any additional personnel necessary to implement this division, and shall transmit to the treasurer of state all moneys collected under this division, including the forfeited amount retained for administrative costs, for deposit in the legal aid fund. (D) In the Cleveland municipal court, reasonable charges for investigating titles of real estate to be sold or disposed of under any writ or process of the court may be taxed as part of the costs. (E) Under the circumstances described in sections 2969.21 to 2969.27 of the Revised Code, the clerk of the municipal court shall charge the fees and perform the other duties specified in those sections. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Full day's attendance" means a day on which a witness is required or requested to be present at an action or proceeding before and after twelve noon, regardless of whether the witness actually testifies. (2) "Half day's attendance" means a day on which a witness is required or requested to be present at an action or proceeding either before or after twelve noon, but not both, regardless of whether the witness actually testifies. Sec. 1907.143. (A)(1) Subject to reimbursement under division (B) of this section, the The treasurer of the county in which a county court is located shall pay the per diem compensation to which an acting judge appointed pursuant to division (A)(2)(a), (B)(1), or (C)(1) of section 1907.141 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (A) of section 1907.142 of the Revised Code. (2) The treasurer of the county in which a county court is located shall pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge assigned pursuant to division (A)(1), (A)(2)(b), (B)(2), or (C)(2) of section 1907.141 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (B)(1) or (4) of section 1907.142 of the Revised Code. (3) Subject to reimbursement under division (B) of this section, the treasurer of the county in which a county court is located shall pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge assigned pursuant to division (A)(1), (A)(2)(b), (B)(2), or (C)(2) of section 1907.141 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 1907.142 of the Revised Code. (4) Subject to reimbursement under division (C) of this section, the supreme court shall pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge assigned pursuant to division (A)(1), (A)(2)(b), (B)(2), or (C)(2) of section 1907.141 of the Revised Code is entitled pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 1907.142 of the Revised Code. (B) A county that, pursuant to division (A)(1) or (3)(A)(3) of this section, is required to pay the per diem compensation to which an acting judge or assigned judge is entitled, shall submit to the administrative director of the supreme court quarterly requests for reimbursements of the state portion of the per diem amounts so paid. The requests shall include verifications of the payment of those amounts and an affidavit from the acting judge or assigned judge stating the days and hours worked. The administrative director shall cause reimbursements of the state portion of the per diem amounts paid to be issued to the county if the administrative director verifies that those amounts were, in fact, so paid. If the county fails to submit a request within one year after the per diem compensation was paid, the administrative director shall refuse to cause reimbursement to be issued. (C) If the supreme court, pursuant to division (A)(4) of this section, is required to pay the per diem compensation to which an assigned judge is entitled, annually, on the first day of August, the administrative director of the supreme court shall issue a billing to the county treasurer of any county to which such a judge was assigned to a county court for reimbursement of the county portion of the per diem compensation previously paid by the supreme court for the twelve-month period preceding the last day of June. The county portion of the per diem compensation shall be that part of each per diem paid by the state which is proportional to the county shares of the total compensation of a resident judge of such court. The county treasurer shall forward the payment within thirty days. After forwarding the payment, the county treasurer shall seek reimbursement from the applicable local municipalities as appropriate. Sec. 1907.24. (A) Subject to division (C) of this section, a county court shall fix and tax fees and costs as follows: (1) The county court shall require an advance deposit for the filing of any new civil action or proceeding when required by division (C) of this section, subject to its waiver pursuant to that division, and, in all other cases, shall establish a schedule of fees and costs to be taxed in any civil or criminal action or proceeding. (2) The county court by rule may require an advance deposit for the filing of a civil action or proceeding and publication fees as provided in section 2701.09 of the Revised Code. The court shall waive an advance deposit requirement for a party that the court determines qualifies as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. (3) When a party demands a jury trial in a civil action or proceeding, the county court may require the party to make an advance deposit as fixed by rule of court, unless the court determines that the party qualifies as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. If a jury is called, the county court shall tax the fees of a jury as costs. (4) In a civil or criminal action or proceeding, the county court shall fix the fees of witnesses in accordance with sections 2335.06 and 2335.08 of the Revised Code. (5) A county court may tax as part of the costs in a trial of the cause, in an amount fixed by rule of court, a reasonable charge for driving, towing, carting, storing, keeping, and preserving motor vehicles and other personal property recovered or seized in a proceeding. (6) The court shall preserve chattel property seized under a writ or process issued by the court pending final disposition for the benefit of all interested persons. The court may place the chattel property in storage when necessary or proper for its preservation. The custodian of chattel property so stored shall not be required to part with the possession of the property until a reasonable charge, to be fixed by the court, is paid. (7) The county court, as it determines, may refund all deposits and advance payments of fees and costs, including those for jurors and summoning jurors, when they have been paid by the losing party. (8) The court may tax as part of costs charges for the publication of legal notices required by statute or order of court, as provided by section 7.13 of the Revised Code. (B)(1)(a) The county court may determine that, for the efficient operation of the court, additional funds are necessary to acquire and pay for special projects of the court including, but not limited to, the acquisition of additional facilities or the rehabilitation of existing facilities, the acquisition of equipment, the hiring and training of staff, community service programs, mediation or dispute resolution services, the employment of magistrates, the training and education of judges, acting judges, and magistrates, and other related services. Upon that determination, the court by rule may charge a fee, in addition to all other court costs, on the filing of each criminal cause, civil action or proceeding, or judgment by confession. Fees collected by a court for special projects of the court under this division shall not be used for training or education that takes place outside of the state. (b) If the county court offers a special program or service in cases of a specific type, the county court by rule may assess an additional charge in a case of that type, over and above court costs, to cover the special program or service. The county court shall adjust the special assessment periodically, but not retroactively, so that the amount assessed in those cases does not exceed the actual cost of providing the service or program. (c) Any fee or charge assessed under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section on the filing of a civil action or proceeding shall be waived if the court determines that the person on whom the fee or charge is assessed qualifies as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. (d) All moneys collected under division (B) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit into either a general special projects fund or a fund established for a specific special project. Moneys from a fund of that nature shall be disbursed upon an order of the court in an amount no greater than the actual cost to the court of a project. If a specific fund is terminated because of the discontinuance of a program or service established under division (B) of this section, the county court may order that moneys remaining in the fund be transferred to an account established under this division for a similar purpose. (2) As used in division (B) of this section: (a) "Criminal cause" means a charge alleging the violation of a statute or ordinance, or subsection of a statute or ordinance, that requires a separate finding of fact or a separate plea before disposition and of which the defendant may be found guilty, whether filed as part of a multiple charge on a single summons, citation, or complaint or as a separate charge on a single summons, citation, or complaint. "Criminal cause" does not include separate violations of the same statute or ordinance, or subsection of the same statute or ordinance, unless each charge is filed on a separate summons, citation, or complaint. (b) "Civil action or proceeding" means any civil litigation that must be determined by judgment entry. (C) Subject to division (E) of this section, the county court shall collect in all its divisions except the small claims division the sum of twenty-six dollars as additional filing fees in each new civil action or proceeding for the charitable public purpose of providing financial assistance to legal aid societies that operate within the state and to support the office of the state public defender. Subject to division (E) of this section, the county court shall collect in its small claims division the sum of eleven dollars as additional filing fees in each new civil action or proceeding for the charitable public purpose of providing financial assistance to legal aid societies that operate within the state and to support the office of the state public defender. This division does not apply to any execution on a judgment, proceeding in aid of execution, or other post-judgment proceeding arising out of a civil action. The filing fees required to be collected under this division shall be in addition to any other court costs imposed in the action or proceeding and shall be collected at the time of the filing of the action or proceeding. The court shall not waive the payment of the additional filing fees in a new civil action or proceeding unless the court waives the advanced payment of all filing fees in the action or proceeding for the party that the court determines is qualified as an indigent litigant as set forth in section 2323.311 of the Revised Code. All such moneys collected during a month except for an amount equal to up to one per cent of those moneys retained to cover administrative costs shall be transmitted on or before the twentieth day of the following month by the clerk of the court to the treasurer of state in a manner prescribed by the treasurer of state or by the Ohio access to justice foundation. The treasurer of state shall deposit four per cent of the funds collected under this division to the credit of the civil case filing fee fund established under section 120.07 of the Revised Code and ninety-six per cent of the funds collected under this division to the credit of the legal aid fund established under section 120.52 of the Revised Code. The court may retain up to one per cent of the moneys it collects under this division to cover administrative costs, including the hiring of any additional personnel necessary to implement this division. If the court fails to transmit to the treasurer of state the moneys the court collects under this division in a manner prescribed by the treasurer of state or by the Ohio access to justice foundation, the court shall forfeit the moneys the court retains under this division to cover administrative costs, including the hiring of any additional personnel necessary to implement this division, and shall transmit to the treasurer of state all moneys collected under this division, including the forfeited amount retained for administrative costs, for deposit in the legal aid fund. (D) The county court shall establish by rule a schedule of fees for miscellaneous services performed by the county court or any of its judges in accordance with law. If judges of the court of common pleas perform similar services, the fees prescribed in the schedule shall not exceed the fees for those services prescribed by the court of common pleas. (E) Under the circumstances described in sections 2969.21 to 2969.27 of the Revised Code, the clerk of the county court shall charge the fees and perform the other duties specified in those sections. Sec. 2101.11. (A)(1)(A)(1)(a) The probate judge shall have the care and custody of the files, papers, books, and records belonging to the probate court. The probate judge is authorized to perform the duties of clerk of the judge's court. The probate judge may appoint deputy clerks, court reporters, a bailiff, and any other necessary employees, each of whom shall take an oath of office before entering upon the duties of the employee's appointment and, when so qualified, may perform the duties appertaining to the office of clerk of the court. (b) Not later than eighteen months after the effective date of this amendment, the general docket of the probate court shall be available online on the clerk of court's web site for remote access and printing by the public of the information in that docket, including all individual documents in each case file, pertaining to probate cases filed on or after the effective date of this amendment. Nothing in this division shall be construed as making available online any of the following: (i) Internal documents such as notes, electronic mails, drafts, recommendations, advice, or research of judicial officers and court staff; (ii) Any document or any information in a case file the public access to which the court has ordered restricted under the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio. (2)(a) The probate judge shall provide for one or more probate court investigators to perform the duties that are established for a probate court investigator by the Revised Code or the probate judge. The probate judge may provide for an investigator in any of the following manners, as the court determines is appropriate: (i) By appointing a person as a full-time or part-time employee of the probate court to serve as investigator, or by designating a current full-time or part-time employee of the probate court to serve as investigator; (ii) By contracting with a person to serve and be compensated as investigator only when needed by the probate court, as determined by the court, and by designating that person as a probate court investigator during the times when the person is performing the duties of an investigator for the court; (iii) By entering into an agreement with another department or agency of the county, including, but not limited to, the sheriff's department or the county department of job and family services, pursuant to which an employee of the other department or agency will serve and perform the duties of investigator for the court, upon request of the probate judge, and designating that employee as a probate court investigator during the times when the person is performing the duties of an investigator for the court. (b) Each person appointed or otherwise designated as a probate court investigator shall take an oath of office before entering upon the duties of the person's appointment. When so qualified, an investigator may perform the duties that are established for a probate court investigator by the Revised Code or the probate judge. (c) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a probate court investigator shall hold at least a bachelor's degree in social work, psychology, education, special education, or a related human services field. A probate judge may waive the education requirement of this division for a person the judge appoints or otherwise designates as a probate court investigator if the judge determines that the person has experience in family services work that is equivalent to the required education. (d) Within one year after appointment or designation, a probate court investigator shall attend an orientation course of at least six hours, and each calendar year after the calendar year of appointment or designation, a probate court investigator shall satisfactorily complete at least six hours of continuing education. (e) For purposes of divisions (A)(4), (B), and (C) of this section, a person designated as a probate court investigator under division (A)(2)(a)(ii) or (iii) of this section shall be considered an appointee of the probate court at any time that the person is performing the duties established under the Revised Code or by the probate judge for a probate court investigator. (3)(a) The probate judge may provide for one or more persons to perform the duties of an assessor under sections 3107.031, 3107.032, 3107.082, 3107.09, 3107.101, and 3107.12 of the Revised Code or may enter into agreements with public children services agencies, private child placing agencies, or private noncustodial agencies under which the agency provides for one or more persons to perform the duties of an assessor. A probate judge who provides for an assessor shall do so in either of the following manners, as the judge considers appropriate: (i) By appointing a person as a full-time or part-time employee of the probate court to serve as assessor, or by designating a current full-time or part-time employee of the probate court to serve as assessor; (ii) By contracting with a person to serve and be compensated as assessor only when needed by the probate court, as determined by the court, and by designating that person as an assessor during the times when the person is performing the duties of an assessor for the court. (b) Each person appointed or designated as a probate court assessor shall take an oath of office before entering on the duties of the person's appointment. (c) A probate court assessor must meet the qualifications for an assessor established by section 3107.014 of the Revised Code. (d) A probate court assessor shall perform additional duties, including duties of an investigator under division (A)(2) of this section, when the probate judge assigns additional duties to the assessor. (e) For purposes of divisions (A)(4), (B), and (C) of this section, a person designated as a probate court assessor shall be considered an appointee of the probate court at any time that the person is performing assessor duties. (4) Each appointee of the probate judge may administer oaths in all cases when necessary, in the discharge of official duties. (B)(1)(a) Subject to the appropriation made by the board of county commissioners pursuant to this division, each appointee of a probate judge under division (A) of this section shall receive such compensation and expenses as the judge determines and shall serve during the pleasure of the judge. The compensation of each appointee shall be paid in semimonthly installments by the county treasurer from the county treasury, upon the warrants of the county auditor, certified to by the judge. (b) Except as otherwise provided in the Revised Code, the total compensation paid to all appointees of the probate judge in any calendar year shall not exceed the total fees earned by the probate court during the preceding calendar year, unless the board of county commissioners approves otherwise. (2) The probate judge annually shall submit a written request for an appropriation to the board of county commissioners that shall set forth estimated administrative expenses of the court, including the salaries of appointees as determined by the judge and any other costs, fees, and expenses, including, but not limited to, those enumerated in section 5123.96 of the Revised Code, that the judge considers reasonably necessary for the operation of the court. The board shall conduct a public hearing with respect to the written request submitted by the judge and shall appropriate such sum of money each year as it determines, after conducting the public hearing and considering the written request of the judge, is reasonably necessary to meet all the administrative expenses of the court, including the salaries of appointees as determined by the judge and any other costs, fees, and expenses, including, but not limited to, the costs, fees, and expenses enumerated in section 5123.96 of the Revised Code. If the judge considers the appropriation made by the board pursuant to this division insufficient to meet all the administrative expenses of the court, the judge shall commence an action under Chapter 2731. of the Revised Code in the court of appeals for the judicial district for a determination of the duty of the board of county commissioners to appropriate the amount of money in dispute. The court of appeals shall give priority to the action filed by the probate judge over all cases pending on its docket. The burden shall be on the probate judge to prove that the appropriation requested is reasonably necessary to meet all administrative expenses of the court. If, prior to the filing of an action under Chapter 2731. of the Revised Code or during the pendency of the action, the judge exercises the judge's contempt power in order to obtain the sum of money in dispute, the judge shall not order the imprisonment of any member of the board of county commissioners notwithstanding sections 2705.02 to 2705.06 of the Revised Code. (C) The probate judge may require any of the judge's appointees to give bond in the sum of not less than one thousand dollars, conditioned for the honest and faithful performance of the appointee's duties. The sureties on the bonds shall be approved in the manner provided in section 2101.03 of the Revised Code. The judge shall not be personally liable for the default, malfeasance, or nonfeasance of any appointee. All bonds required to be given in the probate court, on being accepted and approved by the probate judge, shall be filed in the judge's office. Sec. 2101.16. (A) Except as provided in section 2101.164 of the Revised Code, the fees enumerated in this division shall be charged and collected, if possible, by the probate judge and shall be in full for all services rendered in the respective proceedings: 1 2 3 A (1) Account, in addition to advertising charges B ___________________________________________________ $12.00 C Waivers and proof of notice of hearing on account, per page, minimum one dollar D ___________________________________________________ $1.00 E (2) Account of distribution, in addition to advertising charges F ___________________________________________________ $7.00 G (3) Adoption of child, petition for H ___________________________________________________ $20.00 I (4) Alter or cancel contract for sale or purchase of real property, complaint to J ___________________________________________________ $20.00 K (5) Application and order not otherwise provided for in this section or by rule adopted pursuant to division (E) of this section L ___________________________________________________ $5.00 M (6) Appropriation suit, per day, hearing in N ___________________________________________________ $20.00 O (7) Birth, application for registration of P ___________________________________________________ $7.00 Q (8) Birth record, application to correct R ___________________________________________________ $5.00 S (9) Bond, application for new or additional T ___________________________________________________ $5.00 U (10) Bond, application for release of surety or reduction of V ___________________________________________________ $5.00 W (11) Bond, receipt for securities deposited in lieu of X ___________________________________________________ $5.00 Y (12) Certified copy of journal entry, record, or proceeding, per page, minimum fee one dollar Z ___________________________________________________ $1.00 AA (13) Citation and issuing citation, application for AB ___________________________________________________ $5.00 AC (14) Change of name, petition for AD ___________________________________________________ $20.00 AE (15) Claim, application of administrator or executor for allowance of administrator's or executor's own AF ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AG (16) Claim, application to compromise or settle AH ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AI (17) Claim, authority to present AJ ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AK (18) Commissioner, appointment of AL ___________________________________________________ $5.00 AM (19) Compensation for extraordinary services and attorney's fees for fiduciary, application for AN ___________________________________________________ $5.00 AO (20) Competency, application to procure adjudication of AP ___________________________________________________ $20.00 AQ (21) Complete contract, application to AR ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AS (22) Concealment of assets, citation for AT ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AU (23) Construction of will, complaint for AV ___________________________________________________ $20.00 AW (24) Continue decedent's business, application to AX ___________________________________________________ $10.00 AY Monthly reports of operation AZ ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BA (25) Declaratory judgment, complaint for BB ___________________________________________________ $20.00 BC (26) Deposit of will BD ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BE (27) Designation of heir BF ___________________________________________________ $20.00 BG (28) Distribution in kind, application, assent, and order for BH ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BI (29) Distribution under section 2109.36 of the Revised Code, application for an order of BJ ___________________________________________________ $7.00 BK (30) Docketing and indexing proceedings, including the filing and noting of all necessary documents, maximum fee, fifteen dollars BL ___________________________________________________ $15.00 BM (31) Exceptions to any proceeding named in this section, contest of appointment or BN ___________________________________________________ $10.00 BO (32) Election of surviving partner to purchase assets of partnership, proceedings relating to BP ___________________________________________________ $10.00 BQ (33) Election of surviving spouse under will BR ___________________________________________________ $5.00 BS (34) Fiduciary, including an assignee or trustee of an insolvent debtor or any guardian or conservator accountable to the probate court, appointment of BT ___________________________________________________ $35.00 BU (35) Foreign will, application to record BV ___________________________________________________ $10.00 BW Record of foreign will, additional, per page BX ___________________________________________________ $1.00 BY (36) Forms when supplied by the probate court, not to exceed BZ ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CA (37) Heirship, complaint to determine CB ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CC (38) Injunction proceedings CD ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CE (39) Improve real property, petition to CF ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CG (40) Inventory with appraisement CH ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CI (41) Inventory without appraisement CJ ___________________________________________________ $7.00 CK (42) Investment or expenditure of funds, application for CL ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CM (43) Invest in real property, application to CN ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CO (44) Lease for oil, gas, coal, or other mineral, petition to CP ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CQ (45) Lease or lease and improve real property, petition to CR ___________________________________________________ $20.00 CS (46) Marriage license CT ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CU Certified abstract of each marriage CV ___________________________________________________ $2.00 CW (47) Minor or incompetent person, etc., disposal of estate under twenty-five thousand dollars of CX ___________________________________________________ $10.00 CY (48) Mortgage or mortgage and repair or improve real property, complaint to CZ ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DA (49) Newly discovered assets, report of DB ___________________________________________________ $7.00 DC (50) Nonresident executor or administrator to bar creditors' claims, proceedings by DD ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DE (51) Power of attorney or revocation of power, bonding company DF ___________________________________________________ $10.00 DG (52) Presumption of death, petition to establish DH ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DI (53) Probating will DJ ___________________________________________________ $15.00 DK Proof of notice to beneficiaries DL ___________________________________________________ $5.00 DM (54) Purchase personal property, application of surviving spouse to DN ___________________________________________________ $10.00 DO (55) Purchase real property at appraised value, petition of surviving spouse to DP ___________________________________________________ $20.00 DQ (56) Receipts in addition to advertising charges, application and order to record DR ___________________________________________________ $5.00 DS Record of those receipts, additional, per page DT ___________________________________________________ $1.00 DU (57) Record in excess of fifteen hundred words in any proceeding in the probate court, per page DV ___________________________________________________ $1.00 DW (58) Release of estate by mortgagee or other lienholder DX ___________________________________________________ $5.00 DY (59) Relieving an estate from administration under section 2113.03 of the Revised Code or granting an order for a summary release from administration under section 2113.031 of the Revised Code DZ ___________________________________________________ $60.00 EA (60) Removal of fiduciary, application for EB ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EC (61) Requalification of executor or administrator ED ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EE (62) Resignation of fiduciary EF ___________________________________________________ $5.00 EG (63) Sale bill, public sale of personal property EH ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EI (64) Sale of personal property and report, application for EJ ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EK (65) Sale of real property, petition for EL ___________________________________________________ $25.00 EM (66) Terminate guardianship, petition to EN ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EO (67) Transfer of real property, application, entry, and certificate for EP ___________________________________________________ $7.00 EQ (68) Unclaimed money, application to invest ER ___________________________________________________ $7.00 ES (69) Vacate approval of account or order of distribution, motion to ET ___________________________________________________ $10.00 EU (70) Writ of execution EV ___________________________________________________ $5.00 EW (71) Writ of possession EX ___________________________________________________ $5.00 EY (72) Wrongful death, application and settlement of claim for EZ ___________________________________________________ $20.00 FA (73) Year's allowance, petition to review FB ___________________________________________________ $7.00 FC (74) Guardian's report, filing and review of FD ___________________________________________________ $5.00 FE (75) Person with a mental illness subject to court order, filing of affidavit and proceedings for FF ___________________________________________________ $25.00 (B)(1) In relation to an application for the appointment of a guardian or the review of a report of a guardian under section 2111.49 of the Revised Code, the probate court, pursuant to court order or in accordance with a court rule, may direct that the applicant or the estate pay any or all of the expenses of an investigation conducted pursuant to section 2111.041 or division (A)(2) of section 2111.49 of the Revised Code. If the investigation is conducted by a public employee or investigator who is paid by the county, the fees for the investigation shall be paid into the county treasury. If the court finds that an alleged incompetent or a ward is indigent, the court may waive the costs, fees, and expenses of an investigation. (2) In relation to the appointment or functioning of a guardian for a minor or the guardianship of a minor, the probate court may direct that the applicant or the estate pay any or all of the expenses of an investigation conducted pursuant to section 2111.042 of the Revised Code. If the investigation is conducted by a public employee or investigator who is paid by the county, the fees for the investigation shall be paid into the county treasury. If the court finds that the guardian or applicant is indigent, the court may waive the costs, fees, and expenses of an investigation. (3) In relation to the filing of an affidavit of mental illness for a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court may waive the fee under division (A)(75) of this section if the court finds that the affiant is indigent or for good cause shown. (C) Thirty dollars of the thirty-five-dollar fee collected pursuant to division (A)(34) of this section and twenty dollars of the sixty-dollar fee collected pursuant to division (A)(59) of this section shall be deposited by the county treasurer in the indigent guardianship fund created pursuant to section 2111.51 of the Revised Code. (D) The fees of witnesses, jurors, sheriffs, coroners, and constables for services rendered in the probate court or by order of the probate judge shall be the same as provided for similar services in the court of common pleas. (E) The probate court, by rule, may require an advance deposit for costs, not to exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars, at the time application is made for an appointment as executor or administrator or at the time a will is presented for probate. (F)(1) The "putative father registry fund" is hereby created in the state treasury. The department of job and family services children and youth shall use the money in the fund to fund the department's costs of performing its duties related to the putative father registry established under section 3107.062 of the Revised Code. (2) If the department determines that money in the putative father registry fund is more than is needed for its duties related to the putative father registry, the department may use the surplus moneys in the fund as permitted in division (D) of section 2151.3527 or section 5103.155 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2108.34. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the second chance trust fund. The fund shall consist of voluntary contributions deposited as provided in sections 4501.028 and 4503.721 of the Revised Code. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. (B) The director of health shall use the money in the fund only for the following purposes: (1) Development and implementation of a campaign that explains and promotes the second chance trust fund; (2) Development and implementation of local and statewide public education programs about organ, tissue, and eye donation, including the informational material required to be provided under section 4501.028 of the Revised Code; (3) Development and implementation of local and statewide donor awareness programs in schools; (4) Development and implementation of local and statewide programs to recognize donor families; (5) Development and distribution of materials promoting organ, tissue, and eye donation; (6) Cooperation with the Ohio Supreme Court, Ohio State Bar Association, and law schools of this state to more effectively educate attorneys about the donation of anatomical gifts and to encourage them to assist their clients in donating anatomical gifts through anatomical gift declarations, durable powers of attorney for health care, and any other appropriate means; (7) Cooperation with the state medical board, state medical, osteopathic, and ophthalmological associations, and colleges of medicine and osteopathic medicine in this state to more effectively educate physicians about the donation of anatomical gifts and to encourage them to assist their patients in making declarations of anatomical gifts; (8) Development of statewide hospital training programs to encourage and facilitate compliance with sections 2108.14 and 2108.15 of the Revised Code; (9) Reimbursement of the bureau of motor vehicles for the administrative costs incurred in the performance of duties under section 4501.028 of the Revised Code; (10) Reimbursement of the department of health for administrative costs incurred in the performance of duties under this section and section 2108.35 of the Revised Code; (11) Reimbursement of members of the second chance fund advisory committee for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties. (C) The director shall make the materials developed under division (B)(5) of this section available to other state agencies. (D) The director shall consider recommendations made by the second chance trust fund advisory committee pursuant to section 2108.35 of the Revised Code. The director shall determine the appropriateness of and approve or disapprove projects recommended by the advisory committee for funding and approve or disapprove the disbursement of money from the second chance trust fund. Sec. 2151.27. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, any person having knowledge of a child who appears to have violated section 2151.87 of the Revised Code or to be a juvenile traffic offender or to be an unruly, abused, neglected, or dependent child may file a sworn complaint with respect to that child in the juvenile court of the county in which the child has a residence or legal settlement or in which the violation, unruliness, abuse, neglect, or dependency allegedly occurred. If an alleged abused, neglected, or dependent child is taken into custody pursuant to division (D) of section 2151.31 of the Revised Code or is taken into custody pursuant to division (A) of section 2151.31 of the Revised Code without the filing of a complaint and placed into shelter care pursuant to division (C) of that section, a sworn complaint shall be filed with respect to the child before the end of the next day after the day on which the child was taken into custody. The sworn complaint may be upon information and belief, and, in addition to the allegation that the child committed the violation or is an unruly, abused, neglected, or dependent child, the complaint shall allege the particular facts upon which the allegation that the child committed the violation or is an unruly, abused, neglected, or dependent child is based. (2) Any person having knowledge of a child who appears to be an unruly child for being an habitual truant may file a sworn complaint with respect to that child and the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child in the juvenile court of the county in which the child has a residence or legal settlement or in which the child is supposed to attend public school. The sworn complaint may be upon information and belief and shall contain the following allegations: (a) That the child is an unruly child for being an habitual truant and, in addition, the particular facts upon which that allegation is based; (b) That the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child has failed to cause the child's attendance at school in violation of section 3321.38 of the Revised Code and, in addition, the particular facts upon which that allegation is based. (B) If a child, before arriving at the age of eighteen years, allegedly commits an act for which the child may be adjudicated an unruly child and if the specific complaint alleging the act is not filed or a hearing on that specific complaint is not held until after the child arrives at the age of eighteen years, the court has jurisdiction to hear and dispose of the complaint as if the complaint were filed and the hearing held before the child arrived at the age of eighteen years. (C) If the complainant in a case in which a child is alleged to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child desires permanent custody of the child or children, temporary custody of the child or children, whether as the preferred or an alternative disposition, or the placement of the child in a planned permanent living arrangement, the complaint shall contain a prayer specifically requesting permanent custody, temporary custody, or the placement of the child in a planned permanent living arrangement. (D) Any person with standing under applicable law may file a complaint for the determination of any other matter over which the juvenile court is given jurisdiction by section 2151.23 of the Revised Code. The complaint shall be filed in the county in which the child who is the subject of the complaint is found or was last known to be found. (E) A public children services agency, acting pursuant to a complaint or an action on a complaint filed under this section, is not subject to the requirements of section 3127.23 of the Revised Code. (F) Upon the filing of a complaint alleging that a child is an unruly child, the court may hold the complaint in abeyance pending the child's successful completion of actions that constitute a method to divert the child from the juvenile court system. The method may be adopted by a county pursuant to divisions (D) and (E) of section 121.37 of the Revised Code or it may be another method that the court considers satisfactory. If the child completes the actions to the court's satisfaction, the court may dismiss the complaint. If the child fails to complete the actions to the court's satisfaction, the court may consider the complaint. (G) Upon the filing of a complaint that a child is an unruly child that is based solely on a child being an habitual truant, the court shall consider an alternative to adjudication, including actions that constitute a method to divert the child from the juvenile court system, using the Rules of Juvenile Procedure, or by any other means if such an alternative is available to the court and the child has not already participated or failed to complete one of the available alternatives. The court shall consider the complaint only as a matter of last resort. (H) If a complaint that a child is an unruly child based on the child being an habitual truant proceeds to consideration by the court, the prosecution shall bear the burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt the following: (1) That the child is of compulsory school age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code; (2) That the child was absent without legitimate excuse for absence from the public school the child was supposed to attend for thirty or more consecutive hours, forty-two or more hours in one school month, or seventy-two or more hours in a school year. The child may assert as an affirmative defense the fact that the child did participate in, or made satisfactory progress on, the absence intervention plan any interventions or other alternatives to adjudication as described in division (C) of section 3321.191 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.311. (A) A person taking a child into custody shall, with all reasonable speed and in accordance with division (C) of this section, either: (1) Release the child to the child's parents, guardian, or other custodian, unless the child's detention or shelter care appears to be warranted or required as provided in section 2151.31 of the Revised Code; (2) Bring the child to the court or deliver the child to a place of detention or shelter care designated by the court and promptly give notice thereof, together with a statement of the reason for taking the child into custody, to a parent, guardian, or other custodian and to the court. (B) If a parent, guardian, or other custodian fails, when requested by the court, to bring the child before the court as provided by this section, the court may issue its warrant directing that the child be taken into custody and brought before the court. (C)(1) Before taking any action required by division (A) of this section, a person taking a child into custody may hold the child for processing purposes in a county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or other place where an adult convicted of crime, under arrest, or charged with crime is held for either of the following periods of time: (a) For a period not to exceed six hours, if all of the following apply: (i) The child is alleged to be a delinquent child for the commission of an act that would be a felony if committed by an adult; (ii) The child remains beyond the range of touch of all adult detainees; (iii) The child is visually supervised by jail or workhouse personnel at all times during the detention; (iv) The child is not handcuffed or otherwise physically secured to a stationary object during the detention. (b) For a period not to exceed three hours, if all of the following apply: (i) The child is alleged to be a delinquent child for the commission of an act that would be a misdemeanor if committed by an adult, is alleged to be a delinquent child for violating a court order regarding the child's adjudication as an unruly child for being an habitual truant, or is alleged to be an unruly child or a juvenile traffic offender; (ii) The child remains beyond the range of touch of all adult detainees; (iii) The child is visually supervised by jail or workhouse personnel at all times during the detention; (iv) The child is not handcuffed or otherwise physically secured to a stationary object during the detention. (2) If a child has been transferred to an adult court for prosecution for the alleged commission of a criminal offense, subsequent to the transfer, the child may be held as described in division (F) of section 2152.26 or division (B)(C) of section 5120.16 of the Revised Code. (D) If a person who is alleged to be or has been adjudicated a delinquent child or who is in any other category of persons identified in this section is confined under authority of this section in a place specified in division (C) of this section, the fact of the person's admission to and confinement in that place is restricted as described in division (G) of section 2152.26 of the Revised Code. (E) As used in division (C)(1) of this section, "processing purposes" means all of the following: (1) Fingerprinting, photographing, or fingerprinting and photographing the child in a secure area of the facility; (2) Interrogating the child, contacting the child's parent or guardian, arranging for placement of the child, or arranging for transfer or transferring the child, while holding the child in a nonsecure area of the facility. Sec. 2151.316. (A) The department of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to establish and enforce a foster youth bill of rights for individuals who are in the temporary or permanent custody of a public children services agency or a planned permanent living arrangement or in the Title IV-E eligible care and placement responsibility of a juvenile court or other governmental agency that provides Title IV-E reimbursable placement services and who are subject to out-of-home care or placed with a kinship caregiver as defined in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (B) If the rights of an individual, as established under division (A) of this section, conflict with the rights of a resource family or resource caregiver, as established in section 5103.163 of the Revised Code, the rights of the individual shall preempt the rights of the resource family or resource caregiver. (C) The rights established by rules under this section shall not create grounds for a civil action against the department, the recommending agency, or the custodial agency. Sec. 2151.356. (A) The records of a case in which a person was adjudicated a delinquent child for committing a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, or 2907.02 of the Revised Code shall not be sealed under this section. (B)(1) The juvenile court shall promptly order the immediate sealing of records pertaining to a juvenile in any of the following circumstances: (a) If the court receives a record from a public office or agency under division (B)(2) of this section; (b) If a person was brought before or referred to the court for allegedly committing a delinquent or unruly act and the case was resolved without the filing of a complaint against the person with respect to that act pursuant to section 2151.27 of the Revised Code; (c) If a person was charged with violating division (E)(1) of section 4301.69 of the Revised Code and the person has successfully completed a diversion program under division (E)(2)(a) of section 4301.69 of the Revised Code with respect to that charge; (d) If a complaint was filed against a person alleging that the person was a delinquent child, an unruly child, or a juvenile traffic offender and the court dismisses does both of the following: (i) Dismisses the complaint after a trial on the merits of the case or finds the person not to be a delinquent child, an unruly child, or a juvenile traffic offender; (ii) Finds that the harm to the person alleged to be a delinquent child, an unruly child, or a juvenile traffic offender in having the records pertaining to the case disclosed is not outweighed by the potential benefits to the public in having access to those records. (e) Notwithstanding division (C) of this section and subject to section 2151.358 of the Revised Code, if a person has been adjudicated an unruly child, that and both of the following apply: (i) The person has attained eighteen years of age, and the person is not under the jurisdiction of the court in relation to a complaint alleging the person to be a delinquent child. (ii) The court finds that the harm to the person in having the records pertaining to the case disclosed is not outweighed by the potential benefits to the public in having access to those records. (2) The appropriate public office or agency shall immediately deliver all original records at that public office or agency pertaining to a juvenile to the court, if the person was arrested or taken into custody for allegedly committing a delinquent or unruly act, no complaint was filed against the person with respect to the commission of the act pursuant to section 2151.27 of the Revised Code, and the person was not brought before or referred to the court for the commission of the act. The records delivered to the court as required under this division shall not include fingerprints, DNA specimens, and DNA records described under division (A)(3) of section 2151.357 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The juvenile court shall consider the sealing of records pertaining to a juvenile upon the court's own motion or upon the application of a person if the person has been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act other than a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, or 2907.02 of the Revised Code, an unruly child, or a juvenile traffic offender and if, at the time of the motion or application, the person is not under the jurisdiction of the court in relation to a complaint alleging the person to be a delinquent child. The court shall not require a fee for the filing of the application. The motion or application may be made on or after the time specified in whichever of the following is applicable: (a) If the person is under eighteen years of age, at any time after six months after any of the following events occur: (i) The termination of any order made by the court in relation to the adjudication; (ii) The unconditional discharge of the person from the department of youth services with respect to a dispositional order made in relation to the adjudication or from an institution or facility to which the person was committed pursuant to a dispositional order made in relation to the adjudication; (iii) The court enters an order under section 2152.84 or 2152.85 of the Revised Code that contains a determination that the child is no longer a juvenile offender registrant. (b) If the person is eighteen years of age or older, at any time after the later of the following: (i) The person's attainment of eighteen years of age; (ii) The occurrence of any event identified in divisions (C)(1)(a)(i) to (iii) of this section. (2) In making the determination whether to seal records pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) The court may require a person filing an application under division (C)(1) of this section to submit any relevant documentation to support the application. (b) The court may cause an investigation to be made to determine if the person who is the subject of the proceedings has been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree. (c) The court shall promptly, but not less than thirty days prior to the hearing, notify the prosecuting attorney of any proceedings to seal records initiated pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section. The prosecutor shall provide timely notice to a victim and a victim's representative, if applicable, if the victim or victim's representative requested notice of the proceedings in the underlying case. (d)(i) The prosecuting attorney may file a response with the court within thirty days of receiving notice of the sealing proceedings. (ii) If the prosecuting attorney does not file a response with the court or if the prosecuting attorney files a response but indicates that the prosecuting attorney does not object to the sealing of the records, the court may order the records of the person that are under consideration to be sealed without conducting a hearing on the motion or application. If the court decides in its discretion to conduct a hearing on the motion or application, the court shall conduct the hearing within thirty days after making that decision and shall give notice, by regular mail, of the date, time, and location of the hearing to the prosecuting attorney and to the person who is the subject of the records under consideration. The victim, the victim's representative, and the victim's attorney, if applicable, may be present and heard orally, in writing, or both at any hearing under this division. The court shall consider the oral and written statement of any victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable. (iii) If the prosecuting attorney files a response with the court that indicates that the prosecuting attorney objects to the sealing of the records, the court shall conduct a hearing on the motion or application within thirty days after the court receives the response. The court shall give notice, by regular mail, of the date, time, and location of the hearing to the prosecuting attorney and to the person who is the subject of the records under consideration. The victim, the victim's representative, and the victim's attorney, if applicable, may be present and heard orally, in writing, or both at any hearing under this division. The court shall consider the oral and written statement of any victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable. (e) After conducting a hearing in accordance with division (C)(2)(d) of this section or after due consideration when a hearing is not conducted, except as provided in division (B)(1)(c) of this section, the court may order the records of the person that are the subject of the motion or application to be sealed if it finds that the person has been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree. In determining whether the person has been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree, the court may consider all of the following: (i) The age of the person; (ii) The nature of the case; (iii) The cessation or continuation of delinquent, unruly, or criminal behavior; (iv) The education and employment history of the person; (v) The granting of a new tier classification or declassification from the juvenile offender registry pursuant to section 2152.85 of the Revised Code, except for public registry-qualified juvenile offender registrants; (vi) Any other circumstances that may relate to the rehabilitation of the person who is the subject of the records under consideration. (D)(1)(a) The juvenile court shall provide verbal notice to a person whose records are sealed under division (B) of this section, if that person is present in the court at the time the court issues a sealing order, that explains what sealing a record means, states that the person may apply to have those records expunged under section 2151.358 of the Revised Code, and explains what expunging a record means. (b) The juvenile court shall provide written notice to a person whose records are sealed under division (B) of this section by regular mail to the person's last known address, if that person is not present in the court at the time the court issues a sealing order and if the court does not seal the person's record upon the court's own motion, that explains what sealing a record means, states that the person may apply to have those records expunged under section 2151.358 of the Revised Code, and explains what expunging a record means. (2) Upon final disposition of a case in which a person has been adjudicated a delinquent child for committing an act other than a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, or 2907.02 of the Revised Code, an unruly child, or a juvenile traffic offender, the juvenile court shall provide written notice to the person that does all of the following: (a) States that the person may apply to the court for an order to seal the record; (b) Explains what sealing a record means; (c) States that the person may apply to the court for an order to expunge the record under section 2151.358 of the Revised Code; (d) Explains what expunging a record means. (3) The department of youth services and any other institution or facility that unconditionally discharges a person who has been adjudicated a delinquent child, an unruly child, or a juvenile traffic offender shall immediately give notice of the discharge to the court that committed the person. The court shall note the date of discharge on a separate record of discharges of those natures. Sec. 2151.3527. (A) The director of children and youth shall promulgate forms designed to gather pertinent medical information concerning a deserted child and the child's parents. The forms shall clearly and unambiguously state on each page that the information requested is to facilitate medical care for the child, that the forms may be fully or partially completed or left blank, that completing the forms or parts of the forms is completely voluntary, and that no adverse legal consequence will result from failure to complete any part of the forms. (B) The director shall promulgate written materials to be made available to the parents of a child delivered pursuant to section 2151.3516 of the Revised Code. The materials shall describe services available to assist parents and newborns and shall include information directly relevant to situations that might cause parents to desert a child and information on the procedures for a person to follow in order to reunite with a child the person delivered under section 2151.3516 of the Revised Code, including notice that the person will be required to submit to a DNA test, at that person's expense, to prove that the person is the parent of the child. (C) The director of job and family services children and youth shall distribute the medical information forms and written materials promulgated pursuant to this section to all of the following: (1) Entities permitted to receive a deserted child as specified in section 2151.3517 of the Revised Code; (2) Public children services agencies; (3) Other public or private agencies that, in the discretion of the director, are best able to disseminate the forms and materials to the persons who are most in need of the forms and materials. (D) If the department of job and family services determines that money in the putative father registry fund created under section 2101.16 of the Revised Code is more than is needed for its duties related to the putative father registry, the department may use surplus moneys in the fund for costs related to the development, distribution, and publication of forms and materials promulgated pursuant to divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (E) The department of job and family services shall develop an educational plan, in collaboration with the Ohio family and children first cabinet council, for informing at-risk populations who are most likely to voluntarily deliver a child under section 2151.3516 of the Revised Code concerning the provisions of sections 2151.3515 to 2151.3533 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.416. (A) Each agency that is required by section 2151.412 of the Revised Code to prepare a case plan for a child shall complete a semiannual administrative review of the case plan no later than six months after the earlier of the date on which the complaint in the case was filed or the child was first placed in shelter care. After the first administrative review, the agency shall complete semiannual administrative reviews no later than every six months. If the court issues an order pursuant to section 2151.414 or 2151.415 of the Revised Code, the agency shall complete an administrative review no later than six months after the court's order and continue to complete administrative reviews no later than every six months after the first review, except that the court hearing held pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code may take the place of any administrative review that would otherwise be held at the time of the court hearing. When conducting a review, the child's health and safety shall be the paramount concern. (B) Each administrative review required by division (A) of this section shall be conducted by a review panel of at least three persons, including, but not limited to, both of the following: (1) A caseworker with day-to-day responsibility for, or familiarity with, the management of the child's case plan; (2) A person who is not responsible for the management of the child's case plan or for the delivery of services to the child or the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child. (C) Each semiannual administrative review shall include, but not be limited to, a joint meeting by the review panel with the parents, guardian, or custodian of the child, the guardian ad litem of the child, and the child's foster care provider and shall include an opportunity for those persons to submit any written materials to be included in the case record of the child. If a parent, guardian, custodian, guardian ad litem, or foster care provider of the child cannot be located after reasonable efforts to do so or declines to participate in the administrative review after being contacted, the agency does not have to include them in the joint meeting. (D) The agency shall prepare a written summary of the semiannual administrative review that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (1) A conclusion regarding the safety and appropriateness of the child's foster care placement; (2) The extent of the compliance with the case plan of all parties; (3) The extent of progress that has been made toward alleviating the circumstances that required the agency to assume temporary custody of the child; (4) An estimated date by which the child may be returned to and safely maintained in the child's home or placed for adoption or legal custody; (5) An updated case plan that includes any changes that the agency is proposing in the case plan; (6) The recommendation of the agency as to which agency or person should be given custodial rights over the child for the six-month period after the administrative review; (7) The names of all persons who participated in the administrative review; (8) A summary of the agency's intensive efforts to secure a placement with an appropriate and willing kinship caregiver as defined in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code, including any use of search technology to find biological family members of the child and all other efforts undertaken since the last review, unless a court has determined that intensive efforts are unnecessary pursuant to section 2151.4118 of the Revised Code. (E) The agency shall file the summary with the court no later than seven days after the completion of the administrative review. If the agency proposes a change to the case plan as a result of the administrative review, the agency shall file the proposed change with the court at the time it files the summary. The agency shall give notice of the summary and proposed change in writing before the end of the next day after filing them to all parties and the child's guardian ad litem. All parties and the guardian ad litem shall have seven days after the date the notice is sent to object to and request a hearing on the proposed change. (1) If the court receives a timely request for a hearing, the court shall schedule a hearing pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code to be held not later than thirty days after the court receives the request. The court shall give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem. The agency may implement the proposed change after the hearing, if the court approves it. The agency shall not implement the proposed change unless it is approved by the court. (2) If the court does not receive a timely request for a hearing, the court may approve the proposed change without a hearing. If the court approves the proposed change without a hearing, it shall journalize the case plan with the change not later than fourteen days after the change is filed with the court. If the court does not approve the proposed change to the case plan, it shall schedule a review hearing to be held pursuant to section 2151.417 of the Revised Code no later than thirty days after the expiration of the fourteen-day time period and give notice of the date, time, and location of the hearing to all parties and the guardian ad litem of the child. If, despite the requirements of this division and division (D) of section 2151.417 of the Revised Code, the court neither approves and journalizes the proposed change nor conducts a hearing, the agency may implement the proposed change not earlier than fifteen days after it is submitted to the court. (F) The director of children and youth may adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for procedures and standard forms for conducting administrative reviews pursuant to this section. (G) The juvenile court that receives the written summary of the administrative review, upon determining, either from the written summary, case plan, or otherwise, that the custody or care arrangement is not in the best interest of the child, may terminate the custody of an agency and place the child in the custody of another institution or association certified by the department of children and youth under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.4115. (A) As used in sections 2151.4116 to 2151.4122 of the Revised Code: (1) (A) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as used in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (2) (B) "Search technology" means any locate-and-research tool, search engine, electronic database, or social media search tool available to a public children services agency or a private child placing agency. Sec. 2151.421. (A)(1)(a) No person described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section who is acting in an official or professional capacity and knows, or has reasonable cause to suspect based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in a similar position to suspect, that a child under eighteen years of age, or a person under twenty-one years of age with a developmental disability or physical impairment, has suffered or faces a threat of suffering any physical or mental wound, injury, disability, or condition of a nature that reasonably indicates abuse or neglect of the child shall fail to immediately report that knowledge or reasonable cause to suspect to the entity or persons specified in this division. Except as otherwise provided in this division or section 5120.173 of the Revised Code, the person making the report shall make it to the public children services agency or a peace officer in the county in which the child resides or in which the abuse or neglect is occurring or has occurred. If the person making the report is a peace officer, the officer shall make it to the public children services agency in the county in which the child resides or in which the abuse or neglect is occurring or has occurred. In the circumstances described in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code, the person making the report shall make it to the entity specified in that section. (b) Division (A)(1)(a) of this section applies to any person who is an attorney; health care professional; practitioner of a limited branch of medicine as specified in section 4731.15 of the Revised Code; licensed school psychologist; independent marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist; coroner; administrator or employee of a child care center; administrator or employee of a residential camp, child day camp, or private, nonprofit therapeutic wilderness camp; administrator or employee of a certified child care agency or other public or private children services agency; school teacher; school employee; school authority; peace officer; humane society agent; dog warden, deputy dog warden, or other person appointed to act as an animal control officer for a municipal corporation or township in accordance with state law, an ordinance, or a resolution; person, other than a cleric, rendering spiritual treatment through prayer in accordance with the tenets of a well-recognized religion; employee of a county department of job and family services who is a professional and who works with children and families; employee of an entity that provides home visiting services under the help me grow program established by the department of children and youth pursuant to section 5180.21 of the Revised Code; superintendent or regional administrator employed by the department of youth services; superintendent, board member, or employee of a county board of developmental disabilities; investigative agent contracted with by a county board of developmental disabilities; employee of the department of developmental disabilities; employee of a facility or home that provides respite care in accordance with section 5123.171 of the Revised Code; employee of an entity that provides homemaker services; employee of a qualified organization as defined in section 2151.90 of the Revised Code; a host family as defined in section 2151.90 of the Revised Code; foster caregiver; a person performing the duties of an assessor pursuant to Chapter 3107. or 5103. of the Revised Code; third party employed by a public children services agency to assist in providing child or family related services; court appointed special advocate; or guardian ad litem. (c) If two or more health care professionals, after providing health care services to a child, determine or suspect that the child has been or is being abused or neglected, the health care professionals may designate one of the health care professionals to report the abuse or neglect. A single report made under this division shall meet the reporting requirements of division (A)(1) of this section. (2) Except as provided in division (A)(3) of this section, an attorney, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse is not required to make a report pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section concerning any communication the attorney, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse receives from a client or patient in an attorney-client, physician-patient, or advanced practice registered nurse-patient relationship, if, in accordance with division (A) or (B) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code, the attorney, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse could not testify with respect to that communication in a civil or criminal proceeding. (3) The client or patient in an attorney-client, physician-patient, or advanced practice registered nurse-patient relationship described in division (A)(2) of this section is deemed to have waived any testimonial privilege under division (A) or (B) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code with respect to any communication the attorney, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse receives from the client or patient in that relationship, and the attorney, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse shall make a report pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section with respect to that communication, if all of the following apply: (a) The client or patient, at the time of the communication, is a child under eighteen years of age or is a person under twenty-one years of age with a developmental disability or physical impairment. (b) The attorney, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse knows, or has reasonable cause to suspect based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in similar position to suspect that the client or patient has suffered or faces a threat of suffering any physical or mental wound, injury, disability, or condition of a nature that reasonably indicates abuse or neglect of the client or patient. (c) The abuse or neglect does not arise out of the client's or patient's attempt to have an abortion without the notification of her parents, guardian, or custodian in accordance with section 2151.85 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) No cleric and no person, other than a volunteer, designated by any church, religious society, or faith acting as a leader, official, or delegate on behalf of the church, religious society, or faith who is acting in an official or professional capacity, who knows, or has reasonable cause to believe based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in a similar position to believe, that a child under eighteen years of age, or a person under twenty-one years of age with a developmental disability or physical impairment, has suffered or faces a threat of suffering any physical or mental wound, injury, disability, or condition of a nature that reasonably indicates abuse or neglect of the child, and who knows, or has reasonable cause to believe based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in a similar position to believe, that another cleric or another person, other than a volunteer, designated by a church, religious society, or faith acting as a leader, official, or delegate on behalf of the church, religious society, or faith caused, or poses the threat of causing, the wound, injury, disability, or condition that reasonably indicates abuse or neglect shall fail to immediately report that knowledge or reasonable cause to believe to the entity or persons specified in this division. Except as provided in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code, the person making the report shall make it to the public children services agency or a peace officer in the county in which the child resides or in which the abuse or neglect is occurring or has occurred. In the circumstances described in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code, the person making the report shall make it to the entity specified in that section. (b) Except as provided in division (A)(4)(c) of this section, a cleric is not required to make a report pursuant to division (A)(4)(a) of this section concerning any communication the cleric receives from a penitent in a cleric-penitent relationship, if, in accordance with division (C) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code, the cleric could not testify with respect to that communication in a civil or criminal proceeding. (c) The penitent in a cleric-penitent relationship described in division (A)(4)(b) of this section is deemed to have waived any testimonial privilege under division (C) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code with respect to any communication the cleric receives from the penitent in that cleric-penitent relationship, and the cleric shall make a report pursuant to division (A)(4)(a) of this section with respect to that communication, if all of the following apply: (i) The penitent, at the time of the communication, is a child under eighteen years of age or is a person under twenty-one years of age with a developmental disability or physical impairment. (ii) The cleric knows, or has reasonable cause to believe based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in a similar position to believe, as a result of the communication or any observations made during that communication, the penitent has suffered or faces a threat of suffering any physical or mental wound, injury, disability, or condition of a nature that reasonably indicates abuse or neglect of the penitent. (iii) The abuse or neglect does not arise out of the penitent's attempt to have an abortion performed upon a child under eighteen years of age or upon a person under twenty-one years of age with a developmental disability or physical impairment without the notification of her parents, guardian, or custodian in accordance with section 2151.85 of the Revised Code. (d) Divisions (A)(4)(a) and (c) of this section do not apply in a cleric-penitent relationship when the disclosure of any communication the cleric receives from the penitent is in violation of the sacred trust. (e) As used in divisions (A)(1) and (4) of this section, "cleric" and "sacred trust" have the same meanings as in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code. (B) Anyone who knows, or has reasonable cause to suspect based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in similar circumstances to suspect, that a child under eighteen years of age, or a person under twenty-one years of age with a developmental disability or physical impairment, has suffered or faces a threat of suffering any physical or mental wound, injury, disability, or other condition of a nature that reasonably indicates abuse or neglect of the child may report or cause reports to be made of that knowledge or reasonable cause to suspect to the entity or persons specified in this division. Except as provided in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code, a person making a report or causing a report to be made under this division shall make it or cause it to be made to the public children services agency or to a peace officer. In the circumstances described in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code, a person making a report or causing a report to be made under this division shall make it or cause it to be made to the entity specified in that section. (C) Any report made pursuant to division (A) or (B) of this section shall be made forthwith either by telephone, in person, or electronically and shall be followed by a written report, if requested by the receiving agency or officer. The written report shall contain: (1) The names and addresses of the child and the child's parents or the person or persons having custody of the child, if known; (2) The child's age and the nature and extent of the child's injuries, abuse, or neglect that is known or reasonably suspected or believed, as applicable, to have occurred or of the threat of injury, abuse, or neglect that is known or reasonably suspected or believed, as applicable, to exist, including any evidence of previous injuries, abuse, or neglect; (3) Any other information, including, but not limited to, results and reports of any medical examinations, tests, or procedures performed under division (D) of this section, that might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injury, abuse, or neglect that is known or reasonably suspected or believed, as applicable, to have occurred or of the threat of injury, abuse, or neglect that is known or reasonably suspected or believed, as applicable, to exist. (D)(1) Any person, who is required by division (A) of this section to report child abuse or child neglect that is known or reasonably suspected or believed to have occurred, may take or cause to be taken color photographs of areas of trauma visible on a child and, if medically necessary for the purpose of diagnosing or treating injuries that are suspected to have occurred as a result of child abuse or child neglect, perform or cause to be performed radiological examinations and any other medical examinations of, and tests or procedures on, the child. (2) The results and any available reports of examinations, tests, or procedures made under division (D)(1) of this section shall be included in a report made pursuant to division (A) of this section. Any additional reports of examinations, tests, or procedures that become available shall be provided to the public children services agency, upon request. (3) If a health care professional provides health care services in a hospital, children's advocacy center, or emergency medical facility to a child about whom a report has been made under division (A) of this section, the health care professional may take any steps that are reasonably necessary for the release or discharge of the child to an appropriate environment. Before the child's release or discharge, the health care professional may obtain information, or consider information obtained, from other entities or individuals that have knowledge about the child. Nothing in division (D)(3) of this section shall be construed to alter the responsibilities of any person under sections 2151.27 and 2151.31 of the Revised Code. (4) A health care professional may conduct medical examinations, tests, or procedures on the siblings of a child about whom a report has been made under division (A) of this section and on other children who reside in the same home as the child, if the professional determines that the examinations, tests, or procedures are medically necessary to diagnose or treat the siblings or other children in order to determine whether reports under division (A) of this section are warranted with respect to such siblings or other children. The results of the examinations, tests, or procedures on the siblings and other children may be included in a report made pursuant to division (A) of this section. (5) Medical examinations, tests, or procedures conducted under divisions (D)(1) and (4) of this section and decisions regarding the release or discharge of a child under division (D)(3) of this section do not constitute a law enforcement investigation or activity. (E)(1) When a peace officer receives a report made pursuant to division (A) or (B) of this section, upon receipt of the report, the peace officer who receives the report shall refer the report to the appropriate public children services agency, in accordance with requirements specified under division (B)(6) of section 2151.4221 of the Revised Code, unless an arrest is made at the time of the report that results in the appropriate public children services agency being contacted concerning the possible abuse or neglect of a child or the possible threat of abuse or neglect of a child. (2) When a public children services agency receives a report pursuant to this division or division (A) or (B) of this section, upon receipt of the report, the public children services agency shall do all of the following: (a) Comply with section 2151.422 of the Revised Code; (b) If the county served by the agency is also served by a children's advocacy center and the report alleges sexual abuse of a child or another type of abuse of a child that is specified in the memorandum of understanding that creates the center as being within the center's jurisdiction, comply regarding the report with the protocol and procedures for referrals and investigations, with the coordinating activities, and with the authority or responsibility for performing or providing functions, activities, and services stipulated in the interagency agreement entered into under section 2151.428 of the Revised Code relative to that center; (c) Unless an arrest is made at the time of the report that results in the appropriate law enforcement agency being contacted concerning the possible abuse or neglect of a child or the possible threat of abuse or neglect of a child, and in accordance with requirements specified under division (B)(6) of section 2151.4221 of the Revised Code, notify the appropriate law enforcement agency of the report, if the public children services agency received either of the following: (i) A report of abuse of a child; (ii) A report of neglect of a child that alleges a type of neglect identified by the department of children and youth in rules adopted under division (L)(2) of this section. (F) No peace officer shall remove a child about whom a report is made pursuant to this section from the child's parents, stepparents, or guardian or any other persons having custody of the child without consultation with the public children services agency, unless, in the judgment of the officer, and, if the report was made by a physician or advanced practice registered nurse, the physician or nurse, immediate removal is considered essential to protect the child from further abuse or neglect. The agency that must be consulted shall be the agency conducting the investigation of the report as determined pursuant to section 2151.422 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) Except as provided in section 2151.422 of the Revised Code or in an interagency agreement entered into under section 2151.428 of the Revised Code that applies to the particular report, the public children services agency shall investigate, within twenty-four hours, each report of child abuse or child neglect that is known or reasonably suspected or believed to have occurred and of a threat of child abuse or child neglect that is known or reasonably suspected or believed to exist that is referred to it under this section to determine the circumstances surrounding the injuries, abuse, or neglect or the threat of injury, abuse, or neglect, the cause of the injuries, abuse, neglect, or threat, and the person or persons responsible. The investigation shall be made in cooperation with the law enforcement agency and in accordance with the memorandum of understanding prepared under sections 2151.4220 to 2151.4234 of the Revised Code. A representative of the public children services agency shall, at the time of initial contact with the person subject to the investigation, inform the person of the specific complaints or allegations made against the person. The information shall be given in a manner that is consistent with division (I)(1) of this section and protects the rights of the person making the report under this section. A failure to make the investigation in accordance with the memorandum is not grounds for, and shall not result in, the dismissal of any charges or complaint arising from the report or the suppression of any evidence obtained as a result of the report and does not give, and shall not be construed as giving, any rights or any grounds for appeal or post-conviction relief to any person. The public children services agency shall report each case to the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system that the department of children and youth shall maintain in accordance with section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code. The public children services agency shall submit a report of its investigation, in writing, to the law enforcement agency. (2) The public children services agency shall make any recommendations to the county prosecuting attorney or city director of law that it considers necessary to protect any children that are brought to its attention. (H)(1)(a) Except as provided in divisions (H)(1)(b) and (I)(3) of this section, any person, health care professional, hospital, institution, school, health department, or agency shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability for injury, death, or loss to person or property that otherwise might be incurred or imposed as a result of any of the following: (i) Participating in the making of reports pursuant to division (A) of this section or in the making of reports in good faith, pursuant to division (B) of this section; (ii) Participating in medical examinations, tests, or procedures under division (D) of this section; (iii) Providing information used in a report made pursuant to division (A) of this section or providing information in good faith used in a report made pursuant to division (B) of this section; (iv) Participating in a judicial proceeding resulting from a report made pursuant to division (A) of this section or participating in good faith in a proceeding resulting from a report made pursuant to division (B) of this section. (b) Immunity under division (H)(1)(a)(ii) of this section shall not apply when a health care provider has deviated from the standard of care applicable to the provider's profession. (c) Notwithstanding section 4731.22 of the Revised Code, the physician-patient privilege shall not be a ground for excluding evidence regarding a child's injuries, abuse, or neglect, or the cause of the injuries, abuse, or neglect in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report submitted pursuant to this section. (2) In any civil or criminal action or proceeding in which it is alleged and proved that participation in the making of a report under this section was not in good faith or participation in a judicial proceeding resulting from a report made under this section was not in good faith, the court shall award the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and costs and, if a civil action or proceeding is voluntarily dismissed, may award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the party against whom the civil action or proceeding is brought. (I)(1) Except as provided in divisions (I)(4) and (N) of this section and sections 2151.423 and 2151.4210 of the Revised Code, a report made under this section is confidential. The information provided in a report made pursuant to this section and the name of the person who made the report shall not be released for use, and shall not be used, as evidence in any civil action or proceeding brought against the person who made the report. Nothing in this division shall preclude the use of reports of other incidents of known or suspected abuse or neglect in a civil action or proceeding brought pursuant to division (M) of this section against a person who is alleged to have violated division (A)(1) of this section, provided that any information in a report that would identify the child who is the subject of the report or the maker of the report, if the maker of the report is not the defendant or an agent or employee of the defendant, has been redacted. In a criminal proceeding, the report is admissible in evidence in accordance with the Rules of Evidence and is subject to discovery in accordance with the Rules of Criminal Procedure. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (I)(2)(b) of this section, no person shall permit or encourage the unauthorized dissemination of the contents of any report made under this section. (b) A health care professional that obtains the same information contained in a report made under this section from a source other than the report may disseminate the information, if its dissemination is otherwise permitted by law. (3) A person who knowingly makes or causes another person to make a false report under division (B) of this section that alleges that any person has committed an act or omission that resulted in a child being an abused child or a neglected child is guilty of a violation of section 2921.14 of the Revised Code. (4) If a report is made pursuant to division (A) or (B) of this section and the child who is the subject of the report dies for any reason at any time after the report is made, but before the child attains eighteen years of age, the public children services agency or peace officer to which the report was made or referred, on the request of the child fatality review board, the suicide fatality review committee, or the director of health pursuant to guidelines established under section 3701.70 of the Revised Code, shall submit a summary sheet of information providing a summary of the report to the review board or review committee of the county in which the deceased child resided at the time of death or to the director. On the request of the review board, review committee, or director, the agency or peace officer may, at its discretion, make the report available to the review board, review committee, or director. If the county served by the public children services agency is also served by a children's advocacy center and the report of alleged sexual abuse of a child or another type of abuse of a child is specified in the memorandum of understanding that creates the center as being within the center's jurisdiction, the agency or center shall perform the duties and functions specified in this division in accordance with the interagency agreement entered into under section 2151.428 of the Revised Code relative to that advocacy center. (5) Not later than five business days after the determination of a disposition, a public children services agency shall advise a person alleged to have inflicted abuse or neglect on a child who is the subject of a report made pursuant to this section, including a report alleging sexual abuse of a child or another type of abuse of a child referred to a children's advocacy center pursuant to an interagency agreement entered into under section 2151.428 of the Revised Code, in writing of the disposition of the investigation. The agency shall not provide to the person any information that identifies the person who made the report, statements of witnesses, or police or other investigative reports. The written notice of disposition shall be made in a form designated by the department of job and family services children and youth and shall inform the person of the right to appeal the disposition. (J) Any report that is required by this section, other than a report that is made to the state highway patrol as described in section 5120.173 of the Revised Code, shall result in protective services and emergency supportive services being made available by the public children services agency on behalf of the children about whom the report is made. The agency required to provide the services shall be the agency conducting the investigation of the report pursuant to section 2151.422 of the Revised Code. If a child family is determined to be a candidate for benefit from prevention services, the agency also shall may make efforts to prevent neglect or abuse, to enhance a child's welfare, and to preserve the family unit intact by referring a report for assessment and provision of services to an agency providing prevention services, if appropriate prevention services are available from a local provider or other reasonable source. (K)(1) Except as provided in division (K)(4) or (5) of this section, a person who is required to make a report under division (A) of this section may make a reasonable number of requests of the public children services agency that receives or is referred the report, or of the children's advocacy center that is referred the report if the report is referred to a children's advocacy center pursuant to an interagency agreement entered into under section 2151.428 of the Revised Code, to be provided with the following information: (a) Whether the agency or center has initiated an investigation of the report; (b) Whether the agency or center is continuing to investigate the report; (c) Whether the agency or center is otherwise involved with the child who is the subject of the report; (d) The general status of the health and safety of the child who is the subject of the report; (e) Whether the report has resulted in the filing of a complaint in juvenile court or of criminal charges in another court. (2)(a) A person may request the information specified in division (K)(1) of this section only if, at the time the report is made, the person's name, address, and telephone number are provided to the person who receives the report. (b) When a peace officer or employee of a public children services agency receives a report pursuant to division (A) or (B) of this section the recipient of the report shall inform the person of the right to request the information described in division (K)(1) of this section. The recipient of the report shall include in the initial child abuse or child neglect report that the person making the report was so informed and, if provided at the time of the making of the report, shall include the person's name, address, and telephone number in the report. (c) If the person making the report provides the person's name and contact information on making the report, the public children services agency that received or was referred the report shall send a written notice via United States mail or electronic mail, in accordance with the person's preference, to the person not later than seven calendar days after receipt of the report. The notice shall provide the status of the agency's investigation into the report made, who the person may contact at the agency for further information, and a description of the person's rights under division (K)(1) of this section. (d) Each request is subject to verification of the identity of the person making the report. If that person's identity is verified, the agency shall provide the person with the information described in division (K)(1) of this section a reasonable number of times, except that the agency shall not disclose any confidential information regarding the child who is the subject of the report other than the information described in those divisions. (3) A request made pursuant to division (K)(1) of this section is not a substitute for any report required to be made pursuant to division (A) of this section. (4) If an agency other than the agency that received or was referred the report is conducting the investigation of the report pursuant to section 2151.422 of the Revised Code, the agency conducting the investigation shall comply with the requirements of division (K) of this section. (5) A health care professional who made a report under division (A) of this section, or on whose behalf such a report was made as provided in division (A)(1)(c) of this section, may authorize a person to obtain the information described in division (K)(1) of this section if the person requesting the information is associated with or acting on behalf of the health care professional who provided health care services to the child about whom the report was made. (6) If the person making the report provides the person's name and contact information on making the report, the public children services agency that received or was referred the report shall send a written notice via United States mail or electronic mail, in accordance with the person's preference, to the person not later than seven calendar days after the agency closes the investigation into the case reported by the person. The notice shall notify the person that the agency has closed the investigation. (L)(1) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. The department of children and youth may enter into a plan of cooperation with any other governmental entity to aid in ensuring that children are protected from abuse and neglect. The department shall make recommendations to the attorney general that the department determines are necessary to protect children from child abuse and child neglect. (2) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to identify the types of neglect of a child that a public children services agency shall be required to notify law enforcement of pursuant to division (E)(2)(c)(ii) of this section. (M) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is liable for compensatory and exemplary damages to the child who would have been the subject of the report that was not made. A person who brings a civil action or proceeding pursuant to this division against a person who is alleged to have violated division (A)(1) of this section may use in the action or proceeding reports of other incidents of known or suspected abuse or neglect, provided that any information in a report that would identify the child who is the subject of the report or the maker of the report, if the maker is not the defendant or an agent or employee of the defendant, has been redacted. (N)(1) As used in this division: (a) "Out-of-home care" includes a nonchartered nonpublic school if the alleged child abuse or child neglect, or alleged threat of child abuse or child neglect, described in a report received by a public children services agency allegedly occurred in or involved the nonchartered nonpublic school and the alleged perpetrator named in the report holds a certificate, permit, or license issued by the state board of education under section 3301.071 or Chapter 3319. of the Revised Code. (b) "Administrator, director, or other chief administrative officer" means the superintendent of the school district if the out-of-home care entity subject to a report made pursuant to this section is a school operated by the district. (2) No later than the end of the day following the day on which a public children services agency receives a report of alleged child abuse or child neglect, or a report of an alleged threat of child abuse or child neglect, that allegedly occurred in or involved an out-of-home care entity, the agency shall provide written notice of the allegations contained in and the person named as the alleged perpetrator in the report to the administrator, director, or other chief administrative officer of the out-of-home care entity that is the subject of the report unless the administrator, director, or other chief administrative officer is named as an alleged perpetrator in the report. If the administrator, director, or other chief administrative officer of an out-of-home care entity is named as an alleged perpetrator in a report of alleged child abuse or child neglect, or a report of an alleged threat of child abuse or child neglect, that allegedly occurred in or involved the out-of-home care entity, the agency shall provide the written notice to the owner or governing board of the out-of-home care entity that is the subject of the report. The agency shall not provide witness statements or police or other investigative reports. (3) No later than three days after the day on which a public children services agency that conducted the investigation as determined pursuant to section 2151.422 of the Revised Code makes a disposition of an investigation involving a report of alleged child abuse or child neglect, or a report of an alleged threat of child abuse or child neglect, that allegedly occurred in or involved an out-of-home care entity, the agency shall send written notice of the disposition of the investigation to the administrator, director, or other chief administrative officer and the owner or governing board of the out-of-home care entity. The agency shall not provide witness statements or police or other investigative reports. (O) As used in this section: (1) "Children's advocacy center" and "sexual abuse of a child" have the same meanings as in section 2151.425 of the Revised Code. (2) "Health care professional" means an individual who provides health-related services. "Health care professional" includes all of the following: a physician, including a hospital intern or resident; a dentist; a podiatrist; a registered nurse, including such a nurse who is an advanced practice registered nurse; a licensed practical nurse; a home care nurse; a licensed psychologist; a speech-language pathologist; an audiologist; a person engaged in social work or the practice of professional counseling; and an employee of a home health agency. "Health care professional" does not include a practitioner of a limited branch of medicine as specified in section 4731.15 of the Revised Code, licensed school psychologist, independent marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapist, or coroner. (3) "Investigation" means the public children services agency's response to an accepted report of child abuse or neglect through either an alternative response or a traditional response. (4) "Peace officer" means a sheriff, deputy sheriff, constable, police officer of a township or joint police district, marshal, deputy marshal, municipal police officer, or a state highway patrol trooper. Sec. 2151.423. A public children services agency shall disclose confidential information discovered during an investigation conducted pursuant to section 2151.421 or 2151.422 of the Revised Code to any federal, state, or local government entity, including any appropriate military authority or any agency providing prevention services provider to the childfamily, that needs the information to carry out its responsibilities to protect children from abuse or neglect. Information disclosed pursuant to this section is confidential and is not subject to disclosure pursuant to section 149.43 or 1347.08 of the Revised Code by the agency to whom the information was disclosed. The agency receiving the information shall maintain the confidentiality of information disclosed pursuant to this section. Sec. 2151.424. (A) If a child has been placed in a certified foster home or is in the custody of, or has been placed with, a kinship caregiver as defined in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code, a court, prior to conducting any hearing pursuant to division (F)(2) or (3) of section 2151.412 or section 2151.28, 2151.33, 2151.35, 2151.414, 2151.415, 2151.416, or 2151.417 of the Revised Code with respect to the child, shall notify the foster caregiver or kinship caregiver of the date, time, and place of the hearing. At the hearing, the foster caregiver or kinship caregiver shall have the right to be heard. (B) If a public children services agency or private child placing agency has permanent custody of a child and a petition to adopt the child has been filed under Chapter 3107. of the Revised Code, the agency, prior to conducting a review under section 2151.416 of the Revised Code, or a court, prior to conducting a hearing under division (F)(2) or (3) of section 2151.412 or section 2151.416 or 2151.417 of the Revised Code, shall notify the prospective adoptive parent of the date, time, and place of the review or hearing. At the review or hearing, the prospective adoptive parent shall have the right to be heard. (C) The notice and the opportunity to be heard do not make the foster caregiver, kinship caregiver, or prospective adoptive parent a party in the action or proceeding pursuant to which the review or hearing is conducted. Sec. 2151.45. As used in sections 2151.45 to 2151.455 of the Revised Code, "emancipated young adult" and "representative" have the same meanings as in section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2151.451. (A) The juvenile court of the county, to which either of the following applies regarding an emancipated young adult described under division (A)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code, may exercise jurisdiction over the emancipated young adult for purposes of sections 2151.45 to 2151.455 of the Revised Code: (1) The county in which the emancipated young adult resides; (2) The county in which the emancipated young adult resided when the custody, arrangement, or care and placement described in division (A)(3)(a) of section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code terminated. (B) A juvenile court, on its own motion or the motion of any party, may transfer a proceeding under sections 2151.45 to 2151.455 of the Revised Code to a juvenile court with jurisdiction as provided in this section. Sec. 2151.452. A juvenile court shall do both of the following regarding an emancipated young adult described under division (A)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code: (A) Not later than one hundred eighty days after the voluntary participation agreement becomes effective, make a determination as to whether the emancipated young adult's best interest is served by continuing the care and placement with the department of children and youth or its representative. (B) Not later than twelve months after the effective date of the voluntary participation agreement, and at least once every twelve months thereafter, make a determination that the department or its representative has made reasonable efforts to finalize a permanency plan to prepare the emancipated young adult for independence. Sec. 2151.453. If any determination required under section 2151.452 of the Revised Code is not timely made, the federal payments for foster care under division (A)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code for the emancipated young adult shall be suspended. The payments shall resume upon a subsequent determination that reasonable efforts have been made to prepare the emancipated young adult for independence, but only if both of the following apply: (A) The emancipated young adult complies with division (A)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code. (B) There has been a timely determination of best interest under division (A) of section 2151.452 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2152.26. (A) Except as provided in divisions (B) and (F) of this section, a child alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child or a juvenile traffic offender may be held only in the following places: (1) A certified foster home or a home approved by the court; (2) A facility operated by a certified child welfare agency; (3) Any other suitable place designated by the court. (B) In addition to the places listed in division (A) of this section, a child alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child or a person described in division (C)(7) of section 2152.02 of the Revised Code may be held in a detention facility for delinquent children that is under the direction or supervision of the court or other public authority or of a private agency and approved by the court, and a child adjudicated a delinquent child may be held in accordance with division (F)(2) of this section in a facility of a type specified in that division. (C)(1) Except as provided under division (C)(1) of section 2151.311 of the Revised Code or division (A)(5) of section 2152.21 of the Revised Code, a child alleged to be or adjudicated a juvenile traffic offender may not be held in any of the following facilities: (a) A state correctional institution, county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or other place in which an adult convicted of crime, under arrest, or charged with a crime is held. (b) A secure correctional facility. (2) Except as provided under this section, sections 2151.56 to 2151.59, and divisions (A)(5) and (6) of section 2152.21 of the Revised Code, a child alleged to be or adjudicated a juvenile traffic offender may not be held for more than twenty-four hours in a detention facility. (D) Except as provided in division (F) of this section or in division (C) of section 2151.311, in division (C)(2) of section 5139.06 and section 5120.162, or in division (B)(C) of section 5120.16 of the Revised Code, a child who is alleged to be or is adjudicated a delinquent child or a person described in division (C)(7) of section 2152.02 of the Revised Code may not be held in a state correctional institution, county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or other place where an adult convicted of crime, under arrest, or charged with crime is held. (E) Unless the detention is pursuant to division (F) of this section or division (C) of section 2151.311, division (C)(2) of section 5139.06 and section 5120.162, or division (B)(C) of section 5120.16 of the Revised Code, the official in charge of the institution, jail, workhouse, or other facility shall inform the court immediately when a person who is or appears to be under the age of eighteen years, or a person who is charged with a violation of an order of a juvenile court or a violation of probation or parole conditions imposed by a juvenile court and who is or appears to be between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one years, is received at the facility and shall deliver the person to the court upon request or transfer the person to a detention facility designated by the court. (F)(1) If a case is transferred to another court for criminal prosecution pursuant to section 2152.12 of the Revised Code and the alleged offender is a person described in division (C)(7) of section 2152.02 of the Revised Code, the person may not be transferred for detention pending the criminal prosecution in a jail or other facility except under the circumstances described in division (F)(4) of this section. Any child held in accordance with division (F)(3) of this section shall be confined in a manner that keeps the child beyond the sight and sound of all adult detainees. The child shall be supervised at all times during the detention. (2) If a person is adjudicated a delinquent child or juvenile traffic offender or is a person described in division (C)(7) of section 2152.02 of the Revised Code and the court makes a disposition of the person under this chapter, at any time after the person attains twenty-one years of age, the person may be held under that disposition or under the circumstances described in division (F)(4) of this section in places other than those specified in division (A) of this section, including, but not limited to, a county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or other place where an adult convicted of crime, under arrest, or charged with crime is held. (3)(a) A person alleged to be a delinquent child may be held in places other than those specified in division (A) of this section, including, but not limited to, a county, multicounty, or municipal jail, if the delinquent act that the child allegedly committed would be a felony if committed by an adult, and if either of the following applies: (i) The person attains twenty-one years of age before the person is arrested or apprehended for that act. (ii) The person is arrested or apprehended for that act before the person attains twenty-one years of age, but the person attains twenty-one years of age before the court orders a disposition in the case. (b) If, pursuant to division (F)(3)(a) of this section, a person is held in a place other than a place specified in division (A) of this section, the person has the same rights to bail as an adult charged with the same offense who is confined in a jail pending trial. (4)(a) Any person whose case is transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to section 2152.10 or 2152.12 of the Revised Code or any person who has attained the age of eighteen years but has not attained the age of twenty-one years and who is being held in a place specified in division (B) of this section may be held under that disposition or charge in places other than those specified in division (B) of this section, including a county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or other place where an adult under arrest or charged with crime is held if the juvenile court, upon its own motion or upon motion by the prosecutor and after notice and hearing, establishes by a preponderance of the evidence and makes written findings of either of the following: (i) With respect to a person whose case is transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to either specified section or who has attained the age of eighteen years but who has not attained the age of twenty-one years and is being so held, that the youth is a threat to the safety and security of the facility; (ii) With respect to a person who has attained the age of eighteen years but who has not attained the age of twenty-one years and is being so held, that the best interests of the youth require that the youth be held in a place other than a place specified in division (B) of this section, including a county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or other place where an adult under arrest or charged with crime is held. (b) In determining for purposes of division (F)(4)(a)(i) of this section whether a youth is a threat to the safety and security of the facility, evidence that the youth is a threat to the safety and security of the facility may include, but is not limited to, whether the youth has done any of the following: (i) Injured or created an imminent danger to the life or health of another youth or staff member in the facility or program by violent behavior; (ii) Escaped from the facility or program in which the youth is being held on more than one occasion; (iii) Established a pattern of disruptive behavior as verified by a written record that the youth's behavior is not conducive to the established policies and procedures of the facility or program in which the youth is being held. (c) If a prosecutor submits a motion requesting that a person be held in a place other than those specified in division (B) of this section or if the court submits its own motion, the juvenile court shall hold a hearing within five days of the filing of the motion, and, in determining whether a place other than those specified in division (B) of this section is the appropriate place of confinement for the person, the court shall consider the following factors: (i) The age of the person; (ii) Whether the person would be deprived of contact with other people for a significant portion of the day or would not have access to recreational facilities or age-appropriate educational opportunities in order to provide physical separation from adults; (iii) The person's current emotional state, intelligence, and developmental maturity, including any emotional and psychological trauma, and the risk to the person in an adult facility, which may be evidenced by mental health or psychological assessments or screenings made available to the prosecuting attorney and the defense counsel; (iv) Whether detention in a juvenile facility would adequately serve the need for community protection pending the outcome of the criminal proceeding; (v) The relative ability of the available adult and juvenile detention facilities to meet the needs of the person, including the person's need for age-appropriate mental health and educational services delivered by individuals specifically trained to deal with youth; (vi) Whether the person presents an imminent risk of self-inflicted harm or an imminent risk of harm to others within a juvenile facility; (vii) Any other factors the juvenile court considers to be relevant. (d) If the juvenile court determines that a place other than those specified in division (B) of this section is the appropriate place for confinement of a person pursuant to division (F)(4)(a) of this section, the person may petition the juvenile court for a review hearing thirty days after the initial confinement decision, thirty days after any subsequent review hearing, or at any time after the initial confinement decision upon an emergency petition by the youth due to the youth facing an imminent danger from others or the youth's self. Upon receipt of the petition, the juvenile court has discretion over whether to conduct the review hearing and may set the matter for a review hearing if the youth has alleged facts or circumstances that, if true, would warrant reconsideration of the youth's placement in a place other than those specified in division (B) of this section based on the factors listed in division (F)(4)(c) of this section. (e) Upon the admission of a person described in division (F)(4)(a) of this section to a place other than those specified in division (B) of this section, the facility shall advise the person of the person's right to request a review hearing as described in division (F)(4)(d) of this section. (f) Any person transferred under division (F)(4)(a) of this section to a place other than those specified in division (B) of this section shall be confined in a manner that keeps those under eighteen years of age beyond sight and sound of all adult detainees. Those under eighteen years of age shall be supervised at all times during the detention. (G)(1) If a person who is alleged to be or has been adjudicated a delinquent child or who is in any other category of persons identified in this section or section 2151.311 of the Revised Code is confined under authority of any Revised Code section in a place other than a place specified in division (B) of this section, including a county, multicounty, or municipal jail or workhouse, or other place where an adult under arrest or charged with crime is held, subject to division (G)(2) of this section, all identifying information, other than the person's county of residence, age, gender, and race and the charges against the person, that relates to the person's admission to and confinement in that place is not a public record open for inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code and is confidential and shall not be released to any person other than to a court, to a law enforcement agency for law enforcement purposes, or to a person specified by court order. (2) Division (G)(1) of this section does not apply with respect to a person whose case is transferred for criminal prosecution pursuant to section 2152.10 or 2152.12 of the Revised Code, who is convicted of or pleads guilty to an offense in that case, who is confined after that conviction or guilty plea in a place other than a place specified in division (B) of this section, and to whom one of the following applies: (a) The case was transferred other than pursuant to division (A)(1)(a)(i) or (A)(1)(b)(ii) of section 2152.12 of the Revised Code. (b) The case was transferred pursuant to division (A)(1)(a)(i) or (A)(1)(b)(ii) of section 2152.12 of the Revised Code, and the person is sentenced for the offense pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 2152.121 of the Revised Code. (c) The case was transferred pursuant to division (A)(1)(a)(i) or (A)(1)(b)(ii) of section 2152.12 of the Revised Code, the person is sentenced for the offense pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 2152.121 of the Revised Code by the court in which the person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense, and the sentence imposed by that court is invoked pursuant to division (B)(3)(b) of section 2152.121 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2303.12. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Case file" means the compendium of original documents filed in a civil or criminal action or proceeding in the court of common pleas, including the pleadings, motions, orders, and judgments of the court on a case by case basis. (2) "General docket" means the appearance docket, trial docket, journal, execution docket, and case files in relation to those dockets and journal. (B) The clerk of the court of common pleas shall keep records as indicated by the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio. They shall be called the appearance docket, trial docket and printed duplicates of the trial docket for the use of the court and the officers thereof, journal, and execution docket. The clerk shall also keep a record in book form or the clerk may prepare a record by using any photostatic, photographic, miniature photographic, film, microfilm, or microphotographic process, electrostatic process, perforated tape, magnetic tape, or other electromagnetic means, electronic data processing, machine readable media, graphic or video display, or any combination thereof, which correctly and accurately copies or reproduces every case file and other original document, paper, or instrument in writing. The clerk shall keep an index to the trial docket and to the printed duplicates of the trial docket and of the journal direct, and to the appearance docket, record, and execution docket, direct and reverse. All clerks keeping records and information by the methods described in this section shall keep and make readily available to the public the machine and equipment necessary to reproduce the records and information in a readable form. (C) The clerk of the court of common pleas shall keep confidential information that is subject to a real property confidentiality notice under section 111.431 of the Revised Code, in accordance with that section. (D)(1) Subject to division (D)(2) of this section, not the clerk of court shall do both of the following: (a) Not later than eighteen months after the effective date of this amendment April 6, 2023, the clerk of court shall make available online on the clerk of court's web site the general docket of the court for remote access and printing by the public of the information in that docket, including all individual documents in each case file, pertaining to civil cases filed on or after the effective date of this amendment April 6, 2023. (b) Not later than eighteen months after the effective date of this amendment, the clerk of court shall make available online on the clerk of court's web site the general docket of the court for remote access and printing by the public of the information in that docket, including all individual documents in each case file, pertaining to criminal cases filed on or after the effective date of this amendment. (2) The clerk of court is not required to make available online under division (D)(1) of this section either of the following: (a) The general docket of the division of domestic relations, or the juvenile court, or the probate court; (b) If the court does not have a division of domestic relations, the general docket in civil cases pertaining to domestic relations. (E) Nothing in division (D) of this section shall be construed as making available online any of the following: (1) Internal documents such as notes, emails, drafts, recommendations, advice, or research of judicial officers and court staff; (2) Any document or any information in a case file the public access to which the court has ordered restricted under the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio. Sec. 2303.201. (A)(1) The court of common pleas of any county may determine that for the efficient operation of the court additional funds are required to computerize the court, to make available computerized legal research services, or to do both. Upon making a determination that additional funds are required for either or both of those purposes, the court shall authorize do one of the following: (a) If the court of common pleas of a county has complied with the requirements in division (D)(1) of section 2303.12 of the Revised Code, authorize and direct the clerk of the court of common pleas to charge one additional fee, not to exceed six dollars, on the filing of each cause of action or appeal under divisions (A), (Q), and (U) of section 2303.20 of the Revised Code; (b) If the court of common pleas of a county has not complied with the requirements in division (D)(1) of section 2303.12 of the Revised Code, authorize and direct the clerk of the court of common pleas to charge one additional fee, not to exceed three dollars, on the filing of each cause of action or appeal under divisions (A), (Q), and (U) of section 2303.20 of the Revised Code. (2) All fees collected under division (A)(1) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer. The treasurer shall place the funds from the fees in a separate fund to be disbursed either upon an order of the court, subject to an appropriation by the board of county commissioners, or upon an order of the court, subject to the court making an annual report available to the public listing the use of all such funds, in an amount not greater than the actual cost to the court of procuring and maintaining computerization of the court, computerized legal research services, or both. (3) If the court determines that the funds in the fund described in division (A)(2) of this section are more than sufficient to satisfy the purpose for which the additional fee described in division (A)(1) of this section was imposed, the court may declare a surplus in the fund and, subject to an appropriation by the board of county commissioners, expend those surplus funds, or upon an order of the court, subject to the court making an annual report available to the public listing the use of all such funds, expend those surplus funds, for other appropriate technological expenses of the court. (B)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(b) of this section, the clerk of the court of common pleas of any county may determine that, for the efficient operation of the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas, additional funds are required to make technological advances in or to computerize the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas and, upon . Upon making that determination, authorize the court shall do one of the following: (i) If the court of common pleas of a county has complied with the requirements in division (D)(1) of section 2303.12 of the Revised Code, authorize and direct that an additional fee, not to exceed twenty dollars, on the filing of each cause of action or appeal, on the filing, docketing, and endorsing of each certificate of judgment, or on the docketing and indexing of each aid in execution or petition to vacate, revive, or modify a judgment under divisions (A), (P), (Q), (T), and (U) of section 2303.20 of the Revised Code and not to exceed one dollar each for the services described in divisions (B), (C), (D), (F), (H), and (L) of section 2303.20 of the Revised Code, be charged; (ii) If the court of common pleas of a county has not complied with the requirements in division (D)(1) of section 2303.12 of the Revised Code, authorize and direct that an additional fee, not to exceed ten dollars, on the filing of each cause of action or appeal, on the filing, docketing, and endorsing of each certificate of judgment, or on the docketing and indexing of each aid in execution or petition to vacate, revive, or modify a judgment under divisions (A), (P), (Q), (T), and (U) of section 2303.20 of the Revised Code and not to exceed fifty cents each for the services described in divisions (B), (C), (D), (F), (H), and (L) of section 2303.20 of the Revised Code, be charged. (b) In a county in which the clerk of the court of common pleas is appointed, the court may make the determination described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section and, upon that determination, may include such a computerization fee in the schedule of fees and costs. (2) Subject to division (B)(3) of this section, all moneys collected under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer to be disbursed, subject to an appropriation made by the board of county commissioners, in an amount no greater than the actual cost to the court of procuring and maintaining technology and computer systems for the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas. (3) If the court or the clerk of the court of common pleas of a county makes the determination described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, the board of county commissioners of that county may issue one or more general obligation bonds for the purpose of procuring and maintaining the technology and computer systems for the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas. In addition to the purposes stated in division (B)(1)(a) of this section for which the moneys collected under that division may be expended, the moneys additionally may be expended to pay debt charges on and financing costs related to any general obligation bonds issued pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section as they become due. General obligation bonds issued pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section are Chapter 133. securities. (C) The court of common pleas shall collect the sum of twenty-six dollars as additional filing fees in each new civil action or proceeding for the charitable public purpose of providing financial assistance to legal aid societies that operate within the state and to support the office of the state public defender. This division does not apply to a juvenile division of a court of common pleas, except that an additional filing fee of fifteen dollars shall apply to custody, visitation, and parentage actions; to a probate division of a court of common pleas, except that the additional filing fees shall apply to name change, guardianship, adoption, and decedents' estate proceedings; or to an execution on a judgment, proceeding in aid of execution, or other post-judgment proceeding arising out of a civil action. The filing fees required to be collected under this division shall be in addition to any other filing fees imposed in the action or proceeding and shall be collected at the time of the filing of the action or proceeding. The court shall not waive the payment of the additional filing fees in a new civil action or proceeding unless the court waives the advanced payment of all filing fees in the action or proceeding. All such moneys collected during a month except for an amount equal to up to one per cent of those moneys retained to cover administrative costs shall be transmitted on or before the twentieth day of the following month by the clerk of the court to the treasurer of state in a manner prescribed by the treasurer of state or by the Ohio access to justice foundation. The treasurer of state shall deposit four per cent of the funds collected under this division to the credit of the civil case filing fee fund established under section 120.07 of the Revised Code and ninety-six per cent of the funds collected under this division to the credit of the legal aid fund established under section 120.52 of the Revised Code. The court may retain up to one per cent of the moneys it collects under this division to cover administrative costs, including the hiring of any additional personnel necessary to implement this division. If the court fails to transmit to the treasurer of state the moneys the court collects under this division in a manner prescribed by the treasurer of state or by the Ohio access to justice foundation, the court shall forfeit the moneys the court retains under this division to cover administrative costs, including the hiring of any additional personnel necessary to implement this division, and shall transmit to the treasurer of state all moneys collected under this division, including the forfeited amount retained for administrative costs, for deposit in the legal aid fund. (D) On and after the thirtieth day after December 9, 1994, the court of common pleas shall collect the sum of thirty-two dollars as additional filing fees in each new action or proceeding for annulment, divorce, or dissolution of marriage for the purpose of funding shelters for victims of domestic violence pursuant to sections 3113.35 to 3113.39 of the Revised Code. The filing fees required to be collected under this division shall be in addition to any other filing fees imposed in the action or proceeding and shall be collected at the time of the filing of the action or proceeding. The court shall not waive the payment of the additional filing fees in a new action or proceeding for annulment, divorce, or dissolution of marriage unless the court waives the advanced payment of all filing fees in the action or proceeding. On or before the twentieth day of each month, all moneys collected during the immediately preceding month pursuant to this division shall be deposited by the clerk of the court into the county treasury in the special fund used for deposit of additional marriage license fees as described in section 3113.34 of the Revised Code. Upon their deposit into the fund, the moneys shall be retained in the fund and expended only as described in section 3113.34 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) The court of common pleas may determine that, for the efficient operation of the court, additional funds are necessary to acquire and pay for special projects of the court, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of additional facilities or the rehabilitation of existing facilities, the acquisition of equipment, the hiring and training of staff, community service programs, mediation or dispute resolution services, the employment of magistrates, the training and education of judges, acting judges, and magistrates, and other related services. Upon that determination, the court by rule may charge a fee, in addition to all other court costs, on the filing of each criminal cause, civil action or proceeding, or judgment by confession. Fees collected by a court for special projects of the court under this division shall not be used for training or education that takes place outside of the state. If the court of common pleas offers or requires a special program or additional services in cases of a specific type, the court by rule may assess an additional charge in a case of that type, over and above court costs, to cover the special program or service. The court shall adjust the special assessment periodically, but not retroactively, so that the amount assessed in those cases does not exceed the actual cost of providing the service or program. All moneys collected under division (E) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer for deposit into either a general special projects fund or a fund established for a specific special project. Moneys from a fund of that nature shall be disbursed upon an order of the court, subject to an appropriation by the board of county commissioners, in an amount no greater than the actual cost to the court of a project. If a specific fund is terminated because of the discontinuance of a program or service established under division (E) of this section, the court may order, subject to an appropriation by the board of county commissioners, that moneys remaining in the fund be transferred to an account established under this division for a similar purpose. (2) As used in division (E) of this section: (a) "Criminal cause" means a charge alleging the violation of a statute or ordinance, or subsection of a statute or ordinance, that requires a separate finding of fact or a separate plea before disposition and of which the defendant may be found guilty, whether filed as part of a multiple charge on a single summons, citation, or complaint or as a separate charge on a single summons, citation, or complaint. "Criminal cause" does not include separate violations of the same statute or ordinance, or subsection of the same statute or ordinance, unless each charge is filed on a separate summons, citation, or complaint. (b) "Civil action or proceeding" means any civil litigation that must be determined by judgment entry. Sec. 2303.26. The clerk of the court of common pleas shall exercise the powers conferred and perform the duties enjoined upon the clerk by statute and by the common law; and in the performance of official duties the clerk shall be under the direction of the court. The clerk shall not restrict, prohibit, or otherwise modify the rights of parties to seek service on party defendants allowed by the Rules of Civil Procedure, either singularly or concurrently. In furtherance of the performance of the duties enjoined upon the clerk by statute, common law, and the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio, the clerk of the court of common pleas shall be responsible for determining the best means and methods for storing, maintaining, and retrieving all papers delivered to the clerk, whether delivered in writing or in electronic form, in compliance with Rule 26 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio. Once determined by the clerk of court of common pleas, the clerk shall be responsible for implementing the means and methods for storage, maintenance, and retrieval. Sec. 2307.66. (A) A victim of a violation of section 2917.211 of the Revised Code has and may commence a civil cause of action against the offender for any of the following, in addition to reasonable attorney's fees and the costs of bringing the civil action: (1) An injunction or a temporary restraining order prohibiting further dissemination of the image that is the subject of the violation; (2) Compensatory and punitive damages for harm resulting from the violation. (B) The victim shall be presumed to have suffered harm as a result of the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images or the nonconsensual dissemination of fabricated sexual images. (C) A civil action brought under division (A) of this section shall be brought within four years after the victim discovers the private sexual image or fabricated sexual image. (D) The cause of action created by this section is in addition to any other cause of action available under statutory or common law. (D) (E) As used in this section, "victim" has the same meaning as in section 2930.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Fabricated sexual image" means a created, adapted, or modified image that depicts another person, the other person is recognizable in the image by the other person's face, likeness, or other distinguishing characteristic, and the other person depicted in the image is in a state of nudity or is engaged in a sexual act. Sec. 2329.66. (A) Every person who is domiciled in this state may hold property exempt from execution, garnishment, attachment, or sale to satisfy a judgment or order, as follows: (1)(a) In the case of a judgment or order regarding money owed for health care services rendered or health care supplies provided to the person or a dependent of the person, one parcel or item of real or personal property that the person or a dependent of the person uses as a residence. Division (A)(1)(a) of this section does not preclude, affect, or invalidate the creation under this chapter of a judgment lien upon the exempted property but only delays the enforcement of the lien until the property is sold or otherwise transferred by the owner or in accordance with other applicable laws to a person or entity other than the surviving spouse or surviving minor children of the judgment debtor. Every person who is domiciled in this state may hold exempt from a judgment lien created pursuant to division (A)(1)(a) of this section the person's interest, not to exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, in the exempted property. (b) In the case of all other judgments and orders, the person's interest, not to exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars, in one parcel or item of real or personal property that the person or a dependent of the person uses as a residence. (c) For purposes of divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section, "parcel" means a tract of real property as identified on the records of the auditor of the county in which the real property is located. (2) The person's interest, not to exceed three thousand two hundred twenty-five dollars, in one motor vehicle; (3) The person's interest, not to exceed four hundred dollars, in cash on hand, money due and payable, money to become due within ninety days, tax refunds, and money on deposit with a bank, savings and loan association, credit union, public utility, landlord, or other person, other than personal earnings. (4)(a) The person's interest, not to exceed five hundred twenty-five dollars in any particular item or ten thousand seven hundred seventy-five dollars in aggregate value, in household furnishings, household goods, wearing apparel, appliances, books, animals, crops, musical instruments, firearms, and hunting and fishing equipment that are held primarily for the personal, family, or household use of the person; (b) The person's aggregate interest in one or more items of jewelry, not to exceed one thousand three hundred fifty dollars, held primarily for the personal, family, or household use of the person or any of the person's dependents. (5) The person's interest, not to exceed an aggregate of two thousand twenty-five dollars, in all implements, professional books, or tools of the person's profession, trade, or business, including agriculture; (6)(a) The person's interest in a beneficiary fund set apart, appropriated, or paid by a benevolent association or society, as exempted by section 2329.63 of the Revised Code; (b) The person's interest in contracts of life or endowment insurance or annuities, as exempted by section 3911.10 of the Revised Code; (c) The person's interest in a policy of group insurance or the proceeds of a policy of group insurance, as exempted by section 3917.05 of the Revised Code; (d) The person's interest in money, benefits, charity, relief, or aid to be paid, provided, or rendered by a fraternal benefit society, as exempted by section 3921.18 of the Revised Code; (e) The person's interest in the portion of benefits under policies of sickness and accident insurance and in lump sum payments for dismemberment and other losses insured under those policies, as exempted by section 3923.19 of the Revised Code. (7) The person's professionally prescribed or medically necessary health aids; (8) The person's interest in a burial lot, including, but not limited to, exemptions under section 517.09 or 1721.07 of the Revised Code; (9) The person's interest in the following: (a) Moneys paid or payable for maintenance or rights, as exempted by section 3304.19 of the Revised Code; (b) Workers' compensation, as exempted by section 4123.67 of the Revised Code; (c) Unemployment compensation benefits, as exempted by section 4141.32 of the Revised Code; (d) Cash assistance payments under the Ohio works first program, as exempted by section 5107.75 of the Revised Code; (e) Benefits and services under the prevention, retention, and contingency program, as exempted by section 5108.08 of the Revised Code; (f) Payments under section 24 or 32 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. (10)(a) Except in cases in which the person was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code and in which an order for the withholding of restitution from payments was issued under division (C)(2)(b) of that section, in cases in which an order for withholding was issued under section 2907.15 of the Revised Code, in cases in which an order for forfeiture was issued under division (A) or (B) of section 2929.192 of the Revised Code, and in cases in which an order was issued under section 2929.193 or 2929.194 of the Revised Code, and only to the extent provided in the order, and except as provided in sections 3105.171, 3105.63, 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code, the person's rights to or interests in a pension, benefit, annuity, retirement allowance, or accumulated contributions, the person's rights to or interests in a participant account in any deferred compensation program offered by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board, a government unit, or a municipal corporation, or the person's other accrued or accruing rights or interests, as exempted by section 143.11, 145.56, 146.13, 148.09, 742.47, 3307.41, 3309.66, or 5505.22 of the Revised Code, and the person's rights to or interests in benefits from the Ohio public safety officers death benefit fund; (b) Except as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code, the person's rights to receive or interests in receiving a payment or other benefits under any pension, annuity, or similar plan or contract, not including a payment or benefit from a stock bonus or profit-sharing plan or a payment included in division (A)(6)(b) or (10)(a) of this section, on account of illness, disability, death, age, or length of service, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the person and any of the person's dependents, except if all the following apply: (i) The plan or contract was established by or under the auspices of an insider that employed the person at the time the person's rights or interests under the plan or contract arose. (ii) The payment is on account of age or length of service. (iii) The plan or contract is not qualified under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. (c) Except for any portion of the assets that were deposited for the purpose of evading the payment of any debt and except as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code, the person's rights or interests in the assets held in, or to directly or indirectly receive any payment or benefit under, any individual retirement account, individual retirement annuity, "Roth IRA," account opened pursuant to a program administered by a state under section 529 or 529A of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, or education individual retirement account that provides payments or benefits by reason of illness, disability, death, retirement, or age or provides payments or benefits for purposes of education or qualified disability expenses, to the extent that the assets, payments, or benefits described in division (A)(10)(c) of this section are attributable to or derived from any of the following or from any earnings, dividends, interest, appreciation, or gains on any of the following: (i) Contributions of the person that were less than or equal to the applicable limits on deductible contributions to an individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity in the year that the contributions were made, whether or not the person was eligible to deduct the contributions on the person's federal tax return for the year in which the contributions were made; (ii) Contributions of the person that were less than or equal to the applicable limits on contributions to a Roth IRA or education individual retirement account in the year that the contributions were made; (iii) Contributions of the person that are within the applicable limits on rollover contributions under subsections 219, 402(c), 403(a)(4), 403(b)(8), 408(b), 408(d)(3), 408A(c)(3)(B), 408A(d)(3), and 530(d)(5) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 1, as amended; (iv) Contributions by any person into any plan, fund, or account that is formed, created, or administered pursuant to, or is otherwise subject to, section 529 or 529A of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. (d) Except for any portion of the assets that were deposited for the purpose of evading the payment of any debt and except as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code, the person's rights or interests in the assets held in, or to receive any payment under, any Keogh or "H.R. 10" plan that provides benefits by reason of illness, disability, death, retirement, or age, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the person and any of the person's dependents. (e) The person's rights to or interests in any assets held in, or to directly or indirectly receive any payment or benefit under, any individual retirement account, individual retirement annuity, "Roth IRA," account opened pursuant to a program administered by a state under section 529 or 529A of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, or education individual retirement account that a decedent, upon or by reason of the decedent's death, directly or indirectly left to or for the benefit of the person, either outright or in trust or otherwise, including, but not limited to, any of those rights or interests in assets or to receive payments or benefits that were transferred, conveyed, or otherwise transmitted by the decedent by means of a will, trust, exercise of a power of appointment, beneficiary designation, transfer or payment on death designation, or any other method or procedure. (f) The exemptions under divisions (A)(10)(a) to (e) of this section also shall apply or otherwise be available to an alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order (QDRO) or other similar court order. (g) A person's interest in any plan, program, instrument, or device described in divisions (A)(10)(a) to (e) of this section shall be considered an exempt interest even if the plan, program, instrument, or device in question, due to an error made in good faith, failed to satisfy any criteria applicable to that plan, program, instrument, or device under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended. (11) The person's right to receive spousal support, child support, an allowance, or other maintenance to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the person and any of the person's dependents; (12) The person's right to receive, or moneys received during the preceding twelve calendar months from, any of the following: (a) An award of reparations under sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code, to the extent exempted by division (D) of section 2743.66 of the Revised Code; (b) A payment on account of the wrongful death of an individual of whom the person was a dependent on the date of the individual's death, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the person and any of the person's dependents; (c) Except in cases in which the person who receives the payment is an inmate, as defined in section 2969.21 of the Revised Code, and in which the payment resulted from a civil action or appeal against a government entity or employee, as defined in section 2969.21 of the Revised Code, a payment, not to exceed twenty thousand two hundred dollars, on account of personal bodily injury, not including pain and suffering or compensation for actual pecuniary loss, of the person or an individual for whom the person is a dependent; (d) A payment in compensation for loss of future earnings of the person or an individual of whom the person is or was a dependent, to the extent reasonably necessary for the support of the debtor and any of the debtor's dependents. (13) Except as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code, personal earnings of the person owed to the person for services in an amount equal to the greater of the following amounts: (a) If paid weekly, thirty times the current federal minimum hourly wage; if paid biweekly, sixty times the current federal minimum hourly wage; if paid semimonthly, sixty-five times the current federal minimum hourly wage; or if paid monthly, one hundred thirty times the current federal minimum hourly wage that is in effect at the time the earnings are payable, as prescribed by the "Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938," 52 Stat. 1060, 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1), as amended; (b) Seventy-five per cent of the disposable earnings owed to the person. (14) The person's right in specific partnership property, as exempted by the person's rights in a partnership pursuant to section 1776.50 of the Revised Code, except as otherwise set forth in section 1776.50 of the Revised Code; (15) A seal and official register of a notary public, as exempted by section 147.04 of the Revised Code; (16) The person's interest in a tuition unit or a payment under section 3334.09 of the Revised Code pursuant to a tuition payment contract, as exempted by section 3334.15 of the Revised Code; (17) Any other property that is specifically exempted from execution, attachment, garnishment, or sale by federal statutes other than the "Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978," 92 Stat. 2549, 11 U.S.C.A. 101, as amended; (18) The person's aggregate interest in any property, not to exceed one thousand seventy-five dollars, except that division (A)(18) of this section applies only in bankruptcy proceedings. (B) On April 1, 2010, and on the first day of April in each third calendar year after 2010, the Ohio judicial conference shall adjust each dollar amount set forth in this section to reflect any increase in the consumer price index for all urban consumers, as published by the United States department of labor, or, if that index is no longer published, a generally available comparable index, for the three-year period ending on the thirty-first day of December of the preceding year. Any adjustments required by this division shall be rounded to the nearest twenty-five dollars. The Ohio judicial conference shall prepare a memorandum specifying the adjusted dollar amounts. The judicial conference shall transmit the memorandum to the director of the legislative service commission, and the director shall publish the memorandum in the register of Ohio. (Publication of the memorandum in the register of Ohio shall continue until the next memorandum specifying an adjustment is so published.) The judicial conference also may publish the memorandum in any other manner it concludes will be reasonably likely to inform persons who are affected by its adjustment of the dollar amounts. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Disposable earnings" means net earnings after the garnishee has made deductions required by law, excluding the deductions ordered pursuant to section 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, or 3123.06 of the Revised Code. (2) "Insider" means: (a) If the person who claims an exemption is an individual, a relative of the individual, a relative of a general partner of the individual, a partnership in which the individual is a general partner, a general partner of the individual, or a corporation of which the individual is a director, officer, or in control; (b) If the person who claims an exemption is a corporation, a director or officer of the corporation; a person in control of the corporation; a partnership in which the corporation is a general partner; a general partner of the corporation; or a relative of a general partner, director, officer, or person in control of the corporation; (c) If the person who claims an exemption is a partnership, a general partner in the partnership; a general partner of the partnership; a person in control of the partnership; a partnership in which the partnership is a general partner; or a relative in, a general partner of, or a person in control of the partnership; (d) An entity or person to which or whom any of the following applies: (i) The entity directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, twenty per cent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the person who claims an exemption, unless the entity holds the securities in a fiduciary or agency capacity without sole discretionary power to vote the securities or holds the securities solely to secure to debt and the entity has not in fact exercised the power to vote. (ii) The entity is a corporation, twenty per cent or more of whose outstanding voting securities are directly or indirectly owned, controlled, or held with power to vote, by the person who claims an exemption or by an entity to which division (C)(2)(d)(i) of this section applies. (iii) A person whose business is operated under a lease or operating agreement by the person who claims an exemption, or a person substantially all of whose business is operated under an operating agreement with the person who claims an exemption. (iv) The entity operates the business or all or substantially all of the property of the person who claims an exemption under a lease or operating agreement. (e) An insider, as otherwise defined in this section, of a person or entity to which division (C)(2)(d)(i), (ii), (iii), or (iv) of this section applies, as if the person or entity were a person who claims an exemption; (f) A managing agent of the person who claims an exemption. (3) "Participant account" has the same meaning as in section 148.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Government unit" has the same meaning as in section 148.06 of the Revised Code. (D) For purposes of this section, "interest" shall be determined as follows: (1) In bankruptcy proceedings, as of the date a petition is filed with the bankruptcy court commencing a case under Title 11 of the United States Code; (2) In all cases other than bankruptcy proceedings, as of the date of an appraisal, if necessary under section 2329.68 of the Revised Code, or the issuance of a writ of execution. An interest, as determined under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section, shall not include the amount of any lien otherwise valid pursuant to section 2329.661 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2501.16. (A) Each court of appeals may appoint one or more official reporters, law clerks, secretaries, and any other employees that the court considers necessary for its efficient operation. The clerk of the court of common pleas, acting as the clerk of the court of appeals for the county, shall perform the duties otherwise performed and collect the fees otherwise collected by the clerk of the court of common pleas, as set forth in section 2303.03 of the Revised Code, and shall maintain the files and records of the court. The clerk of the court of common pleas, acting as the clerk of the court of appeals for the county, may refuse to accept for filing any pleading or paper submitted for filing by a person who has been found to be a vexatious litigator under section 2323.52 of the Revised Code and who has failed to obtain leave from the court of appeals to proceed under that section. The overhead expenses pertaining to the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas that result from the clerk's acting as clerk of the court of appeals for the county, other than wages and salaries, shall be paid from the funds provided under sections 2501.18 and 2501.181 of the Revised Code. Each officer and employee appointed pursuant to this section shall take an oath of office, serve at the pleasure of the court, and perform any duties that the court directs. Each reporter shall have the powers that are vested in official reporters of the court of common pleas under sections 2301.18 to 2301.26 of the Revised Code. Whenever an opinion, per curiam, or report of a case has been prepared in accordance with section 2503.20 of the Revised Code, the official reporter immediately shall forward one copy of the opinion, per curiam, or report to the reporter of the supreme court, without expense to the reporter. (B) The court of appeals may determine that, for the efficient operation of the court, additional funds are necessary to acquire and pay for special projects of the court, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of additional facilities or the rehabilitation of existing facilities, the acquisition of equipment, the hiring and training of staff, the employment of magistrates, the training and education of judges, acting judges, and magistrates, community service programs, and other related services. Upon that determination, the court by rule may charge a fee, in addition to all other court costs, on the filing of each case or cause over which the court has jurisdiction. Fees collected by a court for special projects of the court under this division shall not be used for training or education that takes place outside of the state. If the court of appeals offers a special program or service in cases of a specific type, the court by rule may assess an additional charge in a case of that type, over and above court costs, to cover the special program or service. The court shall adjust the special assessment periodically, but not retroactively, so that the amount assessed in those cases does not exceed the actual cost of providing the service or program. All moneys collected under division (B) of this section shall be paid to the county treasurer of the county selected as the principal seat of that court of appeals for deposit into either a general special projects fund or a fund established for a specific special project. Moneys from a fund of that nature shall be disbursed upon an order of the court in an amount no greater than the actual cost to the court of a project. If a specific fund is terminated because of the discontinuance of a program or service established under division (B) of this section, the court may order that moneys remaining in the fund be transferred to an account established under this division for a similar purpose. Sec. 2743.03. (A)(1) There is hereby created a court of claims. Except as provided under section 107.43 of the Revised Code, the court of claims is a court of record and has exclusive, original jurisdiction of all civil actions against the state permitted by the waiver of immunity contained in section 2743.02 of the Revised Code and exclusive jurisdiction of the causes of action of all parties in civil actions that are removed to the court of claims. The court shall have full equity powers in all actions within its jurisdiction and may entertain and determine all counterclaims, cross-claims, and third-party claims. (2) If the claimant in a civil action as described in division (A)(1) of this section also files a claim for a declaratory judgment, injunctive relief, or other equitable relief against the state that arises out of the same circumstances that gave rise to the civil action described in division (A)(1) of this section, the court of claims has exclusive, original jurisdiction to hear and determine that claim in that civil action. This division does not affect, and shall not be construed as affecting, the original jurisdiction of another court of this state to hear and determine a civil action in which the sole relief that the claimant seeks against the state is a declaratory judgment, injunctive relief, or other equitable relief. (3) In addition to its exclusive, original jurisdiction as conferred by divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section, the court of claims has exclusive, original jurisdiction as follows: (a) As described in division (F) of section 2743.02, division (B) of section 3335.03, and division (C) of section 5903.02 of the Revised Code; (b) Under section 2743.75 of the Revised Code to hear complaints alleging a denial of access to public records in violation of division (B) of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the public office or person responsible for public records is an office or employee of the state or of a political subdivision; (c) Under section 118.29 of the Revised Code to appoint a receiver. (B) The court of claims shall sit in Franklin county, its hearings shall be public, and it shall consist of incumbent justices or judges of the supreme court, courts of appeals, or courts of common pleas, or retired justices or judges eligible for active duty pursuant to division (C) of Section 6 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution, sitting by temporary assignment of the chief justice of the supreme court. The chief justice may direct the court to sit in any county for cases on removal upon a showing of substantial hardship and whenever justice dictates. (C)(1) A civil action against the state shall be heard and determined by a single judge. Upon application by the claimant or the state, the chief justice of the supreme court may assign a panel of three judges to hear and determine a civil action presenting novel or complex issues of law or fact. Concurrence of two members of the panel is necessary for any judgment or order. (2) Whenever the chief justice of the supreme court believes an equitable resolution of a case will be expedited, the chief justice may appoint magistrates in accordance with Civil Rule 53 to hear the case. (3) When any dispute under division (B) of section 153.12 of the Revised Code is brought to the court of claims, upon request of either party to the dispute, the chief justice of the supreme court shall appoint a single referee or a panel of three referees. The referees need not be attorneys, but shall be persons knowledgeable about construction contract law, a member of the construction industry panel of the American arbitration association, or an individual or individuals deemed qualified by the chief justice to serve. No person shall serve as a referee if that person has been employed by an affected state agency or a contractor or subcontractor involved in the dispute at any time in the preceding five years. Proceedings governing referees shall be in accordance with Civil Rule 53, except as modified by this division. The referee or panel of referees shall submit its report, which shall include a recommendation and finding of fact, to the judge assigned to the case by the chief justice, within thirty days of the conclusion of the hearings. Referees appointed pursuant to this division shall be compensated on a per diem basis at the same rate as is paid to judges of the court and also shall be paid their expenses. If a single referee is appointed or a panel of three referees is appointed, then, with respect to one referee of the panel, the compensation and expenses of the referee shall not be taxed as part of the costs in the case but shall be included in the budget of the court. If a panel of three referees is appointed, the compensation and expenses of the two remaining referees shall be taxed as costs of the case. All costs of a case shall be apportioned among the parties. The court may not require that any party deposit with the court cash, bonds, or other security in excess of two hundred dollars to guarantee payment of costs without the prior approval in each case of the chief justice. (4) An appeal from a decision of the attorney general pursuant to sections 2743.51 to 2743.72 of the Revised Code shall be heard and determined by the court of claims. (D) The Rules of Civil Procedure shall govern practice and procedure in all actions in the court of claims, except insofar as inconsistent with this chapter. The supreme court may promulgate rules governing practice and procedure in actions in the court as provided in Section 5 of Article IV, Ohio Constitution. (E)(1) A party who files a counterclaim against the state or makes the state a third-party defendant in an action commenced in any court, other than the court of claims, shall file a petition for removal in the court of claims. The petition shall state the basis for removal, be accompanied by a copy of all process, pleadings, and other papers served upon the petitioner, and shall be signed in accordance with Civil Rule 11. A petition for removal based on a counterclaim shall be filed within twenty-eight days after service of the counterclaim of the petitioner. A petition for removal based on third-party practice shall be filed within twenty-eight days after the filing of the third-party complaint of the petitioner. (2) Within seven days after filing a petition for removal, the petitioner shall give written notice to the parties, and shall file a copy of the petition with the clerk of the court in which the action was brought originally. The filing effects the removal of the action to the court of claims, and the clerk of the court where the action was brought shall forward all papers in the case to the court of claims. The court of claims shall adjudicate all civil actions removed. The court may remand a civil action to the court in which it originated upon a finding that the removal petition does not justify removal, or upon a finding that the state is no longer a party. (3) Bonds, undertakings, or security and injunctions, attachments, sequestrations, or other orders issued prior to removal remain in effect until dissolved or modified by the court of claims. Sec. 2907.15. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Public retirement system" means the public employees retirement system, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, Ohio police and fire pension fund, state highway patrol retirement system, or a municipal retirement system of a municipal corporation of this state. (2) "Government deferred compensation program" means such a program offered by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board; a municipal corporation; or a governmental government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code. (3) "Deferred compensation program participant" means a "participating employee" or "continuing member," as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, or any other public employee who has funds in a government deferred compensation program. (4) "Alternative retirement plan" means an alternative retirement plan provided pursuant to Chapter 3305. of the Revised Code. (5) "Prosecutor" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. In any case in which a sentencing court orders restitution to the victim under section 2929.18 or 2929.28 of the Revised Code for a violation of section 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, or 2907.05 of the Revised Code and in which the offender is a government deferred compensation program participant, is an electing employee, as defined in section 3305.01 of the Revised Code, or is a member of, or receiving a pension, benefit, or allowance, other than a survivorship benefit, from, a public retirement system and committed the offense against a child, student, patient, or other person with whom the offender had contact in the context of the offender's public employment, at the request of the victim the prosecutor shall file a motion with the sentencing court specifying the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system and requesting that the court issue an order requiring the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system to withhold the amount required as restitution from one or more of the following: any payment to be made from a government deferred compensation program, any payment or benefit under an alternative retirement plan, or under a pension, annuity, allowance, or any other benefit, other than a survivorship benefit, that has been or is in the future granted to the offender; from any payment of accumulated employee contributions standing to the offender's credit with the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system; or from any payment of any other amounts to be paid to the offender pursuant to Chapter 145., 148., 742., 3307., 3309., or 5505. of the Revised Code on withdrawal of contributions. The motion may be filed at any time subsequent to the conviction of the offender or entry of a guilty plea. On the filing of the motion, the clerk of the court in which the motion is filed shall notify the offender and the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system, in writing, of all of the following: that the motion was filed; that the offender will be granted a hearing on the issuance of the requested order if the offender files a written request for a hearing with the clerk prior to the expiration of thirty days after the offender receives the notice; that, if a hearing is requested, the court will schedule a hearing as soon as possible and notify the offender and the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system of the date, time, and place of the hearing; that, if a hearing is conducted, it will be limited to a consideration of whether the offender can show good cause why the order should not be issued; that, if a hearing is conducted, the court will not issue the order if the court determines, based on evidence presented at the hearing by the offender, that there is good cause for the order not to be issued; that the court will issue the order if a hearing is not requested or if a hearing is conducted but the court does not determine, based on evidence presented at the hearing by the offender, that there is good cause for the order not to be issued; and that, if the order is issued, the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system specified in the motion will be required to withhold the amount required as restitution from payments to the offender. (B) In any case in which a motion requesting the issuance of a withholding order as described in division (A) of this section is filed, the offender may receive a hearing on the motion by delivering a written request for a hearing to the court prior to the expiration of thirty days after the offender's receipt of the notice provided pursuant to division (A) of this section. If the offender requests a hearing within the prescribed time, the court shall schedule a hearing as soon as possible after the request is made and notify the offender and the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system of the date, time, and place of the hearing. A hearing scheduled under this division shall be limited to a consideration of whether there is good cause, based on evidence presented by the offender, for the requested order not to be issued. If the court determines, based on evidence presented by the offender, that there is good cause for the order not to be issued, the court shall deny the motion and shall not issue the order. Good cause for not issuing the order includes a determination by the court that the order would severely impact the offender's ability to support the offender's dependents. If the offender does not request a hearing within the prescribed time or the court conducts a hearing but does not determine, based on evidence presented by the offender, that there is good cause for the order not to be issued, the court shall order the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system to withhold the amount required as restitution from one or more of the following: any payments to be made from a government deferred compensation program, any payment or benefit under an alternative retirement plan, or under a pension, annuity, allowance, or under any other benefit, other than a survivorship benefit, that has been or is in the future granted to the offender; from any payment of accumulated employee contributions standing to the offender's credit with the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system; or from any payment of any other amounts to be paid to the offender upon withdrawal of contributions pursuant to Chapter 145., 148., 742., 3307., 3309., or 5505. of the Revised Code and to continue the withholding for that purpose, in accordance with the order, out of each payment to be made on or after the date of issuance of the order, until further order of the court. On receipt of an order issued under this division, the government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system shall withhold the amount required as restitution, in accordance with the order, from any such payments and immediately forward the amount withheld to the clerk of the court in which the order was issued for payment to the person to whom restitution is to be made. The order shall not apply to any portion of payments made from a government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system to a person other than the offender pursuant to a previously issued domestic court order. (C) Service of a notice required by division (A) or (B) of this section shall be effected in the same manner as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process. (D) Upon the filing of charges under section 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, or 2907.05 of the Revised Code against a person who is a deferred compensation program participant, an electing employee participating in an alternative retirement plan, or a member of, or receiving a pension benefit, or allowance, other than a survivorship benefit, from a public retirement system for an offense against a child, student, patient, or other person with whom the offender had contact in the context of the offender's public employment, the prosecutor shall send written notice that charges have been filed against that person to the appropriate government deferred compensation program, alternative retirement plan, or public retirement system. The notice shall specifically identify the person charged. Sec. 2913.401. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Medicaid services" has the same meaning as in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Property" means any real or personal property or other asset in which a person has any legal title or interest. (B) No person shall knowingly do any of the following in an application for enrollment in the medicaid program or in a document that requires a disclosure of assets for the purpose of determining eligibility for the medicaid program: (1) Make or cause to be made a false or misleading statement; (2) Conceal an interest in property; (3)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(3)(b) of this section, fail to disclose a transfer of property that occurred during the period beginning thirty-six months before submission of the application or document and ending on the date the application or document was submitted; (b) Fail to disclose a transfer of property that occurred during the period beginning sixty months before submission of the application or document and ending on the date the application or document was submitted and that was made to an irrevocable trust a portion of which is not distributable to the applicant for or recipient of medicaid or to a revocable trust. (C)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of medicaid eligibility fraud. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the value of the medicaid services paid as a result of the violation is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, a violation of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the medicaid services paid as a result of the violation is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, a violation of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the medicaid services paid as a result of the violation is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, a violation of this section is a felony of the third degree. (2) In addition to imposing a sentence under division (C)(1) of this section, the court shall may order that a person who is guilty of medicaid eligibility fraud make restitution in the full amount of two hundred per cent of any medicaid services paid on behalf of an applicant for or recipient of medicaid for which the applicant or recipient was not eligible, plus interest at the rate applicable to judgments on unreimbursed amounts from the date on which the medicaid services were paid to the date on which restitution is made. (3) The remedies and penalties provided in this section are not exclusive and do not preclude the use of any other criminal or civil remedy for any act that is in violation of this section. (D) This section does not apply to a person who fully disclosed in an application for medicaid or in a document that requires a disclosure of assets for the purpose of determining eligibility for medicaid all of the interests in property of the applicant for or recipient of medicaid, all transfers of property by the applicant for or recipient of medicaid, and the circumstances of all those transfers. (E) Any amounts of medicaid services recovered as restitution under this section and any interest on those amounts shall be credited to the general revenue fund, and any applicable federal share shall be returned to the appropriate agency or department of the United States. Sec. 2915.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Bookmaking" means the business of receiving or paying off bets. (B) "Bet" means the hazarding of anything of value upon the result of an event, undertaking, or contingency, but does not include a bona fide business risk. (C) "Scheme of chance" means a slot machine unless authorized under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code, lottery unless authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, numbers game, pool conducted for profit, or other scheme in which a participant gives a valuable consideration for a chance to win a prize, but does not include bingo, a skill-based amusement machine, or a pool not conducted for profit. "Scheme of chance" includes the use of an electronic device to reveal the results of a game entry if valuable consideration is paid, directly or indirectly, for a chance to win a prize. Valuable consideration is deemed to be paid for a chance to win a prize in the following instances: (1) Less than fifty per cent of the goods or services sold by a scheme of chance operator in exchange for game entries are used or redeemed by participants at any one location; (2) Less than fifty per cent of participants who purchase goods or services at any one location do not accept, use, or redeem the goods or services sold or purportedly sold; (3) More than fifty per cent of prizes at any one location are revealed to participants through an electronic device simulating a game of chance or a "casino game" as defined in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code; (4) The good or service sold by a scheme of chance operator in exchange for a game entry cannot be used or redeemed in the manner advertised; (5) A participant pays more than fair market value for goods or services offered by a scheme of chance operator in order to receive one or more game entries; (6) A participant may use the electronic device to purchase additional game entries; (7) A participant may purchase additional game entries by using points or credits won as prizes while using the electronic device; (8) A scheme of chance operator pays out in prize money more than twenty per cent of the gross revenue received at one location; or (9) A participant makes a purchase or exchange in order to obtain any good or service that may be used to facilitate play on the electronic device. As used in this division, "electronic device" means a mechanical, video, digital, or electronic machine or device that is capable of displaying information on a screen or other mechanism and that is owned, leased, or otherwise possessed by any person conducting a scheme of chance, or by that person's partners, affiliates, subsidiaries, or contractors. "Electronic device" does not include an electronic instant bingo system. (D) "Game of chance" means poker, craps, roulette, or other game in which a player gives anything of value in the hope of gain, the outcome of which is determined largely by chance, but does not include bingo. (E) "Game of chance conducted for profit" means any game of chance designed to produce income for the person who conducts or operates the game of chance, but does not include bingo. (F) "Gambling device" means any of the following: (1) A book, totalizer, or other equipment for recording bets; (2) A ticket, token, or other device representing a chance, share, or interest in a scheme of chance or evidencing a bet; (3) A deck of cards, dice, gaming table, roulette wheel, slot machine, or other apparatus designed for use in connection with a game of chance; (4) Any equipment, device, apparatus, or paraphernalia specially designed for gambling purposes; (5) Bingo supplies sold or otherwise provided, or used, in violation of this chapter. (G) "Gambling offense" means any of the following: (1) A violation of this chapter; (2) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States substantially equivalent to any provision of this chapter or a violation of section 2915.06 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996; (3) An offense under an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States, of which gambling is an element; (4) A conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, any offense under division (G)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. (H) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, "charitable organization" means either of the following: (1) An organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (2) A volunteer rescue service organization, volunteer firefighter's organization, veteran's organization, fraternal organization, or sporting organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(4), (c)(7), (c)(8), (c)(10), or (c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code. To qualify as a "charitable organization," an organization shall have been in continuous existence as such in this state for a period of two years immediately preceding either the making of an application for a bingo license under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code or the conducting of any game of chance as provided in division (D) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code. (I) "Religious organization" means any church, body of communicants, or group that is not organized or operated for profit and that gathers in common membership for regular worship and religious observances. (J) "Veteran's organization" means any individual post or state headquarters of a national veteran's association or an auxiliary unit of any individual post of a national veteran's association, which post, state headquarters, or auxiliary unit is incorporated as a nonprofit corporation and either has received a letter from the state headquarters of the national veteran's association indicating that the individual post or auxiliary unit is in good standing with the national veteran's association or has received a letter from the national veteran's association indicating that the state headquarters is in good standing with the national veteran's association. As used in this division, "national veteran's association" means any veteran's association that has been in continuous existence as such for a period of at least five years and either is incorporated by an act of the United States congress or has a national dues-paying membership of at least five thousand persons. (K) "Volunteer firefighter's organization" means any organization of volunteer firefighters, as defined in section 146.01 of the Revised Code, that is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial support for a volunteer fire department or a volunteer fire company and that is recognized or ratified by a county, municipal corporation, or township. (L) "Fraternal organization" means any society, order, state headquarters, or association within this state, except a college or high school fraternity, that is not organized for profit, that is a branch, lodge, or chapter of a national or state organization, that exists exclusively for the common business or sodality of its members. (M) "Volunteer rescue service organization" means any organization of volunteers organized to function as an emergency medical service organization, as defined in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (N) "Charitable bingo game" means any bingo game described in division (O)(1) or (2) of this section that is conducted by a charitable organization that has obtained a license pursuant to section 2915.08 of the Revised Code and the proceeds of which are used for a charitable purpose. (O) "Bingo" means either of the following: (1) A game with all of the following characteristics: (a) The participants use bingo cards or sheets, including paper formats and electronic representation or image formats, that are divided into twenty-five spaces arranged in five horizontal and five vertical rows of spaces, with each space, except the central space, being designated by a combination of a letter and a number and with the central space being designated as a free space. (b) The participants cover the spaces on the bingo cards or sheets that correspond to combinations of letters and numbers that are announced by a bingo game operator. (c) A bingo game operator announces combinations of letters and numbers that appear on objects that a bingo game operator selects by chance, either manually or mechanically, from a receptacle that contains seventy-five objects at the beginning of each game, each object marked by a different combination of a letter and a number that corresponds to one of the seventy-five possible combinations of a letter and a number that can appear on the bingo cards or sheets. (d) The winner of the bingo game includes any participant who properly announces during the interval between the announcements of letters and numbers as described in division (O)(1)(c) of this section, that a predetermined and preannounced pattern of spaces has been covered on a bingo card or sheet being used by the participant. (2) Instant bingo, electronic instant bingo, and raffles. (P) "Conduct" means to back, promote, organize, manage, carry on, sponsor, or prepare for the operation of bingo or a game of chance, a scheme of chance, or a sweepstakes. (Q) "Bingo game operator" means any person, except security personnel, who performs work or labor at the site of bingo, including, but not limited to, collecting money from participants, handing out bingo cards or sheets or objects to cover spaces on bingo cards or sheets, selecting from a receptacle the objects that contain the combination of letters and numbers that appear on bingo cards or sheets, calling out the combinations of letters and numbers, distributing prizes, selling or redeeming instant bingo tickets or cards, selling or redeeming electronic instant bingo tickets, credits, or vouchers, accessing an electronic instant bingo system other than as a participant, supervising the operation of a punch board, selling raffle tickets, selecting raffle tickets from a receptacle and announcing the winning numbers in a raffle, and preparing, selling, and serving food or beverages. "Bingo game operator" does not include a person who is installing, maintaining, updating, or repairing an electronic instant bingo system. (R) "Participant" means any person who plays bingo. (S) "Bingo session" means a period that includes both of the following: (1) Not to exceed five continuous hours for the conduct of one or more games described in division (O)(1) of this section, instant bingo, and electronic instant bingo; (2) A period for the conduct of instant bingo and electronic instant bingo for not more than two hours before and not more than two hours after the period described in division (S)(1) of this section. (T) "Gross receipts" means all money or assets, including admission fees, that a person receives from bingo without the deduction of any amounts for prizes paid out or for the expenses of conducting bingo. "Gross receipts" does not include any money directly taken in from the sale of food or beverages by a charitable organization conducting bingo, or by a bona fide auxiliary unit or society of a charitable organization conducting bingo, provided all of the following apply: (1) The auxiliary unit or society has been in existence as a bona fide auxiliary unit or society of the charitable organization for at least two years prior to conducting bingo. (2) The person who purchases the food or beverage receives nothing of value except the food or beverage and items customarily received with the purchase of that food or beverage. (3) The food and beverages are sold at customary and reasonable prices. (U) "Security personnel" includes any person who either is a sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, township constable, or member of an organized police department of a municipal corporation or has successfully completed a peace officer's training course pursuant to sections 109.71 to 109.79 of the Revised Code and who is hired to provide security for the premises on which bingo is conducted. (V) "Charitable purpose" means that the net profit of bingo, other than instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, is used by, or is given, donated, or otherwise transferred to, any of the following: (1) Any organization that is described in subsection 509(a)(1), 509(a)(2), or 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is either a governmental unit or an organization that is tax exempt under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; (2) A veteran's organization that is a post, chapter, or organization of veterans, or an auxiliary unit or society of, or a trust or foundation for, any such post, chapter, or organization organized in the United States or any of its possessions, at least seventy-five per cent of the members of which are veterans and substantially all of the other members of which are individuals who are spouses, widows, or widowers of veterans, or such individuals, provided that no part of the net earnings of such post, chapter, or organization inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and further provided that the net profit is used by the post, chapter, or organization for the charitable purposes set forth in division (B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, is used for awarding scholarships to or for attendance at an institution mentioned in division (B)(12) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, is donated to a governmental agency, or is used for nonprofit youth activities, the purchase of United States or Ohio flags that are donated to schools, youth groups, or other bona fide nonprofit organizations, promotion of patriotism, or disaster relief; (3) A fraternal organization that has been in continuous existence in this state for fifteen years and that uses the net profit exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to children or animals, if contributions for such use would qualify as a deductible charitable contribution under subsection 170 of the Internal Revenue Code; (4) A volunteer firefighter's organization that uses the net profit for the purposes set forth in division (K) of this section. (W) "Internal Revenue Code" means the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as now or hereafter amended. (X) "Youth athletic organization" means any organization, not organized for profit, that is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial support to, or to operate, athletic activities for persons who are twenty-one years of age or younger by means of sponsoring, organizing, operating, or contributing to the support of an athletic team, club, league, or association. (Y) "Youth athletic park organization" means any organization, not organized for profit, that satisfies both of the following: (1) It owns, operates, and maintains playing fields that satisfy both of the following: (a) The playing fields are used for athletic activities by one or more organizations, not organized for profit, each of which is organized and operated exclusively to provide financial support to, or to operate, athletic activities for persons who are eighteen years of age or younger by means of sponsoring, organizing, operating, or contributing to the support of an athletic team, club, league, or association. (b) The playing fields are not used for any profit-making activity at any time during the year. (2) It uses the proceeds of bingo it conducts exclusively for the operation, maintenance, and improvement of its playing fields of the type described in division (Y)(1) of this section. (Z) "Bingo supplies" means bingo cards or sheets; instant bingo tickets or cards; electronic bingo aids; raffle tickets; punch boards; seal cards; instant bingo ticket dispensers; electronic instant bingo systems; and devices for selecting or displaying the combination of bingo letters and numbers or raffle tickets. Items that are "bingo supplies" are not gambling devices if sold or otherwise provided, and used, in accordance with this chapter. For purposes of this chapter, "bingo supplies" are not to be considered equipment used to conduct a bingo game. (AA) "Instant bingo" means a form of bingo that shall use folded or banded tickets or paper cards with perforated break-open tabs, a face of which is covered or otherwise hidden from view to conceal a number, letter, or symbol, or set of numbers, letters, or symbols, some of which have been designated in advance as prize winners, and may also include games in which some winners are determined by the random selection of one or more bingo numbers by the use of a seal card or bingo blower. "Instant bingo" also includes a punch board game. In all "instant bingo" the prize amount and structure shall be predetermined. "Instant bingo" does not include electronic instant bingo or any device that is activated by the insertion of a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent, and that contains as one of its components a video display monitor that is capable of displaying numbers, letters, symbols, or characters in winning or losing combinations. (BB) "Seal card" means a form of instant bingo that uses instant bingo tickets in conjunction with a board or placard that contains one or more seals that, when removed or opened, reveal predesignated winning numbers, letters, or symbols. (CC) "Raffle" means a form of bingo in which the one or more prizes are won by one or more persons who have purchased a raffle ticket. The one or more winners of the raffle are determined by drawing a ticket stub or other detachable section from a receptacle containing ticket stubs or detachable sections corresponding to all tickets sold for the raffle. "Raffle" does not include the drawing of a ticket stub or other detachable section of a ticket purchased to attend a professional sporting event if both of the following apply: (1) The ticket stub or other detachable section is used to select the winner of a free prize given away at the professional sporting event; and (2) The cost of the ticket is the same as the cost of a ticket to the professional sporting event on days when no free prize is given away. (DD) "Punch board" means a form of instant bingo that uses a board containing a number of holes or receptacles of uniform size in which are placed, mechanically and randomly, serially numbered slips of paper that may be punched or drawn from the hole or receptacle. A player may punch or draw the numbered slips of paper from the holes or receptacles and obtain the prize established for the game if the number drawn corresponds to a winning number or, if the punch board includes the use of a seal card, a potential winning number. (EE) "Gross profit" means gross receipts minus the amount actually expended for the payment of prize awards. (FF) "Net profit" means gross profit minus expenses. (GG) "Expenses" means the reasonable amount of gross profit actually expended for all of the following: (1) The purchase or lease of bingo supplies; (2) The annual license fee required under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code; (3) Bank fees and service charges for a bingo session or game account described in section 2915.10 of the Revised Code; (4) Audits and accounting services; (5) Safes; (6) Cash registers; (7) Hiring security personnel; (8) Advertising bingo; (9) Renting premises in which to conduct a bingo session; (10) Tables and chairs; (11) Expenses for maintaining and operating a charitable organization's facilities, including, but not limited to, a post home, club house, lounge, tavern, or canteen and any grounds attached to the post home, club house, lounge, tavern, or canteen; (12) Payment of real property taxes and assessments that are levied on a premises on which bingo is conducted; (13) Any other product or service directly related to the conduct of bingo that is authorized in rules adopted by the attorney general under division (F)(1) of section 2915.08 of the Revised Code. (HH) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 of the Revised Code and includes any firm or any other legal entity, however organized. (II) "Revoke" means to void permanently all rights and privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code or a charitable gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. (JJ) "Suspend" means to interrupt temporarily all rights and privileges of the holder of a license issued under section 2915.08, 2915.081, or 2915.082 of the Revised Code or a charitable gaming license issued by another jurisdiction. (KK) "Distributor" means any person who purchases or obtains bingo supplies and who does either of the following: (1) Sells, offers for sale, or otherwise provides or offers to provide the bingo supplies to another person for use in this state; (2) Modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts from the bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale for use in this state. (LL) "Manufacturer" means any person who assembles completed bingo supplies from raw materials, other items, or subparts or who modifies, converts, adds to, or removes parts from bingo supplies to further their promotion or sale. (MM) "Gross annual revenues" means the annual gross receipts derived from the conduct of bingo described in division (O)(1) of this section plus the annual net profit derived from the conduct of bingo described in division (O)(2) of this section. (NN) "Instant bingo ticket dispenser" means a mechanical device that dispenses an instant bingo ticket or card as the sole item of value dispensed and that has the following characteristics: (1) It is activated upon the insertion of United States currency. (2) It performs no gaming functions. (3) It does not contain a video display monitor or generate noise. (4) It is not capable of displaying any numbers, letters, symbols, or characters in winning or losing combinations. (5) It does not simulate or display rolling or spinning reels. (6) It is incapable of determining whether a dispensed bingo ticket or card is a winning or nonwinning ticket or card and requires a winning ticket or card to be paid by a bingo game operator. (7) It may provide accounting and security features to aid in accounting for the instant bingo tickets or cards it dispenses. (8) It is not part of an electronic network and is not interactive. (OO)(1) "Electronic bingo aid" means an electronic device used by a participant to monitor bingo cards or sheets purchased at the time and place of a bingo session and that does all of the following: (a) It provides a means for a participant to input numbers and letters announced by a bingo caller. (b) It compares the numbers and letters entered by the participant to the bingo faces previously stored in the memory of the device. (c) It identifies a winning bingo pattern. (2) "Electronic bingo aid" does not include any device into which a coin, currency, token, or an equivalent is inserted to activate play. (PP) "Deal" means a single game of instant bingo tickets, or a single game of electronic instant bingo tickets, all with the same serial number. (QQ)(1) "Slot machine" means either of the following: (a) Any mechanical, electronic, video, or digital device that is capable of accepting anything of value, directly or indirectly, from or on behalf of a player who gives the thing of value in the hope of gain; (b) Any mechanical, electronic, video, or digital device that is capable of accepting anything of value, directly or indirectly, from or on behalf of a player to conduct bingo or a scheme or game of chance. (2) "Slot machine" does not include a skill-based amusement machine, an instant bingo ticket dispenser, or an electronic instant bingo system. (RR) "Net profit from the proceeds of the sale of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo" means gross profit minus the ordinary, necessary, and reasonable expense expended for the purchase of bingo supplies for the purpose of conducting instant bingo or electronic instant bingo, and, in the case of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo conducted by a veteran's, fraternal, or sporting organization, minus the payment by that organization of real property taxes and assessments levied on a premises on which instant bingo or electronic instant bingo is conducted. (SS) "Charitable instant bingo organization" means an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is a charitable organization as defined in this section. A "charitable instant bingo organization" does not include a charitable organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is created by a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization in regards to bingo conducted or assisted by a veteran's organization, a fraternal organization, or a sporting organization pursuant to section 2915.13 of the Revised Code. (TT) "Game flare" means the board or placard, or electronic representation of a board or placard, that accompanies each deal of instant bingo or electronic instant bingo tickets and that includes the following information for the game: (1) The name of the game; (2) The manufacturer's name or distinctive logo; (3) The form number; (4) The ticket count; (5) The prize structure, including the number of winning tickets by denomination and the respective winning symbol or number combinations for the winning tickets; (6) The cost per play; (7) The serial number of the game. (UU)(1) "Skill-based amusement machine" means a mechanical, video, digital, or electronic device that rewards the player or players, if at all, only with merchandise prizes or with redeemable vouchers redeemable only for merchandise prizes, provided that with respect to rewards for playing the game all of the following apply: (a) The wholesale value of a merchandise prize awarded as a result of the single play of a machine does not exceed ten dollars; (b) Redeemable vouchers awarded for any single play of a machine are not redeemable for a merchandise prize with a wholesale value of more than ten dollars; (c) Redeemable vouchers are not redeemable for a merchandise prize that has a wholesale value of more than ten dollars times the fewest number of single plays necessary to accrue the redeemable vouchers required to obtain that prize; and (d) Any redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes are distributed at the site of the skill-based amusement machine at the time of play. A card for the purchase of gasoline is a redeemable voucher for purposes of division (UU)(1) of this section even if the skill-based amusement machine for the play of which the card is awarded is located at a place where gasoline may not be legally distributed to the public or the card is not redeemable at the location of, or at the time of playing, the skill-based amusement machine. (2) A device shall not be considered a skill-based amusement machine and shall be considered a slot machine if it pays cash or one or more of the following apply: (a) The ability of a player to succeed at the game is impacted by the number or ratio of prior wins to prior losses of players playing the game. (b) Any reward of redeemable vouchers is not based solely on the player achieving the object of the game or the player's score; (c) The outcome of the game, or the value of the redeemable voucher or merchandise prize awarded for winning the game, can be controlled by a source other than any player playing the game. (d) The success of any player is or may be determined by a chance event that cannot be altered by player actions. (e) The ability of any player to succeed at the game is determined by game features not visible or known to the player. (f) The ability of the player to succeed at the game is impacted by the exercise of a skill that no reasonable player could exercise. (3) All of the following apply to any machine that is operated as described in division (UU)(1) of this section: (a) As used in division (UU) of this section, "game" and "play" mean one event from the initial activation of the machine until the results of play are determined without payment of additional consideration. An individual utilizing a machine that involves a single game, play, contest, competition, or tournament may be awarded redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes based on the results of play. (b) Advance play for a single game, play, contest, competition, or tournament participation may be purchased. The cost of the contest, competition, or tournament participation may be greater than a single noncontest, competition, or tournament play. (c) To the extent that the machine is used in a contest, competition, or tournament, that contest, competition, or tournament has a defined starting and ending date and is open to participants in competition for scoring and ranking results toward the awarding of redeemable vouchers or merchandise prizes that are stated prior to the start of the contest, competition, or tournament. (4) For purposes of division (UU)(1) of this section, the mere presence of a device, such as a pin-setting, ball-releasing, or scoring mechanism, that does not contribute to or affect the outcome of the play of the game does not make the device a skill-based amusement machine. (VV) "Merchandise prize" means any item of value, but shall not include any of the following: (1) Cash, gift cards, or any equivalent thereof; (2) Plays on games of chance, state lottery tickets, or bingo; (3) Firearms, tobacco, or alcoholic beverages; or (4) A redeemable voucher that is redeemable for any of the items listed in division (VV)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. (WW) "Redeemable voucher" means any ticket, token, coupon, receipt, or other noncash representation of value. (XX) "Pool not conducted for profit" means a scheme in which a participant gives a valuable consideration for a chance to win a prize and the total amount of consideration wagered is distributed to a participant or participants. (YY) "Sporting organization" means a hunting, fishing, or trapping organization, other than a college or high school fraternity or sorority, that is not organized for profit, that is affiliated with a state or national sporting organization, including but not limited to, the league of Ohio sportsmen, and that has been in continuous existence in this state for a period of three years. (ZZ) "Community action agency" has the same meaning as in section 122.66 5101.311 of the Revised Code. (AAA)(1) "Sweepstakes terminal device" means a mechanical, video, digital, or electronic machine or device that is owned, leased, or otherwise possessed by any person conducting a sweepstakes, or by that person's partners, affiliates, subsidiaries, or contractors, that is intended to be used by a sweepstakes participant, and that is capable of displaying information on a screen or other mechanism. A device is a sweepstakes terminal device if any of the following apply: (a) The device uses a simulated game terminal as a representation of the prizes associated with the results of the sweepstakes entries. (b) The device utilizes software such that the simulated game influences or determines the winning of or value of the prize. (c) The device selects prizes from a predetermined finite pool of entries. (d) The device utilizes a mechanism that reveals the content of a predetermined sweepstakes entry. (e) The device predetermines the prize results and stores those results for delivery at the time the sweepstakes entry results are revealed. (f) The device utilizes software to create a game result. (g) The device reveals the prize incrementally, even though the device does not influence the awarding of the prize or the value of any prize awarded. (h) The device determines and associates the prize with an entry or entries at the time the sweepstakes is entered. (2) As used in this division and in section 2915.02 of the Revised Code: (a) "Enter" means the act by which a person becomes eligible to receive any prize offered in a sweepstakes. (b) "Entry" means one event from the initial activation of the sweepstakes terminal device until all the sweepstakes prize results from that activation are revealed. (c) "Prize" means any gift, award, gratuity, good, service, credit, reward, or any other thing of value that may be transferred to a person, whether possession of the prize is actually transferred, or placed on an account or other record as evidence of the intent to transfer the prize. (d) "Sweepstakes terminal device facility" means any location in this state where a sweepstakes terminal device is provided to a sweepstakes participant, except as provided in division (G) of section 2915.02 of the Revised Code. (BBB) "Sweepstakes" means any game, contest, advertising scheme or plan, or other promotion where consideration is not required for a person to enter to win or become eligible to receive any prize, the determination of which is based upon chance. "Sweepstakes" does not include bingo as authorized under this chapter, pari-mutuel wagering as authorized by Chapter 3769. of the Revised Code, lotteries conducted by the state lottery commission as authorized by Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, and casino gaming as authorized by Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. (CCC)(1) "Electronic instant bingo" means a form of bingo that consists of an electronic or digital representation of instant bingo in which a participant wins a prize if the participant's electronic instant bingo ticket contains a combination of numbers or symbols that was designated in advance as a winning combination, and to which all of the following apply: (a) Each deal has a predetermined, finite number of winning and losing tickets and a predetermined prize amount and deal structure, provided that there may be multiple winning combinations in each deal and multiple winning tickets. (b) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal has a unique serial number that is not regenerated. (c) Each electronic instant bingo ticket within a deal is sold for the same price. (d) After a participant purchases an electronic instant bingo ticket, the combination of numbers or symbols on the ticket is revealed to the participant. (e) The reveal of numbers or symbols on the ticket may incorporate an entertainment or bonus theme, provided that the reveal does not include spinning reels that resemble a slot machine. (f) The reveal theme, if any, does not require additional consideration or award any prize other than any predetermined prize associated with the electronic instant bingo ticket. (2) "Electronic instant bingo" shall not include any of the following: (a) Any game, entertainment, or bonus theme that replicates or simulates any of the following: (i) The gambling games of keno, blackjack, roulette, poker, craps, other casino-style table games; (ii) Horse racing; (iii) Gambling games offered in this state on slot machines or video lottery terminals. As used in this division, "video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (b) Any device operated by dropping one or more coins or tokens into a slot and pulling a handle or pushing a button or touchpoint on a touchscreen to activate one to three or more rotating reels marked into horizontal segments by varying symbols, where the predetermined prize amount depends on how and how many of the symbols line up when the rotating reels come to a rest; (c) Any device that includes a coin or token slot, tray, or hopper and the ability to dispense coins, cash, tokens, or anything of value other than a credit ticket voucher. (DDD) "Electronic instant bingo system" means both of the following: (1) A mechanical, electronic, digital, or video device and associated software to which all of the following apply: (a) It is used by not more than one player at a time to play electronic instant bingo on a single screen that is physically connected to the device; (b) It is located on the premises of the principal place of business of a veteran's or fraternal organization that holds a type II or type III bingo license to conduct electronic instant bingo at that location issued under section 2915.08 of the Revised Code. (2) Any associated equipment or software used to manage, monitor, or document any aspect of electronic instant bingo. Sec. 2917.211. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Child-victim oriented offense" and "sexually oriented offense" have the same meanings as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Disseminate" means to post, distribute, or publish on a computer device, computer network, web site, or other electronic device or medium of communication. (2) (3) "Image" means a photograph, film, videotape, digital recording, or other depiction or portrayal of a person. (3) (4) "Interactive computer service" has the meaning defined in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 230, as amended. (4) (5) "Internet provider" means a provider of internet service, including all of the following: (a) Broadband service, however defined or classified by the federal communications commission; (b) Information service or telecommunications service, both as defined in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 153, as amended; (c) Internet protocol-enabled services, as defined in section 4927.01 of the Revised Code. (5) (6) "Mobile service" and "telecommunications carrier" have the meanings defined in 47 U.S.C. 153, as amended. (6) (7) "Cable service provider" has the same meaning as in section 1332.01 of the Revised Code. (7) (8) "Direct-to-home satellite service" has the meaning defined in 47 U.S.C. 303, as amended. (8) (9) "Video service provider" has the same meaning as in section 1332.21 of the Revised Code. (9) (10) "Sexual act" means any of the following: (a) Sexual activity; (b) Masturbation; (c) An act involving a bodily substance that is performed for the purpose of sexual arousal or gratification; (d) Sado-masochistic abuse. (11) "Fabricated sexual image" has the same meaning as in section 2307.66 of the Revised Code. (B) No person shall knowingly disseminate an image of another person if all of the following apply: (1) The person in the image is eighteen years of age or older. (2) The person in the image can be identified from the image itself or from information displayed in connection with the image and the offender supplied the identifying information. (3) The person in the image is in a state of nudity or is engaged in a sexual act. (4) The image is disseminated without consent from the person in the image. (5) The image is disseminated with intent to harm the person in the image. (C) No person shall knowingly disseminate a fabricated sexual image of another person without the other person's consent. (D) No person shall, without the consent of the depicted person, in order to harass, extort, threaten, or cause physical, emotional, reputational, or economic harm to a person falsely depicted, knowingly do either of the following: (1) Create a fabricated sexual image with intent to distribute; (2) Solicit the creation of a fabricated sexual image with intent to distribute. (E) This section does not prohibit the dissemination of an image or fabricated sexual image if any of the following apply: (1) The image or fabricated sexual image is disseminated for the purpose of a criminal investigation that is otherwise lawful. (2) The image or fabricated sexual image is disseminated for the purpose of, or in connection with, the reporting of unlawful conduct. (3) The image or fabricated sexual image is part of a news report or commentary or an artistic or expressive work, such as a performance, work of art, literary work, theatrical work, musical work, motion picture, film, or audiovisual work. (4) The image or fabricated sexual image is disseminated by a law enforcement officer, or a corrections officer or guard in a detention facility, acting within the scope of the person's official duties. (5) The image or fabricated sexual image is disseminated for another lawful public purpose. (6) The If the person in the image or fabricated sexual image is eighteen years of age or older, the person in the image or fabricated sexual image is knowingly and willingly in a state of nudity or engaged in a sexual act and is knowingly and willingly in a location in which the person does not have a reasonable expectation of privacy. (7) The image or fabricated sexual image is disseminated for the purpose of medical treatment or examination. (D) (F) The following entities are not liable for a violation of this section solely as a result of an image or fabricated sexual image or other information provided by another person: (1) A provider of interactive computer service; (2) A mobile service; (3) A telecommunications carrier; (4) An internet provider; (5) A cable service provider; (6) A direct-to-home satellite service; (7) A video service provider. (E) (G) Any conduct that is a violation of this section and any other section of the Revised Code may be prosecuted under this section, the other section, or both sections. (F)(1)(a) (H)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(1)(b), (c), or (d) (H)(1)(b) of this section, whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images, a misdemeanor felony of the third fifth degree. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (B) of this section, a sexually oriented offense, or a child-victim oriented offense, nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a misdemeanor felony of the second fourth degree. (c) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of this section, nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (d) If the offender is under eighteen years of age and the person in the image is not more than five years older than the offender, the offender shall not be prosecuted under this section. (2) (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(2)(b) of this section, whoever violates division (C) of this section is guilty of nonconsensual dissemination of fabricated sexual images, a felony of the fourth degree. (b) If the offender has previously been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, a sexually oriented offense, or a child-victim oriented offense, nonconsensual dissemination of fabricated sexual images is a felony of the third degree. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(3)(b) of this section, whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of nonconsensual creation of fabricated sexual images, a felony of the fourth degree. (b) If the offender has previously been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, a sexually oriented offense, or a child-victim oriented offense, nonconsensual creation of fabricated sexual images is a felony of the third degree. (4) In addition to any other penalty or disposition authorized or required by law, the court may order any person who is convicted of a violation of this section or who is adjudicated delinquent by reason of a violation of this section to criminally forfeit all of the following property to the state under Chapter 2981. of the Revised Code: (a) Any profits or proceeds and any property the person has acquired or maintained in violation of this section that the sentencing court determines to have been acquired or maintained as a result of the violation; (b) Any interest in, securities of, claim against, or property or contractual right of any kind affording a source of influence over any enterprise that the person has established, operated, controlled, or conducted in violation of this section that the sentencing court determines to have been acquired or maintained as a result of the violation. (G) (I) A victim of a violation of this section may commence a civil cause of action against the offender, as described in section 2307.66 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2919.171. (A)(1) A physician who performs or induces or attempts to perform or induce an abortion on a pregnant woman shall submit a report to the department of health in accordance with the forms, rules, and regulations adopted by the department that includes all of the information the physician is required to certify in writing or determine under section 2919.17, section 2919.18, divisions (A) and (C) of section 2919.192, division (C) of section 2919.193, division (B) of section 2919.195, or division (A) of section 2919.196 of the Revised Code. (2) If a person other than the physician described in division (A)(1) of this section makes or maintains a record required by sections 2919.192 to 2919.196 of the Revised Code on the physician's behalf or at the physician's direction, that person shall comply with the reporting requirement described in division (A)(1) of this section as if the person were the physician described in that division. (B) By September 30 the first day of March of each year, the department of health shall issue a public report that provides statistics for the previous calendar year compiled from all of the reports covering that calendar year submitted to the department in accordance with this section for each of the items listed in division (A) of this section. The report shall also provide the statistics for each previous calendar year in which a report was filed with the department pursuant to this section, adjusted to reflect any additional information that a physician provides to the department in a late or corrected report. The department shall ensure that none of the information included in the report could reasonably lead to the identification of any pregnant woman upon whom an abortion is performed. (C)(1) The physician shall submit the report described in division (A) of this section to the department of health within fifteen days after the woman is discharged. If the physician fails to submit the report more than thirty days after that fifteen-day deadline, the physician shall be subject to a late fee of five hundred dollars for each additional thirty-day period or portion of a thirty-day period the report is overdue. A physician who is required to submit to the department of health a report under division (A) of this section and who has not submitted a report or has submitted an incomplete report more than one year following the fifteen-day deadline may, in an action brought by the department of health, be directed by a court of competent jurisdiction to submit a complete report to the department of health within a period of time stated in a court order or be subject to contempt of court. (2) If a physician fails to comply with the requirements of this section, other than filing a late report with the department of health, or fails to submit a complete report to the department of health in accordance with a court order, the physician is subject to division (B)(43) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code. (3) No person shall falsify any report required under this section. Whoever violates this division is guilty of abortion report falsification, a misdemeanor of the first degree. (D) The department of health shall adopt rules pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code to assist in compliance with this section. Sec. 2919.19. (A) As used in this section and sections 2919.191 to 2919.1910 2919.199 of the Revised Code: (1) "Conception" means fertilization. (2) "Contraceptive" means a drug, device, or chemical that prevents conception. (3) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid. (4) "Fetal heartbeat" means cardiac activity or the steady and repetitive rhythmic contraction of the fetal heart within the gestational sac. (5) "Fetus" means the human offspring developing during pregnancy from the moment of conception and includes the embryonic stage of development. (6) "Gestational age" means the age of an unborn human individual as calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of a pregnant woman. (7) "Gestational sac" means the structure that comprises the extraembryonic membranes that envelop the fetus and that is typically visible by ultrasound after the fourth week of pregnancy. (8) "Intrauterine pregnancy" means a pregnancy in which the fetus is attached to the placenta within the uterus of the pregnant woman. (9) "Medical emergency" has the same meaning as in section 2919.16 of the Revised Code. (10) "Physician" has the same meaning as in section 2305.113 of the Revised Code. (11) "Pregnancy" means the human female reproductive condition that begins with fertilization, when the woman is carrying the developing human offspring, and that is calculated from the first day of the last menstrual period of the woman. (12) "Serious risk of the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function" has the same meaning as in section 2919.16 of the Revised Code. (13) "Spontaneous miscarriage" means the natural or accidental termination of a pregnancy and the expulsion of the fetus, typically caused by genetic defects in the fetus or physical abnormalities in the pregnant woman. (14) "Standard medical practice" means the degree of skill, care, and diligence that a physician of the same medical specialty would employ in like circumstances. As applied to the method used to determine the presence of a fetal heartbeat for purposes of section 2919.192 of the Revised Code, "standard medical practice" includes employing the appropriate means of detection depending on the estimated gestational age of the fetus and the condition of the woman and her pregnancy. (15) "Unborn human individual" means an individual organism of the species homo sapiens from fertilization until live birth. (B)(1) It is the intent of the general assembly that a court judgment or order suspending enforcement of any provision of this section or sections 2919.171 or 2919.191 to 2919.1913 of the Revised Code is not to be regarded as tantamount to repeal of that provision. (2) Upon the issuance of any court order or judgment restoring, expanding, or clarifying the authority of states to prohibit or regulate abortion entirely or in part, or the effective date of an amendment to the United States Constitution restoring, expanding, or clarifying the authority of states to prohibit or regulate abortion entirely or in part, the attorney general may apply to the pertinent state or federal court for either or both of the following: (a) A declaration that any one or more sections specified in division (B)(1) of this section are constitutional; (b) A judgment or order lifting an injunction against the enforcement of any one or more sections specified in division (B)(1) of this section. (3) If the attorney general fails to apply for the relief described in division (B)(2) of this section within the thirty-day period after an event described in that division occurs, any county prosecutor, with standing, may apply to the appropriate state or federal court for such relief. (4) If any provision of this section or sections 2919.171 or 2919.191 to 2919.1913 of the Revised Code is held invalid, or if the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity of that provision does not affect any other provisions or applications of this section and sections 2919.171 and 2919.191 to 2919.1913 of the Revised Code that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section and sections 2919.171 and 2919.191 to 2919.1913 of the Revised Code are severable as provided in section 1.50 of the Revised Code. In particular, it is the intent of the general assembly that any invalidity or potential invalidity of a provision of this section or sections 2919.171 or 2919.191 to 2919.1913 of the Revised Code is not to impair the immediate and continuing enforceability of the remaining provisions. It is furthermore the intent of the general assembly that the provisions of this section and sections 2919.171 or 2919.191 to 2919.1913 of the Revised Code are not to have the effect of repealing or limiting any other laws of this state, except as specified by this section and sections 2919.171 and 2919.191 to 2919.1913 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2921.13. (A) No person shall knowingly make a false statement, or knowingly swear or affirm the truth of a false statement previously made, when any of the following applies: (1) The statement is made in any official proceeding. (2) The statement is made with purpose to incriminate another. (3) The statement is made with purpose to mislead a public official in performing the public official's official function. (4) The statement is made with purpose to secure the payment of unemployment compensation; Ohio works first; prevention, retention, and contingency benefits and services; disability financial assistance; retirement benefits or health care coverage from a state retirement system; economic development assistance, as defined in section 9.66 of the Revised Code; or other benefits administered by a governmental agency or paid out of a public treasury. (5) The statement is made with purpose to secure the issuance by a governmental agency of a license, permit, authorization, certificate, registration, release, or provider agreement. (6) The statement is sworn or affirmed before a notary public or another person empowered to administer oaths. (7) The statement is in writing on or in connection with a report or return that is required or authorized by law. (8) The statement is in writing and is made with purpose to induce another to extend credit to or employ the offender, to confer any degree, diploma, certificate of attainment, award of excellence, or honor on the offender, or to extend to or bestow upon the offender any other valuable benefit or distinction, when the person to whom the statement is directed relies upon it to that person's detriment. (9) The statement is made with purpose to commit or facilitate the commission of a theft offense. (10) The statement is knowingly made to a probate court in connection with any action, proceeding, or other matter within its jurisdiction, either orally or in a written document, including, but not limited to, an application, petition, complaint, or other pleading, or an inventory, account, or report. (11) The statement is made on an account, form, record, stamp, label, or other writing that is required by law. (12) The statement is made in connection with the purchase of a firearm, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code, and in conjunction with the furnishing to the seller of the firearm of a fictitious or altered driver's or commercial driver's license or permit, a fictitious or altered identification card, or any other document that contains false information about the purchaser's identity. (13) The statement is made in a document or instrument of writing that purports to be a judgment, lien, or claim of indebtedness and is filed or recorded with the secretary of state, a county recorder, or the clerk of a court of record. (14) The statement is made in an application filed with a county sheriff pursuant to section 2923.125 of the Revised Code in order to obtain or renew a concealed handgun license or is made in an affidavit submitted to a county sheriff to obtain a concealed handgun license on a temporary emergency basis under section 2923.1213 of the Revised Code. (15) The statement is required under section 5743.71 of the Revised Code in connection with the person's purchase of cigarettes or tobacco products in a delivery sale. (16) The statement is made to the department of children and youth in connection with the Ohio adoption grant program for the purpose of qualifying for or obtaining an adoption grant under sections 5101.19 to 5101.194 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, in connection with the purchase of a firearm, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code, shall knowingly furnish to the seller of the firearm a fictitious or altered driver's or commercial driver's license or permit, a fictitious or altered identification card, or any other document that contains false information about the purchaser's identity. (C) No person, in an attempt to obtain a concealed handgun license under section 2923.125 of the Revised Code, shall knowingly present to a sheriff a fictitious or altered document that purports to be certification of the person's competence in handling a handgun as described in division (B)(3) of that section. (D) It is no defense to a charge under division (A)(6) of this section that the oath or affirmation was administered or taken in an irregular manner. (E) If contradictory statements relating to the same fact are made by the offender within the period of the statute of limitations for falsification, it is not necessary for the prosecution to prove which statement was false but only that one or the other was false. (F)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (10), (11), (13), or (15), or (16) of this section is guilty of falsification. Except as otherwise provided in this division, falsification is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) Whoever violates division (A)(9) of this section is guilty of falsification in a theft offense. Except as otherwise provided in this division, falsification in a theft offense is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, falsification in a theft offense is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, falsification in a theft offense is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, falsification in a theft offense is a felony of the third degree. (3) Whoever violates division (A)(12) or (B) of this section is guilty of falsification to purchase a firearm, a felony of the fifth degree. (4) Whoever violates division (A)(14) or (C) of this section is guilty of falsification to obtain a concealed handgun license, a felony of the fourth degree. (5) Whoever violates division (A) of this section in removal proceedings under section 319.26, 321.37, 507.13, or 733.78 of the Revised Code is guilty of falsification regarding a removal proceeding, a felony of the third degree. (G) A person who violates this section is liable in a civil action to any person harmed by the violation for injury, death, or loss to person or property incurred as a result of the commission of the offense and for reasonable attorney's fees, court costs, and other expenses incurred as a result of prosecuting the civil action commenced under this division. A civil action under this division is not the exclusive remedy of a person who incurs injury, death, or loss to person or property as a result of a violation of this section. Sec. 2921.36. (A) No person shall knowingly convey, or attempt to convey, onto the grounds of a detention facility or of an institution, office building, or other place that is under the control of the department of mental health and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, the department of youth services, or the department of rehabilitation and correction any of the following items: (1) Any deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code, or any part of or ammunition for use in such a deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance; (2) Any drug of abuse, as defined in section 3719.011 of the Revised Code; (3) Any intoxicating liquor, as defined in section 4301.01 of the Revised Code, except for small amounts of wine for sacramental purposes when the person engaging in the specified conduct is a cleric, as defined in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to any person who conveys or attempts to convey an item onto the grounds of a detention facility or of an institution, office building, or other place under the control of the department of mental health and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, the department of youth services, or the department of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to the written authorization of the person in charge of the detention facility or the institution, office building, or other place and in accordance with the written rules of the detention facility or the institution, office building, or other place. (C) No person shall knowingly deliver, or attempt to deliver, to any person who is confined in a detention facility, to a child confined in a youth services facility, to a prisoner who is temporarily released from confinement for a work assignment, or to any patient in an institution under the control of the department of mental health and addiction services or the department of developmental disabilities any item listed in division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. (D) No person shall knowingly deliver, or attempt to deliver, cash to any person who is confined in a detention facility, to a child confined in a youth services facility, or to a prisoner who is temporarily released from confinement for a work assignment. (E) No person shall knowingly deliver, or attempt to deliver, to any person who is confined in a detention facility, to a child confined in a youth services facility, or to a prisoner who is temporarily released from confinement for a work assignment a cellular telephone, two-way radio, or other electronic communications device. (F)(1) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (A)(1) of this section that the weapon or dangerous ordnance in question was being transported in a motor vehicle for any lawful purpose, that it was not on the actor's person, and, if the weapon or dangerous ordnance in question was a firearm, that it was unloaded and was being carried in a closed package, box, or case or in a compartment that can be reached only by leaving the vehicle. (2) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (C) of this section that the actor was not otherwise prohibited by law from delivering the item to the confined person, the child, the prisoner, or the patient and that either of the following applies: (a) The actor was permitted by the written rules of the detention facility or the institution, office building, or other place to deliver the item to the confined person or the patient. (b) The actor was given written authorization by the person in charge of the detention facility or the institution, office building, or other place to deliver the item to the confined person or the patient. (G)(1) Whoever violates division (A)(1) of this section or commits a violation of division (C) of this section involving an item listed in division (A)(1) of this section is guilty of illegal conveyance of weapons onto the grounds of a specified governmental facility, a felony of the third degree. If the offender is an officer or employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term from the range of definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree. (2) Whoever violates division (A)(2) of this section or commits a violation of division (C) of this section involving any drug of abuse is guilty of illegal conveyance of drugs of abuse onto the grounds of a specified governmental facility, a felony of the third degree. If the offender is an officer or employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction or of the department of youth services, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term from the range of definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree. (3) Whoever violates division (A)(3) of this section or commits a violation of division (C) of this section involving any intoxicating liquor is guilty of illegal conveyance of intoxicating liquor onto the grounds of a specified governmental facility, a misdemeanor of the second degree. (4) Whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of illegal conveyance of cash onto the grounds of a detention facility, a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (D) of this section, illegal conveyance of cash onto the grounds of a detention facility is a felony of the fifth degree. (5) Whoever (5)(a) Except as provided in division (G)(5)(b) of this section, whoever violates division (E) of this section is guilty of illegal conveyance of a communications device onto the grounds of a specified governmental facility, a misdemeanor of the first degree, or if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (E) of this section, a felony of the fifth degree. (b) If the offender is an officer or employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services or a contractor or employee of a contractor providing services to the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services, a violation of division (E) of this section is a felony of the third degree, and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term from the range of definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree. Sec. 2921.41. (A) No public official or party official shall commit any theft offense, as defined in division (K) of section 2913.01 of the Revised Code, when either of the following applies: (1) The offender uses the offender's office in aid of committing the offense or permits or assents to its use in aid of committing the offense; (2) The property or service involved is owned by this state, any other state, the United States, a county, a municipal corporation, a township, or any political subdivision, department, or agency of any of them, is owned by a political party, or is part of a political campaign fund. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of theft in office. Except as otherwise provided in this division, theft in office is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of property or services stolen is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, theft in office is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of property or services stolen is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, theft in office is a felony of the third degree. If the value of property or services stolen is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more and is less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, theft in office is a felony of the second degree. If the value of property or services stolen is seven hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, theft in office is a felony of the first degree. (C)(1) A public official or party official who pleads guilty to theft in office and whose plea is accepted by the court or a public official or party official against whom a verdict or finding of guilt for committing theft in office is returned is forever disqualified from holding any public office, employment, or position of trust in this state. (2)(a)(i) A court that imposes sentence for a violation of this section based on conduct described in division (A)(2) of this section shall require the public official or party official who is convicted of or pleads guilty to the offense to make restitution for all of the property or the service that is the subject of the offense, in addition to the term of imprisonment and any fine imposed. The total amount of restitution imposed under this division shall include costs of auditing the public entities specified in division (A)(2) of this section that own the property or service involved in the conduct described in that division that is a violation of this section, but, except as otherwise provided in a negotiated plea agreement, shall not exceed the amount of the restitution imposed for all of the property or the service that is the subject of the offense. (ii) A court that imposes sentence for a violation of this section based on conduct described in division (A)(1) of this section and that determines at trial that this state or a political subdivision of this state if the offender is a public official, or a political party in the United States or this state if the offender is a party official, suffered actual loss as a result of the offense shall require the offender to make restitution to the state, political subdivision, or political party for all of the actual loss experienced, in addition to the term of imprisonment and any fine imposed. The total amount of restitution imposed under this division shall include costs of auditing the state, political subdivision, or political party that suffered the actual loss based on conduct described in that division that is a violation of this section, but, except as otherwise provided in a negotiated plea agreement, shall not exceed the amount of the restitution imposed for all of the actual loss suffered. (b)(i) In any case in which a sentencing court is required to order restitution under division (C)(2)(a) of this section and in which the offender, at the time of the commission of the offense or at any other time, was a member of the public employees retirement system, the Ohio police and fire pension fund, the state teachers retirement system, the school employees retirement system, or the state highway patrol retirement system; was an electing employee, as defined in section 3305.01 of the Revised Code, participating in an alternative retirement plan provided pursuant to Chapter 3305. of the Revised Code; was a participating employee or continuing member, as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, in a deferred compensation program offered by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board; was an officer or employee of a municipal corporation who was a participant in a deferred compensation program offered by that municipal corporation; was an officer or employee of a government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, who was a participant in a deferred compensation program offered by that government unit, or was a participating employee, continuing member, or participant in any deferred compensation program described in this division and a member of a retirement system specified in this division or a retirement system of a municipal corporation, the entity to which restitution is to be made may file a motion with the sentencing court specifying any retirement system, any provider as defined in section 3305.01 of the Revised Code, and any deferred compensation program of which the offender was a member, electing employee, participating employee, continuing member, or participant and requesting the court to issue an order requiring the specified retirement system, the specified provider under the alternative retirement plan, or the specified deferred compensation program, or, if more than one is specified in the motion, the applicable combination of these, to withhold the amount required as restitution from any payment that is to be made under a pension, annuity, or allowance, under an option in the alternative retirement plan, under a participant account, as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, or under any other type of benefit, other than a survivorship benefit, that has been or is in the future granted to the offender, from any payment of accumulated employee contributions standing to the offender's credit with that retirement system, that provider of the option under the alternative retirement plan, or that deferred compensation program, or, if more than one is specified in the motion, the applicable combination of these, and from any payment of any other amounts to be paid to the offender upon the offender's withdrawal of the offender's contributions pursuant to Chapter 145., 148., 742., 3307., 3309., or 5505. of the Revised Code. A motion described in this division may be filed at any time subsequent to the conviction of the offender or entry of a guilty plea. Upon the filing of the motion, the clerk of the court in which the motion is filed shall notify the offender, the specified retirement system, the specified provider under the alternative retirement plan, or the specified deferred compensation program, or, if more than one is specified in the motion, the applicable combination of these, in writing, of all of the following: that the motion was filed; that the offender will be granted a hearing on the issuance of the requested order if the offender files a written request for a hearing with the clerk prior to the expiration of thirty days after the offender receives the notice; that, if a hearing is requested, the court will schedule a hearing as soon as possible and notify the offender, any specified retirement system, any specified provider under an alternative retirement plan, and any specified deferred compensation program of the date, time, and place of the hearing; that, if a hearing is conducted, it will be limited only to a consideration of whether the offender can show good cause why the requested order should not be issued; that, if a hearing is conducted, the court will not issue the requested order if the court determines, based on evidence presented at the hearing by the offender, that there is good cause for the requested order not to be issued; that the court will issue the requested order if a hearing is not requested or if a hearing is conducted but the court does not determine, based on evidence presented at the hearing by the offender, that there is good cause for the requested order not to be issued; and that, if the requested order is issued, any retirement system, any provider under an alternative retirement plan, and any deferred compensation program specified in the motion will be required to withhold the amount required as restitution from payments to the offender. (ii) In any case in which a sentencing court is required to order restitution under division (C)(2)(a) of this section and in which a motion requesting the issuance of a withholding order as described in division (C)(2)(b)(i) of this section is filed, the offender may receive a hearing on the motion by delivering a written request for a hearing to the court prior to the expiration of thirty days after the offender's receipt of the notice provided pursuant to division (C)(2)(b)(i) of this section. If a request for a hearing is made by the offender within the prescribed time, the court shall schedule a hearing as soon as possible after the request is made and shall notify the offender, the specified retirement system, the specified provider under the alternative retirement plan, or the specified deferred compensation program, or, if more than one is specified in the motion, the applicable combination of these, of the date, time, and place of the hearing. A hearing scheduled under this division shall be limited to a consideration of whether there is good cause, based on evidence presented by the offender, for the requested order not to be issued. If the court determines, based on evidence presented by the offender, that there is good cause for the order not to be issued, the court shall deny the motion and shall not issue the requested order. If the offender does not request a hearing within the prescribed time or if the court conducts a hearing but does not determine, based on evidence presented by the offender, that there is good cause for the order not to be issued, the court shall order the specified retirement system, the specified provider under the alternative retirement plan, or the specified deferred compensation program, or, if more than one is specified in the motion, the applicable combination of these, to withhold the amount required as restitution under division (C)(2)(a) of this section from any payments to be made under a pension, annuity, or allowance, under a participant account, as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, under an option in the alternative retirement plan, or under any other type of benefit, other than a survivorship benefit, that has been or is in the future granted to the offender, from any payment of accumulated employee contributions standing to the offender's credit with that retirement system, that provider under the alternative retirement plan, or that deferred compensation program, or, if more than one is specified in the motion, the applicable combination of these, and from any payment of any other amounts to be paid to the offender upon the offender's withdrawal of the offender's contributions pursuant to Chapter 145., 148., 742., 3307., 3309., or 5505. of the Revised Code, and to continue the withholding for that purpose, in accordance with the order, out of each payment to be made on or after the date of issuance of the order, until further order of the court. Upon receipt of an order issued under this division, the public employees retirement system, the Ohio police and fire pension fund, the state teachers retirement system, the school employees retirement system, the state highway patrol retirement system, a municipal corporation retirement system, the provider under the alternative retirement plan, and the deferred compensation program offered by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board, a municipal corporation, or a government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, whichever are applicable, shall withhold the amount required as restitution, in accordance with the order, from any such payments and immediately shall forward the amount withheld to the clerk of the court in which the order was issued for payment to the entity to which restitution is to be made. (iii) Service of a notice required by division (C)(2)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section shall be effected in the same manner as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process. (c) Consistent with the ruling of the supreme court of the United States in Kelly v. Robinson, 479 U.S. 36 (1986), restitution imposed under division (C)(2)(a) of this section is not dischargeable under Chapter 7 of the United States Bankruptcy Code pursuant to 11 U.S.C. 523, as amended. (D) Upon the filing of charges against a person under this section, the prosecutor, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, who is assigned the case shall send written notice that charges have been filed against that person to the public employees retirement system, the Ohio police and fire pension fund, the state teachers retirement system, the school employees retirement system, the state highway patrol retirement system, the provider under an alternative retirement plan, any municipal corporation retirement system in this state, and the deferred compensation program offered by the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board, a municipal corporation, or a government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code. The written notice shall specifically identify the person charged. Sec. 2925.14. (A) As used in this section, "drug paraphernalia" means any equipment, product, or material of any kind that is used by the offender, intended by the offender for use, or designed for use, in propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body, a controlled substance in violation of this chapter. "Drug paraphernalia" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following equipment, products, or materials that are used by the offender, intended by the offender for use, or designed by the offender for use, in any of the following manners: (1) A kit for propagating, cultivating, growing, or harvesting any species of a plant that is a controlled substance or from which a controlled substance can be derived; (2) A kit for manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, or preparing a controlled substance; (3) Any object, instrument, or device for manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, or preparing methamphetamine; (4) An isomerization device for increasing the potency of any species of a plant that is a controlled substance; (5) Testing equipment for identifying, or analyzing the strength, effectiveness, or purity of, a controlled substance, except for those exempted in unless division (D)(4) of this section applies to the testing equipment; (6) A scale or balance for weighing or measuring a controlled substance; (7) A diluent or adulterant, such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol, mannite, dextrose, or lactose, for cutting a controlled substance; (8) A separation gin or sifter for removing twigs and seeds from, or otherwise cleaning or refining, marihuana; (9) A blender, bowl, container, spoon, or mixing device for compounding a controlled substance; (10) A capsule, balloon, envelope, or container for packaging small quantities of a controlled substance; (11) A container or device for storing or concealing a controlled substance; (12) A hypodermic syringe, needle, or instrument for parenterally injecting a controlled substance into the human body; (13) An object, instrument, or device for ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body, marihuana, cocaine, hashish, or hashish oil, such as a metal, wooden, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic, or ceramic pipe, with or without a screen, permanent screen, hashish head, or punctured metal bowl; water pipe; carburetion tube or device; smoking or carburetion mask; roach clip or similar object used to hold burning material, such as a marihuana cigarette, that has become too small or too short to be held in the hand; miniature cocaine spoon, or cocaine vial; chamber pipe; carburetor pipe; electric pipe; air driver pipe; chillum; bong; or ice pipe or chiller. (B) In determining if any equipment, product, or material is drug paraphernalia, a court or law enforcement officer shall consider, in addition to other relevant factors, the following: (1) Any statement by the owner, or by anyone in control, of the equipment, product, or material, concerning its use; (2) The proximity in time or space of the equipment, product, or material, or of the act relating to the equipment, product, or material, to a violation of any provision of this chapter; (3) The proximity of the equipment, product, or material to any controlled substance; (4) The existence of any residue of a controlled substance on the equipment, product, or material; (5) Direct or circumstantial evidence of the intent of the owner, or of anyone in control, of the equipment, product, or material, to deliver it to any person whom the owner or person in control of the equipment, product, or material knows intends to use the object to facilitate a violation of any provision of this chapter. A finding that the owner, or anyone in control, of the equipment, product, or material, is not guilty of a violation of any other provision of this chapter does not prevent a finding that the equipment, product, or material was intended or designed by the offender for use as drug paraphernalia. (6) Any oral or written instruction provided with the equipment, product, or material concerning its use; (7) Any descriptive material accompanying the equipment, product, or material and explaining or depicting its use; (8) National or local advertising concerning the use of the equipment, product, or material; (9) The manner and circumstances in which the equipment, product, or material is displayed for sale; (10) Direct or circumstantial evidence of the ratio of the sales of the equipment, product, or material to the total sales of the business enterprise; (11) The existence and scope of legitimate uses of the equipment, product, or material in the community; (12) Expert testimony concerning the use of the equipment, product, or material. (C)(1) Subject to divisions (D)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, no person shall knowingly use, or possess with purpose to use, drug paraphernalia. (2) No person shall knowingly sell, or possess or manufacture with purpose to sell, drug paraphernalia, if the person knows or reasonably should know that the equipment, product, or material will be used as drug paraphernalia. (3) No person shall place an advertisement in any newspaper, magazine, handbill, or other publication that is published and printed and circulates primarily within this state, if the person knows that the purpose of the advertisement is to promote the illegal sale in this state of the equipment, product, or material that the offender intended or designed for use as drug paraphernalia. (D)(1) This section does not apply to manufacturers, licensed health professionals authorized to prescribe drugs, pharmacists, owners of pharmacies, and other persons whose conduct is in accordance with Chapters 3719., 4715., 4723., 4729., 4730., 4731., 4741., and 4772. of the Revised Code. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the possession or use of a hypodermic as authorized by section 3719.172 of the Revised Code. (2) Division (C)(1) of this section does not apply to a person's use, or possession with purpose to use, any drug paraphernalia that is equipment, a product, or material of any kind that is used by the person, intended by the person for use, or designed for use in storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the human body marihuana. (3) Division (B)(2) of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code applies with respect to a violation of division (C)(1) of this section when a person seeks or obtains medical assistance for another person who is experiencing a drug overdose, a person experiences a drug overdose and seeks medical assistance for that overdose, or a person is the subject of another person seeking or obtaining medical assistance for that overdose. (4) Division (C)(1) of this section does not apply to a person's use, or possession with purpose to use, any drug testing strips to determine the presence of fentanyl or a fentanyl-related compound or any other equipment, product, or material approved by the state board of pharmacy, in rules adopted under section 4729.261 of the Revised Code, as a type of instrument that demonstrates efficacy in reducing drug poisoning by determining the presence of a specific compound or group of compounds. (E) Notwithstanding Chapter 2981. of the Revised Code, any drug paraphernalia that was used, possessed, sold, or manufactured in a violation of this section shall be seized, after a conviction for that violation shall be forfeited, and upon forfeiture shall be disposed of pursuant to division (B) of section 2981.12 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) Whoever violates division (C)(1) of this section is guilty of illegal use or possession of drug paraphernalia, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (2) Except as provided in division (F)(3) of this section, whoever violates division (C)(2) of this section is guilty of dealing in drug paraphernalia, a misdemeanor of the second degree. (3) Whoever violates division (C)(2) of this section by selling drug paraphernalia to a juvenile is guilty of selling drug paraphernalia to juveniles, a misdemeanor of the first degree. (4) Whoever violates division (C)(3) of this section is guilty of illegal advertising of drug paraphernalia, a misdemeanor of the second degree. (G)(1) If the offender is a professionally licensed person, in addition to any other sanction imposed for a violation of this section, the court immediately shall comply with section 2925.38 of the Revised Code. If the offender has a driver's or commercial driver's license or permit, section 2929.33 of the Revised Code applies. (2) Any offender who received a mandatory suspension of the offender's driver's or commercial driver's license or permit under this section prior to September 13, 2016,may file a motion with the sentencing court requesting the termination of the suspension. However, an offender who pleaded guilty to or was convicted of a violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a substantially similar municipal ordinance or law of another state or the United States that arose out of the same set of circumstances as the violation for which the offender's license or permit was suspended under this section shall not file such a motion. Upon the filing of a motion under division (G)(2) of this section, the sentencing court, in its discretion, may terminate the suspension. Sec. 2933.32. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Body cavity search" means an inspection of the anal or vaginal cavity of a person that is conducted visually, manually, by means of any instrument, apparatus, or object, or in any other manner while the person is detained or arrested for the alleged commission of a misdemeanor or traffic offense. (2) "Medical practitioner" has the same meaning as in section 4743.10 of the Revised Code. (3) "Strip search" means an inspection of the genitalia, buttocks, breasts, or undergarments of a person that is preceded by the removal or rearrangement of some or all of the person's clothing that directly covers the person's genitalia, buttocks, breasts, or undergarments and that is conducted visually, manually, by means of any instrument, apparatus, or object, or in any other manner while the person is detained or arrested for the alleged commission of a misdemeanor or traffic offense. "Strip search" does not mean the visual observation of a person who was afforded a reasonable opportunity to secure release on bail or recognizance, who fails to secure such release, and who is to be integrated with the general population of any detention facility, while the person is changing into clothing that is required to be worn by inmates in the facility. (B)(1) Except as authorized by this division, no law enforcement officer, other employee of a law enforcement agency, physician, or registered nurse or licensed practical nurse shall conduct or cause to be conducted a body cavity search or a strip search. (2) A body cavity search or strip search may be conducted if a law enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement agency has probable cause to believe that the person is concealing evidence of the commission of a criminal offense, including fruits or tools of a crime, contraband, or a deadly weapon, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code, that could not otherwise be discovered. In determining probable cause for purposes of this section, a law enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement agency shall consider the nature of the offense with which the person to be searched is charged, and the circumstances of the person's arrest, and, if known, the prior conviction record of the person. (3) A body cavity search or strip search may be conducted for any legitimate medical or hygienic reason. (4) Unless there is a legitimate medical reason or medical emergency justifying a warrantless search, a body cavity search shall be conducted only after a search warrant is issued that authorizes the search. In any case, a body cavity search shall be conducted under sanitary conditions and only by a physician, or a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse, who is registered or licensed to practice in this state. (5) Unless there is a legitimate medical reason or medical emergency that makes obtaining written authorization impracticable, a body cavity search or strip search shall be conducted only after a law enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement agency obtains a written authorization for the search from the person in command of the law enforcement agency, or from a person specifically designated by the person in command to give a written authorization for either type of search. (6) A body cavity search or strip search shall be conducted by a person or persons who are of the same sex as the person who is being searched and the search shall be conducted in a manner and in a location that permits only the person or persons who are physically conducting the search and the person who is being searched to observe the search. (C)(1) Upon completion of a body cavity search or strip search pursuant to this section, the person or persons who conducted the search shall prepare a written report concerning the search that shall include all of the following: (a) The written authorization for the search obtained from the person in command of the law enforcement agency or his that person's designee, if required by division (B)(5) of this section; (b) The name of the person who was searched; (c) The name of the person or persons who conducted the search, the time and date of the search, and the place at which the search was conducted; (d) A list of the items, if any, recovered during the search; (e) The facts upon which the law enforcement officer or employee of the law enforcement agency based his the officer's or employee's probable cause for the search, including, but not limited to, the officer or employee's review of the nature of the offense with which the searched person is charged, and the circumstances of his the person's arrest, and, if known, his prior conviction record; (f) If the body cavity search was conducted before or without the issuance of a search warrant pursuant to division (B)(4) of this section, or if the body cavity or strip search was conducted before or without the granting of written authorization pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section, the legitimate medical reason or medical emergency that justified the warrantless search or made obtaining written authorization impracticable. (2) A copy of the written report required by division (C)(1) of this section shall be kept on file in the law enforcement agency, and another copy of it shall be given to the person who was searched. (D)(1) This section does not preclude the prosecution of a law enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement agency for the violation of any other section of the Revised Code. (2) This section does not limit, and shall not be construed to limit, any statutory or common law rights of a person to obtain injunctive relief or to recover damages in a civil action. (3) If a person is subjected to a body cavity search or strip search in violation of this section, any person may commence a civil action to recover compensatory damages for any injury, death, or loss to person or property or any indignity arising from the violation. In the civil action, the court may award punitive damages to the plaintiffs if they prevail in the action, and it may award reasonable attorney's fees to the parties who prevail in the action. (4) This section does not apply to body cavity searches or strip searches of persons who have been sentenced to serve a term of imprisonment and who are serving that term in a detention facility, as defined in section 2921.01 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of conducting an unauthorized search, a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) Whoever violates division (C) of this section is guilty of failure to prepare a proper search report, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (F) A medical practitioner is not required, and a court or other person shall not order a medical practitioner, to perform any medical procedure that is inconsistent with the medical practitioner's expert medical opinion. Sec. 2949.12. (A) Unless the execution of sentence is suspended or , the convicted felon has less than thirty days to serve in prison and the department of rehabilitation and correction, the county sheriff, and the court agree otherwise, or, for convictions occurring on or after the effective date of this amendment, the convicted felon is under eighteen years of age, a convicted felon who is sentenced to serve a term of imprisonment in a state correctional institution shall be conveyed, within five days after sentencing, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, by the sheriff of the county in which the conviction was had to the facility that is designated by the department of rehabilitation and correction for the reception of convicted felons. The sheriff shall deliver the convicted felon into the custody of the managing officer of the reception facility and, at that time, unless the department and the sheriff have agreed to electronically processed prisoner commitment, shall present the managing officer with a copy of the convicted felon's sentence that clearly describes each offense for which the felon was sentenced to a correctional institution, designates each section of the Revised Code that the felon violated and that resulted in the felon's conviction and sentence to a correctional institution, designates the sentence imposed for each offense for which the felon was sentenced to a correctional institution, and, pursuant to section 2967.191 of the Revised Code, specifies the total number of days, if any, that the felon was confined for any reason prior to conviction and sentence. The sheriff, at that time, also shall present the managing officer with a copy of the indictment. The clerk of the court of common pleas shall furnish the copies of the sentence and indictment. In the case of a person under the age of eighteen years who is certified to the court of common pleas by the juvenile court, the clerk of the court of common pleas also shall attach a copy of the certification to the copy of the indictment. The convicted felon shall be assigned to an institution or designated to be housed in a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, if authorized pursuant to section 5120.161 of the Revised Code, shall be conveyed to the institution, jail, or workhouse, and shall be kept within the institution, jail, or workhouse until the term of the felon's imprisonment expires, the felon is pardoned, paroled, or placed under a post-release control sanction, or the felon is transferred under laws permitting the transfer of prisoners. If the execution of the felon's sentence is suspended, and the judgment thereafter affirmed, the felon shall be conveyed, in the same manner as if the execution of the felon's sentence had not been suspended, to the reception facility as soon as practicable after the judge directs the execution of sentence. The trial judge or other judge of the court, in the judge's discretion and for good cause shown, may extend the time of the conveyance. (B)(1) A convicted felon who is under eighteen years old at the execution of sentence shall be committed to the department of youth services and assigned to an institution within the department of youth services and, within five days after sentencing, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, the sheriff of the county in which the conviction was had shall deliver the felon to the facility designated by the department of youth services. The sheriff, at that time, shall present the managing officer with a copy of the sentence, a copy of the indictment, and a copy of the certification from the juvenile court to the court of common pleas. The convicted felon shall be held in the institution operated by the department of youth services until the felon is eighteen years of age, until the term of the felon's imprisonment expires, until the felon is pardoned, paroled, or placed under a post-release control sanction, until the department of youth services, in the discretion of the director of youth services, lacks capacity to house the felon, or until the felon is transferred under laws permitting the transfer of prisoners. (2) A convicted felon who is committed to the department of youth services under division (B)(1) of this section shall be transferred to the department of rehabilitation and correction and committed to an institution under division (A) of this section for the remainder of the felon's sentence when the felon attains the age of eighteen or when the felon, because of a rule violation or violations, is determined by the department of youth services to a danger to self or others. At the time of a transfer under division (B)(2) of this section, the sheriff shall present the managing officer with a copy of the sentence, a copy of the indictment, and a copy of the certification from the juvenile court to the court of common pleas. Sec. 2951.041. (A)(1) If an offender is charged with a criminal offense, including but not limited to a violation of section 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, or 2919.21 of the Revised Code, and the court has reason to believe that drug or alcohol usage by the offender was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged or that, at the time of committing that offense, the offender had a mental illness, was a person with an intellectual disability, or was a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 or 2907.21 of the Revised Code and that the mental illness, status as a person with an intellectual disability, or fact that the offender was a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 or 2907.21 of the Revised Code was a factor leading to the offender's criminal behavior, the court may accept, prior to the entry of a guilty plea, the offender's request for intervention in lieu of conviction. The request shall include a statement from the offender as to whether the offender is alleging that drug or alcohol usage by the offender was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged or is alleging that, at the time of committing that offense, the offender had a mental illness, was a person with an intellectual disability, or was a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 or 2907.21 of the Revised Code and that the mental illness, status as a person with an intellectual disability, or fact that the offender was a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 or 2907.21 of the Revised Code was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged. The request also shall include a waiver of the defendant's right to a speedy trial, the preliminary hearing, the time period within which the grand jury may consider an indictment against the offender, and arraignment, unless the hearing, indictment, or arraignment has already occurred. Unless an offender alleges that drug or alcohol usage by the offender was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged, the court may reject an offender's request without a hearing. If the court elects to consider an offender's request or the offender alleges that drug or alcohol usage by the offender was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged, the court shall conduct a hearing to determine whether the offender is eligible under this section for intervention in lieu of conviction and shall stay all criminal proceedings pending the outcome of the hearing. If the court schedules a hearing, the court shall order an assessment of the offender for the purpose of determining the offender's program eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction and recommending an appropriate intervention plan. If the offender alleges that drug or alcohol usage by the offender was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged, the court may order that the offender be assessed by a community addiction services provider or a properly credentialed professional for the purpose of determining the offender's program eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction and recommending an appropriate intervention plan. The community addiction services provider or the properly credentialed professional shall provide a written assessment of the offender to the court. (2) The victim notification provisions of division (E) of section 2930.06 of the Revised Code apply in relation to any hearing held under division (A)(1) of this section. (B) An offender is eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction if the court finds all of the following: (1) The offender previously has not been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any felony offense of violence. (2) The offense is not a felony of the first, second, or third degree, is not an offense of violence, is not a felony sex offense, is not a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of section 2903.06 of the Revised Code, is not a violation of division (A)(1) of section 2903.08 of the Revised Code, is not a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that division, and is not an offense for which a sentencing court is required to impose a mandatory prison term. (3) The offender is not charged with a violation of section 2925.02, 2925.04, or 2925.06 of the Revised Code, is not charged with a violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code that is a felony of the first, second, third, or fourth degree, and is not charged with a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is a felony of the first or second degree. (4) If an offender alleges that drug or alcohol usage by the offender was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged, the court has ordered that the offender be assessed by a community addiction services provider or a properly credentialed professional for the purpose of determining the offender's program eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction and recommending an appropriate intervention plan, the offender has been assessed by a community addiction services provider of that nature or a properly credentialed professional in accordance with the court's order, and the community addiction services provider or properly credentialed professional has filed the written assessment of the offender with the court. (5) If an offender alleges that, at the time of committing the criminal offense with which the offender is charged, the offender had a mental illness, was a person with an intellectual disability, or was a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 or 2907.21 of the Revised Code and that the mental illness, status as a person with an intellectual disability, or fact that the offender was a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 or 2907.21 of the Revised Code was a factor leading to that offense, the offender has been assessed by a psychiatrist, psychologist, independent social worker, licensed professional clinical counselor, or independent marriage and family therapist for the purpose of determining the offender's program eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction and recommending an appropriate intervention plan. (6) The offender's drug usage, alcohol usage, mental illness, or intellectual disability, or the fact that the offender was a victim of a violation of section 2905.32 or 2907.21 of the Revised Code, whichever is applicable, was a factor leading to the criminal offense with which the offender is charged, intervention in lieu of conviction would not demean the seriousness of the offense, and intervention would substantially reduce the likelihood of any future criminal activity. (7) The alleged victim of the offense was not sixty-five years of age or older, permanently and totally disabled, under thirteen years of age, or a peace officer engaged in the officer's official duties at the time of the alleged offense. (8) If the offender is charged with a violation of section 2925.24 of the Revised Code, the alleged violation did not result in physical harm to any person. (9) The offender is willing to comply with all terms and conditions imposed by the court pursuant to division (D) of this section. (10) The offender is not charged with an offense that would result in the offender being disqualified under Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code from operating a commercial motor vehicle or would subject the offender to any other sanction under that chapter. (C) At the conclusion of a hearing held pursuant to division (A) of this section, the court shall determine whether the offender will be granted intervention in lieu of conviction. In making this determination, the court shall presume that intervention in lieu of conviction is appropriate. If the court finds under this division and division (B) of this section that the offender is eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction, the court shall grant the offender's request unless the court finds specific reasons to believe that the candidate's participation in intervention in lieu of conviction would be inappropriate. If the court denies an eligible offender's request for intervention in lieu of conviction, the court shall state the reasons for the denial, with particularity, in a written entry. If the court grants the offender's request, the court shall accept the offender's plea of guilty and waiver of the defendant's right to a speedy trial, the preliminary hearing, the time period within which the grand jury may consider an indictment against the offender, and arraignment, unless the hearing, indictment, or arraignment has already occurred. In addition, the court then may stay all criminal proceedings and order the offender to comply with all terms and conditions imposed by the court pursuant to division (D) of this section. If the court finds that the offender is not eligible or does not grant the offender's request, the criminal proceedings against the offender shall proceed as if the offender's request for intervention in lieu of conviction had not been made. (D) If the court grants an offender's request for intervention in lieu of conviction, all of the following apply: (1) The court shall place the offender under the general control and supervision of one of the following, as if the offender was subject to a community control sanction imposed under section 2929.15, 2929.18, or 2929.25 of the Revised Code: (a) The county probation department, the adult parole authority, or another appropriate local probation or court services agency, if one exists; (b) If the court grants the request for intervention in lieu of conviction during the period commencing on April 4, 2023, and ending on October 15, 2025, a community-based correctional facility. (2) The court shall establish an intervention plan for the offender. (3) The terms and conditions of the intervention plan required under division (D)(2) of this section shall require the offender, for at least one year, but not more than five years, from the date on which the court grants the order of intervention in lieu of conviction, to abstain from the use of illegal drugs and alcohol, to participate in treatment and recovery support services, and to submit to regular random testing for drug and alcohol use and may include any other treatment terms and conditions, or terms and conditions similar to community control sanctions, which may include community service or restitution, that are ordered by the court. (E) If the court grants an offender's request for intervention in lieu of conviction and the court finds that the offender has successfully completed the intervention plan for the offender, including the requirement that the offender abstain from using illegal drugs and alcohol for a period of at least one year, but not more than five years, from the date on which the court granted the order of intervention in lieu of conviction, the requirement that the offender participate in treatment and recovery support services, and all other terms and conditions ordered by the court, the court shall dismiss the proceedings against the offender. Successful completion of the intervention plan and period of abstinence under this section shall be without adjudication of guilt and is not a criminal conviction for purposes of any disqualification or disability imposed by law and upon conviction of a crime, and the court may order the sealing or expungement of records related to the offense in question, as a dismissal of the charges, in the manner provided in sections 2953.31, 2953.33, 2953.37, and 2953.521 of the Revised Code and divisions (H), (K), and (L) of section 2953.34 of the Revised Code. (F) If the court grants an offender's request for intervention in lieu of conviction and the offender fails to comply with any term or condition imposed as part of the intervention plan for the offender, the supervising authority for the offender promptly shall advise the court of this failure, and the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the offender failed to comply with any term or condition imposed as part of the plan. If the court determines that the offender has failed to comply with any of those terms and conditions, it may continue the offender on intervention in lieu of conviction, continue the offender on intervention in lieu of conviction with additional terms, conditions, and sanctions, including placing the offender under the general control and supervision of a community-based correctional facility, or enter a finding of guilty and impose an appropriate sanction under Chapter 2929. of the Revised Code. If the court sentences the offender to a prison term, the court, after consulting with the department of rehabilitation and correction regarding the availability of services, may order continued court-supervised activity and treatment of the offender during the prison term and, upon consideration of reports received from the department concerning the offender's progress in the program of activity and treatment, may consider judicial release under section 2929.20 of the Revised Code. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Community addiction services provider" has the same meaning as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Intervention in lieu of conviction" means any court-supervised activity that complies with this section. (4) "Intellectual disability" has the same meaning as in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Mental illness" and "psychiatrist" have the same meanings as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Psychologist" has the same meaning as in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Felony sex offense" means a violation of a section contained in Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code that is a felony. Sec. 2953.32. (A)(1) Sections 2953.32 to and 2953.34 of the Revised Code do not apply to any of the following: (a) Convictions under Chapter 4506., 4507., 4510., 4511., or 4549. of the Revised Code, or a conviction for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any section contained in any of those chapters; (b) Convictions of a felony offense of violence that is not a sexually oriented offense; (c) Convictions of a sexually oriented offense when the offender is subject to the requirements of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code or Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code as it existed prior to January 1, 2008; (d) Convictions of an offense in circumstances in which the victim of the offense was less than thirteen years of age, except for convictions under section 2919.21 of the Revised Code; (e) Convictions for a violation of section 2921.41 of the Revised Code; (f) Convictions of a felony of the first or second degree; (g) Convictions for a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code that is a misdemeanor of the first or second degree or convictions for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that section; (h) Convictions of a felony of the third degree if the offender has more than one other conviction of any felony or, if the person has exactly two convictions of a felony of the third degree, has more convictions in total than those two third degree felony convictions and two misdemeanor convictions. (2) Sections 2953.32 to 2953.34 of the Revised Code apply to the following for purposes of sealing, but not for purposes of expungement of the record of the case: (a) Convictions for a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code that is a misdemeanor of the third or fourth degree or convictions for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that section; (b) Convictions for a violation of section 2919.27 of the Revised Code or convictions for a violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to that section. (3) For purposes of division (A)(1)(h) of this section, both of the following apply: (a) When two or more convictions result from or are connected with the same act or result from offenses committed at the same time, they shall be counted as one conviction. (b) When two or three convictions result from the same indictment, information, or complaint, from the same plea of guilty, or from the same official proceeding, and result from related criminal acts that were committed within a three-month period but do not result from the same act or from offenses committed at the same time, they shall be counted as one conviction, provided that a court may decide as provided in division (D)(1)(i) of this section that it is not in the public interest for the two or three convictions to be counted as one conviction. (B)(1) Except as provided in section 2953.61 of the Revised Code or as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iii) of this section, an eligible offender may apply to the sentencing court if convicted in this state, or to a court of common pleas if convicted in another state or in a federal court, for the sealing or expungement of the record of the case that pertains to the conviction, except for convictions listed in division (A)(1) of this section. Application may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (a) An application for sealing under this section may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (i) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iv) of this section, at the expiration of three years after the offender's final discharge if convicted of one or two felonies of the third degree, so long as none of the offenses is a violation of section 2921.43 of the Revised Code; (ii) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(a)(iv) of this section, at the expiration of one year after the offender's final discharge if convicted of one or more felonies of the fourth or fifth degree or one or more misdemeanors, so long as none of the offenses is a violation of section 2921.43 of the Revised Code or a felony offense of violence; (iii) At the expiration of seven years after the offender's final discharge if the record includes one or more convictions of soliciting improper compensation in violation of section 2921.43 of the Revised Code; (iv) If the offender was subject to the requirements of Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code or Chapter 2950. of the Revised Code as it existed prior to January 1, 2008, at the expiration of five years after the requirements have ended under section 2950.07 of the Revised Code or section 2950.07 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to January 1, 2008, or are terminated under section 2950.15 or 2950.151 of the Revised Code; (v) At the expiration of six months after the offender's final discharge if convicted of a minor misdemeanor. (b) An application for expungement under this section may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (i) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(1)(b)(ii) of this section, if the offense is a misdemeanor, at the expiration of one year after the offender's final discharge; (ii) If the offense is a minor misdemeanor, at the expiration of six months after the offender's final discharge; (iii) If the offense is a felony, at the expiration of ten years after the time specified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section at which the person may file an application for sealing with respect to that felony offense. (2) Any person who has been arrested for any misdemeanor offense and who has effected a bail forfeiture for the offense charged may apply to the court in which the misdemeanor criminal case was pending when bail was forfeited for the sealing or expungement of the record of the case that pertains to the charge. Except as provided in section 2953.61 of the Revised Code, the application may be filed at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (a) An application for sealing under this section may be made at any time after the date on which the bail forfeiture was entered upon the minutes of the court or the journal, whichever entry occurs first. (b) An application for expungement under this section may be made at whichever of the following times is applicable regarding the offense: (i) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, at any time after the expiration of one year from the date on which the bail forfeiture was entered upon the minutes of the court or the journal, whichever entry occurs first; (ii) If the offense is a minor misdemeanor, at any time after the expiration of six months from the date on which the bail forfeiture was entered upon the minutes of the court or the journal, whichever entry occurs first. (C) Upon the filing of an application under this section, the court shall set a date for a hearing and shall notify the prosecutor for the case of the hearing on the application not less than sixty days prior to the hearing. Pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, the prosecutor shall provide timely notice of the application and the date and time of the hearing to a victim and victim's representative, if applicable, if the victim or victim's representative requested notice of the proceedings in the underlying case. The court shall hold the hearing not less than forty-five days and not more than ninety days from the date of the filing of the application. The prosecutor may object to the granting of the application by filing a written objection with the court not later than thirty days prior to the date set for the hearing. The prosecutor shall specify in the objection the reasons for believing a denial of the application is justified. The victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable, may be present and heard orally, in writing, or both at any hearing under this section. The court shall direct its regular probation officer, a state probation officer, or the department of probation of the county in which the applicant resides to make inquiries and written reports as the court requires concerning the applicant. The probation officer or county department of probation that the court directs to make inquiries and written reports as the court requires concerning the applicant shall determine whether or not the applicant was fingerprinted at the time of arrest or under section 109.60 of the Revised Code. If the applicant was so fingerprinted, the probation officer or county department of probation shall include with the written report a record of the applicant's fingerprints. If the applicant was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A)(2) or (B) of section 2919.21 of the Revised Code, the probation officer or county department of probation that the court directed to make inquiries concerning the applicant shall contact the child support enforcement agency enforcing the applicant's obligations under the child support order to inquire about the offender's compliance with the child support order. (D)(1) At the hearing held under division (C) of this section, the court shall do each of the following: (a) Determine whether the applicant is pursuing sealing or expunging a conviction of an offense that is prohibited under division (A) of this section or whether the forfeiture of bail was agreed to by the applicant and the prosecutor in the case, and determine whether the application was made at the time specified in division (B)(1)(a) or (b) or division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section that is applicable with respect to the application and the subject offense; (b) Determine whether criminal proceedings are pending against the applicant; (c) Determine whether the applicant has been rehabilitated to the satisfaction of the court; (d) If the prosecutor has filed an objection in accordance with division (C) of this section, consider the reasons against granting the application specified by the prosecutor in the objection; (e) If the victim objected, pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, consider the reasons against granting the application specified by the victim in the objection; (f) Weigh the interests of the applicant in having the records pertaining to the applicant's conviction or bail forfeiture sealed or expunged against the legitimate needs, if any, of the government to maintain those records; (g) Consider the oral or written statement of any victim, victim's representative, and victim's attorney, if applicable; (h) If the applicant was an eligible offender of the type described in division (A)(3) of section 2953.36 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to April 4, 2023, determine whether the offender has been rehabilitated to a satisfactory degree. In making the determination, the court may consider all of the following: (i) The age of the offender; (ii) The facts and circumstances of the offense; (iii) The cessation or continuation of criminal behavior; (iv) The education and employment of the offender; (v) Any other circumstances that may relate to the offender's rehabilitation. (i) If the court is required to determine whether an applicant for sealing or expungement has two or three convictions that result from the same indictment, information, or complaint, from the same plea of guilty, or from the same official proceeding, and result from related criminal acts that were committed within a three-month period but do not result from the same act or from offenses committed at the same time, in making its determination, the court initially shall determine whether it is not in the public interest for the two or three convictions to be counted as one conviction. If the court determines that it is not in the public interest for the two or three convictions to be counted as one conviction, the court shall determine whether, when counting the convictions individually, the applicant is pursuing sealing or expunging a conviction that is prohibited under division (A) of this section. (2) If the court determines, after complying with division (D)(1) of this section, that the offender is not pursuing sealing or expunging a conviction of an offense that is prohibited under division (A) of this section or that the forfeiture of bail was agreed to by the applicant and the prosecutor in the case, that the application was made at the time specified in division (B)(1)(a) or (b) or division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section that is applicable with respect to the application and the subject offense, that no criminal proceeding is pending against the applicant, that the interests of the applicant in having the records pertaining to the applicant's conviction or bail forfeiture sealed or expunged are not outweighed by any legitimate governmental needs to maintain those records, and that the rehabilitation of the applicant has been attained to the satisfaction of the court, both of the following apply: (a) The court, except as provided in division (D)(4) or (5) of this section or division (D), (F), or (G) of section 2953.34 of the Revised Code, shall order all official records of the case that pertain to the conviction or bail forfeiture sealed if the application was for sealing or expunged if the application was for expungement and, except as provided in division (C) of section 2953.34 of the Revised Code, all index references to the case that pertain to the conviction or bail forfeiture deleted and, in the case of bail forfeitures, shall dismiss the charges in the case. (b) The proceedings in the case that pertain to the conviction or bail forfeiture shall be considered not to have occurred and the conviction or bail forfeiture of the person who is the subject of the proceedings shall be sealed if the application was for sealing or expunged if the application was for expungement, except that upon conviction of a subsequent offense, a sealed record of prior conviction or bail forfeiture may be considered by the court in determining the sentence or other appropriate disposition, including the relief provided for in sections 2953.31, 2953.32, and 2953.34 of the Revised Code. (3) An applicant may request the sealing or expungement of the records of more than one case in a single application under this section. Upon the filing of an application under this section, the applicant, unless the applicant presents a poverty affidavit showing that the applicant is indigent, shall pay an application fee of fifty dollars and may pay a local court fee of not more than fifty dollars, regardless of the number of records the application requests to have sealed or expunged. If the applicant pays a fee, the court shall pay three-fifths of the fee collected into the state treasury, with half of that amount credited to the attorney general reimbursement fund created by section 109.11 of the Revised Code. If the applicant pays a fee, the court shall pay two-fifths of the fee collected into the county general revenue fund if the sealed or expunged conviction or bail forfeiture was pursuant to a state statute, or into the general revenue fund of the municipal corporation involved if the sealed or expunged conviction or bail forfeiture was pursuant to a municipal ordinance. (4) If the court orders the official records pertaining to the case sealed or expunged, the court shall do one of the following: (a) If the applicant was fingerprinted at the time of arrest or under section 109.60 of the Revised Code and the record of the applicant's fingerprints was provided to the court under division (C) of this section, forward a copy of the sealing or expungement order and the record of the applicant's fingerprints to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. (b) If the applicant was not fingerprinted at the time of arrest or under section 109.60 of the Revised Code, or the record of the applicant's fingerprints was not provided to the court under division (C) of this section, but fingerprinting was required for the offense, order the applicant to appear before a sheriff to have the applicant's fingerprints taken according to the fingerprint system of identification on the forms furnished by the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. The sheriff shall forward the applicant's fingerprints to the court. The court shall forward the applicant's fingerprints and a copy of the sealing or expungement order to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. Failure of the court to order fingerprints at the time of sealing or expungement does not constitute a reversible error. (5) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, when the bureau of criminal identification and investigation receives notice from a court that the record of a conviction or bail forfeiture has been expunged under this section, the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall maintain a record of the expunged conviction record for the limited purpose of determining an individual's qualification or disqualification for employment in law enforcement. The bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall not be compelled by the court to destroy, delete, or erase those records so that the records are permanently irretrievable. These records may only be disclosed or provided to law enforcement for the limited purpose of determining an individual's qualification or disqualification for employment in law enforcement. When any other entity other than the bureau of criminal identification and investigation receives notice from a court that the record of a conviction or bail forfeiture has been expunged under this section, the entity shall destroy, delete, and erase the record as appropriate for the record's physical or electronic form or characteristic so that the record is permanently irretrievable. Sec. 2967.14. (A) As used in this section: (1) "School" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Child care center" has the same meaning as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of rehabilitation and correction or the adult parole authority may require or allow a parolee, a releasee, or a prisoner otherwise released from a state correctional institution to reside in a halfway house or other suitable community residential center that has been licensed by the division of parole and community services pursuant to division (C) (D) of this section during a part or for the entire period of the offender's or parolee's conditional release or of the releasee's term of post-release control. The court of common pleas that placed an offender under a sanction consisting of a term in a halfway house or in an alternative residential sanction may require the offender to reside in a halfway house or other suitable community residential center that is designated by the court and that has been licensed by the division pursuant to division (C) (D) of this section during a part or for the entire period of the offender's residential sanction. (B) (C) The division of parole and community services may negotiate and enter into agreements with any public or private agency or a department or political subdivision of the state that operates a halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center that has been licensed by the division pursuant to division (C) (D) of this section. An agreement under this division shall provide for the purchase of beds, shall set limits of supervision and levels of occupancy, and shall determine the scope of services for all eligible offenders, including those subject to a residential sanction, as defined in rules adopted by the director of rehabilitation and correction in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, or those released from prison without supervision. The payments for beds and services shall not exceed the total operating costs of the halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center during the term of an agreement. The director of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for determining includable and excludable costs and income to be used in computing the agency's average daily per capita costs with its facility at full occupancy. The director of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules providing for the use of no more than fifteen per cent of the amount appropriated to the department each fiscal year for the halfway house, reentry center, and community residential center program to pay for contracts with licensed halfway houses for nonresidential services for offenders under the supervision of the adult parole authority, including but not limited to, offenders supervised pursuant to an agreement entered into by the adult parole authority and a court of common pleas under section 2301.32 of the Revised Code. The nonresidential services may include, but are not limited to, treatment for substance abuse, mental health counseling, counseling for sex offenders, electronic monitoring services, aftercare, and other nonresidential services that the director identifies by rule. (C) (D) The division of parole and community services may license a halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center as a suitable facility for the care and treatment of adult offenders, including offenders sentenced under section 2929.16 or 2929.26 of the Revised Code, only if the halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center does not operate within five hundred feet of a school or child care center, except as provided in division (F) of this section, and complies with the standards that the division adopts in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the licensure of halfway houses, reentry centers, and community residential centers. The division shall annually inspect each licensed halfway house, licensed reentry center, and licensed community residential center to determine if it is in compliance with the licensure standards. (D) (E) The division of parole and community services may expend up to one-half per cent of the annual appropriation made for halfway house programs, for goods or services that benefit those programs. (F) The requirement in division (D) of this section that a halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center not operate within five hundred feet of a school or child care center does not apply to either of the following: (1) A halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center that, prior to the effective date of this amendment, has operated within five hundred feet of a school or child care center; (2) A halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center that was licensed and operating prior to a school or child care center locating within five hundred feet of the halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center. Sec. 2967.18. (A) Whenever the director of rehabilitation and correction determines that the total population of the state correctional institutions for males and females, the total population of the state correctional institutions for males, or the total population of the state correctional institutions for females exceeds the capacity of those institutions and that an overcrowding emergency exists, the director shall notify the correctional institution inspection committee attorney general of the emergency and provide the committee attorney general with information in support of the director's determination. The director shall not notify the committee attorney general that an overcrowding emergency exists unless the director determines that no other reasonable method is available to resolve the overcrowding emergency. (B) On receipt of the notice given pursuant to division (A) of this section, the correctional institution inspection committee attorney general promptly shall review the determination of the director of rehabilitation and correction. Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code or the Administrative Code that governs the lengths of criminal sentences, sets forth the time within which a prisoner is eligible for parole or within which a prisoner may apply for release, or regulates the procedure for granting parole or release to prisoners confined in state correctional institutions, the committee attorney general may recommend to the governor that the prison terms of eligible male, female, or all prisoners, as determined under division (E) of this section, be reduced by thirty, sixty, or ninety days, in the manner prescribed in that division. (C) If the correctional institution inspection committee attorney general disagrees with the determination of the director of rehabilitation and correction that an overcrowding emergency exists, if the committee attorney general finds that an overcrowding emergency exists but does not make a recommendation pursuant to division (B) of this section, or if the committee attorney general does not make a finding or a recommendation pursuant to that division within thirty days of receipt of the notice given pursuant to division (A) of this section, the director may recommend to the governor that the action set forth in division (B) of this section be taken. (D) Upon receipt of a recommendation from the correctional institution inspection committee attorney general or the director of rehabilitation and correction made pursuant to this section, the governor may declare in writing that an overcrowding emergency exists in all of the institutions within the control of the department in which men are confined, in which women are confined, or both. The declaration shall state that the adult parole authority shall take the action set forth in division (B) of this section. After the governor makes the declaration, the director shall file a copy of it with the secretary of state, and the copy is a public record. The department may begin to implement the declaration of the governor made pursuant to this section on the date that it is filed with the secretary of state. The department shall begin to implement the declaration within thirty days after the date of filing. The declaration shall be implemented in accordance with division (E) of this section. (E)(1) No reduction of sentence pursuant to division (B) of this section shall be granted to any of the following: (a) A person who is serving a term of imprisonment for aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, involuntary manslaughter, felonious assault, kidnapping, rape, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or any other offense punishable by life imprisonment or by an indefinite term of a specified number of years to life, or for conspiracy in, complicity in, or attempt to commit any of those offenses; (b) A person who is serving a term of imprisonment for any felony other than carrying a concealed weapon that was committed while the person had a firearm, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code, on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control; (c) A person who is serving a term of imprisonment for a violation of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code; (d) A person who is serving a term of imprisonment for engaging in a pattern of corrupt activity; (e) A person who is serving a prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code; (f) A person who was denied parole or release pursuant to section 2929.20 of the Revised Code during the term of imprisonment the person currently is serving. (2) A declaration of the governor that requires the adult parole authority to take the action set forth in division (B) of this section shall be implemented only by reducing the prison terms of prisoners who are not in any of the categories set forth in division (E)(1) of this section, and only by granting reductions of prison terms in the following order: (a) Under any such declaration, prison terms initially shall be reduced only for persons who are not in any of the categories set forth in division (E)(1) of this section and who are not serving a term of imprisonment for any of the following offenses: (i) An offense of violence that is a felony of the first, second, or third degree or that, under the law in existence prior to the effective date of this amendment July 1, 1996, was an aggravated felony of the first, second, or third degree or a felony of the first or second degree; (ii) An offense set forth in Chapter 2925. of the Revised Code that is a felony of the first or second degree. (b) If every person serving a term of imprisonment at the time of the implementation of any such declaration who is in the class of persons eligible for the initial reduction of prison terms, as described in division (E)(2)(a) of this section, has received a total of ninety days of term reduction for each three years of imprisonment actually served, then prison terms may be reduced for all other persons serving a term of imprisonment at that time who are not in any of the categories set forth in division (E)(1) of this section. (F) An offender who is released from a state correctional institution pursuant to this section is subject to post-release control sanctions imposed by the adult parole authority as if the offender was a prisoner described in division (B) of section 2967.28 of the Revised Code who was being released from imprisonment. (G) If more than one overcrowding emergency is declared while a prisoner is serving a prison term, the total term reduction for that prisoner as the result of multiple declarations shall not exceed ninety days for each three years of imprisonment actually served. Sec. 2967.26. (A)(1) The department of rehabilitation and correction, by rule, may establish a transitional control program for the purpose of closely monitoring a prisoner's adjustment to community supervision during the final one hundred eighty days of the prisoner's confinement. If the department establishes a transitional control program under this division, the division of parole and community services of the department of rehabilitation and correction may transfer eligible prisoners to transitional control status under the program during the final one hundred eighty days of their confinement and under the terms and conditions established by the department, shall provide for the confinement as provided in this division of each eligible prisoner so transferred, and shall supervise each eligible prisoner so transferred in one or more community control sanctions. Each eligible prisoner who is transferred to transitional control status under the program shall be confined in a suitable facility that is licensed pursuant to division (C) (D) of section 2967.14 of the Revised Code, or shall be confined in a residence the department has approved for this purpose and be monitored pursuant to an electronic monitoring device, as defined in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. If the department establishes a transitional control program under this division, the rules establishing the program shall include criteria that define which prisoners are eligible for the program, criteria that must be satisfied to be approved as a residence that may be used for confinement under the program of a prisoner that is transferred to it and procedures for the department to approve residences that satisfy those criteria, and provisions of the type described in division (C) of this section. At a minimum, the criteria that define which prisoners are eligible for the program shall provide all of the following: (a) That a prisoner is eligible for the program if the prisoner is serving a prison term or term of imprisonment for an offense committed prior to March 17, 1998, and if, at the time at which eligibility is being determined, the prisoner would have been eligible for a furlough under this section as it existed immediately prior to March 17, 1998, or would have been eligible for conditional release under former section 2967.23 of the Revised Code as that section existed immediately prior to March 17, 1998; (b) That no prisoner who is serving a mandatory prison term is eligible for the program until after expiration of the mandatory term; (c) That no prisoner who is serving a prison term or term of life imprisonment without parole imposed pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code is eligible for the program. (2) At least sixty days prior to transferring to transitional control under this section a prisoner who is serving a definite term of imprisonment or definite prison term of less than one year for an offense committed on or after July 1, 1996, or who is serving a minimum term of less than one year under a non-life felony indefinite prison term, on or after April 4, 2023, the division of parole and community services of the department of rehabilitation and correction shall give notice of the pendency of the transfer to transitional control to the court of common pleas of the county in which the indictment against the prisoner was found and of the fact that the court may disapprove the transfer of the prisoner to transitional control and shall include the institutional summary report prepared by the head of the state correctional institution in which the prisoner is confined. The head of the state correctional institution in which the prisoner is confined, upon the request of the division of parole and community services, shall provide to the division for inclusion in the notice sent to the court under this division an institutional summary report on the prisoner's conduct in the institution and in any institution from which the prisoner may have been transferred. The institutional summary report shall cover the prisoner's participation in school, vocational training, work, treatment, and other rehabilitative activities and any disciplinary action taken against the prisoner. If the court disapproves of the transfer of the prisoner to transitional control, the court shall notify the division of the disapproval within thirty days after receipt of the notice. If the court timely disapproves the transfer of the prisoner to transitional control, the division shall not proceed with the transfer. If the court does not timely disapprove the transfer of the prisoner to transitional control, the division may transfer the prisoner to transitional control. (3)(a) If the victim of an offense for which a prisoner was sentenced to a prison term or term of imprisonment has requested notification under section 2930.16 of the Revised Code and has provided the department of rehabilitation and correction with the victim's name and address or if division (A)(3)(b) of this section applies, the division of parole and community services, at least sixty days prior to transferring the prisoner to transitional control pursuant to this section, shall notify the victim and the victim's representative, if applicable, of the pendency of the transfer and of the victim's and victim's representative's right to submit a statement to the division regarding the impact of the transfer of the prisoner to transitional control. If the victim or victim's representative's subsequently submits a statement of that nature to the division, the division shall consider the statement in deciding whether to transfer the prisoner to transitional control. (b) If a prisoner is incarcerated for the commission of aggravated murder, murder, or an offense of violence that is a felony of the first, second, or third degree or under a sentence of life imprisonment, except as otherwise provided in this division, the notice described in division (A)(3)(a) of this section shall be given regardless of whether the victim has requested the notification. The notice described in division (A)(3)(a) of this section shall not be given under this division to a victim if the victim has requested pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 2930.03 of the Revised Code that the victim not be provided the notice. If notice is to be provided to a victim under this division, the authority may give the notice by any reasonable means, including regular mail, telephone, and electronic mail, in accordance with division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. If the notice is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, the notice also shall include the opt-out information described in division (D)(1) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. The authority, in accordance with division (D)(2) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code, shall keep a record of all attempts to provide the notice, and of all notices provided, under this division. Division (A)(3)(b) of this section, and the notice-related provisions of divisions (E)(2) and (K) of section 2929.20, division (D)(1) of section 2930.16, division (H) of section 2967.12, division (E)(1)(b) of section 2967.19 as it existed prior to April 4, 2023, division (D)(1) of section 2967.28, and division (A)(2) of section 5149.101 of the Revised Code enacted in the act in which division (A)(3)(b) of this section was enacted, shall be known as "Roberta's Law." (4) The department of rehabilitation and correction, at least sixty days prior to transferring a prisoner to transitional control pursuant to this section, shall post on the database it maintains pursuant to section 5120.66 of the Revised Code the prisoner's name and all of the information specified in division (A)(1)(c)(iv) of that section. In addition to and independent of the right of a victim to submit a statement as described in division (A)(3) of this section or to otherwise make a statement and in addition to and independent of any other right or duty of a person to present information or make a statement, any person may send to the division of parole and community services at any time prior to the division's transfer of the prisoner to transitional control a written statement regarding the transfer of the prisoner to transitional control. In addition to the information, reports, and statements it considers under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section or that it otherwise considers, the division shall consider each statement submitted in accordance with this division in deciding whether to transfer the prisoner to transitional control. (B) Each prisoner transferred to transitional control under this section shall be confined in the manner described in division (A) of this section during any period of time that the prisoner is not actually working at the prisoner's approved employment, engaged in a vocational training or another educational program, engaged in another program designated by the director, or engaged in other activities approved by the department. (C) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules for transferring eligible prisoners to transitional control, supervising and confining prisoners so transferred, administering the transitional control program in accordance with this section, and using the moneys deposited into the transitional control fund established under division (E) of this section. (D) The department of rehabilitation and correction may adopt rules for the issuance of passes for the limited purposes described in this division to prisoners who are transferred to transitional control under this section. If the department adopts rules of that nature, the rules shall govern the granting of the passes and shall provide for the supervision of prisoners who are temporarily released pursuant to one of those passes. Upon the adoption of rules under this division, the department may issue passes to prisoners who are transferred to transitional control status under this section in accordance with the rules and the provisions of this division. All passes issued under this division shall be for a maximum of forty-eight hours and may be issued only for the following purposes: (1) To visit a relative in imminent danger of death; (2) To have a private viewing of the body of a deceased relative; (3) To visit with family; (4) To otherwise aid in the rehabilitation of the prisoner. (E) The division of parole and community services may require a prisoner who is transferred to transitional control to pay to the division the reasonable expenses incurred by the division in supervising or confining the prisoner while under transitional control. Inability to pay those reasonable expenses shall not be grounds for refusing to transfer an otherwise eligible prisoner to transitional control. Amounts received by the division of parole and community services under this division shall be deposited into the transitional control fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury and which hereby replaces and succeeds the furlough services fund that formerly existed in the state treasury. All moneys that remain in the furlough services fund on March 17, 1998, shall be transferred on that date to the transitional control fund. The transitional control fund shall be used solely to pay costs related to the operation of the transitional control program established under this section. The director of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code for the use of the fund. (F) A prisoner who violates any rule established by the department of rehabilitation and correction under division (A), (C), or (D) of this section may be transferred to a state correctional institution pursuant to rules adopted under division (A), (C), or (D) of this section, but the prisoner shall receive credit towards completing the prisoner's sentence for the time spent under transitional control. If a prisoner is transferred to transitional control under this section, upon successful completion of the period of transitional control, the prisoner may be released on parole or under post-release control pursuant to section 2967.13 or 2967.28 of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the department of rehabilitation and correction. If the prisoner is released under post-release control, the duration of the post-release control, the type of post-release control sanctions that may be imposed, the enforcement of the sanctions, and the treatment of prisoners who violate any sanction applicable to the prisoner are governed by section 2967.28 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2967.271. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Offender's minimum prison term" means the minimum prison term imposed on an offender under a non-life felony indefinite prison term, diminished as provided in section 2967.191 or 2967.193 of the Revised Code or in any other provision of the Revised Code, other than division (F) of this section, that provides for diminution or reduction of an offender's sentence. (2) "Offender's presumptive earned early release date" means the date that is determined under the procedures described in division (F) of this section by the reduction, if any, of an offender's minimum prison term by the sentencing court and the crediting of that reduction toward the satisfaction of the minimum term. (3) "Rehabilitative programs and activities" means education programs, vocational training, employment in prison industries, treatment for substance abuse, or other constructive programs developed by the department of rehabilitation and correction with specific standards for performance by prisoners. (4) "Security level" means the security level in which an offender is classified under the inmate classification level system of the department of rehabilitation and correction that then is in effect. (5) "Sexually oriented offense" has the same meaning as in section 2950.01 of the Revised Code. (B) When an offender is sentenced to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, there shall be a presumption that the person shall be released from service of the sentence on the expiration of the offender's minimum prison term or on the offender's presumptive earned early release date, whichever is earlier. (C) The presumption established under division (B) of this section is a rebuttable presumption that the department of rehabilitation and correction may rebut as provided in this division. Unless the department rebuts the presumption, the offender shall be released from service of the sentence on the expiration of the offender's minimum prison term or on the offender's presumptive earned early release date, whichever is earlier. The department may rebut the presumption only if the department determines, at a hearing, that one or more of the following applies: (1) Regardless of the security level in which the offender is classified at the time of the hearing, both of the following apply: (a) During the offender's incarceration, the offender committed institutional rule infractions that involved compromising the security of a state correctional institution, compromising the safety of the staff of a state correctional institution or its inmates, or physical harm or the threat of physical harm to the staff of a state correctional institution or its inmates, or committed a violation of law that was not prosecuted, and the infractions or violations demonstrate that the offender has not been rehabilitated. (b) The offender's behavior while incarcerated, including, but not limited to the infractions and violations specified in division (C)(1)(a) of this section, demonstrate that the offender continues to pose a threat to society. (2) Regardless of the security level in which the offender is classified at the time of the hearing, the offender has been placed by the department in extended restrictive housing at any time within the year preceding the date of the hearing. (3) At the time of the hearing, the offender is classified by the department as a security level three, four, or five, or at a higher security level. (D)(1) If the department of rehabilitation and correction, pursuant to division (C) of this section, rebuts the presumption established under division (B) of this section, the department may maintain the offender's incarceration in a state correctional institution under the sentence after the expiration of the offender's minimum prison term or, for offenders who have a presumptive earned early release date, after the offender's presumptive earned early release date. The department may maintain the offender's incarceration under this division for an additional period of incarceration determined by the department. The additional period of incarceration shall be a reasonable period determined by the department, shall be specified by the department, and shall not exceed the offender's maximum prison term. (2) If the department maintains an offender's incarceration for an additional period under division (D)(1) of this section, there shall be a presumption that the offender shall be released on the expiration of the offender's minimum prison term plus the additional period of incarceration specified by the department as provided under that division or, for offenders who have a presumptive earned early release date, on the expiration of the additional period of incarceration to be served after the offender's presumptive earned early release date that is specified by the department as provided under that division. The presumption is a rebuttable presumption that the department may rebut, but only if it conducts a hearing and makes the determinations specified in division (C) of this section, and if the department rebuts the presumption, it may maintain the offender's incarceration in a state correctional institution for an additional period determined as specified in division (D)(1) of this section. Unless the department rebuts the presumption at the hearing, the offender shall be released from service of the sentence on the expiration of the offender's minimum prison term plus the additional period of incarceration specified by the department or, for offenders who have a presumptive earned early release date, on the expiration of the additional period of incarceration to be served after the offender's presumptive earned early release date as specified by the department. The provisions of this division regarding the establishment of a rebuttable presumption, the department's rebuttal of the presumption, and the department's maintenance of an offender's incarceration for an additional period of incarceration apply, and may be utilized more than one time, during the remainder of the offender's incarceration. If the offender has not been released under division (C) of this section or this division prior to the expiration of the offender's maximum prison term imposed as part of the offender's non-life felony indefinite prison term, the offender shall be released upon the expiration of that maximum term. (E) The department shall provide notices of hearings to be conducted under division (C) or (D) of this section in the same manner, and to the same persons, as specified in section 2967.12 and Chapter 2930. of the Revised Code with respect to hearings to be conducted regarding the possible release on parole of an inmate. (F)(1) The director of the department of rehabilitation and correction may notify the sentencing court in writing that the director is recommending that the court grant a reduction in the minimum prison term imposed on a specified offender who is serving a non-life felony indefinite prison term and who is eligible under division (F)(8) of this section for such a reduction, due to the offender's exceptional conduct while incarcerated or the offender's adjustment to incarceration. If the director wishes to recommend such a reduction for an offender, the director shall send the notice to the court not earlier than ninety days prior to the date on which the director wishes to credit the reduction toward the satisfaction of the offender's minimum prison term. If the director recommends such a reduction for an offender, there shall be a presumption that the court shall grant the recommended reduction to the offender. The presumption established under this division is a rebuttable presumption that may be rebutted as provided in division (F)(4) of this section. The director shall include with the notice sent to a court under this division an institutional summary report that covers the offender's participation while confined in a state correctional institution in rehabilitative programs and activities and any disciplinary action taken against the offender while so confined, and any other documentation requested by the court, if available. The notice the director sends to a court under this division shall do all of the following: (a) Identify the offender; (b) Specify the length of the recommended reduction, which shall be for five to fifteen per cent of the offender's minimum term determined in accordance with rules adopted by the department under division (F)(7) of this section; (c) Specify the reason or reasons that qualify the offender for the recommended reduction; (d) Inform the court of the rebuttable presumption and that the court must either approve or, if the court finds that the presumption has been rebutted, disapprove of the recommended reduction, and that if it approves of the recommended reduction, it must grant the reduction; (e) Inform the court that it must notify the department of its decision as to approval or disapproval not later than sixty days after receipt of the notice from the director. (2) When the director, under division (F)(1) of this section, submits a notice to a sentencing court that the director is recommending that the court grant a reduction in the minimum prison term imposed on an offender serving a non-life felony indefinite prison term, the department promptly shall provide to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender was indicted a copy of the written notice, a copy of the institutional summary report described in that division, and any other information provided to the court. (3) Upon receipt of a notice submitted by the director under division (F)(1) of this section, the court shall schedule a hearing to consider whether to grant the reduction in the minimum prison term imposed on the specified offender that was recommended by the director or to find that the presumption has been rebutted and disapprove the recommended reduction. Upon scheduling the hearing, the court promptly shall give notice of the hearing to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the offender was indicted and to the department. The notice shall inform the prosecuting attorney that the prosecuting attorney may submit to the court, prior to the date of the hearing, written information relevant to the recommendation and may present at the hearing written information and oral information relevant to the recommendation. Upon receipt of the notice from the court, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim of the offender or the victim's representative of the recommendation by the director, the date, time, and place of the hearing, the fact that the victim may submit to the court, prior to the date of the hearing, written information relevant to the recommendation, and the address and procedure for submitting the information. (4) At the hearing scheduled under division (F)(3) of this section, the court shall afford the prosecuting attorney an opportunity to present written information and oral information relevant to the director's recommendation. In making its determination as to whether to grant or disapprove the reduction in the minimum prison term imposed on the specified offender that was recommended by the director, the court shall consider any report and other documentation submitted by the director, any information submitted by a victim, any information submitted or presented at the hearing by the prosecuting attorney, and all of the factors set forth in divisions (B) to (D) of section 2929.12 of the Revised Code that are relevant to the offender's offense and to the offender. Unless the court, after considering at the hearing the specified reports, documentation, information, and relevant factors, finds that the presumption that the recommended reduction shall be granted has been rebutted and disapproves the recommended reduction, the court shall grant the recommended reduction. The court may disapprove the recommended reduction only if, after considering at the hearing the specified reports, documentation, information, and relevant factors, it finds that the presumption that the reduction shall be granted has been rebutted. The court may find that the presumption has been rebutted and disapprove the recommended reduction only if it determines at the hearing that one or more of the following applies: (a) Regardless of the security level in which the offender is classified at the time of the hearing, during the offender's incarceration, the offender committed institutional rule infractions that involved compromising the security of a state correctional institution, compromising the safety of the staff of a state correctional institution or its inmates, or physical harm or the threat of physical harm to the staff of a state correctional institution or its inmates, or committed a violation of law that was not prosecuted, and the infractions or violations demonstrate that the offender has not been rehabilitated. (b) The offender's behavior while incarcerated, including, but not limited to, the infractions and violations specified in division (F)(4)(a) of this section, demonstrates that the offender continues to pose a threat to society. (c) At the time of the hearing, the offender is classified by the department as a security level three, four, or five, or at a higher security level. (d) During the offender's incarceration, the offender did not productively participate in a majority of the rehabilitative programs and activities recommended by the department for the offender, or the offender participated in a majority of such recommended programs or activities but did not successfully complete a reasonable number of the programs or activities in which the offender participated. (e) After release, the offender will not be residing in a halfway house, reentry center, or community residential center licensed under division (C) (D) of section 2967.14 of the Revised Code and, after release, does not have any other place to reside at a fixed residence address. (5) If the court pursuant to division (F)(4) of this section finds that the presumption that the recommended reduction in the offender's minimum prison term has been rebutted and disapproves the recommended reduction, the court shall notify the department of the disapproval not later than sixty days after receipt of the notice from the director. The court shall specify in the notification the reason or reasons for which it found that the presumption was rebutted and disapproved the recommended reduction. The court shall not reduce the offender's minimum prison term, and the department shall not credit the amount of the disapproved reduction toward satisfaction of the offender's minimum prison term. If the court pursuant to division (F)(4) of this section grants the recommended reduction of the offender's minimum prison term, the court shall notify the department of the grant of the reduction not later than sixty days after receipt of the notice from the director, the court shall reduce the offender's minimum prison term in accordance with the recommendation submitted by the director, and the department shall credit the amount of the reduction toward satisfaction of the offender's minimum prison term. Upon deciding whether to disapprove or grant the recommended reduction of the offender's minimum prison term, the court shall notify the prosecuting attorney of the decision and the prosecuting attorney shall notify the victim or victim's representative of the court's decision. (6) If the court under division (F)(5) of this section grants the reduction in the minimum prison term imposed on an offender that was recommended by the director and reduces the offender's minimum prison term, the date determined by the department's crediting of the reduction toward satisfaction of the offender's minimum prison term is the offender's presumptive earned early release date. (7) The department of rehabilitation and correction by rule shall specify both of the following for offenders serving a non-life felony indefinite prison term: (a) The type of exceptional conduct while incarcerated and the type of adjustment to incarceration that will qualify an offender serving such a prison term for a reduction under divisions (F)(1) to (6) of this section of the minimum prison term imposed on the offender under the non-life felony indefinite prison term. (b) The per cent of reduction that it may recommend for, and that may be granted to, an offender serving such a prison term under divisions (F)(1) to (6) of this section, based on the offense level of the offense for which the prison term was imposed, with the department specifying the offense levels used for purposes of this division and assigning a specific percentage reduction within the range of five to fifteen per cent for each such offense level. (8) Divisions (F)(1) to (6) of this section do not apply with respect to an offender serving a non-life felony indefinite prison term for a sexually oriented offense, and no offender serving such a prison term for a sexually oriented offense is eligible to be recommended for or granted, or may be recommended for or granted, a reduction under those divisions in the offender's minimum prison term imposed under that non-life felony indefinite prison term. (G) If an offender is sentenced to a non-life felony indefinite prison term, any reference in a section of the Revised Code to a definite prison term shall be construed as referring to the offender's minimum term under that sentence plus any additional period of time of incarceration specified by the department under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section, except to the extent otherwise specified in the section or to the extent that that construction clearly would be inappropriate. Sec. 2967.28. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Monitored time" means the monitored time sanction specified in section 2929.17 and defined in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Deadly weapon" and "dangerous ordnance" have the same meanings as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (3) "Felony sex offense" means a violation of a section contained in Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code that is a felony. (4) "Risk reduction sentence" means a prison term imposed by a court, when the court recommends pursuant to section 2929.143 of the Revised Code that the offender serve the sentence under section 5120.036 of the Revised Code, and the offender may potentially be released from imprisonment prior to the expiration of the prison term if the offender successfully completes all assessment and treatment or programming required by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5120.036 of the Revised Code. (5) "Victim's immediate family" has the same meaning as in section 2967.12 of the Revised Code. (6) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.11 of the Revised Code. (7) "Single validated risk assessment tool" means the single validated risk assessment tool selected by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 5120.114 of the Revised Code. (B) Each sentence to a prison term, other than a term of life imprisonment, for a felony of the first degree, for a felony of the second degree, for a felony sex offense, or for a felony of the third degree that is an offense of violence and is not a felony sex offense shall include a requirement that the offender be subject to a period of post-release control imposed by the parole board after the offender's release from imprisonment. For post-release control to be imposed, the offender must be committed to the department of rehabilitation and correction as set forth in section 5120.16 of the Revised Code. This division applies with respect to all prison terms of a type described in this division, including a term of any such type that is a risk reduction sentence. If a court imposes a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division on or after July 11, 2006, the failure of a sentencing court to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(d) of section 2929.19 of the Revised Code of this requirement or to include in the judgment of conviction entered on the journal a statement that the offender's sentence includes this requirement does not negate, limit, or otherwise affect the mandatory period of supervision that is required for the offender under this division. This division applies with respect to all prison terms of a type described in this division, including a non-life felony indefinite prison term. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division and failed to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(d) of section 2929.19 of the Revised Code regarding post-release control or to include in the judgment of conviction entered on the journal or in the sentence pursuant to division (D)(1) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code a statement regarding post-release control. Unless reduced by the parole board pursuant to division (D) of this section when authorized under that division, a period of post-release control required by this division for an offender shall be of one of the following periods: (1) For a felony sex offense, five years; (2) For a felony of the first degree that is not a felony sex offense, up to five years, but not less than two years; (3) For a felony of the second degree that is not a felony sex offense, up to three years, but not less than eighteen months; (4) For a felony of the third degree that is an offense of violence and is not a felony sex offense, up to three years, but not less than one year. (C) Any sentence to a prison term for a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree that is not subject to division (B)(1) or (4) of this section shall include a requirement that the offender be subject to a period of post-release control of up to two years after the offender's release from imprisonment, if the parole board, in accordance with division (D) of this section, determines that a period of post-release control is necessary for that offender. For post-release control to be imposed, the offender must be committed to the department of rehabilitation and correction as set forth in section 5120.16 of the Revised Code. This division applies with respect to all prison terms of a type described in this division, including a term of any such type that is a risk reduction sentence. Section 2929.191 of the Revised Code applies if, prior to July 11, 2006, a court imposed a sentence including a prison term of a type described in this division and failed to notify the offender pursuant to division (B)(2)(e) of section 2929.19 of the Revised Code regarding post-release control or to include in the judgment of conviction entered on the journal or in the sentence pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code a statement regarding post-release control. Pursuant to an agreement entered into under section 2967.29 of the Revised Code, a court of common pleas or parole board may impose sanctions or conditions on an offender who is placed on post-release control under this division. (D)(1) Before the prisoner is released from imprisonment, the parole board or, pursuant to an agreement under section 2967.29 of the Revised Code, the court shall impose on a prisoner described in division (B) of this section, shall impose on a prisoner described in division (C) of this section who is to be released before the expiration of the prisoner's stated prison term under a risk reduction sentence, may impose on a prisoner described in division (C) of this section who is not to be released before the expiration of the prisoner's stated prison term under a risk reduction sentence, and shall impose on a prisoner described in division (B)(2)(b) of section 5120.031 or in division (B)(1) of section 5120.032 of the Revised Code, one or more post-release control sanctions to apply during the prisoner's period of post-release control. Whenever the board or court imposes one or more post-release control sanctions on a prisoner, the board or court, in addition to imposing the sanctions, also shall include as a condition of the post-release control that the offender not leave the state without permission of the court or the offender's parole or probation officer and that the offender abide by the law. The board or court may impose any other conditions of release under a post-release control sanction that the board or court considers appropriate, and the conditions of release may include any community residential sanction, community nonresidential sanction, or financial sanction that the sentencing court was authorized to impose pursuant to sections 2929.16, 2929.17, and 2929.18 of the Revised Code. Prior to the release of a prisoner for whom it will impose one or more post-release control sanctions under this division, the parole board or court shall review the prisoner's criminal history, results from the single validated risk assessment tool, and the record of the prisoner's conduct while imprisoned. The parole board or court shall consider any recommendation regarding post-release control sanctions for the prisoner made by the office of victims' services. After considering those materials, the board or court shall determine, for a prisoner described in division (B) of this section, division (B)(2)(b) of section 5120.031, or division (B)(1) of section 5120.032 of the Revised Code and for a prisoner described in division (C) of this section who is to be released before the expiration of the prisoner's stated prison term under a risk reduction sentence, which post-release control sanction or combination of post-release control sanctions is reasonable under the circumstances or, for a prisoner described in division (C) of this section who is not to be released before the expiration of the prisoner's stated prison term under a risk reduction sentence, whether a post-release control sanction is necessary and, if so, which post-release control sanction or combination of post-release control sanctions is reasonable under the circumstances. In the case of a prisoner convicted of a felony of the fourth or fifth degree other than a felony sex offense, the board or court shall presume that monitored time is the appropriate post-release control sanction unless the board or court determines that a more restrictive sanction is warranted. A post-release control sanction imposed under this division takes effect upon the prisoner's release from imprisonment. Regardless of whether the prisoner was sentenced to the prison term prior to, on, or after July 11, 2006, prior to the release of a prisoner for whom it will impose one or more post-release control sanctions under this division, the parole board shall notify the prisoner that, if the prisoner violates any sanction so imposed or any condition of post-release control described in division (B) of section 2967.131 of the Revised Code that is imposed on the prisoner, the parole board may impose a prison term of up to one-half of the stated prison term originally imposed on the prisoner. At least thirty days before the prisoner is released from imprisonment under post-release control, except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, the department of rehabilitation and correction shall notify the victim and the victim's immediate family of the date on which the prisoner will be released, the period for which the prisoner will be under post-release control supervision, and the terms and conditions of the prisoner's post-release control regardless of whether the victim or victim's immediate family has requested the notification. The notice described in this paragraph shall not be given to a victim or victim's immediate family if the victim or the victim's immediate family has requested pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 2930.03 of the Revised Code that the notice not be provided to the victim or the victim's immediate family. At least thirty days before the prisoner is released from imprisonment and regardless of whether the victim or victim's immediate family has requested that the notice described in this paragraph be provided or not be provided to the victim or the victim's immediate family, the department also shall provide notice of that nature to the prosecuting attorney in the case and the law enforcement agency that arrested the prisoner if any officer of that agency was a victim of the offense. If the notice given under the preceding paragraph to the victim or the victim's immediate family is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, and if the department of rehabilitation and correction has not previously successfully provided any notice to the victim or the victim's immediate family under division (B), (C), or (D) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code with respect to that offense and the offender who committed it, the notice also shall inform the victim or the victim's immediate family that the victim or the victim's immediate family may request that the victim or the victim's immediate family not be provided any further notices with respect to that offense and the offender who committed it and shall describe the procedure for making that request. The department may give the notices to which the preceding paragraph applies by any reasonable means, including regular mail, telephone, and electronic mail. If the department attempts to provide notice to any specified person under the preceding paragraph but the attempt is unsuccessful because the department is unable to locate the specified person, is unable to provide the notice by its chosen method because it cannot determine the mailing address, electronic mail address, or telephone number at which to provide the notice, or, if the notice is sent by mail, the notice is returned, the department shall make another attempt to provide the notice to the specified person. If the second attempt is unsuccessful, the department shall make at least one more attempt to provide the notice. If the notice is based on an offense committed prior to March 22, 2013, in each attempt to provide the notice to the victim or victim's immediate family, the notice shall include the opt-out information described in this paragraph. The department, in the manner described in division (D)(2) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code, shall keep a record of all attempts to provide the notice, and of all notices provided, under this paragraph and the preceding paragraph. The record shall be considered as if it was kept under division (D)(2) of section 2930.16 of the Revised Code. This paragraph, the preceding paragraph, and the notice-related provisions of divisions (E)(2) and (K) of section 2929.20, division (D)(1) of section 2930.16, division (H) of section 2967.12, division (E)(1)(b) of section 2967.19 as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment April 4, 2023, division (A)(3)(b) of section 2967.26, and division (A)(2) of section 5149.101 of the Revised Code enacted in the act in which this paragraph and the preceding paragraph were enacted, shall be known as "Roberta's Law." (2) If a prisoner who is placed on post-release control under this section is released before the expiration of the definite term that is the prisoner's stated prison term or the expiration of the minimum term that is part of the prisoner's indefinite prison term imposed under a non-life felony indefinite prison term by reason of credit earned under section 2967.193 or 2967.194 or a reduction under division (F) of section 2967.271 of the Revised Code and if the prisoner earned sixty or more days of credit, the adult parole authority may supervise the offender with an active global positioning system device for the first fourteen days after the offender's release from imprisonment. This division does not prohibit or limit the imposition of any post-release control sanction otherwise authorized by this section. (3) After a prisoner is released from imprisonment and during the period of post-release control applicable to the releasee, the adult parole authority or, pursuant to an agreement under section 2967.29 of the Revised Code, the court may review the releasee's behavior under the post-release control sanctions imposed upon the releasee under this section. The authority or court may determine, based upon the review and in accordance with the standards established under division (E) of this section, that the releasee has satisfactorily complied with the sanctions imposed, and if such a determination is made, the authority may recommend a less restrictive sanction, reduce the period of post-release control, or, no sooner than the minimum period of time required under section 2967.16 of the Revised Code, recommend that the parole board or court terminate the duration of the period of post-release control. In no case shall the board or court reduce the duration of the period of control imposed for a felony sex offense described in division (B)(1) of this section. (4) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall develop factors that the parole board or court shall consider in determining under division (D)(3) of this section whether to terminate the period of control imposed on a releasee. (E) The department of rehabilitation and correction, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules that do all of the following: (1) Establish standards for the imposition by the parole board of post-release control sanctions under this section that are consistent with the overriding purposes and sentencing principles set forth in section 2929.11 of the Revised Code and that are appropriate to the needs of releasees; (2) Establish standards that provide for a period of post-release control of up to two years for all prisoners described in division (C) of this section who are to be released before the expiration of their stated prison term under a risk reduction sentence and standards by which the parole board can determine which prisoners described in division (C) of this section who are not to be released before the expiration of their stated prison term under a risk reduction sentence should be placed under a period of post-release control; (3) Establish standards to be used by the parole board in reducing or terminating the duration of the period of post-release control imposed by the court when authorized under division (D) of this section, in imposing a more restrictive post-release control sanction than monitored time on a prisoner convicted of a felony of the fourth or fifth degree other than a felony sex offense, or in imposing a less restrictive control sanction on a releasee based on results from the single validated risk assessment tool and on the releasee's activities including, but not limited to, remaining free from criminal activity and from the abuse of alcohol or other drugs, successfully participating in approved rehabilitation programs, maintaining employment, and paying restitution to the victim or meeting the terms of other financial sanctions; (4) Establish standards to be used by the adult parole authority in modifying a releasee's post-release control sanctions pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section; (5) Establish standards to be used by the adult parole authority or parole board in imposing further sanctions under division (F) of this section on releasees who violate post-release control sanctions, including standards that do the following: (a) Classify violations according to the degree of seriousness; (b) Define the circumstances under which formal action by the parole board is warranted; (c) Govern the use of evidence at violation hearings; (d) Ensure procedural due process to an alleged violator; (e) Prescribe nonresidential community control sanctions for most misdemeanor and technical violations; (f) Provide procedures for the return of a releasee to imprisonment for violations of post-release control. (F)(1) Whenever the parole board imposes one or more post-release control sanctions on an offender under this section, the offender upon release from imprisonment shall be under the general jurisdiction of the adult parole authority and generally shall be supervised by the field services section through its staff of parole and field officers as described in section 5149.04 of the Revised Code, as if the offender had been placed on parole. If the offender upon release from imprisonment violates the post-release control sanction or any conditions described in division (A) of section 2967.131 of the Revised Code that are imposed on the offender, the public or private person or entity that operates or administers the sanction or the program or activity that comprises the sanction shall report the violation directly to the adult parole authority or to the officer of the authority who supervises the offender. The authority's officers may treat the offender as if the offender were on parole and in violation of the parole, and otherwise shall comply with this section. (2) If the adult parole authority or, pursuant to an agreement under section 2967.29 of the Revised Code, the court determines that a releasee has violated a post-release control sanction or any conditions described in division (A) of section 2967.131 of the Revised Code imposed on the releasee and that a more restrictive sanction is appropriate, the authority or court may impose a more restrictive sanction on the releasee, in accordance with the standards established under division (E) of this section or in accordance with the agreement made under section 2967.29 of the Revised Code, or may report the violation to the parole board for a hearing pursuant to division (F)(3) of this section. The authority or court may not, pursuant to this division, increase the duration of the releasee's post-release control or impose as a post-release control sanction a residential sanction that includes a prison term, but the authority or court may impose on the releasee any other residential sanction, nonresidential sanction, or financial sanction that the sentencing court was authorized to impose pursuant to sections 2929.16, 2929.17, and 2929.18 of the Revised Code. (3) The parole board or, pursuant to an agreement under section 2967.29 of the Revised Code, the court may hold a hearing on any alleged violation by a releasee of a post-release control sanction or any conditions described in division (A) of section 2967.131 of the Revised Code that are imposed upon the releasee. Except as otherwise provided in this division, if after the hearing the board or court finds that the releasee violated the sanction or condition, the board or court may increase the duration of the releasee's post-release control up to the maximum duration authorized by division (B) or (C) of this section or impose a more restrictive post-release control sanction. If a releasee was acting pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of section 2925.11 or a related provision of section 2925.12, 2925.14, or 2925.141 of the Revised Code and in so doing violated the conditions of a post-release control sanction based on a minor drug possession offense, as defined in that section, or violated section 2925.12, division (C)(1) of section 2925.14, or section 2925.141 of the Revised Code, the board or the court shall not impose any of the penalties described in this division based on the violation. When appropriate, the board or court may impose as a post-release control sanction a residential sanction that includes a prison term. The board or court shall consider a prison term as a post-release control sanction imposed for a violation of post-release control when the violation involves a deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance, physical harm or attempted serious physical harm to a person, or sexual misconduct. Unless a releasee's stated prison term was reduced pursuant to section 5120.032 of the Revised Code, the period of a prison term that is imposed as a post-release control sanction under this division shall not exceed nine months, and the maximum cumulative prison term for all violations under this division shall not exceed one-half of the definite prison term that was the stated prison term originally imposed on the offender as part of this sentence or, with respect to a stated non-life felony indefinite prison term, one-half of the minimum prison term that was imposed as part of that stated prison term originally imposed on the offender. If a releasee's stated prison term was reduced pursuant to section 5120.032 of the Revised Code, the period of a prison term that is imposed as a post-release control sanction under this division and the maximum cumulative prison term for all violations under this division shall not exceed the period of time not served in prison under the sentence imposed by the court. The period of a prison term that is imposed as a post-release control sanction under this division shall not count as, or be credited toward, the remaining period of post-release control. If, during the period of the releasee's post-release control, the releasee serves as a post-release control sanction the maximum prison time available as a sanction, the post-release control shall terminate. If an offender is imprisoned for a felony committed while under post-release control supervision and is again released on post-release control for a period of time, the maximum cumulative prison term for all violations under this division shall not exceed one-half of the total stated prison terms of the earlier felony, reduced by any prison term administratively imposed by the parole board or court, plus one-half of the total stated prison term of the new felony. (G)(1) If an offender is simultaneously subject to a period of parole under an indefinite or life sentence and a period of post-release control, or is simultaneously subject to two periods of post-release control, the period of supervision that expires last shall determine the length and form of supervision for all the periods and the related sentences. (2) An offender shall receive credit for post-release control supervision during the period of parole, and shall not be eligible for final release under section 2967.16 of the Revised Code until the post-release control period otherwise would have ended. (3) If the period of parole ends prior to the end of the period of post-release control, the requirements of parole supervision shall be satisfied during the post-release control period. (H)(1) A period of post-release control shall not be imposed consecutively to any other post-release control period. (2) The period of post-release control for a releasee who commits a felony while under post-release control for an earlier felony shall be the longer of the period of post-release control specified for the new felony under division (B) or (C) of this section or the time remaining under the period of post-release control imposed for the earlier felony as determined by the parole board or court. Sec. 2969.13. All moneys that are collected pursuant to section 2929.32 of the Revised Code and required to be deposited in the crime victims recovery fund shall be credited by the treasurer of state to the fund. Any interest earned on the money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 2981.02. (A)(1) The following property is subject to forfeiture to the state or a political subdivision under either the criminal or delinquency process in section 2981.04 of the Revised Code or the civil process in section 2981.05 of the Revised Code: (a) Contraband involved in an offense; (b) Proceeds derived from or acquired through the commission of an offense; (c) An instrumentality that is used in or intended to be used in the commission or facilitation of any of the following offenses when the use or intended use, consistent with division (B) of this section, is sufficient to warrant forfeiture under this chapter: (i) A felony; (ii) A misdemeanor, when forfeiture is specifically authorized by a section of the Revised Code or by a municipal ordinance that creates the offense or sets forth its penalties; (iii) An attempt to commit, complicity in committing, or a conspiracy to commit an offense of the type described in divisions (A)(3)(a) and (b) of this section. (2) In determining whether an alleged instrumentality was used in or was intended to be used in the commission or facilitation of an offense or an attempt, complicity, or conspiracy to commit an offense in a manner sufficient to warrant its forfeiture, the trier of fact shall consider the following factors the trier of fact determines are relevant: (a) Whether the offense could not have been committed or attempted but for the presence of the instrumentality; (b) Whether the primary purpose in using the instrumentality was to commit or attempt to commit the offense; (c) The extent to which the instrumentality furthered the commission of, or attempt to commit, the offense. (B) The property described in division (F)(2) (H)(4) of section 2917.211 of the Revised Code is subject to forfeiture under the criminal or delinquency process in section 2981.04 of the Revised Code, if the forfeiture is ordered by the court imposing sentence or an order of disposition. (C) This chapter does not apply to or limit forfeitures under Title XLV of the Revised Code, including forfeitures relating to section 2903.06 or 2903.08 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3101.08. An ordained or licensed minister of any religious society or congregation within this state who is licensed to solemnize marriages, the governor or a former governor of this state, a judge of a county court in accordance with section 1907.18 of the Revised Code, a judge of a municipal court in accordance with section 1901.14 of the Revised Code, a probate judge in accordance with section 2101.27 of the Revised Code, the mayor of a municipal corporation anywhere within this state, the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services, or any religious society in conformity with the rules of its church, may join together as husband and wife any persons who are not prohibited by law from being joined in marriage. Sec. 3105.171. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Distributive award" means any payment or payments, in real or personal property, that are payable in a lump sum or over time, in fixed amounts, that are made from separate property or income, and that are not made from marital property and do not constitute payments of spousal support, as defined in section 3105.18 of the Revised Code. (2) "During the marriage" means whichever of the following is applicable: (a) Except as provided in division (A)(2)(b) of this section, the period of time from the date of the marriage through the date of the final hearing in an action for divorce or in an action for legal separation; (b) If the court determines that the use of either or both of the dates specified in division (A)(2)(a) of this section would be inequitable, the court may select dates that it considers equitable in determining marital property. If the court selects dates that it considers equitable in determining marital property, "during the marriage" means the period of time between those dates selected and specified by the court. (3)(a) "Marital property" means, subject to division (A)(3)(b) of this section, all of the following: (i) All real and personal property that currently is owned by either or both of the spouses, including, but not limited to, the retirement benefits of the spouses, and that was acquired by either or both of the spouses during the marriage; (ii) All interest that either or both of the spouses currently has in any real or personal property, including, but not limited to, the retirement benefits of the spouses, and that was acquired by either or both of the spouses during the marriage; (iii) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all income and appreciation on separate property, due to the labor, monetary, or in-kind contribution of either or both of the spouses that occurred during the marriage; (iv) A participant account, as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, of either of the spouses, to the extent of the following: the moneys that have been deferred by a continuing member or participating employee, as defined in that section, and that have been transmitted to the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage; the moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of a municipal corporation and that have been transmitted to the governing board, administrator, depository, or trustee of the deferred compensation program of the municipal corporation during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage; or the moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of a government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, and that have been transmitted to the governing board, as defined in that section, during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage. (b) "Marital property" does not include any separate property. (4) "Passive income" means income acquired other than as a result of the labor, monetary, or in-kind contribution of either spouse. (5) "Personal property" includes both tangible and intangible personal property. (6)(a) "Separate property" means all real and personal property and any interest in real or personal property that is found by the court to be any of the following: (i) An inheritance by one spouse by bequest, devise, or descent during the course of the marriage; (ii) Any real or personal property or interest in real or personal property that was acquired by one spouse prior to the date of the marriage; (iii) Passive income and appreciation acquired from separate property by one spouse during the marriage; (iv) Any real or personal property or interest in real or personal property acquired by one spouse after a decree of legal separation issued under section 3105.17 of the Revised Code; (v) Any real or personal property or interest in real or personal property that is excluded by a valid antenuptial or postnuptial agreement; (vi) Compensation to a spouse for the spouse's personal injury, except for loss of marital earnings and compensation for expenses paid from marital assets; (vii) Any gift of any real or personal property or of an interest in real or personal property that is made after the date of the marriage and that is proven by clear and convincing evidence to have been given to only one spouse. (b) The commingling of separate property with other property of any type does not destroy the identity of the separate property as separate property, except when the separate property is not traceable. (B) In divorce proceedings, the court shall, and in legal separation proceedings upon the request of either spouse, the court may, determine what constitutes marital property and what constitutes separate property. In either case, upon making such a determination, the court shall divide the marital and separate property equitably between the spouses, in accordance with this section. For purposes of this section, the court has jurisdiction over all property, excluding the social security benefits of a spouse other than as set forth in division (F)(9) of this section, in which one or both spouses have an interest. (C)(1) Except as provided in this division or division (E) of this section, the division of marital property shall be equal. If an equal division of marital property would be inequitable, the court shall not divide the marital property equally but instead shall divide it between the spouses in the manner the court determines equitable. In making a division of marital property, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including those set forth in division (F) of this section. (2) Each spouse shall be considered to have contributed equally to the production and acquisition of marital property. (3) The court shall provide for an equitable division of marital property under this section prior to making any award of spousal support to either spouse under section 3105.18 of the Revised Code and without regard to any spousal support so awarded. (4) If the marital property includes a participant account, as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, the court shall not order the division or disbursement of the moneys and income described in division (A)(3)(a)(iv) of this section to occur in a manner that is inconsistent with the law, rules, or plan governing the deferred compensation program involved or prior to the time that the spouse in whose name the participant account is maintained commences receipt of the moneys and income credited to the account in accordance with that law, rules, and plan. (D) Except as otherwise provided in division (E) of this section or by another provision of this section, the court shall disburse a spouse's separate property to that spouse. If a court does not disburse a spouse's separate property to that spouse, the court shall make written findings of fact that explain the factors that it considered in making its determination that the spouse's separate property should not be disbursed to that spouse. (E)(1) The court may make a distributive award to facilitate, effectuate, or supplement a division of marital property. The court may require any distributive award to be secured by a lien on the payor's specific marital property or separate property. (2) The court may make a distributive award in lieu of a division of marital property in order to achieve equity between the spouses, if the court determines that a division of the marital property in kind or in money would be impractical or burdensome. (3) The court shall require each spouse to disclose in a full and complete manner all marital property, separate property, and other assets, debts, income, and expenses of the spouse. (4) If a spouse has engaged in financial misconduct, including, but not limited to, the dissipation, destruction, concealment, nondisclosure, or fraudulent disposition of assets, the court may compensate the offended spouse with a distributive award or with a greater award of marital property. (5) If a spouse has substantially and willfully failed to disclose marital property, separate property, or other assets, debts, income, or expenses as required under division (E)(3) of this section, the court may compensate the offended spouse with a distributive award or with a greater award of marital property not to exceed three times the value of the marital property, separate property, or other assets, debts, income, or expenses that are not disclosed by the other spouse. (F) In making a division of marital property and in determining whether to make and the amount of any distributive award under this section, the court shall consider all of the following factors: (1) The duration of the marriage; (2) The assets and liabilities of the spouses; (3) The desirability of awarding the family home, or the right to reside in the family home for reasonable periods of time, to the spouse with custody of the children of the marriage; (4) The liquidity of the property to be distributed; (5) The economic desirability of retaining intact an asset or an interest in an asset; (6) The tax consequences of the property division upon the respective awards to be made to each spouse; (7) The costs of sale, if it is necessary that an asset be sold to effectuate an equitable distribution of property; (8) Any division or disbursement of property made in a separation agreement that was voluntarily entered into by the spouses; (9) Any retirement benefits of the spouses, excluding the social security benefits of a spouse except as may be relevant for purposes of dividing a public pension; (10) Any other factor that the court expressly finds to be relevant and equitable. (G) In any order for the division or disbursement of property or a distributive award made pursuant to this section, the court shall make written findings of fact that support the determination that the marital property has been equitably divided and shall specify the dates it used in determining the meaning of "during the marriage." (H) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the holding of title to property by one spouse individually or by both spouses in a form of co-ownership does not determine whether the property is marital property or separate property. (I) A division or disbursement of property or a distributive award made under this section is not subject to future modification by the court except upon the express written consent or agreement to the modification by both spouses. (J) The court may issue any orders under this section that it determines equitable, including, but not limited to, either of the following types of orders: (1) An order granting a spouse the right to use the marital dwelling or any other marital property or separate property for any reasonable period of time; (2) An order requiring the sale or encumbrancing of any real or personal property, with the proceeds from the sale and the funds from any loan secured by the encumbrance to be applied as determined by the court. Sec. 3105.63. (A)(1) A petition for dissolution of marriage shall be signed by both spouses and shall have attached and incorporated a separation agreement agreed to by both spouses. The separation agreement shall provide for a division of all property; spousal support; if there are minor children of the marriage, the allocation of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the minor children, the designation of a residential parent and legal custodian of the minor children, child support, and parenting time rights; and, if the spouses so desire, an authorization for the court to modify the amount or terms of spousal support, or the division of property, provided in the separation agreement. If there are minor children of the marriage, the spouses may address the allocation of the parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the minor children by including in the separation agreement a plan under which both parents will have shared rights and responsibilities for the care of the minor children. The spouses shall file the plan with the petition for dissolution of marriage and shall include in the plan the provisions described in division (G) of section 3109.04 of the Revised Code. (2) The division of property in the separation agreement shall include any participant account, as defined in section 148.01 of the Revised Code, of either of the spouses, to the extent of the following: (a) The moneys that have been deferred by a continuing member or participating employee, as defined in that section, and that have been transmitted to the Ohio public employees deferred compensation retirement board during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage; (b) The moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of a municipal corporation and that have been transmitted to the governing board, administrator, depository, or trustee of the deferred compensation program of the municipal corporation during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage; (c) The moneys that have been deferred by an officer or employee of a government unit, as defined in section 148.06 of the Revised Code, and that have been transmitted to the governing board, as defined in that section, during the marriage and any income that is derived from the investment of those moneys during the marriage. (3) The separation agreement shall not require or permit the division or disbursement of the moneys and income described in division (A)(2) of this section to occur in a manner that is inconsistent with the law, rules, or plan governing the deferred compensation program involved or prior to the time that the spouse in whose name the participant account is maintained commences receipt of the moneys and income credited to the account in accordance with that law, rules, and plan. (B) An amended separation agreement may be filed at any time prior to or during the hearing on the petition for dissolution of marriage. Upon receipt of a petition for dissolution of marriage, the court may cause an investigation to be made pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure. (C)(1) If a petition for dissolution of marriage contains an authorization for the court to modify the amount or terms of spousal support provided in the separation agreement, the modification shall be in accordance with section 3105.18 of the Revised Code. (2) If a petition for dissolution of marriage contains an authorization for the court to modify the division of property provided in the separation agreement, the modification shall be made with the express written consent or agreement of both spouses. Sec. 3107.01. As used in sections 3107.01 to 3107.20 of the Revised Code: (A) "Adoption" means to create the legal relationship of parent and child between the petitioner and the adopted person, as if the adopted person were a legitimate blood descendant of the petitioner, for all purposes including inheritance and applicability of statutes, documents, and instruments, whether executed before or after the adoption is decreed, and which do not expressly exclude an adopted person from their operation or effect. (B) "Agency" means any public or private organization certified, licensed, or otherwise specially empowered by law or rule to place minors for adoption. (C) "Attorney" means a person who has been admitted to the bar by order of the Ohio supreme court. (D) "Best interest" means the factors a court uses to determine the best interest of a child as set forth in section 3107.161 of the Revised Code. (E) "Child" means a son or daughter, whether by birth or by adoption. (F) "Court" means the probate courts of this state, and when the context requires, means the court of any other state empowered to grant petitions for adoption. (G) "Date of placement" means the date on which a child is living with the child's prospective adoptive parent and becomes eligible for adoption pursuant to statutory authority, judgment decree or court order, or as otherwise authorized by law. (H) "Foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (I) "Identifying information" means any of the following with regard to a person: first name, last name, maiden name, alias, social security number, address, telephone number, place of employment, number used to identify the person for the purpose of the statewide education management information system established pursuant to section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code, and any other number federal or state law requires or permits to be used to identify the person. (J) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (K) "Legal custodian" has the same meaning as in section 5103.16 of the Revised Code. (L) "Legal custody" has the same meaning as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (M) "Minor" means a person under the age of eighteen years. (N) "Parent" means a legally recognized natural or adoptive parent of a child. (O) "Party" means a petitioner, adoptee, or any other person or agency that is part of an adoption proceeding and whose consent to the adoption is necessary but has not been obtained. (P) "Permanent custody" has the same meaning as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (Q) "Placement" means the act by a public children services agency, a private child placing agency, or a parent who is utilizing an agency or attorney that is intended to arrange for the care or custody of a child in accordance with Chapter 5103. of the Revised Code. (R) "Planned permanent living arrangement" has the same meaning as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (S) "Putative father" means a man, including one under age eighteen, who may be a child's father and to whom all of the following apply: (1) He is not married to the child's mother at the time of the child's conception or birth; (2) He has not adopted the child; (3) He has not been determined, prior to the date a petition to adopt the child is filed, to have a parent and child relationship with the child by a court proceeding pursuant to sections 3111.01 to 3111.18 of the Revised Code, a court proceeding in another state, an administrative agency proceeding pursuant to sections 3111.38 to 3111.54 of the Revised Code, or an administrative agency proceeding in another state; (4) He has not acknowledged paternity of the child pursuant to sections 3111.21 to 3111.35 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3107.012. (A) A foster caregiver may use the application prescribed under division (B) of this section to obtain the services of an agency to arrange an adoption for the foster caregiver if the foster caregiver seeks to adopt the foster caregiver's foster child who has resided resides in the foster caregiver's home for at least six months prior to the date the foster caregiver submits the application to the agency. (B) The department of children and youth shall prescribe an application for a foster caregiver to use under division (A) of this section. The application shall not require that the foster caregiver provide any information the foster caregiver already provided the department, or undergo an inspection the foster caregiver already underwent, to obtain a foster home certificate under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. (C) An agency that receives an application prescribed under division (B) of this section from a foster caregiver authorized to use the application shall not require, as a condition of the agency accepting or approving the application, that the foster caregiver undergo a criminal records check under section 2151.86 of the Revised Code as a prospective adoptive parent. The agency shall inform the foster caregiver, in accordance with division (G) of section 2151.86 of the Revised Code, that the foster caregiver must undergo the criminal records check before a court may issue a final decree of adoption or interlocutory order of adoption under section 3107.14 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3107.031. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an assessor shall conduct a home study for the purpose of ascertaining whether a person seeking to adopt a minor is suitable to adopt. A written report of the home study shall be filed with the court at least ten days before the petition for adoption is heard. A person seeking to adopt a minor who knowingly makes a false statement that is included in the written report of a home study conducted pursuant to this section is guilty of the offense of falsification under section 2921.13 of the Revised Code, and such a home study shall not be filed with the court. If such a home study is filed with the court, the court may strike the home study from the court's records. The report shall contain the opinion of the assessor as to whether the person who is the subject of the report is suitable to adopt a minor, any multiple children assessment required under section 3107.032 of the Revised Code, and other information and documents specified in rules adopted by the director of children and youth under section 3107.033 of the Revised Code. The assessor shall not consider the person's age when determining whether the person is suitable to adopt if the person is old enough to adopt as provided by section 3107.03 of the Revised Code. An assessor may request departments or agencies within or outside this state to assist in the home study as may be appropriate and to make a written report to be included with and attached to the report to the court. The assessor shall make similar home studies and reports on behalf of other assessors designated by the courts of this state or another place. Upon order of the court, the costs of the home study and other proceedings shall be paid by the person seeking to adopt, and, if the home study is conducted by a public agency or public employee, the part of the cost representing any services and expenses shall be taxed as costs and paid into the state treasury or county treasury, as the court may direct. On request, the assessor shall provide the person seeking to adopt a copy of the report of the home study. The assessor shall delete from that copy any provisions concerning the opinion of other persons, excluding the assessor, of the person's suitability to adopt a minor. This section does not apply to a foster caregiver seeking to adopt the foster caregiver's foster child if the foster child has resided resides in the foster caregiver's home for at least six months prior to the date and the foster caregiver submits an application prescribed under division (B) of section 3107.012 of the Revised Code to the agency arranging the adoption. Sec. 3107.033. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code specifying both of the following: (A) The manner in which a home study is to be conducted and the information and documents to be included in a home study report, which shall include, pursuant to section 3107.034 of the Revised Code, a summary report of a search of the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system established in section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code and a report of a check of a central registry of another state if a request for a check of a central registry of another state is required under division (A) of section 3107.034 of the Revised Code. The director shall ensure that rules adopted under this section align the home study content, time period, and process with any foster care home study content, time period, and process required by rules adopted under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. (B) A procedure under which a person whose application for adoption has been denied as a result of a search of the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system established in section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code as part of the home study may appeal the denial to the agency that employed the assessor who filed the report. Sec. 3107.034. (A) Whenever a prospective adoptive parent or a person eighteen years of age or older who resides with a prospective adoptive parent has resided in another state within the five-year period immediately prior to the date on which a criminal records check is requested for the person under division (A) of section 2151.86 of the Revised Code, the administrative director of an agency, or attorney, who arranges the adoption for the prospective adoptive parent shall request a check of the central registry of abuse and neglect of this state from the department of children and youth regarding the prospective adoptive parent or the person eighteen years of age or older who resides with the prospective adoptive parent to enable the agency or attorney to check any child abuse and neglect registry maintained by that other state. The administrative director or attorney shall make the request and shall review the results of the check before a final decree of adoption or an interlocutory order of adoption making the person an adoptive parent may be made. Information received pursuant to the request shall be considered for purposes of this chapter as if it were a summary report required under section 3107.033 of the Revised Code. The department of children and youth shall comply with any request to check the central registry that is similar to the request described in this division and that is received from any other state. (B) The summary report of a search of the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system established in section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code that is required under section 3107.033 of the Revised Code shall contain, if applicable, a chronological list of abuse and neglect determinations or allegations of which the person seeking to adopt is subject and in regards to which a public children services agency has done one of the following: (1) Determined that abuse or neglect occurred; (2) Initiated an investigation, and the investigation is ongoing; (3) Initiated an investigation and the agency was unable to determine whether abuse or neglect occurred. (C) The summary report required under section 3107.033 of the Revised Code shall not contain any of the following: (1) An abuse and neglect determination of which the person seeking to adopt is subject and in regards to which a public children services agency determined that abuse or neglect did not occur; (2) Information or reports the dissemination of which is prohibited by, or interferes with eligibility under, the "Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act," 88 Stat. 4 (1974), 42 U.S.C. 5101 et seq., as amended; (3) The name of the person who or entity that made, or participated in the making of, the report of abuse or neglect. (D)(1) An application for adoption may be denied based on a summary report containing the information described under division (B)(1) of this section, when considered within the totality of the circumstances. An application that is denied may be appealed using the procedure adopted pursuant to division (B) of section 3107.033 of the Revised Code. (2) An application for adoption shall not be denied solely based on a summary report containing the information described under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section. Sec. 3107.062. (A)(1) The department of job and family services children and youth shall establish a putative father registry. To register, a putative father must complete a registration form prescribed under section 3107.065 of the Revised Code and submit it to the department. The registration form shall include the putative father's name; the name of the mother of the person he claims as his child; and the address or telephone number at which he wishes to receive, pursuant to section 3107.11 of the Revised Code, notice of any petition that may be filed to adopt a minor he claims as his child. (2) A putative father may register at any time. For the purpose of preserving the requirement of his consent to an adoption, a putative father shall register before or not later than fifteen days after the birth of the child. No fee shall be charged for registration. (B) On receipt of a completed registration form, the department shall indicate on the form the date of receipt and file it in the putative father registry. The department shall maintain registration forms in a manner that enables it to access a registration form using either the name of the putative father or of the mother. (C) The department of children and youth shall grant the office of child support in the department of job and family services and a child support enforcement agency access to the putative father registry for purposes of section 3111.69 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3107.063. (A) An attorney arranging a minor's adoption, a mother, a public children services agency, a private noncustodial agency, or a private child placing agency may request at any time that the department of job and family services children and youth search the putative father registry to determine whether a man is registered as the minor's putative father. The request shall include the mother's name. On receipt of the request, the department shall search the registry. If the department determines that a man is registered as the minor's putative father, it shall provide the attorney, mother, or agency a certified copy of the man's registration form. If the department determines that no man is registered as the minor's putative father, it shall provide the attorney, mother, or agency a certified written statement to that effect. The department shall specify in the statement the date the search request was submitted. No fee shall be charged for searching the registry. Division (B) of section 3107.17 of the Revised Code does not apply to this section. (B) If the department of job and family services children and youth provides a certified copy of a putative father's registration form pursuant to division (A) of this section, the department also shall provide a written notice to the putative father: (1) That he may be the father of the minor he claims as his child on the registration form; (2) That the minor is being or may be placed for adoption; and (3) Of his right to consent or refuse to consent to the minor's adoption to the extent provided under Chapter 3107. of the Revised Code. (C) The department shall provide the notice under this section not later than ten business days after the date it provides the certified copy of the registration form pursuant to division (A) of this section. Sec. 3107.064. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, a court shall not issue a final decree of adoption or finalize an interlocutory order of adoption unless the mother placing the minor for adoption or the agency or attorney arranging the adoption files with the court a certified document provided by the department of job and family services children and youth under section 3107.063 of the Revised Code. The court shall not accept the document unless the date the department places on the document pursuant to that section is sixteen or more days after the date of the minor's birth. (B) The document described in division (A) of this section is not required if any of the following apply: (1) The mother was married at the time the minor was conceived or born; (2) The parent placing the minor for adoption previously adopted the minor; (3) Prior to the date a petition to adopt the minor is filed, a man has been determined to have a parent and child relationship with the minor by a court proceeding pursuant to sections 3111.01 to 3111.18 of the Revised Code, a court proceeding in another state, an administrative agency proceeding pursuant to sections 3111.38 to 3111.54 of the Revised Code, or an administrative agency proceeding in another state; (4) The minor's father acknowledged paternity of the minor and that acknowledgment has become final pursuant to section 2151.232, 3111.25, or 3111.821 of the Revised Code; (5) A public children services agency has permanent custody of the minor pursuant to Chapter 2151. or division (B) of section 5103.15 of the Revised Code after both parents lost or surrendered parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities over the minor. Sec. 3107.065. Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section, the director of job and family services children and youth shall do both of the following: (A) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the putative father registry. The rules shall establish the registration form to be used by a putative father under section 3107.062 of the Revised Code. (B) Establish a campaign to promote awareness of the putative father registry. The campaign shall include informational materials about the registry. Sec. 3107.38. (A) As used in sections 3107.38 to 3107.394 of the Revised Code: (1) "Adopted person" means a person who was adopted but is not an adopted person as defined in section 3107.45 of the Revised Code. (2) "Adoption file" means a file maintained by the department of health under sections 3705.12 to 3705.124 of the Revised Code. (3) "Biological parent" means a parent, by birth, of a person who is, or is to become, an adopted person. (4) "Biological parent's name redaction request form" means the form prescribed under section 3107.391 of the Revised Code. (5) "Biological sibling" means a sibling, by birth, of a person who is, or is to become, an adopted person. (6) "Contact preference form" means the form prescribed under section 3107.39 of the Revised Code. (7) "File of releases" means the filing system for releases that former section 3107.40 of the Revised Code, as repealed by Sub. S.B. 23 of the 130th general assembly, required the department of health to maintain. (8) "Items of identification" include a motor vehicle driver's or commercial driver's license, an identification card issued under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code, a marriage application, a social security card, a credit card, a military identification card, or an employee identification card. (9) "Lineal descendant of an adopted person" means a person who by reason of blood or adoption is a lineal descendant of an adopted person. (10) "Offspring" means a child, by birth, of a person. (11) "Release" means both of the following: (a) A release filed by a biological parent or biological sibling pursuant to former section 3107.40 of the Revised Code, as repealed by Sub. S.B. 23 of the 130th general assembly, that authorized the release of identifying information to the biological parent's offspring or the release of specified information to the biological sibling's adopted sibling pursuant to former section 3107.41 of the Revised Code, as repealed by Sub. S.B. 23 of the 130th general assembly; (b) A withdrawal of release filed by a biological parent or biological sibling pursuant to former section 3107.40 of the Revised Code, as repealed by Sub. S.B. 23 of the 130th general assembly. (B) Subject to division (C) of this section, an adopted person or lineal descendant of an adopted person may submit a written request to the department of health for the department to provide the adopted person or lineal descendant of an adopted person with a copy of the contents of the adopted person's adoption file. The request shall provide the requester's address and notarized signature and be accompanied by two items of identification of the requester. If the requester is a lineal descendant of an adopted person, the request shall also provide notarized documentation evidencing the requester's relationship to the adopted person. On receipt of a request and payment of the fee required by section 3705.241 of the Revised Code, the department shall mail to the requester, at the address provided in the request, a copy of the contents of the adopted person's adoption file if the department has an adoption file, including all releases transferred to the adoption file pursuant to section 3107.381 of the Revised Code, for the adopted person. If the adoption file includes a biological parent's name redaction request form from a biological parent, the department shall redact the biological parent's name from the copy of the contents of the adoption file that is mailed to the requester. If the department removes the biological parent's name redaction request form from the adoption file pursuant to division (D) (A) of section 3107.391 of the Revised Code after the department mails the copy of the contents of the adoption file to the requester, the department shall mail to the requester another copy of the contents with the biological parent's name included. (C) An adopted person or lineal descendant of an adopted person may not submit a request under this section until the adopted person or lineal descendant is at least eighteen years of age. Sec. 3107.391. (A) The department of job and family services shall prescribe a biological parent's name redaction request form. The form shall include all of the following: (1) Information about the procedures and requirements for a biological parent to do either of the following: (a) Have the form placed in the adoption file of the biological parent's offspring so that the biological parent's name is redacted from a copy of the contents of the adoption file that a person receives under section 3107.38 of the Revised Code; (b) Have the form removed from the adoption file if the biological parent later decides to permit the biological parent's name to be included in a copy of the contents of the adoption file that a person receives under section 3107.38 of the Revised Code. (2) Provisions necessary for the department of health to be able to identify the adoption file of the adopted person to whom the form pertains; (3) A place for the biological parent to attest that the biological parent is the biological parent of the adopted person to whom the form pertains. (B) The department of job and family services shall make the biological parent's name redaction request form available to the department of health. (C)(1) Until one year after the effective date of this section, the department of health shall make a biological parent's name redaction request form available to a biological parent on request. The department may accept a completed biological parent's name redaction request form only if all of the following apply: (a) The form is submitted to the department not later than one year after the effective date of this section. (b) The form has been notarized. (c) The biological parent provides the department two items of identification of the biological parent. (d) If a social and medical history for the biological parent was not previously prepared or such a history was prepared but should be corrected or expanded, the biological parent does the following as appropriate: (i) Completes a social and medical history form in accordance with section 3107.091 or 3107.393 of the Revised Code; (ii) Corrects or expands the biological parent's social and medical history in accordance with division (D) of section 3107.09 of the Revised Code. (e) The department is satisfied that the form has been substantially completed. (2) If the department determines that it may accept the biological parent's name redaction request form, it shall accept the form. As soon as the department identifies the adoption file of the adopted person to whom the form pertains, it shall place the form in that file. (D)(1) A biological parent who has had a biological parent's name redaction request form accepted under division (C) of this section by the department of health between March 20, 2014, and March 20, 2015, may request at any time that the department remove the form from the adoption file of the adopted person to whom the form pertains if the biological parent decides to permit the biological parent's name to be included in a copy of the contents of the adoption file that a person receives under section 3107.38 of the Revised Code. The department shall remove the form from the adoption file if the biological parent provides the department all of the following: (a)(1) Two items of identification of the biological parent; (b)(2) Information the department needs to be able to identify the adoption file of the adopted person to whom the form pertains; (c)(3) A notarized attestation that the biological parent is the biological parent of the adopted person to whom the form pertains. (2)(B) When the department removes a biological parent's name redaction request form from an adoption file under division (D)(1)(A) of this section, the department shall destroy the form. Sec. 3109.14. (A) As used in this section, "birth record" and "certification of birth" have the meanings given in section 3705.01 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The director of health, a person authorized by the director, a local commissioner of health, or a local registrar of vital statistics shall charge and collect a fee for each certified copy of a birth record, for each certification of birth, and for each copy of a death record. The fee shall be three dollars. The fee is in addition to the fee imposed by section 3705.24 or any other section of the Revised Code. A local commissioner of health or a local registrar of vital statistics may retain an amount of each additional fee collected, not to exceed three per cent of the amount of the additional fee, to be used for costs directly related to the collection of the fee and the forwarding of the fee to the department of health. The additional fees collected by the director of health or a person authorized by the director and the additional fees collected but not retained by a local commissioner of health or a local registrar of vital statistics shall be forwarded to the department of health not later than thirty days following the end of each quarter. Not later than two days after the fees are forwarded to the department each quarter, the department shall pay deposit the collected fees to the treasurer of state in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state under section 113.08 of the Revised Codein the state treasury to the credit of the children's trust fund. A person or government entity that fails to forward the fees in a timely manner, as determined by the department, shall send to the department, in addition to the fees, a penalty equal to ten per cent of the fees. The department also shall deposit any penalty received in the state treasury to the credit of the children's trust fund. (2) Upon the filing for a divorce decree under section 3105.10 or a decree of dissolution under section 3105.65 of the Revised Code, a court of common pleas shall charge and collect a fee. The fee shall be eleven dollars. The fee is in addition to any other court costs or fees. The county clerk of courts may retain an amount of each additional fee collected, not to exceed three per cent of the amount of the additional fee, to be used for costs directly related to the collection of the fee and the forwarding of the fee to the treasurer of state. The additional fees collected, but not retained, under division (B)(2) of this section shall be forwarded to the treasurer of state not later than twenty days following the end of each month. The treasurer of state shall deposit the fees received under division (B)(2) of this section in the state treasury to the credit of the children's trust fund. A county clerk of courts that fails to forward the fees in a timely manner, as determined by the treasurer of state, shall send to the treasurer of state, in addition to the fees, a penalty equal to ten per cent of the fees. The treasurer of state also shall deposit any penalty received in the state treasury to the credit of the children's trust fund. (C) The treasurer of state shall deposit the fees paid or forwarded under this section in the state treasury to the credit of the children's trust fund, which is hereby created. A person or government entity that fails to forward the fees in a timely manner, as determined by the treasurer of state, shall send to the treasurer of state, in addition to the fees, a penalty equal to ten per cent of the fees. The children's trust fund is created in the state treasury. The treasurer of state shall invest the moneys in the fund, and all earnings resulting from investment of the fund shall be credited to the fund, except that actual administrative costs incurred by the treasurer of state in administering the fund may be deducted from the earnings resulting from investments. The amount that may be deducted shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of fees credited to the fund in each fiscal year, except that the children's trust fund board may approve an amount for actual administrative costs exceeding three per cent but not exceeding four per cent of such amount. The balance of the investment earnings shall be credited to the fund. Moneys credited to the fund shall be used only for the purposes described in sections 3109.13 to 3109.179 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.171. For the purpose of administering child abuse and child neglect prevention programming and services approved by the children's trust fund board, there are hereby created the following eight child abuse and child neglect prevention regions in the state: One region consisting of the following counties: Defiance, Erie, Fulton, Hancock, Henry, Huron, Lucas, Ottawa, Paulding, Putnam, Sandusky, Seneca, Van Wert, Williams, Wood, and Wyandot. One region consisting of the following counties: Ashtabula, Cuyahoga, Geauga, and Lake. One region consisting of the following counties: Ashland, Columbiana, Holmes, Lorain, Mahoning, Medina, Portage, Stark, Summit, Trumbull, and Wayne. One region consisting of the following counties: Allen, Auglaize, Champaign, Clark, Darke, Greene, Hardin, Logan, Mercer, Miami, Montgomery, Preble, and Shelby. One region consisting of the following counties: Crawford, Delaware, Fairfield, Fayette, Franklin, Knox, Licking, Madison, Marion, Morrow, Pickaway, Richland, and Union. One region consisting of the following counties: Belmont, Carroll, Coshocton, Guernsey, Harrison, Jefferson, Monroe, Muskingum, Noble, and Tuscarawas. One region consisting of the following counties: Adams, Brown, Butler, Clermont, Clinton, Hamilton, Highland, and Warren. One region consisting of the following counties: Athens, Gallia, Hocking, Jackson, Lawrence, Meigs, Morgan, Perry, Pike, Ross, Scioto, Vinton, and Washington. The board, in consultation with the department of children and youth, shall determine the number of regions and the counties within each region. Each county in the state shall be included in a region. Sec. 3109.172. (A) As used in this section, "county prevention specialist" includes the following: (1) Members of agencies responsible for the administration of children's services in the counties within a child abuse and child neglect prevention region established in section 3109.171 of the Revised Code; (2) Providers of alcohol or drug addiction services or members of boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that serve counties within a region; (3) Providers of mental health services or members of boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that serve counties within a region; (4) Members of county boards of developmental disabilities that serve counties within a region; (5) Members of the educational community appointed by the superintendent of the school district with the largest enrollment in the counties within a region; (6) Juvenile justice officials serving counties within a region; (7) Pediatricians, health department nurses, and other members of the medical community in the counties within a region; (8) Counselors and social workers serving counties within a region; (9) Head start agencies serving counties within a region; (10) Child care providers serving counties within a region; (11) Parent advocates with relevant experience and knowledge of services in a region; (12) Other persons with demonstrated knowledge in programs for children serving counties within a region. (B) Each child abuse and child neglect prevention region shall have a child abuse and child neglect regional prevention council as appointed under divisions (C), (D), and (E) of this section. Each council shall operate in accordance with rules adopted by the department of children and youth pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Each board of county commissioners within a region may appoint up to two county prevention specialists to the council representing the county, in accordance with rules adopted by the department of children and youth under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The reappointment of a chairperson by a board of county commissioners in accordance with division (D) of this section shall not be considered to be an appointment under this division. (2) The children's trust fund board may appoint additional county prevention specialists to each region's council at the board's discretion. (D) Each council member appointed under division (C)(1) of this section shall be appointed for a two-year term. Each council member appointed under division (C)(2) of this section shall be appointed for a three-year term. A member may be reappointed, but for two consecutive terms only. A council member selected as chairperson of a child abuse and child neglect regional prevention council in accordance with division (G) of this section is eligible to be reappointed by the original appointing authority. (E) A member may be removed from the council by the member's appointing authority for misconduct, incompetence, or neglect of duty. (F) Each appointed member of a council shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties. (G) A chairperson shall be selected by the council's regional prevention coordinator from among the county prevention specialists serving on the council. (1) The chairperson shall serve as a nonvoting member of the council. (2) The chairperson shall preside over council meetings or may call upon the vice-chairperson to preside over meetings. (H) At the first regular meeting of the year, which shall be called by the chairperson, the members shall elect a vice-chairperson by a majority vote. (1) The vice-chairperson shall preside over council meetings in the absence of the chairperson or upon the request of the chairperson. (2) The vice-chairperson functions in the same capacity as the chairperson and becomes a nonvoting member when presiding over a council meeting. (I) Each council shall meet at least quarterly. (J) Council members shall do all of the following: (1) Attend meetings of the council on which they serve; (2) Assist the regional prevention coordinator in conducting a needs assessment to ascertain the child abuse and child neglect prevention programming and services that are needed in their region; (3) Collaborate on assembling the council's regional prevention plan based on children's trust fund board guidelines pursuant to section 3109.174 of the Revised Code; (4) Assist the council's regional prevention coordinator with all of the following: (a) Implementing the regional prevention plan, including monitoring fulfillment of child abuse and child neglect prevention deliverables and achievement of prevention outcomes; (b) Coordinating county data collection; (c) Ensuring timely and accurate reporting to the children's trust fund board. (5) Any additional duties specified in accordance with rules adopted by the department pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (K) No council member shall participate in matters of the council pertaining to their own interests, including applications for funding by a council member or any entity, public or private, of which a council member serves as either a board member or employee. (L) Each council shall file with the children's trust fund board, not later than the due dates specified by the board, a progress report and an annual report regarding the council's child abuse and child neglect prevention programs and activities undertaken in accordance with the council's regional prevention plan. The reports shall contain all information required by the board. Sec. 3109.173. (A) Each child abuse and child neglect regional prevention council shall be under the direction of a regional prevention coordinator. The children's trust fund board shall may select each region's coordinator through a competitive selection process conducted by the board. If the board has not selected a regional coordinator through a competitive selection process for a region, children's trust fund staff shall serve as coordinator for that region. (B) Regional prevention coordinators shall do all of the following: (1) Select a representative to serve as chairperson of the regional prevention council pursuant to division (G) of section 3109.172 of the Revised Code; (2) Conduct a needs assessment to ascertain the child abuse and neglect prevention programming and services that are needed in the region; (3) Work with county prevention specialists in the region to assemble the regional prevention plan based on children's trust fund board guidelines pursuant to section 3109.174 of the Revised Code; (4) Implement the regional prevention plan, including the following: (a) Monitoring fulfillment of prevention deliverables and achievement of prevention outcomes; (b) Coordinating county data collection; (c) Ensuring timely and accurate reporting to the board. (5) Any additional duties specified by the department in rules adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3109.178. (A) Each child abuse and child neglect regional prevention council An entity may request from the children's trust fund board up to five thousand dollars for each county within the council's region to be used as one-time, start-up costs for the establishment and operation of a children's advocacy center to serve each at least one county in the region or a center to serve two or more contiguous counties within the region. (B) On receipt of a request made under this section, the board shall review and approve or disapprove the request. (C) If the board disapproves the request, the board shall send to the requesting council entity requesting funds written notice of the disapproval that states the reasons for the disapproval. (D) No funds allocated to a council under this section may be used as start-up costs for any children's advocacy center unless the center has as a component a primary prevention strategy. (E) A council An entity that receives funds under this section in any fiscal year shall not use the funds received in a different fiscal year or for a different center in any fiscal year without the approval of the board. (F) A children's advocacy center established using funds awarded under this section shall comply with sections 2151.425 to 2151.428 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3115.201. (A) In a proceeding to establish or enforce a support order or to determine parentage of a child, a tribunal or support enforcement agency of this state may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual if any of the following apply: (1) The individual is personally served with summons within this state. (2) The individual submits to the jurisdiction of this state by consent in a record, by entering a general appearance, or by filing a responsive document having the effect of waiving any contest to personal jurisdiction. (3) The individual resided with the child in this state. (4) The individual resided in this state and provided prenatal expenses or support for the child. (5) The child resides in this state as a result of the acts or directives of the individual. (6) The individual engaged in sexual intercourse in this state and the child may have been conceived by that act of intercourse. (7) The individual asserted parentage of a child in the putative father registry maintained in this state by the department of job and family serviceschildren and youth. (8) There is any other basis consistent with the Constitutions of this state and the United States for the exercise of personal jurisdiction. (B) The bases of personal jurisdiction set forth in division (A) of this section or in any other law of this state may not be used to acquire personal jurisdiction for a tribunal of this state to modify a child-support order of another state unless the requirements of section 3115.611 of the Revised Code are met or, in the case of a foreign support order, unless the requirements of section 3115.615 of the Revised Code are met. Sec. 3119.01. (A) As used in the Revised Code, "child support enforcement agency" means a child support enforcement agency designated under former section 2301.35 of the Revised Code prior to October 1, 1997, or a private or government entity designated as a child support enforcement agency under section 307.981 of the Revised Code. (B) As used in this chapter and Chapters 3121., 3123., and 3125. of the Revised Code: (1) "Administrative child support order" means any order issued by a child support enforcement agency for the support of a child pursuant to section 3109.19 or 3111.81 of the Revised Code or former section 3111.211 of the Revised Code, section 3111.21 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to January 1, 1998, or section 3111.20 or 3111.22 of the Revised Code as those sections existed prior to March 22, 2001. (2) "Child support order" means either a court child support order or an administrative child support order. (3) "Obligee" means the person who is entitled to receive the support payments under a support order. (4) "Obligor" means the person who is required to pay support under a support order. (5) "Support order" means either an administrative child support order or a court support order. (C) As used in this chapter: (1) "Caretaker" means any of the following, other than a parent: (a) A person with whom the child resides for at least thirty consecutive days, and who is the child's primary caregiver; (b) A person who is receiving public assistance on behalf of the child; (c) A person or agency with legal custody of the child, including a county department of job and family services or a public children services agency; (d) A guardian of the person or the estate of a child; (e) Any other appropriate court or agency with custody of the child. "Caretaker" excludes a "host family" as defined under section 2151.90 of the Revised Code. (2) "Cash medical support" means an amount ordered to be paid in a child support order toward the ordinary medical expenses incurred during a calendar year. (3) "Child care cost" means annual out-of-pocket costs for the care and supervision of a child or children subject to the order that is related to work or employment training. (4) "Court child support order" means any order issued by a court for the support of a child pursuant to Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, section 2151.23, 2151.231, 2151.232, 2151.33, 2151.36, 2151.361, 2151.49, 3105.21, 3109.05, 3109.19, 3109.20, 3111.13, 3113.04, 3113.07, 3113.31, 3119.11, 3119.65, or 3119.70 of the Revised Code, or division (B) of former section 3113.21 of the Revised Code. (5) "Court-ordered parenting time" means the amount of parenting time a parent is to have under a parenting time order or the amount of time the children are to be in the physical custody of a parent under a shared parenting order. (6) "Court support order" means either a court child support order or an order for the support of a spouse or former spouse issued pursuant to Chapter 3115. of the Revised Code, section 3105.18, 3105.65, or 3113.31 of the Revised Code, or division (B) of former section 3113.21 of the Revised Code. (7) "CPI-U" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers, published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics. (8) "Extraordinary medical expenses" means any uninsured medical expenses incurred for a child during a calendar year that exceed the total cash medical support amount owed by the parents during that year. (9) "Federal poverty level" has the same meaning as in section 5121.30 of the Revised Code. (10) "Income" means either of the following: (a) For a parent who is employed to full capacity, the gross income of the parent; (b) For a parent who is unemployed or underemployed, the sum of the gross income of the parent and any potential income of the parent. (11) "Income share" means the percentage derived from a comparison of each parent's annual income after allowable deductions and credits as indicated on the worksheet to the total annual income of both parents. (12) "Insurer" means any person authorized under Title XXXIX of the Revised Code to engage in the business of insurance in this state, any health insuring corporation, and any legal entity that is self-insured and provides benefits to its employees or members. (13) "Gross income" means, except as excluded in division (C)(13) of this section, the total of all earned and unearned income from all sources during a calendar year, whether or not the income is taxable, and includes income from salaries, wages, overtime pay, and bonuses to the extent described in division (D) of section 3119.05 of the Revised Code; commissions; royalties; tips; rents; dividends; severance pay; pensions; interest; trust income; annuities; social security benefits, including retirement, disability, and survivor benefits that are not means-tested; workers' compensation benefits; unemployment insurance benefits; disability insurance benefits; benefits that are not means-tested and that are received by and in the possession of the veteran who is the beneficiary for any service-connected disability under a program or law administered by the United States department of veterans' affairs or veterans' administration; spousal support actually received; and all other sources of income. "Gross income" includes income of members of any branch of the United States armed services or national guard, including, amounts representing base pay, basic allowance for quarters, basic allowance for subsistence, supplemental subsistence allowance, cost of living adjustment, specialty pay, variable housing allowance, and pay for training or other types of required drills; self-generated income; and potential cash flow from any source. "Gross income" does not include any of the following: (a) Benefits received from means-tested government administered programs, including Ohio works first; prevention, retention, and contingency; means-tested veterans' benefits; supplemental security income; supplemental nutrition assistance program; disability financial assistance; or other assistance for which eligibility is determined on the basis of income or assets; (b) Benefits for any service-connected disability under a program or law administered by the United States department of veterans' affairs or veterans' administration that are not means-tested, that have not been distributed to the veteran who is the beneficiary of the benefits, and that are in the possession of the United States department of veterans' affairs or veterans' administration; (c) Child support amounts received for children who are not included in the current calculation; (d) Amounts paid for mandatory deductions from wages such as union dues but not taxes, social security, or retirement in lieu of social security; (e) Nonrecurring or unsustainable income or cash flow items; (f) Adoption assistance, kinship guardianship assistance, and foster care maintenance payments made pursuant to Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501, 42 U.S.C.A. 670 (1980), as amended; (g) State kinship guardianship assistance described in section 5153.163 of the Revised Code and payment from the kinship support program described in section 5101.881 5180.531 of the Revised Code. (14) "Nonrecurring or unsustainable income or cash flow item" means an income or cash flow item the parent receives in any year or for any number of years not to exceed three years that the parent does not expect to continue to receive on a regular basis. "Nonrecurring or unsustainable income or cash flow item" does not include a lottery prize award that is not paid in a lump sum or any other item of income or cash flow that the parent receives or expects to receive for each year for a period of more than three years or that the parent receives and invests or otherwise uses to produce income or cash flow for a period of more than three years. (15) "Ordinary medical expenses" includes copayments and deductibles, and uninsured medical-related costs for the children of the order. (16)(a) "Ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in generating gross receipts" means actual cash items expended by the parent or the parent's business and includes depreciation expenses of business equipment as shown on the books of a business entity. (b) Except as specifically included in "ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in generating gross receipts" by division (C)(16)(a) of this section, "ordinary and necessary expenses incurred in generating gross receipts" does not include depreciation expenses and other noncash items that are allowed as deductions on any federal tax return of the parent or the parent's business. (17) "Personal earnings" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, however denominated, and includes wages, salary, commissions, bonuses, draws against commissions, profit sharing, vacation pay, or any other compensation. (18) "Potential income" means both of the following for a parent who the court pursuant to a court support order, or a child support enforcement agency pursuant to an administrative child support order, determines is voluntarily unemployed or voluntarily underemployed: (a) Imputed income that the court or agency determines the parent would have earned if fully employed as determined from the following criteria: (i) The parent's prior employment experience; (ii) The parent's education; (iii) The parent's physical and mental disabilities, if any; (iv) The availability of employment in the geographic area in which the parent resides; (v) The prevailing wage and salary levels in the geographic area in which the parent resides; (vi) The parent's special skills and training; (vii) Whether there is evidence that the parent has the ability to earn the imputed income; (viii) The age and special needs of the child for whom child support is being calculated under this section; (ix) The parent's increased earning capacity because of experience; (x) The parent's decreased earning capacity because of a felony conviction; (xi) Any other relevant factor. (b) Imputed income from any nonincome-producing assets of a parent, as determined from the local passbook savings rate or another appropriate rate as determined by the court or agency, not to exceed the rate of interest specified in division (A) of section 1343.03 of the Revised Code, if the income is significant. (19) "Schedule" means the basic child support schedule created pursuant to section 3119.021 of the Revised Code. (20) "Self-generated income" means gross receipts received by a parent from self-employment, proprietorship of a business, joint ownership of a partnership or closely held corporation, and rents minus ordinary and necessary expenses incurred by the parent in generating the gross receipts. "Self-generated income" includes expense reimbursements or in-kind payments received by a parent from self-employment, the operation of a business, or rents, including company cars, free housing, reimbursed meals, and other benefits, if the reimbursements are significant and reduce personal living expenses. (21) "Self-sufficiency reserve" means the minimal amount necessary for an obligor to adequately subsist upon, as determined under section 3119.021 of the Revised Code. (22) "Split parental rights and responsibilities" means a situation in which there is more than one child who is the subject of an allocation of parental rights and responsibilities and each parent is the residential parent and legal custodian of at least one of those children. (23) "Worksheet" means the applicable worksheet created in rules adopted under section 3119.022 of the Revised Code that is used to calculate a parent's child support obligation. Sec. 3121.441. (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter, Chapters 3119., 3123., and 3125., and sections 3770.071 and 5107.20 of the Revised Code providing for the office of child support in the department of job and family services to collect, withhold, or deduct spousal support, when a court pursuant to section 3105.18 or 3105.65 of the Revised Code issues or modifies an order requiring an obligor to pay spousal support or grants or modifies a decree of dissolution of marriage incorporating a separation agreement that provides for spousal support, or at any time after the issuance, granting, or modification of an order or decree of that type, the court may permit the obligor to make the spousal support payments directly to the obligee instead of to the office if the obligee and the obligor have no minor children born as a result of their marriage and the obligee has not assigned the spousal support amounts to the department pursuant to section 5107.20 or 5160.38 of the Revised Code. (B) A court that permits an obligor to make spousal support payments directly to the obligee pursuant to division (A) of this section shall order the obligor to make the spousal support payments as a check, as a money order, or in any other form that establishes a clear record of payment. (C) If a court permits an obligor to make spousal support payments directly to an obligee pursuant to division (A) of this section and the obligor is in default in making any spousal support payment to the obligee, the court, upon motion of the obligee or on its own motion, may rescind the permission granted under that division. After the rescission, the court shall determine the amount of arrearages in the spousal support payments and order the obligor to make to the office of child support in the department of job and family services any spousal support payments that are in arrears and any future spousal support payments. Upon the issuance of the order of the court under this division, the provisions of this chapter, Chapters 3119., 3123., and 3125., and sections 3770.071, 3770.074, and 5107.20 of the Revised Code apply with respect to the collection, withholding, or deduction of the obligor's spousal support payments that are the subject of that order of the court. Sec. 3123.89. (A) The department of job and family services shall develop and implement a real time data match program with the state lottery commission and its lottery sales agents and lottery agents to identify obligors who are subject to a final and enforceable determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon the data match program's implementation, the department, in consultation with the commission, shall promulgate rules to facilitate withholding, in appropriate circumstances and in accordance with section sections 3770.071 and 3770.074 of the Revised Code, by the commission or its lottery sales agents or lottery agents of an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due support owed by an obligor from a lottery prize award owed to the obligor up to the amount of the award. The rules shall describe an expedited method for withholding, and the time frame for transmission of the amount withheld to the department. (C) As used in this section, "lottery : (1) "Lottery prize award" has the same meaning as in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code includes a prize award from a video lottery terminal but does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except for winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (2) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code. (3) "Video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3123.90. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Casino facility," "casino operator," and "management company" have the meanings defined in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Sports gaming proprietor" has the meaning defined in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of job and family services shall develop and implement a real time data match program with each casino facility's casino operator or management company and with each sports gaming proprietor to identify obligors who are subject to a final and enforceable determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. (C) Upon Subject to division (E) of this section, upon the data match program's implementation, if a person receives a payout of winnings at a casino facility or from sports gaming in an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, the casino operator, management company, or sports gaming proprietor shall refer to the data match program to determine if the person entitled to the winnings is in default under a support order. If the data match program indicates that the person is in default, the casino operator, management company, or sports gaming proprietor shall withhold from the person's winnings an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due support owed by the obligor identified in the data match up to the amount of the winnings. (D) Not later than fourteen days after withholding the amount, the casino operator, management company, or sports gaming proprietor shall electronically transmit any amount withheld to the department as payment on the support obligation. (E) A sports gaming proprietor that offers lottery sports gaming through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code shall not withhold amounts under this section from winnings from wagers placed through that terminal. The state lottery commission shall withhold amounts from those winnings under section 3770.071 of the Revised Code. (F) The department, in consultation with the Ohio casino control commission, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as are necessary for implementation of this section. Sec. 3301.01. (A) There is hereby created the state board of education consisting of nineteen members with eleven elected members, one each to be elected in accordance with section 3301.03 of the Revised Code from each of the districts established in accordance with division (B) of this section, and with eightfive members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. In addition to the nineteen elected or appointed members, the chairperson of the committee of the senate that primarily deals with education and the chairperson of the committee of the house of representatives that primarily deals with education shall be nonvoting ex officio members of the board. (B)(1) The territory of each state board of education district for each elected voting member of the board shall consist of the territory of three contiguous senate districts as established in the most recent apportionment for members of the general assembly, but the territory of no senate district shall be part of the territory of more than one state board of education district. Each state board of education district shall be as compact as practicable. The districts shall include, when practicable, some districts that primarily consist of territory in rural areas and some districts that primarily consist of territory in urban areas. (2) If, after the apportionment for members of the general assembly is made in any year, the general assembly does not during that year enact legislation establishing state board of education districts in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section, the governor shall designate the boundaries of the districts in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section no later than the thirty-first day of January of the year next succeeding such apportionment. Upon making such designation, the governor shall give written notice of the boundaries of the districts to each member of the state board of education, including the nonvoting ex officio members; the superintendent of public instruction; the director of education and workforce; the president of the senate; the speaker of the house of representatives; and the board of elections of each county in each new district. On the first day of February in any year in which the governor designates the boundaries of state board of education districts under this section, the state board of education districts as they existed prior to that date shall cease to exist and the new districts shall be created. Sec. 3301.02. (A) Elected voting members of the state board of education shall be elected as required by expiration of respective terms, each for a term of four years or until a successor is elected and qualified. One elected member shall be elected from each district respectively in which the term of office of a board member expires on the first day of January following the election. The term of office of each member so elected shall begin on the first day of January immediately following this election. (B) At any time the boundaries of state board of education districts are changed under division (B) of section 3301.01 of the Revised Code, a member of the state board whose term will not expire within two years of the time the change in boundaries is made shall represent, for the remainder of the term for which the member was elected, the state board district containing the largest portion of the population of the district from which the member was elected. If more than one member whose term will not so expire would represent the same district under the provisions of this section, either the general assembly, if the general assembly enacted legislation establishing those districts under division (B)(2) of section 3301.01 of the Revised Code, or the governor, if the governor designated the bounderies of the districts under that division, shall designate which member shall represent each district for the balance of the members' terms. (C) Appointed voting membersMembers of the board shall serve four-year terms beginning the first day of January and ending on the thirty-first day of December. Except as provided in division (D) of this section, members may be reappointed. (D)(B) No person, elected or appointed, shall hold the office of member of the state board of education for a period of longer than two successive terms of four years. Terms shall be considered successive unless separated by a period of four or more years. Only terms beginning on or after January 1, 1996, shall be considered in determining an individual's eligibility to hold office. (C) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, members who were elected or appointed under this section as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment shall remain in office until the expiration of their current terms. Upon the expiration of the current term of elected members, all eleven elected offices shall be abolished and no successor shall be elected after the effective date of this amendment. If such elected member vacates the office prior to the expiration of the member's term, no individual shall be appointed or elected to fill that vacancy, and that office is abolished. The offices of the first three appointed members to reach the expiration of their current terms or vacate the office prior to the expiration of their current terms shall be abolished. Thereafter, the state board consists of five appointed members as prescribed under section 3301.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.03. Each elected voting member of the state board of education shall be a qualified elector residing in the territory composing the district from which the member is elected, and shall be nominated and elected to office as provided by Title XXXV of the Revised Code. (A) Each appointed voting member of the board shall be a qualified elector residing in the state. At least four of the appointed voting members shall represent rural school districts in the state, as evidenced by the member's current place of residence and at least one One member shall represent each of the following: (A) The member's children attend, or at one time attended, school in a (1) A rural school district; (B) The member's past or present occupation is associated with rural areas of the state(2) A suburban school district; (C) The member possesses other credentials or experience demonstrating knowledge and familiarity with rural(3) An urban school districtsdistrict; (4) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (5) A chartered nonpublic school. No elected or appointed voting member of the board shall, during the member's term of office, hold any other office of trust or profit or be an employee or officer of any public or private elementary or secondary school. Before entering on the duties of office, each elected and appointed voting member shall subscribe to the official oath of office. Each voting member of the state board of education shall be paid a salary fixed pursuant to division (J) of section 124.15 of the Revised Code, together with the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred while engaged in the performance of the member's official duties or in the conduct of authorized board business, and while en route to and from the member's home for such purposes. (D)(B) As used in this section only, "office of trust or profit" means: (1) A federal or state elective office or an elected office of a political subdivision of the state; (2) A position on a board or commission of the state that is appointed by the governor; (3) An office set forth in section 121.03, 121.04, or 121.05 of the Revised Code; (4) An office of the government of the United States that is appointed by the president of the United States. Sec. 3301.06. A vacancy in the state board of education may be caused by death, nonresidence, resignation, removal from office, failure of a person elected to qualify within ten days after the organization of the board or of the person's election, removal from the district of election or from residence in the state, or absence from any twothree consecutive regular meetings of the board if such absence is caused by reasons declared insufficient by a vote of twelve members of the board. When a vacancy occurs in the office of an elected member, the governor shall, within a period of thirty days and with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint a qualified person residing in the district in which the vacancy occurred to fill the vacancy until the next general election at which members of the state board of education are elected, at which time a qualified elector residing in the district in which the vacancy occurred shall be elected for the unexpired term. Such member shall assume office at the next succeeding meeting of the board for any reason. When a vacancy occurs in the office of an appointeda member, the governor shall, within a period of thirty days and with the advice and consent of the senate, appoint a qualified person, in accordance with section 3301.03 of the Revised Code, to serve the remainder of the term. Sec. 3301.071. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, in the case of nontax-supported schools, standards for teacher certification prescribed under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code shall provide for certification, without further educational requirements, of any administrator, supervisor, or teacher who has attended and received a bachelor's degree or a master's degree from a college or university accredited by a national or regional association in the United States except that, at the discretion of the state board of education, this requirement may be met by having an equivalent degree from a foreign college or university of comparable standing. (2) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, in the case of nonchartered, nontax-supported schools, the standards for teacher certification prescribed under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code shall provide for certification, without further educational requirements, of any administrator, supervisor, or teacher who has attended and received a diploma from a "bible college" or "bible institute" described in division (E) of section 1713.02 of the Revised Code. (3) A certificate issued under division (A)(3) of this section shall be valid only for teaching foreign language, music, religion, computer technology, or fine arts. Notwithstanding division (A)(1) of this section and except as provided in division (E) of this section, the standards for teacher certification prescribed under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code shall provide for certification of a person as a teacher upon receipt by the state board of an affidavit signed by the chief administrative officer of a chartered nonpublic school seeking to employ the person, stating that the person meets one of the following conditions: (a) The person has specialized knowledge, skills, or expertise that qualifies the person to provide instruction. (b) The person has provided to the chief administrative officer evidence of at least three years of teaching experience in a public or nonpublic school. (c) The person has provided to the chief administrative officer evidence of completion of a teacher training program named in the affidavit. (B) Each person applying for a certificate under this section for purposes of serving in a nonpublic school chartered by the director of education and workforce under section 3301.16 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee in the amount established under division (A)(B) of section 3319.51 of the Revised Code. Any fees received under this division shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the state board of education certification fund established under division (B) of section 3319.51 occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. (C) A person applying for or holding any certificate pursuant to this section for purposes of serving in a nonpublic school chartered by the director is subject to sections 3123.41 to 3123.50 of the Revised Code and any applicable rules adopted under section 3123.63 of the Revised Code and sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code. (D) Divisions (B) and (C) of this section and sections 3319.291, 3319.31, and 3319.311 of the Revised Code do not apply to any administrators, supervisors, or teachers in nonchartered, nontax-supported schools. (E) The state board shall issue a certificate to serve in a nonpublic school as an administrator, supervisor, or teacher in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a certificate in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a nonpublic school administrator, supervisor, or teacher in a state that does not issue one or more of those certificates. Sec. 3301.074. (A) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, the state board of education shall, by rule adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, establish standards for licensing school district treasurers and business managers, for the renewal of such licenses, and for the issuance of duplicate copies of licenses. Licenses of the following types shall be issued or renewed by the board to applicants who meet the standards for the license or the renewal of the license for which application is made: (1) Treasurer, valid for serving as treasurer of a school district in accordance with section 3313.22 of the Revised Code; (2) Business manager, valid for serving as business manager of a school district in accordance with section 3319.03 of the Revised Code. (B) Each application for a license or renewal or duplicate copy of a license shall be accompanied by the payment of a fee in the amount established under division (A)(B) of section 3319.51 of the Revised Code. Any fees received under this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the state board of education licensure fund established under division (B) of section 3319.51 occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. (C) Any person employed under section 3313.22 of the Revised Code as a treasurer on July 1, 1983, shall be considered to meet the standards for licensure as a treasurer and for renewal of such license. Any person employed under section 3319.03 of the Revised Code as a business manager on July 1, 1983, shall be considered to meet the standards for licensure as a business manager and for renewal of such license. (D) Any person applying for or holding any license pursuant to this section is subject to sections 3123.41 to 3123.50 of the Revised Code and any applicable rules adopted under section 3123.63 of the Revised Code and sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code. (E) The state board shall issue a license to act as a school district treasurer or business manager in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a school district treasurer or business manager in a state that does not issue one of those licenses or both. Sec. 3301.079. (A)(1) The department of education and workforce periodically shall adopt statewide academic standards with emphasis on coherence, focus, and essential knowledge and that are more challenging and demanding when compared to international standards for each of grades kindergarten through twelve in English language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies. (a) The department shall ensure that the standards do all of the following: (i) Include the essential academic content and skills that students are expected to know and be able to do at each grade level that will allow each student to be prepared for postsecondary instruction and the workplace for success in the twenty-first century; (ii) Include the development of skill sets that promote information, media, and technological literacy; (iii) Include interdisciplinary, project-based, real-world learning opportunities; (iv) Instill life-long learning by providing essential knowledge and skills based in the liberal arts tradition, as well as science, technology, engineering, mathematics, and career-technical education; (v) Be clearly written, transparent, and understandable by parents, educators, and the general public. (b) The department shall incorporate into the social studies standards for grades four to twelve academic content regarding the original texts of the Declaration of Independence, the Northwest Ordinance, the Constitution of the United States and its amendments, with emphasis on the Bill of Rights, and the Ohio Constitution, and their original context. The department shall revise the model curricula and achievement assessments adopted under divisions (B) and (C) of this section as necessary to reflect the additional American history and American government content. The department shall make available a list of suggested grade-appropriate supplemental readings that place the documents prescribed by this division in their historical context, which teachers may use as a resource to assist students in reading the documents within that context. (c) When the department adopts or revises academic content standards in social studies, American history, American government, or science under division (A)(1) of this section, it shall develop such standards independently and not as part of a multistate consortium. (2)(a) After completing the standards required by division (A)(1) of this section, the department shall adopt standards and model curricula for instruction in technology, financial literacy and entrepreneurship, fine arts, and foreign language for grades kindergarten through twelve. The standards shall meet the same requirements prescribed in division (A)(1)(a) of this section. (b) The department shall incorporate into the standards and model curriculum for financial literacy and entrepreneurship for grades nine through twelve academic content regarding free market capitalism. The academic content shall include all of the following concepts related to free market capitalism: (i) Raw materials, labor, and capital, the three classical factors of economic production, are privately owned. (ii) Individuals control their own ability to work, earn wages, and obtain skills to earn and increase wages. (iii) Private ownership of capital may include a sole proprietorship, a family business, a publicly traded corporation, a group of private investors, or a bank. (iv) Markets aggregate the exchange of goods and services throughout the world. Market prices are the only way to convey so much constantly changing information about the supply of goods and services, and the demand for them, for consumers and producers to make informed economic decisions for themselves. (v) Wealth is created by providing goods and services that people value at a profit, and both sellers and buyers seek to profit in some way in a free market transaction. Thus, profit earned through transactions can be consumed, saved, reinvested in the business, or dispersed to shareholders. (vi) Wealth creation involves asset value appreciation and depreciation, voluntary exchange of equity ownership, and open and closed markets. (vii) The free market is driven by, and tends to produce, entrepreneurship and innovation. (viii) The free market can include side effects and market failures where at least part of the cost of the transaction, including producing, transporting, selling, or buying, is born by others outside of the transaction. (ix) The political features of the free market, including legally protected property rights, legally enforceable contracts, patent protections, and the mitigation of side effects and market failures; (x) Societies that embrace the free market often embrace political and personal freedom as well. (3) The department shall adopt the most recent standards developed by the national association for sport and physical education for physical education in grades kindergarten through twelve or shall adopt its own standards for physical education in those grades and revise and update them periodically. The department shall employ a full-time physical education coordinator to provide guidance and technical assistance to districts, community schools, and STEM schools in implementing the physical education standards adopted under this division. The director of education and workforce shall determine that the person employed as coordinator is qualified for the position, as demonstrated by possessing an adequate combination of education, license, and experience. (4) The department shall update the standards and model curriculum for instruction in computer science in grades kindergarten through twelve, which shall include standards for introductory and advanced computer science courses in grades nine through twelve. When developing the standards and curriculum, the department shall consider recommendations from computer science education stakeholder groups, including teachers and representatives from higher education, industry, computer science organizations in Ohio, and national computer science organizations. Any district or school may utilize the computer science standards or model curriculum or any part thereof adopted pursuant to division (A)(4) of this section. However, no district or school shall be required to utilize all or any part of the standards or curriculum. (5) When academic standards have been completed for any subject area required by this section, the department shall inform all school districts, all community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, all STEM schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, and all nonpublic schools required to administer the assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code of the content of those standards. Additionally, upon completion of any academic standards under this section, the department shall post those standards on the department's web site. (B)(1) The department shall adopt a model curriculum for instruction in each subject area for which updated academic standards are required by division (A)(1) of this section and for each of grades kindergarten through twelve that is sufficient to meet the needs of students in every community. The model curriculum shall be aligned with the standards, to ensure that the academic content and skills specified for each grade level are taught to students, and shall demonstrate vertical articulation and emphasize coherence, focus, and rigor. When any model curriculum has been completed, the department shall inform all school districts, community schools, and STEM schools of the content of that model curriculum. (2) The department, in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall adopt model curricula for grades kindergarten through twelve that embed career connection learning strategies into regular classroom instruction. (3) All school districts, community schools, and STEM schools may utilize the state standards and the model curriculum established by the department, together with other relevant resources, examples, or models to ensure that students have the opportunity to attain the academic standards. Upon request, the department shall provide technical assistance to any district, community school, or STEM school in implementing the model curriculum. Nothing in this section requires any school district to utilize all or any part of a model curriculum developed under this section. (C) The department shall develop achievement assessments aligned with the academic standards and model curriculum for each of the subject areas and grade levels required by divisions (A)(1) and (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. When any achievement assessment has been completed, the department shall inform all school districts, community schools, STEM schools, and nonpublic schools required to administer the assessment of its completion, and the department shall make the achievement assessment available to the districts and schools. (D)(1) The Not later than June 30, 2026, the department shall adopt do both of the following: (a) Adopt a diagnostic assessment aligned with the academic standards and model curriculum for each of grades one and two kindergarten to three in reading, writing, and mathematics and for grade three in reading and writing. The ; (b) Approve a list of up to five diagnostic assessments aligned with the academic standards for each of grades kindergarten to three for both reading and mathematics. The department's list of approved diagnostic assessments for reading shall include the three reading diagnostic assessments that were approved by the department for use as comparable tools for purposes of division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to the effective date of this amendment, and are most widely used by public schools in the state. (2) Each diagnostic assessment adopted or approved under division (D)(1) of this section shall be designed to measure student comprehension of academic content and mastery of related skills for the relevant subject area and grade level. The diagnostic assessment for reading shall be designed to measure student comprehension of foundational reading skills aligned to the science of reading. Any diagnostic assessment adopted by the department shall not include components to identify gifted students. Blank copies of diagnostic assessments shall be public records. (2) When each diagnostic assessment has been completed, the department shall inform all school districts of its completion and make the diagnostic assessment available to the districts at no cost to the district. (3) School districts shall administer the a diagnostic assessment in reading and mathematics adopted or approved by the department pursuant to section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code beginning the first in the 2026-2027 school year following the development of the assessment. However, beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, both of the following shall apply: (a) In the case of the diagnostic assessments for grades one or two in writing or mathematics or for grade three in writing, a school district shall not be required to administer any such assessment, but may do so at the discretion of the district board; (b) In the case of any diagnostic assessment that is not for the grade levels and subject areas specified in division (D)(3)(a) of this section, each school district shall administer the assessment in the manner prescribed by section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code. (E) The department shall not adopt a diagnostic or achievement assessment for any grade level or subject area other than those specified in this section. (F) Whenever the department consults with persons for the purpose of drafting or reviewing any standards, diagnostic assessments, achievement assessments, or model curriculum required under this section, the department shall first consult with parents of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade and with active Ohio classroom teachers, other school personnel, and administrators with expertise in the appropriate subject area. Whenever practicable, the department shall consult with teachers recognized as outstanding in their fields. If the department contracts with more than one outside entity for the development of the achievement assessments required by this section, the department shall ensure the interchangeability of those assessments. (G) Whenever the department adopts standards or model curricula under this section, the department also shall provide information on the use of blended, online, or digital learning in the delivery of the standards or curricula to students in accordance with division (A)(5) of this section. (H) The fairness sensitivity review committee of the department shall not allow any question on any achievement or diagnostic assessment developed under this section or any proficiency test prescribed by former section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to September 11, 2001, to include, be written to promote, or inquire as to individual moral or social values or beliefs. The decision of the committee shall be final. This section does not create a private cause of action. (I) Not later than sixty days prior to the adoption of updated academic standards under division (A)(1) of this section or updated model curricula under division (B)(1) of this section, the director of education and workforce shall present the academic standards or model curricula, as applicable, in person at a public hearing of the respective committees of the house of representatives and senate that consider education legislation. (J) As used in this section: (1) "Blended learning" means the delivery of instruction in a combination of time primarily in a supervised physical location away from home and online delivery whereby the student has some element of control over time, place, path, or pace of learning and includes noncomputer-based learning opportunities. (2) "Online learning" means students work primarily from their residences on assignments delivered via an internet- or other computer-based instructional method. (3) "Coherence" means a reflection of the structure of the discipline being taught. (4) "Digital learning" means learning facilitated by technology that gives students some element of control over time, place, path, or pace of learning. (5) "Focus" means limiting the number of items included in a curriculum to allow for deeper exploration of the subject matter. (6) "Vertical articulation" means key academic concepts and skills associated with mastery in particular content areas should be articulated and reinforced in a developmentally appropriate manner at each grade level so that over time students acquire a depth of knowledge and understanding in the core academic disciplines. Sec. 3301.0711. (A) The department of education and workforce shall: (1) Annually furnish to, grade, and score all assessments required by divisions (A)(1) and (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to be administered by city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, except that each district shall score any assessment administered pursuant to division (B)(10) of this section. Each assessment so furnished shall include the data verification code of the student to whom the assessment will be administered, as assigned pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. In furnishing the practice versions of Ohio graduation tests prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, the department shall make the tests available on its web site for reproduction by districts. In awarding contracts for grading assessments, the department shall give preference to Ohio-based entities employing Ohio residents. (2) Adopt rules for the ethical use of assessments and prescribing the manner in which the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall be administered to students. (B) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (J) of this section, the board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall, in accordance with rules adopted under division (A) of this section: (1) Administer the English language arts assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code twice annually to all students in the third grade who have not attained the score designated for that assessment under division (A)(2)(c) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. (2) Administer the mathematics assessment prescribed under division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the third grade. (3) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the fourth grade. (4) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(c) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the fifth grade. (5) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(d) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the sixth grade. (6) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(e) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the seventh grade. (7) Administer the assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least once annually to all students in the eighth grade. (8) Except as provided in division (B)(9) of this section, administer any assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as follows: (a) At least once annually to all tenth grade students and at least twice annually to all students in eleventh or twelfth grade who have not yet attained the score on that assessment designated under that division; (b) To any person who has successfully completed the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the person by any high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code but has not received a high school diploma and who requests to take such assessment, at any time such assessment is administered in the district. (9) In lieu of the board of education of any city, local, or exempted village school district in which the student is also enrolled, the board of a joint vocational school district shall administer any assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code at least twice annually to any student enrolled in the joint vocational school district who has not yet attained the score on that assessment designated under that division. A board of a joint vocational school district may also administer such an assessment to any student described in division (B)(8)(b) of this section. (10) If the district has a three-year average graduation rate of not more than seventy-five per cent, administer each assessment prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in September to all ninth grade students who entered ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014. Except as provided in section 3313.614 of the Revised Code for administration of an assessment to a person who has fulfilled the curriculum requirement for a high school diploma but has not passed one or more of the required assessments, the assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall not be administered after the date specified in the rules adopted under division (D)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (11)(a) Except as provided in divisions (B)(11)(b) and (c) of this section, administer the assessments prescribed by division (B)(2) of section 3301.0710 and section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in accordance with the timeline and plan for implementation of those assessments prescribed by rule adopted under division (D)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (b) A student who has presented evidence to the district or school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. However, no board shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (c) A student shall not be required to retake the Algebra I end-of-course examination or the English language arts II end-of-course examination prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in grades nine through twelve if the student demonstrates at least a proficient level of skill, as prescribed under division (B)(5)(a) of that section, or achieves a competency score, as prescribed under division (B)(10) of that section, in an administration of the examination prior to grade nine. (C)(1)(a) In the case of a student receiving special education services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the individualized education program developed for the student under that chapter shall specify the manner in which the student will participate in the assessments administered under this section, except that a student with significant cognitive disabilities to whom an alternate assessment is administered in accordance with division (C)(1) of this section and a student determined to have a disability that includes an intellectual disability as outlined in guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. The individualized education program may excuse the student from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section if it instead specifies an alternate assessment method approved by the department as conforming to requirements of federal law for receipt of federal funds for disadvantaged pupils. To the extent possible, the individualized education program shall not excuse the student from taking an assessment unless no reasonable accommodation can be made to enable the student to take the assessment. No board shall prohibit a student who is not required to take an assessment under division (C)(1) of this section from taking the assessment. (b) Any alternate assessment approved by the department for a student under this division shall produce measurable results comparable to those produced by the assessment it replaces in order to allow for the student's results to be included in the data compiled for a school district or building under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (c)(i) Any student enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school who has been identified, based on an evaluation conducted in accordance with section 3323.03 of the Revised Code or section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C.A. 794, as amended, as a child with a disability shall be excused from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section if either of the following apply: (I) A plan developed for the student pursuant to rules adopted by the department excuses the student from taking that assessment. (II) The chartered nonpublic school develops a written plan in which the school, in consultation with the student's parents, determines that an assessment or alternative assessment with accommodations does not accurately assess the student's academic performance. The plan shall include an academic profile of the student's academic performance and shall be reviewed annually to determine if the student's needs continue to require excusal from taking the assessment. (ii) A student with significant cognitive disabilities to whom an alternate assessment is administered in accordance with division (C)(1) of this section and a student determined to have a disability that includes an intellectual disability as outlined in guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (iii) In the case of any student so excused from taking an assessment under division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the chartered nonpublic school shall not prohibit the student from taking the assessment. (2) A district board may, for medical reasons or other good cause, excuse a student from taking an assessment administered under this section on the date scheduled, but that assessment shall be administered to the excused student not later than nine days following the scheduled date. The district board shall annually report the number of students who have not taken one or more of the assessments required by this section to the department not later than the thirtieth day of June. (3) No school district board shall excuse any English learner from taking any particular assessment required to be administered under this section, except that any English learner who has been enrolled in United States schools for less than two years and for whom no appropriate accommodations are available based on guidance issued by the department shall not be required to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. However, no board shall prohibit an English learner who is not required to take that assessment from taking the assessment. A board may permit any English learner to take an assessment required to be administered under this section with appropriate accommodations, as determined by the department. For each English learner, each school district shall annually assess that student's progress in learning English, in accordance with procedures approved by the department. The guidance and procedures issued by the department for the purposes of division (C)(3) of this section shall comply with the rules adopted under section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) The governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may excuse an English learner from taking any assessment administered under this section. (b) No governing authority shall require an English learner who has been enrolled in United States schools for less than two years and for whom no appropriate accommodations are available based on guidance issued by the department to take the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (c) No governing authority shall prohibit an English learner from taking an assessment from which the student was excused under division (C)(4) of this section. (D)(1) In the school year next succeeding the school year in which the assessments prescribed by division (A)(1) or (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or former division (A)(1), (A)(2), or (B) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to September 11, 2001, are administered to any student, the board of education of any school district in which the student is enrolled in that year shall provide to the student intervention services commensurate with the student's performance, including any intensive intervention required under section 3313.608 of the Revised Code, in any skill in which the student failed to demonstrate at least a score at the proficient level on the assessment. (2) Following any administration of the assessments prescribed by division (D) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to ninth grade students, each school district that has a three-year average graduation rate of not more than seventy-five per cent shall determine for each high school in the district whether the school shall be required to provide intervention services to any students who took the assessments. In determining which high schools shall provide intervention services based on the resources available, the district shall consider each school's graduation rate and scores on the practice assessments. The district also shall consider the scores received by ninth grade students on the English language arts and mathematics assessments prescribed under division (A)(1)(f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in the eighth grade in determining which high schools shall provide intervention services. Each high school selected to provide intervention services under this division shall provide intervention services to any student whose results indicate that the student is failing to make satisfactory progress toward being able to attain scores at the proficient level on the Ohio graduation tests. Intervention services shall be provided in any skill in which a student demonstrates unsatisfactory progress and shall be commensurate with the student's performance. Schools shall provide the intervention services prior to the end of the school year, during the summer following the ninth grade, in the next succeeding school year, or at any combination of those times. (E) Except as provided in section 3313.608 of the Revised Code and division (N) of this section, no school district board of education shall utilize any student's failure to attain a specified score on an assessment administered under this section as a factor in any decision to deny the student promotion to a higher grade level. However, a district board may choose not to promote to the next grade level any student who does not take an assessment administered under this section or make up an assessment as provided by division (C)(2) of this section and who is not exempt from the requirement to take the assessment under division (C)(3) of this section. (F) No person shall be charged a fee for taking any assessment administered under this section. (G)(1) Each school district board shall designate one location for the collection of assessments administered in the spring under division (B)(1) of this section and those administered under divisions (B)(2) to (7) of this section. Each district board shall submit the assessments to the entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessments as follows: (a) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was less than two thousand five hundred, not later than the Friday after all of the assessments have been administered; (b) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was two thousand five hundred or more, but less than seven thousand, not later than the Monday after all of the assessments have been administered; (c) If the district's total enrollment in grades kindergarten through twelve during the first full school week of October was seven thousand or more, not later than the Tuesday after all of the assessments have been administered. However, any assessment that a student takes during the make-up period described in division (C)(2) of this section shall be submitted not later than the Friday following the day the student takes the assessment. (2) The department or an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessment shall send to each school district board a list of the individual scores of all persons taking a state achievement assessment as follows: (a) Except as provided in division (G)(2)(b) or (c) of this section, within forty-five days after the administration of the assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the thirtieth day of June following the administration; (b) In the case of the third-grade English language arts assessment, within forty-five days after the administration of that assessment, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the fifteenth day of June following the administration; (c) In the case of the writing component of an assessment or end-of-course examination in the area of English language arts, except for the third-grade English language arts assessment, the results may be sent after forty-five days of the administration of the writing component, but in no case shall the scores be returned later than the thirtieth day of June following the administration. (3) For assessments administered under this section by a joint vocational school district, the department or entity shall also send to each city, local, or exempted village school district a list of the individual scores of any students of such city, local, or exempted village school district who are attending school in the joint vocational school district. (4) Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, a school district, other public school, or chartered nonpublic school may administer the third-grade English language arts or mathematics assessment, or both, in a paper format in any school year for which the district board of education or school governing body adopts a resolution indicating that the district or school chooses to administer the assessment in a paper format. The board or governing body shall submit a copy of the resolution to the department of education and workforce not later than the first day of May prior to the school year for which it will apply. If the resolution is submitted, the district or school shall administer the assessment in a paper format to all students in the third grade, except that any student whose individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C. 794, as amended, specifies that taking the assessment in an online format is an appropriate accommodation for the student may take the assessment in an online format. (5) A classical school may administer all assessments administered under this section in a paper format, except that any student whose individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794 specifies that taking the assessment in an online format is an appropriate accommodation for the student may take the assessment in an online format. (H) Individual scores on any assessments administered under this section shall be released by a district board only in accordance with section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under division (A) of this section. No district board or its employees shall utilize individual or aggregate results in any manner that conflicts with rules for the ethical use of assessments adopted pursuant to division (A) of this section. (I) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, the department or an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring of the assessment shall not release any individual scores on any assessment administered under this section. The department shall adopt rules to ensure the protection of student confidentiality at all times. The rules may require the use of the data verification codes assigned to students pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code to protect the confidentiality of student scores. (J) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply to the board of education of any cooperative education school district except as provided under rules adopted pursuant to this division. (1) In accordance with rules that the department shall adopt, the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district with territory in a cooperative education school district established pursuant to divisions (A) to (C) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code may enter into an agreement with the board of education of the cooperative education school district for administering any assessment prescribed under this section to students of the city, exempted village, or local school district who are attending school in the cooperative education school district. (2) In accordance with rules that the department shall adopt, the board of education of any city, exempted village, or local school district with territory in a cooperative education school district established pursuant to section 3311.521 of the Revised Code shall enter into an agreement with the cooperative district that provides for the administration of any assessment prescribed under this section to both of the following: (a) Students who are attending school in the cooperative district and who, if the cooperative district were not established, would be entitled to attend school in the city, local, or exempted village school district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code; (b) Persons described in division (B)(8)(b) of this section. Any assessment of students pursuant to such an agreement shall be in lieu of any assessment of such students or persons pursuant to this section. (K)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(1) or (2) of this section, each chartered nonpublic school for which at least sixty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who are participating in state scholarship programs shall administer the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or an alternative standardized assessment determined by the department. In accordance with procedures and deadlines prescribed by the department, the parent or guardian of a student enrolled in the school who is not participating in a state scholarship program may submit notice to the chief administrative officer of the school that the parent or guardian does not wish to have the student take the assessments prescribed for the student's grade level under division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. If a parent or guardian submits an opt-out notice, the school shall not administer the assessments to that student. This option does not apply to any assessment required for a high school diploma under section 3313.612 of the Revised Code. (b) Any chartered nonpublic school that enrolls students who are participating in state scholarship programs may administer an alternative standardized assessment determined by the department instead of the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. Each chartered nonpublic school subject to division (K)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall report the results of each assessment administered under those divisions to the department. (2) A chartered nonpublic school may submit to the director of education and workforce a request for a waiver from administering the elementary assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The director shall approve or disapprove a request for a waiver submitted under division (K)(2) of this section. To be eligible to submit a request for a waiver, a chartered nonpublic school shall meet the following conditions: (a) At least ninety-five per cent of the students enrolled in the school are children with disabilities, as defined under section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, or have received a diagnosis by a school district or from a physician, including a neuropsychiatrist or psychiatrist, or a psychologist who is authorized to practice in this or another state as having a condition that impairs academic performance, such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, or Asperger's syndrome. (b) The school has solely served a student population described in division (K)(1)(a) of this section for at least ten years. (c) The school provides to the department at least five years of records of internal testing conducted by the school that affords the department data required for accountability purposes, including diagnostic assessments and nationally standardized norm-referenced achievement assessments that measure reading and math skills. (3) Any chartered nonpublic school that is not subject to division (K)(1) of this section may participate in the assessment program by administering any of the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The chief administrator of the school shall specify which assessments the school will administer. Such specification shall be made in writing to the director prior to the first day of August of any school year in which assessments are administered and shall include a pledge that the nonpublic school will administer the specified assessments in the same manner as public schools are required to do under this section and rules adopted by the department. (4) The department shall furnish the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code to each chartered nonpublic school that is subject to division (K)(1) of this section or participates under division (K)(3) of this section. (L) If a chartered nonpublic school is educating students in grades nine through twelve, the following shall apply: (1) Except as provided in division (L)(4) of this section, for a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is accredited through the independent schools association of the central states and who is attending the school under a state scholarship program, the student shall either take all of the assessments prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code or take an alternative assessment approved by the department under section 3313.619 of the Revised Code. However, a student who is excused from taking an assessment under division (C) of this section or has presented evidence to the chartered nonpublic school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. No governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (2) For a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is accredited through the independent schools association of the central states, and who is not attending the school under a state scholarship program, the student shall not be required to take any assessment prescribed under section 3301.0712 or 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (3)(a) Except as provided in divisions (L)(3)(b) and (4) of this section, for a student who is enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school that is not accredited through the independent schools association of the central states, regardless of whether the student is attending or is not attending the school under a state scholarship program, the student shall do one of the following: (i) Take all of the assessments prescribed by division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (ii) Take only the assessment prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, provided that the student's school publishes the results of that assessment for each graduating class. The published results of that assessment shall include the overall composite scores, mean scores, twenty-fifth percentile scores, and seventy-fifth percentile scores for each subject area of the assessment. (iii) Take an alternative assessment approved by the department under section 3313.619 of the Revised Code. (b) A student who is excused from taking an assessment under division (C) of this section or has presented evidence to the chartered nonpublic school of having satisfied the condition prescribed by division (A)(1) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma prior to the date of the administration of the assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code shall not be required to take that assessment. No governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school shall prohibit a student who is not required to take such assessment from taking the assessment. (4) The assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0712 and 3313.619 of the Revised Code shall not be administered to any student attending the school, if the school meets all of the following conditions: (a) At least ninety-five per cent of the students enrolled in the school are children with disabilities, as defined under section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, or have received a diagnosis by a school district or from a physician, including a neuropsychologist or psychiatrist, or a psychologist who is authorized to practice in this or another state as having a condition that impairs academic performance, such as dyslexia, dyscalculia, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, or Asperger's syndrome. (b) The school has solely served a student population described in division (L)(4)(a) of this section for at least ten years. (c) The school makes available to the department at least five years of records of internal testing conducted by the school that affords the department data required for accountability purposes, including growth in student achievement in reading or mathematics, or both, as measured by nationally norm-referenced assessments that have developed appropriate standards for students. Division (L)(4) of this section applies to any student attending such school regardless of whether the student receives special education or related services and regardless of whether the student is attending the school under a state scholarship program. (M)(1) The superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall administer the assessments described by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code for the state school for the blind and the state school for the deaf. The superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall administer the assessments in the same manner as district boards are required to do under this section and rules adopted by the department and in conformity with division (C)(1)(a) of this section. (2) The department shall furnish the assessments described by sections 3301.0710 and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code to the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services. (N) Notwithstanding division (E) of this section, a school district may use a student's failure to attain a score in at least the proficient range on the mathematics assessment described by division (A)(1)(a) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or on an assessment described by division (A)(1)(b), (c), (d), (e), or (f) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as a factor in retaining that student in the current grade level. (O)(1) In the manner specified in divisions (O)(3), and (4), (6), and (7) of this section, the assessments required by division (A)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall become public records pursuant to section 149.43 of the Revised Code on the thirty-first day of July following the school year that the assessments were administered. (2) The department may field test proposed questions with samples of students to determine the validity, reliability, or appropriateness of questions for possible inclusion in a future year's assessment. The department also may use anchor questions on assessments to ensure that different versions of the same assessment are of comparable difficulty. Field test questions and anchor questions shall not be considered in computing scores for individual students. Field test questions and anchor questions may be included as part of the administration of any assessment required by division (A)(1) or (B) of section 3301.0710 and division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (3) Any field test question or anchor question administered under division (O)(2) of this section shall not be a public record. Such field test questions and anchor questions shall be redacted from any assessments which are released as a public record pursuant to division (O)(1) of this section. (4) This division applies to the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. (a) The first administration of each assessment, as specified in former section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, shall be a public record. (b) For subsequent administrations of each assessment prior to the 2011-2012 school year, not less than forty per cent of the questions on the assessment that are used to compute a student's score shall be a public record. The department shall determine which questions will be needed for reuse on a future assessment and those questions shall not be public records and shall be redacted from the assessment prior to its release as a public record. However, for each redacted question, the department shall inform each city, local, and exempted village school district of the statewide academic standard adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code and the corresponding benchmark to which the question relates. The preceding sentence does not apply to field test questions that are redacted under division (O)(3) of this section. (c) The administrations of each assessment in the 2011-2012, 2012-2013, and 2013-2014 school years shall not be a public record. (5) Each assessment prescribed by division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall not be a public record. (6)(a) Except as provided in division (O)(6)(b) of this section, for the administrations in the 2014-2015, 2015-2016, and 2016-2017 school years, questions on the assessments prescribed under division (A) of section 3301.0710 and division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code and the corresponding preferred answers that are used to compute a student's score shall become a public record as follows: (i) Forty per cent of the questions and preferred answers on the assessments on the thirty-first day of July following the administration of the assessment; (ii) Twenty per cent of the questions and preferred answers on the assessment on the thirty-first day of July one year after the administration of the assessment; (iii) The remaining forty per cent of the questions and preferred answers on the assessment on the thirty-first day of July two years after the administration of the assessment. The entire content of an assessment shall become a public record within three years of its administration. The department shall make the questions that become a public record under this division readily accessible to the public on the department's web site. Questions on the spring administration of each assessment shall be released on an annual basis, in accordance with this division. (b) No questions and corresponding preferred answers shall become a public record under division (O)(6) of this section after July 31, 2017. (7) Division (O)(7)(O)(4) of this section applies to the assessments prescribed by division (A) of section 3301.0710 and division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the assessments administered in the spring of the 2017-2018 2025-2026 school year, not less than forty per cent of the the department shall determine which questions on each assessment that are used to compute a student's score shall be are a public record, if any. The department shall determine which questions will be needed for reuse on a future assessment and those questions shall not be public records and shall be redacted from the assessment prior to its release as a public record. However, for each redacted question, the department shall inform each city, local, and exempted village school district of the corresponding statewide academic standard adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code and the corresponding benchmark to which the question relates. The department is not required to provide corresponding standards and benchmarks to field test questions that are redacted under division (O)(3) of this section. (P) As used in this section: (1) "Three-year average" means the average of the most recent consecutive three school years of data. (2) "Dropout" means a student who withdraws from school before completing course requirements for graduation and who is not enrolled in an education program approved by the department or an education program outside the state. "Dropout" does not include a student who has departed the country. (3) "Graduation rate" means the ratio of students receiving a diploma to the number of students who entered ninth grade four years earlier. Students who transfer into the district are added to the calculation. Students who transfer out of the district for reasons other than dropout are subtracted from the calculation. If a student who was a dropout in any previous year returns to the same school district, that student shall be entered into the calculation as if the student had entered ninth grade four years before the graduation year of the graduating class that the student joins. (4) "State scholarship programs" means the educational choice scholarship pilot program established under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code, the autism scholarship program established under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program established under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code, and the pilot project scholarship program established under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (5) "Other public school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314., a STEM school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (6) "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (7) "Classical school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that is a member of the Ohio classical school association, or its successor organization, and uses a curriculum substantially similar to that of a nationally recognized classical school network. Sec. 3301.0712. (A) The department of education and workforce and the chancellor of higher education shall develop a system of college and work ready assessments as described in division (B) of this section to assess whether each student upon graduating from high school is ready to enter college or the workforce. Beginning with students who enter the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, the system shall replace the Ohio graduation tests prescribed in division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code as a measure of student academic performance and one determinant of eligibility for a high school diploma in the manner prescribed by rule adopted under division (D) of this section. (B) The college and work ready assessment system shall consist of the following: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(1)(b) of this section, nationally standardized assessments that measure college and career readiness and are used for college admission. The assessments shall be selected jointly by the department and the chancellor, and one of which shall be selected by each school district or school to administer to its students. The assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section shall be administered to all eleventh-grade students in the spring of the school year. (b) Beginning with students who enter the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2022, the parent or guardian of a student may elect not to have a nationally standardized assessment administered to that student. In that event, the student's school district or school shall not administer the nationally standardized assessment to that student. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(b) of this section, seven end-of-course examinations, one in each of the areas of English language arts I, English language arts II, science, Algebra I, geometry, American history, and American government. The end-of-course examinations shall be selected jointly by the department and the chancellor in consultation with faculty in the appropriate subject areas at institutions of higher education of the university system of Ohio. Advanced placement examinations and international baccalaureate examinations, as prescribed under section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, in the areas of science, American history, and American government may be used as end-of-course examinations in accordance with division (B)(4)(a)(i) of this section. Final course grades for courses taken under any other advanced standing program, as prescribed under section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, in the areas of science, American history, and American government may be used in lieu of end-of-course examinations in accordance with division (B)(4)(a)(ii) of this section. (b) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, five end-of-course examinations, one in each areas of English language arts II, science, Algebra I, American history, and American government. However, only the end-of-course examinations in English language arts II and Algebra I shall be required for graduation. The department shall, as necessary to implement division (B)(2)(b) of this section, seek a waiver from the United States secretary of education for testing requirements prescribed under federal law to allow for the use and implementation of Algebra I as the primary assessment of high school mathematics. If the department does not receive a waiver under this division, the end-of-course examinations for students described in division (B)(2)(b) of this section also shall include an end-of-course examination in the area of geometry. However, the geometry end-of-course examination shall not be required for graduation. (3) The end-of-course examinations in American history and American government shall require demonstration of mastery of the American history and American government content for social studies standards adopted under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code and the topics required under division (M) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. At least twenty per cent of the end-of-course examination in American government shall address the topics on American history and American government described in division (M) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, both of the following shall apply: (i) If a student is enrolled in an appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate course, that student shall take the advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination in lieu of the science, American history, or American government end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. The department shall specify the score levels for each advanced placement examination and international baccalaureate examination for purposes of calculating the minimum cumulative performance score that demonstrates the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma. (ii) If a student is enrolled in an appropriate course under any other advanced standing program, as described in section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, that student shall not be required to take the science, American history, or American government end-of-course examination, whichever is applicable, prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. Instead, that student's final course grade shall be used in lieu of the applicable end-of-course examination prescribed under that section. The department, in consultation with the chancellor, shall adopt guidelines for purposes of calculating the corresponding final course grades that demonstrate the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma. Division (B)(4)(a)(ii) of this section shall apply only to courses for which students receive transcripted credit, as defined in section 3365.01 of the Revised Code. It shall not apply to remedial or developmental courses. (b) No student shall take a substitute examination or examination prescribed under division (B)(4)(a) of this section in place of the end-of-course examinations in English language arts I, English language arts II, Algebra I, or geometry prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. (c) The department shall consider additional assessments that may be used as substitute examinations in lieu of the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section. (5) The department shall do all of the following: (a) Determine and designate at least five ranges of scores on each of the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section, and substitute examinations prescribed under division (B)(4) of this section. Not later than sixty days after the designation of ranges of scores, the director of education and workforce shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider primary and secondary education legislation regarding the designated range of scores. Each range of scores shall be considered to demonstrate a level of achievement so that any student attaining a score within such range has achieved one of the following: (i) An advanced level of skill; (ii) An accomplished level of skill; (iii) A proficient level of skill; (iv) A basic level of skill; (v) A limited level of skill. (b) Determine a method by which to calculate a cumulative performance score based on the results of a student's end-of-course examinations or substitute examinations; (c) Determine the minimum cumulative performance score that demonstrates the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma under division (A)(2) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. However, no new minimum cumulative performance score shall be determined after October 17, 2019. (d) Develop a table of corresponding score equivalents for the end-of-course examinations and substitute examinations in order to calculate student performance consistently across the different examinations. A score of two on an advanced placement examination or a score of two or three on an international baccalaureate examination shall be considered equivalent to a proficient level of skill as specified under division (B)(5)(a)(iii) of this section. (6)(a) A student who meets both of the following conditions shall not be required to take an end-of-course examination: (i) The student received high school credit prior to July 1, 2015, for a course for which the end-of-course examination is prescribed. (ii) The examination was not available for administration prior to July 1, 2015. Receipt of credit for the course described in division (B)(6)(a)(i) of this section shall satisfy the requirement to take the end-of-course examination. A student exempted under division (B)(6)(a) of this section may take the applicable end-of-course examination at a later date. (b) For purposes of determining whether a student who is exempt from taking an end-of-course examination under division (B)(6)(a) of this section has attained the cumulative score prescribed by division (B)(5)(c) of this section, such student shall select either of the following: (i) The student is considered to have attained a proficient score on the end-of-course examination from which the student is exempt; (ii) The student's final course grade shall be used in lieu of a score on the end-of-course examination from which the student is exempt. The department, in consultation with the chancellor, shall adopt guidelines for purposes of calculating the corresponding final course grades and the minimum cumulative performance score that demonstrates the level of academic achievement necessary to earn a high school diploma. (7)(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the department may replace the algebra I end-of-course examination prescribed under division (B)(2) of this section with an algebra II end-of-course examination, beginning with the 2016-2017 school year for students who enter ninth grade on or after July 1, 2016. (b) If the department replaces the algebra I end-of-course examination with an algebra II end-of-course examination as authorized under division (B)(7)(a) of this section, both of the following shall apply: (i) A student who is enrolled in an advanced placement or international baccalaureate course in algebra II shall take the advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination in lieu of the algebra II end-of-course examination. (ii) A student who is enrolled in an algebra II course under any other advanced standing program, as described in section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, shall not be required to take the algebra II end-of-course examination. Instead, that student's final course grade shall be used in lieu of the examination. (c) If a school district or school utilizes an integrated approach to mathematics instruction, the district or school may do either or both of the following: (i) Administer an integrated mathematics I end-of-course examination in lieu of the prescribed algebra I end-of-course examination; (ii) Administer an integrated mathematics II end-of-course examination in lieu of the prescribed geometry end-of-course examination. (8)(a) For students entering the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2015, the assessment in the area of science shall be physical science or biology. For students entering the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2015, the assessment in the area of science shall be biology. (b) Until July 1, 2019, the department shall make available the end-of-course examination in physical science for students who entered the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2015, and who wish to retake the examination. (c) The department shall adopt rules prescribing the requirements for the end-of-course examination in science for students who entered the ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2015, and who have not met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code by July 1, 2019, due to a student's failure to satisfy division (A)(2) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (9) The department shall not develop or administer an end-of-course examination in the area of world history. (10) The department, in consultation with the chancellor and the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall determine a competency score for both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations for the purpose of graduation eligibility. (C) The department shall convene a group of national experts, state experts, and local practitioners to provide advice, guidance, and recommendations for the alignment of standards and model curricula to the assessments and in the design of the end-of-course examinations prescribed by this section. (D) Upon completion of the development of the assessment system, the department shall adopt rules prescribing all of the following: (1) A timeline and plan for implementation of the assessment system, including a phased implementation if the department determines such a phase-in is warranted; (2) The date after which a person shall meet the requirements of the entire assessment system as a prerequisite for a diploma of adult education under section 3313.611 of the Revised Code; (3) Whether and the extent to which a person may be excused from an American history end-of-course examination and an American government end-of-course examination under division (H) of section 3313.61 and division (B)(3) of section 3313.612 of the Revised Code; (4) The date after which a person who has fulfilled the curriculum requirement for a diploma but has not passed one or more of the required assessments at the time the person fulfilled the curriculum requirement shall meet the requirements of the entire assessment system as a prerequisite for a high school diploma under division (B) of section 3313.614 of the Revised Code; (5) The extent to which the assessment system applies to students enrolled in a dropout recovery and prevention and recovery program for purposes of division (F) of section 3313.603 and or a dropout prevention and recovery community school under section 3314.36 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Any person enrolled in a nonchartered nonpublic school or any person who is exempt from attendance at school for the purpose of home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code may choose to participate in the system of assessments administered under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section. However, no such person shall be required to participate in the system of assessments. (2) The department shall adopt rules for the administration and scoring of any assessments under division (E)(1) of this section. (F) The department shall select at least one nationally recognized job skills assessment. Each school district shall administer that assessment to those students who opt to take it. The department shall reimburse a school district for the costs of administering that assessment. The department shall establish the minimum score a student must attain on the job skills assessment in order to demonstrate a student's workforce readiness and employability. The administration of the job skills assessment to a student under this division shall not exempt a school district from administering the assessments prescribed in division (B) of this section to that student. Sec. 3301.0714. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules for a statewide education management information system. The rules shall require the department to establish guidelines for the establishment and maintenance of the system in accordance with this section and the rules adopted under this section. The guidelines shall include: (1) Standards identifying and defining the types of data in the system in accordance with divisions (B) and (C) of this section; (2) Procedures for annually collecting and reporting the data to the department in accordance with division (D) of this section; (3) Procedures for annually compiling the data in accordance with division (G) of this section; (4) Procedures for annually reporting the data to the public in accordance with division (H) of this section; (5) Standards to provide strict safeguards to protect the confidentiality of personally identifiable student data. (B) The guidelines adopted under this section shall require the data maintained in the education management information system to include at least the following: (1) Student participation and performance data, for each grade in each school district as a whole and for each grade in each school building in each school district, that includes: (a) The numbers of students receiving each category of instructional service offered by the school district, such as regular education instruction, vocational education instruction, specialized instruction programs or enrichment instruction that is part of the educational curriculum, instruction for gifted students, instruction for students with disabilities, and remedial instruction. The guidelines shall require instructional services under this division to be divided into discrete categories if an instructional service is limited to a specific subject, a specific type of student, or both, such as regular instructional services in mathematics, remedial reading instructional services, instructional services specifically for students gifted in mathematics or some other subject area, or instructional services for students with a specific type of disability. The categories of instructional services required by the guidelines under this division shall be the same as the categories of instructional services used in determining cost units pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section. (b) The numbers of students receiving support or extracurricular services for each of the support services or extracurricular programs offered by the school district, such as counseling services, health services, and extracurricular sports and fine arts programs. The categories of services required by the guidelines under this division shall be the same as the categories of services used in determining cost units pursuant to division (C)(4)(a) of this section. (c) Average student grades in each subject in grades nine through twelve; (d) Academic achievement levels as assessed under sections 3301.0710, 3301.0711, and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (e) The number of students designated as having a disabling condition pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (f) The numbers of students reported to the department pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code; (g) Attendance rates and the average daily attendance for the year. For purposes of this division, a student shall be counted as present for any field trip that is approved by the school administration. (h) Expulsion rates; (i) Suspension rates; (j) Dropout rates; (k) Rates of retention in grade; (l) For pupils in grades nine through twelve, the average number of carnegie units, as calculated in accordance with the director's rules; (m) Graduation rates, to be calculated in a manner specified by the department that reflects the rate at which students who were in the ninth grade three years prior to the current year complete school and that is consistent with nationally accepted reporting requirements; (n) Results of diagnostic assessments administered to kindergarten students as required underdescribed in division (A)(1) of section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code to permit a comparison of the academic readiness of kindergarten students. However, no district shall be required to report to the department the results of any diagnostic assessment administered to a kindergarten student, except for the language and reading assessment described in division (A)(2) of section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code, if the parent of that student requests the district not to report those results. ; (o) The number of students earning each state diploma seal included in the system prescribed under division (A) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code; (p) The number of students demonstrating competency for graduation using each option described in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (d) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code; (q) The number of students completing each foundational and supporting option as part of the demonstration of competency for graduation pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code; (r) The number of students enrolled in all-day kindergarten, as defined in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code. (2) Personnel and classroom enrollment data for each school district, including: (a) The total numbers of licensed employees and nonlicensed employees and the numbers of full-time equivalent licensed employees and nonlicensed employees providing each category of instructional service, instructional support service, and administrative support service used pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require these categories of data to be maintained for the school district as a whole and, wherever applicable, for each grade in the school district as a whole, for each school building as a whole, and for each grade in each school building. (b) The total number of employees and the number of full-time equivalent employees providing each category of service used pursuant to divisions (C)(4)(a) and (b) of this section, and the total numbers of licensed employees and nonlicensed employees and the numbers of full-time equivalent licensed employees and nonlicensed employees providing each category used pursuant to division (C)(4)(c) of this section. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require these categories of data to be maintained for the school district as a whole and, wherever applicable, for each grade in the school district as a whole, for each school building as a whole, and for each grade in each school building. (c) The total number of regular classroom teachers teaching classes of regular education and the average number of pupils enrolled in each such class, in each of grades kindergarten through five in the district as a whole and in each school building in the school district. (d) The number of lead teachers employed by each school district and each school building. (3)(a) Student demographic data for each school district, including information regarding the gender ratio of the school district's pupils, the racial make-up of the school district's pupils, the number of English learners in the district, and an appropriate measure of the number of the school district's pupils who reside in economically disadvantaged households. The demographic data shall be collected in a manner to allow correlation with data collected under division (B)(1) of this section. Categories for data collected pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section shall conform, where appropriate, to standard practices of agencies of the federal government. (b) With respect to each student entering kindergarten, whether the student previously participated in a public preschool program, a private preschool program, or a head start program, and the number of years the student participated in each of these programs. (4)(a) The core curriculum and instructional materials being used for English language arts in each of grades pre-kindergarten to five; (b) The reading intervention programs being used in each of grades pre-kindergarten to twelve. (5) Any data required to be collected pursuant to federal law. (C) The education management information system shall include cost accounting data for each district as a whole and for each school building in each school district. The guidelines adopted under this section shall require the cost data for each school district to be maintained in a system of mutually exclusive cost units and shall require all of the costs of each school district to be divided among the cost units. The guidelines shall require the system of mutually exclusive cost units to include at least the following: (1) Administrative costs for the school district as a whole. The guidelines shall require the cost units under this division (C)(1) to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil in enrolled ADM in the school district, as determined pursuant to section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Administrative costs for each school building in the school district. The guidelines shall require the cost units under this division (C)(2) to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per full-time equivalent pupil receiving instructional or support services in each building. (3) Instructional services costs for each category of instructional service provided directly to students and required by guidelines adopted pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of this section. The guidelines shall require the cost units under division (C)(3) of this section to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in the school district as a whole and average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in each building in the school district and in terms of a total cost for each category of service and, as a breakdown of the total cost, a cost for each of the following components: (a) The cost of each instructional services category required by guidelines adopted under division (B)(1)(a) of this section that is provided directly to students by a classroom teacher; (b) The cost of the instructional support services, such as services provided by a speech-language pathologist, classroom aide, multimedia aide, or librarian, provided directly to students in conjunction with each instructional services category; (c) The cost of the administrative support services related to each instructional services category, such as the cost of personnel that develop the curriculum for the instructional services category and the cost of personnel supervising or coordinating the delivery of the instructional services category. (4) Support or extracurricular services costs for each category of service directly provided to students and required by guidelines adopted pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of this section. The guidelines shall require the cost units under division (C)(4) of this section to be designed so that each of them may be compiled and reported in terms of average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in the school district as a whole and average expenditure per pupil receiving the service in each building in the school district and in terms of a total cost for each category of service and, as a breakdown of the total cost, a cost for each of the following components: (a) The cost of each support or extracurricular services category required by guidelines adopted under division (B)(1)(b) of this section that is provided directly to students by a licensed employee, such as services provided by a guidance counselor or any services provided by a licensed employee under a supplemental contract; (b) The cost of each such services category provided directly to students by a nonlicensed employee, such as janitorial services, cafeteria services, or services of a sports trainer; (c) The cost of the administrative services related to each services category in division (C)(4)(a) or (b) of this section, such as the cost of any licensed or nonlicensed employees that develop, supervise, coordinate, or otherwise are involved in administering or aiding the delivery of each services category. (D)(1) The guidelines adopted under this section shall require school districts to collect information about individual students, staff members, or both in connection with any data required by division (B) or (C) of this section or other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The guidelines may also require school districts to report information about individual staff members in connection with any data required by division (B) or (C) of this section or other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The guidelines shall not authorize school districts to request social security numbers of individual students. The guidelines shall prohibit the reporting under this section of a student's name, address, and social security number to the department. The guidelines shall also prohibit the reporting under this section of any personally identifiable information about any student, except for the purpose of assigning the data verification code required by division (D)(2) of this section, to any other person unless such person is employed by the school district or the information technology center operated under section 3301.075 of the Revised Code and is authorized by the district or technology center to have access to such information or is employed by an entity with which the department contracts for the scoring or the development of state assessments. The guidelines may require school districts to provide the social security numbers of individual staff members and the county of residence for a student. Nothing in this section prohibits the department from providing a student's county of residence to the department of taxation to facilitate the distribution of tax revenue. (2)(a) The guidelines shall provide for each school district or community school to assign a data verification code that is unique on a statewide basis over time to each student whose initial Ohio enrollment is in that district or school and to report all required individual student data for that student utilizing such code. The guidelines shall also provide for assigning data verification codes to all students enrolled in districts or community schools on the effective date of the guidelines established under this section. The assignment of data verification codes for other entities, as described in division (D)(2)(d) of this section, the use of those codes, and the reporting and use of associated individual student data shall be coordinated by the department of education and workforce in accordance with state and federal law. School districts shall report individual student data to the department through the information technology centers utilizing the code. The entities described in division (D)(2)(d) of this section shall report individual student data to the department in the manner prescribed by the department. (b)(i) Except as provided in sections 3301.941, 3310.11, 3310.42, 3310.63, 3313.978, 3317.20, and 5747.057 of the Revised Code, and in division (D)(2)(b)(ii) of this section, at no time shall the department have access to information that would enable any data verification code to be matched to personally identifiable student data. (ii) For the purpose of making per-pupil payments to community schools under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, the department shall have access to information that would enable any data verification code to be matched to personally identifiable student data. (c) Each school district and community school shall ensure that the data verification code is included in the student's records reported to any subsequent school district, community school, or state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, in which the student enrolls. Any such subsequent district or school shall utilize the same identifier in its reporting of data under this section. (d)(i) The director of any state agency that administers a publicly funded program providing services to children who are younger than compulsory school age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, including the directors of health, job and family services, mental health and addiction services, children and youth, and developmental disabilities, shall request and receive, pursuant to sections 3301.0723 and 5180.33 of the Revised Code, a data verification code for a child who is receiving those services. (ii) The director of developmental disabilities, director of health, director of job and family services, director of children and youth, director of mental health and addiction services, medicaid director, executive director of the commission on minority health, executive director of the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, or director of education and workforce, on behalf of a program that receives public funds and provides services to children who are younger than compulsory school age, may request and receive, pursuant to section 3301.0723 of the Revised Code, a data verification code for a child who is receiving services from the program. (E) The guidelines adopted under this section may require school districts to collect and report data, information, or reports other than that described in divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section for the purpose of complying with other reporting requirements established in the Revised Code. The other data, information, or reports may be maintained in the education management information system but are not required to be compiled as part of the profile formats required under division (G) of this section or the annual statewide report required under division (H) of this section. (F) The board of education of each school district shall annually collect and report to the department, in accordance with the guidelines established by the department, the data required pursuant to this section. A school district may collect and report these data notwithstanding section 2151.357 or 3319.321 of the Revised Code. (G) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually compile the data reported by each school district pursuant to division (D) of this section. The department shall design formats for profiling each school district as a whole and each school building within each district and shall compile the data in accordance with these formats. These profile formats shall: (1) Include all of the data gathered under this section in a manner that facilitates comparison among school districts and among school buildings within each school district; (2) Present the data on academic achievement levels as assessed by the testing of student achievement maintained pursuant to division (B)(1)(d) of this section. (H)(1) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually prepare a statewide report for all school districts and the general public that includes the profile of each of the school districts developed pursuant to division (G) of this section. Copies of the report shall be sent to each school district. (2) The department shall, in accordance with the procedures it adopts, annually prepare an individual report for each school district and the general public that includes the profiles of each of the school buildings in that school district developed pursuant to division (G) of this section. (I) Any data that is collected or maintained pursuant to this section and that identifies an individual pupil is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (J) As used in this section: (1) "School district" means any city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district and, in accordance with section 3314.17 of the Revised Code, any community school. As used in division (L) of this section, "school district" also includes any educational service center or other educational entity required to submit data using the system established under this section. (2) "Cost" means any expenditure for operating expenses made by a school district excluding any expenditures for debt retirement except for payments made to any commercial lending institution for any loan approved pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. (K) Any person who removes data from the information system established under this section for the purpose of releasing it to any person not entitled under law to have access to such information is subject to section 2913.42 of the Revised Code prohibiting tampering with data. (L)(1) In accordance with division (L)(2) of this section and the rules adopted under division (L)(10) of this section, the department may sanction any school district that reports incomplete or inaccurate data, reports data that does not conform to data requirements and descriptions published by the department, fails to report data in a timely manner, or otherwise does not make a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. (2) If the department decides to sanction a school district under this division, the department shall take the following sequential actions: (a) Notify the district in writing that the department has determined that data has not been reported as required under this section and require the district to review its data submission and submit corrected data by a deadline established by the department. The department also may require the district to develop a corrective action plan, which shall include provisions for the district to provide mandatory staff training on data reporting procedures. (b) Withhold up to ten per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year and, if not previously required under division (L)(2)(a) of this section, require the district to develop a corrective action plan in accordance with that division; (c) Withhold an additional amount of up to twenty per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year; (d) Direct department staff or an outside entity to investigate the district's data reporting practices and make recommendations for subsequent actions. The recommendations may include one or more of the following actions: (i) Arrange for an audit of the district's data reporting practices by department staff or an outside entity; (ii) Conduct a site visit and evaluation of the district; (iii) Withhold an additional amount of up to thirty per cent of the total amount of state funds due to the district for the current fiscal year; (iv) Continue monitoring the district's data reporting; (v) Assign department staff to supervise the district's data management system; (vi) Conduct an investigation to determine whether to suspend or revoke the license of any district employee in accordance with division (N) of this section; (vii) If the district is issued a report card under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, indicate on the report card that the district has been sanctioned for failing to report data as required by this section; (viii) If the district is issued a report card under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and incomplete or inaccurate data submitted by the district likely caused the district to receive a higher performance rating than it deserved under that section, issue a revised report card for the district; (ix) Any other action designed to correct the district's data reporting problems. (3) Any time the department takes an action against a school district under division (L)(2) of this section, the department shall make a report of the circumstances that prompted the action. The department shall send a copy of the report to the district superintendent or chief administrator and maintain a copy of the report in its files. (4) If any action taken under division (L)(2) of this section resolves a school district's data reporting problems to the department's satisfaction, the department shall not take any further actions described by that division. If the department withheld funds from the district under that division, the department may release those funds to the district, except that if the department withheld funding under division (L)(2)(c) of this section, the department shall not release the funds withheld under division (L)(2)(b) of this section and, if the department withheld funding under division (L)(2)(d) of this section, the department shall not release the funds withheld under division (L)(2)(b) or (c) of this section. (5) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the department may use its own staff or an outside entity to conduct an audit of a school district's data reporting practices any time the department has reason to believe the district has not made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. If any audit conducted by an outside entity under division (L)(2)(d)(i) or (5) of this section confirms that a district has not made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section, the district shall reimburse the department for the full cost of the audit. The department may withhold state funds due to the district for this purpose. (6) Prior to issuing a revised report card for a school district under division (L)(2)(d)(viii) of this section, the department may hold a hearing to provide the district with an opportunity to demonstrate that it made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. The hearing shall be conducted by a referee appointed by the department. Based on the information provided in the hearing, the referee shall recommend whether the department should issue a revised report card for the district. If the referee affirms the department's contention that the district did not make a good faith effort to report data as required by this section, the district shall bear the full cost of conducting the hearing and of issuing any revised report card. (7) If the department determines that any inaccurate data reported under this section caused a school district to receive excess state funds in any fiscal year, the district shall reimburse the department an amount equal to the excess funds, in accordance with a payment schedule determined by the department. The department may withhold state funds due to the district for this purpose. (8) Any school district that has funds withheld under division (L)(2) of this section may appeal the withholding in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (9) In all cases of a disagreement between the department and a school district regarding the appropriateness of an action taken under division (L)(2) of this section, the burden of proof shall be on the district to demonstrate that it made a good faith effort to report data as required by this section. (10) The director of education and workforce shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement division (L) of this section. (M) No information technology center or school district shall acquire, change, or update its student administration software package to manage and report data required to be reported to the department unless it converts to a student software package that is certified by the department. (N) The state board of education, in accordance with sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code, may suspend or revoke a license as defined under division (A) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code that has been issued to any school district employee found to have willfully reported erroneous, inaccurate, or incomplete data to the education management information system. (O) No person shall release or maintain any information about any student in violation of this section. Whoever violates this division is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (P) The department shall disaggregate the data collected under division (B)(1)(n) of this section according to the race and socioeconomic status of the students assessed. (Q) If the department cannot compile any of the information required by division (I) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code based upon the data collected under this section, the department shall develop a plan and a reasonable timeline for the collection of any data necessary to comply with that division. Sec. 3301.0715. (A) Except as required under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 or as specified in division (D)(3) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, the (A)(1) The board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall administer each applicable a diagnostic assessment developed and provided to the district in reading and mathematics adopted or approved in accordance with section 3301.079 of the Revised Code to the following: (1)(a) Each student enrolled in kindergarten, first, second, or third grade. (b) Any student who transfers into the district or to a different school within the district if each applicable diagnostic assessment was not administered by the district or school the student previously attended in the current school year, within thirty days after the date of transfer. If the district or school into which the student transfers cannot determine whether the student has taken any applicable diagnostic assessment in the current school year, the district or school may administer the diagnostic assessment to the student. However, if a student transfers into the district prior to the administration of the diagnostic assessments to all students under division (B) of this section, the district may administer the diagnostic assessments to that student on the date or dates determined under that division. (2) Each kindergarten student, not earlier than the first day of July of the school year and not later than the twentieth day of instruction of that school year. For the purpose of division (A)(2) of this section, the The district shall administer the kindergarten readiness assessment provided by the department of children and youthto each kindergarten student not earlier than the first day of July of the school year in which the student is enrolled in kindergarten and not later than the twentieth day of instruction of that school year. In no case shall the results of the readiness assessment be used to prohibit a student from enrolling in kindergarten. (3) Each student enrolled in first, second, or third grade. Division (A) of this section does not apply to students with significant cognitive disabilities, as defined by the department. (B) Each district board shall administer each diagnostic assessment when the board deems appropriate, provided the administration complies with section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. However, the board shall administer any diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section at least once annually by the thirtieth day of September to all students in the appropriate grade level. The board shall administer a diagnostic assessment to a student with a significant cognitive disability in accordance with guidelines adopted by the department of education and workforce. A district board may administer any diagnostic assessment in the fall and spring of a school year to measure the amount of academic growth attributable to the instruction received by students during that school year. (C) A district may use different diagnostic assessments from those adopted under division (D) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code in order to satisfy the requirements of division (A)(3) of this section if the district meets either of the following conditions for the immediately preceding school year: (1) The district received a grade of "A" or "B" for the performance index score under division (C)(1)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or for the value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of that section. (2) The district received a performance rating of four stars or higher for achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (D) Each district board shall utilize and score any diagnostic the kindergarten readiness assessment administered under division (A) of this section in accordance with rules established by the department of education or the department of children and youth and shall utilize and score each diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section in accordance with rules established by the department of education and workforce. After the administration of any the kindergarten readiness assessment or a diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section, each district shall provide a student's completed diagnostic assessment, the results of such assessment, and any other accompanying documents used during the administration of the assessment to the parent of that student, and . The district shall include all such documents and information related to a diagnostic assessment described in division (A)(1) of this section in any plan developed for the student under division (C) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. Each district shall submit, in the manner prescribed by each department, the results of the diagnostic assessments administered under this section, regardless of the type of assessment used under section 3313.608 of the Revised Code as follows: (1) The results of the kindergarten readiness assessment to the department of children and youth; (2) The results of all diagnostic assessments described in division (A)(1) of this section to the department of education and workforce pursuant to section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. The department of education and the department of children and youth may issue reports with respect to the data collected. Either department may report school and district level kindergarten diagnostic readiness assessment data and use . The department of education and workforce may report data from any diagnostic assessment data described in division (A)(1) of this section and may use that data to calculate the measures prescribed by divisions (B)(1)(g), (C)(1)(g), and (D)(1)(h) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and the data reported under division (D)(2)(e) of that section. (E)(D) Each district board shall provide intervention services to students whose diagnostic assessments described in division (A)(1) of this section show that they are failing to make satisfactory progress toward attaining the academic standards for their grade level. (F)(E) Any chartered nonpublic school may elect to administer the kindergarten readiness assessment to all kindergarten students enrolled in the school. If the school so elects, the chief administrator of the school shall notify the director of children and youth not later than the thirty-first day of March prior to any school year in which the school will administer the assessment. The department of children and youth shall furnish the assessment to the school at no cost to the school. In administering the assessment, the school shall do all of the following: (1) Enter into a written agreement with the department of children and youth specifying that the school will share each participating student's assessment data with the department of education and the department of children and youth and, that for the purpose of reporting the data to the department of education and department of children and youth, each participating student will be assigned a data verification code as described in division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code; (2) Require the assessment to be administered by a teacher certified under section 3301.071 of the Revised Code who either has completed training on administering the kindergarten readiness assessment provided by the department of children and youth or has been trained by another person who has completed such training; (3) Administer the assessment in the same manner as school districts are required to do under this section and the rules established under division (D)(C) of this section. (G)(F) A school district in which less than eighty per cent of its students score at the proficient level or higher on the third-grade English language arts assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code shall establish a reading improvement plan supported by reading specialists. Prior to implementation, the plan shall be approved by the school district board of education. (G) As used in this section, "kindergarten readiness assessment" means the diagnostic assessment provided by the department of children and youth under section 5104.52 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.0723. (A) All of the following apply to the independent contractor engaged by the department of education and workforce to create and maintain for school districts and community schools the student data verification codes required by division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code: (1) Upon request of the director of any state agency that administers a publicly funded program providing services to children who are younger than compulsory school age, including the directors of health, children and youth, mental health and addiction services, and developmental disabilities, the contractor shall assign a data verification code to a child who is receiving such services and shall provide that code to the director. (2) Upon request of the director of developmental disabilities, director of health, director of job and family services, director of children and youth, director of mental health and addiction services, medicaid director, executive director of the commission on minority health, executive director of the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, or director of education and workforce and on behalf of a program that receives public funds and provides services to children younger than compulsory school age, the contractor shall assign a data verification code to a child who is receiving such services from the program and shall provide that code to the director. (3) The contractor also shall provide the codes requested under division (A) of this section to the department of education and workforce. For purposes of division (A) of this section, "compulsory school age" has the same meaning as in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of a state agency that receives a child's data verification code under division (A)(1) of this section shall use that code to submit information for that child to the department of education and workforce in accordance with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. The director of a state agency that receives a child's data verification code under division (A)(2) of this section shall provide that code to the publicly or privately funded program providing services to the child. The program shall use that code to submit information for that child to the department of education and workforce in accordance with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code, but only to the extent permitted by federal law. (C) A public school that receives from the independent contractor the data verification code for a child assigned under division (A) of this section shall not request or assign to that child another data verification code under division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. That school and any other public school in which the child subsequently enrolls shall use the data verification code assigned under division (A) of this section to report data relative to that student required under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3301.0727. (A) As used in this section, "dropout prevention and recovery community school" has the same meaning as in section 3319.301 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in section 3301.0710, 3301.0711, or 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, a dropout prevention and recovery community school shall do both of the following with regard to the administration of end-of-course examinations required under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code: (1) In addition to the annual testing windows established by the director of education and workforce under division (C) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, administer the examinations in an online or paper format based on the needs of the student; (2) Adhere to security requirements prescribed under section 3319.151 of the Revised Code for the online examinations administered under division (B)(1) of this section. (C) The director of education and workforce shall establish extended testing windows of ten weeks in duration in the fall and spring for dropout prevention and recovery community schools so that they may administer assessments in closer proximity to when students complete related coursework. The director also shall establish a summer testing window for students participating in summer instruction. (D) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve a dropout prevention and recovery community school from its obligation to administer testing in-person as otherwise required by law. Sec. 3301.136. The department of education and workforce shall compile a list of tutoring programs that it considers to be of high quality and have the potential to accelerate learning for students in the areas of English language arts, mathematics, science, and social studies. For this purpose, the department shall request the qualifications of public and private entities that provide tutoring programs for students. The requested qualifications shall include program efficacy data or other evidence of program effectiveness for students who participate in the tutoring programs. The department shall establish a rubric to evaluate the programs and determine a minimum score for a tutoring program to be included on the department's list. In compiling the list, the department may designate individual tutoring programs as more appropriate for certain grade levels, populations of students, or subject areas. The department shall immediately remove from the list any tutoring program in the area of English language arts that the department determines is not aligned to the science of reading or uses a three-cueing approach, as defined in section 3313.6028 of the Revised Code. The department may establish multiple application periods in any school year for entities to submit their qualifications for consideration to be included on the list. However, the department shall post the initial list of tutoring programs on the department's web site not later than October 1, 2022. After the initial list is posted, the department shall, at least every three years thereafter, provide an opportunity for entities to submit their qualifications for consideration to be included on the list and post an updated list of tutoring programs on the department's web site. No school district or school shall be required to use a tutoring program on the list. Sec. 3301.17. (A) The board of education of each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district may make a driver education course available to high school students enrolled in the district in accordance with Chapter 4508. of the Revised Code. No school district making such a course available shall require any student to enroll in the course in lieu of taking a training course from a private driver training school licensed under that chapter. (B) The principal of each high school shall annually give written notice to the students enrolled in the high school that they may elect, under a procedure that shall be described in the notice, to take a training course from a private driver training school or, if available, enroll in a driver education course made available by the student's school district of attendance. (C) Students who successfully complete a driver education course offered by the student's school district of attendance or through any agency or organization that the district contracts with to offer such a course under this section may earn either: (1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (C)(8) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, up to one-half unit towards high school elective credits that may substitute for credits in the subjects listed under that division; (2) An industry-recognized credential approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. A student may be granted up to two points toward a high school diploma under the list of industry-recognized credentials established and updated under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. (D) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in sections 3317.014, 3317.022, and 3317.16 of the Revised Code, a career-technical planning district, as defined in section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, may use a portion of the career-technical education funds received under section 3317.022 or 3317.16 of the Revised Code to make a driver education course available to high school students enrolled in the district. Sec. 3301.24. (A) Not later than December 31, 2025, the department of education and workforce shall develop a model policy on the use of artificial intelligence in schools. The model policy shall address appropriate use of artificial intelligence by students and staff for educational purposes. (B) Not later than July 1, 2026, each school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code shall adopt a policy on the use of artificial intelligence. The district or school may adopt the department's model policy developed under division (A) of this section. Sec. 3301.541. (A)(1) The director, head teacher, elementary principal, or site administrator of a preschool program shall request the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation to conduct a criminal records check with respect to any applicant who has applied to the preschool program for employment as a person responsible for the care, custody, or control of a child. If the applicant does not present proof that the applicant has been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date upon which the criminal records check is requested or does not provide evidence that within that five-year period the superintendent has requested information about the applicant from the federal bureau of investigation in a criminal records check, the director, head teacher, or elementary principal shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as a part of the criminal records check for the applicant. If the applicant presents proof that the applicant has been a resident of this state for that five-year period, the director, head teacher, or elementary principal may request that the superintendent include information from the federal bureau of investigation in the criminal records check. (2) Any director, head teacher, elementary principal, or site administrator required by division (A)(1) of this section to request a criminal records check shall provide to each applicant a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, provide to each applicant a standard impression sheet to obtain fingerprint impressions prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, obtain the completed form and impression sheet from each applicant, and forward the completed form and impression sheet to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation at the time the person requests a criminal records check pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section. (3) Any applicant who receives pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a copy of an impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section and who is requested to complete the form and provide a set of fingerprint impressions shall complete the form or provide all the information necessary to complete the form and provide the impression sheet with the impressions of the applicant's fingerprints. If an applicant, upon request, fails to provide the information necessary to complete the form or fails to provide impressions of the applicant's fingerprints, the preschool program shall not employ that applicant for any position for which a criminal records check is required by division (A)(1) of this section. (B)(1) Except as provided in rules adopted by the department of education and workforce children and youth in accordance with division (E) of this section, no preschool program shall employ a person as a person responsible for the care, custody, or control of a child if the person previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any of the following: (a) A violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.16, 2903.21, 2903.34, 2905.01, 2905.02, 2905.05, 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.04, 2907.05, 2907.06, 2907.07, 2907.08, 2907.09, 2907.21, 2907.22, 2907.23, 2907.25, 2907.31, 2907.32, 2907.321, 2907.322, 2907.323, 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2919.12, 2919.22, 2919.24, 2919.25, 2923.12, 2923.13, 2923.161, 2925.02, 2925.03, 2925.04, 2925.05, 2925.06, or 3716.11 of the Revised Code, a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, a violation of section 2919.23 of the Revised Code that would have been a violation of section 2905.04 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996, had the violation occurred prior to that date, a violation of section 2925.11 of the Revised Code that is not a minor drug possession offense, or felonious sexual penetration in violation of former section 2907.12 of the Revised Code; (b) A violation of an existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States that is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses or violations described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section. (2) A preschool program may employ an applicant conditionally until the criminal records check required by this section is completed and the preschool program receives the results of the criminal records check. If the results of the criminal records check indicate that, pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, the applicant does not qualify for employment, the preschool program shall release the applicant from employment. (C)(1) Each preschool program shall pay to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation the fee prescribed pursuant to division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code for each criminal records check conducted in accordance with that section upon the request pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section of the director, head teacher, elementary principal, or site administrator of the preschool program. (2) A preschool program may charge an applicant a fee for the costs it incurs in obtaining a criminal records check under this section. A fee charged under this division shall not exceed the amount of fees the preschool program pays under division (C)(1) of this section. If a fee is charged under this division, the preschool program shall notify the applicant at the time of the applicant's initial application for employment of the amount of the fee and that, unless the fee is paid, the applicant will not be considered for employment. (D) The report of any criminal records check conducted by the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in accordance with section 109.572 of the Revised Code and pursuant to a request under division (A)(1) of this section is not a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person other than the applicant who is the subject of the criminal records check or the applicant's representative, the preschool program requesting the criminal records check or its representative, and any court, hearing officer, or other necessary individual in a case dealing with the denial of employment to the applicant. (E) The department of education and workforce children and youth shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section, including rules specifying circumstances under which a preschool program may hire a person who has been convicted of an offense listed in division (B)(1) of this section but who meets standards in regard to rehabilitation set by the department. (F) Any person required by division (A)(1) of this section to request a criminal records check shall inform each person, at the time of the person's initial application for employment, that the person is required to provide a set of impressions of the person's fingerprints and that a criminal records check is required to be conducted and satisfactorily completed in accordance with section 109.572 of the Revised Code if the person comes under final consideration for appointment or employment as a precondition to employment for that position. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Applicant" means a person who is under final consideration for appointment or employment in a position with a preschool program as a person responsible for the care, custody, or control of a child, except that "applicant" does not include a person already employed by a board of education, community school, or chartered nonpublic school in a position of care, custody, or control of a child who is under consideration for a different position with such board or school. (2) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (3) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (H) If the board of education of a local school district adopts a resolution requesting the assistance of the educational service center in which the local district has territory in conducting criminal records checks of substitute teachers under this section, the appointing or hiring officer of such educational service center governing board shall serve for purposes of this section as the appointing or hiring officer of the local board in the case of hiring substitute teachers for employment in the local district. Sec. 3301.57. (A) For the purpose of improving programs, facilities, and implementation of the standards promulgated under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code, the department of education and workforce and the department of children and youth shall provide consultation and technical assistance to school districts, county boards of developmental disabilities, community schools, authorized private before and after school care programs, and eligible nonpublic schools operating preschool programs or school child programs, and in-service training to preschool staff members, school child program staff members, and nonteaching employees. (B) The department of education and workforce, the department of children and youth, and the school district board of education, county board of developmental disabilities, community school, or eligible nonpublic school shall jointly monitor each preschool program and each school child program. If the program receives any grant or other funding from the state or federal government, the department of education and workforce and the department of children and youth annually shall monitor all reports on attendance, financial support, and expenditures according to provisions for use of the funds. (C) The department of education and workforce and the department of children and youth, at least once during every twelve-month period of operation of a preschool program or a licensed school child program, shall inspect the program and provide a written inspection report to the superintendent of the school district, county board of developmental disabilities, community school, or eligible nonpublic school. The departments department may inspect any program more than once, as considered necessary by the departmentsdepartment, during any twelve-month period of operation. All inspections may be unannounced. No person shall interfere with any inspection conducted pursuant to this division or to the rules adopted pursuant to sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of any complaint that a preschool program or a licensed school child program is out of compliance with the requirements in sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code or the rules adopted under those sections, the department of children and youth shall investigate and may inspect the program. If the complaint is related to a teacher, the department shall coordinate with the department state board of education to investigate and take action on a teacher's license. (D) If a preschool program or a licensed school child program is determined to be out of compliance with the requirements of sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code or the rules adopted under those sections, the department of children and youth shall notify the appropriate superintendent, county board of developmental disabilities, community school, authorized private before and after school care program, or eligible nonpublic school in writing regarding the nature of the violation, what must be done to correct the violation, and by what date the correction must be made. If the correction is not made by the date established by the department, it may commence action under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to close the program or to revoke the license of the program. If a program does not comply with an order to cease operation issued in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the department shall notify the attorney general, the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the program is located, or the city attorney, village solicitor, or other chief legal officer of the municipal corporation in which the program is located that the program is operating in violation of sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code or the rules adopted under those sections and in violation of an order to cease operation issued in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of the notification, the attorney general, prosecuting attorney, city attorney, village solicitor, or other chief legal officer shall file a complaint in the court of common pleas of the county in which the program is located requesting the court to issue an order enjoining the program from operating. The court shall grant the requested injunctive relief upon a showing that the program named in the complaint is operating in violation of sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code or the rules adopted under those sections and in violation of an order to cease operation issued in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (E) The department of education and workforce and department of children and youth shall prepare an annual report on inspections conducted under this section. The report shall include the number of inspections conducted, the number and types of violations found, and the steps taken to address the violations. The departments department shall file the report with the governor, the president and minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives on or before the first day of January of each year. Sec. 3301.82. The department of education and workforce shall begin conducting its duties under this section one year after the effective date of this section. (A) The department of education and workforce annually shall collect employment and vacancy data for each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code for all of the following: (1) Teachers; (2) Related services providers and other providers of specialized services; (3) Principals and assistant principals; (4) Paraprofessionals; (5) Bus drivers; (6) Any other positions as determined by the department. (B) The department shall report the number of vacant positions aggregated by the following: (1) Type of position; (2) Subject area; (3) Geographic area, including rural and urban areas; (4) The number of educator positions filled by long-term substitute teachers, unlicensed individuals, or educators with emergency credentials disaggregated by school, grade level, and endorsement; (5) The reasons why a position was vacant, which may include the following reasons: (a) Retirement; (b) New position; (c) Repeated poor teacher evaluations; (d) Position is no longer necessary; (e) Reduction in force. (6) Methods used to fill vacant positions, which shall include the following: (a) Hiring of short- and long-term substitutes; (b) Hiring retired educators; (c) Hiring educators from alternative licensure program candidates; (d) Contracting with an educational service center or other entity; (e) Hiring personnel with emergency credentials or who are unlicensed; (f) Other methods identified by the department. (7) Positions that remain unfilled. (C) The department also annually shall collect and report the following statewide data on educators: (1) Educator preparation program enrollment and completion data annually, disaggregated by endorsement area and grade level; (2) The number of new educator licenses issued by the state board of education annually, disaggregated by licensure pathway and including those issued through reciprocity with another state; (3) Educator retention at one-year, three-year, five-year, and ten-year rates; (4) Educator demographic data aggregated at the district and state level. (D) The department shall annually publish and summarize data collected under this section on its publicly accessible web site. To the extent possible, the department shall report the data at the state, district, and school level. Sec. 3302.03. Not later than the thirty-first day of July of each year, the department of education and workforce shall submit preliminary report card data for overall academic performance and for each separate performance measure for each school district, and each school building, in accordance with this section. Annually, not later than the fifteenth day of September or the preceding Friday when that day falls on a Saturday or Sunday, the department shall assign a letter grade or performance rating for overall academic performance and for each separate performance measure for each school district, and each school building in a district, in accordance with this section. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. The department's rules shall establish performance criteria for each letter grade or performance rating and prescribe a method by which the department assigns each letter grade or performance rating. For a school building to which any of the performance measures do not apply, due to grade levels served by the building, the department shall designate the performance measures that are applicable to the building and that must be calculated separately and used to calculate the building's overall grade or performance rating. The department shall issue annual report cards reflecting the performance of each school district, each building within each district, and for the state as a whole using the performance measures and letter grade or performance rating system described in this section. The department shall include on the report card for each district and each building within each district the most recent two-year trend data in student achievement for each subject and each grade. (A)(1) For the 2012-2013 school year, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the following performance measures: (a) Annual measurable objectives; (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as adopted by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.02 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (A)(1)(d), (B)(1)(d), or (C)(1)(d) of this section, the department shall designate a four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate of ninety-three per cent or higher for an "A" and a five-year cohort graduation rate of ninety-five per cent or higher for an "A." (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. The letter grade assigned for this growth measure shall be as follows: (i) A score that is at least one standard error of measure above the mean score shall be designated as an "A." (ii) A score that is less than one standard error of measure above but greater than one standard error of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "B." (iii) A score that is less than or equal to one standard error of measure below the mean score but greater than two standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "C." (iv) A score that is less than or equal to two standard errors of measure below the mean score but is greater than three standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as a "D." (v) A score that is less than or equal to three standard errors of measure below the mean score shall be designated as an "F." Whenever the value-added progress dimension is used as a graded performance measure in this division and divisions (B) and (C) of this section, whether as an overall measure or as a measure of separate subgroups, the grades for the measure shall be calculated in the same manner as prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (f) The value-added progress dimension score for a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. (2) The department shall adopt a resolution describing the performance measures, benchmarks, and grading system for the 2012-2013 school year and shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (A)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, including performance benchmarks for each letter grade. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (A)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing such methods, including performance benchmarks. (3) There shall not be an overall letter grade for a school district or building for the 2012-2013 school year. (B)(1) For the 2013-2014 school year, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the following performance measures: (a) Annual measurable objectives; (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as created by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (B)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (B)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates; (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. (f) The value-added progress dimension score for a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. (g) Whether a school district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The department shall adopt rules to prescribe benchmarks and standards for assigning grades to districts and buildings for purposes of division (B)(1)(g) of this section. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under divisions (B)(1)(g) and (C)(1)(g) of this section, the department shall determine progress made based on the reduction in the total percentage of students scoring below grade level, or below proficient, compared from year to year on the reading and writing diagnostic assessments administered under section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code and the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The department shall designate for a "C" grade a value that is not lower than the statewide average value for this measure. No grade shall be issued under divisions (B)(1)(g) and (C)(1)(g) of this section for a district or building in which less than five per cent of students have scored below grade level on the diagnostic assessment administered to students in kindergarten under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (h) For a high mobility school district or building, an additional value-added progress dimension score. For this measure, the department shall use value-added data from the most recent school year available and shall use assessment scores for only those students to whom the district or building has administered the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for each of the two most recent consecutive school years. As used in this division, "high mobility school district or building" means a school district or building where at least twenty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who have attended that school district or building for less than one year. (2) In addition to the graded measures in division (B)(1) of this section, the department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following without an assigned letter grade: (a) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building participating in advanced placement classes and the percentage of those students who received a score of three or better on advanced placement examinations; (b) The number of a district's or building's students who have earned at least three college credits through dual enrollment or advanced standing programs, such as the post-secondary enrollment options program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's transcript or other official document, either of which is issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. The credits earned that are reported under divisions (B)(2)(b) and (C)(2)(c) of this section shall not include any that are remedial or developmental and shall include those that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree. (c) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who have taken a national standardized test used for college admission determinations and the percentage of those students who are determined to be remediation-free in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code; (d) The percentage of the district's or the building's students who receive industry-recognized credentials as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. (e) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who are participating in an international baccalaureate program and the percentage of those students who receive a score of four or better on the international baccalaureate examinations. (f) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code. (3) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under divisions (B)(1)(f) and (B)(1)(g) of this section will be assessed and assigned a letter grade, including performance benchmarks for each grade. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods by which the performance measures under division (B)(1) of this section shall be assessed and assigned a letter grade, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing such methods, including performance benchmarks. (4) There shall not be an overall letter grade for a school district or building for the 2013-2014, 2014-2015, 2015-2016, and 2016-2017 school years. (C)(1) For the 2014-2015, 2015-2016, 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, and 2020-2021 school years, the department shall issue grades as described in division (F) of this section for each of the performance measures prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section. The graded measures are as follows: (a) Annual measurable objectives. For the 2017-2018 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than twenty-five students. For the 2018-2019 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than twenty students. Beginning with the 2019-2020 school year, the department shall not include any subgroup data in the annual measurable objectives that includes data from fewer than fifteen students. (b) Performance index score for a school district or building. Grades shall be awarded as a percentage of the total possible points on the performance index system as created by the department. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (C)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A," at least seventy per cent but not more than eighty per cent for a "C," and less than fifty per cent for an "F." (c) The extent to which the school district or building meets each of the applicable performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and the percentage of applicable performance indicators that have been achieved. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades under division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall designate ninety per cent or higher for an "A." (d) The four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates; (e) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension, or another measure of student academic progress if adopted by the department, of a school district or building, for which the department shall use up to three years of value-added data as available. In adopting benchmarks for assigning letter grades for overall score on value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of this section, the department shall prohibit the assigning of a grade of "A" for that measure unless the district's or building's grade assigned for value-added progress dimension for all subgroups under division (C)(1)(f) of this section is a "C" or higher. For the metric prescribed by division (C)(1)(e) of this section, the department may adopt a student academic progress measure to be used instead of the value-added progress dimension. If the department adopts such a measure, it also shall prescribe a method for assigning letter grades for the new measure that is comparable to the method prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (f) The value-added progress dimension score of a school district or building disaggregated for each of the following subgroups: students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code, students with disabilities, and students whose performance places them in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis, as determined by a method prescribed by the department. Each subgroup shall be a separate graded measure. The department may adopt student academic progress measures to be used instead of the value-added progress dimension. If the department adopts such measures, it also shall prescribe a method for assigning letter grades for the new measures that is comparable to the method prescribed in division (A)(1)(e) of this section. (g) Whether a school district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The department shall adopt rules to prescribe benchmarks and standards for assigning grades to a district or building for purposes of division (C)(1)(g) of this section. The department shall designate for a "C" grade a value that is not lower than the statewide average value for this measure. No grade shall be issued under division (C)(1)(g) of this section for a district or building in which less than five per cent of students have scored below grade level on the kindergarten diagnostic assessment under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (h) For a high mobility school district or building, an additional value-added progress dimension score. For this measure, the department shall use value-added data from the most recent school year available and shall use assessment scores for only those students to whom the district or building has administered the assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for each of the two most recent consecutive school years. As used in this division, "high mobility school district or building" means a school district or building where at least twenty-five per cent of its total enrollment is made up of students who have attended that school district or building for less than one year. (2) In addition to the graded measures in division (C)(1) of this section, the department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following without an assigned letter grade: (a) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who have taken a national standardized test used for college admission determinations and the percentage of those students who are determined to be remediation-free in accordance with the standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code; (b) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building participating in advanced placement classes and the percentage of those students who received a score of three or better on advanced placement examinations; (c) The percentage of a district's or building's students who have earned at least three college credits through advanced standing programs, such as the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's college transcript issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. The credits earned that are reported under divisions (B)(2)(b) and (C)(2)(c) of this section shall not include any that are remedial or developmental and shall include those that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree. (d) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive an honor's diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (e) The percentage of the district's or building's students who receive industry-recognized credentials as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code; (f) The percentage of students enrolled in a district or building who are participating in an international baccalaureate program and the percentage of those students who receive a score of four or better on the international baccalaureate examinations; (g) The results of the college and career-ready assessments administered under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (h) Whether the school district or building has implemented a positive behavior intervention and supports framework in compliance with the requirements of section 3319.46 of the Revised Code, notated as a "yes" or "no" answer. (3) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish a method to assign an overall grade for a school district or school building for the 2017-2018 school year and each school year thereafter. The rules shall group the performance measures in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section into the following components: (a) Gap closing, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(a) of this section; (b) Achievement, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(1)(b) and (c) of this section; (c) Progress, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(1)(e) and (f) of this section; (d) Graduation, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(d) of this section; (e) Kindergarten through third-grade literacy, which shall include the performance measure in division (C)(1)(g) of this section; (f) Prepared for success, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (C)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. The department shall develop a method to determine a grade for the component in division (C)(3)(f) of this section using the performance measures in divisions (C)(2)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. When available, the department may incorporate the performance measure under division (C)(2)(g) of this section into the component under division (C)(3)(f) of this section. When determining the overall grade for the prepared for success component prescribed by division (C)(3)(f) of this section, no individual student shall be counted in more than one performance measure. However, if a student qualifies for more than one performance measure in the component, the department may, in its method to determine a grade for the component, specify an additional weight for such a student that is not greater than or equal to 1.0. In determining the overall score under division (C)(3)(f) of this section, the department shall ensure that the pool of students included in the performance measures aggregated under that division are all of the students included in the four- and five-year adjusted graduation cohort. In the rules adopted under division (C)(3) of this section, the department shall adopt a method for determining a grade for each component in divisions (C)(3)(a) to (f) of this section. The department also shall establish a method to assign an overall grade of "A," "B," "C," "D," or "F" using the grades assigned for each component. The method the department adopts for assigning an overall grade shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (C)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. At least forty-five days prior to the department's adoption of rules to prescribe the methods for calculating the overall grade for the report card, as required by this division, the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider education legislation describing the format for the report card, weights that will be assigned to the components of the overall grade, and the method for calculating the overall grade. (D) For the 2021-2022 school year and each school year thereafter, all of the following apply: (1) The department shall include on a school district's or building's report card all of the following performance measures without an assigned performance rating: (a) Whether the district or building meets the gifted performance indicator under division (A)(2) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code and the extent to which the district or building meets gifted indicator performance benchmarks; (b) The extent to which the district or building meets the chronic absenteeism indicator under division (A)(3) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code; (c) Performance index score percentage for a district or building, which shall be calculated by dividing the district's or building's performance index score according to the performance index system created by the department by the maximum performance index score for a district or building. The maximum performance index score shall be as follows: (i) For a building, the average of the highest two per cent of performance index scores achieved by a building for the school year for which a report card is issued; (ii) For a district, the average of the highest two per cent of performance index scores achieved by a district for the school year for which a report card is issued. (d) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building, for which the department shall use three consecutive years of value-added data. In using three years of value-added data to calculate the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(d) of this section, the department shall assign a weight of fifty per cent to the most recent year's data and a weight of twenty-five per cent to the data of each of the other years. However, if three consecutive years of value-added data is not available, the department shall use prior years of value-added data to calculate the measure, as follows: (i) If two consecutive years of value-added data is not available, the department shall use one year of value-added data to calculate the measure. (ii) If two consecutive years of value-added data is available, the department shall use two consecutive years of value-added data to calculate the measure. In using two years of value-added data to calculate the measure, the department shall assign a weight of sixty-seven per cent to the most recent year's data and a weight of thirty-three per cent to the data of the other year. (e) The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. (f) The five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. (g) The percentage of students in the district or building who score proficient or higher on the reading segment of the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. To the extent possible, the department shall include the results of the summer administration of the third grade reading assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in the performance measures prescribed under divisions (D)(1)(g) and (h) of this section. (h) Whether a district or building is making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three, as determined using a method prescribed by the department. The method shall determine progress made based on the reduction in the total percentage of students scoring below grade level, or below proficient, compared from year to year on the reading segments of the diagnostic assessments administered under division (A)(1) of section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code, including the kindergarten readiness assessment, and the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code, as applicable. The method shall not include a deduction for students who did not pass the third grade English language arts assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code and were not on a reading improvement and monitoring plan. The performance measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section shall not be included on the report card of a district or building in which less than ten per cent of students have scored below grade level on the diagnostic assessment administered to students in kindergarten under division (B)(1) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (i) The percentage of students in a district or building who are promoted to the fourth grade and not subject to retention under division (A)(2) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Codebased on the student's score on the third grade English language arts assessment under division (A)(3) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or demonstrate competency on an alternative assessment under division (A)(2)(c) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code; (j) A post-secondary readiness measure. This measure shall be calculated by dividing the number of students included in the four-year adjusted graduation rate cohort who demonstrate post-secondary readiness by the total number of students included in the denominator of the four-year adjusted graduation rate cohort. Demonstration of post-secondary readiness shall include a student doing any of the following: (i) Attaining a remediation-free score, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (ii) Attaining required scores on three or more advanced placement, college-level examination program, or international baccalaureate examinations. The required score for an advanced placement examination shall be a three or better. The required score for a college-level examination program examination shall be a passing score, as determined by the department. The required score for an international baccalaureate examination shall be a four or better. A student may satisfy this condition with any combination of advanced placement, college-level examination program, or international baccalaureate examinations. (iii) Earning at least twelve college credits through advanced standing programs, such as the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, an early college high school program under section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code, and state-approved career-technical courses offered through dual enrollment or statewide articulation, that appear on a student's college transcript issued by the institution of higher education from which the student earned the college credit. Earned credits reported under division (D)(1)(j)(iii) of this section shall include credits that count toward the curriculum requirements established for completion of a degree, but shall not include any remedial or developmental credits. (iv) Meeting the additional criteria for an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code; (v) Earning an industry-recognized credential or license issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code; (vi) Satisfying any of the following conditions: (I) Completing a pre-apprenticeship aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field; (II) Completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field; (III) Providing evidence of acceptance into an apprenticeship program after high school that is restricted to participants eighteen years of age or older. (vii) Earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway; (viii) Earning an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code and completing two hundred fifty hours of an internship or other work-based learning experience that is either: (I) Approved by the business advisory council established under section 3313.82 of the Revised Code that represents the student's district; or (II) Aligned to the career-technical education pathway approved by the department in which the student is enrolled. (ix) Providing evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. A student who satisfies more than one of the conditions prescribed under this division shall be counted as one student for the purposes of calculating the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(j) of this section. (2) In addition to the performance measures under division (D)(1) of this section, the department shall report on a district's or building's report card all of the following data without an assigned performance rating: (a) The applicable performance indicators established by the department under division (A)(1) of section 3302.02 of the Revised Code; (b) The overall score under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building for the most recent school year; (c) A composite of the overall scores under the value-added progress dimension of a district or building for the previous three school years or, if only two years of value-added data are available, for the previous two years; (d) The percentage of students included in the four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates of a district or building who did not receive a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate that data according to the following categories: (i) Students who are still enrolled in the district or building and receiving general education services; (ii) Students with an individualized education program, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, who satisfied the conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code, but opted not to receive a diploma and are still receiving education services; (iii) Students with an individualized education program who have not yet satisfied conditions for a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code and who are still receiving education services; (iv) Students who are no longer enrolled in any district or building; (v) Students who, upon enrollment in the district or building for the first time, had completed fewer units of high school instruction required under section 3313.603 of the Revised Code than other students in the four- or five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate. The department may disaggregate the data prescribed under division (D)(2)(d) of this section according to other categories that the department determines are appropriate. (e) The results of the kindergarten diagnostic assessment prescribed under division (D) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code; (f) Post-graduate outcomes for students who were enrolled in a district or building and received a high school diploma under section 3313.61 or 3325.08 of the Revised Code in the school year prior to the school year for which the report card is issued, including the percentage of students who: (i) Enrolled in a post-secondary educational institution. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate that data according to whether the student enrolled in a four-year institution of higher education, a two-year institution of higher education, an Ohio technical center that provides adult technical education services and is recognized by the chancellor of higher education, or another type of post-secondary educational institution. (ii) Entered an apprenticeship program registered with the apprenticeship council established under Chapter 4139. of the Revised Code. The department may include other job training programs with similar rigor and outcomes. (iii) Attained gainful employment, as determined by the department; (iv) Enlisted in a branch of the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. (g)(f) Whether the school district or building has implemented a positive behavior intervention and supports framework in compliance with the requirements of section 3319.46 of the Revised Code, notated with a "yes" or "no"; (h)(g) The number and percentage of high school seniors in each school year who completed the free application for federal student aid; (i)(h) Beginning with the report card issued under this section for the 2022-2023 school year, a student opportunity profile measure that reports data regarding the opportunities provided to students by a district or building. To the extent possible, and when appropriate, the data shall be disaggregated by grade level and subgroup. The measure also shall include data regarding the statewide average, the average for similar school districts, and, for a building, the average for the district in which the building is located. The measure shall include all of the following data for the district or building: (i) The average ratio of teachers of record to students in each grade level in a district or building; (ii) The average ratio of school counselors to students in a district or building; (iii) The average ratio of nurses to students in a district or building; (iv) The average ratio of licensed librarians and library media specialists to students in a district or building; (v) The average ratio of social workers to students in a district or building; (vi) The average ratio of mental health professionals to students in a district or building; (vii) The average ratio of paraprofessionals to students in a district or building; (viii) The percentage of teachers with fewer than three years of experience teaching in any school; (ix) The percentage of principals with fewer than three years of experience as a principal in any school; (x) The percentage of teachers who are not teaching in the subject or field for which they are certified or licensed; (xi) The percentage of kindergarten students who are enrolled in all-day kindergarten, as defined in section 3321.05 of the Revised Code; (xii) The percentage of students enrolled in a performing or visual arts course; (xiii) The percentage of students enrolled in a physical education or wellness course; (xiv) The percentage of students enrolled in a world language course; (xv) The percentage of students in grades seven through twelve who are enrolled in a career-technical education course; (xvi) The percentage of students participating in one or more cocurricular activities; (xvii) The percentage of students participating in advance placement courses, international baccalaureate courses, honors courses, or courses offered through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code; (xviii) The percentage of students identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and specific academic ability fields under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code and receiving gifted services pursuant to that chapter; (xix) The percentage of students participating in enrichment or support programs offered by the district or building outside of the normal school day; (xx) The percentage of eligible students participating each school day in school breakfast programs offered by the district or building in accordance with section 3313.813 or 3313.818 of the Revised Code; (xxi) The percentage of students who are transported by a school bus each school day; (xxii) The ratio of portable technology devices that students may take home to the number of students. The department shall include only opportunity measures at the building level for which data for buildings is available, as determined by a school district. (j)(i)(i)(i) The percentage of students included in the four- and five-year adjusted cohort graduation rates of the district or building who completed all of grades nine through twelve while enrolled in the district or building; (ii) The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate for only those students who were continuously enrolled in the same district or building for grades nine through twelve. (k)(j) Whether the district or building provides information about and promotes the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code to students in accordance with section 3365.04 of the Revised Code, notated with a "yes" or "no"; (l)(k) The percentage of students in the district or building to whom both of the following apply: (i) The students are promoted to fourth grade and not subject to retention under division (A)(2) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. (ii) The students completed all of the grade levels offered prior to the fourth grade in the district or building. (3) Except as provided in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, the department shall use the method prescribed under rules adopted under division (D)(4) of this section to assign performance ratings of "one star," "two stars," "three stars," "four stars," or "five stars," as described in division (F) of this section, for a district or building for the individual components prescribed under division (D)(3) of this section. The department also shall assign an overall performance rating for a district or building in accordance with division (D)(3)(g) of this section. The method shall use the performance measures prescribed under division (D)(1) of this section to calculate performance ratings for components. The method may report data under division (D)(2) of this section with corresponding components, but shall not use the data to calculate performance ratings for that component. The performance measures and reported data shall be grouped together into components as follows: (a) Gap closing. In addition to other criteria determined appropriate by the department, performance ratings for the gap closing component shall reflect whether each of the following performance measures are met or not met: (i) The gifted performance indicator as described in division (D)(1)(a) of this section; (ii) The chronic absenteeism indicator as described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (iii) For English learners, an English language proficiency improvement indicator established by the department; (iv) The subgroup graduation targets; (v) The subgroup achievement targets in both mathematics and English language arts; (vi) The subgroup progress targets in both mathematics and English language arts. Achievement and progress targets under division (D)(3)(a) of this section shall be calculated individually, and districts and buildings shall receive a status of met or not met on each measure. The department shall not require a subgroup of a district or building to meet both the achievement and progress targets at the same time to receive a status of met. The department shall not include any subgroup data in this measure that includes data from fewer than fifteen students. Any penalty for failing to meet the required assessment participation rate must be partially in proportion to how close the district or building was to meeting the rate requirement. (b) Achievement, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(c) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(a) of this section. Performance ratings for the achievement component shall be awarded as a percentage of the maximum performance index score described in division (D)(1)(c) of this section. (c) Progress, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(d) of this section and the reported data in divisions (D)(2)(b) and (c) of this section; (d) Graduation, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (D)(1)(e) and (f) of this section and the reported data in divisions (D)(2)(d) and (j) of this section. The four-year adjusted cohort graduation rate shall be assigned a weight of sixty per cent and the five-year adjusted cohort graduation rate shall be assigned a weight of forty per cent;. (e) Early literacy, which shall include the performance measures in divisions (D)(1)(g), (h), and (i) of this section and the reported data in divisions (D)(2)(e) and (l)division (D)(2)(k) of this section. If the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section is included in a report card, performance ratings for the early literacy component shall give a weight of forty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(g) of this section, a weight of thirty-five per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(i) of this section, and a weight of twenty-five per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section. If the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(h) of this section is not included in a report card of a district or building, performance ratings for the early literacy component shall give a weight of sixty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(g) of this section and a weight of forty per cent to the measure prescribed under division (D)(1)(i) of this section. (f) College, career, workforce, and military readiness, which shall include the performance measure in division (D)(1)(j) of this section and the reported data in division (D)(2)(f) (D)(2)(e) of this section. For the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, and 2023-2024 school years, the department only shall report the data for, and not assign a performance rating to, the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component. The reported data shall include the percentage of students who demonstrate post-secondary readiness using any of the options described in division (D)(1)(j) of this section. The department shall analyze the data included in the performance measure prescribed in division (D)(1)(j) of this section for the 2021-2022, 2022-2023, and 2023-2024 school years. Using that data, the department shall develop and propose rules for a method to assign a performance rating to the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component based on that measure. The method to assign a performance rating shall not include a tiered structure or per student bonuses. The rules shall specify that a district or building shall not receive lower than a performance rating of three stars for the component if the district's or building's performance on the component meets or exceeds a level of improvement set by the department. Notwithstanding division (D)(4)(b) of this section, more than half of the total districts and buildings may earn a performance rating of three stars on this component to account for the districts and buildings that earned a performance rating of three stars because they met or exceeded the level of improvement set by the department. The department shall submit the rules to the joint committee on agency rule review. The committee shall conduct at least one public hearing on the proposed rules and approve or disapprove the rules. If the committee approves the rules, the department shall adopt the rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the rules are adopted, the department shall assign a performance rating to the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component under the rules beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, and for each school year thereafter. If the committee disapproves the rules, the component shall be included in the report card only as reported data for the 2024-2025 school year, and each school year thereafter. (g)(i) Except as provided for in division (D)(3)(g)(ii) of this section, beginning with the 2022-2023 school year, under the method prescribed under rules adopted in division (D)(4) of this section, the department shall use the performance ratings assigned for the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a) to (e) of this section to determine and assign an overall performance rating of "one star," "one and one-half stars," "two stars," "two and one-half stars," "three stars," "three and one-half stars," "four stars," "four and one-half stars," or "five stars" for a district or building. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), and (e) of this section. The individual weights of each of the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), and (e) of this section shall be equal to one-half of the weight given to the component prescribed in division (D)(3)(b) of this section. (ii) If the joint committee on agency rule review approves the department's rules regarding the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component as described in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, for the 2024-2025 school year, and each school year thereafter, the department's method shall use the components in divisions (D)(3)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section to calculate the overall performance rating. The method shall give equal weight to the components in divisions (D)(3)(b) and (c) of this section. The method shall give equal weight to the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), (e), and (f) of this section. The individual weights of each of the components prescribed in divisions (D)(3)(a), (d), (e), and (f) of this section shall be equal to one-half the weight given to the component prescribed in division (D)(3)(b) of this section. If the joint committee on agency rule review disapproves the department's rules regarding the college, career, workforce, and military readiness component as described in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, division (D)(3)(g)(ii) of this section does not apply. (4)(a) The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to establish the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system necessary to implement divisions (D) and (F) of this section, including the method for the department to assign performance ratings under division (D)(3) of this section. (b) In establishing the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system, the department shall consult with stakeholder groups and advocates that represent parents, community members, students, business leaders, and educators from different school typology regions. The department shall use data from prior school years and simulations to ensure that there is meaningful differentiation among districts and buildings across all performance ratings and that, except as permitted in division (D)(3)(f) of this section, more than half of all districts or buildings do not earn the same performance rating in any component or overall performance rating. (c) The department shall adopt the rules prescribed by division (D)(4) of this section not later than March 31, 2022. However, the department shall notify districts and buildings of the changes to the report card prescribed in law not later than one week after September 30, 2021. (d) Prior to adopting or updating rules under division (D)(4) of this section, the director of education and workforce and the department shall conduct a public presentation before the standing committees of the house of representatives and the senate that consider primary and secondary education legislation describing the format for the report card and the performance criteria, benchmarks, and rating system, including the method to assign performance ratings under division (D)(3) of this section. (E) The department may develop a measure of student academic progress for high school students using only data from assessments in English language arts and mathematics. If the department develops this measure, each school district and applicable school building shall be assigned a separate letter grade for it not sooner than the 2017-2018 school year. The district's or building's grade for that measure shall not be included in determining the district's or building's overall letter grade. (F)(1) The letter grades assigned to a school district or building under this section shall be as follows: (a) "A" for a district or school making excellent progress; (b) "B" for a district or school making above average progress; (c) "C" for a district or school making average progress; (d) "D" for a district or school making below average progress; (e) "F" for a district or school failing to meet minimum progress. (2) For the overall performance rating under division (D)(3) of this section, the department shall include a descriptor for each performance rating as follows: (a) "Significantly exceeds state standards" for a performance rating of five stars; (b) "Exceeds state standards" for a performance rating of four stars or four and one-half stars; (c) "Meets state standards" for a performance rating of three stars or three and one-half stars; (d) "Needs support to meet state standards" for a performance rating of two stars or two and one-half stars; (e) "Needs significant support to meet state standards" for a performance rating of one star or one and one-half stars. (3) For performance ratings for each component under divisions (D)(3)(a) to (f) of this section, the department shall include a description of each component and performance rating. The description shall include component-specific context to each performance rating earned, estimated comparisons to other school districts and buildings if appropriate, and any other information determined by the department. The descriptions shall be not longer than twenty-five words in length when possible. In addition to such descriptions, the department shall include the descriptors in division (F)(2) of this section for component performance ratings. (4) Each report card issued under this section shall include all of the following: (a) A graphic that depicts the performance ratings of a district or school on a color scale. The color associated with a performance rating of three stars shall be green and the color associated with a performance rating of one star shall be red. (b) An arrow graphic that shows data trends for performance ratings for school districts or buildings. The department shall determine the data to be used for this graphic, which shall include at least the three most recent years of data. (c) A description regarding the weights that are assigned to each component and used to determine an overall performance rating, as prescribed under division (D)(3)(g) of this section, which shall be included in the presentation of the overall performance rating on each report card. (G) When reporting data on student achievement and progress, the department shall disaggregate that data according to the following categories: (1) Performance of students by grade-level; (2) Performance of students by race and ethnic group; (3) Performance of students by gender; (4) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for three or more years; (5) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for more than one year and less than three years; (6) Performance of students grouped by those who have been enrolled in a district or school for one year or less; (7) Performance of students grouped by those who are economically disadvantaged; (8) Performance of students grouped by those who are enrolled in a conversion community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (9) Performance of students grouped by those who are classified as English learners; (10) Performance of students grouped by those who have disabilities; (11) Performance of students grouped by those who are classified as migrants; (12) Performance of students grouped by those who are identified as gifted in superior cognitive ability and the specific academic ability fields of reading and math pursuant to Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code. In disaggregating specific academic ability fields for gifted students, the department shall use data for those students with specific academic ability in math and reading. If any other academic field is assessed, the department shall also include data for students with specific academic ability in that field as well. (13) Performance of students grouped by those who perform in the lowest quintile for achievement on a statewide basis, as determined by a method prescribed by the department. The department may disaggregate data on student performance according to other categories that the department determines are appropriate. To the extent possible, the department shall disaggregate data on student performance according to any combinations of two or more of the categories listed in divisions (G)(1) to (13) of this section that it deems relevant. In reporting data pursuant to division (G) of this section, the department shall not include in the report cards any data statistical in nature that is statistically unreliable or that could result in the identification of individual students. For this purpose, the department shall not report student performance data for any group identified in division (G) of this section that contains less than ten students. If the department does not report student performance data for a group because it contains less than ten students, the department shall indicate on the report card that is why data was not reported. (H) The department may include with the report cards any additional education and fiscal performance data it deems valuable. (I) The department shall include on each report card a list of additional information collected by the department that is available regarding the district or building for which the report card is issued. When available, such additional information shall include student mobility data disaggregated by race and socioeconomic status, college enrollment data, and the reports prepared under section 3302.031 of the Revised Code. The department shall maintain a site on the world wide web. The report card shall include the address of the site and shall specify that such additional information is available to the public at that site. The department shall also provide a copy of each item on the list to the superintendent of each school district. The district superintendent shall provide a copy of any item on the list to anyone who requests it. (J)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (J)(1)(b) of this section, for any district that sponsors a conversion community school under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the department shall combine data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in the community school with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the report card issued for the district under this section or section 3302.033 of the Revised Code. (b) The department shall not combine data from any conversion community school that a district sponsors if a majority of the students enrolled in the conversion community school are enrolled in is a dropout prevention and recovery program that is operated by the community school, as described in division (B)(1) of defined in section 3314.35 3314.02 of the Revised Code. The department shall include as an addendum to the district's report card the ratings and performance measures that are required under section 3314.017 of the Revised Code for any community school to which division (J)(1)(b) of this section applies. This addendum shall include, at a minimum, the data specified in divisions (C)(1)(a), (C)(2), and (C)(3) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (2) Any district that leases a building to a community school located in the district or that enters into an agreement with a community school located in the district whereby the district and the school endorse each other's programs may elect to have data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in the community school combined with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the district report card. Any district that so elects shall annually file a copy of the lease or agreement with the department. (3) Any municipal school district, as defined in section 3311.71 of the Revised Code, that sponsors a community school located within the district's territory, or that enters into an agreement with a community school located within the district's territory whereby the district and the community school endorse each other's programs, may exercise either or both of the following elections: (a) To have data regarding the academic performance of students enrolled in that community school combined with comparable data from the schools of the district for the purpose of determining the performance of the district as a whole on the district's report card; (b) To have the number of students attending that community school noted separately on the district's report card. The election authorized under division (J)(3)(a) of this section is subject to approval by the governing authority of the community school. Any municipal school district that exercises an election to combine or include data under division (J)(3) of this section, by the first day of October of each year, shall file with the department documentation indicating eligibility for that election, as required by the department. (K) The department shall include on each report card the percentage of teachers in the district or building who are properly certified or licensed teachers, as defined in section 3319.074 of the Revised Code, and a comparison of that percentage with the percentages of such teachers in similar districts and buildings. (L)(1) In calculating English language arts, mathematics, science, American history, or American government assessment passage rates used to determine school district or building performance under this section, the department shall include all students taking an assessment with accommodation or to whom an alternate assessment is administered pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code and all students who take substitute examinations approved under division (B)(4) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code in the subject areas of science, American history and American government. (2) In calculating performance index scores, rates of achievement on the performance indicators established by the department under section 3302.02 of the Revised Code, and annual measurable objectives for determining adequate yearly progress for school districts and buildings under this section, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Include for each district or building only those students who are included in the ADM certified for the first full school week of October and are continuously enrolled in the district or building through the time of the spring administration of any assessment prescribed by division (A)(1) or (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 or division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that is administered to the student's grade level; (b) Include cumulative totals from both the fall and spring administrations of the third grade English language arts achievement assessment and, to the extent possible, the summer administration of that assessment; (c) Include for each district or building any English learner in accordance with the department's plan, as approved by the United States secretary of education, to comply with the "Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 6311 to 6339. As used in this section, "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. (M) Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year and at least once every three years thereafter, the department shall review and may adjust the benchmarks for assigning letter grades or performance ratings to the performance measures and components prescribed under divisions (C)(3), (D), and (E) of this section. Sec. 3302.034. (A) The department of education and workforce shall adopt and specify measures in addition to those included on the report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. The measures adopted under this section shall be reported separately, as specified under division (B) of this section, for each school district, each building in a district, each community school established under Chapter 3314., each STEM school established under Chapter 3326., and each college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. The measures shall include at least the following: (1) Data for students who have passed over a grade or subject area under an acceleration policy prescribed under section 3324.10 of the Revised Code; (2) The number of students who are economically disadvantaged as determined by the department; (3) The number of lead teachers employed by each district and each building once the data is available through the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code; (4) The amount of students screened and identified as gifted under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code; (5) Postgraduate student outcome data as described under division (E)(2)(d)(ii) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code, including postsecondary credit earned, nationally recognized career or technical certification, military enlistment, job placement, and attendance rate; (6) Availability of courses in fine arts; (7) Participation with other school districts to provide career-technical education services to students. (B) The department shall report this information annually beginning with the 2013-2014 school year and make this information available on its web site for comparison purposes. Sec. 3302.20. (A) The department of education and workforce shall develop standards for determining, from the existing data reported in accordance with sections 3301.0714 and 3314.17 of the Revised Code, the amount of annual operating expenditures for classroom instructional purposes and for nonclassroom purposes for each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district, each community school established under Chapter 3314. that is not an internet- or computer-based community school, each internet- or computer-based community school, and each STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. In developing the standards, the department shall adapt existing standards used by professional organizations, research organizations, and other state governments. The department also shall align the expenditure categories required for reporting under the standards with the categories that are required for reporting to the United States department of education under federal law. (B)(1) The department shall categorize all city, exempted village, and local school districts into not less than three nor more than five groups based primarily on average daily student enrollment as reported on the most recent report card issued for each district under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) The department shall categorize all joint vocational school districts into not less than three nor more than five groups based primarily on enrolled ADM as that term is defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code rounded to the nearest whole number. (3) The department shall categorize all community schools that are not internet- or computer-based community schools into not less than three nor more than five groups based primarily on average daily student enrollment as reported on the most recent report card issued for each community school under sections 3302.03 and 3314.012 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a school to which section 3314.017 of the Revised Code applies, on the total number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code. (4) The department shall categorize all internet- or computer-based community schools into a single category. (5) The department shall categorize all STEM schools into a single category. (C) Using the standards adopted under division (A) of this section and the data reported under sections 3301.0714 and 3314.17 of the Revised Code, the department shall compute annually for each fiscal year, the following: (1) The percentage of each district's, community school's, or STEM school's total operating budget spent for classroom instructional purposes; (2) The statewide average percentage for all districts, community schools, and STEM schools combined spent for classroom instructional purposes; (3) The average percentage for each of the categories of districts and schools established under division (B) of this section spent for classroom instructional purposes; (4) The ranking of each district, community school, or STEM school within its respective category established under division (B) of this section according to the following: (a) From highest to lowest percentage spent for classroom instructional purposes; (b) From lowest to highest percentage spent for noninstructional purposes. (5) The total operating expenditures per pupil for each district, community school, and STEM school; (6) The total operating expenditure per equivalent pupils for each district, community school, and STEM school. (D) In its display of rankings within each category under division (C)(4) of this section, the department shall make the following notations: (1) Within each category of city, exempted village, and local school districts, the department shall denote each district that is: (a) Among the twenty per cent of all city, exempted village, and local school districts statewide with the lowest total operating expenditure per equivalent pupils; (b) Among the twenty per cent of all city, exempted village, and local school districts statewide with the highest performance index scores. (2) Within each category of joint vocational school districts, the department shall denote each district that is: (a) Among the twenty per cent of all joint vocational school districts statewide with the lowest total operating expenditure per equivalent pupils; (b) Among the twenty per cent of all joint vocational school districts statewide with the highest report card scores under section 3302.033 of the Revised Code. (3) Within each category of community schools that are not internet- or computer-based community schools, the department shall denote each school that is: (a) Among the twenty per cent of all such community schools statewide with the lowest total operating expenditure per equivalent pupils; (b) Among the twenty per cent of all such community schools statewide with the highest performance index scores, excluding such community schools to which section 3314.017 of the Revised Code applies. (4) Within the category of internet- or computer-based community schools, the department shall denote each school that is: (a) Among the twenty per cent of all such community schools statewide with the lowest total operating expenditure per equivalent pupils; (b) Among the twenty per cent of all such community schools statewide with the highest performance index scores, excluding such community schools to which section 3314.017 of the Revised Code applies. (5) Within the category of STEM schools, the department shall denote each school that is: (a) Among the twenty per cent of all STEM schools statewide with the lowest total operating expenditure per equivalent pupils; (b) Among the twenty per cent of all STEM schools statewide with the highest performance index scores. For purposes of divisions (D)(3)(b) and (4)(b) of this section, the display shall note that, in accordance with section 3314.017 of the Revised Code, a performance index score is not reported for some community schools that serve primarily students enrolled in dropout prevention and recovery programscommunity schools. (E) The department shall post in a prominent location on its web site the information prescribed by divisions (C) and (D) of this section. The department also shall include on each district's, community school's, and STEM school's annual report card issued under section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code the respective information computed for the district or school under divisions (C)(1) and (4) of this section, the statewide information computed under division (C)(2) of this section, and the information computed for the district's or school's category under division (C)(3) of this section. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Internet- or computer-based community school" has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (2) A school district's, community school's, or STEM school's performance index score rank is its performance index score rank as computed under section 3302.21 of the Revised Code. (3) "Expenditure per equivalent pupils" has the same meaning as in section 3302.26 of the Revised Code. (4) "Dropout prevention and recovery community school" has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3302.42. As used in this section, "online learning" has the same meaning as in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. (A) Any local, city, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, with approval of the department of education and workforce, may operate a school using an online learning model. If a school is operated using an online learning model or is to cease operating using an online learning model, the superintendent of the district shall notify the department of that fact not later than the first day of July of the school year for which the change is effective. If any school district school is currently operated using an online learning model on September 30, 2021, the superintendent of the district shall notify the department within sixty days after September 30, 2021, of that fact and request that the school be classified as an online learning school. (1) Districts shall assign all students engaged in online learning to a single school which the department shall designate as a district online school. (2) Districts shall provide all students engaged in online learning a computer, at no cost, for instructional use. Districts shall provide a filtering device or install filtering software that protects against internet access to materials that are obscene or harmful to juveniles on each computer provided to students for instructional use. (3) Districts shall provide all students engaged in online learning access to the internet, at no cost, for instructional use. (4) Districts that operate an online learning school shall provide a comprehensive orientation for students and their parents or guardians prior to enrollment or within thirty days for students enrolled as of September 30, 2021. (5) Online learning schools operated by a district shall implement a learning management system that tracks the time students participate in online learning activities. All student learning activities completed while off-line shall be documented with all participation records checked and approved by the teacher of record. (6) Districts may employ teachers and nonteaching employees necessary to carry out its duties and fulfill its responsibilities under this section or may contract with a nonprofit or for-profit entity to operate the online learning school, including the provision of personnel, related services, curriculum, supplies, equipment, or facilities. (B) The department shall revise any operating standards for school districts adopted under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code to include standards for the operation of online learning under this section. The online learning operation standards shall provide for all of the following: (1) Student-to-teacher ratios whereby no school or classroom is required to have more than one teacher for every one hundred twenty-five students in online learning classrooms; (2) The ability of all students, at any grade level, to earn credits or advance grade levels upon demonstrating mastery of knowledge or skills through competency-based learning models. Credits or grade level advancement shall not be based on a minimum number of days or hours in a classroom. (3) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3313.48 of the Revised Code, a requirement that schools operating using an online learning model have an annual instructional calendar of not less than nine hundred ten hours. (a) For funding purposes, the department shall reduce the full-time equivalence proportionally for any student in an online learning school who participates in less than nine hundred ten hours per school year. The department shall reduce state funding for students assigned to an online learning school operated by a district commensurate with such adjustments to enrollment. (b) The department shall develop a review process and make all adjustments of state funding to districts to reflect any participation of students in online learning schools for less than the equivalent of a full school year. (4) Adequate provisions for: the licensing of teachers, administrators, and other professional personnel and their assignment according to training and qualifications; efficient and effective instructional materials and equipment, including library facilities; the proper organization, administration, and supervision of each school, including regulations for preparing all necessary records and reports and the preparation of a statement of policies and objectives for each school; buildings, grounds, and health and sanitary facilities and services; admission of pupils, and such requirements for their promotion from grade to grade as will ensure that they are capable and prepared for the level of study to which they are certified; requirements for graduation; and such other factors as the board finds necessary. (C) This section does not affect any provisions for the operation of and payments to an internet- or computer-based community school prescribed in Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3305.05. (A) As used in this section and section 3305.051 of the Revised Code, "academic or administrative employee" means any full-time employee not receiving any benefit, allowance, or other payment granted on the employee's account from a state retirement system who, before August 1, 2005, met one of the following requirements: (1) The employee was a member of the faculty of a public institution of higher education. (2) The employee was a member of the administrative staff of a public institution of higher education serving in a position in the unclassified civil service pursuant to section 124.11 of the Revised Code. (3) If section 124.11 of the Revised Code did not apply to the public institution of higher education, the employee was a member of the administrative staff of a public institution of higher education serving in a position comparable to a position in the unclassified civil service. In all cases of doubt, the board of trustees of the public institution of higher education shall determine whether any person is an academic or administrative employee for purposes of this chapter, and the board's decision shall be final. (B)(1) Each person who, on August 1, 2005, is an eligible employee of a public institution of higher education and has accrued less than five years of service credit in a state retirement system may, not later than one hundred twenty days after August 1, 2005, make an election to participate in an alternative retirement plan available at the employing public institution, unless, prior to August 1, 2005, the person had an opportunity pursuant to former section 3305.05 of the Revised Code to make such an election as an academic or administrative employee of that public institution of higher education. (2) An eligible employee whose employment with a public institution of higher education commences on or after August 1, 2005, may, not later than one hundred twenty days after the starting date of the employment, make an election to participate in an alternative retirement plan available at the employing public institution. (3) An eligible employee who, on or after August 1, 2005, terminates employment at one public institution of higher education and subsequently is employed by another public institution of higher education in a position for which an alternative retirement plan is available may, not later than one hundred twenty days after the starting date of the employment, elect to participate in an alternative retirement plan available at that public institution. (C)(1) An eligible employee who makes an election to participate in an alternative retirement plan under division (B) of this section shall submit make the election in writing and sign the election. The public institution of higher education employing the eligible employee may permit the employee to sign the election by electronic signature. The employee shall submit the election to the designated officer of the employee's employing public institution of higher education. Once submitted, the election is irrevocable while the eligible employee continues to be employed by the public institution of higher education. Not later than ten days after the election becomes irrevocable, the officer shall file a certified copy of the election with the state retirement system to which, apart from the election, the employee's employment would be subject. Each public institution of higher education that employs a person eligible to make an election under division (B) of this section shall notify, in writing, the state retirement system that applies to that employment in the manner specified by that state retirement system. The notice shall include the person's name and address. The notice shall be given not later than ten days after the first date the person is on the institution's payroll. (2) Elections made under division (B) of this section take effect as follows: (a) An election under division (B)(1) of this section is effective as of the date on which the employee's election to participate in the alternative retirement plan becomes irrevocable. (b) An election under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section is effective as of the electing employee's starting date of employment. (3) An eligible employee's election under division (B) of this section applies to the employee's employment in all positions at that public institution, unless the employee terminates employment at the public institution and does not return to employment in any position at that public institution for at least three hundred sixty-five days after the date of termination. (4) An eligible employee who makes an election under division (B) of this section is forever barred from claiming or purchasing service credit under any state retirement system for the period of employment while the election is in effect. (D)(1) An eligible employee who fails to make an election under division (B) of this section within the one-hundred-twenty day election period shall be deemed to have elected to participate in the state retirement system that applies to the employee's employment. (2) An eligible employee who fails to make an election under division (B) of this section shall not be permitted to make an election for employment in any other position at the public institution of higher education while employed at that public institution, unless the employee terminates employment at the public institution and does not return to employment in any position at the public institution for at least three hundred sixty-five days after the date of termination. Sec. 3305.053. (A) The board of trustees of a public institution of higher education shall permit an employee who makes an election under section 3305.05 or 3305.051 of the Revised Code to do all both of the following: (A) (1) Select, from among the providers that have entered into an agreement with the public institution of higher education under section 3305.04 of the Revised Code, the provider of an investment option for that employee; (B) (2) Subject to any terms and conditions established by the public institution of higher education, change the provider selected under division (A) (A)(1) of this section any time during the plan year. (B) A public institution of higher education may allow an employee who seeks to change the employee's provider under division (A)(2) of this section to sign a form to change providers by electronic signature. (C) If under division (B) (A)(2) of this section an employee changes providers, the employee may direct the provider to transfer to the new provider the employee's account balance either in whole or in part, as directed by the employee, except that the provider is not required to immediately transfer any part of the account invested at the employee's election in a fixed annuity account if the contract with the employee under which the investment was made permits the provider to make such a transfer over a period of time not exceeding ten years and the contract was filed with and approved by the department of insurance pursuant to section 3911.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3307.044. The state teachers retirement board shall appoint a committee to oversee the selection of an internal auditor. The committee shall select one or more persons for employment as an internal auditor. The board shall employ the person or persons selected by the committee. The committee shall consist of the following board members: one retirant the retired teacher member, one contributing member, one ex officio member, and any additional board members appointed to the committee by the board. The committee shall annually prepare and submit to the Ohio retirement study council a report of its actions during the preceding year. Sec. 3307.05. (A) The state teachers retirement board shall consist of the following members: (A)(1) The director of education and workforce or a designee of the director who has the following qualifications: (1)(a) The designee is a resident of this state. (2)(b) Within the three years immediately preceding the appointment, the designee has not been employed by the public employees retirement system, police and fire pension fund, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, or state highway patrol retirement system or by any person, partnership, or corporation that has provided to one of those retirement systems services of a financial or investment nature, including the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (3) (c) The designee has direct experience in the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (B) One member(2) The chancellor of higher education or a designee of the chancellor who has the following qualifications: (a) The designee is a resident of this state. (b) Within the three years immediately preceding the appointment, the designee has not been employed by the public employees retirement system, police and fire pension fund, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, or state highway patrol retirement system or by any person, partnership, or corporation that has provided to one of those retirement systems services of a financial or investment nature, including the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (c) The designee has direct experience in the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (3) Two members, known as the treasurer of state's investment designeedesignees, who shall be appointed by the treasurer of state for a term terms of four years unless removed or replaced by the treasurer of state pursuant to division (B) of this section, and who have the following qualifications: (1)(a) The member is a resident members are residents of this state. (2)(b) Within the three years immediately preceding the appointment, the member has members have not been employed by the public employees retirement system, police and fire pension fund, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, or state highway patrol retirement system or by any person, partnership, or corporation that has provided to one of those retirement systems services of a financial or investment nature, including management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (3)(c) The member has members have direct experience in the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (4)(d) The member is members are not currently employed by the state or a political subdivision of the state. (e) The members do not have contributions on deposit with the state teachers retirement system. (C) Two (4) Four members, known as the investment expert members, who shall be appointed for four-year terms unless removed or replaced by the appointing authority pursuant to division (B) of this section. One investment expert member shall be appointed by the governor, and one investment expert member shall be jointly appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate, one investment expert member shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, and one investment expert member shall be appointed by the president of the senate. Each investment expert member shall have the following qualifications: (1)(a) Each member shall be a resident of this state. (2)(b) Within the three years immediately preceding the appointment, each member shall not have been employed by the public employees retirement system, police and fire pension fund, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, or state highway patrol retirement system or by any person, partnership, or corporation that has provided to one of those retirement systems services of a financial or investment nature, including the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (3)(c) Each member shall have direct experience in the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets. (d) No member shall have contributions on deposit with the state teachers retirement system. Any investment expert member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office until the end of such term. The member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. (D) Five (5) Two members, known as contributing members, who shall be members of the state teachers retirement system; (E) Two (6) One former members member of the system, known as the retired teacher membersmember, who shall be superannuatesa superannuate. (B) Notwithstanding section 3307.061 of the Revised Code, each appointed member of the board serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Sec. 3307.06. (A) Annually on On the first Monday of May of each even-numbered year, one contributing member, as defined in division (D)(A)(5) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code, shall be elected by ballot to the state teachers retirement board, except that, beginning with the annual election for contributing members in May, 1978, and in the annual election of each fourth year thereafter, two contributing members shall be elected to the board. Elected contributing members shall begin their respective terms of office on the first day of September following their election and shall serve for a term of four years. (B) The retired teacher members member of the board, as defined in division (E)(A)(6) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code, shall be elected for a term of four years. The retired teacher members member shall be elected to the board at the annual election for contributing members of the board, as provided in division (A) of this section, in the year in which the term of the current retired teacher members member would expire. The retired teacher members member shall begin their respective terms the member's term of office on the first day of September following their the member's election. No contributing member of the board who retires while a member of the board shall be eligible to become a retired teacher member of the board for three years after the date of the member's retirement. (C) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, if a vacancy occurs during the term of office of any elected member of the board, the remaining members of the board shall elect a successor member. On certification of the election results in accordance with rules adopted under section 3307.075 of the Revised Code the successor member shall hold office until the first day of the new term that follows the next board election that occurs not less than ninety days after the successor member's election, or until the end of the term for which the successor member was elected, whichever is sooner. The successor member shall qualify for board membership under the same division of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code as the member's predecessor in office. Elections under this division shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted under section 3307.075 of the Revised Code. (D) If as a result of changed circumstances an elected member of the board would no longer qualify for board membership under that division of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code on the basis of which the member was elected, or if such a member fails to attend the meetings of the board for four months or longer without being excused, the member's position on the board shall be considered vacant, and a successor member shall be elected under this division for the remainder of the unexpired term. (E) A successor member need not be elected under division (C) of this section to fill a vacancy if on the day the vacancy occurs less than ninety days remain in the vacated term. Sec. 3307.07. All elections of members of the state teachers retirement board shall be held under the direction of the board in accordance with rules adopted under section 3307.075 of the Revised Code. Any member of the state teachers retirement system, who has been nominated by a petition that is signed by five hundred or more members of the system and certified in accordance with rules adopted under section 3307.075 of the Revised Code, shall be eligible for election as a contributing member of the board. The petition shall contain the signatures of twenty or more members of the system from each of at least ten counties wherein members of the system are employed. Any retired teacher who is a superannuate and a resident of Ohio is eligible for election as a retired teacher member of the board, if such retired teacher has been nominated by a petition that is signed by five hundred or more retired teachers, who are also superannuates, and certified in accordance with rules adopted under section 3307.075 of the Revised Code. The petition shall contain the signatures of twenty or more retired teachers from each of at least ten counties wherein superannuates under the system reside. The board shall place the name of any eligible candidate upon the appropriate ballot as a regular candidate. At any election, qualified voters, as defined in this section, may vote for the regular candidates or for other eligible candidates, in which case the names of such persons shall be written upon the appropriate ballots, except that members of the system and former members of the system who are superannuates shall vote respectively for contributing members and the retired teacher members member of the board. The candidate who receives the highest number of votes for any term of office shall be elected to the board on certification of the election results in accordance with rules adopted under section 3307.075 of the Revised Code. If, at any election, contributing members or retired teacher members are to be elected for concurrent terms, eligible candidates shall be placed on the ballot, and the candidates who receive the highest numbers of votes shall be elected to the board on certification of the election results in accordance with rules adopted under section 3307.075 of the Revised Code. Elected members of the board shall be elected on the basis of the total number of ballots cast by qualified voters, who shall consist of members of the system and former members of the system who are superannuates. Sec. 3307.073. (A) No person shall knowingly fail to file a complete and accurate campaign finance statement or independent expenditure statement in accordance with section 3307.072 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, during the course of a person seeking nomination for, and during any campaign for, election to the state teachers retirement board, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the nomination or the outcome of the campaign do any of the following by means of campaign materials, an advertisement on radio or television or in a newspaper or periodical, a public speech, press release, or otherwise: (1) With regard to a candidate, identify the candidate in a manner that implies that the candidate is a member of the board or use the term "re-elect" when the candidate is not currently a member of the board; (2) Make a false statement concerning the formal schooling or training completed or attempted by a candidate; a degree, diploma, certificate, scholarship, grant, award, prize, or honor received, earned, or held by a candidate; or the period of time during which a candidate attended any school, college, community technical school, or institution; (3) Make a false statement concerning the professional, occupational, or vocational licenses held by a candidate, or concerning any position the candidate held for which the candidate received a salary or wages; (4) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been indicted or convicted of a theft offense, extortion, or other crime involving financial corruption or moral turpitude; (5) Make a statement that a candidate has been indicted for any crime or has been the subject of a finding by the Ohio elections commission, the secretary of state, or the Ohio election integrity commission without disclosing the outcome of any legal proceedings resulting from the indictment or finding; (6) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has a record of treatment or confinement for mental disorder; (7) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been subjected to military discipline for criminal misconduct or dishonorably discharged from the armed services; (8) Falsely identify the source of a statement, issue statements under the name of another person without authorization, or falsely state the endorsement of or opposition to a candidate by a person or publication; (9) Make a false statement concerning the voting record of a candidate or board member; (10) Post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise disseminate a false statement concerning a candidate, either knowing the same to be false or with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not, if the statement is designed to promote the election, nomination, or defeat of the candidate. Sec. 3307.074. The secretary of state, or any person acting on personal knowledge and subject to the penalties of perjury, may file a A complaint with the Ohio elections commission alleging a violation of section 3307.073 of the Revised Code may be filed in accordance with section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. The complaint shall be made on a form prescribed and provided by the commission. On receipt of a complaint under this section, the commission shall hold a hearing open to the public to determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. The commission may administer oaths and issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. On the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold contempt proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. The commission shall provide the person accused of the violation at least seven days prior notice of the time, date, and place of the hearing. The accused may be represented by an attorney and shall have an opportunity to present evidence, call witnesses, and cross-examine witnesses. At the hearing, the commission shall determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. If the commission determines that a violation of division (A) of section 3307.073 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall either impose a fine under section 3307.99 of the Revised Code or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose the fine. If the commission determines that a violation of division (B) of section 3307.073 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall impose the fine described in section 3307.99 of the Revised Code, refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor, or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose a fine or refer the matter to a prosecutor. Sec. 3307.10. (A)(A)(1) The members of the state teachers retirement board holding office under divisions (A)(3) to (6) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code, for their service on the board, are entitled to both of the following: (a) Two hundred dollars for each regular board meeting attended, provided that no member shall be entitled to more than four hundred dollars per month, regardless of the number of regular board meetings held in a month; (b) Health care benefits comparable to those generally available to employees of the state teachers retirement system. (2) Except as provided in division (A)(3) of this section, the members of the board other than the appointed members described under division (A)(1) of this section shall serve without compensation, except that . (3) All of the members of the board shall be reimbursed from the expense fund for all actual necessary expenses incurred while serving on the board. (4) The payment to which a board member is entitled for attending a regular board meeting under division (A)(1)(a) of this section does not entitle the member to payment for attending a special meeting or a committee meeting of the board. (5) Health care benefits provided to a board member under division (A)(1)(b) of this section shall be provided on the same terms and at the same cost as to employees of the system. (B) The board may secure insurance coverage designed to indemnify board members and employees for their actions or conduct in the performance of official duties, and may pay required premiums for such coverage from the expense fund. (C) If the officers of the board determine that a meeting of the entire membership, or any part thereof, is necessary, such determination shall be final, and contributing members shall be given time off from their employment to attend any such meeting. The employer of a contributing member shall not reduce the member's earned compensation as a teacher or any contribution required under section 3307.26 of the Revised Code, because of the contributing member's absence from employment to attend any such meeting. The portion of the employer contribution required under section 3307.28 of the Revised Code that represents earned compensation of a contributing member paid for the period of an absence from employment to attend a board meeting, shall be annually transferred from the expense fund and forwarded to the employer of the contributing member. (D) The board shall adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code establishing a policy for reimbursement of travel expenses incurred by board members in the performance of their official duties. As part of any audit performed under Chapter 117. of the Revised Code, an inquiry shall be made into whether board members have complied with these rules. (E) No board member shall accept payment or reimbursement for travel expenses, other than for meals and other food and beverages provided to the member, from any source other than the expense fund. Except in the case of an emergency, no out-of-state travel expenses shall be reimbursed unless approved in advance by a majority of the board at a regular board meeting. (F) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in sections 145.38, 742.26, 3307.35, or 3309.341 of the Revised Code, a board member's service on the board shall not forfeit the member's allowance or benefit under any of those sections. Sec. 3307.11. The state teachers retirement board shall elect from its membership, a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. A member of the board who has contributions on deposit with the state teachers retirement system is not eligible to serve as chairperson or vice-chairperson. The board shall employ an executive director who shall serve as secretary, and shall employ other persons necessary to operate the system and to fulfill the board's duties and responsibilities under Chapter 3307. of the Revised Code. Effective ninety days after the effective date of this amendment September 15, 2004, the board may not employ a state retirement system investment officer, as defined in section 1707.01 of the Revised Code, who does not hold a valid state retirement system investment officer license issued by the division of securities in the department of commerce. The compensation of all employees and all other expenses of the board necessary for the proper operation of the system shall be paid in such amounts as the board approves. Every expense voucher of an employee, officer, or board member of the state teachers retirement system shall itemize all purchases and expenditures. The board shall receive all applications for retirement under the plans described in section 3307.031 of the Revised Code, shall provide for the payment of all retirement allowances and other benefits payable under this chapter, and shall make other expenditures authorized by this chapter. Sec. 3307.27. The (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the contributions required under section 3307.26 of the Revised Code may be paid by the employer in accordance with division (h) of section 414 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 414(h), as amended. (B) The contributions required under section 3307.26 of the Revised Code shall not be paid by a school district board of education on behalf of a contributor employed by the school district as a superintendent or principal, but may be treated as paid by the school district board of education in accordance with division (h) of section 414 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 414(h). Sec. 3307.99. (A) Whoever violates division (A) of section 3307.073 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of the violation. (B) Whoever violates division (B) of section 3307.073 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for not more than six months or fined not more than five thousand dollars, or both. (C) Fines imposed by the Ohio elections commission under this section shall be paid into the Ohio elections commission fund created under section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3309.073. (A) No person shall knowingly fail to file a complete and accurate campaign finance statement or independent expenditure statement in accordance with section 3309.072 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, during the course of a person seeking nomination for, and during any campaign for, election to the school employees retirement board, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the nomination or the outcome of the campaign do any of the following by means of campaign materials, an advertisement on radio or television or in a newspaper or periodical, a public speech, press release, or otherwise: (1) With regard to a candidate, identify the candidate in a manner that implies that the candidate is a member of the board or use the term "re-elect" when the candidate is not currently a member of the board; (2) Make a false statement concerning the formal schooling or training completed or attempted by a candidate; a degree, diploma, certificate, scholarship, grant, award, prize, or honor received, earned, or held by a candidate; or the period of time during which a candidate attended any school, college, community technical school, or institution; (3) Make a false statement concerning the professional, occupational, or vocational licenses held by a candidate, or concerning any position the candidate held for which the candidate received a salary or wages; (4) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been indicted or convicted of a theft offense, extortion, or other crime involving financial corruption or moral turpitude; (5) Make a statement that a candidate has been indicted for any crime or has been the subject of a finding by the Ohio elections commission, the secretary of state, or the Ohio election integrity commission without disclosing the outcome of any legal proceedings resulting from the indictment or finding; (6) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has a record of treatment or confinement for mental disorder; (7) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been subjected to military discipline for criminal misconduct or dishonorably discharged from the armed services; (8) Falsely identify the source of a statement, issue statements under the name of another person without authorization, or falsely state the endorsement of or opposition to a candidate by a person or publication; (9) Make a false statement concerning the voting record of a candidate or board member; (10) Post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise disseminate a false statement concerning a candidate, either knowing the same to be false or with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not, if the statement is designed to promote the election, nomination, or defeat of the candidate. Sec. 3309.074. The secretary of state, or any person acting on personal knowledge and subject to the penalties of perjury, may file a A complaint with the Ohio elections commission alleging a violation of section 3309.073 of the Revised Code may be filed in accordance with section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. The complaint shall be made on a form prescribed and provided by the commission. A complaint shall be filed not later than two years after the occurrence of the act or failure to act that is the subject of the complaint, except that if the act or failure to act involves fraud, concealment, or misrepresentation and was not discovered during that two-year period, a complaint may be filed not later than one year after discovery of the act or failure to act. On receipt of a complaint under this section, the commission shall hold a hearing open to the public to determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. The commission may administer oaths and issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. On the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold contempt proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. The commission shall provide the person accused of the violation at least seven days prior notice of the time, date, and place of the hearing. The accused may be represented by an attorney and shall have an opportunity to present evidence, call witnesses, and cross-examine witnesses. At the hearing, the commission shall determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. If the commission determines that a violation of division (A) of section 3309.073 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall either impose a fine under section 3309.99 of the Revised Code or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose the fine. If the commission determines that a violation of division (B) of section 3309.073 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall impose the fine described in section 3309.99 of the Revised Code, refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor, or enter a finding that good cause has been shown to not impose a fine or refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor. Sec. 3309.47. Each school employees retirement system contributor shall contribute eight per cent of the contributor's compensation to the employees' savings fund, except that the school employees retirement board may raise the contribution rate to a rate not greater than ten per cent of compensation. The contributions required under this section shall not be paid by a school district board of education on behalf of a contributor employed by the school district as a treasurer, but may be treated as employer contributions for purposes of state and federal income tax deferred income provisions. The contributions by the direction of the school employees retirement board shall be deducted by the employer from the compensation of each contributor on each payroll of such contributor for each payroll period and shall be an amount equal to the required per cent of such contributor's compensation. On a finding by the board that an employer has failed or refused to deduct contributions for any employee during any year and to transmit such amounts to the retirement system, the retirement board may make a determination of the amount of the delinquent contributions, including interest at a rate set by the retirement board, from the end of each year, and certify to the employer the amounts for collection. If the amount is not paid by the employer, it may be certified for collection in the same manner as payments due the employers' trust fund. Any amounts so collected shall be held in trust pending receipt of a report of contributions for the employee for the period involved as provided by law and, thereafter, the amount in trust shall be transferred to the employee's savings fund to the credit of the employee. Any amount remaining after the transfer to the employees' savings fund shall be transferred to the employers' trust fund as a credit of the employer. Additional deposits may be made to a member's account. At retirement, the amount deposited with interest may be used to provide additional annuity income. The additional deposits may be refunded to the member before retirement, and shall be refunded if the member withdraws the member's refundable amount. The deposits may be refunded to the beneficiary or estate if the member dies before retirement, and the board shall determine whether regular interest shall be credited to deposits thus refunded. Sec. 3309.99. (A) Whoever violates division (A) of section 3309.073 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of the violation. (B) Whoever violates division (B) of section 3309.073 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for not more than six months or fined not more than five thousand dollars, or both. (C) Fines imposed by the Ohio elections commission under this section shall be paid into the Ohio elections commission fund created under section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.033. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Foster child" means a child placed with a foster caregiver, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Qualifying student" means a student who is not entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code in a school district in which the pilot project scholarship program is operating under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (3) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (4) "Sibling" means any of the following: (a) A brother, half-brother, sister, or half-sister by birth, marriage, or adoption; (b) A cousin by birth, marriage, or adoption who is residing in the same household; (c) A foster child who is residing in the same household, including a child who is subsequently adopted by the child's foster family; (d) A child residing in the same household who is placed with a guardian or legal custodian; (e) A child who is residing in the same household and is being cared for by a kinship caregiver; (f) Any other child under eighteen years of age who has resided in the same household for at least forty-five consecutive days within the last calendar year. (5) "Caretaker" means the parent of a minor child or a relative acting in the parent's place. "Caretaker" also means another responsible adult who has care of the child and in whose household the child resides and, if not for residing in that household, the child would be homeless or likely to be homeless. (B) Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, a qualifying student shall be eligible for an educational choice scholarship under section 3310.03 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the student is enrolled in a school building described in division (A)(1) or (C) of that section, if any of the following apply: (1) The student's sibling received an educational choice scholarship under section 3310.03 of the Revised Code for the school year immediately prior to the school year for which the student is seeking a scholarship; (2) The student is a foster child; (3) The student is a child placed with a guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver; (4) The student is not a child placed with a guardian, legal custodian, or kinship caregiver, but has resided in the same household as such a child for at least forty-five consecutive days within the last calendar year; (5) The student is not a foster child, but resides in a home that has received certification under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (6) The student satisfies all of the following conditions: (a) The student is not a foster child or a student described in division (B)(4) of this section. (b) The student has resided in the household of an individual who is not the student's parent or guardian for at least forty-five consecutive days within the last calendar year and, if not for residing in that household, the student would have been homeless. (c) The student's parent or guardian resides in this state. (7) The student is not a child described in division (B)(6) of this section, but has resided in the same household as a child described in that division for at least forty-five consecutive days within the last calendar year. (C) A student who receives an educational choice scholarship under this section remains eligible for that scholarship and may continue to receive a scholarship in subsequent school years until the student completes grade twelve, so long as the student satisfies the conditions specified in divisions (D)(2) and (3) of section 3310.03 of the Revised Code. (D) The department of education and workforce may request any individual applying for a scholarship under this section on behalf of a qualifying student to provide appropriate documentation, as defined by the department, that the student meets the eligibility qualifications prescribed under this section. In the case of a student who qualifies under division (B)(6) of this section, such documentation shall be provided by the student's parent, guardian, or caretaker. Sec. 3310.037. A student is not eligible to receive an educational choice scholarship awarded under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code if the treasurer of state has established an educational savings account for the student under section 3310.23 of the Revised Code for the school year for which the scholarship is sought. Sec. 3310.21. As used in this section and sections 3310.22 to 3310.26 of the Revised Code: (A) "Chartered nonpublic school" has the same meaning as in section 3310.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "Community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (C) "Parent" has the same meaning as in section 3313.98 of the Revised Code. (D) "Participating school" means a nonchartered nonpublic school that participates in the nonchartered educational savings account program in accordance with section 3310.25 of the Revised Code. (E) "Resident district" means the school district in which a student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (F) "Scholarship account" means an educational savings account established under section 3310.23 of the Revised Code. (G) "School district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district. (H) "State scholarship" means a scholarship awarded under the educational choice scholarship pilot program established under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code, the autism scholarship program established under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program established under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code, or the pilot project scholarship program established under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (I) "STEM school" means a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.22. (A) The nonchartered educational savings account program is established to begin operating for the 2026-2027 school year. The treasurer of state shall administer the program with the assistance of the department of education and workforce. Under the program, the treasurer of state shall establish an educational savings account for each participating student to purchase educational goods and services, including tuition at participating schools. Funding for each educational savings account shall be transferred by the department of education and workforce from the nonchartered educational savings account unit, as defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, in accordance with section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (B) The department shall establish a system under which a student, parent, participating school, or any other individual may submit a complaint about an alleged violation of the program's requirements. The department shall investigate each complaint that it receives. During the investigation, the department shall provide updates to and respond to questions from both the subject of the complaint and the party who submitted the complaint. The department shall complete each investigation promptly. Upon completion of an investigation, the department shall submit to the party who submitted a complaint, the subject of the complaint, and the treasurer of state a report regarding the investigation's findings, including whether the program's requirements were violated. If the department's report indicates the program's requirements were violated, the treasurer of state shall determine a resolution to the complaint and require corrective actions to be taken, including remediation plans and other potential consequences for the subject of the complaint. (C) The treasurer of state shall establish due process procedures for individuals and participating schools who are determined noncompliant with the requirements of the program under this section and sections 3310.24 and 3310.25 of the Revised Code. The procedures shall provide an individual or school with at least a notice of the noncompliance determination, an opportunity for a hearing regarding it, and an opportunity to appeal it prior to the treasurer of state determining a resolution or undertaking any action regarding it. Sec. 3310.23. (A) Not later than February 1, 2026, the treasurer of state shall develop an application procedure for the nonchartered educational savings account program. Under the procedure, the treasurer of state shall open an application period for a school year on the first day of February immediately prior to the first day of July of that school year. The parent of a student enrolled in a participating school may submit an application to participate in the program during that application period. The treasurer of state shall accept and process each application that is submitted. The application shall require the parent to do all of the following: (1) Provide the student's and parent's names and address; (2) Provide documentation verifying the student's enrollment and attendance at a participating school; (3) Provide the student's participating school's tuition and fee schedule; (4) Affirm that the student will take a nationally recognized standardized achievement assessment; (5) If the parent is reapplying for a scholarship account in accordance with division (C) of this section, provide the student's nationally recognized standardized achievement assessment scores for the prior school year. As a matter of convenience, the student's participating school may submit the nationally recognized standardized achievement assessment scores on behalf of the student's parent. (6) Affirm the parent will maintain records and related documentation regarding educational expenses on which the parent spends funds from the scholarship account, including any receipts for tuition, fees, textbooks, and curriculum materials; (7) Affirm the parent will not enroll the student in a school district, community school, STEM school, or chartered nonpublic school while the student is participating in the program; (8) Affirm the parent will not use funds in a scholarship account for any purpose other than those described in division (A) of section 3310.24 of the Revised Code; (9) Provide other information determined necessary by the treasurer of state. (B) For an educational savings account sought for the 2026-2027 school year, and for each school year thereafter, the treasurer of state shall approve a completed application submitted on behalf of a student, and establish an educational savings account for that student, if both of the following apply: (1) The student is enrolling in any of grades kindergarten through twelve in a participating school for the school year for which an account is sought. (2) The student has not received a state scholarship for the school year for which an account is sought. (C) A student for whom an educational savings account is established under this section for a school year shall be required to reapply under this section to have an account established for a subsequent school year. The treasurer of state shall notify parents of students for whom a scholarship account is established of the renewal process, the deadline for renewal, and that failure to renew in a timely manner may result in a temporary suspension of access to funds until an account is renewed. The treasurer of state shall provide support to ensure a smooth transition from school year to school year for renewing parents and students. (D) To the extent practicable, the treasurer of state shall establish a scholarship account prior to the start of the school year for which it is sought if the parent submits an application prior to the school year's start. Sec. 3310.24. (A) Funds transferred by the department of education and workforce under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to a scholarship account established for a student shall be used by the student's parent to pay for tuition and fees at a participating school. Any funds remaining in the scholarship account after paying for tuition and fees shall be used for curriculum, textbooks, instructional materials, and supplies. (B) Upon request of the parent of a student for whom a scholarship account is established, the treasurer of state shall disburse funds from that account by either of the following methods as selected by the parent: (1) The treasurer of state shall disburse funds directly to an approved vendor who provides educational goods or services described in division (A) of this section to the student. The treasurer of state shall establish a process to solicit and approve vendors for the purposes of this section. Under that process, a participating school that complies with the requirements prescribed under section 3310.25 of the Revised Code shall be considered an approved vendor. (2) The treasurer of state shall disburse funds to reimburse the student's parent for any costs incurred by the parent for educational goods or services described in division (A) of this section for that student. Prior to disbursing funds to reimburse a parent, the treasurer of state shall require that the parent provide appropriate documentation, as determined by the treasurer of state, that the costs incurred by the parent are in accordance with division (A) of this section. (C) Any refund or other repayment of funds by a participating school or other educational provider shall be returned to the student's scholarship account. Such a refund or repayment shall not be made directly to the student or the student's parent. (D) If a student for whom a scholarship account has been established for a school year disenrolls from the student's participating school and does not enroll in a different participating school during that school year, the treasurer of state shall transfer the balance of any funds in the student's account, including any prorated refund from a participating school, to the general revenue fund. The treasurer shall transfer funds under this division on the first day of January and the first day of July of each year. (E) If the parent of a student for whom a scholarship account is established for a school year reapplies to have an account established for the immediately subsequent school year, the treasurer of state shall, on the thirtieth day of June of the school year for which the account is established, transfer to the student's new account the balance of funds in the student's old account. (F) If the parent of a student for whom a scholarship account is established for a school year does not reapply to have a new account established for the immediately subsequent school year, the treasurer of state shall, on the first day of July of the year following the school year for which the account is established, transfer the balance of any funds in the student's old account to the general revenue fund. (G) Nothing in this section prohibits the parent of a student for whom a scholarship account is established from making payments for the costs of educational goods and services not covered by the funds in that account. However, the parent of a student shall not deposit funds in the student's scholarship account. (H) The treasurer of state may conduct random audits to verify that parents are using funds from a student's scholarship account in accordance with this section. If the treasurer of state determines a misuse of funds, the treasurer of state shall take any action the treasurer of state determines appropriate, including suspension or termination of a student's participation in the program. (I) The treasurer of state shall certify to the office of budget and management the amount of funds transferred to the general revenue fund under divisions (D) and (F) of this section. Sec. 3310.25. (A) A nonchartered nonpublic school that elects to participate in the nonchartered educational savings account program for a school year shall notify the treasurer of state of that fact by a deadline established by the treasurer of state. (B) Each nonchartered nonpublic school that participates in the program shall do all of the following: (1) Maintain records and related documentation regarding the educational expenses on which the school spends the funds it receives under the program, including receipts for tuition, textbooks, and curricula; (2) Maintain a physical location in the state at which each student has regular and direct contact with teachers. For the purposes of this section, "physical location" does not include a building that primarily serves as a residence. (3) Notify the treasurer of state and the department of education and workforce of any change in the school's name, school director, mailing address, or physical location within fifteen days of the change; (4) Require the parent of a student for whom a scholarship account is established to endorse the use of funds from a scholarship account by the school or approve the transfer of funds from the scholarship account to the school. (C) Each nonchartered nonpublic school that participates in the program shall comply with the requirements prescribed under the program. However, such schools are autonomous and not an agent of the state or federal governments. Therefore, all of the following apply: (1) The treasurer of state shall not regulate the curriculum, instructional methods, or other aspects of a school's educational program. (2) The program does not expand the authority of the treasurer of state to impose on nonchartered nonpublic schools any additional requirements beyond those expressly prescribed under the program. (3) Nonchartered nonpublic schools that participate in the program shall be given maximum freedom to provide for the educational needs of their students. (D) The treasurer of state may remove a nonchartered nonpublic school from the list of schools participating in the program if the treasurer of state determines the school has failed to comply with the requirements prescribed under this section. (E)(1) The treasurer of state shall provide the department with the list of nonchartered nonpublic schools that participate in the program. (2) Annually, the department shall do all of the following regarding each nonchartered nonpublic school that participates in the program: (a) Verify the school has filed with the department, in accordance with section 3301.0732 of the Revised Code, a copy of the report prescribed under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code; (b) Request from the board of health of the city or general health district in which the school's physical location is located a copy of any report of any inspection conducted by the board of health of that physical location; (c) Request from the state fire marshal a copy of any report of any fire inspection of the school's physical location; (d) Prepare and submit to the treasurer of state a report regarding whether, based on the information collected under divisions (E)(2)(a) to (c) of this section, the school is compliant with the minimum education standards and health, fire, and safety laws. (3) If the department's report under division (E)(2)(d) of this section demonstrates that a school is not compliant, the treasurer of state shall take any action the treasurer of state determines appropriate against the school. (F)(1) The department shall compile the scores attained by students with a scholarship account and provided to the treasurer of state under section 3310.23 of the Revised Code. The department shall aggregate the scores as follows: (a) By state, which shall include all students with a scholarship account; (b) By school district, which shall include all students with a scholarship account and for whom the district is the student's resident district; (c) By nonchartered nonpublic school, which shall include all students with a scholarship account and who were enrolled in that school. (2) The department shall disaggregate the student performance data described in division (F)(1) of this section according to the following categories: (a) Grade level; (b) Race and ethnicity; (c) Gender; (d) Students with a scholarship account who have participated in the program for three or more years; (e) Students with a scholarship account who have participated in the program for more than one year and less than three years; (f) Students with a scholarship account who have participated in the program for one year or less; (g) Economically disadvantaged students. (3) Not later than the first day of February each year, the department shall post the student performance data required under divisions (F)(1) and (F)(2) of this section on its web site. In reporting student performance data under this division, the department shall not include any data that is statistically unreliable or that could result in the identification of individual students. For this purpose, the department shall not report performance data for any group that contains less than ten students. (4) Not later than July 1, 2026, the department shall develop a measure of student growth for students with scholarship accounts that are enrolled in nonchartered nonpublic schools. The measure of student growth shall be used to report data annually on student growth for students in grades four through eight during the school year in which data is reported. No data shall be reported for schools with fewer than ten students with scholarship accounts. The department shall make the growth reports available on its publicly accessible web site. (5) The treasurer of state shall collect and provide to the department any data necessary for the department to perform its duties under this division. (G) The treasurer of state may conduct random audits to verify that nonchartered nonpublic schools that participate in the program are using funds received under the program in accordance with this section. If the treasurer of state determines a misuse of funds, the treasurer of state shall take any action the treasurer of state determines appropriate, including suspension or termination of a school's participation in the program. Sec. 3310.26. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Adjusted gross income" has the same meaning as in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Base amount" means an amount equal to the maximum educational choice scholarship amount for the student's grade level under division (A)(10)(a)(ii)(I) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code for the fiscal year multiplied by 0.75. (3) "Constant multiplier" means 0.50. (4) "Federal poverty level multiplier" means a percentage equal to the student's family income percentage of the federal poverty guidelines for the fiscal year. (5) "Federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning as in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code. (6) "Minimum amount" means an amount equal to the base amount for the fiscal year multiplied by 0.10. (7) "Power equation" means the following formula: The federal poverty level multiplier X ln(constant multiplier) (B) The department of education and workforce shall determine the scholarship amount for a student for whom a scholarship account is established for a fiscal year, as follows: (1) For a student with a family adjusted gross income at or below four hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines for the fiscal year, the base amount; (2) For a student with a family adjusted gross income above four hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty guidelines, an amount calculated according to the following formula: The base amount X (1 / the constant multiplier)^4.5 X e^power equation If the amount calculated for a student under division (B)(2) of this division is less than the minimum amount, the student's scholarship amount shall be the minimum amount. (C) For the purposes of calculating a scholarship amount for a student under this section, the department shall require a student's parent to submit documentation regarding the student's family income. The department shall use the documentation submitted for the first school year that the student has a scholarship amount calculated under this section to calculate the amount for that school year and each subsequent school year, unless, for a subsequent school year, the parent requests the department recalculate the student's scholarship amount based on updated documentation. A parent shall submit documentation, or a request for a recalculation, to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the department. Sec. 3310.41. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Alternative public provider" means either of the following providers that agrees to enroll a child in the provider's special education program to implement the child's individualized education program or an education plan developed by the school district under division (K)(L) of this section and to which the child's parent owes fees for the services provided to the child: (a) A school district that is not the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school; (b) A public entity other than a school district. (2) "Eligible applicant" means any of the following: (a) Either of the natural or adoptive parents of a qualified special education child, except as otherwise specified in this division. When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the child has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or when the natural or adoptive parents of the child are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree, and a court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child, "eligible applicant" means the residential parent as designated by the court. If the court issues a shared parenting decree, "eligible applicant" means either parent. "Eligible applicant" does not mean a parent whose custodial rights have been terminated. (b) The custodian of a qualified special education child, when a court has granted temporary, legal, or permanent custody of the child to an individual other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the child or to a government agency; (c) The guardian of a qualified special education child, when a court has appointed a guardian for the child; (d) The grandparent of a qualified special education child, when the grandparent is the child's attorney in fact under a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code or when the grandparent has executed a caretaker authorization affidavit under sections 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code; (e) The surrogate parent appointed for a qualified special education child pursuant to division (B) of section 3323.05 and section 3323.051 of the Revised Code; (f) A qualified special education child, if the child does not have a custodian or guardian and the child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (3) "Entitled to attend school" means entitled to attend school in a school district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (3)(4) "Formula ADM" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (4)(5) "Preschool child with a disability" and "individualized education program" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Parent" has the same meaning as in section 3313.64 of the Revised Code, except that "parent" does not mean a parent whose custodial rights have been terminated. "Parent" also includes the custodian of a qualified special education child, when a court has granted temporary, legal, or permanent custody of the child to an individual other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the child or to a government agency. (6) "Qualified special education child" is a child who is at least three years of age and less than twenty-two years of age and who either was enrolled in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in any grade from preschool through twelve in the school year prior to the year in which a scholarship under this section is first sought for the child or is eligible to enter school in any grade preschool through twelve or is less than twenty-two years of age in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in the school year in which a scholarship under this section is first sought for the child and for whom any of the following conditions apply: (a) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school has identified the child as autistic. A child who has been identified as having a "pervasive developmental disorder - not otherwise specified (PPD-NOS)" shall be considered to be an autistic child for purposes of this section. (b) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school has developed an individualized education program under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code for the child that includes services related to autism. (c) The child has been diagnosed as autistic by a physician or psychologist. (d) All of the following apply: (i) The child is enrolled in a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school, is home educated in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, or is a student older than compulsory school age and less than twenty-two years of age and received a home education in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code and has not received a diploma under section 3313.6110 of the Revised Code. (ii) The child has an individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code that includes services related to autism. (iii) The child is still eligible to receive transition services under the child's individualized education program. (7) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or other nonpublic entity that has been approved by the department of education and workforce to participate in the program established under this section. (8) "Special education program" means a school or facility that provides special education and related services to children with disabilities. (B) There is hereby established the autism scholarship program. Under the program, the department shall pay a scholarship under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to the parent of each qualified special education child an eligible applicant upon application of that parent eligible applicant pursuant to procedures and deadlines established by rule of the department. Each scholarship shall be used only to pay tuition for the child on whose behalf the scholarship is awarded to attend a special education program or programs that implements the child's individualized education program or education plan and that is operated by an alternative public provider or by a registered private provider, and to pay for other services agreed to by the provider and the parent of a qualified special education child eligible applicant that are not included in the individualized education program or education plan but are associated with educating the child. Upon agreement with the parent of a qualified special education childeligible applicant, the alternative public provider or the registered private provider may modify the services provided to the child. The purpose of the scholarship is to permit the parent of a qualified special education child eligible applicant the choice to send the child to a special education program or programs, instead of the one operated by or for the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, to receive the services prescribed in the child's individualized education program or education plan once the individualized education program or education plan is finalized and any other services agreed to by the provider and the parent of a qualified special education childeligible applicant. The services provided under the scholarship shall include an educational component or services designed to assist the child to benefit from the child's education. At the discretion of the eligible applicant, multiple alternative public providers or registered private providers may be contracted to provide services to implement an individualized education program or education plan as the eligible applicant and providers determine are necessary and associated with educating the qualified special education child. A qualified special education child shall not be limited to receiving services from a single provider for any services as identified in the individualized education program or education plan, including a single type of service. (C) Services, including intervention services, educational services, academic services, tutoring services, aide services, and other related special education services, provided through the program established under this section may be provided virtually by any of the following: (1) An educational aide or assistant who holds a valid permit issued under section 3319.088 of the Revised Code; (2) An instructional assistant who holds a valid permit issued under section 3310.43 of the Revised Code; (3) A qualified, credentialed provider in accordance with standards established by the department; (4) A teacher or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education. (D) A scholarship under this section shall not be awarded to the parent of a child an eligible applicant while the child's individualized education program is being developed by the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or while any administrative or judicial mediation or proceedings with respect to the content of the child's individualized education program are pending. A scholarship under this section shall not be used for a child to attend a public special education program that operates under a contract, compact, or other bilateral agreement between the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school and another school district or other public provider, or for a child to attend a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. However, nothing in this section or in any rule adopted by the department shall prohibit a parent an eligible applicant whose child attends a public special education program under a contract, compact, or other bilateral agreement, or a parent an eligible applicant whose child attends a community school, from applying for and accepting a scholarship under this section so that the parent eligible applicant may withdraw the child from that program or community school and use the scholarship for the child to attend a special education program for which the parent eligible applicant is required to pay for services for the child. (E) Except for development of the child's individualized education program or education plan, the school district in which a qualified special education child is entitled to attend school and the child's school district of residence, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, if different, are not obligated to provide the child with a free appropriate public education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code for as long as the child continues to attend the special education program operated by either an alternative public provider or a registered private provider for which a scholarship is awarded under the autism scholarship program. If at any time, the eligible applicant for the child decides no longer to accept scholarship payments and enrolls the child in the special education program of the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, that district shall provide the child with a free appropriate public education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (F) A child attending a special education program with a scholarship under this section shall continue to be entitled to transportation to and from that program in the manner prescribed by law. (G) As prescribed in division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, a child who is not a preschool child with a disability for whom a scholarship is awarded under this section shall be counted in the formula ADM of the district in which the child is entitled to attend school and not in the formula ADM of any other school district. (H) A scholarship shall not be paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to a parent an eligible applicant for payment of tuition owed to a nonpublic entity unless that entity is a registered private provider. The department shall approve entities that meet the standards established by rule of the department for the program established under this section. (I) The department shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing procedures necessary to implement this section, including, but not limited to, procedures and deadlines for parents eligible applicants to apply for scholarships, standards for registered private providers, and procedures for approval of entities as registered private providers. The rules also shall specify that intervention services, including virtual services, under the autism scholarship program may be provided by a qualified, credentialed provider, including an educator or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education, and shall additionally include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (1) A behavior analyst certified by a nationally recognized organization that certifies behavior analysts; (2) A psychologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (3) An independent school psychologist or school psychologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (4) Any person employed by a licensed psychologist, licensed independent school psychologist, or licensed school psychologist, while carrying out specific tasks, under the licensee's supervision, as an extension of the licensee's legal and ethical authority as specified under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code who is ascribed as "psychology trainee," "psychology assistant," "psychology intern," or other appropriate term that clearly implies their supervised or training status; (5) Unlicensed persons holding a doctoral degree in psychology or special education from a program approved by the department; (6) A "registered behavior technician" as described under rule 5123-9-41 of the Administrative Code working under the supervision and following the intervention plan of a certified Ohio behavior analyst or a behavior analyst certified by a nationally recognized organization that certifies behavior analysts; (7) A "certified Ohio behavior analyst" under Chapter 4783. of the Revised Code; (8) An occupational therapist or physical therapist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4755. of the Revised Code; (9) A speech-language pathologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4753. of the Revised Code; (10) An intervention specialist who holds a valid license issued by the state board; (11) A literacy intervention specialist certified through pathways recognized by the Ohio dyslexia committee established by section 3323.25 of the Revised Code. To the extent that certification for any of the following positions is approved by the Ohio dyslexia committee under section 3323.25 of the Revised Code, literary intervention specialists may include: (a) A structured literacy dyslexia interventionist; (b) A structured literacy dyslexia specialist; (c) A certified academic language practitioner; (d) A certified academic language therapist. (12) An educational aide or assistant with a valid permit issued under section 3319.088 of the Revised Code; (13) An instructional assistant with a valid permit issued in accordance with section 3310.43 of the Revised Code; (14) Any other qualified individual as determined by the department. Supervision of a qualified, credentialed provider may be conducted virtually. (J) For billing purposes under the autism scholarship program, services provided by a teacher or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education shall be classified as academic services and shall not be classified as aide services. The department shall use this differentiation to simplify monthly audit procedures. (K) The department shall provide reasonable notice to all parents of children eligible applicants receiving a scholarship under the autism scholarship program, alternative public providers, and registered private providers of any amendment to a rule governing, or change in the administration of, the autism scholarship program. (K)(L) If a child qualifies for the autism scholarship program pursuant to a diagnosis under division (A)(6)(c) of this section and does not have an individualized education program that includes services related to autism, the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school shall develop an education plan for the child. (L)(M) Not later than the thirtieth day of June each year, each alternative public provider and registered private provider enrolling students receiving autism scholarships shall submit to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, the tuition rates charged by the provider for the following school year. (M)(N) The department shall not require the parent of a student an eligible applicant who applies for or receives a scholarship under this section to complete any kind of income verification regarding the student's family income. (O) The department shall maintain a list of each registered private provider and the location of that provider on its publicly accessible web site. Sec. 3310.412. A student is not eligible to receive an autism scholarship awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code if the treasurer of state has established an educational savings account for the student under section 3310.23 of the Revised Code for the school year for which the scholarship is sought. Sec. 3310.413. As used in this section, "junior reserve officer training corps program" means a junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code. A qualified special education child, as defined in section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, receiving home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code who participates in a junior reserve officer training corps program maintained by the child's resident school district in accordance with 10 U.S.C. 2031f(1) shall not be considered enrolled in that district for purposes of determining eligibility for an autism scholarship under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.51. As used in sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code: (A) "Alternative public provider" means either of the following providers that agrees to enroll a child in the provider's special education program to implement the child's individualized education program and to which the eligible applicant owes fees for the services provided to the child: (1) A school district that is not the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school or the child's school district of residence, if different; (2) A public entity other than a school district. (B) "Child with a disability" and "individualized education program" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Eligible applicant" means any of the following: (1) Either of the natural or adoptive parents of a qualified special education child, except as otherwise specified in this division. When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the student has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or when the natural or adoptive parents of the student are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree, and a court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the child, "eligible applicant" means the residential parent as designated by the court. If the court issues a shared parenting decree, "eligible applicant" means either parent. "Eligible applicant" does not mean a parent whose custodial rights have been terminated. (2) The custodian of a qualified special education child, when a court has granted temporary, legal, or permanent custody of the child to an individual other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the child or to a government agency; (3) The guardian of a qualified special education child, when a court has appointed a guardian for the child; (4) The grandparent of a qualified special education child, when the grandparent is the child's attorney in fact under a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code or when the grandparent has executed a caretaker authorization affidavit under sections 3109.65 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code; (5) The surrogate parent appointed for a qualified special education child pursuant to division (B) of section 3323.05 and section 3323.051 of the Revised Code; (6) The treasurer of state has not established an educational savings account for the student under section 3310.23 of the Revised Code for the same school year in which a scholarship under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is sought. (7) A qualified special education child, if the child does not have a custodian or guardian and the child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (D) "Entitled to attend school" means entitled to attend school in a school district under sections 3313.64 and 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (E) "Formula ADM" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (F) "Qualified special education child" is a child for whom all of the following conditions apply: (1) The child is at least five three years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (2) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or the child's school district of residence if different, has identified the child as a child with a disability. (3) The school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, or the child's school district of residence if different, has developed an individualized education program under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code for the child. (4) The child either meets one of the following conditions: (a) Was enrolled in the schools of the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in any grade from kindergarten preschool through twelve in the school year prior to the school year in which a scholarship is first sought for the child; (b) Is eligible to enter school in any grade kindergarten preschool through twelve in the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school in the school year in which a scholarship is first sought for the child; (c) All of the following apply: (i) The child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (ii) The child is enrolled in a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school, is home educated in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, or is a student older than compulsory school age and less than twenty-two years of age and received a home education in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code and has not received a diploma under section 3313.6110 of the Revised Code. (iii) The child is still eligible to receive transition services under the child's individualized education program. (5) The department of education and workforce has not approved a scholarship for the child under the educational choice scholarship pilot program, under sections 3310.01 to 3310.17 of the Revised Code, the autism scholarship program, under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, or the pilot project scholarship program, under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code for the same school year in which a scholarship under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is sought. (6) The child and the child's parents are in compliance with the state compulsory attendance law under Chapter 3321. of the Revised Code. (G) "Registered private provider" means a nonpublic school or other nonpublic entity that has been registered by the superintendent of public instruction under section 3310.58 of the Revised Code prior to the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, or the department of education and workforce on or after that date. (H) "Scholarship" means a scholarship awarded under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program pursuant to sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (I) "School district of residence" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code is not a "school district of residence" for purposes of sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (J) "School year" has the same meaning as in section 3313.62 of the Revised Code. (K) "Special education program" means a school or facility that provides special education and related services to children with disabilities. Sec. 3310.52. (A) The Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is hereby established. Under the program, beginning with the 2012-2013 school year, subject to division (B) of this section, the department of education and workforce annually shall pay a scholarship under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to an eligible applicant for services provided by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider for a qualified special education child. The scholarship shall be used only to pay all or part of the fees for the child to attend the special education program or programs operated by the alternative public provider or registered private provider to implement the child's individualized education program or programs, in lieu of the child's attending the special education program operated by the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, and other services agreed to by the provider and eligible applicant that are not included in the individualized education program but are associated with educating the child. At the discretion of an eligible applicant, multiple alternative public providers or registered private providers may be contracted to provide services to implement the individualized education program as the eligible applicant and providers determine are necessary and associated with educating the qualified special education child. A qualified special education child is not limited to receiving services from a single provider for any services as identified in the individualized education program, including a single type of service. Beginning in the 2014-2015 school year, if the child is receiving special education services for a disability specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, the scholarship shall be used only to pay for related services that are included in the child's individualized education program. Upon agreement with the eligible applicant, the alternative public provider or registered private provider may modify the services provided to the child. Services, including intervention services, educational services, academic services, tutoring services, aide services, and other related special education services, provided through the program established under this section may be provided virtually by any of the following: (1) An educational aide or assistant who holds a valid permit issued under section 3319.088 of the Revised Code; (2) An instructional assistant who holds a valid permit issued under section 3310.43 of the Revised Code; (3) A qualified, credentialed provider in accordance with standards established by the department; (4) A teacher or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education. (B) The number of scholarships awarded under the program in any fiscal year shall not exceed five per cent of the total number of students residing in the state identified as children with disabilities during the previous fiscal year. (C) The department shall pay a scholarship under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to the parent of each qualified special education childeligible applicant, unless the parent eligible applicant authorizes a direct payment to the child's provider, upon application of that parent in the manner prescribed by the department. However, the department shall not adopt specific dates for application deadlines for scholarships under the program. (D) The department shall not require the parent of a student an eligible applicant who applies for or receives a scholarship under this section to complete any kind of income verification regarding the student's family income. Sec. 3310.523. As used in this section, "junior reserve officer training corps program" means a junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code. A qualified special education child receiving home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code who participates in a junior reserve officer training corps program maintained by the child's resident school district in accordance with 10 U.S.C. 2031f(1) shall not be considered enrolled in that district for purposes of determining eligibility for a Jon Peterson special needs scholarship under section 3310.52 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3310.58. No nonpublic school or entity shall receive payments from an eligible applicant for services for a qualified special education child under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program until the school or entity registers with the department of education and workforce. The department shall maintain a list of each registered private provider and the location of that provider on its publicly accessible web site. The department shall register and designate as a registered private provider any nonpublic school or entity that meets the following requirements: (A) The school or entity complies with the antidiscrimination provisions of 42 U.S.C. 2000d, regardless of whether the school or entity receives federal financial assistance. (B) If the school or entity is not chartered by the director of education and workforce under section 3301.16 of the Revised Code, the school or entity agrees to comply with sections 3319.39, 3319.391, and 3319.392 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (C) The teaching and nonteaching professionals employed by the school or entity, or employed by any subcontractors of the school or entity, hold appropriate credentials for the qualified special education children enrolled in and the services provided through the special education program it operates. The list of professionals who hold appropriate credentials to provide services under a special education program include all of the following: (1) A behavior analyst certified by a nationally recognized organization that certifies behavior analysts; (2) A psychologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (3) An independent school psychologist or school psychologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (4) Any person employed by a licensed psychologist, licensed independent school psychologist, or licensed school psychologist, while carrying out specific tasks, under the licensee's supervision, as an extension of the licensee's legal and ethical authority as specified under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code who is ascribed as "psychology trainee," "psychology assistant," "psychology intern," or other appropriate term that clearly implies their supervised or training status; (5) An unlicensed person holding a doctoral degree in psychology or special education from a program approved by the department; (6) A registered behavior technician as described in rule 5123-9-41 of the Administrative Code working under the supervision and following the intervention plan of a certified Ohio behavior analyst or behavior analyst certified by a nationally recognized organization that certifies behavior analysts; (7) A certified Ohio behavior analyst under Chapter 4783. of the Revised Code; (8) An occupational therapist or physical therapist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4755. of the Revised Code; (9) A speech-language pathologist licensed to practice in this state under Chapter 4753. of the Revised Code; (10) An intervention specialist who holds a valid license issued by the state board; (11) A literacy intervention specialist certified through pathways recognized by the Ohio dyslexia committee established by section 3323.25 of the Revised Code. To the extent that certification for any of the following positions is approved by the Ohio dyslexia committee under section 3323.25 of the Revised Code, literary intervention specialists may include: (a) A structured literacy dyslexia interventionist; (b) A structured literacy dyslexia specialist; (c) A certified academic language practitioner; (d) A certified academic language therapist. (12) An educational aide or assistant with a valid permit issued under section 3319.088 of the Revised Code; (13) An instructional assistant with a valid permit issued in accordance with section 3310.43 of the Revised Code; (14) Any other qualified individual as determined by the department. (D) For billing purposes under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program, services provided by a teacher or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education shall be classified as academic services and shall not be classified as aide services. The department shall use this differentiation to simplify monthly audit procedures. (E) The school's or entity's educational program shall be approved by the department. (E)(F) The school or entity meets applicable health and safety standards established by law. (F)(G) The school or entity agrees to retain on file documentation as required by the department. (G)(H) The school or entity agrees to provide a record of the implementation of the individualized education program for each qualified special education child enrolled in the school's or entity's special education program, including evaluation of the child's progress, to the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school, in the form and manner prescribed by the department. (H)(I) The school or entity agrees that, if it declines to enroll a particular qualified special education child, it will notify in writing the eligible applicant of its reasons for declining to enroll the child. Sec. 3310.64. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing procedures necessary to implement sections 3310.51 to 3310.63 of the Revised Code including, but not limited to, procedures for parents to apply for scholarships, standards for registered private providers, and procedures for registration of private providers. The rules also shall specify that intervention services, including virtual services, under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program may be provided by a qualified, credentialed provider, including an educator or substitute teacher licensed by the state board of education, and shall additionally include, but not be limited to, the credentialed professionals listed in division (C) of section 3310.58 of the Revised Code. The rules also shall specify that supervision of a qualified, credentialed provider may be conducted virtually. Sec. 3311.053. (A) The boards of education of up to five adjoining educational service centers may, by identical resolutions adopted by a majority of the members of each governing board within any sixty-day period, combine such educational service centers into one educational service center. The resolutions shall state the name of the new center, which may be styled as a "joint educational service center." The resolutions shall also indicate whether the governing board of the new educational service center is to be formed in accordance with division (B) of this section, in accordance with division (A) of section 3311.054 of the Revised Code, or in accordance with section 3311.057 of the Revised Code. A copy of each resolution shall be filed with the state board of education. The new educational service center shall be created and the governing boards of the participating educational service centers shall be dissolved and a new governing board established thirty days after the date on which the last resolution was filed with the state board. (B) The initial members of a new governing board established in accordance with this division shall be appointed as follows: (1) If two educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint two members to the new governing board and the four members so selected shall select a fifth member within ten days of the date on which the last of the four members is appointed. (2) If three educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint one member to the new governing board and the three members so selected shall select the remaining two members of the governing board within ten days of the date on which the last of the three members is appointed. (3) If four educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint one member to the new governing board and the four members so selected shall select the remaining member of the governing board within ten days of the date on which the last of the four members is appointed. (4) If five educational service centers combine, each center's governing board, prior to its dissolution, shall appoint one member to the new governing board. If the members appointed to a new governing board by the governing boards of the combining educational service centers are unable to agree on the selection of the remaining members of the new governing board within ten days, the probate judge of the county in which the greatest number of pupils under the supervision of the new educational service center reside shall appoint the remaining members. Electors of the new educational service center shall elect a new governing board at the next general election occurring in an odd-numbered year and more than ninety days after the date of the appointment of the last member to the initial governing board. Members shall serve for the duration of the term to which they are elected or until their successors are elected and qualified. At such election, two members shall be elected to terms of two years and three members shall be elected to terms of four years. Thereafter, their successors shall be elected in the same manner and for the same terms as members of governing boards of all educational service centers. Each candidate for election as a member of the educational service center governing board shall file a nominating petition in accordance with section 3513.255 of the Revised Code. (C) The funds of each former educational service center shall be paid over in full to the governing board of the new educational service center, and the legal title to all property of the former governing boards shall become vested in the new governing board. The governing board of an educational service center created under this section shall honor all contracts made by the former governing boards. Sec. 3311.242. In the case of a proposed transfer of school district territory filed under section 3311.24 of the Revised Code, the state board of education shall approve a proposed transfer that satisfies all of the following conditions: (A) The territory is being transferred to an adjacent school district. (B) The district from which the territory is being transferred has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for two or more consecutive school years. (C) No party opposing the proposed transfer has presented to the state board clear and convincing evidence that any information used to facilitate the transfer under section 3311.24 of the Revised Code is incorrect or inaccurate. Sec. 3311.50. (A) As used in this section: (1) "County school financing district" means a taxing district consisting of the following territory: (a) The territory that constitutes the educational service center on the date that the governing board of that educational service center adopts a resolution under division (B) of this section declaring that the territory of the educational service center is a county school financing district, exclusive of any territory subsequently withdrawn from the district under division (D) of this section; (b) Any territory that has been added to the county school financing district under this section. A county school financing district may include the territory of a city, local, or exempted village school district whose territory also is included in the territory of one or more other county school financing districts. (2) "The county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The governing board of any educational service center may, by resolution, declare that the territory of the educational service center is a county school financing district. The resolution shall state the purpose for which the county school financing district is created, which may be for any one or more of the following purposes: (1) To levy taxes for the provision of special education by the school districts that are a part of the district, including taxes for permanent improvements for special education; (2) To levy taxes for the provision of specified educational programs and services by the school districts that are a part of the district, as identified in the resolution creating the district, including the levying of taxes for permanent improvements for those programs and services. Services financed by the levy may include school safety and security and mental health services, including training and employment of or contracting for the services of safety personnel, mental health personnel, social workers, and counselors. (3) To levy taxes for permanent improvements of school districts that are a part of the district. The governing board of the educational service center that creates a county school financing district shall serve as the taxing authority of the district and may use educational service center governing board employees to perform any of the functions necessary in the performance of its duties as a taxing authority. A county school financing district shall not employ any personnel. With the approval of a majority of the members of the board of education of each school district within the territory of the county school financing district, the taxing authority of the financing district may amend the resolution creating the district to broaden or narrow the purposes for which it was created. A governing board of an educational service center may create more than one county school financing district. If a governing board of an educational service center creates more than one such district, it shall clearly distinguish among the districts it creates by including a designation of each district's purpose in the district's name. (C) A majority of the members of a board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district may adopt a resolution requesting that its territory be joined with the territory of any county school financing district. Copies of the resolution shall be filed with the state board of education and the taxing authority of the county school financing district. Within sixty days of its receipt of such a resolution, the county school financing district's taxing authority shall vote on the question of whether to accept the school district's territory as part of the county school financing district. If a majority of the members of the taxing authority vote to accept the territory, the school district's territory shall thereupon become a part of the county school financing district unless the county school financing district has in effect a tax imposed under section 5705.215 of the Revised Code. If the county school financing district has such a tax in effect, the taxing authority shall certify a copy of its resolution accepting the school district's territory to the school district's board of education. The board of education and the county auditor shall proceed in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the school district's territory has been added to the county school financing district. After receipt of the auditor's certification under that section, the board may adopt a resolution, with the affirmative vote of a majority of its members, proposing the submission to the electors of the question of whether the district's territory shall become a part of the county school financing district and subject to the taxes imposed by the financing district. The resolution shall set forth the date on which the question shall be submitted to the electors, which shall be at a special election held on a date specified in the resolution, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after the adoption and certification of the resolution. A copy of the resolution shall immediately be certified to the board of elections of the proper county, which shall make arrangements for the submission of the proposal to the electors of the school district. The board of the joining district shall publish notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. Additionally, if the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within __________ (name of the school district proposing to join the county school financing district) __________ be added to __________ (name) __________ county school financing district, and a property tax for the purposes of _________ (here insert purposes), that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, __________ at a rate not exceeding __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, ___________ be in effect for __________ (here insert the number of years the tax is to be in effect or "a continuing period of time," as applicable) __________?" If the proposal is approved by a majority of the electors voting on it, the joinder shall take effect on the first day of July following the date of the election, and the county board of elections shall notify the county auditor of each county in which the school district joining its territory to the county school financing district is located. (D) The board of any city, local, or exempted village school district whose territory is part of a county school financing district may withdraw its territory from the county school financing district thirty days after submitting to the governing board that is the taxing authority of the district and the state board a resolution proclaiming such withdrawal, adopted by a majority vote of its members, but any county school financing district tax levied in such territory on the effective date of the withdrawal shall remain in effect in such territory until such tax expires or is renewed. No board may adopt a resolution withdrawing from a county school financing district that would take effect during the forty-five days preceding the date of an election at which a levy proposed under section 5705.215 of the Revised Code is to be voted upon. (E) A city, local, or exempted village school district does not lose its separate identity or legal existence by reason of joining its territory to a county school financing district under this section and an educational service center does not lose its separate identity or legal existence by reason of creating a county school financing district that accepts or loses territory under this section. Sec. 3313.27. At the expiration of the term of any treasurer of any board of education or before any board approves the surety of any treasurer, such board shall require the treasurer to produce all money, bonds, or other securities in his the treasurer's hands, which shall then be counted by the board or a committee thereof, or by a representative of the auditor of state. A certificate setting forth the exact amount of such money, bonds, or other securities, and signed by the representatives making such count, shall be entered upon the records of the board and shall be prima-facie evidence that the amount therein stated was actually in the treasury at that date. Sec. 3313.413. (A) As used in this section, "high-performing community school" means either a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revise Code that meets any of the following conditions: (1) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that meets the following conditions: (a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) or (c) of this section, the school both: (i) Has received either a grade of "A," "B," or "C" for the performance index score under division (C)(1)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or a performance rating of three stars or higher for achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of that section; or has increased its performance index score under division (C)(1)(b) or (D)(1)(d) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code in each of the previous three years of operation; and (ii) Has received either a grade of "A" or "B" for the value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or a performance rating of four stars or higher for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section on its most recent report card rating issued under that section Except as provided for in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, the community school does both of the following: (a) The school has a higher performance index score than the school district in which the school is located on the two most recent report cards issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (b) The school either has a performance rating of four stars or higher for progress on the most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or is a school described under division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code and did not receive a rating for progress on the most recent report card. (b) (2) If the community school serves only grades kindergarten through three, the school received either a grade of "A" or "B" for making progress in improving literacy in grades kindergarten through three under division (C)(1)(g) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or a performance rating of four stars or higher for early literacy under division (D)(3)(e) of that section on its most recent report card issued under that section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If the school primarily serves students enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program as described in division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code, the school received a rating of "exceeds standards" on its most recent report card issued under section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (2) A newly established community school that is implementing a community school model that has a track record of high-quality academic performance, as determined by the department of education and workforce. (3) If the community school has not commenced operations or has been in operation for less than one school year, the school meets the following conditions: (a) The school is replicating an operational and instructional model used by a community school described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. (b) The school either: (i) Has an operator that received an overall rating of three stars or higher, or a "C" or higher, on its most recent performance report published under section 3314.031 of the Revised Code; (ii) Does not have an operator and is sponsored by a sponsor that was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on its most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (B) When a school district board of education decides to dispose of real property it owns in its corporate capacity under section 3313.41 of the Revised Code, the board shall first offer that property to the governing authorities of all start-up community schools, the boards of trustees of any college-preparatory boarding schools, and the governing bodies of any STEM schools that are located within the territory of the district. Not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, interested governing authorities, boards of trustees, and governing bodies shall notify the district treasurer in writing of the intention to purchase the property. The district board shall give priority to the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that are located within the territory of the district. (1) If more than one governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (2) If no governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall then proceed with the offers from all other start-up community schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and STEM schools made pursuant to that division. If more than one such entity notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the entities that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (3) If no governing authority, board of trustees, or governing body notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the district may then offer the property for sale in the manner prescribed under divisions (A) to (F) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in sections 3313.41 and 3313.411 of the Revised Code, the purchase price of any real property sold to any of the entities in accordance with division (B) of this section shall not be more than the appraised fair market value of that property as determined in an appraisal of the property that is not more than one year old. (D) Not later than the first day of October of each year, the department of education and workforce shall post in a prominent location on its web site a list of schools that qualify as high-performing community schools for purposes of this section and section 3313.411 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.46. (A) In addition to any other law governing the bidding for contracts by the board of education of any school district, when any such board determines to build, repair, enlarge, improve, or demolish any school building or other property, the cost of which will exceed the amount specified in section 9.17 of the Revised Code, except in cases of urgent necessity, or for the security and protection of school property, and except as otherwise provided in division (D) of section 713.23 and in section 125.04 of the Revised Code, all of the following shall apply: (1) The board shall cause to be prepared the plans, specifications, and related information as required in divisions (A)(1), (2), and (3) of section 153.01 of the Revised Code unless the board determines that other information is sufficient to inform any bidders of the board's requirements. However, if the board determines that such other information is sufficient for bidding a project, the board shall not engage in the construction of any such project involving the practice of professional engineering, professional surveying, or architecture, for which plans, specifications, and estimates have not been made by, and the construction thereof inspected by, a licensed professional engineer, licensed professional surveyor, or registered architect. (2) The board shall advertise for bids once each week for a period of not less than two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, in a newspaper of general circulation in the district before the date specified by the board for receiving bids. The board may also cause notice to be inserted in trade papers or other publications designated by it or to be distributed by electronic means, including posting the notice on the board's internet web site. If the board posts the notice on its web site, it may eliminate the second notice otherwise required to be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the school district, provided that the first notice published in such newspaper meets all of the following requirements: (a) It is published at least two weeks before the opening of bids. (b) It includes a statement that the notice is posted on the board of education's internet web site. (c) It includes the internet address of the board's internet web site. (d) It includes instructions describing how the notice may be accessed on the board's internet web site. (3) Unless the board extends the time for the opening of bids they shall be opened at the time and place specified by the board in the advertisement for the bids. (4) Each bid shall contain the name of every person interested therein. Each bid shall meet the requirements of section 153.54 of the Revised Code. (5) When both labor and materials are embraced in the work bid for, the board may require that each be separately stated in the bid, with the price thereof, or may require that bids be submitted without such separation. (6) None but the lowest responsible bid shall be accepted. The board may reject all the bids, or accept any bid for both labor and material for such improvement or repair, which is the lowest in the aggregate. In all other respects, the award of contracts for improvement or repair, but not for purchases made under section 3327.08 of the Revised Code, shall be pursuant to section 153.12 of the Revised Code. (7) The contract shall be between the board and the bidders. The board shall pay the contract price for the work pursuant to sections 153.13 and 153.14 of the Revised Code. The board shall approve and retain the estimates referred to in section 153.13 of the Revised Code and make them available to the auditor of state upon request. (8) When two or more bids are equal, in the whole, or in any part thereof, and are lower than any others, either may be accepted, but in no case shall the work be divided between such bidders. (9) When there is reason to believe there is collusion or combination among the bidders, or any number of them, the bids of those concerned therein shall be rejected. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to the board of education of any school district in any of the following situations: (1) The acquisition of educational materials used in teaching. (2) If the board determines and declares by resolution adopted by two-thirds of all its members that any item is available and can be acquired only from a single source. (3) If the board declares by resolution adopted by two-thirds of all its members that division (A) of this section does not apply to any installation, modification, or remodeling involved in any energy conservation measure undertaken through an installment payment contract under section 3313.372 of the Revised Code or undertaken pursuant to division (G)(1) of section 133.06 of the Revised Code. (4) The acquisition of computer software for instructional purposes and computer hardware for instructional purposes pursuant to division (B)(4) of section 3313.37 of the Revised Code. (C) No resolution adopted pursuant to division (B)(2) or (3) of this section shall have any effect on whether sections 153.12 to 153.14 and 153.54 of the Revised Code apply to the board of education of any school district with regard to any item. Sec. 3313.489. (A) The director of education and workforce shall examine each five-year school district's current budget information and three-year projection of revenues and expenditures submitted under section 5705.391 of the Revised Code and shall determine whether the information contained therein, together with any other relevant information, indicates that the district may be financially unable to operate its instructional program on all days set forth in its adopted school calendars and pay all obligated expenses during the current fiscal year. If a board of education has not adopted a school calendar for the school year beginning on the first day of July of the current fiscal year at the time an examination is required under this division, the director shall examine the five-year current budget information and three-year projection and determine whether the district may be financially unable to pay all obligated expenses and operate its instructional program for the number of days on which instruction was held in the preceding fiscal year. (B) If the director of education and workforce determines pursuant to division (A) of this section that a school district may be financially unable to operate its instructional program on all days required by such division and pay all obligated expenses during the current fiscal year, the director shall provide written notification of such determination to the president of the district's board of education and the auditor of state. (C) This section does not apply to a school district declared to be under a fiscal emergency pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.536. (A) The superintendent of any school district may afford a student enrolled in another school district the opportunity to participate in ice hockey as an interscholastic athletic activity at a school of the superintendent's district if all of the following conditions apply: (1) The school district in which the student is enrolled does not offer ice hockey as an interscholastic athletic activity. (2) The school district in which the student is enrolled is located less than twenty miles away from the superintendent's school district. (3) The superintendents of both school districts enter into an agreement approving the student's participation in ice hockey at the school district in which the student is not enrolled. (B) A student shall not be required to enroll in the school district that offers ice hockey as an interscholastic athletic activity or be a resident of that district to participate in ice hockey at the district under this section. (C) To participate in ice hockey under this section, a student shall be of the appropriate age and grade level for the school at which the student participates in ice hockey, as determined by the superintendent of that school district, and shall fulfill and be subject to the same academic, nonacademic, and financial requirements as any other participant, including trying out for a position on the team. Sec. 3313.5313. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Harassment, intimidation, or bullying" has the same meaning as in section 3313.666 of the Revised Code. (2) "Home-educated student" means a student who is receiving home education in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (3) "Qualifying offense" means any of the following: (a) An offense of violence; (b) A violation of section 2907.07 of the Revised Code; (c) An attempt to commit an offense of violence or a violation of section 2907.07 of the Revised Code. (4) "Qualifying school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, a chartered nonpublic school, or a nonchartered nonpublic school. (5) "Resident district" means the school district in which a student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (B) The superintendent of any school district may afford any home-educated student or any student enrolled in a qualifying school or a different school district, regardless of whether the superintendent's district is the student's resident district, the opportunity to participate in interscholastic athletics at a school of the superintendent's district, if the student was subject to any of the following by a school official, employee, or volunteer or another student from the district or school in which the student is enrolled or the district in which the student is participating in interscholastic athletics under section 3313.537, 3313.5311, or 3313.5312 of the Revised Code: (1) Harassment, intimidation, or bullying; (2) A qualifying offense, for which the school official, employee, or volunteer or another student has been either of the following: (a) Charged with, indicted for, convicted of, or pled guilty to committing; (b) Alleged to be or is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing. (3) Conduct by a school official, employee, or volunteer that violates the licensure code of professional conduct for Ohio educators developed by the state board of education. (C) The chief administrative officer of any qualifying school may afford any student enrolled in a school district, any student enrolled in a different qualifying school, or any home-educated student the opportunity to participate in interscholastic athletics at the chief administrative officer's school, if the student was subject to any of the following by a school official, employee, or volunteer or another student from the district or school in which the student is enrolled or the district in which the student is participating in interscholastic athletics under section 3313.537, 3313.5311, or 3313.5312 of the Revised Code: (1) Harassment, intimidation, or bullying; (2) A qualifying offense, for which the school official, employee, or volunteer or another student has been either of the following: (a) Charged with, indicted for, convicted of, or pled guilty to committing; (b) Alleged to be or is adjudicated a delinquent child for committing. (3) Conduct by a school official, employee, or volunteer that violates the licensure code of professional conduct for Ohio educators developed by the state board of education. (D) To participate in interscholastic athletics under this section, a student who is not a home-educated student shall be of the appropriate age and grade level, as determined by the superintendent of the district or the chief administrative officer of the qualifying school, for the school at which the student participates in interscholastic athletics and shall fulfill the same academic, nonacademic, and financial requirements as any other participant. (E) Divisions (C) to (E) of section 3313.5312 of the Revised Code apply to a home-educated student who participates in interscholastic athletics at school under this section. (F)(E) No district or school shall impose additional rules on a student to participate under this section that do not apply to other students participating in the same interscholastic athletics activity. No district or school shall impose fees for a student to participate under this section that exceed any fees charged to other students participating in the same interscholastic athletics activity. (G)(F) No school district board of education, STEM school governing body, or governing authority of a community school, chartered nonpublic school, or nonchartered nonpublic school shall take any action contrary to the provisions of this section. (H)(G) No school district, interscholastic conference, or organization that regulates interscholastic conferences or events shall do either of the following: (1) Require a student who is eligible to participate in interscholastic athletics under this section to meet eligibility requirements that conflict with this section; (2) Penalize or restrict the eligibility to participate in interscholastic athletics of a student who, during a school year, ceases to participate in interscholastic athletics at one district or school and then begins to participate in interscholastic athletics at a different district or school under this section. Sec. 3313.603. (A) As used in this section: (1) "One unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of course instruction, except that for a laboratory course, "one unit" means a minimum of one hundred fifty hours of course instruction. (2) "One-half unit" means a minimum of sixty hours of course instruction, except that for physical education courses, "one-half unit" means a minimum of one hundred twenty hours of course instruction. (B) Beginning September 15, 2001, except as required in division (C) of this section and division (C) of section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the requirements for graduation from every high school shall include twenty units earned in grades nine through twelve and shall be distributed as follows: (1) English language arts, four units; (2) Health, one-half unit; (3) Mathematics, three units; (4) Physical education, one-half unit; (5) Science, two units until September 15, 2003, and three units thereafter, which at all times shall include both of the following: (a) Biological sciences, one unit; (b) Physical sciences, one unit. (6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the following: (a) American history, one-half unit; (b) American government, one-half unit. (7) Social studies, two units. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of instruction prescribed by division (B)(7) of this section shall include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of world history and civilizations. (8) Elective units, seven units until September 15, 2003, and six units thereafter. Each student's electives shall include at least one unit, or two half units, chosen from among the areas of business/technology, fine arts, and/or foreign language. (C) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, except as provided in divisions (D) to (F) of this section, the requirements for graduation from every public and chartered nonpublic high school shall include twenty units that are designed to prepare students for the workforce and college. The units shall be distributed as follows: (1) English language arts, four units; (2) Health, one-half unit, which shall include instruction in nutrition and the benefits of nutritious foods and physical activity for overall health; (3) Mathematics, four units, which shall include one unit of algebra II or the equivalent of algebra II, or one unit of advanced computer science as described in the standards adopted pursuant to division (A)(4) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. However, students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2015, and who are pursuing a career-technical instructional track shall not be required to take algebra II or advanced computer science, and instead may complete a career-based pathway mathematics course approved by the department of education and workforce as an alternative. For students who choose to take advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II under division (C)(3) of this section, the school shall communicate to those students that some institutions of higher education may require algebra II for the purpose of college admission. Also, the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of each student who chooses to take advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II shall sign and submit to the school a document containing a statement acknowledging that not taking algebra II may have an adverse effect on college admission decisions. A student may fulfill one unit of mathematics under division (C)(3) of this section by completing one-half unit of financial literacy instruction to satisfy the requirement prescribed under division (C)(9) of this section and one-half unit of a mathematics course. The one-half unit course in mathematics shall not be in algebra II, or its equivalent, or a course for which the department requires an end-of-course examination under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. Students who choose to take one unit of advanced computer science in lieu of algebra II, as described in division (C)(3) of this section, shall not be permitted to complete one-half unit of financial literacy instruction to satisfy the mathematics unit requirements of that division. Instead, those students shall be required to complete the one-half unit of financial literacy instruction under division (C)(8) of this section. (4) Physical education, one-half unit; (5) Science, three units with inquiry-based laboratory experience that engages students in asking valid scientific questions and gathering and analyzing information, which shall include the following, or their equivalent: (a) Physical sciences, one unit; (b) Life sciences, one unit; (c) Advanced study in one or more of the following sciences, one unit: (i) Chemistry, physics, or other physical science; (ii) Advanced biology or other life science; (iii) Astronomy, physical geology, or other earth or space science; (iv) Computer science. No student shall substitute a computer science course for a life sciences or biology course under division (C)(5) of this section. (6) History and government, one unit, which shall comply with division (M) of this section and shall include both of the following: (a) American history, one-half unit; (b) American government, one-half unit. (7) Social studies, two units. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2017, the two units of instruction prescribed by division (C)(7) of this section shall include at least one-half unit of instruction in the study of world history and civilizations. (8) Five units consisting of one or any combination of foreign language, fine arts, business, career-technical education, family and consumer sciences, technology which may include computer science, agricultural education, a junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code, or English language arts, mathematics, science, or social studies courses not otherwise required under division (C) of this section. One-half unit of instruction under division (C)(8) of this section may be instruction in financial literacy to satisfy the requirement under division (C)(9) of this section. (9)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this section, for students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2022, financial literacy, one-half unit. Each student shall elect to complete the one-half unit of instruction in financial literacy either in lieu of one-half unit of instruction in mathematics under division (C)(3) of this section or an elective under division (C)(8) of this section. A student may fulfill the financial literacy instruction requirement under division (C)(9) of this section through the successful completion of an advanced placement course in microeconomics or macroeconomics. (b) A student attending a nonpublic school accredited through the independent schools association of the central states or any other chartered nonpublic school shall not be required to complete the one-half unit of financial literacy instruction prescribed in division (C)(9)(a) of this section, unless that student is attending the school under a state scholarship program as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. The study and instruction of financial literacy required under division (C)(9) of this section shall align with the academic content standards for financial literacy and entrepreneurship adopted under division (A)(2) of section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. The instruction provided under an advanced placement course in microeconomics or macroeconomics shall be considered to be aligned with those academic content standards. In developing the curriculum for the study and instruction of financial literacy, schools may use available public-private partnerships and resources and materials that exist in business, industry, and through the centers for economics education at institutions of higher education. Ohioans must be prepared to apply increased knowledge and skills in the workplace and to adapt their knowledge and skills quickly to meet the rapidly changing conditions of the twenty-first century. National studies indicate that all high school graduates need the same academic foundation, regardless of the opportunities they pursue after graduation. The goal of Ohio's system of elementary and secondary education is to prepare all students for and seamlessly connect all students to success in life beyond high school graduation, regardless of whether the next step is entering the workforce, beginning an apprenticeship, engaging in post-secondary training, serving in the military, or pursuing a college degree. The requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section are the standard expectation for all students entering ninth grade for the first time at a public or chartered nonpublic high school on or after July 1, 2010. A student may satisfy this expectation through a variety of methods, including, but not limited to, integrated, applied, career-technical, and traditional coursework. Stronger coordination between high schools and institutions of higher education is necessary to prepare students for more challenging academic endeavors and to lessen the need for academic remediation in college, thereby reducing the costs of higher education for Ohio's students, families, and the state. The department and the chancellor of higher education shall develop policies to ensure that only in rare instances will students who complete the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section require academic remediation after high school. School districts, community schools, and chartered nonpublic schools shall integrate technology into learning experiences across the curriculum in order to maximize efficiency, enhance learning, and prepare students for success in the technology-driven twenty-first century. Districts and schools shall use distance and web-based course delivery as a method of providing or augmenting all instruction required under this division, including laboratory experience in science. Districts and schools shall utilize technology access and electronic learning opportunities provided by the broadcast educational media commission, chancellor, the Ohio learning network, education technology centers, public television stations, and other public and private providers. (D) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, a student who enters ninth grade on or after July 1, 2010, and before July 1, 2016, may qualify for graduation from a public or chartered nonpublic high school even though the student has not completed the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) During the student's third year of attending high school, as determined by the school, the student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian sign and file with the school a written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's consent to the student's graduating without completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one consequence of not completing those requirements is ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio without further coursework. (2) The student and parent, guardian, or custodian fulfill any procedural requirements the school stipulates to ensure the student's and parent's, guardian's, or custodian's informed consent and to facilitate orderly filing of statements under division (D)(1) of this section. Annually, each district or school shall notify the department of the number of students who choose to qualify for graduation under division (D) of this section and the number of students who complete the student's success plan and graduate from high school. (3) The student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian and a representative of the student's high school jointly develop a student success plan for the student in the manner described in division (C)(1) of section 3313.6020 of the Revised Code that specifies the student matriculating to a two-year degree program, acquiring a business and industry-recognized credential, or entering an apprenticeship. (4) The student's high school provides counseling and support for the student related to the plan developed under division (D)(3) of this section during the remainder of the student's high school experience. (5)(a) Except as provided in division (D)(5)(b) of this section, the student successfully completes, at a minimum, the curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section. (b) Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, a student shall be required to complete successfully, at the minimum, the curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section, except as follows: (i) Mathematics, four units, one unit which shall be one of the following: (I) Probability and statistics; (II) Computer science; (III) Applied mathematics or quantitative reasoning; (IV) Any other course approved by the department using standards established by the superintendent not later than October 1, 2014. (ii) Elective units, five units; (iii) Science, three units as prescribed by division (B) of this section which shall include inquiry-based laboratory experience that engages students in asking valid scientific questions and gathering and analyzing information. (E) Each school district and chartered nonpublic school retains the authority to require an even more challenging minimum curriculum for high school graduation than specified in division (B) or (C) of this section. A school district board of education, through the adoption of a resolution, or the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school may stipulate any of the following: (1) A minimum high school curriculum that requires more than twenty units of academic credit to graduate; (2) An exception to the district's or school's minimum high school curriculum that is comparable to the exception provided in division (D) of this section but with additional requirements, which may include a requirement that the student successfully complete more than the minimum curriculum prescribed in division (B) of this section; (3) That no exception comparable to that provided in division (D) of this section is available. If a school district or chartered nonpublic school requires a foreign language as an additional graduation requirement under division (E) of this section, a student may apply one unit of instruction in computer coding to satisfy one unit of foreign language. If a student applies more than one computer coding course to satisfy the foreign language requirement, the courses shall be sequential and progressively more difficult. (F) A student enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program, which program has received a waiver from the department, may qualify for graduation from high school by successfully completing a competency-based instructional program administered by the dropout prevention and recovery program in lieu of completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section. The department shall grant a waiver to a dropout prevention and recovery program, within sixty days after the program applies for the waiver, if the program meets all of the following conditions: (1) The program serves only students not younger than sixteen years of age and not older than twenty-one years of age. (2) The program enrolls students who, at the time of their initial enrollment, either, or both, are at least one grade level behind their cohort age groups or experience crises that significantly interfere with their academic progress such that they are prevented from continuing their traditional programs. (3) The program requires students to attain at least the applicable score designated for each of the assessments prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or, to the extent prescribed by rule of the department under division (D)(5) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, division (B)(2) of that section. (4) The program develops a student success plan for the student in the manner described in division (C)(1) of section 3313.6020 of the Revised Code that specifies the student's matriculating to a two-year degree program, acquiring a business and industry-recognized credential, or entering an apprenticeship. (5) The program provides counseling and support for the student related to the plan developed under division (F)(4) of this section during the remainder of the student's high school experience. (6) The program requires the student and the student's parent, guardian, or custodian to sign and file, in accordance with procedural requirements stipulated by the program, a written statement asserting the parent's, guardian's, or custodian's consent to the student's graduating without completing the requirements for graduation prescribed in division (C) of this section and acknowledging that one consequence of not completing those requirements is ineligibility to enroll in most state universities in Ohio without further coursework. (7) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department an instructional plan that demonstrates how the academic content standards adopted by the department under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code will be taught and assessed. (8) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department a policy on career advising that satisfies the requirements of section 3313.6020 of the Revised Code, with an emphasis on how every student will receive career advising. (9) Prior to receiving the waiver, the program has submitted to the department a written agreement outlining the future cooperation between the program and any combination of local job training, postsecondary education, nonprofit, and health and social service organizations to provide services for students in the program and their families. Divisions (F)(8) and (9) of this section apply only to waivers granted on or after July 1, 2015. If the department does not act either to grant the waiver or to reject the program application for the waiver within sixty days as required under this section, the waiver shall be considered to be granted. (G) Every high school may permit students below the ninth grade to take advanced work. If a high school so permits, it shall award high school credit for successful completion of the advanced work and shall count such advanced work toward the graduation requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section if the advanced work was both: (1) Taught by a person who possesses a license or certificate issued under section 3301.071, 3319.22, or 3319.222 of the Revised Code that is valid for teaching high school; (2) Designated by the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district, the board of the cooperative education school district, or the governing authority of the chartered nonpublic school as meeting the high school curriculum requirements. Each high school shall record on the student's high school transcript all high school credit awarded under division (G) of this section. In addition, if the student completed a seventh- or eighth-grade fine arts course described in division (K) of this section and the course qualified for high school credit under that division, the high school shall record that course on the student's high school transcript. (H) The department shall make its individual academic career plan available through its Ohio career information system web site for districts and schools to use as a tool for communicating with and providing guidance to students and families in selecting high school courses. (I) A school district or chartered nonpublic school may integrate academic content in a subject area for which the department has adopted standards under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code into a course in a different subject area, including a career-technical education course, in accordance with guidance for integrated coursework developed by the department. Upon successful completion of an integrated course, a student may receive credit for both subject areas that were integrated into the course. Units earned for subject area content delivered through integrated academic and career-technical instruction are eligible to meet the graduation requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section. For purposes of meeting graduation requirements, if an end-of-course examination has been prescribed under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code for the subject area delivered through integrated instruction, the school district or school may administer the related subject area examinations upon the student's completion of the integrated course. Nothing in division (I) of this section shall be construed to excuse any school district, chartered nonpublic school, or student from any requirement in the Revised Code related to curriculum, assessments, or the awarding of a high school diploma. (J)(1) The department, in consultation with the chancellor, shall adopt a statewide plan implementing methods for students to earn units of high school credit based on a demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in combination with completing hours of classroom instruction. The plan shall include a standard method for recording demonstrated proficiency on high school transcripts. Each school district and community school shall comply with the department's plan adopted under this division and award units of high school credit in accordance with the plan. The department may adopt existing methods for earning high school credit based on a demonstration of subject area competency as necessary prior to the 2009-2010 school year. (2) The department shall update the statewide plan adopted pursuant to division (J)(1) of this section to also include methods for students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on a demonstration of subject area competency, instead of or in combination with completing hours of classroom instruction. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, each school district and community school also shall comply with the updated plan adopted pursuant to this division and permit students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency in accordance with the plan. (3) The department shall develop a framework for school districts and community schools to use in granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, each district and community school shall comply with the framework. Each district and community school also shall review any policy it has adopted regarding the demonstration of subject area competency to identify ways to incorporate work-based learning experiences, internships, and cooperative education into the policy in order to increase student engagement and opportunities to earn units of high school credit. (K) This division does not apply to students who qualify for graduation from high school under division (D) or (F) of this section, or to students pursuing a career-technical instructional track as determined by the school district board of education or the chartered nonpublic school's governing authority. Nevertheless, the general assembly encourages such students to consider enrolling in a fine arts course as an elective. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, each student enrolled in a public or chartered nonpublic high school shall complete two semesters or the equivalent of fine arts to graduate from high school. The coursework may be completed in any of grades seven to twelve. Each student who completes a fine arts course in grade seven or eight may elect to count that course toward the five units of electives required for graduation under division (C)(8) of this section, if the course satisfied the requirements of division (G) of this section. In that case, the high school shall award the student high school credit for the course and count the course toward the five units required under division (C)(8) of this section. If the course in grade seven or eight did not satisfy the requirements of division (G) of this section, the high school shall not award the student high school credit for the course but shall count the course toward the two semesters or the equivalent of fine arts required by this division. (L) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the board of education of each school district and the governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school may adopt a policy to excuse from the high school physical education requirement each student who, during high school, has participated in interscholastic athletics, marching band, show choir, or cheerleading for at least two full seasons or in the junior reserve officer training corps for at least two full school years. If the board or authority adopts such a policy, the board or authority shall not require the student to complete any physical education course as a condition to graduate. However, the student shall be required to complete one-half unit, consisting of at least sixty hours of instruction, in another course of study. In the case of a student who has participated in the junior reserve officer training corps for at least two full school years, credit received for that participation may be used to satisfy the requirement to complete one-half unit in another course of study. (M) It is important that high school students learn and understand United States history and the governments of both the United States and the state of Ohio. Therefore, beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2012, the study of American history and American government required by divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this section shall include the study of all of the following documents: (1) The Declaration of Independence; (2) The Northwest Ordinance; (3) The Constitution of the United States with emphasis on the Bill of Rights; (4) The Ohio Constitution. The study of each of the documents prescribed in divisions (M)(1) to (4) of this section shall include study of that document in its original context. The study of American history and government required by divisions (B)(6) and (C)(6) of this section shall include the historical evidence of the role of documents such as the Federalist Papers and the Anti-Federalist Papers to firmly establish the historical background leading to the establishment of the provisions of the Constitution and Bill of Rights. (N) A student may apply one unit of instruction in computer science to satisfy one unit of mathematics or one unit of science under division (C) of this section as the student chooses, regardless of the field of certification of the teacher who teaches the course, so long as that teacher meets the licensure requirements prescribed by section 3319.236 of the Revised Code and, prior to teaching the course, completes a professional development program determined to be appropriate by the district board. If a student applies more than one computer science course to satisfy curriculum requirements under that division, the courses shall be sequential and progressively more difficult or cover different subject areas within computer science. (O) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the board of education of each school district and the governing authority of each chartered nonpublic school may adopt a policy to excuse from the financial literacy instruction requirement under division (C)(9) of this section each student who, during high school, participates in a financial literacy program offered through a student branch, as defined in section 1733.04 of the Revised Code, or by a bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code. The policy shall require the financial literacy program to meet or exceed the academic content standards and model curriculum for financial literacy and entrepreneurship instruction adopted under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code. The policy shall require a student to participate in the program for the equivalent of at least one-half unit of instruction to qualify for an exemption under this division. Not later than July 1, 2026, the department shall develop and post on its web site a model policy and guidelines for districts and schools to use in developing a policy under this division. Sec. 3313.608. (A)(1) Beginning with students who enter third grade in the school year that starts July 1, 2009, and until June 30, 2013, unless the student is excused under division (C) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code from taking the assessment described in this section, for any student who does not attain at least the equivalent level of achievement designated under division (A)(3) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on the assessment prescribed under that section to measure skill in English language arts expected at the end of third grade, each school district, in accordance with the policy adopted under section 3313.609 of the Revised Code, shall do one of the following: (a) Promote the student to fourth grade if the student's principal and reading teacher agree that other evaluations of the student's skill in reading demonstrate that the student is academically prepared to be promoted to fourth grade; (b) Promote the student to fourth grade but provide the student with intensive intervention services in fourth grade; (c) Retain the student in third grade. (2) Beginning with students who enter third grade in the 2013-2014 school year, unless the student is excused under division (C) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code from taking the assessment described in this section, no school district shall promote to fourth grade any student who does not attain at least the equivalent level of achievement designated under division (A)(3) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on the assessment prescribed under that section to measure skill in English language arts expected at the end of third grade, unless one of the following applies: (a) The student is an English learner who has been enrolled in United States schools for less than three full school years and has had less than three years of instruction in an English as a second language program. (b) The student is a child with a disability entitled to special education and related services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code and the student's individualized education program exempts the student from retention under this division. (c) The student demonstrates an acceptable level of performance on an alternative standardized reading assessment as determined by the department of education and workforce. (d) All of the following apply: (i) The student is a child with a disability entitled to special education and related services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (ii) The student has taken the third grade English language arts achievement assessment prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. (iii) The student's individualized education program or plan under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C. 794, as amended, shows that the student has received intensive remediation in reading for two school years but still demonstrates a deficiency in reading. (iv) The student previously was retained in any of grades kindergarten to three. (e)(i) The student received intensive remediation for reading for two school years but still demonstrates a deficiency in reading and was previously retained in any of grades kindergarten to three. (ii) A student who is promoted under division (A)(2)(e)(i) of this section shall continue to receive intensive reading instruction in grade four. The instruction shall include an altered instructional day that includes specialized diagnostic information and specific research-based reading strategies for the student that have been successful in improving reading among low-performing readers. (f) A student's parent or guardian, in consultation with the student's reading teacher and building principal, requests that the student, regardless of if the student is reading at grade level, be promoted to the fourth grade. A student who is promoted under division (A)(2)(f) of this section shall continue to receive intensive reading instruction in the same manner as a student retained under this section until the student is able to read at grade level. (B)(1) Beginning in the 2012-2013 school year, to assist students in meeting the third grade guarantee established by this section, each school district board of education shall adopt policies and procedures with which it annually shall assess the reading skills of each student, except those students with significant cognitive disabilities or other disabilities as authorized by the department on a case-by-case basis, enrolled in kindergarten to third grade and shall identify students who are reading below their grade level. The reading skills assessment shall be completed by the thirtieth day of September for students in grades one to three, and by the twentieth day of instruction of the school year for students in kindergarten. Each district shall use the a diagnostic assessment to measure reading ability for the appropriate grade level adopted or approved under section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, or a comparable tool approved by the department of education and workforce, to identify such students. The policies and procedures shall require the students' classroom teachers to be involved in the assessment and the identification of students reading below grade level. The assessment may be administered electronically using live, two-way video and audio connections whereby the teacher administering the assessment may be in a separate location from the student. (2) For each student identified by the diagnostic assessment prescribed under this section as having reading skills below grade level, the district shall do both of the following: (a) Provide to the student's parent or guardian, in writing, all of the following: (i) Notification that the student has been identified as having a substantial deficiency in reading; (ii) A description of the current services that are provided to the student; (iii) A description of the proposed supplemental instructional services and supports that will be provided to the student that are designed to remediate the identified areas of reading deficiency; (iv) Notification that if the student attains a score in the range designated under division (A)(3) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on the assessment prescribed under that section to measure skill in English language arts expected at the end of third grade, the student shall be retained unless the student is exempt under division (A) of this section. The notification shall specify that the assessment under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code is not the sole determinant of promotion and that additional evaluations and assessments are available to the student to assist parents and the district in knowing when a student is reading at or above grade level and ready for promotion. (v) A statement that connects the child's proficiency level in reading to long-term outcomes of success related to proficiency in reading. (b) Provide intensive reading instruction services and regular diagnostic assessments to the student immediately following identification of a reading deficiency until the development of the reading improvement and monitoring plan required by division (C) of this section. These intervention services shall be aligned with the science of reading as defined under section 3313.6028 of the Revised Code and include research-based reading strategies that have been shown to be successful in improving reading among low-performing readers and instruction targeted at the student's identified reading deficiencies. (3) For each student retained under division (A) of this section, the district shall do all of the following: (a) Provide intense remediation services until the student is able to read at grade level. The remediation services shall include intensive interventions in reading that address the areas of deficiencies identified under this section including, but not limited to, not less than ninety minutes of reading instruction per day, and may include any of the following: (i) Small group instruction; (ii) Reduced teacher-student ratios; (iii) More frequent progress monitoring; (iv) Tutoring or mentoring; (v) Transition classes containing third and fourth grade students; (vi) Extended school day, week, or year; (vii) Summer reading camps. (b) Establish a policy for the mid-year promotion of a student retained under division (A) of this section who demonstrates that the student is reading at or above grade level; (c) Provide each student with a teacher who satisfies one or more of the criteria set forth in division (H) of this section. The district shall offer the option for students to receive applicable services from one or more providers other than the district. Providers shall be screened and approved by the district or the department of education and workforce. If the student participates in the remediation services and demonstrates reading proficiency in accordance with standards adopted by the department prior to the start of fourth grade, the district shall promote the student to that grade. (4) For each student retained under division (A) of this section who has demonstrated proficiency in a specific academic ability field, each district shall provide instruction commensurate with student achievement levels in that specific academic ability field. As used in this division, "specific academic ability field" has the same meaning as in section 3324.01 of the Revised Code. (C) For each student required to be provided intervention services under this section, the district shall develop a reading improvement and monitoring plan within sixty days after receiving the student's results on the diagnostic assessment or comparable tool administered under division (B)(1) of this section. The district shall involve the student's parent or guardian and classroom teacher in developing the plan. The plan shall include all of the following: (1) Identification of the student's specific reading deficiencies; (2) A description of the additional instructional services and support that will be provided to the student to remediate the identified reading deficiencies; (3) Opportunities for the student's parent or guardian to be involved in the instructional services and support described in division (C)(2) of this section; (4) A process for monitoring the extent to which the student receives the instructional services and support described in division (C)(2) of this section; (5) A reading curriculum during regular school hours that does all of the following: (a) Assists students to read at grade level; (b) Provides scientifically based and reliable assessment; (c) Provides initial and ongoing analysis of each student's reading progress. (6) A statement that if the student does not attain at least the equivalent level of achievement designated under division (A)(3) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on the assessment prescribed under that section to measure skill in English language arts expected by the end of third grade, the student may be retained in third grade. (7) High-dosage The provision of high-dosage tutoring opportunities aligned with the student's classroom instruction through a state-approved vendor on the list of high-quality tutoring vendors under section 3301.136 of the Revised Code or a locally approved opportunity program that aligns with high-dosage tutoring best practices identified by the department. High-dosage tutoring opportunities shall include additional instruction time of at least three days per week, or at least fifty hours over thirty-six weeks. High-dosage tutoring may be incorporated into a student's regular classroom instruction. The district shall continue to provide the plan developed under division (C) of this section until the student achieves the required level of skill in reading for the student's current grade level. Each student with a reading improvement and monitoring plan under this division who enters third grade after July 1, 2013, shall be assigned to a teacher who satisfies one or more of the criteria set forth in division (H) of this section. The district shall report any information requested by the department about the reading improvement monitoring plans developed under this division in the manner required by the department. (D) Each school district shall report annually to the department on its implementation and compliance with this section using guidelines prescribed by the department. The director of education and workforce annually shall report to the governor and general assembly the number and percentage of students in grades kindergarten through four reading below grade level based on the diagnostic assessments administered under division (B) of this section and the achievement assessments administered under divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code in English language arts, aggregated by school district and building; the types of intervention services provided to students; and, if available, an evaluation of the efficacy of the intervention services provided. (E) Any summer remediation services funded in whole or in part by the state and offered by school districts to students under this section shall meet the following conditions: (1) The remediation methods are based on reliable educational research. (2) The school districts conduct assessment before and after students participate in the program to facilitate monitoring results of the remediation services. (3) The parents of participating students are involved in programming decisions. (F) Any intervention or remediation services required by this section shall include intensive, explicit, and systematic instruction. (G) This section does not create a new cause of action or a substantive legal right for any person. (H)(1) Except as provided under divisions (H)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, each student described in division (B)(3) or (C) of this section who enters third grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2013, shall be assigned a teacher who has at least one year of teaching experience and who satisfies one or more of the following criteria: (a) The teacher holds a reading endorsement on the teacher's license and has attained a passing score on the corresponding assessment for that endorsement, as applicable. (b) The teacher has completed a master's degree program with a major in reading. (c) The teacher was rated "most effective" for reading instruction consecutively for the most recent two years based on assessments of student growth measures developed by a vendor and that is on the list of student assessments approved by the department under division (B)(2) of section 3319.112 of the Revised Code. (d) The teacher was rated "above expected value added," in reading instruction, as determined by criteria established by the department, for the most recent, consecutive two years. (e) The teacher has earned a passing score on a rigorous test of principles of scientifically research-based reading instruction as approved by the department. (f) The teacher holds an educator license for teaching grades pre-kindergarten through three or four through nine issued on or after July 1, 2017. (2) Notwithstanding division (H)(1) of this section, a student described in division (B)(3) or (C) of this section who enters third grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2013, may be assigned to a teacher with less than one year of teaching experience provided that the teacher meets one or more of the criteria described in divisions (H)(1)(a) to (f) of this section and that teacher is assigned a teacher mentor who meets the qualifications of division (H)(1) of this section. (3) Notwithstanding division (H)(1) of this section, a student described in division (B)(3) or (C) of this section who enters third grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2013, but prior to July 1, 2016, may be assigned to a teacher who holds an alternative credential approved by the department or who has successfully completed training that is based on principles of scientifically research-based reading instruction that has been approved by the department. The alternative credentials and training described in division (H)(3) of this section shall be aligned with the reading competencies adopted by the department of education and workforce under section 3301.077 of the Revised Code. (4) Notwithstanding division (H)(1) of this section, a student described in division (B)(3) or (C) of this section who enters third grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2013, may receive reading intervention or remediation services under this section from an individual employed as a speech-language pathologist who holds a license issued by the state speech and hearing professionals board under Chapter 4753. of the Revised Code and a registration under section 3319.221 of the Revised Code. (5) A teacher, other than a student's teacher of record, may provide any services required under this section, so long as that other teacher meets the requirements of division (H) of this section and the teacher of record and the school principal agree to the assignment. Any such assignment shall be documented in the student's reading improvement and monitoring plan. As used in this division, "teacher of record" means the classroom teacher to whom a student is assigned. (I) Notwithstanding division (H) of this section, a teacher may teach reading to any student who is an English language learner, and has been in the United States for three years or less, or to a student who has an individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code if that teacher holds an alternative credential approved by the department or has successfully completed training that is based on principles of scientifically research-based reading instruction that has been approved by the department. The alternative credentials and training described in this division shall be aligned with the reading competencies adopted by the department of education and workforce under section 3301.077 of the Revised Code. (J) If, on or after June 4, 2013, a school district or community school cannot furnish the number of teachers needed who satisfy one or more of the criteria set forth in division (H) of this section for the 2013-2014 school year, the school district or community school shall develop and submit a staffing plan by June 30, 2013. The staffing plan shall include criteria that will be used to assign a student described in division (B)(3) or (C) of this section to a teacher, credentials or training held by teachers currently teaching at the school, and how the school district or community school will meet the requirements of this section. The school district or community school shall post the staffing plan on its web site for the applicable school year. Not later than March 1, 2014, and on the first day of March in each year thereafter, a school district or community school that has submitted a plan under this division shall submit to the department a detailed report of the progress the district or school has made in meeting the requirements under this section. A school district or community school may request an extension of a staffing plan beyond the 2013-2014 school year. Extension requests must be submitted to the department not later than the thirtieth day of April prior to the start of the applicable school year. The department may grant extensions valid through the 2015-2016 school year. (K) The department of education and workforce shall designate one or more staff members to provide guidance and assistance to school districts and community schools in implementing the third grade guarantee established by this section, including any standards or requirements adopted to implement the guarantee and to provide information and support for reading instruction and achievement. Sec. 3313.609. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Truant" means absent without excuse. (2) "Academically prepared" , "academically prepared" means whatever educational standard the board of education of each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district establishes as necessary for the promotion of a student to the next grade level pursuant to the policy adopted under division (B) of this section. (B) The board of education of each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district shall adopt a grade promotion and retention policy for students that complies with this section and section 3313.608 of the Revised Code. The policy shall prohibit the promotion of a student to the next grade level if the student has been truant for more than ten per cent of the required attendance days of the current school year and has failed two or more of the required curriculum subject areas in the current grade unless the student's principal and the teachers of any failed subject areas agree that the student is academically prepared to be promoted to the next grade level. Sec. 3313.6013. (A) As used in this section, "advanced standing program" means a program that enables a student to earn credit toward a degree from an institution of higher education while enrolled in high school or that enables a student to complete coursework while enrolled in high school that may earn credit toward a degree from an institution of higher education upon the student's attainment of a specified score on an examination covering the coursework. Advanced standing programs may include any of the following: (1) The college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code; (2) Advanced placement courses; (3) International baccalaureate diploma courses; (4) Early college high school programs; (5) Courses that comply with the career-technical education credit transfer criteria, policies, and procedures established under section 3333.162 of the Revised Code; (6) The college-level examination program. (B) Each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district and each chartered nonpublic high school shall provide students enrolled in grades nine through twelve with the opportunity to participate in an advanced standing program. For this purpose, each school district and chartered nonpublic high school shall offer at least one advanced standing program in accordance with division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, as applicable. (1) A city, local, or exempted village school district meets the requirements of this division through its mandatory participation in the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. However, a city, local, or exempted village school district may offer any other advanced standing program, in addition to the college credit plus program, and each joint vocational school district shall offer at least one other advanced standing program, to students in good standing, as defined by the partnership for continued learning under section 3301.42 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to October 16, 2009, or as subsequently defined by the department of education and workforce. (2) A chartered nonpublic high school that elects to participate in the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code meets the requirements of this division. Each chartered nonpublic high school that elects not to participate in the college credit plus program instead shall offer at least one other advanced standing program to students in good standing, as defined by the partnership for continued learning under section 3301.42 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to October 16, 2009, or as subsequently defined by the department of education and workforce. (C) Each school district and each chartered nonpublic high school, at least annually, shall provide information about the advanced standing programs offered by the district or school to all students enrolled in grades six through eleven. The district or school shall include information about all of the following: (1) The process colleges and universities use in awarding credit for advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses and examinations, including minimum scores required by state institutions of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, for a student to receive college credit; (2) The availability of tuition and fee waivers for advanced placement and international baccalaureate courses and examinations; (3) The availability of online advanced placement or international baccalaureate courses, including those that may be available at no cost; (4) The benefits of earning postsecondary credit through advanced placement or international baccalaureate courses; (5) The availability of advanced placement or international baccalaureate courses offered throughout the district. The district or school may include additional information as determined appropriate by the district or school. (D) Except as provided for in Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, no city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district shall charge an enrolled student an additional fee or tuition for participation in any advanced standing program offered by the district. Students may be required to pay the costs associated with taking an advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination. (E) Any agreement between a school district or school and an associated college governing the operation of an early college high school program shall be exempt from the requirements of the college credit plus program, provided the program meets the definition set forth in division (F)(2) of this section and is approved by the director of education and workforce and the chancellor of higher education. The college credit plus program also shall not govern any advanced placement course or international baccalaureate diploma course as described under this section. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Associated college" means a public or private college, as defined in section 3365.01 of the Revised Code, which has entered into an agreement with a school district or school to establish an early college high school program, as described in division (F)(2) of this section, and awards transcripted credit, as defined in section 3365.01 of the Revised Code, to students through that program. (2) "Early college high school program" means a partnership between at least one school district or school and at least one institution of higher education that allows participants to simultaneously complete requirements toward earning a regular high school diploma and have the opportunity to earn not less than twenty-four credits that are transferable to the institutions of higher education in the partnership as part of an organized course of study toward a post-secondary degree or credential at no cost to the participant or participant's family. The program also shall prioritize the following students: (a) Students who are underrepresented in regard to completing post-secondary education; (b) Students who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department of education and workforce; (c) Students whose parents did not earn a college degree. Sec. 3313.6022. (A) As used in this section, "released time" means a period of time during which a student is excused from school to attend a course in religious instruction conducted by a private entity off school district property. (B) A school district board of education shall adopt a policy that authorizes a student to be excused from school to attend a released time course in religious instruction for at least one period per week, provided that each of the following applies: (1) The student's parent or guardian gives written consent. (2) The sponsoring entity maintains attendance records and makes them available to the school district the student attends. (3) Transportation to and from the place of instruction, including transportation for students with disabilities, is the complete responsibility of the sponsoring entity, parent, guardian, or student. (4) The sponsoring entity makes provisions for and assumes liability for the student. (5) No public funds are expended and no public school personnel are involved in providing the religious instruction. (6) The student assumes responsibility for any missed schoolwork. While in attendance in a released time course in religious instruction, a student shall not be considered absent from school. No student may be released from a core curriculum subject course to attend a religious instruction course. (C) A school district board of education shall collaborate with a sponsoring entity of a released time course in religious instruction to identify a time to offer the course during the school day. (D) A policy adopted under division (B) of this section shall not prohibit students from bringing external educational and program materials into school. (E) A policy adopted under division (B) of this section shall not exceed either of the following: (1) For students in an elementary or middle school, two periods in total per week; (2) For students in high school, the amount of time that is equivalent to attending two units of high school credit per week. (F) A policy adopted under division (B) of this section may authorize high school students to earn up to two units of high school credit for the completion of a released time course in religious instruction. In determining whether to award credit for completion of such a course, the board shall evaluate the course based on purely secular criteria that are substantially the same criteria used to evaluate similar nonpublic high school courses for purposes of determining whether to award credit for such courses to a student transferring from a nonpublic high school to a public high school. However, there shall be no criteria requiring that released time courses be completed only at a nonpublic school. The decision to award credit for a released time course of religious instruction shall be neutral to, and shall not involve any test for, religious content or denominational affiliation. For purposes of this division, secular criteria may include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) The number of hours of classroom instruction time; (2) A review of the course syllabus that reflects course requirements and materials used; (3) The methods of assessment used in the course; (4) The qualifications of the course instructor, which shall be similar to the qualifications of other teachers within the district. Notwithstanding division (C)(8) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, high school credit awarded to a student for a released time course in religious instruction may substitute for the same amount of credit in subjects listed in that division. (E)(G) A school district, member of a school district board of education, or school district employee is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury allegedly arising during a student's transportation to or from a place of instruction when private transportation is used under a released time policy adopted under this section. This division does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a school district, member of a school district board of education, or school district employee may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state. Sec. 3313.6028. (A)(1) As used in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code, "science of reading" means an interdisciplinary body of scientific evidence that: (a) Informs how students learn to read and write proficiently; (b) Explains why some students have difficulty with reading and writing; (c) Indicates that all students benefit from explicit and systematic instruction in phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, comprehension, and writing to become effective readers; (d) Does not rely on any model of teaching students to read based on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues, including a three-cueing approach. (2) As used in this section, "three-cueing approach" means any model of teaching students to read based on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues. (B) The department of education and workforce shall establish a list of high-quality core curriculum and instructional materials in English language arts, and a list of evidence-based reading intervention programs, that are aligned with the science of reading and strategies for effective literacy instruction. (C) Beginning not later than the 2024-2025 school year, each school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, shall use core curriculum and instructional materials in English language arts in each of grades pre-kindergarten to five and evidence-based reading intervention programs in each of grades pre-kindergarten to twelve only from the lists established under division (B) of this section. Except as provided in division (D) of this section, no district or school shall use any core curriculum, instructional materials, or intervention program in grades pre-kindergarten to five that use the three-cueing approach to teach students to read. (D) A district or school may apply to the department for a waiver on an individual student basis to use curriculum, instructional materials, or an intervention program in grades pre-kindergarten through five that uses the three-cueing approach to teach students to read, except as follows: (1) No student for whom a reading improvement and monitoring plan has been developed under division (C) of section 3313.608 of the Revised Code shall be eligible for a waiver. (2) If a student has an individualized education program that explicitly indicates the three-cueing approach is appropriate for the student's learning needs, the student shall not be required to have a waiver. In determining whether to approve a waiver requested under this section, the department shall consider the performance of the student's district or school on the state report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, including on the early literacy component prescribed under division (D)(3)(e) of that section. (E)(1) The department shall identify vendors that provide professional development to educators, including pre-service teachers and faculty employed by educator preparation programs, on the use of high-quality core curriculum and instructional materials and reading intervention programs on the lists established under division (B) of this section. (2) A professional development committee established under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code shall qualify any completed professional development coursework provided by a vendor described in division (E)(1) of this section to count towards professional development coursework requirements for teacher licensure renewal. (3) A professional development committee shall permit a teacher to apply any hours earned over the minimum amount of hours required for professional development coursework for teacher licensure renewal under division (E)(2) of this section to the next renewal period for that license. Sec. 3313.6031. (A) As used in this section, "other high school" means any of the following that offers any of grades nine through twelve: (1) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (2) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (3) A chartered nonpublic school. (B) Each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district and other high school that has students enrolled in courses that comply with the career-technical education credit transfer criteria, policies, and procedures established under section 3333.162 of the Revised Code shall adopt and implement a policy for the awarding of grades and the calculation of class standing for those courses. A district's or school's policy under this section shall be equivalent to the district's or school's policy for courses taken under the advanced standing programs described in divisions (A)(1) to (3) of section 3313.6013 of the Revised Code or for other courses designated as honors courses by the district or school, including procedures for awarding a weighted grade or enhancing a student's class standing for those courses. Sec. 3313.6032. (A) As used in this section, "advanced learning opportunities in mathematics" or "advanced mathematics course" means learning opportunities or a course that provides academic content or rigor that exceeds the standard mathematics curriculum for the student's grade level, including a mathematics course that is two grade levels above the student's current grade level, as determined by the district. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section, each city, local, exempted village, and joint-vocational school district shall provide each student that achieves an advanced level of skill on a mathematics achievement assessment as prescribed under section 3301.0710 or end-of-course examination under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code with advanced learning opportunities in mathematics including advanced mathematics courses in the following school year. Each student shall take any corresponding required achievement assessment or end-of-course examination for any mathematics course the student takes under those sections. (C)(1) No school district is subject to division (B) of this section if it does not offer the advanced learning opportunities in mathematics or an advanced mathematics course for the grade level in which the student is enrolled for the next school year. (2) Each school district shall notify the parent or guardian of a student who qualifies for advanced learning opportunities in mathematics under division (B) of this section of that determination. The parent or guardian of any such student may submit a written request for that student to not receive the advanced learning opportunities in mathematics or to not be enrolled in the advanced mathematics course. In which case, the district shall not be required to provide that student with advanced mathematics instruction under division (B) of this section. Sec. 3313.618. (A) In addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the board of education of a school district or governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school, each student entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2019, shall satisfy at least one of the following conditions or the conditions prescribed under division (B) of this section in order to qualify for a high school diploma: (1) Be remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on each of the nationally standardized assessments in English, mathematics, and reading; (2) Attain a score specified under division (B)(5)(c) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (3) Attain a score that demonstrates workforce readiness and employability on a nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department of education and workforce under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code and obtain either an industry-recognized credential or a license issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license. For the purposes of this division, the industry-recognized credentials and licenses shall be as approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. A student may choose to qualify for a high school diploma by satisfying any of the separate requirements prescribed by divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section. If the student's school district or school does not administer the examination prescribed by one of those divisions that the student chooses to take to satisfy the requirements of this section, the school district or school may require that student to arrange for the applicable scores to be sent directly to the district or school by the company or organization that administers the examination. (B) In addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the district board or school governing authority, each student entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, shall satisfy the following conditions in order to qualify for a high school diploma: (1) Attain a competency score as determined under division (B)(10) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on each of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. School districts and chartered nonpublic schools shall offer remedial support to any student who fails to attain a competency score on one or both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations. Following the first administration of the exam, if a student fails to attain a competency score on one or both of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations that student must retake the respective examination at least once. If a student fails to attain a competency score on a retake examination, the student may demonstrate competency in the failed subject area through one of the following options: (a) Earn course credit taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code in the failed subject area; (b) Complete two of the following options, one of which must be foundational: (i) Foundational options to demonstrate competency, which include earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway, obtaining an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that is at least equal to the total number of points meet the criteria established under that section to qualify for a high school diploma, obtaining a license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that is issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license, completing a pre-apprenticeship aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field, completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the student's chosen career field, or providing evidence of acceptance into an apprenticeship program after high school that is restricted to participants eighteen years of age or older; (ii) Supporting options to demonstrate competency, which include completing two hundred fifty hours of a work-based learning experience with evidence of positive evaluations, obtaining an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code, or attaining a workforce readiness score, as determined by the department, on the nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. (c) Provide evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code. (d) Be remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, in the failed subject area on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. For English language arts II, a student must be remediation-free in the subjects of English and reading on the nationally standardized assessment. Subject to division (L)(2) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code, for any students receiving special education and related services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the individualized education program developed for the student under that chapter shall specify the manner in which the student will participate in the assessments administered under this division or an alternate assessment in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (2) Earn at least two of the state diploma seals prescribed under division (A) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, at least one of which shall be any of the following: (a) The state seal of biliteracy established under section 3313.6111 of the Revised Code; (b) The OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code; (c) One of the state diploma seals established under divisions (C)(1) to (7) of section 3313.6114 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) A student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or enrolls in such a high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year shall meet the requirements of division (B) or (D) of this section, as applicable, in order to qualify for a high school diploma. However, any student subject to division (B) of this section who transfers or enrolls after the start of the student's twelfth grade year and fails to attain a competency score on the Algebra I or English language arts II end-of-course examination shall not be required to retake the applicable examination prior to demonstrating competency in the failed subject area under the options prescribed in divisions (B)(1)(a) to (d) of this section. (2) The department shall prescribe standards that allow a transfer student who, prior to the student's transfer, took an assessment described in division (B)(1) or (2) of section 3301.0712 or section 3313.619 of the Revised Code to apply the score from that assessment towards graduation requirements at the student's new public or chartered nonpublic school. (D) Notwithstanding division (B) of this section, in addition to the curriculum requirements specified by the school governing authority, a chartered nonpublic school student subject to division (L)(3)(a)(ii) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code entering ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2019, shall qualify for a high school diploma if the student earns a remediation-free score in the areas of English, mathematics, and reading, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code. No such student shall be required to take the Algebra I or English language arts II end-of-course examination or earn diploma seals under this section. (E) The department shall not create or require any additional assessment for the granting of any type of high school diploma other than as prescribed by this section. Except as provided in sections 3313.6111, 3313.6112, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, the department or the director of education and workforce shall not create any endorsement or designation that may be affiliated with a high school diploma. Sec. 3313.6113. (A) The director of education and workforce, in collaboration with the governor's office of workforce transformation and representatives of business organizations, shall establish a committee to develop a list of industry-recognized credentials and licenses that may be used to qualify for a high school diploma under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code and shall be used for state report card purposes under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (B) The committee shall do the following: (1) Establish criteria for acceptable industry-recognized credentials and licenses aligned with the in-demand jobs list published by the department of job and family services and other relevant demand data; (2) Review the list of industry-recognized credentials and licenses that was in existence on January 1, 2018, and update the list as it considers necessary; (3) Review and update the list of industry-recognized credentials and licenses at least biennially; (4) Assign a point value for each industry-recognized credential and establish the total number of points for industry-recognized credentials that (3) Establish the criteria under which a student must earn to may use industry-recognized credentials to help qualify for a high school diploma under sections 3313.618 and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code; (5)(4) Update the list of industry-recognized credentials to include a driver's license obtained by a student through a driver education course offered by a school district in accordance with section 3301.17 of the Revised Code. (C) For purposes of divisions (B)(2)(d), (C)(2)(e), and (D)(1)(j)(v) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, the department of education and workforce shall include only those students who earn an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, at least equal to the total number of points that meet the criteria established by the committee under this section to qualify for a high school diploma. Sec. 3313.6114. (A) The department of education and workforce shall establish a system of state diploma seals for the purposes of allowing a student to qualify for graduation under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. State diploma seals may be attached or affixed to the high school diploma of a student enrolled in a public or chartered nonpublic school. The system of state diploma seals shall consist of all of the following: (1) The state seal of biliteracy established under section 3313.6111 of the Revised Code; (2) The OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal established under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code; (3) The state diploma seals prescribed under division (C) of this section. (B) A school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, or chartered nonpublic school shall attach or affix the state seals prescribed under division (C) of this section to the diploma and transcript of a student enrolled in the district or school who meets the requirements established under that division. (C) The department shall establish all of the following state diploma seals: (1) An industry-recognized credential seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing either of the following: (a) Earning an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that is both of the following: (i) At least equal to the total number of points meets the criteria established under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma; (ii) Aligned and aligns to a job that is determined to be in demand in this state and its regions under section 6301.11 of the Revised Code. (b) Obtaining a license approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code that is issued by a state agency or board for practice in a vocation that requires an examination for issuance of that license. (2) A college-ready seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by attaining a score that is remediation-free, in accordance with standards adopted under division (F) of section 3345.061 of the Revised Code, on a nationally standardized assessment prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department of education and workforce and aligned with current statewide college-level examination program scores identified by the chancellor of higher education, on a college-level examination program examination. (3) A military seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing one of the following: (a) Providing evidence that the student has enlisted in a branch of the armed services of the United States as defined in section 5910.01 of the Revised Code; (b) Participating in a junior reserve officer training program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code; (c) Providing evidence that the student has accepted a scholarship to enter the reserve officer training corps; (d) Providing evidence that the student has been appointed to a United States military service academy. (4) A citizenship seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing any of the following: (a) Demonstrating at least a proficient level of skill as prescribed under division (B)(5)(a) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on both the American history and American government end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (b) Attaining a score level prescribed under division (B)(5)(d) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that is at least the equivalent of a proficient level of skill in appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate examinations or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department, on a college-level examination program examination in lieu of the American history and American government end-of-course examinations; (c) In lieu of the American history and American government end-of-course examinations, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in either: (i) An American history course and an American government course that are offered by the student's high school; (ii) Appropriate courses taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. (d) In the case of a student who takes an alternate assessment in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, attaining a score established by the department on the alternate assessment in social studies; (e) In the case of a student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or who enrolls in an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in courses that correspond with the American history and American government end-of-course examinations and that the student completed in the state from which the student transferred or completed while receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school. Division (C)(4)(e) of this section does not apply to any such student with respect to an American history or American government course for which an end-of-course examination is associated that the student takes after enrolling in the high school. (5) A science seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing any of the following: (a) Demonstrating at least a proficient level of skill as prescribed under division (B)(5)(a) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on the science end-of-course examination prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (b) Attaining a score level prescribed under division (B)(5)(d) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code that is at least the equivalent of a proficient level of skill in an appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department, on a college-level examination program examination in lieu of the science end-of-course examination; (c) In lieu of the science end-of-course examination, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in either: (i) A science course listed in divisions (C)(5)(c)(i) to (iii) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code that is offered by the student's high school; (ii) An appropriate course taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. (d) In the case of a student who takes an alternate assessment in accordance with division (C)(1) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, attaining a score established by the department on the alternate assessment in science; (e) In the case of a student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or enrolls in an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in a course that corresponds with the science end-of-course examination and that the student completed in the state from which the student transferred or completed while receiving home instruction or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school. Division (C)(5)(e) of this section does not apply to any such student who takes a science course for which an end-of-course examination is associated after enrolling in the high school. (6) An honors diploma seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by meeting the additional criteria for an honors diploma under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code. (7) A technology seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by doing any of the following: (a) Subject to division (B)(5)(d) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, attaining a score level that is at least the equivalent of a proficient level of skill in an appropriate advanced placement or international baccalaureate examination or by attaining a passing score, as determined by the department of education and workforce and aligned with the current statewide college-level examination program scores identified by the chancellor of higher education, on a college-level examination program examination; (b) Attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in an appropriate course taken through the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code; (c) Completing a course offered through the student's district or school that meets guidelines developed by the department. However, a district or school shall not be required to offer a course that meets those guidelines. (d) In the case of a student who transfers into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school from another state or enrolls in an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school in the previous school year, attaining a final course grade that is the equivalent of a "B" or higher in an appropriate course, as determined by the district or school, that the student completed in the state from which the student transferred or completed while receiving home education or attending a nonchartered, nontax-supported school. (8) A community service seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by completing a community service project that is aligned with guidelines adopted by the student's district board or school governing authority. (9) A fine and performing arts seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by demonstrating skill in the fine or performing arts according to an evaluation that is aligned with guidelines adopted by the student's district board or school governing authority. (10) A student engagement seal. A student shall meet the requirement for this seal by participating in extracurricular activities such as athletics, clubs, or student government to a meaningful extent, as determined by guidelines adopted by the student's district board or school governing authority. (D)(1) Each district or school shall develop guidelines for at least one of the state seals prescribed under divisions (C)(8) to (10) of this section. (2) For the purposes of determining whether a student who transfers to a district or school has satisfied the state diploma seal requirement under division (B)(2) of section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, each district or school shall recognize a state diploma seal prescribed under divisions (C)(8) to (10) of this section and earned by a student at another district or a different public or chartered nonpublic school regardless of whether the district or school to which the student transfers has developed guidelines under this section for that state seal. (3) In guidelines developed for a state diploma seal prescribed under divisions (C)(8) to (10) of this section, each district or school shall include a method to give, to the extent feasible, a student who transfers into the district or school a proportional amount of credit for any progress the student was making toward earning that state seal at the school district or different public or chartered nonpublic school from which the student transfers. (E) Each district or school shall maintain appropriate records to identify students who have met the requirements prescribed under division (C) of this section for earning the state seals established under that division. (F) The department shall prepare and deliver to each district or school an appropriate mechanism for assigning a state diploma seal established under division (C) of this section. (G) A student shall not be charged a fee to be assigned a state seal prescribed under division (C) of this section on the student's diploma and transcript. Sec. 3313.64. (A) As used in this section and in section 3313.65 of the Revised Code: (1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, "parent" means either parent, unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian of the child. When a child is in the legal custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent with residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. When a child is in the permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent, "parent" means the parent who was divested of parental rights and responsibilities for the care of the child and the right to have the child live with the parent and be the legal custodian of the child and all residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities. (b) When a child is the subject of a power of attorney executed under sections 3109.51 to 3109.62 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent designated as attorney in fact under the power of attorney. When a child is the subject of a caretaker authorization affidavit executed under sections 3109.64 to 3109.73 of the Revised Code, "parent" means the grandparent that executed the affidavit. (2) "Legal custody," "permanent custody," and "residual parental rights, privileges, and responsibilities" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (3) "School district" or "district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district and excludes any school operated in an institution maintained by the department of youth services. (4) Except as used in division (C)(2) of this section, "home" means a home, institution, foster home, group home, or other residential facility in this state that receives and cares for children, to which any of the following applies: (a) The home is licensed, certified, or approved for such purpose by the state or is maintained by the department of youth services. (b) The home is operated by a person who is licensed, certified, or approved by the state to operate the home for such purpose. (c) The home accepted the child through a placement by a person licensed, certified, or approved to place a child in such a home by the state. (d) The home is a children's home created under section 5153.21 or 5153.36 of the Revised Code. (5) "Agency" means all of the following: (a) A public children services agency; (b) An organization that holds a certificate issued by the department of children and youth in accordance with the requirements of section 5103.03 of the Revised Code and assumes temporary or permanent custody of children through commitment, agreement, or surrender, and places children in family homes for the purpose of adoption; (c) Comparable agencies of other states or countries that have complied with applicable requirements of section 2151.39 of the Revised Code or as applicable, sections 5103.20 to 5103.22 or 5103.23 to 5103.237 of the Revised Code. (6) A child is placed for adoption if either of the following occurs: (a) An agency to which the child has been permanently committed or surrendered enters into an agreement with a person pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code for the care and adoption of the child. (b) The child's natural parent places the child pursuant to section 5103.16 of the Revised Code with a person who will care for and adopt the child. (7) "Preschool child with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Child," unless otherwise indicated, includes preschool children with disabilities. (9) "Active duty" means active duty pursuant to an executive order of the president of the United States, an act of the congress of the United States, or section 5919.29 or 5923.21 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code for admittance to kindergarten and first grade, a child who is at least five but under twenty-two years of age and any preschool child with a disability shall be admitted to school as provided in this division. (1) A child shall be admitted to the schools of the school district in which the child's parent resides. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section or division (B) of section 2151.362 and section 3317.30 of the Revised Code, a child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides shall be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if any of the following applies: (a) The child is in the legal or permanent custody of a government agency or a person other than the child's natural or adoptive parent. (b) The child resides in a home. (c) The child requires special education. (3) A child who is not entitled under division (B)(2) of this section to be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides and who is residing with a resident of this state with whom the child has been placed for adoption shall be admitted to the schools of the district where the child resides unless either of the following applies: (a) The placement for adoption has been terminated. (b) Another school district is required to admit the child under division (B)(1) of this section. (4)(a) A child who does not reside in the district where the child's parent resides is not required to be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child resides if both of the following apply: (i) The child resides in a home, or in a facility similarly licensed in another state, and the child was placed in the home or facility by the child's parent in consultation with, and upon the recommendation of, the Ohio resilience through integrated systems and excellence program for children and youth involved in multiple state systems. (ii) The home provides education services that meet the minimum education standards under division (D)(2) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a facility located in another state, meets substantially similar requirements of the jurisdiction where the facility is located, except that the home or facility may provide the child with less than the minimum number of instructional hours required only as necessary to accommodate the child's treatment program. (b) Upon a child's admission to a home pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the home shall notify the district where the child's parent resides and the district where the home is located that the home is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. Upon a child's admission to a facility located in another state pursuant to division (B)(4)(a) of this section, the facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides that the facility is providing educational services to the child until the child is discharged. In either case, the district where the child's parent resides shall continue to enroll the student as provided in division (C)(5) of this section and shall excuse the child from attendance until the child is discharged from the home or facility. (c) Upon a child's discharge from a home or facility, the home or facility shall notify the district where the child's parent resides. The home or facility and the district shall collaborate on a supportive reentry plan into school for the child. Division (B) of this section does not prohibit the board of education of a school district from placing a child with a disability who resides in the district in a special education program outside of the district or its schools in compliance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (C) A district shall not charge tuition for children admitted under division (B)(1) or (3) of this section. If the district admits a child under division (B)(2) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the district that admits the child as provided in divisions (C)(1) to (3) of this section, unless division (C)(4) of this section applies to the child: (1) If the child receives special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the school district of residence, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, shall pay tuition for the child in accordance with section 3323.091, 3323.13, 3323.14, or 3323.141 of the Revised Code regardless of who has custody of the child or whether the child resides in a home. (2) For a child that does not receive special education in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(d) of this section, if the child is in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent, tuition shall be paid by: (a) The district in which the child's parent resided at the time the court removed the child from home or at the time the court vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first; (b) If the parent's residence at the time the court removed the child from home or placed the child in the legal or permanent custody of the person or government agency is unknown, tuition shall be paid by the district in which the child resided at the time the child was removed from home or placed in legal or permanent custody, whichever occurred first; (c) If a school district cannot be established under division (C)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, tuition shall be paid by the district determined as required by section 2151.362 of the Revised Code by the court at the time it vests custody of the child in the person or government agency; (d) If at the time the court removed the child from home or vested legal or permanent custody of the child in the person or government agency, whichever occurred first, one parent was in a residential or correctional facility or a juvenile residential placement and the other parent, if living and not in such a facility or placement, was not known to reside in this state, tuition shall be paid by the district determined under division (D) of section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as the district required to pay any tuition while the parent was in such facility or placement; (e) If the department of education and workforce has determined, pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 2151.362 of the Revised Code, that a school district other than the one named in the court's initial order, or in a prior determination of the department, is responsible to bear the cost of educating the child, the district so determined shall be responsible for that cost. (3) If the child is not in the permanent or legal custody of a government agency or person other than the child's parent and the child resides in a home, tuition shall be paid by one of the following: (a) The school district in which the child's parent resides; (b) If the child's parent is not a resident of this state, the home in which the child resides. (4) Division (C)(4) of this section applies to any child who is admitted to a school district under division (B)(2) of this section, resides in a home that is not a foster home, a home maintained by the department of youth services, a detention facility established under section 2152.41 of the Revised Code, or a juvenile facility established under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, and receives educational services at the home or facility in which the child resides pursuant to a contract between the home or facility and the school district providing those services. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is a special education student, a district may choose whether to receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section or to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code. If a district chooses to receive a payment for that child under section 3323.14 of the Revised Code, it shall not receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. If a child to whom division (C)(4) of this section applies is not a special education student, a district shall receive a tuition payment for that child under division (C)(4) of this section. In the case of a child to which division (C)(4) of this section applies, the total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce, which formula shall be designed to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the school district providing the educational services and, if different, the school district that is responsible to pay tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the district providing the educational services to the child. (5) In the case of a child to whom division (B)(4) of this section applies, and except as otherwise provided in division (C)(5)(f) of this section, tuition shall be paid to the home or facility for educational services provided to the child by the school district in which the child's parent resides according to the following: (a) The total educational cost to be paid for the child shall be determined by a formula approved by the department of education and workforce. The department shall design the formula to calculate a per diem cost for the educational services provided to the child for each day the child is served and shall reflect the total actual cost incurred in providing those services. The department shall certify the total educational cost to be paid for the child to both the home or facility providing the educational services and the district that is responsible to pay the tuition for the child. The department shall deduct the certified amount from the state basic aid funds payable under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the district responsible to pay tuition and shall pay that amount to the home or facility providing the educational services to the child. (b) The district responsible to pay tuition shall continue to report the child in its enrollment for purposes of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If the parent's residence changes to a different school district while the child resides in the home or facility, the department of education and workforce may re-determine the school district responsible for tuition based on evidence provided by the district currently responsible for tuition. (d) Upon a child's discharge from the home or facility, the home or facility shall immediately notify the district where the child's parent resides and the department of education and workforce. The notification shall include a certified transcript of all coursework completed by the child while residing in the home or facility. The district where the child's parent resides shall accept all coursework completed by the child while in the home or facility and shall award credit for that coursework in accordance with district policy. (e) Following discharge from the home or facility and return to the parent's residence, high school students shall meet requirements under section 3313.618 of the Revised Code in order to qualify for a high school diploma that are no more stringent than those that apply to students who enroll into an Ohio public or chartered nonpublic high school after receiving a home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (f) If the child is provided educational services by a chartered nonpublic school while residing in a home and the child has been awarded a scholarship under a state scholarship program, as defined in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code, no school district shall be responsible for paying tuition under division (C)(5) of this section. (D) Tuition required to be paid under divisions (C)(2) and (3)(a) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. Tuition required to be paid under division (C)(3)(b) of this section shall be computed in accordance with section 3317.081 of the Revised Code. If a home fails to pay the tuition required by division (C)(3)(b) of this section, the board of education providing the education may recover in a civil action the tuition and the expenses incurred in prosecuting the action, including court costs and reasonable attorney's fees. If the prosecuting attorney or city director of law represents the board in such action, costs and reasonable attorney's fees awarded by the court, based upon the prosecuting attorney's, director's, or one of their designee's time spent preparing and presenting the case, shall be deposited in the county or city general fund. (E) A board of education may enroll a child free of any tuition obligation for a period not to exceed sixty days, on the sworn statement of an adult resident of the district that the resident has initiated legal proceedings for custody of the child. (F) In the case of any individual entitled to attend school under this division, no tuition shall be charged by the school district of attendance and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the individual's attendance. Notwithstanding division (B), (C), or (E) of this section: (1) All persons at least eighteen but under twenty-two years of age who live apart from their parents, support themselves by their own labor, and have not successfully completed the high school curriculum or the individualized education program developed for the person by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code, are entitled to attend school in the district in which they reside. (2) Any child under eighteen years of age who is married is entitled to attend school in the child's district of residence. (3) A child is entitled to attend school in the district in which either of the child's parents is employed if the child has a medical condition that may require emergency medical attention. The parent of a child entitled to attend school under division (F)(3) of this section shall submit to the board of education of the district in which the parent is employed a statement from the child's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner certifying that the child's medical condition may require emergency medical attention. The statement shall be supported by such other evidence as the board may require. (4) Any child residing with a person other than the child's parent is entitled, for a period not to exceed twelve months, to attend school in the district in which that person resides if the child's parent files an affidavit with the superintendent of the district in which the person with whom the child is living resides stating all of the following: (a) That the parent is serving outside of the state in the armed services of the United States; (b) That the parent intends to reside in the district upon returning to this state; (c) The name and address of the person with whom the child is living while the parent is outside the state. (5) Any child under the age of twenty-two years who, after the death of a parent, resides in a school district other than the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death is entitled to continue to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parent's death for the remainder of the school year, subject to approval of that district board. (6) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a parent who is having a new house built in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the new house is being built. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being built, and stating the parent's intention to reside there upon its completion; (b) A statement from the builder confirming that a new house is being built for the parent and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. (7) A child under the age of twenty-two years residing with a parent who has a contract to purchase a house in a school district outside the district where the parent is residing and who is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan for the purchase of such house is entitled to attend school for a period of time in the district where the house is being purchased. In order to be entitled to such attendance, the parent shall provide the district superintendent with the following: (a) A sworn statement explaining the situation, revealing the location of the house being purchased, and stating the parent's intent to reside there; (b) A statement from a real estate broker or bank officer confirming that the parent has a contract to purchase the house, that the parent is waiting upon the date of closing of the mortgage loan, and that the house is at the location indicated in the parent's statement. The district superintendent shall establish a period of time not to exceed ninety days during which the child entitled to attend school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section may attend without tuition obligation. A student attending a school under division (F)(6) or (7) of this section shall be eligible to participate in interscholastic athletics under the auspices of that school, provided the board of education of the school district where the student's parent resides, by a formal action, releases the student to participate in interscholastic athletics at the school where the student is attending, and provided the student receives any authorization required by a public agency or private organization of which the school district is a member exercising authority over interscholastic sports. (8) A child whose parent is a full-time employee of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or of an educational service center, may be admitted to the schools of the district where the child's parent is employed, or in the case of a child whose parent is employed by an educational service center, in the district that serves the location where the parent's job is primarily located, provided the district board of education establishes such an admission policy by resolution adopted by a majority of its members. Any such policy shall take effect on the first day of the school year and the effective date of any amendment or repeal may not be prior to the first day of the subsequent school year. The policy shall be uniformly applied to all such children and shall provide for the admission of any such child upon request of the parent. No child may be admitted under this policy after the first day of classes of any school year. (9) A child who is with the child's parent under the care of a shelter for victims of domestic violence, as defined in section 3113.33 of the Revised Code, is entitled to attend school free in the district in which the child is with the child's parent, and no other school district shall be required to pay tuition for the child's attendance in that school district. The enrollment of a child in a school district under this division shall not be denied due to a delay in the school district's receipt of any records required under section 3313.672 of the Revised Code or any other records required for enrollment. Any days of attendance and any credits earned by a child while enrolled in a school district under this division shall be transferred to and accepted by any school district in which the child subsequently enrolls. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules to ensure compliance with this division. (10) Any child under the age of twenty-two years whose parent has moved out of the school district after the commencement of classes in the child's senior year of high school is entitled, subject to the approval of that district board, to attend school in the district in which the child attended school at the time of the parental move for the remainder of the school year and for one additional semester or equivalent term. A district board may also adopt a policy specifying extenuating circumstances under which a student may continue to attend school under division (F)(10) of this section for an additional period of time in order to successfully complete the high school curriculum for the individualized education program developed for the student by the high school pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code. (11) As used in this division, "grandparent" means a parent of a parent of a child. A child under the age of twenty-two years who is in the custody of the child's parent, resides with a grandparent, and does not require special education is entitled to attend the schools of the district in which the child's grandparent resides, provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, the board of education of the school district in which the child's grandparent resides and the board of education of the school district in which the child's parent resides enter into a written agreement specifying that good cause exists for such attendance, describing the nature of this good cause, and consenting to such attendance. In lieu of a consent form signed by a parent, a board of education may request the grandparent of a child attending school in the district in which the grandparent resides pursuant to division (F)(11) of this section to complete any consent form required by the district, including any authorization required by sections 3313.712, 3313.713, 3313.716, and 3313.718 of the Revised Code. Upon request, the grandparent shall complete any consent form required by the district. A school district shall not incur any liability solely because of its receipt of a consent form from a grandparent in lieu of a parent. Division (F)(11) of this section does not create, and shall not be construed as creating, a new cause of action or substantive legal right against a school district, a member of a board of education, or an employee of a school district. This section does not affect, and shall not be construed as affecting, any immunities from defenses to tort liability created or recognized by Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code for a school district, member, or employee. (12) A child under the age of twenty-two years is entitled to attend school in a school district other than the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section provided that, prior to such attendance in any school year, both of the following occur: (a) The superintendent of the district in which the child is entitled to attend school under division (B), (C), or (E) of this section contacts the superintendent of another district for purposes of this division; (b) The superintendents of both districts enter into a written agreement that consents to the attendance and specifies that the purpose of such attendance is to protect the student's physical or mental well-being or to deal with other extenuating circumstances deemed appropriate by the superintendents. While an agreement is in effect under this division for a student who is not receiving special education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code and notwithstanding Chapter 3327. of the Revised Code, the board of education of neither school district involved in the agreement is required to provide transportation for the student to and from the school where the student attends. A student attending a school of a district pursuant to this division shall be allowed to participate in all student activities, including interscholastic athletics, at the school where the student is attending on the same basis as any student who has always attended the schools of that district while of compulsory school age. (13) All school districts shall comply with the "McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act," 42 U.S.C.A. 11431 et seq., for the education of homeless children. Each city, local, and exempted village school district shall comply with the requirements of that act governing the provision of a free, appropriate public education, including public preschool, to each homeless child. When a child loses permanent housing and becomes a homeless person, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11481(5), or when a child who is such a homeless person changes temporary living arrangements, the child's parent or guardian shall have the option of enrolling the child in either of the following: (a) The child's school of origin, as defined in 42 U.S.C.A. 11432(g)(3)(C); (b) The school that is operated by the school district in which the shelter where the child currently resides is located and that serves the geographic area in which the shelter is located. (14) A child under the age of twenty-two years who resides with a person other than the child's parent is entitled to attend school in the school district in which that person resides if both of the following apply: (a) That person has been appointed, through a military power of attorney executed under section 574(a) of the "National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 1994," 107 Stat. 1674 (1993), 10 U.S.C. 1044b, or through a comparable document necessary to complete a family care plan, as the parent's agent for the care, custody, and control of the child while the parent is on active duty as a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States or because the parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on a duty assignment away from the parent's residence. (b) The military power of attorney or comparable document includes at least the authority to enroll the child in school. The entitlement to attend school in the district in which the parent's agent under the military power of attorney or comparable document resides applies until the end of the school year in which the military power of attorney or comparable document expires. (G) A board of education, after approving admission, may waive tuition for students who will temporarily reside in the district and who are either of the following: (1) Residents or domiciliaries of a foreign nation who request admission as foreign exchange students; (2) Residents or domiciliaries of the United States but not of Ohio who request admission as participants in an exchange program operated by a student exchange organization. (H) Pursuant to sections 3311.211, 3313.90, 3319.01, 3323.04, 3327.04, and 3327.06 of the Revised Code, a child may attend school or participate in a special education program in a school district other than in the district where the child is entitled to attend school under division (B) of this section. (I)(1) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, a child under twenty-two years of age may attend school in the school district in which the child, at the end of the first full week of October of the school year, was entitled to attend school as otherwise provided under this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code, if at that time the child was enrolled in the schools of the district but since that time the child or the child's parent has relocated to a new address located outside of that school district and within the same county as the child's or parent's address immediately prior to the relocation. The child may continue to attend school in the district, and at the school to which the child was assigned at the end of the first full week of October of the current school year, for the balance of the school year. Division (I)(1) of this section applies only if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The board of education of the school district in which the child was entitled to attend school at the end of the first full week in October and of the district to which the child or child's parent has relocated each has adopted a policy to enroll children described in division (I)(1) of this section. (b) The child's parent provides written notification of the relocation outside of the school district to the superintendent of each of the two school districts. (2) At the beginning of the school year following the school year in which the child or the child's parent relocated outside of the school district as described in division (I)(1) of this section, the child is not entitled to attend school in the school district under that division. (3) Any person or entity owing tuition to the school district on behalf of the child at the end of the first full week in October, as provided in division (C) of this section, shall continue to owe such tuition to the district for the child's attendance under division (I)(1) of this section for the lesser of the balance of the school year or the balance of the time that the child attends school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section. (4) A pupil who may attend school in the district under division (I)(1) of this section shall be entitled to transportation services pursuant to an agreement between the district and the district in which the child or child's parent has relocated unless the districts have not entered into such agreement, in which case the child shall be entitled to transportation services in the same manner as a pupil attending school in the district under interdistrict open enrollment as described in division (E) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the district has adopted an open enrollment policy as described in division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of section 3313.98 of the Revised Code. (J) This division does not apply to a child receiving special education. A school district required to pay tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount deducted under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. A school district entitled to receive tuition pursuant to division (C)(2) or (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code shall have an amount credited under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code equal to its own tuition rate for the same period of attendance. If the tuition rate credited to the district of attendance exceeds the rate deducted from the district required to pay tuition, the department of education and workforce shall pay the district of attendance the difference from amounts deducted from all districts' payments under division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code but not credited to other school districts under such division and from appropriations made for such purpose. The treasurer of each school district shall, by the fifteenth day of January and July, furnish the director of education and workforce a report of the names of each child who attended the district's schools under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code during the preceding six calendar months, the duration of the attendance of those children, the school district responsible for tuition on behalf of the child, and any other information that the director requires. Upon receipt of the report the director, pursuant to division (C) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, shall deduct each district's tuition obligations under divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code and pay to the district of attendance that amount plus any amount required to be paid by the state. (K) In the event of a disagreement, the director of education and workforce shall determine the school district in which the parent resides. (L) Nothing in this section requires or authorizes, or shall be construed to require or authorize, the admission to a public school in this state of a pupil who has been permanently excluded from public school attendance by the director pursuant to sections 3301.121 and 3313.662 of the Revised Code. (M) In accordance with division (B)(1) of this section, a child whose parent is a member of the national guard or a reserve unit of the armed forces of the United States and is called to active duty, or a child whose parent is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, may continue to attend school in the district in which the child's parent lived before being called to active duty or ordered to a temporary duty assignment outside of the district, as long as the child's parent continues to be a resident of that district, and regardless of where the child lives as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. However, the district is not responsible for providing transportation for the child if the child lives outside of the district as a result of the parent's active duty status or temporary duty assignment. Sec. 3313.7118. Each public school, as defined in section 3301.28 of the Revised Code, and chartered nonpublic school that serves elementary school students shall provide either an electronic or paper copy of the informational materials described in section 3707.61 of the Revised Code to each student's parent or guardian on the student's enrollment in elementary school. Sec. 3313.753. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Electronic communications device" means any device that is powered by batteries or electricity and that is capable of receiving, transmitting, or receiving and transmitting communications between two or more persons or a communication from or to a person. (2) "School" means any school that is operated by a board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district. (3) "School building" means any building in which any of the instruction, extracurricular activities, or training provided by a school is conducted. (4) "School grounds or premises" means either of the following: (a) The parcel of real property on which any school building is situated; (b) Any other parcel of real property that is owned or leased by a board of education and on which some of the instruction, extracurricular activities, or training of the school is conducted. (B) The board of education of any city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district may adopt a policy prohibiting students from carrying an electronic communications device in any school building or on any school grounds or premises of the district. The policy may provide for exceptions to this prohibition as specified in the policy. The policy shall specify any disciplinary measures that will be taken for violation of this prohibition. If a board of education adopts a policy under this division, the board shall post the policy in a central location in each school building and make it available to students and parents upon request. (C)(C)(1) Not later than the first day of July that immediately follows the effective date of this amendmentJanuary 1, 2026, each school district board of education shall adopt a policy governing the use of cellular telephones by students during school hours. The policy shall do all of the following: (1) Emphasize that student cellular telephone use be as limited as possible during school hours; (2) Reduce cellular telephone-related distractions in classroom settings; (3)prohibit all cellular telephone use by students during the instructional day, except as described in division (C)(2) of this section or if permitted under the building's comprehensive emergency management plan adopted under section 5502.262 of the Revised Code. (2) If determined appropriate by the district board, or if included in a student's individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code or plan developed under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794, permit students to may use cellular telephones or other electronic communications devices for student learning or to monitor or address a health concern. A district board shall permit a student to use a cellular telephone or other electronic communications device to monitor or address a health concern if the board receives a written statement from the student's physician requiring such use. (D) Division (C) of this section shall not be construed to require a district board to adopt a policy that prohibits all cellular telephone use by students. Nonetheless, any Any district board that adopts a policy that prohibits all cellular telephone use by students shall be considered to have met the requirements in division (C) of this section. (E) Any district board that adopts a policy that meets the requirements prescribed in division (C) of this section prior to the effective date of this amendmentthe effective date of this amendment, shall be considered to have met the requirement to adopt a policy under this section. (F) Each district board that adopts a policy under this section after the effective date of this amendmentthe effective date of this amendment, shall do so at a public meeting of the board. (G) Each district board shall make any policy it adopts under this section publicly available and post it prominently on its publicly accessible web site, if it has one. (H) Not later than sixty days after the effective date of this amendment, the department of education and workforce shall develop a model policy that meets the requirements prescribed in division (C) of this section. To the extent possible, the model policy shall take into account available research concerning the effect of the use of cellular telephones by students in school settings. The model policy may be utilized by districts and schools. Sec. 3313.90. As used in this section, "formula ADM" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, the provisions of this section that apply to a city school district do not apply to any joint vocational or cooperative education school district. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, each city, local, and exempted village school district shall, by one of the following means, provide to students enrolled in grades seven through twelve career-technical education adequate to prepare a student enrolled therein for an occupation: (1) Establishing and maintaining a career-technical education program that meets standards adopted by the department of education and workforce; (2) Being a member of a joint vocational school district that meets standards adopted by the department; (3) Contracting for career-technical education with a joint vocational school district or another school district that meets the standards adopted by the department. The standards of the department shall include criteria for the participation by nonpublic students in career-technical education programs without financial assessment, charge, or tuition to such student except such assessments, charges, or tuition paid by resident public school students in such programs. Such nonpublic school students shall be included in the formula ADM of the school district maintaining the career-technical education program as part-time students in proportion to the time spent in the career-technical education program. By the thirtieth day of October of each year, the director of education and workforce shall determine and certify to the superintendent of each school district subject to this section either that the district is in compliance with the requirements of this section for the current school year or that the district is not in compliance. If the director certifies that the district is not in compliance, the director shall notify the board of education of the district of the actions necessary to bring the district into compliance with this section. In meeting standards established by the department, school districts, where practicable, shall provide career-technical education programs in high schools. A minimum enrollment of fifteen hundred students in grades nine through twelve is established as a base for comprehensive career-technical education course offerings. Beginning with the 2015-2016 school year, this base shall increase to a minimum enrollment of two thousand two hundred fifty students in grades seven through twelve is the base for comprehensive career-technical education course offerings. A school district may meet this requirement alone, through a cooperative arrangement pursuant to section 3313.92 of the Revised Code, through school district consolidation, by membership in a joint vocational school district, by contract with a school district, by contract with a school licensed by any state agency established by the Revised Code which school operates its courses offered for contracting with public schools under standards as to staffing and facilities comparable to those prescribed by the department for public schools provided no instructor in such courses shall be required to be certificated by the department, or in a combination of such ways. Exceptions to the minimum enrollment prescribed by this section may be made by the department based on sparsity of population or other factors indicating that comprehensive educational and career-technical education programs as required by this section can be provided through an alternate plan. (B) If Until July 1, 2026, the department shall waive the requirement for a city, local, or exempted village school district to provide career-technical education to students enrolled in grades seven and eight for that particular school year, if the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school that district adopts a resolution that specifies the district's intent not to provide career-technical education to students enrolled in grades seven and eight for a particular school year and submits that resolution to the department by the thirtieth day of September of that school year, the department shall waive the requirement for that district to provide career-technical education to students enrolled in grades seven and eight for that particular school year. Sec. 3313.902. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Competency-based educational program" means any system of academic instruction, assessment, grading, and reporting in which individuals receive credit based on demonstrations and assessments of their learning rather than the amount of time they spend studying a subject. A competency-based educational program shall encourage accelerated learning among individuals who master academic materials quickly while providing additional instructional support time for individuals who need it. (2) "Eligible individual" means an individual who satisfies all of the following criteria: (a) The individual is at least eighteen years of age. (b) The individual is officially withdrawn from school. (c) The individual has not been awarded a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalence as defined in section 4109.06 of the Revised Code. (3) "Eligible provider" means a city, local, or exempted village school district that operates a dropout prevention and recovery program, the buckeye united school district operated by the department of youth services, the Ohio central school system established under section 5145.06 of the Revised Code, or a joint vocational school district that operates an adult education program. (4) "Ohio technical center" has the same meaning as in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code. (B) An eligible provider may establish a competency-based educational program that complies with standards adopted by the department of education and workforce and may enroll eligible individuals in the program for up to three consecutive school years for the purpose of earning a high school diploma. The provider shall establish a career plan for each individual enrolled in the program that specifies the individual's career goals and describes how the individual will demonstrate competency or earn course credits under division (C) of this section to earn a diploma and attain the individual's career goals. (C) Notwithstanding sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.613, 3313.614, 3313.618, and 3313.619 of the Revised Code, the department shall award a high school diploma to an individual enrolled in a program under division (B) of this section who meets either of the following conditions: (1) The individual demonstrates competency by completing at least three of the following activities, at least one of which shall be the activity described in division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section: (a) Attaining a competency score as determined under division (B)(10) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code on each of the Algebra I and English language arts II end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of that section; (b) Attaining a workforce readiness score, as determined by the department, on the nationally recognized job skills assessment selected by the department under division (F) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code; (c) Obtaining an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, in a single career field that meet the criteria established under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code to qualify for a high school diploma or earning an industry-recognized credential that is aligned to a technical education program provided by an Ohio technical center; (d) Earning a cumulative score of proficient or higher on three or more state technical assessments aligned with section 3313.903 of the Revised Code in a single career pathway; (e) Doing either of the following: (i) Completing a pre-apprenticeship program aligned with options established under section 3313.904 of the Revised Code in the individual's chosen career field and providing evidence of acceptance into a registered apprenticeship program in that career field; (ii) Completing an apprenticeship registered with the apprenticeship council established under section 4139.02 of the Revised Code in the individual's chosen career field. (f) Completing two hundred fifty hours of a work-based learning experience with evidence of positive evaluations; (g) Obtaining an OhioMeansJobs-readiness seal under section 3313.6112 of the Revised Code. (2) The individual demonstrates competency by completing at least two of the activities described in divisions (C)(1)(a) to (g) of this section and earns course credits distributed as follows: (a) English language arts, four credits; (b) Mathematics, four credits. One credit may be a career-based mathematics course aligned to the individual's career plan developed under division (B) of this section. (c) Science, three credits; (d) Social studies, three credits; (e) Financial literacy, one-half credit. The one-half credit of financial literacy may be applied toward the number of mathematics or social studies credits required under division (C)(2) of this section. (D) An eligible provider shall report each individual enrolled in a program under division (B) of this section to the department. The department annually shall certify the enrollment and attendance of each individual reported under this division and shall pay the provider up to $7,500 for each such individual per school year, as determined by the department based on the extent of the individual's successful completion of the diploma requirements prescribed in division (C) of this section. (E) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, an eligible provider may request that the department allow an eligible individual to enroll in a program under division (B) of this section for more than three consecutive school years due to a hardship experienced by the individual that necessitates additional time to meet the diploma requirements prescribed in division (C) of this section. (F) An eligible individual shall not be assigned to classes or settings with individuals who are younger than eighteen years of age. (G) Each eligible provider shall contact each individual to whom a diploma is awarded under this section to collect data on the individual's career and educational outcomes at six months, twelve months, and eighteen months after the awarding of the diploma. At each time of contact, the provider shall request information regarding whether the individual is gainfully employed, participating in an apprenticeship, enrolled in postsecondary education, or serving in the military. The provider shall report the data collected to the department in the manner determined by the department. (H) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this section. The rules may include all of the following: (1) Standards for competency-based educational programs; (2) Standards for applying an individual's work or life experiences toward the requirements of division (C) of this section; (3) Requirements for determining the amount paid to providers under division (D) of this section; (4) Guidelines for approving or denying a hardship request made under division (E) of this section. Sec. 3313.905. (A) Southern state community college shall establish and maintain the Ohio code-scholar program, a hands-on educational initiative designed for students in grades four through twelve, with an emphasis on experiential learning in computer science, coding, and digital literacy. (B) Southern state community college shall use any funds appropriated by the general assembly for the Ohio-code scholar program for the following purposes: (1) All of the following: (a) Curriculum development and alignment; (b) Teacher training and resource creation; (c) Coordination with K–12 schools statewide; (d) Partnership development with other educational institutions, workforce agencies, and regional employers; (2) To implement and scale the program statewide, prioritizing outreach to underserved and rural areas, particularly within Ohio's Appalachian region. (3) To provide ongoing institutional support for southern state community college, including all of the following: (a) Operational needs that enhance its educational mission; (b) Technology and infrastructure upgrades; (c) Community outreach; (d) Services that strengthen the college's regional impact in the Appalachian corridor. (C) The director of development shall oversee the allocation and use of these funds. The director of education and workforce may establish guidelines to ensure compliance with this section. (D) Southern state community college shall submit an annual report to the director of education and workforce and the general assembly by the thirtieth day of June that includes all of the following: (1) The number of students and districts served by the Ohio code-scholar program; (2) Progress toward statewide implementation; (3) Regional economic and educational impact; (4) Use of funds for both programmatic and general operational support. Sec. 3313.975. As used in this section and in sections 3313.976 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, "the pilot project school district" or "the district" means any school district included in the pilot project scholarship program pursuant to this section. (A) The director of education and workforce shall implement the pilot project scholarship program and shall include in such program any school districts that are or have ever been under federal court order requiring supervision and operational management of the district by the state superintendent or director. The program shall provide for a number of students residing in any such district to receive scholarships to attend alternative schools, and for an equal number of students to receive tutorial assistance grants while attending public school in any such district. (B) The director shall establish an application process and deadline for accepting applications from students residing in the district to participate in the scholarship program. In the initial year of the program students may only use a scholarship to attend school in grades kindergarten through third. The director shall award as many scholarships and tutorial assistance grants as can be funded given the amount appropriated for the program. (C)(1) The pilot project program shall continue in effect each year that the general assembly has appropriated sufficient money to fund scholarships and tutorial assistance grants. In each year the program continues, new students may receive scholarships in grades kindergarten to twelve. A student who has received a scholarship may continue to receive one until the student has completed grade twelve. (2) If the general assembly discontinues the scholarship program, all students who are attending an alternative school under the pilot project shall be entitled to continued admittance to that specific school through all grades that are provided in such school, under the same conditions as when they were participating in the pilot project. The director shall continue to make scholarship payments in accordance with section 3317.022 of the Revised Code for students who remain enrolled in an alternative school under this provision in any year that funds have been appropriated for this purpose. If funds are not appropriated, the tuition charged to the parents of a student who remains enrolled in an alternative school under this provision shall not be increased beyond the amount equal to the amount of the scholarship plus any additional amount charged that student's parent in the most recent year of attendance as a participant in the pilot project, except that tuition for all the students enrolled in such school may be increased by the same percentage. (D) Notwithstanding sections 124.39 and 3311.83 of the Revised Code, if the pilot project school district experiences a decrease in enrollment due to participation in a state-sponsored scholarship program pursuant to sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, the district board of education may enter into an agreement with any teacher it employs to provide to that teacher severance pay or early retirement incentives, or both, if the teacher agrees to terminate the employment contract with the district board, provided any collective bargaining agreement in force pursuant to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code does not prohibit such an agreement for termination of a teacher's employment contract. (E) Except as provided for in division (C)(2) of section 3365.07 of the Revised Code, the director shall not require the parent of a student who applies for or receives a scholarship under the pilot project program to complete any kind of income verification regarding the student's family income. (F) A student is not eligible to receive a scholarship under sections 3313.975 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code if the treasurer of state has established an educational savings account for the student under section 3310.23 of the Revised Code for the school year for which the scholarship is sought. Sec. 3313.98. Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.19 and division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, the provisions of this section and sections 3313.981 to 3313.983 of the Revised Code that apply to a city school district do not apply to a joint vocational or cooperative education school district unless expressly specified. (A) As used in this section and sections 3313.981 to 3313.983 of the Revised Code: (1) "Parent" means either of the natural or adoptive parents of a student, except under the following conditions: (a) When the marriage of the natural or adoptive parents of the student has been terminated by a divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment or the natural or adoptive parents of the student are living separate and apart under a legal separation decree and the court has issued an order allocating the parental rights and responsibilities with respect to the student, "parent" means the residential parent as designated by the court except that "parent" means either parent when the court issues a shared parenting decree. (b) When a court has granted temporary or permanent custody of the student to an individual or agency other than either of the natural or adoptive parents of the student, "parent" means the legal custodian of the child. (c) When a court has appointed a guardian for the student, "parent" means the guardian of the student. (2) "Native student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in a district adopting a resolution under this section. (3) "Adjacent district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district having territory that abuts the territory of a district adopting a resolution under this section. (4) "Adjacent district student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in an adjacent district. (5) "Adjacent district joint vocational student" means an adjacent district student who enrolls in a city, exempted village, or local school district pursuant to this section and who also enrolls in a joint vocational school district that does not contain the territory of the district for which that student is a native student and does contain the territory of the city, exempted village, or local district in which the student enrolls. (6) "Poverty line" means the poverty line established by the director of the United States office of management and budget as revised by the secretary of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 1609, 42 U.S.C.A. 9902, as amended. (7) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Other district" means a city, exempted village, or local school district having territory outside of the territory of a district adopting a resolution under this section. (9) "Other district student" means a student entitled under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code to attend school in an other district. (10) "Other district joint vocational student" means a student who is enrolled in any city, exempted village, or local school district and who also enrolls in a joint vocational school district that does not contain the territory of the district for which that student is a native student in accordance with a policy adopted under section 3313.983 of the Revised Code. (11) "Active duty member" means a member of the armed forces of the United States who is on full-time duty. (12) "Armed forces" means the United States army, navy, air force, space force, marine corps, and coast guard. (B)(1) Subject to division (I) of this section, the board of education of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall adopt a resolution establishing for the school district one of the following policies: (a) A policy that entirely prohibits the enrollment of students from adjacent districts or other districts, other than students for whom tuition is paid in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code; (b) A policy that permits enrollment of students from all adjacent districts in accordance with policy statements contained in the resolution; (c) A policy that permits enrollment of students from all other districts in accordance with policy statements contained in the resolution. (2) A policy permitting enrollment of students from adjacent or from other districts, as applicable, shall provide for all of the following: (a) Application procedures, including deadlines for application and for notification of students and the superintendent of the applicable district whenever an adjacent or other district student's application is approved. (b) Procedures for admitting adjacent or other district applicants free of any tuition obligation to the district's schools, including, but not limited to: (i) The establishment of district capacity limits by grade level, school building, and education program; (ii) A requirement that all native students wishing to be enrolled in the district will be enrolled and that any adjacent or other district students previously enrolled in the district shall receive preference over first-time applicants; (iii) Procedures to ensure that an appropriate racial balance is maintained in the district schools. (C) Except as provided in section 3313.982 of the Revised Code, the procedures for admitting adjacent or other district students, as applicable, shall not include: (1) Any requirement of academic ability, or any level of athletic, artistic, or other extracurricular skills; (2) Limitations on admitting applicants because of disability, except that a board may refuse to admit a student receiving services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, if the services described in the student's IEP are not available in the district's schools; (3) A requirement that the student be proficient in the English language; (4) Rejection of any applicant because the student has been subject to disciplinary proceedings, except that if an applicant has been suspended or expelled by the student's district for ten consecutive days or more in the term for which admission is sought or in the term immediately preceding the term for which admission is sought, the procedures may include a provision denying admission of such applicant. (D)(1) Each school board permitting only enrollment of adjacent district students shall provide information about the policy adopted under this section, including the application procedures and deadlines, to the superintendent and the board of education of each adjacent district and, upon request, to the parent of any adjacent district student. (2) Each school board permitting enrollment of other district students shall provide information about the policy adopted under this section, including the application procedures and deadlines, upon request, to the board of education of any other school district or to the parent of any student anywhere in the state. (E) Any school board shall accept all credits toward graduation earned in adjacent or other district schools by an adjacent or other district student or a native student. (F)(1) No board of education may adopt a policy discouraging or prohibiting its native students from applying to enroll in the schools of an adjacent or any other district that has adopted a policy permitting such enrollment, except that: (a) A a district may object to the enrollment of a native student in an adjacent or other district in order to maintain an appropriate racial balance. (b) The board of education of a district receiving funds under 64 Stat. 1100 (1950), 20 U.S.C.A. 236 et seq., as amended, may adopt a resolution objecting to the enrollment of its native students in adjacent or other districts if at least ten per cent of its students are included in the determination of the United States secretary of education made under section 20 U.S.C.A. 238(a). (2) If a board objects to enrollment of native students under this division, any adjacent or other district shall refuse to enroll such native students unless tuition is paid for the students in accordance with section 3317.08 of the Revised Code. An adjacent or other district enrolling such students may not receive funding for those students in accordance with section 3313.981 of the Revised Code. (G) The department of education and workforce shall monitor school districts to ensure compliance with this section and the districts' policies. The department may adopt rules requiring uniform application procedures, deadlines for application, notification procedures, and record-keeping requirements for all school boards that adopt policies permitting the enrollment of adjacent or other district students, as applicable. If the department adopts such rules, no school board shall adopt a policy that conflicts with those rules. (H) A resolution adopted by a board of education under this section that entirely prohibits the enrollment of students from adjacent and from other school districts does not abrogate any agreement entered into under section 3313.841 or 3313.92 of the Revised Code or any contract entered into under section 3313.90 of the Revised Code between the board of education adopting the resolution and the board of education of any adjacent or other district or prohibit these boards of education from entering into any such agreement or contract. (I) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section or section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) A policy adopted by a city, exempted village, or local school district board of education under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall permit any student who is not a native student of the district to enroll in the district if both of the following apply: (a) The student's parent is an active duty member of the armed forces stationed in the state. (b) The student's parent provides to the district a copy of the parent's official written order verifying the parent's status as an active duty member of the armed forces. (2) In enrolling a student pursuant to division (I) of this section, a district shall comply with procedures prescribed under divisions (B)(2) and (C) of this section, except as provided in division (I)(6) of this section. In addition, the district shall not require tuition to be paid for the student's enrollment in the district. (3) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(a) of this section and who is not a native student of that district shall, for the purposes of sections 3313.981, 3315.18, 3317.03, and 3318.011 of the Revised Code, be considered as an "other district student" who enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(c) of this section. Such student also shall receive transportation services under section 3313.981 of the Revised Code in the same manner as an "other district student." (4) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and who is not a native student of the district or an adjacent district shall, nevertheless, be considered an "adjacent district student" for the purposes of sections 3313.981, 3315.18, and 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (5) A student who, pursuant to this division, enrolls in a district that has adopted a policy under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and whose parent is subsequently discharged or released from active duty shall be permitted to attend school in that district and receive transportation services under section 3313.981 of the Revised Code in the same manner as an "other district student" for the remainder of the school year in which the parent is discharged or released from active duty. After the conclusion of that school year, that student shall not be eligible under this division, as long as the student does not have a parent on active duty. (6) A school district that enrolls a student under division (I) of this section, or that enrolls a student described in division (I)(1) of this section under division (B)(1)(c) of this section, shall not require the student to comply with any application deadline established under division (B)(2) of this section. (J) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit or require the board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district to exclude any native student of the district from enrolling in the district. Sec. 3314.011. (A) Every community school established under this chapter shall have a designated fiscal officer. Except as provided for in division (C) of this section, the fiscal officer shall be employed by or engaged under a contract with the governing authority of the community school. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 3.061 of the Revised Code, the auditor of state department of education and workforce shall require that the fiscal officer of any community school, before entering upon duties as fiscal officer of the school, execute a bond in an amount and with surety to be approved by the governing authority of the school, payable to the state, conditioned for the faithful performance of all the official duties required of the fiscal officer. The bond shall be deposited with the governing authority of the school, and a copy thereof, certified by the governing authority, shall be filed with the county auditor. (C) Prior to assuming the duties of fiscal officer, the fiscal officer designated under this section shall be licensed under section 3301.074 of the Revised Code. Any person serving as a fiscal officer of a community school on March 22, 2013, who is not licensed as a treasurer shall be permitted to serve as a fiscal officer for not more than one year following March 22, 2013. Beginning on that date and thereafter, no community school shall permit any individual to serve as a fiscal officer without a license as required by this section. (D)(1) The governing authority of a community school may adopt a resolution waiving the requirement that the governing authority is the party responsible to employ or contract with the designated fiscal officer, as prescribed by division (A) of this section, so long as the school's sponsor also approves the resolution. The resolution shall be valid for one year. A new resolution shall be adopted for each year that the governing authority wishes to waive this requirement, so long as the school's sponsor also approves the resolution. No resolution adopted pursuant to this division may waive the requirement for a community school to have a designated fiscal officer. (2) If the governing authority adopts a resolution pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section, the school's designated fiscal officer annually shall meet with the governing authority to review the school's financial status. (3) The governing authority shall submit to the department of education and workforce a copy of each resolution adopted pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section. Sec. 3314.013. (A) Until May 22, 2013, no internet- or computer-based community school shall operate unless the school was open for instruction as of May 1, 2005. No entity described in division (C)(1) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code shall enter into a contract to sponsor an internet- or computer-based community school, including a conversion school, between May 1, 2005, and May 22, 2013, except as follows: (1) The entity may renew a contract that the entity entered into with an internet- or computer-based community school prior to May 1, 2005, if the school was open for operation as of that date. (2) The entity may assume sponsorship of an existing internet- or computer-based community school that was formerly sponsored by another entity and may enter into a contract with that community school in accordance with section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. If a sponsor entered into a contract with an internet- or computer-based community school, including a conversion school, but the school was not open for operation as of May 1, 2005, the contract shall be void and the entity shall not enter into another contract with the school until May 22, 2013. (B)(1) Beginning on July 1, 2013, up to five new internet- or computer-based community schools may open each year, subject to approval of the director of education and workforce under division (B)(2) of this section. (2) The director shall approve applications for new internet- or computer-based community schools from only those applicants demonstrating experience and quality. The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules prescribing measures to determine experience and quality of applicants in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The measures shall include, but not be limited to, the following considerations: (a) The sponsor's experience with online schools; (b) The operator's experience with online schools; (c) The sponsor's and operator's previous record for student performance; (d) A preference for operators with previous experience in Ohio. (3) The department shall notify any new internet- or computer-based community school governed by division (B) of this section of whether the director has approved or disapproved the school's application to open for the 2013-2014 school year not later than July 1, 2013. Notwithstanding the dates prescribed for adoption and signing on sponsor contracts in division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code, or the date for opening a school for instruction required by division (A)(25) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code, a new internet- or computer-based community school approved for opening for the 2013-2014 school year under division (B) of this section may open and operate in that school year regardless of whether it has complied with those contract and opening dates. For each school year thereafter, the school shall comply with all applicable provisions of this chapter. (4) Notwithstanding divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, a sponsor rated "exemplary" on its most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code is permitted to open up to two new internet- or computer-based community schools that will primarily serve students enrolled in a are dropout prevention and recovery program community schools each year, not to exceed six new schools in a five-year period. (C) Nothing in division (A) or (B) of this section prohibits an internet- or computer-based community school from increasing the number of grade levels it offers. Sec. 3314.015. (A) The department of education and workforce shall be responsible for the oversight of any and all sponsors of the community schools established under this chapter and shall provide technical assistance to schools and sponsors in their compliance with applicable laws and the terms of the contracts entered into under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code and in the development and start-up activities of those schools. In carrying out its duties under this section, the department shall do all of the following: (1) In providing technical assistance to proposing parties, governing authorities, and sponsors, conduct training sessions and distribute informational materials; (2) Approve entities to be sponsors of community schools; (3) Monitor and evaluate, as required under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code, the effectiveness of any and all sponsors in their oversight of the schools with which they have contracted; (4) By December thirty-first of each year, issue a report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the chairpersons of the house and senate committees principally responsible for education matters regarding the effectiveness of academic programs, operations, and legal compliance and of the financial condition of all community schools established under this chapter and on the performance of community school sponsors; (5) From time to time, make legislative recommendations to the general assembly designed to enhance the operation and performance of community schools. (B)(1) Except as provided in sections 3314.021 and 3314.027 of the Revised Code, no entity shall enter into a preliminary agreement under division (C)(2) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or renew an existing contract to sponsor a community school until it has received approval from the department to sponsor community schools under this chapter and has entered into a written agreement with the department regarding the manner in which the entity will conduct such sponsorship. On and after July 1, 2017, each entity that sponsors a community school in this state, except for an entity described in sections 3314.021 and 3314.027 of the Revised Code, shall attain approval from the department in order to continue sponsoring schools regardless of whether that entity intends to enter into a preliminary agreement or renew an existing contract. All new and renewed agreements between the department and a sponsor shall contain specific language addressing the parameters under which the department can intervene and potentially revoke sponsorship authority in the event that the sponsor is unwilling or unable to fulfill its obligations. Additionally, each agreement shall set forth any territorial restrictions and limits on the number of schools that entity may sponsor, provide for an annual evaluation process, and include a stipulation permitting the department to modify the agreement under the following circumstances: (a) Poor fiscal management; (b) Lack of academic progress. (2) The initial term of a sponsor's agreement with the department shall be for up to five years. (a) An agreement entered into with the department pursuant to this section may be renewed for a term of up to ten years using the following criteria: (i) The academic performance of students enrolled in each community school the entity sponsors, as determined by the department pursuant to division (B)(1)(a) of section 3314.016 of the Revised Code; (ii) The sponsor's adherence to quality practices, as determined by the department pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of section 3314.016 of the Revised Code; (iii) The sponsor's compliance with all applicable laws and administrative rules. (b) Each agreement between the department and a sponsor shall specify that entities with an overall rating of "exemplary" for at least two consecutive years shall not be subject to the limit on the number of community schools the entity may sponsor or any territorial restrictions on sponsorship, for so long as that entity continues to be rated "exemplary." (c) The department shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code rules containing criteria, procedures, and deadlines for processing applications for approval of sponsors, for oversight of sponsors, for notifying a sponsor of noncompliance with applicable laws and administrative rules under division (F) of this section, for revocation of the approval of sponsors under division (C) of this section, and for entering into written agreements with sponsors. The rules shall require an entity to submit evidence of the entity's ability and willingness to comply with the provisions of division (D) (C) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. The rules also shall require all entities approved as sponsors to demonstrate a record of financial responsibility and successful implementation of educational programs. If an entity seeking approval to sponsor community schools in this state sponsors or operates schools in another state, at least one of the schools sponsored or operated by the entity must be comparable to or better than the performance of Ohio schools in need of continuous improvement under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, as determined by the department. Subject to section 3314.016 of the Revised Code, an entity that sponsors community schools may enter into preliminary agreements and sponsor up to one hundred schools, provided each school and the contract for sponsorship meets the requirements of this chapter. A sponsor that was rated "exemplary" on its most recent rating under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code may sponsor up to two hundred such schools. (3) The department shall determine, pursuant to criteria specified in rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, whether the mission proposed to be specified in the contract of a community school to be sponsored by a state university board of trustees or the board's designee under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code complies with the requirements of that division. Such determination of the department is final. (4) The department shall determine, pursuant to criteria specified in rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, if any tax-exempt entity under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that is proposed to be a sponsor of a community school is an education-oriented entity for purpose of satisfying the condition prescribed in division (C)(1)(f)(iii) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. Such determination of the department is final. (C) If at any time the department finds that a sponsor is not in compliance or is no longer willing to comply with its contract with any community school or with the department's rules for sponsorship, the department shall conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code on that matter. If after the hearing, the department has confirmed the original finding, it may revoke the sponsor's approval to sponsor community schools. In that case, the department's office of Ohio school sponsorship, established under section 3314.029 of the Revised Code, may assume the sponsorship of any schools with which the sponsor has contracted until the earlier of the expiration of two school years or until a new sponsor as described in division (C)(1) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code is secured by the school's governing authority. The office of Ohio school sponsorship may extend the term of the contract in the case of a school for which it has assumed sponsorship under this division as necessary to accommodate the term of the department's authorization to sponsor the school specified in this division. Community schools sponsored under this division shall not apply to the limit on directly authorized community schools under division (A)(3) of section 3314.029 of the Revised Code. However, nothing in this division shall preclude a community school affected by this division from applying for sponsorship under that section. (D) The decision of the department to disapprove an entity for sponsorship of a community school or to revoke approval for such sponsorship under division (C) of this section, may be appealed by the entity in accordance with section 119.12 of the Revised Code. (E) The department shall adopt procedures for use by a community school governing authority and sponsor when the school permanently closes and ceases operation, which shall include at least procedures for data reporting to the department, handling of student records, distribution of assets in accordance with section 3314.074 of the Revised Code, and other matters related to ceasing operation of the school. (F)(1) In lieu of revoking a sponsor's authority to sponsor community schools under division (C) of this section, if the department finds that a sponsor is not in compliance with applicable laws and administrative rules, the department shall declare in a written notice to the sponsor the specific laws or rules, or both, for which the sponsor is noncompliant. A sponsor notified under division (F)(1) of this section shall respond to the department not later than fourteen days after the notification with a proposed plan to remedy the conditions for which the sponsor was found to be noncompliant. The department shall approve or disapprove the plan not later than fourteen days after receiving it. If the plan is disapproved, the sponsor may submit a revised plan to the department not later than fourteen days after receiving notification of disapproval from the department or not later than sixty days after the date the sponsor received notification of noncompliance from the department, whichever is earlier. The department shall approve or disapprove the revised plan not later than fourteen days after receiving it or not later than sixty days after the date the sponsor received notification of noncompliance from the department, whichever is earlier. A sponsor may continue to make revisions by the deadlines prescribed in division (F)(1) of this section to any revised plan that is disapproved by the department until the sixtieth day after the date the sponsor received notification of noncompliance from the department. If a plan or a revised plan is approved, the sponsor shall implement it not later than sixty days after the date the sponsor received notification of noncompliance from the department or not later than thirty days after the plan is approved, whichever is later. If a sponsor does not respond to the department or implement an approved compliance plan by the deadlines prescribed by division (F)(1) of this section, or if a sponsor does not receive approval of a compliance plan on or before the sixtieth day after the date the sponsor received notification of noncompliance from the department, the department shall declare in written notice to the sponsor that the sponsor is in probationary status, and may limit the sponsor's ability to sponsor additional schools. (2) A sponsor that has been placed on probationary status under division (F)(1) of this section may apply to the department for its probationary status to be lifted. The application for a sponsor's probationary status to be lifted shall include evidence, occurring after the initial notification of noncompliance, of the sponsor's compliance with applicable laws and administrative rules. Not later than fourteen days after receiving an application from the sponsor, the department shall decide whether or not to remove the sponsor's probationary status. (G) In carrying out its duties under this chapter, the department shall not impose requirements on community schools or their sponsors that are not permitted by law or duly adopted rules. (H) This section applies to entities that sponsor conversion community schools and new start-up schools. (I) Nothing in divisions (C) to (F) of this section prohibits the department from taking any action permitted or required under the written agreement between the department and a sponsoring entity without a hearing on the matter, in the event that the sponsor is unwilling or unable to fulfill its obligations. Sec. 3314.016. This section applies to any entity that sponsors a community school, regardless of whether section 3314.021 or 3314.027 of the Revised Code exempts the entity from the requirement to be approved for sponsorship under divisions (A)(2) and (B)(1) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The office of Ohio school sponsorship established under section 3314.029 of the Revised Code shall be rated under division (B) of this section, but divisions (A) and (C) of this section do not apply to the office. (A) An entity that sponsors a community school shall be permitted to enter into contracts under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code to sponsor additional community schools only if the entity meets all of the following criteria: (1) The entity is in compliance with all provisions of this chapter requiring sponsors of community schools to report data or information to the department of education and workforce. (2) The entity is not rated as "ineffective" under division (B)(6) (B)(5) of this section. (3) Except as set forth in sections 3314.021 and 3314.027 of the Revised Code, the entity has received approval from and entered into an agreement with the department pursuant to section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The department shall develop and implement an evaluation system that annually rates and assigns an overall rating to each entity that sponsors a community school. The department, not later than the first day of February of each year, shall post on the department's web site the framework for the evaluation system, including technical documentation that the department intends to use to rate sponsors for the next school year. The department shall solicit public comment on the evaluation system for thirty consecutive days. Not later than the first day of April of each year, the department shall compile and post on the department's web site all public comments that were received during the public comment period. The evaluation system shall be posted on the department's web site by the fifteenth day of July of each school year. Any changes to the evaluation system after that date shall take effect the following year. The evaluation system shall be based on the following components: (a) Academic performance of students enrolled in community schools sponsored by the same entity. The academic performance component shall be derived from the performance measures prescribed for the state report cards under section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, and shall be based on the performance of the schools for the school year for which the evaluation is conducted. In addition to the academic performance for a specific school year, the academic performance component shall also include year-to-year changes in the overall sponsor portfolio. For a community school for which no graded performance measures are applicable or available, the department shall use nonreport card performance measures specified in the contract between the community school and the sponsor under division (A)(4) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (b) Adherence by a sponsor to the quality practices prescribed by the department under division (B)(3) of this section. For a sponsor that was rated "effective" or "exemplary" on its most recent rating, the department may evaluate that sponsor's adherence to quality practices once over a period of three years. If the department elects to evaluate a sponsor once over a period of three years, the most recent rating for a sponsor's adherence to quality practices shall be used when determining an annual overall rating conducted under this section. (c) Compliance with all applicable laws and administrative rules by an entity that sponsors a community school. Under the evaluation system prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section, the department shall not assign an overall rating of "ineffective" or lower to an entity that sponsors a community school solely because that entity received no points on one of the components prescribed under that division. (2) In calculating an academic performance component, the department shall exclude all community schools that have been in operation for not more than two full school years, all community schools whose contracts were not renewed or terminated by the sponsor pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code before the evaluation, and all community schools described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. However, the academic performance of the community schools described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code shall be reported, but shall not be used as a factor when determining a sponsoring entity's rating under this section. (3) The department, in consultation with entities that sponsor community schools, shall prescribe quality practices for community school sponsors and develop an instrument to measure adherence to those quality practices. The quality practices shall be based on standards developed by the national association of charter school authorizers or any other nationally organized community school organization. (4)(a) The department may permit peer review of a sponsor's adherence to the quality practices prescribed under division (B)(3) of this section. Peer reviewers shall be limited to individuals employed by sponsors rated "effective" or "exemplary" on the most recent ratings conducted under this section. (b) The department shall require individuals participating in peer review under division (B)(4)(a) of this section to complete training approved or established by the department. (c) The department may enter into an agreement with another entity to provide training to individuals conducting peer review of sponsors. Prior to entering into an agreement with an entity, the department shall review and approve of the entity's training program. (5)(4) The director of education and workforce shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing standards for measuring compliance with applicable laws and rules under division (B)(1)(c) of this section. (6)(5) The department annually shall rate all entities that sponsor community schools as either "exemplary," "effective," "ineffective," or "poor," based on the components prescribed by division (B) of this section, where each component is weighted equally. A separate rating shall be given by the department for each component of the evaluation system. The department shall publish the ratings between the first day of October and the fifteenth day of November. Prior to the publication of the final ratings, the department shall designate and provide notice of a period of at least ten business days during which each sponsor may review the information used by the department to determine the sponsor's rating on the components prescribed by division (B)(1) of this section. If the sponsor believes there is an error in the department's evaluation, the sponsor may request adjustments to the rating of any of those components based on documentation previously submitted as part of an evaluation. The sponsor shall provide to the department any necessary evidence or information to support the requested adjustments. The department shall review the evidence and information, determine whether an adjustment is valid, and promptly notify the sponsor of its determination and reasons. If any adjustments to the data could result in a change to the rating on the applicable component or to the overall rating, the department shall recalculate the ratings prior to publication. The department shall provide training on an annual basis regarding the evaluation system prescribed under this section. The training shall, at a minimum, describe methodology, timelines, and data required for the evaluation system. The first training session shall occur not later than March 2, 2016. Beginning in 2018, the training shall be made available to each entity that sponsors a community school by the fifteenth day of July of each year and shall include guidance on any changes made to the evaluation system. (7)(a)(6)(a) Entities with an overall rating of "exemplary" for the two most recent years in which the entity was evaluated may take advantage of the following incentives: (i) Renewal of the written agreement with the department, not to exceed ten years, provided that the entity consents to continued evaluation of adherence to quality practices as described in division (B)(1)(b) of this section; (ii) The ability to extend the term of the contract between the sponsoring entity and the community school beyond the term described in the written agreement with the department; (iii) An exemption from the preliminary agreement and contract adoption and execution deadline requirements prescribed in division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code; (iv) An exemption from the automatic contract expiration requirement, should a new community school fail to open by the thirtieth day of September of the calendar year in which the community school contract is executed; (v) No limit on the number of community schools the entity may sponsor; (vi) No territorial restrictions on sponsorship. An entity may continue to sponsor any community schools with which it entered into agreements under division (B)(7)(a)(B)(6)(a) (v) or (vi) of this section while rated "exemplary," notwithstanding the fact that the entity later receives a lower overall rating. (b) Entities with an overall rating of "exemplary" shall not be evaluated by the department for five full school years following the school year for which the entity received the "exemplary" rating. Entities with an overall rating of "exemplary" or "effective" for the three most recent years in which the entity was evaluated shall not be evaluated by the department once every for three full school years following the school year for which the entity received the "effective" rating. (c)(i) Entities that receive an overall rating of "ineffective" shall be prohibited from sponsoring any new or additional community schools during the time in which the sponsor is rated as "ineffective" and shall be subject to a quality improvement plan based on correcting the deficiencies that led to the "ineffective" rating, with timelines and benchmarks that have been established by the department. (ii) Entities that receive an overall rating of "ineffective" on their three most recent ratings shall have all sponsorship authority revoked. Within thirty days after receiving its third rating of "ineffective," the entity may appeal the revocation of its sponsorship authority to the director, who shall appoint an independent hearing officer to conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The hearing shall be conducted within thirty days after receipt of the notice of appeal. Within forty-five days after the hearing is completed, the director shall determine whether the revocation is appropriate based on the hearing conducted by the independent hearing officer, and if determined appropriate, the revocation shall be confirmed. (d) Entities that receive an overall rating of "poor" shall have all sponsorship authority revoked. Within thirty days after receiving a rating of "poor," the entity may appeal the revocation of its sponsorship authority to the director, who shall appoint an independent hearing officer to conduct a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The hearing shall be conducted within thirty days after receipt of the notice of appeal. Within forty-five days after the hearing is completed, the director shall determine whether the revocation is appropriate based on the hearing conducted by the independent hearing officer, and if determined appropriate, the revocation shall be confirmed. (8)(7) For the 2014-2015 school year and each school year thereafter, student academic performance prescribed under division (B)(1)(a) of this section shall include student academic performance data from dropout prevention and recovery community schools that primarily serve students enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program. (8) The department shall publish annually academic performance data for each sponsor in accordance with division (B)(1)(a) of this section, regardless of whether the sponsor is being evaluated under this section for that school year. (C) If the governing authority of a community school enters into a contract with a sponsor prior to the date on which the sponsor is prohibited from sponsoring additional schools under division (A) of this section and the school has not opened for operation as of that date, that contract shall be void and the school shall not open until the governing authority secures a new sponsor by entering into a contract with the new sponsor under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. However, the department's office of Ohio school sponsorship, established under section 3314.029 of the Revised Code, may assume the sponsorship of the school until the earlier of the expiration of two school years or until a new sponsor is secured by the school's governing authority. A community school sponsored by the department under this division shall not be included when calculating the maximum number of directly authorized community schools permitted under division (A)(3) of section 3314.029 of the Revised Code. (D) When an entity's authority to sponsor schools is revoked pursuant to division (B)(7)(c)(B)(6)(c) or (d) of this section, the office of Ohio school sponsorship shall assume sponsorship of any schools with which the original sponsor has contracted for the remainder of that school year. The office may continue sponsoring those schools until the earlier of: (1) The expiration of two school years from the time that sponsorship is revoked; (2) When a new sponsor is secured by the governing authority pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. Any community school sponsored under this division shall not be counted for purposes of directly authorized community schools under division (A)(3) of section 3314.029 of the Revised Code. (E) The department shall recalculate the rating for the 2017-2018 school year for each sponsor of a community school that receives recalculated ratings pursuant to division (I) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.017. (A) The department of education and workforce shall prescribe by rules, adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, an academic performance rating and report card system that satisfies the requirements of this section for dropout prevention and recovery community schools that primarily serve students enrolled in dropout prevention and recovery programs as described in division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code, to be used in lieu of the system prescribed under sections 3302.03 and 3314.012 of the Revised Code beginning with the 2012-2013 school year. Each such school shall comply with the testing and reporting requirements of the system as prescribed by the department. (B) Nothing in this section shall at any time relieve a school from its obligations under the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001" to make "adequate yearly progress," as both that act and that term are defined in section 3302.01 of the Revised Code, or a school's amenability to the provisions of section 3302.04 or 3302.041 of the Revised Code. The department shall continue to report each school's performance as required by the act and to enforce applicable sanctions under section 3302.04 or 3302.041 of the Revised Code. (C) The rules adopted by the department shall prescribe the following performance indicators for the rating and report card system required by this section: (1) Graduation rate for each of the following student cohorts: (a) The number of students who graduate in four years or less with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the graduating class; (b) The number of students who graduate in five years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate; (c) The number of students who graduate in six years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate; (d) The number of students who graduate in seven years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate; (e) The number of students who graduate in eight years with a regular high school diploma divided by the number of students who form the adjusted cohort for the four-year graduation rate. (2) The percentage of twelfth-grade students currently enrolled in the school who have attained the designated passing score on all of the state high school achievement assessments required under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code or the cumulative performance score on the end-of-course examinations prescribed under division (B)(2) of section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, whichever applies, and other students enrolled in the school, regardless of grade level, who are within three months of their twenty-second birthday and have attained the designated passing score on all of the state high school achievement assessments or the cumulative performance score on the end-of-course examinations, whichever applies, by their twenty-second birthday; (3) Annual measurable objectives as defined in section 3302.01 of the Revised Code; (4) Growth in student achievement in reading, or mathematics, or both as measured by separate nationally norm-referenced assessments that have developed appropriate standards for students enrolled in dropout prevention and recovery programs, adopted or approved by the department. (D)(1) The department's rules shall prescribe the expected performance levels and benchmarks for each of the indicators prescribed by division (C) of this section based on the data gathered by the department under division (G) of this section and simulations created by the department. Based on a school's level of attainment or nonattainment of the expected performance levels and benchmarks for each of the indicators, the department shall rate each school in one of the following categories: (a) Exceeds standards; (b) Meets standards; (c) Does not meet standards. (2) The department's rules shall establish all of the following: (a) Performance levels and benchmarks for the indicators described in divisions (C)(1) to (3) of this section; (b) Both of the following: (i) Performance levels and benchmarks for the indicator described in division (C)(4) of this section; (ii) Standards for awarding a dropout prevention and recovery community school described in division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code an overall designation, which shall be calculated as follows: (I) Thirty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(1) of this section that are applicable to the school year for which the overall designation is granted. (II) Thirty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(4) of this section. (III) Twenty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(2) of this section. (IV) Twenty per cent of the score shall be based on the indicators described in division (C)(3) of this section. (3) If both of the indicators described in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section improve by ten per cent for two consecutive years, a school shall be rated not less than "meets standards." The rating and the relevant performance data for each school shall be posted on the department's web site, and a copy of the rating and data shall be provided to the governing authority of the community school. (E)(1) For the 2012-2013 school year, the department shall issue a report card including the following performance measures, but without a performance rating as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section, for each community school described in division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code: (a) The graduation rates as described in divisions (C)(1)(a) to (c) of this section; (b) The percentage of twelfth-grade students and other students who have attained a designated passing score on high school achievement assessments as described in division (C)(2) of this section; (c) The statewide average for the graduation rates and assessment passage rates described in divisions (C)(1)(a) to (c) and (C)(2) of this section; (d) Annual measurable objectives described in division (C)(3) of this section. (2) For the 2013-2014 school year, the department shall issue a report card including the following performance measures for each community school described in division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code: (a) The graduation rates described in divisions (C)(1)(a) to (d) of this section, including a performance rating as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section; (b) The percentage of twelfth-grade students and other students who have attained a designated passing score on high school achievement assessments as described in division (C)(2) of this section, including a performance rating as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section; (c) Annual measurable objectives described in division (C)(3) of this section, including a performance rating as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section; (d) Both of the following without an assigned rating: (i) Growth in annual student achievement in reading and mathematics described in division (C)(4) of this section, if available; (ii) Student outcome data, including postsecondary credit earned, nationally recognized career or technical certification, military enlistment, job placement, and attendance rate. (3) Beginning with the 2014-2015 school year, and annually thereafter, the (E) The department annually shall issue a report card for each dropout prevention and recovery community school described in division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code that includes all of the following performance measures, including a performance rating for each measure as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section: (a)(1) The graduation rates as described in division (C)(1) of this section; (b)(2) The percentage of twelfth-grade students and other students who have attained a designated passing score on high school achievement assessments as described in division (C)(2) of this section; (c)(3) Annual measurable objectives described in division (C)(3) of this section, including a performance rating as described in divisions (D)(1)(a) to (c) of this section; (d)(4) Growth in annual student achievement in reading and mathematics as described in division (C)(4) of this section; (e)(5) An overall performance designation for the school calculated under rules adopted under division (D)(2) of this section. The department shall also include student outcome data, including postsecondary credit earned, nationally recognized career or technical certification, military enlistment, job placement, attendance rate, and progress on closing achievement gaps for each school. This information shall not be included in the calculation of a school's performance rating. (F) Not later than the thirty-first day of July of each year, the department shall submit preliminary report card data for overall academic performance for each performance measure prescribed in division (E)(3)(E) of this section for each community school to which this section applies. (G) For the purposes of prescribing performance levels and benchmarks under division (D) of this section, the department shall gather and analyze data from prior school years for each dropout prevention and recovery community school described in division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. Each such school shall cooperate with the department. The department shall consult with stakeholder groups in performing its duties under this division. (H) The department shall review the performance levels and benchmarks for performance indicators in the report card issued under this section and may revise them based on the data collected under division (G) of this section. (I) For the purposes of division (F) of section 3314.351 of the Revised Code, the department shall recalculate the ratings for each school under division (E)(3) of this section for the 2017-2018 school year and calculate the ratings under that division for the 2018-2019 school year using the indicators prescribed by division (C) of this section, as it exists on and after July 18, 2019. Sec. 3314.02. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Sponsor" means the board of education of a school district or the governing board of an educational service center that agrees to the conversion of all or part of a school or building under division (B) of this section, or an entity listed in division (C)(1) of this section, which has been approved by the department of education and workforce to sponsor community schools or is exempted by section 3314.021 or 3314.027 of the Revised Code from obtaining approval, and with which the governing authority of a community school enters into a contract under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (2) "Pilot project area" means the school districts included in the territory of the former community school pilot project established by former Section 50.52 of Am. Sub. H.B. No. 215 of the 122nd general assembly. (3) "Challenged school district" means any of the following: (a) A school district that is part of the pilot project area; (b) A school district that meets one of the following conditions: (i) On March 22, 2013, the district was in a state of academic emergency or in a state of academic watch under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to March 22, 2013; (ii) For two of the 2012-2013, 2013-2014, 2014-2015, and 2015-2016 school years, the district received a grade of "D" or "F" for the performance index score and a grade of "F" for the value-added progress dimension under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (iii) For the 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, and 2020-2021 school years, the district has received an overall grade of "D" or "F" under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, or, for at least two of the three most recent school years, the district received a grade of "F" for the value-added progress dimension under division (C)(1)(e) of that section; (iv) For the 2021-2022 school year and for any school year thereafter, the district has received an overall performance rating of less than three stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, or, for at least two of the three most recent school years, the district received one star for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (c) A big eight school district; (d) A school district ranked in the lowest five per cent of school districts according to performance index score under section 3302.21 of the Revised Code. (4) "Big eight school district" means a school district that for fiscal year 1997 had both of the following: (a) A percentage of children residing in the district and participating in the predecessor of Ohio works first greater than thirty per cent, as reported pursuant to section 3317.10 of the Revised Code; (b) An average daily membership greater than twelve thousand, as reported pursuant to former division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (5) "New start-up school" means a community school other than one created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building, as designated in the school's contract pursuant to division (A)(17) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (6) "Urban school district" means one of the state's twenty-one urban school districts as defined in division (O) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to July 1, 1998. (7) "Internet- or computer-based community school" means a community school established under this chapter in which the enrolled students work primarily from their residences on assignments in nonclassroom-based learning opportunities provided via an internet- or other computer-based instructional method that does not rely on regular classroom instruction or via comprehensive instructional methods that include internet-based, other computer-based, and noncomputer-based learning opportunities unless a student receives career-technical education under section 3314.086 of the Revised Code. A community school that operates mainly as an internet- or computer-based community school and provides career-technical education under section 3314.086 of the Revised Code shall be considered an internet- or computer-based community school, even if it provides some classroom-based instruction, so long as it provides instruction via the methods described in this division. (8) "Operator" or "management company" means either of the following: (a) An individual or organization that manages the daily operations of a community school pursuant to a contract between the operator or management company and the school's governing authority; (b) A nonprofit organization that provides programmatic oversight and support to a community school under a contract with the school's governing authority and that retains the right to terminate its affiliation with the school if the school fails to meet the organization's quality standards. (9) "Alliance municipal school district" has the same meaning as in section 3311.86 of the Revised Code. (10) "Dropout prevention and recovery community school" means a community school that enrolls only students who are at least fourteen years of age and not older than twenty-one years of age and who, at the time of their initial enrollment, are at least one grade level behind their cohort age groups or experience crises that significantly interfere with their academic progress such that they are prevented from continuing their traditional educational programs. (B)(1) Any person or group of individuals may initially propose under this division the conversion of all or a portion of a public school to a community school. The proposal shall be made to the board of education of the city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district in which the public school is proposed to be converted. (2) Any person or group of individuals may initially propose under this division the conversion of all or a portion of a building operated by an educational service center to a community school. The proposal shall be made to the governing board of the service center. On or after July 1, 2017, except as provided in section 3314.027 of the Revised Code, any educational service center that sponsors a community school shall be approved by and enter into a written agreement with the department as described in section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (3) Upon receipt of a proposal, and after an agreement has been entered into pursuant to section 3314.015 of the Revised Code, a board may enter into a preliminary agreement with the person or group proposing the conversion of the public school or service center building, indicating the intention of the board to support the conversion to a community school. A proposing person or group that has a preliminary agreement under this division may proceed to finalize plans for the school, establish a governing authority for the school, and negotiate a contract with the board. Provided the proposing person or group adheres to the preliminary agreement and all provisions of this chapter, the board shall negotiate in good faith to enter into a contract in accordance with section 3314.03 of the Revised Code and division (C) of this section. (4) The sponsor of a conversion community school proposed to open in an alliance municipal school district shall be subject to approval by the department of education and workforce for sponsorship of that school using the criteria established under division (A) of section 3311.87 of the Revised Code. Division (B)(4) of this section does not apply to a sponsor that, on or before September 29, 2015, was exempted under section 3314.021 or 3314.027 of the Revised Code from the requirement to be approved for sponsorship under divisions (A)(2) and (B)(1) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (5) A school established in accordance with division (B) of this section that later enters into a sponsorship contract with an entity that is not a school district or educational service center shall, at the time of entering into the new contract, be deemed a community school established in accordance with division (C) of this section. (C)(1) Provided all other conditions of sponsorship and governance are satisfied, any person or group of individuals may propose under this division the establishment of a new start-up school regardless of the school's proposed location. The proposal may be made to any of the following entities: (a) The board of education of the district in which the school is proposed to be located; (b) The board of education of any joint vocational school district with territory in the county in which is located the majority of the territory of the district in which the school is proposed to be located; (c) The board of education of any other city, local, or exempted village school district having territory in the same county where the district in which the school is proposed to be located has the major portion of its territory; (d) The governing board of any educational service center, regardless of the location of the proposed school, may sponsor a new start-up school if all of the following are satisfied: (i) If applicable, it satisfies the requirements of division (E) of section 3311.86 of the Revised Code; (ii) It is approved to do so by the department; (iii) It enters into an agreement with the department under section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (e) A sponsoring authority designated by the board of trustees of any of the thirteen state universities listed in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code or the board of trustees itself as long as a mission of the proposed school to be specified in the contract under division (A)(2) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code and as approved by the department under division (B)(3) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code will be the practical demonstration of teaching methods, educational technology, or other teaching practices that are included in the curriculum of the university's teacher preparation program approved by the chancellor of higher education; (f) Any qualified tax-exempt entity under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as long as all of the following conditions are satisfied: (i) The entity has been in operation for at least five years prior to applying to be a community school sponsor. (ii) The entity has assets of at least five hundred thousand dollars and a demonstrated record of financial responsibility. (iii) The department has determined that the entity is an education-oriented entity under division (B)(4) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and the entity has a demonstrated record of successful implementation of educational programs. (iv) The entity is not a community school. (g) The mayor of a city in which the majority of the territory of a school district to which section 3311.60 of the Revised Code applies is located, regardless of whether that district has created the position of independent auditor as prescribed by that section. The mayor's sponsorship authority under this division is limited to community schools that are located in that school district. Such mayor may sponsor community schools only with the approval of the city council of that city, after establishing standards with which community schools sponsored by the mayor must comply, and after entering into a sponsor agreement with the department as prescribed under section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The mayor shall establish the standards for community schools sponsored by the mayor not later than one hundred eighty days after July 15, 2013, and shall submit them to the department upon their establishment. The department shall approve the mayor to sponsor community schools in the district, upon receipt of an application by the mayor to do so. Not later than ninety days after the department's approval of the mayor as a community school sponsor, the department shall enter into the sponsor agreement with the mayor. Any entity described in division (C)(1) of this section may enter into a preliminary agreement pursuant to division (C)(2) of this section with the proposing person or group, provided that entity has been approved by and entered into a written agreement with the department pursuant to section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (2) A preliminary agreement indicates the intention of an entity described in division (C)(1) of this section to sponsor the community school. A proposing person or group that has such a preliminary agreement may proceed to finalize plans for the school, establish a governing authority as described in division (E) of this section for the school, and negotiate a contract with the entity. Provided the proposing person or group adheres to the preliminary agreement and all provisions of this chapter, the entity shall negotiate in good faith to enter into a contract in accordance with section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (3) A new start-up school that is established in a school district described in either division (A)(3)(b) or (d) of this section may continue in existence once the school district no longer meets the conditions described in either division, provided there is a valid contract between the school and a sponsor. (4) A copy of every preliminary agreement entered into under this division shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. (D) A majority vote of the board of a sponsoring entity and a majority vote of the members of the governing authority of a community school shall be required to adopt a contract and convert the public school or educational service center building to a community school or establish the new start-up school. Beginning September 29, 2005, adoption of the contract shall occur not later than the fifteenth day of March, and signing of the contract shall occur not later than the fifteenth day of May, prior to the school year in which the school will open. The governing authority shall notify the department of education and workforce when the contract has been signed. Subject to sections 3314.013 and 3314.016 of the Revised Code, an unlimited number of community schools may be established in any school district provided that a contract is entered into for each community school pursuant to this chapter. (E)(1) As used in this division, "immediate relatives" are limited to spouses, children, parents, grandparents, and siblings, as well as in-laws residing in the same household as the person serving on the governing authority. Each new start-up community school established under this chapter shall be under the direction of a governing authority which shall consist of a board of not less than five individuals. (2)(a) No person shall serve on the governing authority or operate the community school under contract with the governing authority under any of the following circumstances: (i) The person owes the state any money or is in a dispute over whether the person owes the state any money concerning the operation of a community school that has closed. (ii) The person would otherwise be subject to division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code with respect to refusal, limitation, or revocation of a license to teach, if the person were a licensed educator. (iii) The person has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of theft in office under section 2921.41 of the Revised Code, or has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of a substantially similar offense in another state. (b) No person shall serve on the governing authority or engage in the financial day-to-day management of the community school under contract with the governing authority unless and until that person has submitted to a criminal records check in the manner prescribed by section 3319.39 of the Revised Code. (c) Each sponsor of a community school shall annually verify that a finding for recovery has not been issued by the auditor of state against any individual or individuals who propose to create a community school or any member of the governing authority, the operator, or any employee of each community school with responsibility for fiscal operations or authorization to expend money on behalf of the school. (3) No person shall serve on the governing authorities of more than five start-up community schools at the same time unless both of the following apply: (a) The person serves in a volunteer capacity and receives no compensation under division (E)(5) of this section from any governing authority on which the person serves. (b) For any school that has an operator, the operator is a nonprofit organization. (4)(a) For a community school established under this chapter that is not sponsored by a school district or an educational service center, no present or former member, or immediate relative of a present or former member, of the governing authority shall be an owner, employee, or consultant of the community school's sponsor or operator, unless at least one year has elapsed since the conclusion of the person's membership on the governing authority. (b) For a community school established under this chapter that is sponsored by a school district or an educational service center, no present or former member, or immediate relative of a present or former member, of the governing authority shall: (i) Be an officer of the district board or service center governing board that serves as the community school's sponsor, unless at least one year has elapsed since the conclusion of the person's membership on the governing authority; (ii) Serve as an employee of, or a consultant for, the department, division, or section of the sponsoring district or service center that is directly responsible for sponsoring community schools, or have supervisory authority over such a department, division, or section, unless at least one year has elapsed since the conclusion of the person's membership on the governing authority. (5) The governing authority of a start-up or conversion community school may provide by resolution for the compensation of its members. However, no individual who serves on the governing authority of a start-up or conversion community school shall be compensated more than one hundred twenty-five dollars per meeting of that governing authority and no such individual shall be compensated more than a total amount of five thousand dollars per year for all governing authorities upon which the individual serves. Each member of the governing authority may be paid compensation for attendance at an approved training program, provided that such compensation shall not exceed sixty dollars a day for attendance at a training program three hours or less in length and one hundred twenty-five dollars a day for attendance at a training program longer than three hours in length. (6) No person who is the employee of a school district or educational service center shall serve on the governing authority of any community school sponsored by that school district or service center. (7) Each member of the governing authority of a community school shall annually file a disclosure statement setting forth the names of any immediate relatives or business associates employed by any of the following within the previous three years: (a) The sponsor or operator of that community school; (b) A school district or educational service center that has contracted with that community school; (c) A vendor that is or has engaged in business with that community school. (8) No person who is a member of a school district board of education shall serve on the governing authority of any community school. (F)(1) A new start-up school that is established prior to August 15, 2003, in an urban school district that is not also a big-eight school district may continue to operate after that date and the contract between the school's governing authority and the school's sponsor may be renewed, as provided under this chapter, after that date. (2) A community school that was established prior to June 29, 1999, and is located in a county contiguous to the pilot project area and in a school district that was not a challenged school district may continue to operate after that date, provided the school complies with all provisions of this chapter. The contract between the school's governing authority and the school's sponsor may be renewed. (3) Any educational service center that, on June 30, 2007, sponsors a community school that is not located in a county within the territory of the service center or in a county contiguous to such county may continue to sponsor that community school on and after June 30, 2007, and may renew its contract with the school. (4) The department of education and workforce shall not restrict the establishment of a new start-up community school to those located in a challenged school district as was required by this section prior to September 30, 2021. Sec. 3314.021. (A) This section applies to any entity that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that satisfies the conditions specified in divisions (C)(1)(f)(ii) and (iii) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code but does not satisfy the condition specified in division (C)(1)(f)(i) of that section. (B) Notwithstanding division (C)(1)(f)(i) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code, and subject to division (D)(2) of this section, an entity described in division (A) of this section may do both of the following without obtaining the department of education and workforce's initial approval of its sponsorship under divisions (A)(2) and (B)(1) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code: (1) Succeed the board of trustees of a state university located in the pilot project area or that board's designee as the sponsor of a community school established under this chapter; (2) Continue to sponsor that school in conformance with the terms of the contract between the board of trustees or its designee and the governing authority of the community school and renew that contract as provided in division (E) (D) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (C) The entity that succeeds the board of trustees or the board's designee as sponsor of a community school under division (B) of this section also may enter into contracts to sponsor other community schools regardless of the proposed school's location, without obtaining the department's initial approval of its sponsorship of those schools under divisions (A)(2) and (B)(1) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code as long as the contracts conform with and the entity complies with all other requirements of this chapter. (D)(1) Regardless of the entity's authority to sponsor community schools without the initial approval of the department, the entity is under the continuing oversight of the department in accordance with rules adopted under section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. (2) If an entity described in division (A) of this section receives a rating below "effective" under division (B) of section 3314.016 of the Revised Code for two or more consecutive years, that entity shall receive approval from the department to sponsor community schools and enter into a written agreement with the department in accordance with division (B)(1) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code prior to entering into any further preliminary agreements under division (C)(2) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or renewing any existing contract to sponsor a community school. (E)(1) As used in division (E) of this section: (a) "Board of trustees" means a board of trustees of a state university located in the pilot project area. (b) "Rating" means a sponsor rating under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (B)(7)(b)(B)(6)(b) of section 3314.016 of the Revised Code, for the purposes of that division, the department shall consider an entity that succeeded a board of trustees as the sponsor of a community school in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section to have received the same rating for the 2016-2017 school year as the board of trustees, provided all of the following apply: (a) The department assigned the board of trustees a rating of either "effective" or "exemplary" for the 2016-2017 school year. (b) The department did not assign the entity its own rating for the 2016-2017 school year. (c) The department assigned the entity its own rating for the 2017-2018 school year. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission and educational philosophy, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (m) The school will comply with section 3313.7118 of the Revised Code if it serves elementary school students. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (E) (D) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, specification both of the following: (a) Specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (b) Alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion. (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (34) A provision establishing the process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future. (35) A description of the management and administration of the school. (36) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt policies and procedures to establish internal financial controls for the school. (B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the following: (1) The process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future; (2) The management and administration of the school; (3) If the community school is a currently existing public school or educational service center building, alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion; (4) The instructional program and educational philosophy of the school; (5) Internal financial controls. When submitting the plan under this division, the school shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing authority of the school. (C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (D) (C) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (E) (D) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (F) (E) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.034. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, and except as described in division (E) of this section, any community school to which either of the following conditions apply shall be prohibited from entering into a contract with a new sponsor: (1) The community school has received, on the most recent report card issued for that school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, either of the following: (a) A grade of "D" or "F" for the performance index score, under division (C)(1)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, and an overall grade of "D" or "F" for the value-added progress dimension or another measure of student academic progress if adopted by the department of education and workforce, under division (C)(1)(e) of that section; (b) A performance rating of less than three stars for achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and a performance rating of less than three stars for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (2) The community school is one in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program community school, and it has received a rating of "does not meet standards" for the annual student growth measure and combined graduation rates on the most recent report card issued for the school under section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (B) A community school to which division (A) of this section applies may enter into a contract with a new sponsor if all of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) The proposed sponsor received a rating of "effective" or higher pursuant to division (B)(6)(B)(5) of section 3314.016 of the Revised Code on its most recent evaluation conducted according to that section, or the proposed sponsor is the office of Ohio school sponsorship established in section 3314.029 of the Revised Code. (2) The community school submits a request to enter into a new contract with a sponsor. (3) The community school has not submitted a prior request that was granted. (4) The department grants the school's request pursuant to division (C) of this section. (C)(1) A school shall submit a request to change sponsors under this section not later than on the fifteenth day of February of the year in which the school wishes to do so. If a community school to which division (A)(1) of this section applies submits a request to the department to enter into a contract with a new sponsor and a majority of the school's students are children with disabilities receiving special education and related services under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code, the department shall at least consider the school's performance as measured against the average performance of all other community schools that primarily serve children with disabilities. (2) The department shall grant or deny the request not later than thirty days after the department receives it. If the department denies the request, the community school may submit an appeal to the director of education and workforce who shall hold a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The community school shall file its notice of appeal to the director not later than ten days after receiving the decision from the department. The director shall conduct the hearing not later than thirty days after receiving the school's notice of appeal and act upon the determination of the hearing officer not later than the twenty-fifth day of June of the year in which the school wishes to change sponsors. (D) Factors to be considered during a hearing held pursuant to division (C) of this section include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) The school's impact on the students and the community or communities it serves; (2) The quality and quantity of academic and administrative support the school receives from its current sponsor to help the school to improve; (3) The sponsor's annual evaluations of the community school under division (D)(2) (c)(2) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code for the previous three years; (4) The academic performance of the school, taking into account the demographic information of the students enrolled in the school; (5) The academic performance of alternative schools that serve comparable populations of students as those served by the community school; (6) The fiscal stability of the school; (7) The results of any audits of the school by the auditor of state; (8) The length of time the school has been under the oversight of its current sponsor; (9) The number of times the school has changed sponsors prior to the current request; (10) Parent and student satisfaction rates as demonstrated by surveys, if available. (E) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, if a community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities receiving special education and related services in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code meets both of the following criteria, the school may enter into a contract with a new sponsor, provided that the new sponsor satisfies the criteria in division (B)(1) of this section: (1) The school received, on its most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, a performance rating of at least three stars for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (2) As calculated for the most recent school year under section 3302.035 of the Revised Code, the school's performance index score for students with disabilities was higher than the performance index score for students with disabilities of the school district in which the school is located. Sec. 3314.038. Each community school shall annually submit to the department of education and workforce and auditor of state a report of each instance under which a student who is enrolled in that community school resides in a children's residential center as defined under section 5103.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.05. (A) The contract between the community school and the sponsor shall specify the facilities to be used for the community school and the method of acquisition. Except as provided in divisions (B)(3) and (4) of this section, no community school shall be established in more than one school district under the same contract. (B) Division (B) of this section shall not apply to internet- or computer-based community schools. (1) A community school may be located in multiple facilities under the same contract only if the limitations on availability of space prohibit serving all the grade levels specified in the contract in a single facility or division (B)(2), (3), or (4) of this section applies to the school. The school shall not offer the same grade level classrooms in more than one facility. (2) A community school may be located in multiple facilities under the same contract and, notwithstanding division (B)(1) of this section, may assign students in the same grade level to multiple facilities, as long as all of the following apply: (a) The governing authority has entered into and maintains a contract with an operator of the type described in division (A)(8)(b) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (b) The contract with that operator qualified the school to be established pursuant to division (A) of former section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (c) The school's rating under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code does not fall below a combination of any of the following for two or more consecutive years: (i) A rating of "in need of continuous improvement" under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to March 22, 2013; (ii) For the 2012-2013, 2013-2014, 2014-2015, and 2015-2016 school years, a rating of "C" for both the performance index score under division (A)(1)(b) or (B)(1)(b) and the value-added dimension under division (A)(1)(e) or (B)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; or if the building serves only grades ten through twelve, the building received a grade of "C" for the performance index score under division (A)(1)(b) or (B)(1)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (iii) For the 2016-2017, 2017-2018, 2018-2019, 2019-2020, 2020-2021 school years, an overall grade of "C" under division (C)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or an overall performance designation of "meets standards" under division (E)(3)(e) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code; (iv) For the 2021-2022 school year and any school year thereafter, an overall performance rating of three stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or an overall performance designation of "meets standards" under division (E)(3)(e) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (3) On and after September 30, 2021, a new start-up community school may be established in two school districts under the same contract regardless of the proposed location of either district if both of the following apply: (a) The school operates not more than one facility in each school district and, in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section, the school does not offer the same grade level classrooms in both facilities; and (b) Transportation between the two facilities does not require more than thirty minutes of direct travel time as measured by school bus. (4) A community school may be located in multiple facilities under the same contract and, notwithstanding division (B)(1) of this section, may assign students in the same grade level to multiple facilities, as long as both of the following apply: (a) The facilities are all located in the same county or in any county adjacent to the county in which the community school's primary facility is located. (b) Either of the following conditions are satisfied: (i) The community school is sponsored by a board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district having territory in the same county where the facilities of the community school are located or in any county adjacent to the county in which the community school's primary facility is located; (ii) The community school is managed by an operator. (2) In the case of a community school to which division (B)(4) of this section applies and that maintains facilities in more than one school district, the school's governing authority shall designate one of those districts to be considered the school's primary location and the district in which the school is located for the purposes of division (A)(19) of section 3314.03 and divisions (C) and (H) of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and for all other purposes of this chapter and shall notify the department of that designation. A community school governing authority that elects to modify a community school's primary location shall notify the department of that modification. (5) (3) Any facility used for a community school shall meet all health and safety standards established by law for school buildings. (C) In the case where a community school is proposed to be located in a facility owned by a school district or educational service center, the facility may not be used for such community school unless the district or service center board owning the facility enters into an agreement for the community school to utilize the facility. Use of the facility may be under any terms and conditions agreed to by the district or service center board and the school. (D) Two or more separate community schools may be located in the same facility. (E) In the case of a community school that is located in multiple facilities, beginning July 1, 2012, the department shall assign a unique identification number to the school and to each facility maintained by the school. Each number shall be used for identification purposes only. Nothing in this division shall be construed to require the department to calculate the amount of funds paid under this chapter, or to compute any data required for the report cards issued under section 3314.012 of the Revised Code, for each facility separately. The department shall make all such calculations or computations for the school as a whole. (F)(1) In the case of a community school that exists prior to September 30, 2021, to which division (B)(3) of this section applies, if only one of the school districts in which the school is established was located in a challenged school district prior to September 30, 2021, that district continues to be considered the school's primary location and the district in which the school is located for the purposes of division (A)(19) of section 3314.03 and divisions (C) and (H) of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and for all other purposes of this chapter unless and until the school's governing authority designates a different school district as the school's primary location in accordance with division (F)(2) of this section. If both of the school districts in which the school is established were challenged school districts on that date, and the primary location was already designated by the school's governing authority pursuant to the requirements of this section as it existed prior to September 30, 2021, that designation remains unless and until the school's governing authority designates a different primary location. (2)(a) On and after September 30, 2021, when a new start-up community school is established in two school districts under the same contract, the school's governing authority shall designate one of those districts to be considered the school's primary location and the district in which the school is located for the purposes of division (A)(19) of section 3314.03 and divisions (C) and (H) of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and for all other purposes of this chapter and shall notify the department of education and workforce of that designation. (b) A community school governing authority that elects to modify a community school's primary location, whether in accordance with division (F)(1) of this section or otherwise, shall notify the department of that modification. Sec. 3314.07. (A) The expiration of the contract for a community school between a sponsor and a school shall be the date provided in the contract. A successor contract may be entered into pursuant to division (E) (D) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code unless the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to this section. (B)(1) A sponsor may choose not to renew a contract at its expiration or may choose to terminate a contract prior to its expiration for any of the following reasons: (a) Failure to meet student performance requirements stated in the contract; (b) Failure to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal management; (c) Violation of any provision of the contract or applicable state or federal law; (d) Other good cause. (2) A sponsor may choose to terminate a contract prior to its expiration if the sponsor has suspended the operation of the contract under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. (3) Not later than the fifteenth day of January in the year in which the sponsor intends to terminate or take actions not to renew the community school's contract, the sponsor shall notify the school of the proposed action in writing. The notice shall include the reasons for the proposed action in detail, the effective date of the termination or nonrenewal, and a statement that the school may, within fourteen days of receiving the notice, request an informal hearing before the sponsor. Such request must be in writing. The informal hearing shall be held within fourteen days of the receipt of a request for the hearing. Not later than fourteen days after the informal hearing, the sponsor shall issue a written decision either affirming or rescinding the decision to terminate or not renew the contract. (4) The termination of a contract under this section shall be effective upon the occurrence of the later of the following events: (a) The date the sponsor notifies the school of its decision to terminate the contract as prescribed in division (B)(3) of this section; (b) If an informal hearing is requested under division (B)(3) of this section and as a result of that hearing the sponsor affirms its decision to terminate the contract, the effective date of the termination specified in the notice issued under division (B)(3) of this section. (5) Any community school whose contract is terminated or not renewed under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section shall close permanently at the end of the current school year or on a date specified in the notification of termination or nonrenewal under division (B)(3) of this section. Any community school whose contract is terminated or not renewed for failure to meet student performance requirements stated in the contract, or for failure to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal management under this division shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. (C) A child attending a community school whose contract has been terminated, nonrenewed, or suspended or that closes for any reason shall be admitted to the schools of the district in which the child is entitled to attend under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. Any deadlines established for the purpose of admitting students under section 3313.97 or 3313.98 of the Revised Code shall be waived for students to whom this division pertains. (D) If a community school does not intend to renew a contract with its sponsor, the community school shall notify its sponsor in writing of that fact at least one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration of the contract. Such a community school may enter into a contract with a new sponsor in accordance with section 3314.03 of the Revised Code upon the expiration of the previous contract. (E) A sponsor of a community school and the officers, directors, or employees of such a sponsor are immune from civil liability for any action authorized under this chapter or the contract entered into with the school under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code that is taken to fulfill the sponsor's responsibility to oversee and monitor the school. The sponsor and its officers, directors, or employees are not liable in damages in a tort or other civil action for harm allegedly arising from any of the following: (1) A failure of the community school or any of its officers, directors, or employees to perform any statutory or common law duty or responsibility or any other legal obligation; (2) An action or omission of the community school or any of its officers, directors, or employees that results in harm. (3) A failure of the community school or any of its officers, directors, or employees to meet the obligations of any contract or other obligation entered into on behalf of the community school and another party. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Harm" means injury, death, or loss to person or property. (2) "Tort action" means a civil action for damages for injury, death, or loss to person or property other than a civil action for damages for a breach of contract or another agreement between persons. Sec. 3314.08. (A) As used in this section: (1) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Resident district" means the school district in which a student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall adopt rules requiring the governing authority of each community school established under this chapter to annually report all of the following: (1) The number of students enrolled in grades one through twelve and the full-time equivalent number of students enrolled in kindergarten in the school who are not receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP; (2) The number of enrolled students in grades one through twelve and the full-time equivalent number of enrolled students in kindergarten, who are receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP; (3) The number of students reported under division (B)(2) of this section receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP for a disability described in each of divisions (A) to (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (4) The full-time equivalent number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in each of divisions (A)(1) to (5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code that are provided by the community school; (5) The number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are not reported under division (B)(4) of this section but who are enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in each of divisions (A)(1) to (5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code at a joint vocational school district or another district in the career-technical planning district to which the school is assigned; (6) The number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are category one to three English learners described in each of divisions (A) to (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code; (7) The number of students reported under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (B)(7) of this section based on anything other than family income. (8) For each student, the city, exempted village, or local school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (9) The number of students enrolled in a preschool program operated by the school that is licensed under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code who are not receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP. A school district board and a community school governing authority shall include in their respective reports under division (B) of this section any child admitted in accordance with division (A)(2) of section 3321.01 of the Revised Code. A governing authority of a community school shall not include in its report under divisions (B)(1) to (9) of this section any student for whom tuition is charged under division (F) of this section. (C)(1)(a) If a community school's costs for a fiscal year for a student receiving special education and related services pursuant to an IEP for a disability described in divisions (B) to (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code exceed the threshold cost for serving the student as specified in division (B) of section 3317.0214 of the Revised Code, the school may submit to the director of education and workforce documentation, as prescribed by the director, of all its costs for that student. Upon submission of documentation for a student of the type and in the manner prescribed, the department shall pay to the community school an amount equal to the school's costs for the student in excess of the threshold costs. (b) The community school shall report under division (C)(1)(a) of this section, and the department shall pay for, only the costs of educational expenses and the related services provided to the student in accordance with the student's individualized education program. Any legal fees, court costs, or other costs associated with any cause of action relating to the student may not be included in the amount. (2) In any fiscal year, a community school receiving funds under division (A)(7) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code shall spend those funds only for the purposes that the department designates as approved for career-technical education expenses. Career-technical education expenses approved by the department shall include only expenses connected to the delivery of career-technical programming to career-technical students. The department shall require the school to report data annually so that the department may monitor the school's compliance with the requirements regarding the manner in which funding received under division (A)(7) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code may be spent. (3) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3313.90 of the Revised Code, except as provided in division (C)(5) of this section, all funds received under division (A)(7) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code shall be spent in the following manner: (a) At least seventy-five per cent of the funds shall be spent on curriculum development, purchase, and implementation; instructional resources and supplies; industry-based program certification; student assessment, credentialing, and placement; curriculum specific equipment purchases and leases; career-technical student organization fees and expenses; home and agency linkages; work-based learning experiences; professional development; and other costs directly associated with career-technical education programs including development of new programs. (b) Not more than twenty-five per cent of the funds shall be used for personnel expenditures. (4) A community school shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(4) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code in accordance with section 3317.25 of the Revised Code. (5) The department may waive the requirement in division (C)(3) of this section for any community school that exclusively provides one or more career-technical workforce development programs in arts and communications that are not equipment-intensive, as determined by the department. (6) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a community school shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code only for services for English learners. (D) A board of education sponsoring a community school may utilize local funds to make enhancement grants to the school or may agree, either as part of the contract or separately, to provide any specific services to the community school at no cost to the school. (E) A community school may not levy taxes or issue bonds secured by tax revenues. (F) No community school shall charge tuition for the enrollment of any student who is a resident of this state. A community school may charge tuition for the enrollment of any student who is not a resident of this state. (G)(1)(a) A community school may borrow money to pay any necessary and actual expenses of the school in anticipation of the receipt of any portion of the payments to be received by the school pursuant to section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. The school may issue notes to evidence such borrowing. The proceeds of the notes shall be used only for the purposes for which the anticipated receipts may be lawfully expended by the school. (b) A school may also borrow money for a term not to exceed fifteen years for the purpose of acquiring facilities. (2) The state is not liable for debt incurred by the governing authority of a community school. (H) The department shall adjust the amounts paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to reflect any enrollment of students in community schools for less than the equivalent of a full school year. The department shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code rules governing the payments to community schools under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code including initial payments in a school year and adjustments and reductions made in subsequent periodic payments to community schools as provided under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. For purposes of this division: (1) A student shall be considered enrolled in the community school for any portion of the school year the student is participating at a college under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. (2) A student shall be considered to be enrolled in a community school for the period of time beginning on the later of the date on which the school both has received documentation of the student's enrollment from a parent and the student has commenced participation in learning opportunities as defined in the contract with the sponsor, or thirty days prior to the date on which the student is entered into the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code. For purposes of applying this division and divisions (H)(3) and (4) of this section to a community school student, "learning opportunities" shall be defined in the contract, which shall describe both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities and shall be in compliance with criteria and documentation requirements for student participation which shall be established by the department. Any student's instruction time in non-classroom-based learning opportunities shall be certified by an employee of the community school. A student's enrollment shall be considered to cease on the date on which any of the following occur: (a) The community school receives documentation from a parent terminating enrollment of the student. (b) The community school is provided documentation of a student's enrollment in another public or private school. (c) The community school ceases to offer learning opportunities to the student pursuant to the terms of the contract with the sponsor or the operation of any provision of this chapter. Except as otherwise specified in this paragraph, beginning in the 2011-2012 school year, any student who completed the prior school year in an internet- or computer-based community school shall be considered to be enrolled in the same school in the subsequent school year until the student's enrollment has ceased as specified in division (H)(2) of this section. The department shall continue paying amounts for the student under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code without interruption at the start of the subsequent school year. However, if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in the first seventy-two consecutive hours of learning opportunities offered to the student in that subsequent school year, the student shall be considered not to have re-enrolled in the school for that school year and the department shall recalculate the payments to the school for that school year to account for the fact that the student is not enrolled. (3) The department shall determine each community school student's percentage of full-time equivalency based on the percentage of learning opportunities offered by the community school to that student, reported either as number of hours or number of days, is of the total learning opportunities offered by the community school to a student who attends for the school's entire school year. However, no internet- or computer-based community school shall be credited for any time a student spends participating in learning opportunities beyond ten hours within any period of twenty-four consecutive hours. Whether it reports hours or days of learning opportunities, each community school shall offer not less than nine hundred twenty hours of learning opportunities during the school year. (4) With respect to the calculation of full-time equivalency under division (H)(3) of this section, the department shall waive the number of hours or days of learning opportunities not offered to a student because the community school was closed during the school year due to disease epidemic, hazardous weather conditions, law enforcement emergencies, inoperability of school buses or other equipment necessary to the school's operation, damage to a school building, or other temporary circumstances due to utility failure rendering the school building unfit for school use, so long as the school was actually open for instruction with students in attendance during that school year for not less than the minimum number of hours required by this chapter. The department shall treat the school as if it were open for instruction with students in attendance during the hours or days waived under this division. (I) The department of education and workforce shall reduce the amounts paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to reflect payments made to colleges under section 3365.07 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) No student shall be considered enrolled in any internet- or computer-based community school or, if applicable to the student, in any community school that is required to provide the student with a computer pursuant to division (C) of section 3314.22 of the Revised Code, unless both of the following conditions are satisfied: (a) The student possesses or has been provided with all required hardware and software materials and all such materials are operational so that the student is capable of fully participating in the learning opportunities specified in the contract between the school and the school's sponsor as required by division (A)(23) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code; (b) The school is in compliance with division (A) of section 3314.22 of the Revised Code, relative to such student. (2) In accordance with policies adopted by the department of education and workforce, in consultation with the auditor of state, the department shall reduce the amounts otherwise payable under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to any community school that includes in its program the provision of computer hardware and software materials to any student, if such hardware and software materials have not been delivered, installed, and activated for each such student in a timely manner or other educational materials or services have not been provided according to the contract between the individual community school and its sponsor. The director and the auditor of state shall jointly establish a method for auditing any community school to which this division pertains to ensure compliance with this section. The director, auditor of state, and the governor shall jointly make recommendations to the general assembly for legislative changes that may be required to assure fiscal and academic accountability for such schools. (K)(1) If the department determines that a review of a community school's enrollment is necessary, such review shall be completed and written notice of the findings shall be provided to the governing authority of the community school and its sponsor within ninety days of the end of the community school's fiscal year, unless extended for a period not to exceed thirty additional days for one of the following reasons: (a) The department and the community school mutually agree to the extension. (b) Delays in data submission caused by either a community school or its sponsor. (2) If the review results in a finding that additional funding is owed to the school, such payment shall be made within thirty days of the written notice. If the review results in a finding that the community school owes moneys to the state, the following procedure shall apply: (a) Within ten business days of the receipt of the notice of findings, the community school may appeal the department's determination to the director. (b) The director shall conduct an informal hearing on the matter within thirty days of receipt of such an appeal and shall issue a decision within fifteen days of the conclusion of the hearing. (c) Any decision made by the director under this division is final. (3) If it is decided that the community school owes moneys to the state, the department shall deduct such amount from the school's future payments in accordance with guidelines issued by the director. (L) The department shall not pay to a community school under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code any amount for any of the following: (1) Any student who has graduated from the twelfth grade of a public or nonpublic high school; (2) Any student who is not a resident of the state; (3) Any student who was enrolled in the community school during the previous school year when assessments were administered under section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code but did not take one or more of the assessments required by that section and was not excused pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of that section, unless the director grants the student a waiver from the requirement to take the assessment and a parent is not paying tuition for the student pursuant to section 3314.26 of the Revised Code. The director may grant a waiver only for good cause in accordance with rules adopted by the department. (4) Any student who has attained the age of twenty-two years, except for veterans of the armed services whose attendance was interrupted before completing the recognized twelve-year course of the public schools by reason of induction or enlistment in the armed forces and who apply for enrollment in a community school not later than four years after termination of war or their honorable discharge. If, however, any such veteran elects to enroll in special courses organized for veterans for whom tuition is paid under federal law, or otherwise, the department shall not pay to a community school under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code any amount for that veteran. Sec. 3314.093. (A) The governing authorities of two or more community schools may enter into an agreement to establish a consortium to provide or arrange transportation to and from school for students enrolled in participating schools. A consortium shall act on behalf of each participating school with regard to student transportation and shall comply with any law regarding student transportation in the same manner as a community school, including sections 3314.091 and 3327.02 of the Revised Code. Each consortium shall designate one of its participating schools as its fiscal agent. (B) A consortium may do both of the following as if it were a community school: (1) Enter into an agreement under division (A) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code with a school district that has native students, as defined in section 3314.09 of the Revised Code, enrolled in a community school participating in the consortium; (2) Unilaterally accept responsibility for the transportation of students enrolled in participating schools under division (B) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code. (C) The department of education and workforce shall calculate and make payments to a consortium under division (I) of section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code as if it were a community school. (D) The consortium's fiscal agent shall report to the department, on behalf of all of the consortium's participating schools, the combined data necessary for the department to calculate payments under section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code. The fiscal agent shall report that data using the department's data collection system. Sec. 3314.19. The sponsor of each community school shall provide the following assurances required under this section in writing to the department of education and workforce not later than ten five business days prior to the opening of the school's first year of operation or, if the school is not an internet- or computer-based community school and it changes the relocates to a different building from which it operatesor opens a satellite location, not later than five business days prior to the opening of the first year it operates from the new building: facility. In cases where a school adds a facility to the existing school location or the school is an internet or computer-based community school and changes its location or adds a satellite location, the sponsor shall provide the assurances not later than one day prior to the operation in the new facility. The assurances shall include the following statements: (A) That a current copy of the contract between the sponsor and the governing authority of the school entered into under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code has been filed with the department and that any subsequent modifications to that contract will be filed with the department; (B) That the school has submitted to the sponsor a plan for providing special education and related services to students with disabilities and has demonstrated the capacity to provide those services in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code and federal law; (C) That the school has a plan and procedures for administering the achievement and diagnostic assessments prescribed by sections 3301.0710, 3301.0712, and 3301.0715 of the Revised Code; (D) That school personnel have the necessary training, knowledge, and resources to properly use and submit information to all databases maintained by the department for the collection of education data, including the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in accordance with methods and timelines established under section 3314.17 of the Revised Code; (E) That all required information about the school has been submitted to the Ohio education directory system or any successor system; (F) That the school will enroll at least the minimum number of students required by division (A)(11)(a) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code in the school year for which the assurances are provided; (G) That all classroom teachers are licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except for noncertificated persons engaged to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (H) That the school's fiscal officer is in compliance with section 3314.011 of the Revised Code; (I) That the school has complied with sections 3319.39 and 3319.391 of the Revised Code with respect to all employees and that the school has conducted a criminal records check of each of its governing authority members; (J) That the school holds all of the following: (1) Proof of property ownership or a lease for the facilities used by the school; (2) A certificate of occupancy; (3) Liability insurance for the school, as required by division (A)(11)(b) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code, that the sponsor considers sufficient to indemnify the school's facilities, staff, and governing authority against risk; (4) A satisfactory health and safety inspection; (5) A satisfactory fire inspection; (6) A valid food permit, if applicable. (K) That the sponsor has conducted a pre-opening site visit to the school for the school year for which the assurances are provided; (L) That the school has designated a date it will open for the school year for which the assurances are provided that is in compliance with division (A)(25) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code; (M) That the school has met all of the sponsor's requirements for opening and any other requirements of the sponsor. (N) That, for any school that operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, the sponsor has reviewed the following information, submitted by the school: (1) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (2) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (3) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (4) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (5) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (6) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (7) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. Sec. 3314.191. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the Revised Code, the department of education and workforce shall make no payment under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to a community school opening for its first year of operation until the sponsor of that school confirms all of the following: (A) The school is in compliance with the provisions described in divisions (A), (H), (I), and (J)(3) of section 3314.19 of the Revised Code. (B) The sponsor has approved the financial controls required by the comprehensive plan for the school contract the sponsor enters into with the governing authority of the community school under division (B)(5) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. (C) The school facilities will be ready and open for use by the date prescribed in the contract entered into under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code, and the sponsor has reviewed any lease, purchase agreement, permits required by statute or contract, and construction plans. (D) The chief administrator of the community school actively is managing daily operations at the school. (E) The projected enrollment reported to the department is accurate. Sec. 3314.261. This section shall not apply to an internet- or computer-based community school in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program that is a dropout prevention and recovery community school. (A) For purposes of this section, "instructional activities" means the following classroom-based or nonclassroom-based activities that a student is expected to complete, participate in, or attend during any given school day: (1) Online logins to curriculum or programs; (2) Offline activities; (3) Completed assignments within a particular program, curriculum, or class; (4) Testing; (5) Face-to-face communications or meetings with school staff or service providers; (6) Telephone or video conferences with school staff or service providers; (7) Other documented communication with school staff or service providers related to school curriculum or programs. (B)(1) Each internet- or computer-based community school's attendance policy adopted in accordance with division (A)(6)(b) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code shall specify that a student is considered in attendance at the school when the student satisfies either of the following conditions: (a) The student participates in at least ninety per cent of the hours of instructional activities offered by the school in that school year; (b) The student is on pace for on-time completion of any course in which the student is enrolled. The school's attendance policy shall define "on pace for on-time completion" for purposes of division (B)(1)(b) of this section. (2) If a student is not considered in attendance under division (B)(1) of this section, the student shall be considered absent for those hours of instructional activities offered by the school in that school year in which the student does not participate. (3) In the event that a student has thirty or more hours of unexcused absences in any semester, the internet- or computer-based community school in which the student is enrolled shall submit a written report to the student's parent, guardian, or custodian. (C) Notwithstanding section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, each internet- or computer-based community school shall develop and adopt a policy regarding failure to participate in instructional activities. The policy shall state that a student shall become subject to certain consequences, including disenrollment from the school, if both of the following conditions are satisfied: (1) After the student's parent, guardian, or custodian receives a written report under division (B)(2) of this section, the student fails to comply with the policy adopted under division (C) of this section within a reasonable period of time specified by the school; (2) Other intervention strategies contained in the policy adopted under division (C) of this section fail to cause a student's attendance to comply with the policy. (D) If an internet- or computer-based community school disenrolled a student pursuant to a policy adopted under division (C) of this section, the student shall not be eligible to re-enroll in that school for the remainder of the school year in which the student is disenrolled. This division does not prohibit a disenrolled student from enrolling in another internet- or computer-based community school. (E) If an internet- or computer-based community school disenrolls a student pursuant to a policy adopted under division (C) of this section, the school shall do both of the following: (1) Provide the student's parent, guardian, or custodian with a list of alternative educational options available to the student; (2) Within forty-eight hours of the student's disenrollment, notify the student's resident school district in writing. (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from school that must be adopted as part of a school's attendance policy in accordance with division (A)(6)(b) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.29. (A) This section applies to any internet- or computer-based community school that meets all of the following conditions: (1) Serves all of grades kindergarten through twelve; (2) Has an enrollment of at least two thousand students; (3) Has a sponsor that was not rated ineffective or poor on its most recent evaluation under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (B) Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the governing authority of a community school to which this section applies may adopt a resolution to divide the school into two or three separate schools as follows: (1) If the school is divided into two schools, one school shall serve grades kindergarten through eight and one school shall serve grades nine through twelve. (2) If the school is divided into three schools, one school shall serve grades kindergarten through five, one school shall serve grades six through eight, and one school shall serve grades nine through twelve. (C) The resolution adopted by the governing authority shall not be effective unless approved by the school's sponsor. Following approval of the resolution by the sponsor, and by the fifteenth day of March prior to the school year in which it will take effect, the governing authority shall file the resolution with the department of education and workforce. The division of the schools shall be effective on the first day of July succeeding the date the resolution is filed with the department. (D) All of the following shall apply to each new school created as a result of the resolution authorized by this section and to the school that is divided as a result of the resolution: (1) Each school shall have the same governing authority. (2) The sponsor and governing authority shall enter into a separate contract under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code for each school. (3) No school shall primarily serve students enrolled in be a dropout prevention and recovery program operated by the school community school. (4) No school shall be permitted to divide again under this section. (5) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (B)(2) of section 3314.016 of the Revised Code, each school shall be included in the calculation of the academic performance component for purposes of rating the schools' sponsor under the evaluation system prescribed by that section. (6) Each school shall be subject to the laws contained in Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise specified in this section. (E) The department shall issue a report card under section 3314.012 of the Revised Code for each new school created as a result of the resolution authorized by this section and for the school that is divided as a result of the resolution. For purposes of the report cards and other reporting requirements under this chapter, the department shall assign the school that serves the highest grades the same internal retrieval number previously used by the school that is divided under this section. The department shall assign a new internal retrieval number to each other school resulting from the division. Notwithstanding division (A) of section 3314.012 of the Revised Code, the ratings a school receives on its report card for the first two full school years after the division under this section shall count toward closure of the school under section 3314.35 of the Revised Code and any other matter that is based on report card ratings or measures. Sec. 3314.35. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section and section 3314.355 of the Revised Code, this section applies to any community school that meets one of the following criteria: (1) The school does not offer a grade level higher than three and, for the three most recent school years, satisfies either of the following criteria: (a) The school has received a performance rating of one star for early literacy under division (D)(3)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code; (b) The school has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D)(3) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (2) The school offers any of grade levels four to eight but does not offer a grade level higher than nine and, for the three most recent school years, satisfies either of the following criteria: (a) The school has received a performance rating of one star for both achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section; (b) The school has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and a performance rating of one star for progress under division (D)(3)(c) of that section. (3) The school offers any of grade levels ten to twelve and, for the three most recent school years, satisfies either of the following criteria: (a) The school has received a performance rating of "one star" for achievement under division (D)(3)(b) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and has not met annual measurable objectives for gap closing under division (D)(3)(a) of that section, as determined by the department of education and workforce; (b) The school has received an overall performance rating of less than two stars under division (D) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and a performance rating of one star for progress under division (D)(1)(b) of that section. For purposes of division (A) of this section only, the department shall calculate the value-added progress dimension for a community school using assessment scores for only those students to whom the school has administered the achievement assessments prescribed by section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code for at least the two most recent school years but using value-added data from only the most recent school year. (B) This section does not apply to either of the following: (1) Any dropout prevention and recovery community school in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program that is operated by the school. Rather, such schools shall be subject to closure only as provided in section 3314.351 of the Revised Code. However, prior to July 1, 2014, a community school in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program shall be exempt from this section only if it has been granted a waiver under section 3314.36 of the Revised Code. (2) Any community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities receiving special education and related services in accordance with Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (C) Any community school to which this section applies shall permanently close at the conclusion of the school year in which the school first becomes subject to this section. The sponsor and governing authority of the school shall comply with all procedures for closing a community school adopted by the department under division (E) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The governing authority of the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code after the school closes. (D) Nothing in this section or in any other provision of the Revised Code prohibits the sponsor of a community school from exercising its option not to renew a contract for any reason or from terminating a contract prior to its expiration for any of the reasons set forth in section 3314.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.351. (A) This section applies to any dropout prevention and recovery community school in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program. Except as provided in division (F) of this section, any such community school that has received a designation of "does not meet standards," as described in division (D)(1) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code on the report card issued under that section, for the three most recent school years shall be subject to closure in accordance with this section. (B) Not later than the first day of September in each school year, the department of education and workforce shall notify each school subject to closure under this section that the school must close not later than the thirtieth day of the following June. A school so notified shall close as required. (C) A school that opens on or after July 1, 2014, shall not be subject to closure under this section for its first two years of operation. A school that is in operation prior to July 1, 2014, shall not be subject to closure under this section until after August 31, 2016. (D) The sponsor and governing authority of the school shall comply with all procedures for closing a community school adopted by the department under division (E) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code. The governing authority of the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor under section 3314.03 of the Revised Code after the school closes. (E) Nothing in this section or in any other provision of the Revised Code prohibits the sponsor of a community school from exercising its option not to renew a contract for any reason or from terminating a contract prior to its expiration for any of the reasons set forth in section 3314.07 of the Revised Code. (F) Beginning in the 2019-2020 school year, no school shall be subject to closure under this section based on the report card issued for that school for the 2017-2018 or 2018-2019 school year if the school received an overall rating of "meets standards" or "exceeds standards" for the 2017-2018 or 2018-2019 school year pursuant to division (I) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. However, no school permanently closed under this section prior to the 2019-2020 school year shall be eligible to reopen based on the calculated or recalculated ratings under division (I) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.36. (A) Section 3314.35 of the Revised Code does not apply to any dropout prevention and recovery community school in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program that is operated by the school and that has been granted a waiver by the former department of education prior to July 1, 2014. (B) All dropout prevention and recovery community schools in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program are subject to the provisions of section 3314.351 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether a waiver has been granted under this section prior to July 1, 2014. Thereafter, no waivers shall be granted under this section. Sec. 3314.361. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, a A community school that operates a drug recovery program in cooperation with a court shall be considered a dropout prevention and recovery program community school for purposes of this chapter, regardless of the ages of students or grade levels served by the school and shall comply with all enrollment restrictions applicable to such a school. Sec. 3314.362. Notwithstanding division (A)(10) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code, a community school that primarily serves students enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program may continue to operate in the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years without complying with that division and shall be considered a dropout prevention and recovery community school for the purposes of Title XXXIII of the Revised Code for those school years. Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2027, any community school that primarily serves students enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program is a dropout prevention and recovery community school, as defined in division (A)(10) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. Prior to that date, the school, upon approval of the school's sponsor, shall do one or both of the following with any grades that do not comply with division (A)(10) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code: (A) Transfer those grades to a separate community school. The department of education and workforce shall assign the separate community school its own internal retrieval number. (B) Cease offering those grades. The school shall assist students who are not eligible to enroll in the dropout prevention and recovery community school to transfer to a separate community school or enroll in a different school, as applicable. Sec. 3314.38. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Competency-based educational program" and "eligible individual" have the same meanings as in section 3313.902 of the Revised Code. (2) "Eligible provider" means a community school that operates a dropout prevention and recovery program. (B) An eligible provider may establish a competency-based educational program that complies with standards adopted by the department of education and workforce and may enroll eligible individuals in the program for up to three consecutive school years for the purpose of earning a high school diploma. The provider shall establish a career plan for each individual enrolled in the program that specifies the individual's career goals and describes how the individual will demonstrate competency or earn course credits under division (C) of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code to earn a diploma and attain the individual's career goals. Notwithstanding sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.613, 3313.614, 3313.618, and 3313.619 of the Revised Code, the department shall award a high school diploma to an individual enrolled in a program who satisfies one of the conditions specified in division (C) of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code. (C) An eligible provider shall report each individual enrolled in a program under division (B) of this section to the department. This report shall be in addition to the report required under division (B) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code. The department annually shall certify the enrollment and attendance of each individual reported under this division and shall pay the provider up to $7,500 per school year, as determined by the department based on the extent of the individual's successful completion of the diploma requirements prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code. (D) An eligible provider that enrolls individuals under division (B) of this section is subject to the requirements of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code, as applicable. Sec. 3314.381. (A) As used in this section, "dropout recovery community school" has the same meaning as in section 3319.301 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall establish the dropout prevention and recovery advisory council. The council shall provide a forum for communication and collaboration between the department and parties involved in the establishment and operation of dropout prevention and recovery community schools, including sponsors and operators. (C)(B) The advisory council shall consist of the following members appointed by the director of education and workforce: (1) Two members of the state board of education; (2) One employee of the department who works directly with dropout prevention and recovery community schools, including any employee who works as a liaison with such schools; (3) Seven individuals with experience in dropout prevention and recovery community schools, their operators, and their sponsors. In appointing these individuals, the director shall ensure they represent a diverse array of schools in terms of enrollment, programs, learning models, and methods of instruction. (D)(C) The advisory council shall, in collaboration with the director, review all existing rules and guidance previously developed or adopted by the department pursuant to division (D)(C) of section 3314.382 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3314.382. (A) As used in this section, "dropout recovery community school" has the same meaning as in section 3319.301 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, the department of education and workforce shall only adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for any requirement to be imposed on a dropout prevention and recovery community school. The department shall not develop guidelines that impose requirements on the general and uniform operation of a dropout prevention and recovery community school. (C)(B) Pursuant to section 119.035 of the Revised Code, prior to adoption, the dropout prevention and recovery advisory council established under section 3314.381 of the Revised Code shall review any proposed rule described in division (B)(A) of this section. (D)(C) Any guidance document previously developed by the department that establishes general and uniform operations regarding a dropout recovery community school in effect on the effective date of this section October 3, 2023, is void after that date. Sec. 3315.063. No board of education of any school district shall expend more than fifteen per cent of the board's annual operating budget on administrative salaries and benefits and other costs associated with the district's administrative offices. Sec. 3315.18. (A) The board of education of each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district shall establish a capital and maintenance fund. Each board annually shall deposit into that fund an amount derived from revenues received by the district that would otherwise have been deposited in the general fund that is equal to three per cent of the statewide average base cost per pupil for the preceding fiscal year, as defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, or another percentage if established by the auditor of state under division (B) of this section, multiplied by the district's student population for the preceding fiscal year, except that money received from a permanent improvement levy authorized by section 5705.21 of the Revised Code may replace general revenue moneys in meeting the requirements of this section. Money in the fund shall be used solely for acquisition, replacement, enhancement, maintenance, or repair of permanent improvements, as that term is defined in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Any money in the fund that is not used in any fiscal year shall carry forward to the next fiscal year. (B) The director of education and workforce and the auditor of state jointly shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code defining what constitutes expenditures permitted by division (A) of this section. The auditor of state may designate a percentage, other than three per cent, of the statewide average base cost per pupil multiplied by the district's student population that must be deposited into the fund. (C) Within its capital and maintenance fund, a school district board of education may establish a separate account solely for the purpose of depositing funds transferred from the district's reserve balance account established under former division (H) of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code. After April 10, 2001, a board may deposit all or part of the funds formerly included in such reserve balance account in the separate account established under this section. Funds deposited in this separate account and interest on such funds shall be utilized solely for the purpose of providing the district's portion of the basic project costs of any project undertaken in accordance with Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code. (D)(1) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, in any year a district is in fiscal emergency status as declared pursuant to section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, the district may deposit an amount less than required by division (A) of this section, or make no deposit, into the district capital and maintenance fund for that year. (2) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, in any fiscal year that a school district is either in fiscal watch status, as declared pursuant to section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, or in fiscal caution status, as declared pursuant to section 3316.031 of the Revised Code, the district may apply to the director of education and workforce for a waiver from the requirements of division (A) of this section, under which the district may be permitted to deposit an amount less than required by that division or permitted to make no deposit into the district capital and maintenance fund for that year. The director may grant a waiver under division (D)(2) of this section if the district demonstrates to the satisfaction of the director that compliance with division (A) of this section that year will create an undue financial hardship on the district. (3) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, not more often than one fiscal year in every three consecutive fiscal years, any school district that does not satisfy the conditions for the exemption described in division (D)(1) of this section or the conditions to apply for the waiver described in division (D)(2) of this section may apply to the director for a waiver from the requirements of division (A) of this section, under which the district may be permitted to deposit an amount less than required by that division or permitted to make no deposit into the district capital and maintenance fund for that year. The director may grant a waiver under division (D)(3) of this section if the district demonstrates to the satisfaction of the director that compliance with division (A) of this section that year will necessitate the reduction or elimination of a program currently offered by the district that is critical to the academic success of students of the district and that no reasonable alternatives exist for spending reductions in other areas of operation within the district that negate the necessity of the reduction or elimination of that program. (E) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, the requirements of this section prevail over any conflicting provisions of agreements between employee organizations and public employers entered into after November 21, 1997. (F) As used in this section, "student population" means the average, daily, full-time equivalent number of students in kindergarten through twelfth grade receiving any educational services from the school district during the first full school week in October, excluding students enrolled in adult education classes, but including all of the following: (1) Adjacent or other district students enrolled in the district under an open enrollment policy pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (2) Students receiving services in the district pursuant to a compact, cooperative education agreement, or a contract, but who are entitled to attend school in another district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code; (3) Students for whom tuition is payable pursuant to sections 3317.081 and 3323.141 of the Revised Code. The department of education and workforce shall determine a district's student population using data reported to it under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code for the applicable fiscal year. Sec. 3315.181. As used in this section, "securities" has the same meaning as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding division (A) of section 3315.18 of the Revised Code, the board of education of a city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district, in meeting the amount required by that division to be deposited in the district's capital and maintenance fund, may replace general fund revenues with proceeds received from a permanent improvement levy authorized by section 5705.21 of the Revised Code only to the extent the proceeds are available to be used for the acquisition, replacement, enhancement, maintenance, or repair of permanent improvements as defined in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. In addition, the board may replace general fund revenues with proceeds received from any of the following sources in meeting the amount required by that division to be deposited in the fund: (A) Proceeds received from any securities whose use is limited to the acquisition, replacement, enhancement, maintenance, or repair of permanent improvements; (B) Insurance proceeds received as a result of the damage to or theft or destruction of a permanent improvement to the extent a board of education places the proceeds in a separate fund for the acquisition, replacement, enhancement, maintenance, or repair of permanent improvements; (C) Proceeds received from the sale of a permanent improvement to the extent the proceeds are paid into a separate fund for the construction or acquisition of permanent improvements; (D) Proceeds received from a tax levy authorized by section 3318.06 of the Revised Code to the extent the proceeds are available to be used for the maintenance of capital facilities; (E) Proceeds of certificates of participation issued as part of a lease-purchase agreement entered into under section 3313.375 of the Revised Code; (F) Proceeds of any school district income tax levied under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code for permanent improvements, to the extent the proceeds are available for the acquisition, replacement, enhancement, maintenance, or repair of permanent improvements; (G) Any other revenue source identified by the auditor of state, in consultation with the department of education and workforce, in rules adopted by the auditor of state. Sec. 3316.031. (A) The director of education and workforce, in consultation with the auditor of state, shall develop guidelines for identifying fiscal practices and budgetary conditions that, if uncorrected, could result in a future declaration of a fiscal watch or fiscal emergency within a school district. The guidelines shall not include a requirement that a school district submit financial statements according to generally accepted accounting principles. (B)(1) If the director determines from a school district's five-year current budget information and three-year forecast submitted under section 5705.391 of the Revised Code that a district is engaging in any of those practices or that any of those conditions exist within the district, after consulting with the district board of education concerning the practices or conditions, the director may declare the district to be under a fiscal caution. (2) If the auditor of state finds that a district is engaging in any of those practices or that any of those conditions exist within the district, the auditor of state shall report that finding to the director and, after consulting with the district board of education concerning the practices or conditions, the director may declare the district to be under a fiscal caution. (3) Unless the auditor of state has elected to declare a state of fiscal watch under division (A)(4) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, the director shall declare a school district to be under a fiscal caution if the conditions described in divisions (A)(4)(a) and (b) of that section are both satisfied with respect to the school district. (C) When the director declares a district to be under fiscal caution, the director shall promptly notify the district board of education of that declaration and shall request the board to provide written proposals for discontinuing or correcting the fiscal practices or budgetary conditions that prompted the declaration and for preventing the district from experiencing further fiscal difficulties that could result in the district being declared to be in a state of fiscal watch or fiscal emergency. (D) The director, or a designee, may visit and inspect any district that is declared to be under a fiscal caution. The department of education and workforce shall provide technical assistance to the district board in implementing proposals to eliminate the practices or budgetary conditions that prompted the declaration of fiscal caution and may make recommendations concerning the board's proposals. (E) If the director finds that a school district declared to be under a fiscal caution has not made reasonable proposals or otherwise taken action to discontinue or correct the fiscal practices or budgetary conditions that prompted the declaration of fiscal caution, and if the director considers it necessary to prevent further fiscal decline, the director may determine that the district should be in a state of fiscal watch. As provided in division (A)(3) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code, the auditor of state shall declare the district to be in a state of fiscal watch if the auditor of state finds the director's determination to be reasonable. Sec. 3316.041. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 133. or sections 3313.483 to 3313.4810 of the Revised Code, and subject to the approval of the director of education and workforce, a school district that is in a state of fiscal watch declared under section 3316.03 of the Revised Code may restructure or refinance loans obtained or in the process of being obtained under section 3313.483 of the Revised Code if all of the following requirements are met: (1) The operating deficit certified for the school district for the current or preceding fiscal year under section 3313.483 of the Revised Code exceeds fifteen per cent of the district's general revenue fund for the fiscal year preceding the year for which the certification of the operating deficit is made. (2) The school district voters have, during the period of the fiscal watch, approved the levy of a tax under section 718.09, 718.10, 5705.194, 5705.21, 5748.02, or 5748.09 of the Revised Code that is not a renewal or replacement levy, or a levy under section 5705.199 of the Revised Code, and that will provide new operating revenue. (3) The board of education of the school district has adopted or amended the financial plan required by section 3316.04 of the Revised Code to reflect the restructured or refinanced loans, and sets forth the means by which the district will bring projected operating revenues and expenditures, and projected debt service obligations, into balance for the life of any such loan. (B) Subject to the approval of the director, the school district may issue securities to evidence the restructuring or refinancing authorized by this section. Such securities may extend the original period for repayment not to exceed ten years, and may alter the frequency and amount of repayments, interest or other financing charges, and other terms or agreements under which the loans were originally contracted, provided the loans received under sections 3313.483 of the Revised Code are repaid from funds the district would otherwise receive under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, as required under division (E)(3) of section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. Securities issued for the purpose of restructuring or refinancing under this section shall be repaid in equal payments and at equal intervals over the term of the debt and are not eligible to be included in any subsequent proposal to restructure or refinance. (C) Unless the district is declared to be in a state of fiscal emergency under division (D) of section 3316.04 of the Revised Code, a school district shall remain in a state of fiscal watch for the duration of the repayment period of any loan restructured or refinanced under this section. Sec. 3316.043. Upon the approval by the director of education and workforce of an initial financial plan under section 3316.04 of the Revised Code or a financial recovery plan under section 3316.06 of the Revised Code, the board of education of the school district for which the plan was approved shall revise the district's five-year current budget information and three-year projection of revenues and expenditures in accordance with rules adopted under section 5705.391 of the Revised Code so that the five-yearcurrent budget information and three-year projection is are consistent with the financial plan or financial recovery plan. In the case of a school district declared to be in a state of fiscal emergency, the five-yearcurrent budget information and three-year projection shall be revised by the financial planning and supervision commission for that district. Sec. 3316.06. (A) Within one hundred twenty days after the first meeting of a school district financial planning and supervision commission, the commission shall adopt a financial recovery plan regarding the school district for which the commission was created. During the formulation of the plan, the commission shall seek appropriate input from the school district board and from the community. This plan shall contain the following: (1) Actions to be taken to: (a) Eliminate all fiscal emergency conditions declared to exist pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Satisfy any judgments, past-due accounts payable, and all past-due and payable payroll and fringe benefits; (c) Eliminate the deficits in all deficit funds, except that any prior year deficits in the capital and maintenance fund established pursuant to section 3315.18 of the Revised Code shall be forgiven; (d) Restore to special funds any moneys from such funds that were used for purposes not within the purposes of such funds, or borrowed from such funds by the purchase of debt obligations of the school district with the moneys of such funds, or missing from the special funds and not accounted for, if any; (e) Balance the budget, avoid future deficits in any funds, and maintain on a current basis payments of payroll, fringe benefits, and all accounts; (f) Avoid any fiscal emergency condition in the future; (g) Restore the ability of the school district to market long-term general obligation bonds under provisions of law applicable to school districts generally. (2) The management structure that will enable the school district to take the actions enumerated in division (A)(1) of this section. The plan shall specify the level of fiscal and management control that the commission will exercise within the school district during the period of fiscal emergency, and shall enumerate respectively, the powers and duties of the commission and the powers and duties of the school board during that period. The commission may elect to assume any of the powers and duties of the school board it considers necessary, including all powers related to personnel, curriculum, and legal issues in order to successfully implement the actions described in division (A)(1) of this section. (3) The target dates for the commencement, progress upon, and completion of the actions enumerated in division (A)(1) of this section and a reasonable period of time expected to be required to implement the plan. The commission shall prepare a reasonable time schedule for progress toward and achievement of the requirements for the plan, and the plan shall be consistent with that time schedule. (4) The amount and purpose of any issue of debt obligations that will be issued, together with assurances that any such debt obligations that will be issued will not exceed debt limits supported by appropriate certifications by the fiscal officer of the school district and the county auditor. If the commission considers it necessary in order to maintain or improve educational opportunities of pupils in the school district, the plan may include a proposal to restructure or refinance outstanding debt obligations incurred by the board under section 3313.483 of the Revised Code contingent upon the approval, during the period of the fiscal emergency, by district voters of a tax levied under section 718.09, 718.10, 5705.194, 5705.21, 5748.02, 5748.08, or 5748.09 of the Revised Code that is not a renewal or replacement levy, or a levy under section 5705.199 of the Revised Code, and that will provide new operating revenue. Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 133. or sections 3313.483 to 3313.4810 of the Revised Code, following the required approval of the district voters and with the approval of the commission, the school district may issue securities to evidence the restructuring or refinancing. Those securities may extend the original period for repayment, not to exceed ten years, and may alter the frequency and amount of repayments, interest or other financing charges, and other terms of agreements under which the debt originally was contracted, at the discretion of the commission, provided that any loans received pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code shall be paid from funds the district would otherwise receive under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, as required under division (E)(3) of section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. The securities issued for the purpose of restructuring or refinancing the debt shall be repaid in equal payments and at equal intervals over the term of the debt and are not eligible to be included in any subsequent proposal for the purpose of restructuring or refinancing debt under this section. (5) An evaluation of the feasibility of entering into shared services agreements with other political subdivisions for the joint exercise of any power, performance of any function, or rendering of any service, if so authorized by statute. (B) Any financial recovery plan may be amended subsequent to its adoption. Each financial recovery plan shall be updated annually. (C) Each school district financial planning and supervision commission shall submit the financial recovery plan it adopts or updates under this section to the director of education and workforce for approval immediately following its adoption or updating. The director shall evaluate the plan and either approve or disapprove it within thirty calendar days from the date of its submission. If the plan is disapproved, the director shall recommend modifications that will render it acceptable. No financial planning and supervision commission shall implement a financial recovery plan that is adopted or updated on or after April 10, 2001, unless the director has approved it. Sec. 3316.08. During a school district's fiscal emergency period, the auditor of state shall determine annually, or at any other time upon request of the financial planning and supervision commission, whether the school district will incur an operating deficit. If the auditor of state determines that a school district will incur an operating deficit, the auditor of state shall certify that determination to the director of education and workforce, the financial planning and supervision commission, and the board of education of the school district. Upon receiving the auditor of state's certification, the commission shall adopt a resolution requesting that the board of education work with the county auditor or tax commissioner to estimate the amount and rate of a tax levy that is needed under section 5705.194, 5705.199, or 5705.21 or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code to produce a positive fund balance not later than the fifth third year of the five-year three-year forecast submitted under section 5705.391 of the Revised Code. The board of education shall recommend to the commission whether the board supports or opposes a tax levy under section 5705.194, 5705.199, or 5705.21 or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and shall provide supporting documentation to the commission of its recommendation. After considering the board of education's recommendation and supporting documentation, the commission shall adopt a resolution to either submit a ballot question proposing a tax levy or not to submit such a question. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the tax shall be levied in the manner prescribed for a tax levied under section 5705.194, 5705.199, or 5705.21 or under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. If the commission decides that a tax should be levied, the tax shall be levied for the purpose of paying current operating expenses of the school district. The rate of a property tax levied under section 5705.194, 5705.199, 5705.21, or 5748.09 of the Revised Code shall be determined by the county auditor, and the rate of an income tax levied under section 5748.02, 5748.08, or 5748.09 of the Revised Code shall be determined by the tax commissioner, upon the request of the commission. The commission, in consultation with the board of education, shall determine the election at which the question of the tax shall appear on the ballot, and the commission shall submit a copy of its resolution to the board of elections not later than ninety days prior to the day of that election. The board of elections conducting the election shall certify the results of the election to the board of education and to the financial planning and supervision commission. Sec. 3316.16. (A) A school district financial planning and supervision commission, with respect to its functions under this chapter, shall continue in existence until such time as a determination is made under division (B) of this section that all of the following have occurred: (1) An effective financial accounting and reporting system in accordance with section 3316.10 of the Revised Code is in the process of being implemented, and it is reasonably expected that this implementation will be completed within two years. (2) All of the fiscal emergency conditions determined pursuant to division (B) of section 3316.03 of the Revised Code have been corrected or eliminated, and no new fiscal emergency conditions have occurred. (3) The objectives of the financial recovery plan described in section 3316.06 of the Revised Code are being met. (4) The school district board has prepared current budget information and a financial forecast for a five-year three-year period in accordance with the standards issued by the auditor of state and an opinion has been rendered by the auditor of state that the financial forecast is considered to be nonadverse. The forecast shall display the district's projected compliance with section 3315.18 of the Revised Code beginning in the year the commission is proposed for termination. (B) The determination that all conditions listed in division (A) of this section for the termination of the existence of the commission and its functions exist may be made either by the auditor of state or by the commission and shall be certified to the commission, the auditor of state, the governor, the director of budget and management, and the budget commission, whereupon such commission and its functions under this chapter shall terminate. This determination shall be made by the auditor of state upon the filing with the auditor of state of a written request for such a determination by the school district board, the governor, or the commission, or may be made by the auditor of state upon the auditor of state's own initiative. (C) The commission shall prepare and submit at the time of such certification a final report of its activities, in such form as is appropriate for the purpose of providing a record of its activities and assisting other commissions created under this chapter in the conduct of their functions. All of the books and records of the commission shall be delivered to the auditor of state for retention and safekeeping. (D) Upon receipt of the certification provided for in division (B) of this section, the director of budget and management shall follow the procedures set forth in section 126.29 of the Revised Code. (E) If, at the time of termination of the commission, an effective financial accounting and reporting system has not been fully implemented, the auditor of state shall monitor the progress of implementation and shall exercise authority under this section and Chapter 117. of the Revised Code to secure full implementation at the earliest time feasible but within two years after such termination. Sec. 3317.01. As used in this section, "school district," unless otherwise specified, means any city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district and any educational service center. This chapter shall be administered by the department of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall calculate the amounts payable to each school district and shall certify the amounts payable to each eligible district to the treasurer of the district as provided by this chapter. Certification of moneys pursuant to this section shall include the amounts payable to each school building, at a frequency determined by the department, for each subgroup of students, as defined in section 3317.40 of the Revised Code, receiving services, provided for by state funding, from the district or school. No moneys shall be distributed pursuant to this chapter without the approval of the controlling board. The department shall, in accordance with appropriations made by the general assembly, meet the financial obligations of this chapter. Moneys distributed to school districts pursuant to this chapter shall be calculated based on the annual enrollment calculated from the three reports required under sections section 3317.03 and 3317.036 of the Revised Code and paid on a fiscal year basis, beginning with the first day of July and extending through the thirtieth day of June. In any given fiscal year, prior to school districts submitting the first report required under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, enrollment for the districts shall be calculated based on the third report submitted by the districts for the previous fiscal year. The moneys appropriated for each fiscal year shall be distributed periodically to each school district unless otherwise provided for. The department, in June of each year, shall submit to the controlling board the department's year-end distributions pursuant to this chapter. Except as otherwise provided, payments under this chapter shall be made only to those school districts in which: (A) The school district, except for any educational service center and any joint vocational or cooperative education school district, levies for current operating expenses at least twenty mills, unless the school district is levying less than that amount due to the operation of section 5705.316 or 5705.32 of the Revised Code. Levies for joint vocational or cooperative education school districts or county school financing districts, limited to or to the extent apportioned to current expenses, shall be included in this qualification requirement. School district income tax levies under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code, limited to or to the extent apportioned to current operating expenses, shall be included in this qualification requirement to the extent determined by the tax commissioner under division (C) of section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (B) The school year next preceding the fiscal year for which such payments are authorized meets the requirement of section 3313.48 of the Revised Code, with regard to the minimum number of hours school must be open for instruction with pupils in attendance, for individualized parent-teacher conference and reporting periods, and for professional meetings of teachers. A school district shall not be considered to have failed to comply with this division because schools were open for instruction but either twelfth grade students were excused from attendance for up to the equivalent of three school days or only a portion of the kindergarten students were in attendance for up to the equivalent of three school days in order to allow for the gradual orientation to school of such students. A board of education or governing board of an educational service center which has not conformed with other law and the rules pursuant thereto, shall not participate in the distribution of funds authorized by this chapter, except for good and sufficient reason established to the satisfaction of the department and the state controlling board. All funds allocated to school districts under this chapter, except those specifically allocated for other purposes, shall be used to pay current operating expenses only. Sec. 3317.011. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Average administrative assistant salary" means the average salary of administrative assistants employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $20,000 but less than $65,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department of education and workforce. (2) "Average bookkeeping and accounting employee salary" means the average salary of bookkeeping employees and accounting employees employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $20,000 but less than $80,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (3) "Average clerical staff salary" means the average salary of clerical staff employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $15,000 but less than $50,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (4) "Average counselor salary" means the average salary of counselors employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $95,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (5) "Average education management information system support employee salary" means the average salary of accounting employees employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $90,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (6) "Average librarian and media staff salary" means the average salary of librarians and media staff employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $95,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (7) "Average other district administrator salary" means the average salary of all assistant superintendents and directors employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $50,000 but less than $135,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (8) "Average principal salary" means the average salary of all principals employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $50,000 but less than $120,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (9) "Average superintendent salary" means the average salary of all superintendents employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $60,000 but less than $180,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department. (10) "Average teacher cost" for a fiscal year is equal to the sum of the following: (a) The average salary of teachers employed by city, local, and exempted village school districts in this state with salaries greater than $30,000 but less than $95,000, using fiscal year 2022 data, as determined by the department; (b) An amount for teacher benefits equal to 0.16 times the average salary calculated under division (A)(10)(a) of this section; (c) An amount for district-paid insurance costs equal to the following product: The statewide weighted average employer-paid monthly premium based on data reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the state employment relations board for the health insurance survey conducted in accordance with divisions (K)(5) and (6) of section 4117.02 of the Revised Code using fiscal year 2022 data X 12 (11) "Eligible school district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district that satisfies one of the following: (a) The district is a member of an organization that regulates interscholastic athletics. (b) The district has teams in at least three different sports that participate in an interscholastic league. (B) When calculating a district's aggregate base cost under this section, the department shall use data from fiscal year 2022 for all of the following: (1) The average salaries determined under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10)(a) of this section; (2) The amount for teacher benefits determined under division (A)(10)(b) of this section; (3) The district-paid insurance costs determined under division (A)(10)(c) of this section; (4) The spending determined under divisions (E)(4)(a), (E)(5)(a), (E)(6)(a), and (H)(1) of this section and the corresponding student counts determined under divisions (E)(4)(b), (E)(5)(b), (E)(6)(b), and (H)(2) of this section; (5) The information determined under division (G)(3) of this section. (C) A city, local, or exempted village school district's aggregate base cost for a fiscal year shall be equal to the following sum: (The district's teacher base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (D) of this section) + (the district's student support base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (E) of this section) + (the district's leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (F) of this section) + (the district's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (G) of this section) + (the athletic co-curricular activities base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (H) of this section, if the district is an eligible school district) (D) The department shall compute a district's teacher base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's classroom teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in kindergarten and divide that number by 20; (b) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades one through three and divide that number by 23; (c) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades four through eight but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 25; (d) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 27; (e) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in a career-technical education program or class, as certified under divisions (B)(11), (12), (13), (14), and (15) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, and divide that number by 18; (f) Compute the sum of the quotients obtained under divisions (D)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section; (g) Compute the classroom teacher cost by multiplying the average teacher cost for that fiscal year by the sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section. (2) Calculate the district's special teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 150; (b) If the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section is greater than 6, the special teacher cost shall be equal to that quotient multiplied by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (c) If the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section is less than or equal to 6, the special teacher cost shall be equal to 6 multiplied by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (3) Calculate the district's substitute teacher cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (a) Compute the substitute teacher daily rate with benefits by multiplying the substitute teacher daily rate of $90 by 1.16; (b) Compute the substitute teacher cost in accordance with the following formula: [The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section and 6)] X the amount computed under division (D)(3)(a) of this section X 5 (4) Calculate the district's professional development cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: [The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section and 6)] X [(the sum of divisions (A)(10)(a) and (b) of this section for that fiscal year)/180] X 4 (5) Calculate the district's teacher base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (D)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section. (E) The department shall compute a district's student support base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's guidance counselor cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the number of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve and divide that number by 360; (b) Compute the counselor cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (E)(1)(a) of this section and 1) X [(the average counselor salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (2) Calculate the district's librarian and media staff cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 1,000; (b) Compute the librarian and media staff cost in accordance with the following formula: The quotient obtained under division (E)(2)(a) of this section X [(the average librarian and media staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (3) Calculate the district's staffing cost for student wellness and success for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 250; (b) Compute the staffing cost for student wellness and success in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (E)(3)(a) of this section and 5) X [(the average counselor salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (4) Calculate the district's academic co-curricular activities cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the total amount of spending for academic co-curricular activities reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department using fiscal year 2022 data; (b) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state using fiscal year 2022 data as specified under division (E)(4)(a) of this section; (c) Compute the academic co-curricular activities cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(4)(a) of this section / the sum determined under division (E)(4)(b) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the academic co-curricular activities cost is computed (5) Calculate the district's building safety and security cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the total amount of spending for building safety and security reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department using fiscal year 2022 data; (b) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state that reported the data specified under division (E)(5)(a) of this section using fiscal year 2022 data; (c) Compute the building safety and security cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(5)(a) of this section / the sum determined under division (E)(5)(a) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the building safety and security cost is computed (6) Calculate the district's supplies and academic content cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the total amount of spending for supplies and academic content, excluding supplies for transportation and maintenance, reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department using fiscal year 2022 data; (b) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state using fiscal year 2022 data as specified under division (E)(6)(a) of this section; (c) Compute the supplies and academic content cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(6)(a) of this section / the sum determined under division (E)(6)(b) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the supplies and academic content cost is computed (7) Calculate the district's technology cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: $37.50 X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year (8) Calculate the district's student support base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (E)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section. (F) The department shall compute a district's leadership and accountability base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than 4,000, then the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to [($160,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (b) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is less than or equal to 4,000 but greater than or equal to 500, the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to the sum of the following: (i) (The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year - 500) X {[($160,000 X 1.16) - ($80,000 X 1.16)]/3500}; (ii) ($80,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year. (c) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM is less than 500, then the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to [($80,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (2) Calculate the district's treasurer cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than 4,000, then the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to [($130,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (b) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is less than or equal to 4,000 but greater than or equal to 500, the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to the sum of the following: (i) (The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year - 500) X {[($130,000 X 1.16) - ($60,000 X 1.16)]/3500}; (ii) ($60,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year. (c) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM is less than 500, then the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to [($60,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]. (3) Calculate the district's other district administrator cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the average other district administrator salary for that fiscal year by the average superintendent salary for that fiscal year; (b) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 750; (c) Compute the other district administrator cost in accordance with the following formula: {[(The district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year calculated under division (F)(1) of this section - the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year) X the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(a) of this section] + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section} X (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(b) of this section and 2) (4) Calculate the district's fiscal support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 850; (b) Determine the lesser of the following: (i) The maximum of the quotient obtained under division (F)(4)(a) of this section and 2; (ii) 35. (c) Compute the fiscal support cost in accordance with the following formula: The number obtained under division (F)(4)(b) of this section X [(the average bookkeeping and accounting employee salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (5) Calculate the district's education management information system support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 5,000; (b) Compute the education management information system support cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(5)(a) of this section and 1) X [(the average education management information system support employee salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (6) Calculate the district's leadership support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(b) of this section and 2, and add 1 to that number; (b) Divide the number obtained under division (F)(6)(a) of this section by 3; (c) Compute the leadership support cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(6)(b) of this section and 1) X [(the average administrative assistant salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year] (7) Calculate the district's information technology center support cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: $31 X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year (8) Calculate the district's district leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (F)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section. (G) The department shall compute a district's building leadership and operations base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's building leadership cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the average principal salary for that fiscal year by the average superintendent salary for that fiscal year; (b) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 450; (c) Compute the building leadership cost in accordance with the following formula: {[(The district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year calculated under division (F)(1) of this section - the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year) X the quotient obtained under division (G)(1)(a) of this section] + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year} X the quotient obtained under division (G)(1)(b) of this section (2) Calculate the district's building leadership support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 400; (b) Determine the number of school buildings in the district for that the preceding fiscal year; (c) Compute the building leadership support cost in accordance with the following formula: (i) If the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section is less than the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section, then the district's building leadership support cost shall be equal to {the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section for that fiscal year X [(the average clerical staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]}. (ii) If the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section is greater than or equal to the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section, then the district's building leadership support cost shall be equal to {[the lesser of (the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section X 3) and the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section] X [(the average clerical staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of this section for that fiscal year]}. (3) Calculate the district's building operations cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine both of the following: (i) The average building square feet per pupil for all city, local, and exempted village school district buildings in the state; (ii) The average cost per square foot for all city, local, and exempted village school district buildings in the state. (b) Compute the building operations cost in accordance with the following formula: The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year X [(the number determined under division (G)(3)(a)(i) of this section X the number determined under division (G)(3)(a)(ii) of this section) - (the amount determined under division (E)(5)(a) of this section for that fiscal year/ the sum determined under division (E)(5)(b) of this section for that fiscal year)] (4) Calculate the district's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (G)(1), (2), and (3) of this section. (H) If a district is an eligible school district, the department shall compute the district's athletic co-curricular activities base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Determine the total amount of spending for athletic co-curricular activities reported by city, local, and exempted village school districts to the department for that fiscal year; (2) Determine the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district in the state for that fiscal year; (3) Compute the district's athletic co-curricular activities base cost in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (H)(1) of this section / the sum determined under division (H)(2) of this section) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the funds for athletic co-curricular activities are computed Sec. 3317.012. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027. (A) As used in this section, "average administrative assistant salary," "average bookkeeping and accounting employee salary," "average clerical staff salary," "average counselor salary," "average education management information system support employee salary," "average librarian and media staff salary," "average other district administrator salary," "average principal salary," "average superintendent salary," and "average teacher cost" have the same meanings as in section 3317.011 of the Revised Code. (B) When calculating a district's aggregate base cost under this section, the department shall use data from fiscal year 2022 for all of the following: (1) The average salaries determined under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10)(a) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code; (2) The amount for teacher benefits determined under division (A)(10)(b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code; (3) The district-paid insurance costs determined under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code; (4) Spending determined under divisions (E)(4)(a), (E)(5)(a), and (H)(1) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code and the corresponding student counts determined under divisions (E)(4)(b), (E)(5)(b), and (H)(2) of that section; (5) The information determined under division (G)(3) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code. (C) A joint vocational school district's aggregate base cost for a fiscal year shall be equal to the following sum: The district's teacher base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (D) of this section + the district's student support base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (E) of this section + the district's leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (F) of this section + the district's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (G) of this section (D) The department of education and workforce shall compute a district's teacher base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's classroom teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in a career-technical education program or class, as certified under divisions (D)(2)(h), (i), (j), (k), and (l) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, and divide that number by 18; (b) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades six through eight but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 25; (c) Determine the full-time equivalency of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 27; (d) Compute the sum of the quotients obtained under divisions (D)(1)(a), (b), and (c) of this section; (e) Compute the classroom teacher base cost by multiplying the average teacher cost for that fiscal year by the sum computed under division (D)(1)(d) of this section. (2) Calculate the district's cost for that fiscal year for teachers providing health and physical education, instruction regarding employability and soft skills, development and coordination of internships and job placements, career-technical student organization activities, pre-apprenticeship and apprenticeship coordination, and any assessment related to career-technical education, including any nationally recognized job skills or end-of-course assessment, as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 150; (b) If the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section is greater than 6, the teacher cost shall be equal to that quotient multiplied by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (c) If the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section is less than or equal to 6, the teacher cost shall be equal to 6 multiplied by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (3) Calculate the district's substitute teacher cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (a) Compute the substitute teacher daily rate with benefits by multiplying the substitute teacher daily rate of $90 by 1.16; (b) Compute the substitute teacher cost in accordance with the following formula: [The sum computed under division (D)(1)(d) of this section + (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section and 6)] X the amount computed under division (D)(3)(a) of this section X 5 (4) Calculate the district's professional development cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: [The sum computed under division (D)(1)(d) of this section + (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section and 6)] X [(the sum of divisions (A)(10)(a) and (b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year)/180] X 4 (5) Calculate the district's teacher base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (D)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section. (E) The department shall compute a district's student support base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's guidance counselor cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the number of students in the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve and divide that number by 360; (b) Compute the counselor cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (E)(1)(a) of this section and 1) X [(the average counselor salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year] (2) Calculate the district's librarian and media staff cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 1,000; (b) Compute the librarian and media staff cost in accordance with the following formula: The quotient obtained under division (E)(2)(a) of this section X [(the average librarian and media staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year] (3) Calculate the district's staffing cost for student wellness and success for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 250; (b) Compute the staffing cost for student wellness and success in accordance with the following formula: The quotient obtained under division (E)(3)(a) of this section X [(the average counselor salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year] (4) Calculate the district's cost for that fiscal year for career-technical curriculum specialists and coordinators, career assessment and program placement, recruitment and orientation, student success coordination, analysis of test results, development of intervention and remediation plans and monitoring of those plans, and satellite program coordination in accordance with the following formula: [(The amount determined under division (E)(4)(a) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year / the sum determined under division (E)(4)(b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) + (the amount determined under division (H)(1) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year / the sum determined under division (H)(2) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code)] X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the district's cost under this division is computed (5) Compute the district's building safety and security cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(5)(a) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year / the sum determined under division (E)(5)(b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the building safety and security cost is computed (6) Compute the district's supplies and academic content cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (E)(6)(a) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year / the sum determined under division (E)(6)(b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the supplies and academic content cost is computed (7) Calculate the district's technology cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: $37.50 X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year (8) Calculate the district's student support base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (E)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section. (F) The department shall compute a district's leadership and accountability base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than 4,000, then the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to [($160,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year]. (b) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is less than or equal to 4,000 but greater than or equal to 500, the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to the sum of the following: (i) (The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year - 500) X {[($160,000 X 1.16) - ($80,000 X 1.16)]/3500}; (ii) ($80,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year. (c) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM is less than 500, then the district's superintendent cost shall be equal to [($80,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year]. (2) Calculate the district's treasurer cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than 4,000, then the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to [($130,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year]. (b) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is less than or equal to 4,000 but greater than or equal to 500, the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to the sum of the following: (i) (The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year - 500) X {[($130,000 X 1.16) - ($60,000 X 1.16)]/3500}; (ii) ($60,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year. (c) If the district's base cost enrolled ADM is less than 500, then the district's treasurer cost shall be equal to [($60,000 X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year]. (3) Calculate the district's other district administrator cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the average other district administrator salary for that fiscal year by the average superintendent salary for that fiscal year; (b) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 750; (c) Compute the other district administrator cost in accordance with the following formula: {[(The district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year calculated under division (F)(1) of this section - the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year) X the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(a) of this section] + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code} X (the greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(b) of this section and 2) (4) Calculate the district's fiscal support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 850; (b) Determine the lesser of the following: (i) The maximum of the quotient obtained under division (F)(4)(a) of this section and 2; (ii) 35. (c) Compute the fiscal support cost in accordance with the following formula: The number obtained under division (F)(4)(b) of this section X [(the average bookkeeping and accounting employee salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year] (5) Calculate the district's education management information system support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 5,000; (b) Compute the education management information system support cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(5)(a) of this section and 1) X [(the average education management information system support employee salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year] (6) Calculate the district's leadership support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(3)(b) of this section and 2 and add 1 to that number; (b) Divide the number obtained under division (F)(6)(a) of this section by 3; (c) Compute the leadership support cost in accordance with the following formula: (The greater of the quotient obtained under division (F)(6)(b) of this section and 1) X [(the average administrative assistant salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year] (7) Calculate the district's information technology center support cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: $31 X the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year (8) Calculate the district's district leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (F)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), and (7) of this section; (G) The department shall compute a district's building leadership and operations base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's building leadership cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the average principal salary for that fiscal year by the average superintendent salary for that fiscal year; (b) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 450; (c) Compute the building leadership cost in accordance with the following formula: {[(The district's superintendent cost for that fiscal year calculated under division (F)(1) of this section - the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year) X the quotient obtained under division (G)(1)(a) of this section] + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year} X the quotient obtained under division (G)(1)(b) of this section (2) Calculate the district's building leadership support cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year by 400; (b) Determine the number of school buildings in the district for that the preceding fiscal year; (c) Compute the building leadership support cost in accordance with the following formula: (i) If the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section is less than the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section, then the district's building leadership support cost shall be equal to {the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section X [(the average clerical staff salary X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year]}. (ii) If the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section is greater than or equal to the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section, then the district's building leadership support cost shall be equal to {[the lesser of (the number obtained under division (G)(2)(b) of this section X 3) and the quotient obtained under division (G)(2)(a) of this section] X [(the average clerical staff salary for that fiscal year X 1.16) + the amount specified under division (A)(10)(c) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year]}. (3) Compute the district's building operations cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: The district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year X [(the number determined under division (G)(3)(a)(i) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code X the number determined under division (G)(3)(a)(ii) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) - (the amount determined under division (E)(5)(a) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year / the sum determined under division (E)(5)(b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year)] (4) Calculate the district's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (G)(1), (2), and (3) of this section. Sec. 3317.014. (A) The multiples for the following categories of career-technical education programs approved by the department of education and workforce under section 3317.161 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: (1) A multiple of 0.6230 for students enrolled in career-technical education workforce development programs in agricultural and environmental systems, construction technologies, engineering and science technologies, finance, health science, information technology, and manufacturing technologies, each of which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (2) A multiple of 0.5905 for students enrolled in workforce development programs in business and administration, hospitality and tourism, human services, law and public safety, transportation systems, and arts and communications, each of which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (3) A multiple of 0.2154 for students enrolled in career-based intervention programs, which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (4) A multiple of 0.1830 for students enrolled in workforce development programs in education and training, marketing, workforce development academics, public administration, and career development, each of which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation; (5) A multiple of 0.1570 for students enrolled in family and consumer science programs, which shall be defined by the department in consultation with the governor's office of workforce transformation. (B) The multiple for career-technical education associated services, as defined by the department, shall be 0.0294. (C) The department shall calculate career-technical education funds for each funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district or the community and STEM school unit as follows: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the sum of the following: (a) The funding unit's category one career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(1) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (b) The funding unit's category two career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(2) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (c) The funding unit's category three career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(3) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (d) The funding unit's category four career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(4) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage; (e) The funding unit's category five career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A)(5) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the district's state share percentage. (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following: (a) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category one career-technical education ADM; (b) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category two career-technical education ADM; (c) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category three career-technical education ADM; (d) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category four career-technical education ADM; (e) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category five career-technical education ADM. (3) Payment of funds calculated under division (C) of this section is subject to approval under section 3317.161 of the Revised Code. (D) Subject to division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, the department shall calculate career-technical associated services funds for each funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district or the community and STEM school unit as follows: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the following product: (If the funding unit is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the funding unit's state share percentage) X the multiple for career-technical education associated services specified under division (B) of this section X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the sum of the funding unit's categories one through five career-technical education ADM (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's categories one through five career-technical education ADM. (E)(1) In accordance with division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, the department shall compute career awareness and exploration funds for each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code that is part of a career technical planning district. The department shall pay the lead district in each career technical planning district as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, an amount equal to the following product: The sum of enrolled ADM for all districts and schools within the career technical planning district X $7.50, for fiscal year 2024, or $10, for fiscal year 2025 $3 (b) For fiscal year 20262028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly, if the general assembly authorizes such a payment to city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, community schools, and STEM schools. (2) The lead district of a career technical planning district shall use career awareness and exploration funds in accordance with division (H) of this section. (F)(1) In any fiscal year, a school district receiving funds calculated under division (C) of this section shall spend those funds only for the purposes that the department designates as approved for career-technical education expenses. Career-technical education expenses approved by the department shall include only expenses connected to the delivery of career-technical programming to career-technical students. The department shall require the school district to report data annually so that the department may monitor the district's compliance with the requirements regarding the manner in which funding calculated under division (C) of this section may be spent. (2) All funds received under division (C) of this section shall be spent in the following manner: (a) At least seventy-five per cent of the funds shall be spent on curriculum development, purchase, and implementation; instructional resources and supplies; industry-based program certification; student assessment, credentialing, and placement; curriculum specific equipment purchases and leases; career-technical student organization fees and expenses; home and agency linkages; work-based learning experiences; professional development; and other costs directly associated with career-technical education programs including development of new programs. (b) Not more than twenty-five per cent of the funds shall be used for personnel expenditures. (G) In any fiscal year, a school district receiving funds calculated under division (D) of this section, or through a transfer of funds pursuant to division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, shall spend those funds only for the purposes that the department designates as approved for career-technical education associated services expenses, which may include such all of the following purposes as apprenticeship coordinators, coordinators for other career-technical education services, career-technical evaluation, and other purposes designated by the department.: (1) Engaging and collaborating with education and workforce stakeholders in the service area; (2) Developing and maintaining a comprehensive plan to increase career-focused education activities; (3) Ensuring that plans are informed by quality data and using data to expand access to career-focused activities for all students; (4) Planning and allocating resources for the growth, sustainability, and enhancement of career-focused activities in the long term; (5) Establishing continuous improvement and program approval processes. The department may deny payment of funds calculated under division (D) of this section to any district that the department determines is not operating those services or is using funds calculated under division (D) of this section, or through a transfer of funds pursuant to division (I) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, for other purposes. (H) In any fiscal year, a lead district of a career-technical planning district receiving funds under division (E) of this section, shall utilize those funds to deliver relevant career awareness and exploration programs to all students within its career technical planning district in a manner that is consistent with the career-technical planning district's plan that is on file with the department. The lead district that receives funds under this division shall spend those funds only for the following purposes: (1) Delivery of career awareness programs to students enrolled in grades kindergarten through twelve; (2) Provision of a common, consistent curriculum to students throughout their primary and secondary education; (3) Assistance to teachers in providing a career development curriculum to students; (4) Development of a career development plan for each student that stays with that student for the duration of the student's primary and secondary education; (5) Provision of opportunities for students to engage in activities, such as career fairs, hands-on experiences, and job shadowing, across all career pathways at each grade level; (6) Provision of mentorship opportunities through which students may learn about careers and workforce skills. The lead district that receives funds under division (E) of this section shall report on the use of those funds to the department in a manner prescribed by the department. The department may deny payment under this division to any district or school that the department determines is using funds paid under this division for other purposes. Sec. 3317.016. As used in this section, "English learner" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0731 of the Revised Code. The multiples for English learners shall be as follows: (A) A multiple of 0.2104 for each student who has been identified as an English learner following the state's standardized identification process enrolled in schools in the United States for 180 school days or less. (B) A multiple of 0.1577 for each student who, for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 2025 2027 has been identified as an English learner following the state's standardized identification process and enrolled in schools in the United States for more than 180 school days until the student achieves a proficient score on the spring administration of the state's English language proficiency assessments prescribed by division (C)(3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code or who, for fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, satisfies criteria specified by the general assembly for purposes of this division. (C) A multiple of 0.1053 for each student who, for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, achieves a score of proficient on the spring administration of the state's English language proficiency assessments prescribed by division (C)(3) of section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code for the two school years following the school year in which the student achieved that level of achievement or who, for fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, satisfies criteria specified by the general assembly for purposes of this division. Sec. 3317.017. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027. (A) The department of education and workforce shall compute a city, local, or exempted village school district's per-pupil local capacity amount for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the district's valuation per pupil for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the minimum of the district's three-year average valuation for the fiscal year for which the calculation is made and the district's taxable value for the most recent tax year for which data is available; (b) Divide the amount determined under division (A)(1)(a) of this section by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the calculation is made. (2) Calculate the district's local share federal adjusted gross income per pupil for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the minimum of the following: (i) The average of the total federal adjusted gross income of the district's residents for the three most recent tax years for which data is available, as certified under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code; (ii) The total federal adjusted gross income of the district's residents for the most recent tax year for which data is available, as certified under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (b) Divide the amount determined under division (A)(2)(a) of this section by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the calculation is made. (3) Calculate the district's adjusted local share federal adjusted gross income per pupil for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine both of the following: (i) The median federal adjusted gross income of the district's residents for the most recent tax year for which data is available, as certified under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code; (ii) The number of state tax returns filed by taxpayers residing in the district for the most recent tax year for which data is available, as certified under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (b) Compute the product of divisions (A)(3)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section; (c) Divide the amount determined under division (A)(3)(b) of this section by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for the fiscal year for which the calculation is made. (4) Calculate the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage as follows: (a) Determine the median of the median federal adjusted gross incomes determined for all districts statewide under division (A)(3)(a)(i) of this section for that fiscal year; (b) Divide the district's median federal adjusted gross income for that fiscal year determined under division (A)(3)(a)(i) of this section by the median federal adjusted gross income for all districts statewide determined under division (A)(4)(a) of this section; (c) Rank all school districts in order of the ratios calculated under division (A)(4)(b) of this section, from the district with the highest ratio calculated under division (A)(4)(b) of this section to the district with the lowest ratio calculated under division (A)(4)(b) of this section; (d) Determine the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage as follows: (i) If the ratio calculated for the district under division (A)(4)(b) of this section is greater than or equal to the ratio calculated under division (A)(4)(b) of this section for the district with the fortieth highest ratio as determined under division (A)(4)(c) of this section, the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage shall be equal to 0.025. (ii) If the ratio calculated for the district under division (A)(4)(b) of this section is less than the ratio calculated under division (A)(4)(b) of this section for the district with the fortieth highest ratio as determined under division (A)(4)(c) of this section but greater than 1.0, the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage shall be equal to an amount calculated as follows: {[(The ratio calculated for the district under division (A)(4)(b) of this section - 1) X 0.0025]/ (the ratio calculated under division (A)(4)(b) of this section for the district with the fortieth highest ratio as determined under division (A)(4)(c) of this section – 1)} + 0.0225 (iii) If the ratio calculated for the district under division (A)(4)(b) of this section is less than or equal to 1.0, the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage shall be equal to the amount calculated under division (A)(4)(b) of this section times 0.0225. (5) Calculate the district's per-pupil local capacity amount for that fiscal year as follows: (The district's valuation per pupil calculated under division (A)(1) of this section for that fiscal year X the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage calculated under division (A)(4) of this section X 0.60) + (the district's local share federal adjusted gross income per pupil calculated under division (A)(2) of this section for that fiscal year X the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage calculated under division (A)(4) of this section X 0.20 ) + (the district's adjusted local share federal adjusted gross income per pupil calculated under division (A)(3) of this section for that fiscal year X the district's per-pupil local capacity percentage calculated under division (A)(4) of this section X 0.20) (B) The department shall compute a city, local, or exempted village school district's state share for a fiscal year as follows: (1) If the district's per-pupil local capacity amount for that fiscal year divided by the district's base cost per pupil for that fiscal year is greater than 0.90, then the district's state share shall be equal to (the district's base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X 0.10 X the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year). (2) If the district's per-pupil local capacity amount for that fiscal year divided by the district's base cost per pupil for that fiscal year is less than or equal to 0.90, then the district's state share for that fiscal year shall be equal to [(the district's base cost per pupil for that fiscal year - the district's per-pupil local capacity amount for that fiscal year) X the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year]. (C) The department shall compute a city, local, or exempted village school district's state share percentage for a fiscal year as follows: (the district's base cost per pupil amount for that fiscal year - the district's per pupil local capacity amount for that fiscal year)/(the district's base cost per pupil amount for that fiscal year). If the result is less than 0.10, the state share percentage shall be 0.10. Sec. 3317.018. (A) The statewide average base cost per pupil shall be determined as follows: (1) For fiscal year 2024, the statewide average base cost per pupil shall be equal to the sum of the aggregate base cost calculated for all city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year under section 3317.011 of the Revised Code divided by the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year. (2) For fiscal year years 2025, 2026, and 2027, the statewide average base cost per pupil shall be equal to the amount calculated under division (A)(1) of this section. (B) The statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil shall be determined as follows: (1) For fiscal year 2024, the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil shall be equal to the sum of the aggregate base cost calculated for all joint vocational school districts in the state for that fiscal year under section 3317.012 of the Revised Code divided by the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the joint vocational school districts in the state for that fiscal year. (2) For fiscal year years 2025, 2026, and 2027, the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil shall be equal to the amount calculated under division (B)(1) of this section. Sec. 3317.019. (A)(1) Subject to division (C) of this section, for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department of education and workforce shall pay temporary transitional aid to each city, local, and exempted village school district according to the following formula: (The district's funding base, as that term is defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code) – (the district's payment under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code - the district's payment for supplemental targeted assistance under section 3317.0218 of the Revised Code for the fiscal year for which each payment is computed) If the computation made under division (A)(1) of this section results in a negative number, the district's funding under division (A)(1) of this section shall be zero. (2) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department shall pay temporary transitional transportation aid to that district according to the following formula: (The amount calculated for the district for fiscal year 2020 under division (A)(2) of Section 265.220 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, prior to any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, "Implementing Additional Spending Controls to Balance the State Budget" issued on May 7, 2020) – (the district's payment for fiscal year 2019 under division (D)(2) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021) - (the district's payment under section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code for the fiscal year for which the payment is computed) If the computation made under division (A)(2) of this section results in a negative number, the district's funding under division (A)(2) of this section shall be zero. (B) If a local school district participates in the establishment of a joint vocational school district that begins receiving payments under section 3317.16 of the Revised Code for fiscal year 2024 2026 or fiscal year 20252027, but does not receive payments for the fiscal year immediately preceding that fiscal year, the department shall adjust, as necessary, the district's funding base, as that term is defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, according to the amounts received by the district in the immediately preceding fiscal year for career-technical education students who attend the newly established joint vocational school district. (C)(1) For purposes of division (C) of this section, a district's "decrease threshold" for a fiscal year is the greater of the following: (a) Twenty; (b) Ten per cent of the number of the district's students counted under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code for the previous fiscal year. (2) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, if a district has fewer students counted under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year than for the previous fiscal year and the positive difference between those two student counts is greater than or equal to the district's decrease threshold for that fiscal year, the amount paid to the district under division (A) of this section shall be reduced by the following amount: The statewide average base cost per pupil X [(the positive difference between the number of the district's students counted under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year and the number of the district's students counted under that division for the previous fiscal year) - the district's decrease threshold for that fiscal year] At no time, however, shall the amount paid to a district under division (A) of this section be less than zero. Sec. 3317.0110. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Average teacher cost" for a fiscal year has the same meaning as in section 3317.011 of the Revised Code. (2) "Eligible community or STEM school" means a community or STEM school that satisfies one of the following: (a) The school is a member of an organization that regulates interscholastic athletics. (b) The school has teams in at least three different sports that participate in an interscholastic league. (B) When calculating a community or STEM school's aggregate base cost under this section, the department of education and workforce shall use data from fiscal year 2022 for the average teacher cost. (C) A community or STEM school's aggregate base cost for a fiscal year shall be equal to the following sum: (The school's teacher base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (D) of this section) + (the school's student support base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (E) of this section) + (the school's leadership and accountability base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (F) of this section) + (the school's building leadership and operations base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (G) of this section) + (the school's athletic co-curricular activities base cost for that fiscal year computed under division (H) of this section, if the school is an eligible community or STEM school) (D) The department of education shall compute a community or STEM school's teacher base cost for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate the school's classroom teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in kindergarten and divide that number by 20; (b) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades one through three and divide that number by 23; (c) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades four through eight but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 25; (d) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in grades nine through twelve but are not enrolled in a career-technical education program or class described under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and divide that number by 27; (e) Determine the full-time equivalency of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year that are enrolled in a career-technical education program or class, as reported under division (B)(4) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code, and divide that number by 18; (f) Compute the sum of the quotients obtained under divisions (D)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section; (g) Compute the classroom teacher cost by multiplying the average teacher cost for that fiscal year by the sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section. (2) Calculate the school's special teacher cost for that fiscal year as follows: (a) Divide the number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year by 150; (b) Compute the special teacher cost by multiplying the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section by the average teacher cost for that fiscal year. (3) Calculate the school's substitute teacher cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (a) Compute the substitute teacher daily rate with benefits by multiplying the substitute teacher daily rate of $90 by 1.16; (b) Compute the substitute teacher cost in accordance with the following formula: (The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section) X the amount computed under division (D)(3)(a) of this section X 5 (4) Calculate the school's professional development cost for that fiscal year in accordance with the following formula: (The sum computed under division (D)(1)(f) of this section + the quotient obtained under division (D)(2)(a) of this section) X [(the sum of divisions (A)(10)(a) and (b) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year)/180] X 4 (5) Calculate the school's teacher base cost for that fiscal year, which equals the sum of divisions (D)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section. (E) The department shall compute a community or STEM school's student support base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X [(the sum of the student support base cost calculated for all city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year under division (E) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) / the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year] (F) The department shall compute a community or STEM school's leadership and accountability base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X (the sum of the leadership and accountability base cost calculated for all city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year under division (F) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code / the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year) (G) The department shall compute a community or STEM school's building leadership and operations base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X (the sum of the building leadership and accountability base cost calculated for all city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year under division (G) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code / the sum of the base cost enrolled ADMs of all of the city, local, and exempted village school districts in the state for that fiscal year) (H) If a community or STEM school is an eligible community or STEM school, the department shall compute the school's athletic co-curricular activities base cost for a fiscal year as follows: The number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year X (the amount determined under division (H)(1) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code / the sum determined under division (H)(2) of section 3317.011 of the Revised Code) Sec. 3317.02. As used in this chapter: (A) "Alternative school" has the same meaning as in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code. (B) "Autism scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom autism scholarships are awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code. (C) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a district's "base cost enrolled ADM" for a fiscal year means the greater of the following: (1) The district's enrolled ADM for the previous fiscal year; (2) The average of the district's enrolled ADM for the previous three fiscal years. (D)(1) "Base cost per pupil" means the following for a city, local, or exempted village school district: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the aggregate base cost calculated for that district for that fiscal year under section 3317.011 of the Revised Code divided by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year; (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "Base cost per pupil" means the following for a joint vocational school district: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the aggregate base cost calculated for that district for that fiscal year under section 3317.012 of the Revised Code divided by the district's base cost enrolled ADM for that fiscal year; (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (E)(1) "Category one career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(11) or (D)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(12) or (D)(2)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(13) or (D)(2)(j) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (4) "Category four career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(14) or (D)(2)(k) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (5) "Category five career-technical education ADM" means the enrollment of students during the school year on a full-time equivalency basis in career-technical education programs described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(15) or (D)(2)(l) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) "Category one English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(16) or (D)(2)(m) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(17) or (D)(2)(n) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three English learner ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(18) or (D)(2)(o) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(6) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (E) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) "Category one special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of children with disabilities receiving special education services for the disability specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(5) or (D)(2)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "Category two special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of children with disabilities receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(6) or (D)(2)(c) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (3) "Category three special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(7) or (D)(2)(d) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (4) "Category four special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for those disabilities specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(8) or (D)(2)(e) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (5) "Category five special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for the disabilities specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, certified under division (B)(9) or (D)(2)(f) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (6) "Category six special education ADM" means the full-time equivalent number of students receiving special education services for the disabilities specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code and, in the case of a funding unit that is a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district certified under division (B)(10) or (D)(2)(g) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the community and STEM school unit, reported by all community and STEM schools statewide under division (B)(3) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (C) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. (H) "Community and STEM school unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students enrolled in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (I)(1) "Economically disadvantaged index for a school district" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the square of the quotient of that district's percentage of students in its enrolled ADM who are identified as economically disadvantaged as defined by the department of education and workforce, divided by the percentage of students in the statewide ADM identified as economically disadvantaged. For purposes of this calculation: (i) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the "statewide ADM" equals the sum of the following: (I) The enrolled ADM for all city, local, and exempted village school districts combined; (II) The statewide enrollment of students in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (III) The statewide enrollment of students in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (ii) For a joint vocational school district, the "statewide ADM" equals the sum of the enrolled ADM for all joint vocational school districts combined. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an index calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "Economically disadvantaged index for a community or STEM school" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the square of the quotient of the percentage of students enrolled in the school who are identified as economically disadvantaged as defined by the department, divided by the percentage of students in the statewide ADM identified as economically disadvantaged. For purposes of this calculation, the "statewide ADM" equals the "statewide ADM" for city, local, and exempted village school districts described in division (I)(1)(a)(i) of this section. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an index calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (J) "Educational choice scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom educational choice scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.03 and 3310.032 of the Revised Code. (K) "Enrolled ADM" means the following: (1) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department, as follows: (a) Add the students described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Subtract the students counted under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (c) Count only twenty per cent of the number of joint vocational school district students counted under division (A)(3) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (d) Add twenty per cent of the number of students who are entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code and are enrolled in another school district under a career-technical education compact; (e) Add twenty per cent of the number of students described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code who enroll in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact. (2) For a joint vocational school district, the final number verified by the department, based on the enrollment reported and certified under division (D) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as adjusted, if so ordered, under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department by adding the students described in division (D)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (3) For the community and STEM school unit, the sum of the number of students reported as enrolled in community schools under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and the number of students reported as enrolled in STEM schools under division (A) of section 3326.32 of the Revised Code; (4) For the educational choice scholarship unit, the number of students for whom educational choice scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.03 and 3310.032 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(g) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (5) For the pilot project scholarship unit, the number of students for whom pilot project scholarships are awarded under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (6) For the autism scholarship unit, the number of students for whom autism scholarships are awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (7) For the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit, the number of students for whom Jon Peterson special needs scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(h) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (8) For the nonchartered educational savings account unit, the number of students for whom educational savings accounts are established under sections 3310.21 to 3310.26 of the Revised Code as reported under division (A)(2)(k) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (L)(1) "Formula ADM" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section, and as further adjusted by the department, as follows: (a) Count only twenty per cent of the number of joint vocational school district students counted under division (A)(3) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code; (b) Add twenty per cent of the number of students who are entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code and are enrolled in another school district under a career-technical education compact. (2) "Formula ADM" means, for a joint vocational school district, the final number verified by the department, based on the enrollment reported and certified under division (D) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, as adjusted, if so ordered, under division (K) of that section. (M) "FTE basis" means a count of students based on full-time equivalency, in accordance with rules adopted by the department pursuant to section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. In adopting its rules under this division, the department shall provide for counting any student in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM or in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion the student is counted in enrolled ADM and formula ADM. (N) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "funding base" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the sum of the following as calculated by the department: (1) The district's "general funding base," which equals the amount calculated as follows: (a) Compute the sum of the following: (i) The amount calculated for the district for fiscal year 2020 under division (A)(1) of Section 265.220 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and prior to any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, "Implementing Additional Spending Controls to Balance the State Budget" issued on May 7, 2020; (ii) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (C)(1), (3), and (4) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (b) Subtract from the amount calculated in division (N)(1)(a) of this section the sum of the following: (i) The following difference: (The amount paid to the district under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019) - (the amounts deducted from the district and paid to a community school under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school under division (E) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2020 in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly) (ii) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a community school for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (C)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (iii) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (A), (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), and (G) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (iv) The payments deducted from the district under division (C) of section 3310.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, division (C)(2) of section 3310.41 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, and former section 3310.55 of the Revised Code for fiscal year 2020 and, in the case of a pilot project school district as defined in section 3313.975 of the Revised Code, the funds deducted from the district under Section 265.210 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly to operate the pilot project scholarship program for fiscal year 2020 under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (v) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the payments subtracted from the district for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (B)(1) and (3) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (2) The district's "disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base," which equals the following difference: (The amount paid to the district under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019) - (the amounts deducted from the district and paid to a community school under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code or a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school under division (E) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2020 in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly) (O) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "funding base" means, for a joint vocational school district, the sum of the following as calculated by the department: (1) The district's "general funding base," which equals the amount calculated as follows: (a) Compute the sum of the following: (i) The district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under Section 265.225 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (ii) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the district's payments for fiscal year 2020 under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed prior to September 30, 2021. (b) Subtract from the amount paid to the district under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019. (2) The district's "disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base," which equals the amount paid to the district under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, for fiscal year 2019. (P) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "funding base" for a community school means the following: (1) For a community school that was in operation for the entirety of fiscal year 2020, the amount paid to the school for that fiscal year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and the amount, if any, paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (2) For a community school that was in operation for part of fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department; (3) For a community school that was not in operation for fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school if it was in operation for that school year under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department. (Q) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "funding base" for a STEM school means the following: (1) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was in operation for the entirety of fiscal year 2020, the amount paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly and the amount, if any, paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly; (2) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was in operation for part of fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department; (3) For a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school that was not in operation for fiscal year 2020, the amount that would have been paid to the school if it was in operation for that school year under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to September 30, 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department, and the amount that would have been paid to the school for that fiscal year under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code in accordance with division (B) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly, if any, if the school had been in operation for the entirety of that fiscal year, as calculated by the department. (R) "Funding unit" means any of the following: (1) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; (2) The community and STEM school unit; (3) The educational choice scholarship unit; (4) The pilot project scholarship unit; (5) The autism scholarship unit; (6) The Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit; (7) The nonchartered educational savings account unit. (S) "Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom Jon Peterson scholarships are awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. (T) "Internet- or computer-based community school" has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (U) "LRE student with a disability" means a child with a disability who has an individualized education program providing for the student to spend more than half of each school day in a regular school setting with nondisabled students. For purposes of this division, "individualized education program" and "child with a disability" have the same meanings as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, and "LRE" is an abbreviation for "least restrictive environment." (V) "Medically fragile child" means a child to whom all of the following apply: (1) The child requires the services of a doctor of medicine or osteopathic medicine at least once a week due to the instability of the child's medical condition. (2) The child requires the services of a registered nurse on a daily basis. (3) The child is at risk of institutionalization in a hospital, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities. (W)(1) A child may be identified as having an "other health impairment-major" if the child's condition meets the definition of "other health impaired" established in rules previously adopted by the department and if either of the following apply: (a) The child is identified as having a medical condition that is among those listed by the department as conditions where a substantial majority of cases fall within the definition of "medically fragile child." (b) The child is determined by the department to be a medically fragile child. A school district superintendent may petition the department for a determination that a child is a medically fragile child. (2) A child may be identified as having an "other health impairment-minor" if the child's condition meets the definition of "other health impaired" established in rules previously adopted by the department but the child's condition does not meet either of the conditions specified in division (W)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (X)(1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district's, community school's, or STEM school's "general phase-in percentage" is equal to the percentage for that fiscal year that is determined by the general assembly. (2) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district's "phase-in percentage for disadvantaged pupil impact aid" is equal to the percentage for that fiscal year that is determined by the general assembly. (Y) "Pilot project scholarship unit" means a unit that consists of all of the students for whom pilot project scholarships are awarded under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code. (Z) "Preschool child with a disability" means a child with a disability, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, who is at least age three but is not of compulsory school age, as defined in section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, and who is not currently enrolled in kindergarten. (AA) "Related services" includes: (1) Child study, special education supervisors and coordinators, speech and hearing services, adaptive physical development services, occupational or physical therapy, teacher assistants for children with disabilities whose disabilities are described in division (B) of section 3317.013 or division (G)(3) of this section, behavioral intervention, interpreter services, work study, nursing services, and specialized integrative services as those terms are defined by the department; (2) Speech and language services provided to any student with a disability, including any student whose primary or only disability is a speech and language disability; (3) Any related service not specifically covered by other state funds but specified in federal law, including but not limited to, audiology and school psychological services; (4) Any service included in units funded under former division (O)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code; (5) Any other related service needed by children with disabilities in accordance with their individualized education programs. (BB) "School district," unless otherwise specified, means city, local, and exempted village school districts. (CC) "Separately educated student with a disability" has the same meaning as in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code. (DD) "State education aid" has the same meaning as in section 5751.20 of the Revised Code. (EE)(1) "State share percentage" means the following for a city, local, or exempted village school district: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the state share percentage calculated under section 3317.017 of the Revised Code; (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, a percentage calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) "State share percentage" means the following , for a joint vocational school district: (a) For fiscal years 2024 and 2025, the percentage calculated in accordance with the following formula: The amount computed for the district under division (A)(1) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code for that fiscal year / the aggregate base cost calculated for the district for that fiscal year under section 3317.012 of the Revised Code (b) For fiscal year 2026 and each fiscal year thereafter, a percentage calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly, the district's state share percentage calculated under section 3317.165 of the Revised Code. (FF) "Statewide average base cost per pupil" means the following: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the statewide average base cost per pupil calculated under division (A) of section 3317.018 of the Revised Code; (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (GG) "Statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil" means the following: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil calculated under division (B) of section 3317.018 of the Revised Code; (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (HH) "STEM school" means a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (II) "Taxes charged and payable" means the taxes charged and payable against real and public utility property after making the reduction required by section 319.301 of the Revised Code, plus the taxes levied against tangible personal property. (JJ) For purposes of sections 3317.017 and 3317.16 3317.165 of the Revised Code, "three-year average valuation" for a fiscal year means the average of total taxable value for the three most recent tax years for which data is available, as certified under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Total ADM" means, for a city, local, or exempted village school district, the enrollment reported under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code minus the enrollment reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (g), (h), and (i), and (k) of that section, as verified by the department and adjusted if so ordered under division (K) of that section. (LL) "Total special education ADM" means the sum of categories one through six special education ADM. (MM) "Total taxable value" means the sum of the amounts certified for a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district under divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Tuition discount" means any deduction from the base tuition amount per student charged by a chartered nonpublic school, to which the student's family is entitled due to one or more of the following conditions: (1) The student's family has multiple children enrolled in the same school. (2) The student's family is a member of or affiliated with a religious or secular organization that provides oversight of the school or from which the school has agreed to enroll students. (3) The student's parent is an employee of the school. (4) Some other qualification not based on the income of the student's family or the student's athletic or academic ability and for which all students in the school may qualify. (OO) "Nonchartered educational savings account unit" means a unit that consists of all the students for whom educational savings accounts are established under sections 3310.21 to 3310.26 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.021. (A) On or before the first day of June of each year, the tax commissioner shall certify to the department of education and workforce and the office of budget and management the information described in divisions (A)(1) to (5) of this section for each city, exempted village, and local school district, and the information required by divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section for each joint vocational school district, and it shall be used, along with the information certified under division (B) of this section, in making the computations for the district under this chapter. (1) The taxable value of real and public utility real property in the school district subject to taxation in the preceding tax year, by class and by county of location. (2) The taxable value of tangible personal property, including public utility personal property, subject to taxation by the district for the preceding tax year. (3)(a) The total property tax rate and total taxes charged and payable for the current expenses for the preceding tax year and the total property tax rate and the total taxes charged and payable to a joint vocational district for the preceding tax year that are limited to or to the extent apportioned to current expenses. (b) The portion of the amount of taxes charged and payable reported for each city, local, and exempted village school district under division (A)(3)(a) of this section attributable to a joint vocational school district. (4) The value of all real and public utility real property in the school district exempted from taxation minus both of the following: (a) The value of real and public utility real property in the district owned by the United States government and used exclusively for a public purpose; (b) The value of real and public utility real property in the district exempted from taxation under Chapter 725. or 1728. or section 3735.67, 5709.40, 5709.41, 5709.45, 5709.57, 5709.62, 5709.63, 5709.632, 5709.73, or 5709.78 of the Revised Code. (5) The total median federal adjusted gross income of the residents of the school district, based on tax returns filed by the residents of the district, for the most recent year for which this information is available, and the median Ohio adjusted gross income of the residents of the school district determined on the basis of tax returns filed for the second preceding tax year by the residents of the district. (6) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the number of state tax returns filed by the residents of the district for the most recent year for which this information is available. (B) On or before the first day of May each year, the tax commissioner shall certify to the department of education and workforce and the office of budget and management the total taxable real property value of railroads and, separately, the total taxable tangible personal property value of all public utilities for the preceding tax year, by school district and by county of location. (C) If on the basis of the information certified under division (A) of this section, the department determines that any district fails in any year to meet the qualification requirement specified in division (A) of section 3317.01 of the Revised Code, the department shall immediately request the tax commissioner to determine the extent to which any school district income tax levied by the district under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code shall be included in meeting that requirement. Within five days of receiving such a request from the department, the tax commissioner shall make the determination required by this division and report the quotient obtained under division (C)(3) of this section to the department and the office of budget and management. This quotient represents the number of mills that the department shall include in determining whether the district meets the qualification requirement of division (A) of section 3317.01 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner shall make the determination required by this division as follows: (1) Multiply one mill times the total taxable value of the district as determined in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section; (2) Estimate the total amount of tax liability for the current tax year under taxes levied by Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code that are apportioned to current operating expenses of the district, excluding any income tax receipts allocated for the project cost, debt service, or maintenance set-aside associated with a state-assisted classroom facilities project as authorized by section 3318.052 of the Revised Code; (3) Divide the amount estimated under division (C)(2) of this section by the product obtained under division (C)(1) of this section. Sec. 3317.022. The department of education and workforce shall compute and distribute state core foundation funding to each eligible funding unit that is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the community and STEM school unit, the educational choice scholarship unit, the pilot project scholarship unit, the autism scholarship unit, and the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit, and the nonchartered educational savings account unit for the fiscal year, using the information obtained under section 3317.021 of the Revised Code in the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins in accordance with the following: For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, for a funding unit that is a city, local, or exempted village school district: The district's funding base + [(the district's state core foundation funding components for that fiscal year calculated under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this section - the district's general funding base calculated in accordance with division (N)(1) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code) X the district's general phase-in percentage for that fiscal year] + [(the district's disadvantaged pupil impact aid for that fiscal year calculated under division (A)(4) of this section – the district's disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base calculated in accordance with division (N)(2) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code) X the district's phase-in percentage for disadvantaged pupil impact aid for that fiscal year] + the district's supplemental targeted assistance funds calculated under section 3317.0218 of the Revised Code For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, for a funding unit that is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the sum of the district's state core foundation funding components for that fiscal year calculated under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (8) of this section and the district's supplemental targeted assistance funds calculated under section 3317.0218 of the Revised Code, if the general assembly authorizes such payments to these funding units. For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, for the community and STEM school unit, an amount calculated in accordance with section 3317.026 of the Revised Code. For fiscal years 2026 year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, for the community and STEM school unit, an amount calculated in accordance with divisions (A)(1), (3), (4), (5), (7), (8), and (9), and (14) of this section, if the general assembly authorizes such payments to these funding units. For the educational choice scholarship unit, the amount calculated under division (A)(10) of this section. For the pilot project scholarship unit, the amount calculated under division (A)(11) of this section. For the autism scholarship unit, the amount calculated under division (A)(12) of this section. For the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit, the amount calculated under division (A)(13) of this section. For fiscal year 2027 and each fiscal year thereafter, for the nonchartered educational savings account unit, the amount calculated under division (A)(15) of this section. (A) A funding unit's state core foundation funding components shall be the following: (1)(a) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share, which is equal to the following: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the amount calculated under division (B) of section 3317.017 of the Revised Code; (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (b) If the funding unit is the community and STEM school unit, the aggregate base cost for all schools in that unit, which is equal to the following: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the amount calculated under section 3317.0110 of the Revised Code; (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, targeted assistance funds equal to the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, an amount calculated under section 3317.0217 of the Revised Code; (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (3) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district or the community and STEM school unit, additional state aid for special education and related services provided under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code calculated as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the sum of the following: (i) The funding unit's category one special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage; (ii) The funding unit's category two special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage; (iii) The funding unit's category three special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage; (iv) The funding unit's category four special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage; (v) The funding unit's category five special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage; (vi) The funding unit's category six special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following: (i) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category one special education ADM; (ii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category two special education ADM; (iii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category three special education ADM; (iv) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category four special education ADM; (v) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category five special education ADM; (vi) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category six special education ADM. (4) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district or the community and STEM school unit, disadvantaged pupil impact aid calculated according to the following formula: (a) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, an amount equal to the following: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the following product: $422 X (the district's economically disadvantaged index) X the number of students who are economically disadvantaged as certified under division (B)(21) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (b) If the funding unit is the community and STEM school unit, an amount equal to the following: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, an amount calculated as follows: (I) For each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM who is economically disadvantaged and is not enrolled in an internet- or computer-based community school, multiply $422 by the economically disadvantaged index of the school in which the student is enrolled; (II) Compute the funding unit's disadvantaged pupil impact aid by calculating the sum of the amounts determined under division (A)(4)(b)(i)(I) of this section. (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated as follows: (I) For each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM who is economically disadvantaged and is not enrolled in an internet- or computer-based community school, calculate an amount in the manner determined by the general assembly; (II) Compute the funding unit's disadvantaged pupil impact aid by calculating the sum of the amounts determined under division (A)(4)(b)(ii)(I) of this section. (5) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district or the community and STEM school unit, English learner funds calculated as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the sum of the following: (i) The funding unit's category one English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage; (ii) The funding unit's category two English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage; (iii) The funding unit's category three English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, the district's state share percentage. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following: (i) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category one English learner ADM; (ii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category two English learner ADM; (iii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category three English learner ADM. (6)(a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, if the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district, all of the following: (i) Gifted identification funds calculated according to the following formula: $24 X the district's enrolled ADM for grades kindergarten through six X the district's state share percentage (ii) Gifted referral funds calculated according to the following formula: $2.50 X the district's enrolled ADM X the district's state share percentage (iii) Gifted professional development funds calculated according to the following formula: (The greater of the number of gifted students enrolled in the district as certified under division (B)(22) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code and ten per cent of the district's enrolled ADM) X the district's state share percentage X $21, for fiscal year 2024, or $28, for fiscal year 2025 (iv) Gifted unit funding calculated under section 3317.051 of the Revised Code. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, all of the following: (i) Gifted identification funds calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly; (ii) Gifted referral funds calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly, if the general assembly authorizes such a payment; (iii) Gifted professional development funds calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly, if the general assembly authorizes such a payment; (iv) Gifted unit funding calculated in an amount determined by the general assembly. (7) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district or the community and STEM school unit, career-technical education funds calculated under division (C) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (8) If the funding unit is a city, local, or exempted village school district or the community and STEM school unit, career-technical education associated services funds calculated under division (D) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (9) If the funding unit is the community and STEM school unit, an amount calculated as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, an amount equal to the following: [The number of students in the funding unit's enrolled ADM who are reported under division (B)(5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code X (the aggregate base cost calculated for all schools in the funding unit for that fiscal year under section 3317.0110 of the Revised Code / the funding unit's enrolled ADM) X.20] (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (10) If the funding unit is the educational choice scholarship unit, an amount calculated as follows: (a) For each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM, determine the lesser of the following: (i) The base tuition of the chartered nonpublic school in which the student is enrolled minus the total amount of any applicable tuition discounts for which the student qualifies; (ii)(I) If the student receives a scholarship under section 3310.03 of the Revised Code, or received a scholarship for the first time under section 3310.032 of the Revised Code prior to the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, and the student's parent does not elect to receive a scholarship amount under division (A)(10)(a)(ii)(II) of this section, $5,500, if the student is in grades kindergarten through eight, or $7,500, if the student is in grades nine through twelve. (II) If the student receives a scholarship for the first time under section 3310.032 of the Revised Code on and after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, or if a student who received a scholarship for the first time under that section prior to that date and the student's parent elects to receive a scholarship amount under division (A)(10)(a)(ii)(II) of this section, an amount calculated in accordance with section 3310.08 of the Revised Code. The department shall provide an opportunity each fiscal year for a parent to elect to receive a scholarship amount under division (A)(10)(a)(ii)(II) of this section. The amounts specified in division (A)(10)(a)(ii)(I) of this section shall increase in future fiscal years by the same percentage that the statewide average base cost per pupil increases in future fiscal years. (b) Compute the sum of the amounts calculated under division (A)(10)(a) of this section. (11) If the funding unit is the pilot project scholarship unit, an amount calculated as follows: (a) For each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM, determine the lesser of the following: (i) The net tuition charges of the student's alternative school; (ii) $5,500, if the student is in grades kindergarten through eight, or $7,500, if the student is in grades nine through twelve. The amounts specified in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of this section shall increase in future fiscal years by the same percentage that the statewide average base cost per pupil increases in future fiscal years. For purposes of division (A)(11)(a) of this section, the net tuition and fees charged to a student shall be the tuition amount specified by the alternative school minus all other financial aid, discounts, and adjustments received for the student. In cases where discounts are offered for multiple students from the same family, and not all students in the same family are scholarship recipients, the net tuition amount attributable to the scholarship recipient shall be the lowest net tuition to which the family is entitled. The department shall provide for an increase in the amount determined for any student who is an LRE student with a disability and shall further increase such amount in the case of any separately educated student with a disability, as that term is defined in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code. Such increases shall take into account the instruction, related services, and transportation costs of educating such students. (b) Compute the sum of the amounts calculated under division (A)(17)(a) of this section. (12) If the funding unit is the autism scholarship unit, an amount calculated as follows: (a) For each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM, determine the lesser of the following: (i) The tuition charged for the student's special education program, as that term is defined in section 3310.41 of the Revised Code; (ii) $32,445$34,000. (b) Compute the sum of the amounts calculated under division (A)(12)(a) of this section. (13) If the funding unit is the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit, an amount calculated as follows: (a) For each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM, determine the least of the following: (i) The amount of fees charged for that school year by the student's alternative public provider or registered private provider, as those terms are defined in section 3310.51 of the Revised Code; (ii) $7,190 plus an amount determined as follows: (I) If the student is receiving special education services for a disability specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, $1,751, for fiscal year 2024, and $2,395 for fiscal year 2025$2,855; (II) If the student is receiving special education services for a disability specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, $4,442, for fiscal year 2024, and $5,280 for fiscal year 2025$5,879; (III) If the student is receiving special education services for a disability specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, $10,673, for fiscal year 2024, and $11,960 for fiscal year 2025$12,879; (IV) If the student is receiving special education services for a disability specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, $14,243, for fiscal year 2024, and $15,787 for fiscal year 2025$16,890; (V) If the student is receiving special education services for a disability specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, $19,290, for fiscal year 2024, and $21,197 for fiscal year 2025$22,560; (VI) If the student is receiving special education services for a disability specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, $28,438, for fiscal year 2024, and $30,469 for fiscal year 2025$31,932. (iii) $30,000, for fiscal year 2024, and $32,445 for fiscal year 2025$34,000. The amount specified in division (A)(13)(a)(ii) of this section shall increase in future fiscal years by the same percentage that the statewide average base cost per pupil increases in future fiscal years. The amounts specified in divisions (A)(13)(a)(ii)(I) to (VI) of this section shall increase in future fiscal years by the same percentage that the amounts calculated by the general assembly for those categories of special education services under division (A)(3) of this section increase in future fiscal years. (b) Compute the sum of the amounts calculated under division (A)(13)(a) of this section. (14) If the funding unit is the community and STEM school unit, an equity supplement calculated as follows: $500 in fiscal year 2026 and $400 in fiscal year 2027 X each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM who is enrolled in a community school that is not an internet- or computer-based community school. (15) If the funding unit is the nonchartered educational savings account unit, an amount calculated as follows: (a) For each student in the funding unit's enrolled ADM, an amount calculated under section 3310.26 of the Revised Code; (b) Compute the sum of the amounts calculated under division (A)(15)(a) of this section. (B) In any fiscal year, a funding unit that is a city, local, or exempted village school district shall spend for purposes that the department designates as approved for special education and related services expenses at least the amount calculated as follows: (The base cost per pupil calculated for the district for that fiscal year X the total special education ADM) + (the district's category one special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil) + (the district's category two special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil) + (the district's category three special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil) + (the district's category four special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil) + (the district's category five special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil) + (the district's category six special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil) The purposes approved by the department for special education expenses shall include, but shall not be limited to, identification of children with disabilities, compliance with state rules governing the education of children with disabilities and prescribing the continuum of program options for children with disabilities, provision of speech language pathology services, and the portion of the school district's overall administrative and overhead costs that are attributable to the district's special education student population. (C) A funding unit that is a city, local, or exempted village school district shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(4) of this section in accordance with section 3317.25 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (B) of section 3317.026 of the Revised Code, the department shall distribute to each community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and to each STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, from the funds paid to the community and STEM school unit under this section, an amount for each student enrolled in the school equal to the sum of the following: (a) The school's base cost per pupil for that fiscal year, calculated as follows: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027: The aggregate base cost calculated for the school for that fiscal year under section 3317.0110 of the Revised Code / the number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount determined by the general assembly under division (A)(1)(b)(ii) of this section divided by the number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year. (b) If the student is a special education student: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the multiple specified for the student's special education category under section 3317.013 of the Revised Code times the statewide average base cost per pupil; (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount calculated for the student's special education category in a manner determined by the general assembly under division (A)(3)(b) of this section. (c) If the school is not an internet- or computer-based community school and the student is economically disadvantaged: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the amount calculated for the student under division (A)(4)(b)(i)(I) of this section; (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated for the student in the manner determined by the general assembly under division (A)(4)(b)(ii)(I) of this section. (d) If the student is an English learner: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the multiple specified for the student's English learner category under section 3317.016 of the Revised Code times the statewide average base cost per pupil; (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount calculated for the student's special education category in a manner determined by the general assembly under division (A)(5)(b) of this section. (e) If the student is a career-technical education student: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the multiple specified for the student's career-technical education category under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code times the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil; (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount calculated for the student's career-technical education category in a manner determined by the general assembly under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (f) If the student is a career-technical education student: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the multiple for career-technical associated services specified under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code times the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil; (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount calculated for career-technical associated services in a manner determined by the general assembly under section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (g) If the school is a community school that is not an internet- or computer-based community school, an equity supplement equal to $500 for fiscal year 2026 and $400 for fiscal year 2027 for each student enrolled in the school. (2) The department shall distribute to each community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and to each STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, from the funds paid to the community and STEM school unit under this section, an amount equal to the amount calculated for the school under division (A)(9) of this section. (E) The department shall distribute to the parent of each student for whom an educational choice scholarship is awarded under section 3310.03 or 3310.032 of the Revised Code, or to the student if at least eighteen years of age, from the funds paid to the educational choice scholarship unit under this section, a scholarship equal to the amount calculated for the student under division (A)(10)(a) of this section. The scholarship shall be distributed in monthly partial payments, and the department shall proportionately reduce or terminate the payments for any student who withdraws from a chartered nonpublic school prior to the end of the school year. For purposes of divisions (E) and (F) of this section, in the case of a student who is not living with the student's parent, the department shall distribute the scholarship payments to the student's guardian, legal custodian, kinship caregiver, foster caregiver, or caretaker. For the purposes of this division, "caretaker" has the same meaning as in section 3310.033 of the Revised Code, "kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code, and "foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (F) If a student is awarded a pilot project scholarship under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code, the department shall distribute to the parent of the student, if the student is attending a registered private school as defined in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code, or the student's school district of attendance, if the scholarship is to be used for payments to a public school in a school district adjacent to the pilot project school district pursuant to section 3327.06 of the Revised Code, a scholarship from the funds paid to the pilot project scholarship unit under this section that is equal to the amount calculated for the student under division (A)(11)(a) of this section. In the case of a scholarship distributed to a student's parent, the scholarship shall be distributed in monthly partial payments. The scholarship amount shall be proportionately reduced in the case of any such student who is not enrolled in a registered private school, as that term is defined in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code, for the entire school year. In the case of a scholarship distributed to a student's school district of attendance, the department shall, on behalf of the student's parents, use the scholarship to make the tuition payments required by section 3327.06 of the Revised Code to the student's school district of attendance, except that, notwithstanding sections 3323.13, 3323.14, and 3327.06 of the Revised Code, the total payments in any school year shall not exceed the scholarship amount calculated for the student under division (A)(11)(a) of this section. (G) The department shall distribute to the parent of each student for whom an autism scholarship is awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, from the funds paid to the autism scholarship unit under this section, a scholarship equal to the amount calculated for the student under division (A)(12)(a) of this section. The scholarship shall be distributed from time to time in partial payments. The scholarship amount shall be proportionately reduced in the case of any student who is not enrolled in the special education program for which a scholarship was awarded under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code for the entire school year. The department shall make no payments to the parent of a student while any administrative or judicial mediation or proceedings with respect to the content of the student's individualized education program are pending. (H) The department shall distribute to the parent of each student for whom a Jon Peterson special needs scholarship is awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code, from the funds paid to the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship unit under this section, a scholarship equal to the amount calculated for the student under division (A)(13)(a) of this section. The scholarship shall be distributed in periodic payments, and the department shall proportionately reduce or terminate the payments for any student who is not enrolled in the special education program of an alternative public provider or a registered private provider, as those terms are defined in section 3310.51 of the Revised Code, for the entire school year. (I) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a school district shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(5) of this section only for services for English learners. (J) For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, a school district shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(6) of this section only for the identification of gifted students, gifted coordinator services, and gifted intervention specialist services, and gifted professional development. For fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, if the department determines that a district is not in compliance with this division, it shall reduce the district's payments for that fiscal year under this chapter by an amount equal to the amount paid to the district for that fiscal year under division (A)(6) of this section that was not spent in accordance with this division. The department shall reduce the payment within ninety days of data finalization. (K) The department shall transfer to each educational savings account established for a student by the treasurer of state under sections 3310.21 to 3310.26 of the Revised Code, from the funds paid to the nonchartered educational savings account unit under this section, an amount of funds equal to the amount calculated for the student under division (A)(15)(a) of this section. The department shall distribute those funds in one annual payment. To the extent practicable, the department shall make that payment for which an account is established prior to the school year for which it is sought before the first day of that school year. Sec. 3317.024. The following shall be distributed monthly, quarterly, or annually as may be determined by the department of education and workforce: (A) An amount for each island school district and each joint state school district for the operation of each high school and each elementary school maintained within such district and for capital improvements for such schools. Such amounts shall be determined on the basis of standards adopted by the department. However, for fiscal years 2012 and 2013, an island district shall receive the lesser of its actual cost of operation, as certified to the department, or ninety-three per cent of the amount the district received in state operating funding for fiscal year 2011. If an island district received no funding for fiscal year 2011, it shall receive no funding for either of fiscal year 2012 or 2013. (B) An amount for each school district required to pay tuition for a child in an institution maintained by the department of youth services pursuant to section 3317.082 of the Revised Code, provided the child was not included in the calculation of the district's formula ADM, as that term is defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, for the preceding school year. (C)(1) An amount for the approved cost of transporting eligible pupils with disabilities attending a special education program approved by the department of education and workforce whom it is impossible or impractical to transport by regular school bus in the course of regular route transportation provided by the school district or educational service center. For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, this amount shall be equal to the actual costs incurred in the prior fiscal year by the district or service center when transporting those students, as reported to the department, multiplied by one of the following: (a) For a district, the percentage determined for the district for that fiscal year under divisions (E)(1)(c)(i) and (ii) of section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code; (b) For a service center, thirty-seven forty-five and one-half eighty-three hundredths per cent for fiscal year 2024 2026 and forty-one and two-thirds fifty per cent for fiscal year 20252027. (2) No district or service center is eligible to receive a payment under division (C) of this section for the cost of transporting any pupil whom it transports by regular school bus and who is included in the district's transportation ADM. (3) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, both of the following apply: (a) The department of education and workforce shall also establish the deadline for each district and service center to report its actual costs for transporting students described in division (C)(1) of this section. (b) The costs reported by each district and service center under division (C) of this section shall be subject to periodic, random audits by the department of education and workforce. (D) An amount to each school district, including each cooperative education school district, pursuant to section 3313.81 of the Revised Code to assist in providing free lunches to needy children. The amounts shall be determined on the basis of rules adopted by the department of education and workforce. (E)(1) An amount for auxiliary services to each school district, for each pupil attending a chartered nonpublic elementary or high school within the district that has not elected to receive funds under division (E)(2) of this section. (2)(a) An amount for auxiliary services paid directly to each chartered nonpublic school that has elected to receive funds under division (E)(2) of this section for each pupil attending the school. To elect to receive funds under division (E)(2) of this section, a school, by the first day of April of each odd-numbered year, shall notify the department of education and workforce and the school district in which the school is located of the election and shall submit to the department an affidavit certifying that the school shall expend the funds in the manner outlined in section 3317.062 of the Revised Code. The election shall take effect the following first day of July. The school subsequently may rescind its election, but it may do so only in an odd-numbered year by notifying the department and the school district in which the school is located of the rescission not later than the first day of April of that year. Beginning the following first day of July after the rescission, the school shall receive funds under division (E)(1) of this section. (b) Not later later than ten days after the notification of approval and issuance of a charter to a nonpublic school, that school may elect to receive funds under division (E)(2) of this section. If no election is made, the chartered nonpublic school shall receive funds under division (E)(1) of this section. The school may subsequently change its election in accordance with division (E)(2)(a) of this section. (c) A chartered nonpublic school that elects to receive auxiliary services funds under division (E)(2) of this section may designate an organization that oversees one or more nonpublic schools to receive those funds on its behalf. (i) Each chartered nonpublic school that designates an organization to receive auxiliary services funds on its behalf shall notify the department of education and workforce of the organization's name not later than the first day of April of each odd-numbered year. (ii) A school may rescind its decision, but may do so only in each odd-numbered year by notifying the department of that rescission not later than the first day of April of that year. A rescission submitted in compliance with this division takes effect on the following first day of July, and the school district may elect to then begin receiving auxiliary services funds directly or as specified under division (E)(1) of this section. (iii) An organization shall disburse the auxiliary services funds of all chartered nonpublic schools that have designated the organization to receive funds on their behalf in accordance with division (E)(2)(c) of this section. If multiple chartered nonpublic schools designate the same organization to receive auxiliary services funds on their behalf, that organization may use one or more accounts for the purposes of managing the funds. The organization shall maintain appropriate accounting and reporting standards and ensure that each chartered nonpublic school receives the auxiliary services funds to which the school is entitled. (iv) Each chartered nonpublic school that elects to receive funds directly in accordance with division (E)(2) of this section or the organization designated to receive and disburse auxiliary services funds on behalf of a chartered nonpublic school shall maintain records of receipt and expenditures of the funds in a manner that conforms with generally accepted accounting principles. (v) The department of education and workforce shall create and disseminate a standardized reporting form that chartered nonpublic schools and organizations designated to receive funds in accordance with division (E)(2)(c) of this section may use to comply with division (E)(2)(c)(iv) of this section. However, the department shall not require schools to use that form. (vi) An organization that manages a school's auxiliary services funds pursuant to a designation made in accordance with division (E)(2)(c) of this section may require the school's governing authority to pay a fee for that service that does not exceed four per cent of the total amount of payments for auxiliary services that the school receives from the state. A school may pay any fee assessed pursuant to division (E)(2)(c)(vi) of this section using auxiliary services funds. (d) The amount paid under divisions (E)(1) and (2) of this section shall equal the total amount appropriated for the implementation of sections 3317.06 and 3317.062 of the Revised Code divided by the average daily membership in grades kindergarten through twelve in chartered nonpublic elementary and high schools within the state as determined as of the last day of October of each school year. (F) An amount for each county board of developmental disabilities for the approved cost of transportation required for children attending special education programs operated by the county board under section 3323.09 of the Revised Code. For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, this amount shall be equal to the actual costs incurred in the prior fiscal year by the county board when transporting those students multiplied by thirty-seven forty-five and one-half eighty-three hundredths per cent for fiscal year 2024 2026 and forty-one and two-thirds fifty per cent for fiscal year 20252027. (G) An amount to each institution defined under section 3317.082 of the Revised Code providing elementary or secondary education to children other than children receiving special education under section 3323.091 of the Revised Code. This amount for any institution in any fiscal year shall equal the total of all tuition amounts required to be paid to the institution under division (A)(1) of section 3317.082 of the Revised Code. The department of education and workforce or any board of education or governing board may provide for any resident of a district or educational service center territory any educational service for which funds are made available to the board by the United States under the authority of public law, whether such funds come directly or indirectly from the United States or any agency or department thereof or through the state or any agency, department, or political subdivision thereof. Sec. 3317.026. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027. (A) For each fiscal year, the department of education and workforce shall calculate an amount for the community and STEM school unit as follows: (1) For each community school and STEM school, determine the sum of the following: (a) The aggregate base cost calculated for the school for that fiscal year under section 3317.0110 of the Revised Code; (b) The sum of the following: (i) The school's category one special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (ii) The school's category two special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (iii) The school's category three special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (iv) The school's category four special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (v) The school's category five special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (vi) The school's category six special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year. (c) If the school is not an internet- or computer-based community school, an amount of disadvantaged pupil impact aid equal to the following: $422 X the school's economically disadvantaged index X the number of students in the school's enrolled ADM who are economically disadvantaged (d) The sum of the following: (i) The school's category one English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (ii) The school's category two English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (iii) The school's category three English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year. (e) The sum of the following: (i) The school's category one career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified under division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (ii) The school's category two career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified under division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (iii) The school's category three career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified under division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (iv) The school's category four career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified under division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year; (v) The school's category five career-technical education ADM X the multiple specified under division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year. (f) An amount equal to the following: The multiple for career-technical associated services specified under division (B) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code X the statewide average career-technical base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the sum of the school's categories one through five career-technical education ADM (g) If the school is a community school, an amount equal to the following: The number of students reported by the community school under division (B)(5) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code X (the aggregate base cost calculated for the school for that fiscal year under section 3317.0110 of the Revised Code / the school's enrolled ADM) X 0.20 (h) If the school is a community school that is not an internet- or computer-based community school, an equity supplement calculated as follows: The number of students in the school's enrolled ADM X $500 for fiscal year 2026 and $400 for fiscal year 2027 (2) For each community and STEM school, determine the lesser of the following: (a) The following sum: The school's funding base + {[(the sum calculated for the school under division (A) of this section) - the school's funding base] X the school's general phase-in percentage for that fiscal year} (b) The sum of the amounts calculated for the school for that fiscal year under division (A) of this section. (3) Compute the sum of the amounts determined under division (B) of this section to determine the amount calculated for the community and STEM school unit. (B) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, for each fiscal year, the department shall distribute to each community school and each STEM school, from the funds paid to the community and STEM school unit under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, an amount equal to the amount determined for that school under division (A)(2) of this section. Sec. 3317.0212. (A) As used in this section: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "assigned bus" means a school bus used to transport qualifying riders. (2) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "density" means the total riders per square mile of a school district. (3) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "nontraditional ridership" means the average number of qualifying riders who are enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, in a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, or in a nonpublic school and are provided school bus service by a school district during the first full week of October. (4) "Qualifying riders" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, resident students enrolled in preschool and regular education in grades kindergarten to twelve who are provided school bus service by a school district, including students with dual enrollment in a joint vocational school district or a cooperative education school district, and students enrolled in a community school, STEM school, or nonpublic school; (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, students specified by the general assembly. (5) "Qualifying ridership" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the greater of the average number of qualifying riders counted in the morning or counted in the afternoon who are provided school bus service by a school district during the first full week of October; (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, a ridership determined in a manner specified by the general assembly. (6) "Rider density" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the following quotient: A school district's total number of qualifying riders/ the number of square miles in the district (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, a number calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (7) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "riders" means students enrolled in regular and special education in grades kindergarten through twelve who are provided school bus service by a school district, including students with dual enrollment in a joint vocational school district or a cooperative education school district, and students enrolled in a community school, STEM school, or nonpublic school. (8) "School bus service" means a school district's transportation of qualifying riders in any of the following types of vehicles: (a) School buses owned or leased by the district; (b) School buses operated by a private contractor hired by the district; (c) School buses operated by another school district or entity with which the district has contracted, either as part of a consortium for the provision of transportation or otherwise. (B) Not later than the first day of November, for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, or a date determined by the general assembly, for fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, of each year, each city, local, and exempted village school district shall report to the department of education and workforce its qualifying ridership and any other information requested by the department. Subsequent adjustments to the reported numbers shall be made only in accordance with rules adopted by the department. (C) The department shall calculate the statewide transportation cost per student as follows: (1) Determine each city, local, and exempted village school district's transportation cost per student by dividing the district's total costs for school bus service in the previous fiscal year by its qualifying ridership in the previous fiscal year. (2) After excluding districts that do not provide school bus service and the ten districts with the highest transportation costs per student and the ten districts with the lowest transportation costs per student, divide the aggregate cost for school bus service for the remaining districts in the previous fiscal year by the aggregate qualifying ridership of those districts in the previous fiscal year. (D) The department shall calculate the statewide transportation cost per mile as follows: (1) Determine each city, local, and exempted village school district's transportation cost per mile by dividing the district's total costs for school bus service in the previous fiscal year by its total number of miles driven for school bus service in the previous fiscal year. (2) After excluding districts that do not provide school bus service and the ten districts with the highest transportation costs per mile and the ten districts with the lowest transportation costs per mile, divide the aggregate cost for school bus service for the remaining districts in the previous fiscal year by the aggregate miles driven for school bus service in those districts in the previous fiscal year. (E) The department shall calculate each city, local, and exempted village school district's transportation base payment as follows: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027: (a) Calculate the sum of the following: (i) The product of the statewide transportation cost per student and the number of students counted in the district's qualifying ridership for the current fiscal year who are enrolled in the district; (ii) 1.5 times the statewide transportation cost per student times the number of students counted in the district's qualifying ridership for the current fiscal year who are enrolled in community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code or STEM schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (iii) 2.0 times the statewide transportation cost per student times the number of students counted in the district's qualifying ridership for the current fiscal year who are enrolled in nonpublic schools. (b) Calculate the sum of the following: (i) The product of the statewide transportation cost per mile and the number of miles driven for school bus service as reported for qualifying riders for the current fiscal year who are enrolled in the district; (ii) 1.5 times the statewide transportation cost per mile times the number of miles driven for school bus service as reported for qualifying riders for the current fiscal year who are enrolled in community schools or STEM schools; (iii) 2.0 times the statewide transportation cost per mile times the number of miles driven for school bus service as reported for qualifying riders for the current fiscal year who are enrolled in nonpublic schools. (c) Multiply the greater of the amounts calculated under divisions (E)(1)(a) and (b) of this section by the following: (i) For fiscal year 20242026, the greater of thirty-seven forty-five and one-half eighty-three hundredths per cent or the district's state share percentage, as defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code; (ii) For fiscal year 20252027, the greater of forty-one and two-thirds fifty per cent or the district's state share percentage. (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount determined by the general assembly. (F) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department shall pay a district's efficiency adjustment payment in accordance with divisions (F)(1) to (3) of this section. For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall pay a district's efficiency adjustment payment in a manner determined by the general assembly, if the general assembly authorizes such a payment to districts. (1) The department annually shall establish a target number of qualifying riders per assigned bus for each city, local, and exempted village school district. The department shall use the most recently available data from the previous fiscal year in establishing the target number. The target number shall be based on the statewide median number of riders per assigned bus as adjusted to reflect the district's density in comparison to the density of all other districts. The department shall post on the department's web site each district's target number of riders per assigned bus and a description of how the target number was determined. (2) The department shall determine each school district's efficiency index by dividing the district's number of riders per assigned bus by its target number of riders per assigned bus. (3) The department shall determine each city, local, and exempted village school district's efficiency adjustment payment as follows: (a) If the district's efficiency index is equal to or greater than 1.5, the efficiency adjustment payment shall be calculated according to the following formula: 0.15 X the district's transportation base payment calculated under division (E) of this section (b) If the district's efficiency index is less than 1.5 but greater than or equal to 1.0, the efficiency adjustment payment shall be calculated according to the following formula: {[(The district's efficiency index - 1) X 0.15]/0.5} X the district's transportation base payment calculated under division (E) of this section (c) If the district's efficiency index is less than 1.0, the efficiency adjustment payment shall be zero. (G) In addition to funds paid under divisions (E), (F), and (H) of this section, each city, local, and exempted village district shall receive in accordance with rules adopted by the department a payment for students transported by means other than school bus service and whose transportation is not funded under division (C) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. The rules shall include provisions for school district reporting of such students. (H)(1) For purposes of division (H) of this section, a school district's "transportation supplement percentage" means the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the following quotient: (28 – the district's rider density) / 100 If the result of the calculation for a district under division (H)(1)(a) of this section is less than zero, the district's transportation supplement percentage shall be zero. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, a percentage calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) The department shall pay each district a transportation supplement calculated according to the following formula: The district's transportation supplement percentage X the amount calculated for the district under division (E)(1)(b) of this section X 0.55 (I)(1) If a school district board and a community school governing authority elect to enter into an agreement under division (A) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code, the department shall make payments to the community school according to the terms of the agreement for each student actually transported under division (C)(1) of that section. If a community school governing authority accepts transportation responsibility under division (B) of that section, the department shall make payments to the community school for each student actually transported or for whom transportation is arranged by the community school under division (C)(1) of that section, calculated as follows: (a) For any fiscal year which the general assembly has specified that transportation payments to school districts be based on an across-the-board percentage of the district's payment for the previous school year, the per pupil payment to the community school shall be the following quotient: (i) The total amount calculated for the school district in which the child is entitled to attend school for student transportation other than transportation of children with disabilities; divided by (ii) The number of students included in the district's transportation ADM for the current fiscal year, as calculated under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, plus the number of students enrolled in the community school not counted in the district's transportation ADM who are transported under division (B)(1) or (2) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code. (b) For any fiscal year which the general assembly has specified that the transportation payments to school districts be calculated in accordance with this section and any rules of the department implementing this section, the payment to the community school shall be the following: (i) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, either of the following: (I) If the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school would have used a method of transportation for the student for which payments are computed and paid under division (E) of this section, 1.0 times the statewide transportation cost per student, as calculated in division (C) of this section; (II) If the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school would have used a method of transportation for the student for which payments are computed and paid in a manner described in division (G) of this section, the amount that would otherwise be computed for and paid to the district. (ii) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. The community school, however, is not required to use the same method to transport the student. As used in this division, "entitled to attend school" means entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (2) A community school shall be paid under division (I)(2) of this section only for students who are eligible as specified in section 3327.01 of the Revised Code and division (C)(1) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code, and whose transportation to and from school is actually provided, who actually utilized transportation arranged, or for whom a payment in lieu of transportation is made by the community school's governing authority. To qualify for the payments, the community school shall report to the department, in the form and manner required by the department, data on the number of students transported or whose transportation is arranged, the number of miles traveled, cost to transport, and any other information requested by the department. Sec. 3317.0213. (A) The department of education and workforce shall compute and pay in accordance with this section additional state aid for preschool children with disabilities to each city, local, and exempted village school district and to each institution, as defined in section 3323.091 of the Revised Code. Funding shall be provided for children who are not enrolled in kindergarten and who are under age six on the thirtieth day of September of the academic year, or on the first day of August of the academic year if the school district in which the child is enrolled has adopted a resolution under division (A)(3) of section 3321.01 of the Revised Code, but not less than age three on the first day of December of the academic year. For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the additional state aid shall be calculated under the following formula: ($4,000 X the number of students who are preschool children with disabilities) + the sum of the following: (1) The district's or institution's category one special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (2) The district's or institution's category two special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (3) The district's or institution's category three special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (4) The district's or institution's category four special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (5) The district's or institution's category five special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50; (6) The district's or institution's category six special education students who are preschool children with disabilities X the multiple specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage X 0.50. For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the additional state aid shall be calculated for each category of special education students who are preschool children with disabilities using a formula specified by the general assembly. The special education disability categories for preschool children used in this section are the same categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. As used in division (A) of this section, the state share percentage of a student enrolled in an institution is the state share percentage of the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (B) If an educational service center is providing services to students who are preschool children with disabilities under agreement with the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the students are entitled to attend school, that district may authorize the department to transfer funds computed under this section to the service center providing those services. (C) If a county DD board is providing services to students who are preschool children with disabilities under agreement with the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the students are entitled to attend school, the department shall deduct from the district's payment computed under division (A) of this section the total amount of those funds that are attributable to the students served by the county DD board and pay that amount to that board. Sec. 3317.0215. (A)(1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department of education and workforce shall withhold from the aggregate amount paid for a fiscal year to each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code an amount equal to the following: (a) In the case of a city, local, or exempted village school district, the aggregate amount of special education funding paid to the district under division (A)(3) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code times 0.10, subject to any funding limitations enacted by the general assembly to the computation. (b) In the case of a community school or STEM school, the aggregate amount of special education funding paid to the school under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.026 of the Revised Code times 0.10, subject to any funding limitations enacted by the general assembly to the computation. (c) In the case of a joint vocational school district, the aggregate amount of special education funding paid to the school under division (A)(2) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code times 0.10, subject to any funding limitations enacted by the general assembly to the computation. (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall withhold from the aggregate amount paid for a fiscal year to each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school an amount determined by the general assembly, if any, for purposes of this section. (B) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department shall use the amount of funds withheld under division (A) of this section for purposes of division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code, section 3317.0214 of the Revised Code, and division (B) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code, and section 3326.34 of the Revised Code. For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall use the amount of funds withheld under division (A) of this section, if any, for purposes determined by the general assembly. (C)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the department shall withhold from the aggregate amount paid for a fiscal year to each community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code an amount equal to the aggregate amount of special education funding paid to the school under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.026 of the Revised Code times 0.05, subject to any funding limitations enacted by the general assembly to the computation. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall withhold from the aggregate amount paid for a fiscal year to each community school and STEM school an amount determined by the general assembly, if any, for purposes of this section. (D)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the department shall use the amount of funds withheld under division (C) of this section for purposes of division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and section 3326.34 of the Revised Code. Any unused funds shall be redistributed by the department, in a manner determined by the department, to community schools and STEM schools in the same proportion that the funds were originally contributed. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall use the amount of funds withheld under division (C) of this section, if any, for purposes determined by the general assembly. Sec. 3317.0217. This section shall apply only for fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027. Payment of the amount calculated for a school district under this section shall be made under division (A) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (A) For each fiscal year, the department of education and workforce shall compute targeted assistance funds for city, local, and exempted village school districts, in accordance with the following formula: A district's capacity amount for that fiscal year calculated under division (B) of this section + a district's wealth amount for that fiscal year calculated under division (C) of this section (B) The department shall calculate each district's capacity amount for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate each district's weighted wealth for that fiscal year, which equals the following sum: (The amount determined for the district for that fiscal year under division (A)(1)(a) of section 3317.017 of the Revised Code X 0.6) + (the amount determined for the district for that fiscal year under division (A)(2)(a) of section 3317.017 of the Revised Code X 0.4) (2) Determine the median weighted wealth of all school districts in this state for that fiscal year; (3) Compute each district's capacity index for that fiscal year by dividing the median weighted wealth of all school districts in this state for that fiscal year by the district's weighted wealth for that fiscal year; (4) Compute each district's capacity amount for that fiscal year as follows: (a) The district's capacity amount shall be zero if the district satisfies either of the following criteria for that fiscal year: (i) The district's capacity index is less than 1. (ii) The district's enrolled ADM is less than 200. (b) If the district does not satisfy either of the criteria specified in division (B)(4)(a) of this section for that fiscal year, the district's capacity amount for that fiscal year shall be calculated as follows: (i) Compute the following amount for the district: (The median weighted wealth of all school districts in this state for that fiscal year X 0.008) – (the district's weighted wealth for that fiscal year X 0.008) (ii) If the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than or equal to 200 but less than or equal to 400, the district's capacity amount for that fiscal year shall be equal to 0.05 X the amount computed under division (B)(4)(b)(i) of this section. (iii) If the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than 400 and less than 600, the district's capacity amount for that fiscal year shall be calculated in accordance with the following formula: {[0.95 X (the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year – 400)/200] + 0.05} X the amount computed under division (B)(4)(b)(i) of this section (iv) If the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year is greater than or equal to 600, the district's capacity amount for that fiscal year shall be equal to the amount computed under division (B)(4)(b)(i) of this section. (C) The department shall calculate each district's wealth amount for a fiscal year as follows: (1) Calculate each district's weighted wealth per pupil for that fiscal year, which equals the following quotient: The district's weighted wealth for that fiscal year calculated under division (B)(1) of this section/ (the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year - the students described in division (A)(1)(b) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code + the students described in division (A)(2)(d) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code) (2) Determine the median weighted wealth per pupil of all school districts in this state for that fiscal year; (3) Compute each district's wealth index for that fiscal year by dividing the median weighted wealth per pupil of all school districts in this state for that fiscal year by the district's weighted wealth per pupil for that fiscal year; (4) Compute each district's wealth amount for that fiscal year, as follows: (a) If the district's wealth index computed under division (C)(3) of this section for that fiscal year is less than 0.8, the district's wealth amount for that fiscal year shall be zero. (b) If the district's wealth index computed under division (C)(3) of this section for that fiscal year is greater than or equal to 0.8, the district's wealth amount for that fiscal year shall be calculated in accordance with the following formula: [(The median weighted wealth per pupil of all school districts in this state for that fiscal year X 0.014) – (the district's weighted wealth per pupil for that fiscal year X 0.0112)] X the district's enrolled ADM for that fiscal year Sec. 3317.03. (A) The superintendent of each city, local, and exempted village school district shall report to the department of education and workforce as of the last day of October, March, and June of each year the enrollment of students receiving services from schools under the superintendent's supervision, and the numbers of other students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code the superintendent is required to report under this section, so that the department can calculate the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, transportation ADM, and, for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership. (1) The enrollment reported by the superintendent during the reporting period shall consist of the number of students in grades kindergarten through twelve receiving any educational services from the district, except that the following categories of students shall not be included in the determination: (a) Students enrolled in adult education classes; (b) Adjacent or other district students enrolled in the district under an open enrollment policy pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (c) Students receiving services in the district pursuant to a compact, cooperative education agreement, or a contract, but who are entitled to attend school in another district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code; (d) Students for whom tuition is payable pursuant to sections 3317.081 and 3323.141 of the Revised Code; (e) Students receiving services in the district through a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. When reporting students under division (A)(1) of this section, the superintendent also shall report the district where each student is entitled to attend school pursuant to sections 3313.64 and 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (2) The department shall compile a list of all students reported to be enrolled in a district under division (A)(1) of this section and of the students entitled to attend school in the district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code on an FTE basis but receiving educational services in grades kindergarten through twelve from one or more of the following entities: (a) A community school pursuant to Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in such community school; (b) An alternative school pursuant to sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (c) A college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, except when the student is enrolled in the college while also enrolled in a community school pursuant to Chapter 3314., a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (d) An adjacent or other school district under an open enrollment policy adopted pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (e) An educational service center or cooperative education district; (f) Another school district under a cooperative education agreement, compact, or contract; (g) A chartered nonpublic school with a scholarship paid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code, if the students qualified for the scholarship under section 3310.03 or 3310.032 of the Revised Code; (h) An alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "alternative public provider" and "registered private provider" have the same meanings as in section 3310.41 or 3310.51 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (i) A science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in the school; (j) A college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, including any participation in a college pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code while enrolled in the school; (k) A nonchartered nonpublic school if the students have educational savings accounts established under sections 3310.21 to 3310.26 of the Revised Code. (3) The department also shall compile a list of the students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are enrolled in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact, excluding any students so entitled to attend school in the district who are enrolled in another school district through an open enrollment policy as reported under division (A)(2)(d) of this section and then enroll in a joint vocational school district or under a career-technical education compact. The department shall provide each city, local, and exempted village school district with an opportunity to review the list of students compiled under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section to ensure that the students reported accurately reflect the enrollment of students in the district. (B) To enable the department to obtain the data needed to complete the calculation of payments pursuant to this chapter, each superintendent shall certify from the reports provided by the department under division (A) of this section all of the following: (1) The total student enrollment in regular learning day classes included in the report under division (A)(1) or (2), including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, of this section for each of the individual grades kindergarten through twelve in schools under the superintendent's supervision; (2) The unduplicated count of the number of preschool children with disabilities enrolled in the district for whom the district is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, in accordance with the disability categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (3) The number of children entitled to attend school in the district pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are: (a) Enrolled in a college under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, except when the student is enrolled in the college while also enrolled in a community school pursuant to Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (b) Participating in a program operated by a county board of developmental disabilities or a state institution. (4) The total enrollment of pupils in joint vocational schools; (5) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, receiving special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (6) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, receiving special education services for category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (7) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, receiving special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (8) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, receiving special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (9) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, receiving special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (10) The combined enrollment of children with disabilities reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, receiving special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including children attending a special education program operated by an alternative public provider or a registered private provider with a scholarship awarded under either section 3310.41 or sections 3310.51 to 3310.64 of the Revised Code; (11) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, in category one career-technical education programs or classes, described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or by another district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (12) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, in category two career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (13) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, in category three career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (14) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, in category four career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (15) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section on a full-time equivalency basis, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section, in category five career-technical education programs or services, described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, operated by the school district or another school district that is a member of the district's career-technical planning district, other than a joint vocational school district, or by an educational service center, notwithstanding division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code and division (C)(3) of this section; (16) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section; (17) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section; (18) The enrollment of pupils reported under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section who are English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j) of this section; (19) The average number of children transported during the reporting period by the school district on board-owned or contractor-owned and -operated buses, reported in accordance with rules adopted by the department; (20)(a) The number of children, other than preschool children with disabilities, the district placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in fiscal year 1998. Division (B)(20)(a) of this section does not apply after fiscal year 2013. (b) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (c) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (d) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (e) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (f) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (g) The number of children with disabilities, other than preschool children with disabilities, placed with a county board of developmental disabilities in the current fiscal year to receive special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. (21) The enrollment of students who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department, including any student described in divisions (A)(1)(b) of this section and excluding any student reported under divisions (A)(2)(a), (b), (d), (g), (h), (i), and (j), and (k) of this section. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (B)(21) of this section based on anything other than family income. (22) The enrollment of students identified as gifted under division (A), (B), (C), or (D) of section 3324.03 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The department shall adopt rules necessary for implementing divisions (A), (B), and (D) of this section. (2) A student enrolled in a community school established under Chapter 3314., a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code shall be counted in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code for the same proportion of the school year that the student is counted in the enrollment of the community school, the science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school, or the college-preparatory boarding school for purposes of section 3317.022 or 3328.24 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding the enrollment of students reported pursuant to division (A)(2)(a), (i), or (j) of this section, the department may adjust the formula ADM of a school district to account for students entitled to attend school in the district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code who are enrolled in a community school, a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school, or a college-preparatory boarding school for only a portion of the school year. (3) No child shall be counted as more than a total of one child in the sum of the enrollment of students of a school district under division (A), divisions (B)(1) to (22), or division (D) of this section, except as follows: (a)(i) A child with a disability described in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code may be counted both in formula ADM and in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM. As provided in division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM in the same proportion that the child is counted in formula ADM. (ii) A child with a disability described in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code may be counted both in enrolled ADM and in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM. As provided in division (M) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM in the same proportion that the child is counted in enrolled ADM. (b)(i) A child enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code may be counted both in formula ADM and category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM. Such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion as the percentage of time that the child spends in the career-technical education programs or classes. (ii) A child enrolled in career-technical education programs or classes described in section 3317.014 of the Revised Code may be counted both in enrolled ADM and category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM and, if applicable, in category one, two, three, four, five, or six special education ADM. Such a child shall be counted in category one, two, three, four, or five career-technical education ADM in the same proportion as the percentage of time that the child spends in the career-technical education programs or classes. (4) Based on the information reported under this section, the department shall determine the total student count, as defined in section 3301.011 of the Revised Code, for each school district. (D)(1) The superintendent of each joint vocational school district shall report and certify to the department as of the last day of October, March, and June of each year the enrollment of students receiving services from schools under the superintendent's supervision so that the department can calculate the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, and for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership. The enrollment reported and certified by the superintendent, except as otherwise provided in this division, shall consist of the number of students in grades six through twelve receiving any educational services from the district, except that the following categories of students shall not be included in the determination: (a) Students enrolled in adult education classes; (b) Adjacent or other district joint vocational students enrolled in the district under an open enrollment policy pursuant to section 3313.98 of the Revised Code; (c) Students receiving services in the district pursuant to a compact, cooperative education agreement, or a contract, but who are entitled to attend school in a city, local, or exempted village school district whose territory is not part of the territory of the joint vocational district; (d) Students for whom tuition is payable pursuant to sections 3317.081 and 3323.141 of the Revised Code. (2) To enable the department to obtain the data needed to complete the calculation of payments pursuant to this chapter, each superintendent shall certify from the report provided under division (D)(1) of this section the enrollment for each of the following categories of students: (a) Students enrolled in each individual grade included in the joint vocational district schools, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (b) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category one disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (c) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category two disabilities described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (d) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category three disabilities described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (e) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category four disabilities described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (f) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for the category five disabilities described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (g) Children with disabilities receiving special education services for category six disabilities described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (h) Students receiving category one career-technical education services, described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (i) Students receiving category two career-technical education services, described in division (A)(2) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (j) Students receiving category three career-technical education services, described in division (A)(3) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (k) Students receiving category four career-technical education services, described in division (A)(4) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (l) Students receiving category five career-technical education services, described in division (A)(5) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (m) English learners described in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (n) English learners described in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (o) English learners described in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section; (p) Students who are economically disadvantaged, as defined by the department, including any student described in division (D)(1)(b) of this section. A student shall not be categorically excluded from the number reported under division (D)(2)(p) of this section based on anything other than family income. The superintendent of each joint vocational school district shall also indicate the city, local, or exempted village school district in which each joint vocational district pupil is entitled to attend school pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (E) In each school of each city, local, exempted village, joint vocational, and cooperative education school district there shall be maintained a record of school enrollment, which record shall accurately show, for each day the school is in session, the actual enrollment in regular day classes. For the purpose of determining the enrollment of students, the enrollment figure of any school shall not include any pupils except those pupils described by division (A) or (D) of this section. The record of enrollment for each school shall be maintained in such manner that no pupil shall be counted as enrolled prior to the actual date of entry in the school and also in such manner that where for any cause a pupil permanently withdraws from the school that pupil shall not be counted as enrolled from and after the date of such withdrawal. There shall not be included in the enrollment of any school any of the following: (1) Any pupil who has graduated from the twelfth grade of a public or nonpublic high school; (2) Any pupil who is not a resident of the state; (3) Any pupil who was enrolled in the schools of the district during the previous school year when assessments were administered under section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code but did not take one or more of the assessments required by that section and was not excused pursuant to division (C)(1) or (3) of that section; (4) Any pupil who has attained the age of twenty-two years, except for veterans of the armed services whose attendance was interrupted before completing the recognized twelve-year course of the public schools by reason of induction or enlistment in the armed forces and who apply for reenrollment in the public school system of their residence not later than four years after termination of war or their honorable discharge; (5) Any pupil who has a certificate of high school equivalence as defined in section 5107.40 of the Revised Code. If, however, any veteran described by division (E)(4) of this section elects to enroll in special courses organized for veterans for whom tuition is paid under the provisions of federal laws, or otherwise, that veteran shall not be included in the enrollment of students determined under this section. Notwithstanding division (E)(3) of this section, the enrollment of any school may include a pupil who did not take an assessment required by section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code if the department of education and workforce grants a waiver from the requirement to take the assessment to the specific pupil and a parent is not paying tuition for the pupil pursuant to section 3313.6410 of the Revised Code. The department may grant such a waiver only for good cause in accordance with rules adopted by the department. The enrolled ADM, formula ADM, total ADM, category one through five career-technical education ADM, category one through three English learner ADM, category one through six special education ADM, transportation ADM, and, for purposes of provisions of law outside of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code, average daily membership of any school district shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the department. (F)(1) If a student attending a community school under Chapter 3314., a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326., or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code is not included in the formula ADM calculated for the school district in which the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student in accordance with division (C)(2) of this section. (2) If a student awarded an educational choice scholarship is not included in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student resides, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student. (3) If a student awarded a scholarship under the Jon Peterson special needs scholarship program is not included in the formula ADM of the school district in which the student resides, the department shall adjust the formula ADM of that school district to include the student. (G)(1)(a) The superintendent of an institution operating a special education program pursuant to section 3323.091 of the Revised Code shall, for the programs under such superintendent's supervision, certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the director of education and workforce, both of the following: (i) The unduplicated count of the number of all children with disabilities other than preschool children with disabilities receiving services at the institution for each category of disability described in divisions (A) to (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled; (ii) The unduplicated count of the number of all preschool children with disabilities in classes or programs for whom the district is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, reported according to the categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. (b) The superintendent of an institution with career-technical education units approved under section 3317.05 of the Revised Code shall, for the units under the superintendent's supervision, certify to the department the enrollment in those units, in the manner prescribed by the director of education and workforce. (2) The superintendent of each county board of developmental disabilities that maintains special education classes under section 3317.20 of the Revised Code or provides services to preschool children with disabilities pursuant to an agreement between the county board and the appropriate school district shall do both of the following: (a) Certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the enrollment in classes under section 3317.20 of the Revised Code for each school district that has placed children in the classes; (b) Certify to the department, in the manner prescribed by the department, the unduplicated count of the number of all preschool children with disabilities enrolled in classes for which the board is eligible to receive funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code adjusted for the portion of the year each child is so enrolled, reported according to the categories prescribed in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code, and the number of those classes. (H) Except as provided in division (I) of this section, when any city, local, or exempted village school district provides instruction for a nonresident pupil whose attendance is unauthorized attendance as defined in section 3327.06 of the Revised Code, that pupil's enrollment shall not be included in that district's enrollment figure used in calculating the district's payments under this chapter. The reporting official shall report separately the enrollment of all pupils whose attendance in the district is unauthorized attendance, and the enrollment of each such pupil shall be credited to the school district in which the pupil is entitled to attend school under division (B) of section 3313.64 or section 3313.65 of the Revised Code as determined by the department. (I) This division shall not apply on or after September 30, 2021. (1) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district admitting a scholarship student of a pilot project district pursuant to division (C) of section 3313.976 of the Revised Code may count such student in its enrollment. (2) In any year for which funds are appropriated for pilot project scholarship programs, a school district implementing a state-sponsored pilot project scholarship program that year pursuant to sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code may count in its enrollment: (a) All children residing in the district and utilizing a scholarship to attend kindergarten in any alternative school, as defined in section 3313.974 of the Revised Code; (b) All children who were enrolled in the district in the preceding year who are utilizing a scholarship to attend an alternative school. (J) The superintendent of each cooperative education school district shall certify to the director of education and workforce, in a manner prescribed by the department, the applicable enrollments for all students in the cooperative education district, also indicating the city, local, or exempted village district where each pupil is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (K) If the director of education and workforce determines that a component of the enrollment certified or reported by a district superintendent, or other reporting entity, is not correct, the director of education and workforce may order that the district's enrolled ADM, formula ADM, or both be adjusted in the amount of the error. Sec. 3317.035. The auditor of state may conduct annual audits of the information certified under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code by a number of school districts determined by the auditor of state and selected at random. Sec. 3317.051. (A) The department of education and workforce shall compute and pay to a school district funds based on units for services to students identified as gifted under Chapter 3324. of the Revised Code as prescribed by this section. (B) The department shall allocate gifted units for a school district as follows: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027: (a) One gifted coordinator unit shall be allocated for every 3,300 students in a district's enrolled ADM, with a minimum of 0.5 units and a maximum of 8 units allocated for the district. (b) One kindergarten through eighth grade gifted intervention specialist unit shall be allocated for every 140 gifted students enrolled in grades kindergarten through eight in the district, as certified under division (B)(22) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, with a minimum of 0.3 units allocated for the district. (c) One ninth through twelfth grade gifted intervention specialist unit shall be allocated for every 140 gifted students enrolled in grades nine through twelve in the district, as certified under division (B)(22) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code, with a minimum of 0.3 units allocated for the district. (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, in the manner prescribed by the general assembly. (C) The department shall pay an amount to a school district for gifted units as follows: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, an amount equal to the following sum: ($85,776 X the number of units allocated to a school district under division (B)(1)(a) of this section X the district's state share percentage) + ($89,378 X the number of units allocated to a school district under division (B)(1)(b) of this section X the district's state share percentage) + ($80,974 X the number of units allocated to a school district under division (B)(1)(c) of this section X the district's state share percentage) (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (D) A school district may assign gifted unit funding that it receives under division (C) of this section to another school district, an educational service center, a community school, or a STEM school as part of an arrangement to provide services to the district. Sec. 3317.06. Moneys paid to school districts under division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code shall be used for the following independent and fully severable purposes: (A) To purchase such secular textbooks or digital texts as have been approved by the department of education and workforce for use in public schools in the state and to loan such textbooks or digital texts to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code or to their parents and to hire clerical personnel to administer such lending program. Such loans shall be based upon individual requests submitted by such nonpublic school pupils or parents. Such requests shall be submitted to the school district in which the nonpublic school is located. Such individual requests for the loan of textbooks or digital texts shall, for administrative convenience, be submitted by the nonpublic school pupil or the pupil's parent to the nonpublic school, which shall prepare and submit collective summaries of the individual requests to the school district. As used in this section: (1) "Textbook" means any book or book substitute that a pupil uses as a consumable or nonconsumable text, text substitute, or text supplement in a particular class or program in the school the pupil regularly attends. (2) "Digital text" means a consumable book or book substitute that a student accesses through the use of a computer or other electronic medium or that is available through an internet-based provider of course content, or any other material that contributes to the learning process through electronic means. (B) To provide speech and hearing diagnostic services to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Such service shall be provided in the nonpublic school attended by the pupil receiving the service. (C) To provide physician, nursing, dental, and optometric services to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Such services shall be provided in the school attended by the nonpublic school pupil receiving the service. (D) To provide diagnostic mental health or psychological services to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Such services shall be provided in the school attended by the pupil receiving the service. (E) To provide therapeutic mental health, psychological, and speech and hearing services to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Such services shall be provided in the public school, in nonpublic schools, in public centers, or in mobile units located on or off of the nonpublic premises. If such services are provided in the public school or in public centers, transportation to and from such facilities shall be provided by the school district in which the nonpublic school is located. (F) To provide guidance, counseling, and social work services to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Such services shall be provided in the public school, in nonpublic schools, in public centers, or in mobile units located on or off of the nonpublic premises. If such services are provided in the public school or in public centers, transportation to and from such facilities shall be provided by the school district in which the nonpublic school is located. (G) To provide remedial services to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Such services shall be provided in the public school, in nonpublic schools, in public centers, or in mobile units located on or off of the nonpublic premises. If such services are provided in the public school or in public centers, transportation to and from such facilities shall be provided by the school district in which the nonpublic school is located. (H) To supply for use by pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code such standardized tests and scoring services as are in use in the public schools of the state; (I) To provide programs for children who attend nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code and are children with disabilities as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code or gifted children. Such programs shall be provided in the public school, in nonpublic schools, in public centers, or in mobile units located on or off of the nonpublic premises. If such programs are provided in the public school or in public centers, transportation to and from such facilities shall be provided by the school district in which the nonpublic school is located. (J) To hire clerical personnel to assist in the administration of programs pursuant to divisions (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), and (I) of this section and to hire supervisory personnel to supervise the providing of services and textbooks pursuant to this section. (K) To purchase or lease any secular, neutral, and nonideological computer application software designed to assist students in performing a single task or multiple related tasks, device management software, learning management software, site-licensing, digital video on demand (DVD), wide area connectivity and related technology as it relates to internet access, mathematics or science equipment and materials, instructional materials, and school library materials that are in general use in the public schools of the state and loan such items to pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code or to their parents, and to hire clerical personnel to administer the lending program. Only such items that are incapable of diversion to religious use and that are susceptible of loan to individual pupils and are furnished for the use of individual pupils shall be purchased and loaned under this division. As used in this section, "instructional materials" means prepared learning materials that are secular, neutral, and nonideological in character and are of benefit to the instruction of school children. "Instructional materials" includes media content that a student may access through the use of a computer or electronic device. Mobile applications that are secular, neutral, and nonideological in character and that are purchased for less than twenty dollars for instructional use shall be considered to be consumable and shall be distributed to students without the expectation that the applications must be returned. (L) To purchase or lease instructional equipment, including computer hardware and related equipment in general use in the public schools of the state, for use by pupils attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code and to loan such items to pupils attending such nonpublic schools within the district or to their parents, and to hire clerical personnel to administer the lending program. "Computer hardware and related equipment" includes desktop computers and workstations; laptop computers, computer tablets, and other mobile handheld devices; their operating systems and accessories; and any equipment designed to make accessible the environment of a classroom to a student, who is physically unable to attend classroom activities due to hospitalization or other circumstances, by allowing real-time interaction with other students both one-on-one and in group discussion. (M) To purchase mobile units to be used for the provision of services pursuant to divisions (E), (F), (G), and (I) of this section and to pay for necessary repairs and operating costs associated with these units. (N) To reimburse costs the district incurred to store the records of a chartered nonpublic school that closes. Reimbursements under this division shall be made one time only for each chartered nonpublic school described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code that closes. (O) To purchase life-saving medical or other emergency equipment for placement in nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code or to maintain such equipment. (P) To procure and pay for security services from a county sheriff or a township or municipal police force, from a retired Ohio peace officer, or from a person certified through the Ohio peace officer training commission, in accordance with section 109.78 of the Revised Code, as a special police, security guard, or as a privately employed person serving in a police capacity for nonpublic schools in the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. (Q) To provide language and academic support services and other accommodations for English learners attending nonpublic schools within the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Clerical and supervisory personnel hired pursuant to division (J) of this section shall perform their services in the public schools, in nonpublic schools, public centers, or mobile units where the services are provided to the nonpublic school pupil, except that such personnel may accompany pupils to and from the service sites when necessary to ensure the safety of the children receiving the services. All services provided pursuant to this section may be provided under contract with educational service centers, the department of health, city or general health districts, or private agencies whose personnel are properly licensed by an appropriate state board or agency. School districts shall not deny a nonpublic school's request for personnel who are properly licensed by a state board or agency. Transportation of pupils provided pursuant to divisions (E), (F), (G), and (I) of this section shall be provided by the school district from its general funds and not from moneys paid to it under division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code unless a special transportation request is submitted by the parent of the child receiving service pursuant to such divisions. If such an application is presented to the school district, it may pay for the transportation from moneys paid to it under division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. No school district shall provide health or remedial services to nonpublic school pupils as authorized by this section unless such services are available to pupils attending the public schools within the district. Materials, equipment, computer hardware or software, textbooks, digital texts, and health and remedial services provided for the benefit of nonpublic school pupils pursuant to this section and the admission of pupils to such nonpublic schools shall be provided without distinction as to race, creed, color, or national origin of such pupils or of their teachers. No school district shall provide services, materials, or equipment that contain religious content for use in religious courses, devotional exercises, religious training, or any other religious activity. As used in this section, "parent" includes a person standing in loco parentis to a child. Notwithstanding section 3317.01 of the Revised Code, payments shall be made under this section to any city, local, or exempted village school district within which is located one or more nonpublic elementary or high schools described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code and any payments made to school districts under division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code for purposes of this section may be disbursed without submission to and approval of the controlling board. The allocation of payments for materials, equipment, textbooks, digital texts, health services, and remedial services to city, local, and exempted village school districts shall be on the basis of the department's estimated annual average daily membership in nonpublic elementary and high schools located in the district described in division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Payments made to city, local, and exempted village school districts under this section shall be equal to specific appropriations made for the purpose. All interest earned by a school district on such payments shall be used by the district for the same purposes and in the same manner as the payments may be used. The department shall adopt guidelines and procedures under which such programs and services shall be provided, under which districts and educational service centers with which districts contract to provide auxiliary services shall be reimbursed for administrative costs incurred in providing such programs and services, and under which any unexpended balance of the amounts appropriated by the general assembly to implement this section may be transferred to the auxiliary services personnel unemployment compensation fund established pursuant to section 4141.47 of the Revised Code. If a district contracts with an educational service center to provide auxiliary services, only the service center shall be reimbursed for administrative costs. The department shall also adopt guidelines and procedures limiting the purchase and loan of the items described in division (K) of this section to items that are in general use in the public schools of the state, that are incapable of diversion to religious use, and that are susceptible to individual use rather than classroom use. Within thirty days after the end of each biennium, each board of education shall remit to the department all moneys paid to it under division (E)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code and any interest earned on those moneys that are not required to pay expenses incurred under this section during the biennium for which the money was appropriated and during which the interest was earned. If a board of education subsequently determines that the remittal of moneys leaves the board with insufficient money to pay all valid expenses incurred under this section during the biennium for which the remitted money was appropriated, the board may apply to the department for a refund of money, not to exceed the amount of the insufficiency. If the department determines the expenses were lawfully incurred and would have been lawful expenditures of the refunded money, it shall certify its determination and the amount of the refund to be made to the director of job and family services who shall make a refund as provided in section 4141.47 of the Revised Code. Each school district shall label materials, equipment, computer hardware or software, textbooks, and digital texts purchased or leased for loan to a nonpublic school under this section, acknowledging that they were purchased or leased with state funds under this section. However, a district need not label materials, equipment, computer hardware or software, textbooks, or digital texts that the district determines are consumable in nature or have a value of less than two hundred dollars. Sec. 3317.11. (A) As used in this section: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "base amount" is equal to $356,250. (2) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "funding base" means an amount calculated by the department of education and workforce that is equal to the amount an educational service center would have received under Section 265.360 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly for fiscal year 2020 using the student counts of the school districts with which the service center has service agreements for the fiscal year for which payments under this section are being made. (3) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "general phase-in percentage" for an educational service center means the "general phase-in percentage" for school districts as defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (4) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, "student count" means the count calculated under division (G)(1) of section 3313.843 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department of education and workforce shall pay the governing board of each educational service center an amount equal to the following: The educational service center's funding base + [(the amount calculated for the educational service center for that fiscal year under division (C) of this section - the educational service center's funding base) X the educational service center's general phase-in percentage for that fiscal year] (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall pay the governing board of each educational service center an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (C) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department shall calculate an amount for each educational service center as follows: (1) If the educational service center has a student count of 5,000 students or less, the base amount. (2) If the educational service center has a student count greater than 5,000 students but less than or equal to 35,000 students, the following sum: The base amount + [(the educational service center's student count - 5,000) X $24.72] (3) If the educational service center has a student count greater than 35,000 students, the following sum: The base amount + (30,000 X $24.72) + [(the educational service center's student count - 35,000) X $30.90] Sec. 3317.16. The department of education and workforce shall compute and distribute state core foundation funding to each funding unit that is a joint vocational school district for the fiscal year as follows: For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027: The district's funding base + [(the district's state core foundation funding components for that fiscal year calculated under divisions (A)(1), (2), (4), (5), and (6) of this section - the district's general funding base) X the district's general phase-in percentage for that fiscal year] + [(the district's disadvantaged pupil impact aid for that fiscal year calculated under division (A)(3) of this section - the district's disadvantaged pupil impact aid funding base) X the district's phase-in percentage for disadvantaged pupil impact aid for that fiscal year] For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the district's state core foundation funding components for that fiscal year calculated under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (6) of this section. (A) A district's state core foundation funding components shall be all of the following: (1) The district's state share of the base cost, which is equal to the following: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, an amount calculated according to the following formula: (The district's base cost calculated under section 3317.012 of the Revised Code) - (0.0005 X the lesser of the district's three-year average valuation or the district's most recent valuation) However, no district shall receive an amount under division (A)(1) of this section that is less than 0.10 times the base cost calculated for the district under section 3317.012 of the Revised Code. enrolled ADM for the fiscal year) X (the district's state share percentage for the fiscal year) X (the district's base cost per pupil for the fiscal year) (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (2) Additional state aid for special education and related services provided under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code calculated as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the sum of the following: (i) The district's category one special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage; (ii) The district's category two special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage; (iii) The district's category three special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage; (iv) The district's category four special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage; (v) The district's category five special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage; (vi) The district's category six special education ADM X the multiple specified in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following: (i) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category one special education ADM; (ii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category two special education ADM; (iii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category three special education ADM; (iv) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category four special education ADM; (v) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category five special education ADM; (vi) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category six special education ADM. (3) Disadvantaged pupil impact aid calculated as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, an amount calculated according to the following formula: $422 X the district's economically disadvantaged index X the number of students who are economically disadvantaged as certified under division (D)(2)(p) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly. (4) English learner funds calculated as follows: (a) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the sum of the following: (i) The district's category one English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (A) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage; (ii) The district's category two English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (B) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage; (iii) The district's category three English learner ADM X the multiple specified in division (C) of section 3317.016 of the Revised Code X the statewide average base cost per pupil for that fiscal year X the district's state share percentage. (b) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following: (i) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category one English learner ADM; (ii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category two English learner ADM; (iii) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the funding unit's category three English learner ADM. (5) Career-technical education funds calculated under division (C) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (6) Career-technical education associated services funds calculated under division (D) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) If a joint vocational school district's costs for a fiscal year for a student in its categories two through six special education ADM exceed the threshold cost for serving the student, as specified in division (B) of section 3317.0214 of the Revised Code, the district may submit to the department documentation, as prescribed by the department, of all of its costs for that student. Upon submission of documentation for a student of the type and in the manner prescribed, the department shall pay to the district an amount equal to the sum of the following: (a) One-half of the district's costs for the student in excess of the threshold cost; (b) The product of one-half of the district's costs for the student in excess of the threshold cost multiplied by the district's state share percentage. (2) The district shall report under division (B)(1) of this section, and the department shall pay for, only the costs of educational expenses and the related services provided to the student in accordance with the student's individualized education program. Any legal fees, court costs, or other costs associated with any cause of action relating to the student may not be included in the amount. (C)(1) For each student with a disability receiving special education and related services under an individualized education program, as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, at a joint vocational school district, the resident district or, if the student is enrolled in a community school, the community school shall be responsible for the amount of any costs of providing those special education and related services to that student that exceed the sum of the amount calculated for those services attributable to that student under division (A) of this section. Those excess costs shall be calculated using a formula approved by the department. (2) The board of education of the joint vocational school district may report the excess costs calculated under division (C)(1) of this section to the department. (3) If the board of education of the joint vocational school district reports excess costs under division (C)(2) of this section, the department shall pay the amount of excess cost calculated under division (C)(2) of this section to the joint vocational school district and shall deduct that amount as provided in division (C)(3)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable: (a) If the student is not enrolled in a community school, the department shall deduct the amount from the account of the student's resident district pursuant to division (J) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code. (b) If the student is enrolled in a community school, the department shall deduct the amount from the account of the community school pursuant to section 3314.083 of the Revised Code. (D) A joint vocational school district shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(3) of this section in accordance with section 3317.25 of the Revised Code. (E) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a school district shall spend the funds it receives under division (A)(4) of this section only for services for English learners. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (2) "Resident district" means the city, local, or exempted village school district in which a student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.161. (A) As used in this section, "lead district" has the same meaning as in section 3317.023 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) A career-technical education program or a dropout prevention and recovery program of a city, local, or exempted village school district, community school, or STEM school shall be subject to approval under this section in order for the district or school to qualify for state funding for the program. Approval granted under this section shall be valid for the five fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the program is approved and may be renewed. Approval shall be subject to annual review under division (E) of this section. (2) If a district or school becomes a new member of a career-technical planning district, its career-technical education programs shall be approved or disapproved by the lead district of the career-technical planning district during the fiscal year in which the district or school becomes a member of the career-technical planning district. Any program of the district or school that was approved by the department of education and workforce for an approval period that includes the fiscal year in which the district or school becomes a new member of the career-technical planning district shall retain its approved status during that fiscal year. (3) If an existing member of a career-technical planning district develops a new career-technical education program, that program shall be approved or disapproved by the lead district of the career-technical planning district prior to the first fiscal year for which the district or school is seeking funding for the program. (4) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, if a career-technical education program was approved by the department prior to September 29, 2013, that approval remains valid for the unexpired remainder of the approval period specified by the department. Approval of that program may then be renewed in accordance with this section on a date prior to the expiration of the approval period. (C)(1) The lead district of a career-technical planning district shall approve or disapprove for a five-year period each career-technical education program of the city, local, and exempted village school districts, community schools, and STEM schools that are assigned by the department to the career-technical planning district. The lead district's decision to approve or disapprove a program shall be based on requirements for career-technical education programs that are specified in rules adopted by the department. These requirements shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (a) Demand for the career-technical education program by industries in the state; (b) Quality of the program; (c) Potential for a student enrolled in the program to receive the training that will qualify the student for industry credentials or post-secondary education; (d) Admission requirements of the lead district; (e) Past performance of the district or school that is offering the program; (f) Traveling distance; (g) Sustainability; (h) Capacity; (i) Availability of the program within the career-technical planning district; (j) In the case of a new program, the cost to begin the program. (2) The lead district shall approve or disapprove each program not later than the first day of March prior to the first fiscal year for which the district or school is seeking funding for the program. If a program is approved, the lead district shall notify the department of its decision. If a program is disapproved, the lead district shall notify the district or school of its decision. If the lead district disapproves the program or does not take any action to approve or disapprove the program by the first day of March, the district or school may appeal the lead district's decision or failure to take action to the department by the fifteenth day of March. (D)(1) Upon receiving notification of a lead district's approval of a district's or school's career-technical education program, the department shall review the lead district's decision and determine whether to approve or disapprove the program not later than the fifteenth day of May prior to the first fiscal year for which the district or school is seeking funding for the program. The department shall notify the district or school and the lead district of the district's or school's career-technical planning district of its determination. (2) Upon receiving an appeal from a district or school of a lead district's disapproval of a career-technical education program or failure to take action to approve or disapprove the program, the department shall review the lead district's disapproval or failure to take action. The department shall decide whether to approve or disapprove the program as a result of this review not later than the fifteenth day of May prior to the first fiscal year for which the district or school is seeking funding for the program. The department shall notify the lead district and the appealing district or school of its determination. (3) In conducting a review under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section, the department shall consider the criteria prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section. (4) If the department approves a program under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section, it shall authorize the payment to the district or school of the funds attributed to the career-technical students enrolled in that program in the next fiscal year according to a payment schedule prescribed by the department. (5) The department's decisions under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of this section shall be final and not appealable. (6) The director of education and workforce may adopt guidelines identifying circumstances in which the department may, after consulting with a lead district, approve or disapprove a program that has been approved or disapproved by the lead district after the deadline prescribed in division (D)(1) or (2) of this section has passed. The department shall authorize a payment for any dropout prevention and recovery program offering career-technical education that is in its first year of operation and that submits an application during the additional application period described in division (D)(6) of this section in the fiscal year for which the application was submitted. (E) The department and the lead district of each career-technical planning district shall conduct an annual review of each career-technical education program in the lead district's career-technical planning district that receives approval under this section. Continued funding of the program during the five-year approval period shall be subject to the school's compliance with any directives for performance improvement that are issued by the department or the lead district as a result of any review conducted under this section. Sec. 3317.162. (A) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the department of education and workforce shall pay temporary transitional aid to each joint vocational school district according to the following formula: (The district's funding base, as that term is defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code) – (the district's payment under section 3317.16 of the Revised Code for the fiscal year for which the payment is computed) If the computation made under division (A) of this section results in a negative number, the district's funding under division (A) of this section shall be zero. (B) If a joint vocational school district begins receiving payments under section 3317.16 of the Revised Code for fiscal year 2024 2026 or fiscal year 2025 2027 but does not receive payments for the fiscal year immediately preceding that fiscal year, the department shall establish the district's funding base, as that term is defined in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, as an amount equal to the absolute value of the sum of the associated adjustments of any local school district's funding base under division (C) of section 3317.019 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.163. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Credential-only program" means an industry-approved credentialing program, or a series of such programs, offered by a dropout prevention and recovery community school in which students enrolled in grades eleven and twelve may earn an industry-recognized credential approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. The program, or programs, shall align with a career-technical education program approved under section 3317.161 of the Revised Code. The dropout prevention and recovery community school shall offer the program, or programs, using classroom teachers employed by the school. (2) "Dropout prevention and recovery community school" has the same meaning as in section 3319.301 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code to the contrary, all of the following shall apply: (1) For the purposes of sections 3317.014, 3317.022, and 3317.026 of the Revised Code, the department of education and workforce shall adjust the career-technical education ADM of a dropout prevention and recovery community school that offers a credential-only program so that each student enrolled in that program is included only in the school's category one career-technical education ADM, regardless of whether the credential-only program includes programs described in division (A)(1) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. (2) For funding purposes, the department shall count each student enrolled in a credential-only program as a full-time student. (3) A dropout prevention and recovery community school that offers a credential-only program may provide support services to students who graduate from the school to assist them in securing post-secondary placement opportunities, including careers with state, regional, or local labor organizations. For that purpose, the school may use a portion of the career-technical education funds received under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code to provide recent graduates, in the year following their graduation from the school, with short-term, emergency financial assistance for expenses related to child care, housing, food insecurity, transportation, and services including but not limited to health care, dental care, mental health care, and addiction treatment services. Sec. 3317.165. (A)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the department of education and workforce shall calculate a joint vocational school district's per-pupil local capacity amount according to the following formula: (0.0005 X the lesser of the district's three-year average valuation or the district's most recent valuation) / (the district's base cost enrolled ADM) (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall calculate a district's per-pupil local capacity amount in a manner determined by the general assembly. (B)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the department shall calculate a joint vocational school district's state share percentage according to the following formula: (The district's base cost per pupil for the fiscal year - the district's per-pupil local capacity amount for the fiscal year) / (the district's base cost per pupil for the fiscal year) If the result is less than 0.10, the state share percentage shall be 0.10. (2) For fiscal year 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the department shall calculate the state share percentage for a joint vocational school district in a manner determined by the general assembly. Sec. 3317.20. This section does not apply to preschool children with disabilities. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Applicable special education amount" means the amount specified in section 3317.013 of the Revised Code for a disability described in that section. (2) "Child's school district" means the school district in which a child is entitled to attend school pursuant to section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (3) "State share percentage" means the state share percentage of the child's school district. (B) The department shall annually pay each county board of developmental disabilities for each child with a disability, other than a preschool child with a disability, for whom the county board provides special education and related services an amount equal to the following: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the statewide average base cost per pupil + (state share percentage X the applicable special education multiple X the statewide average base cost per pupil); (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount determined by the general assembly. (C) Each county board of developmental disabilities shall report to the department, in the manner specified by the department, the name of each child for whom the county board of developmental disabilities provides special education and related services and the child's school district. (D)(1) For the purpose of verifying the accuracy of the payments under this section, the department may request from either of the following entities the data verification code assigned under division (D)(2) of section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code to any child who is placed with a county board of developmental disabilities: (a) The child's school district; (b) The independent contractor engaged to create and maintain data verification codes. (2) Upon a request by the department under division (D)(1) of this section for the data verification code of a child, the child's school district shall submit that code to the department in the manner specified by the department. If the child has not been assigned a code, the district shall assign a code to that child and submit the code to the department by a date specified by the department. If the district does not assign a code to the child by the specified date, the department shall assign a code to the child. The department annually shall submit to each school district the name and data verification code of each child residing in the district for whom the department has assigned a code under this division. (3) The department shall not release any data verification code that it receives under division (D) of this section to any person except as provided by law. (E) Any document relative to special education and related services provided by a county board of developmental disabilities that the department holds in its files that contains both a student's name or other personally identifiable information and the student's data verification code shall not be a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.201. This section does not apply to preschool children with disabilities. (A) As used in this section, the "total special education amount" for an institution means the following: (1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, the sum of the following amounts: (a) The number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code multiplied by the multiple specified in that division multiplied by the statewide average base cost per pupil; (b) The number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code multiplied by the multiple specified in that division multiplied by the statewide average base cost per pupil; (c) The number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code multiplied by the multiple specified in that division multiplied by the statewide average base cost per pupil; (d) The number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code multiplied by the multiple specified in that division multiplied by the statewide average base cost per pupil; (e) The number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code multiplied by the multiple specified in that division multiplied by the statewide average base cost per pupil; (f) The number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code multiplied by the multiple specified in that division multiplied by the statewide average base cost per pupil. (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the following amounts: (a) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (A) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (b) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (B) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (c) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (C) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (d) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (D) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (e) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (E) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code; (f) An amount calculated in a manner determined by the general assembly times the number of children certified by the institution under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code as receiving services for a disability described in division (F) of section 3317.013 of the Revised Code. (B) For each fiscal year, the department of education and workforce shall pay each state institution required to provide special education services under division (A) of section 3323.091 of the Revised Code an amount equal to the institution's total special education amount. Sec. 3317.22. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Eligible internet- or computer-based community school" means an internet- or computer-based community school in which a majority of the students were enrolled in that is a dropout prevention and recovery programcommunity school, as defined in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Statewide average base cost per-pupil" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (3) "Internet- or computer-based community school" has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall establish a program to provide additional funding for students enrolled in grades eight through twelve in eligible internet- or computer-based community schools. An eligible internet- or computer-based community school may choose to participate in the program by notifying the department not later than the first day of February of the school year in which the school will participate in the program in a form and manner determined by the department. (C) The department shall require each eligible internet- or computer-based community school that chooses to participate in the program to report all information that is necessary to make payments under division (D) of this section. (D) The department shall calculate an additional payment for each eligible internet- or computer-based community school that chooses to participate in the program, as follows: (1) Compute the lesser of the following for each student enrolled in grades eight through twelve: (a) The statewide average base cost per-pupil X the maximum full-time equivalency for the portion of the school year for which the student is enrolled in the school; (b) The sum of the following: (i) A one-time payment of $1,750. In the case of a student enrolled in the school for the first time for the school year for which the payment is being made, payment shall be made under division (D)(1)(b)(i) of this section at least thirty days after the student is considered to be enrolled in the school in accordance with division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code, provided the student has been continuously enrolled in the school during that time, as determined by the department. In the case of a student that was enrolled in the school for the prior school year, payment shall be made under division (D)(1)(b)(i) of this section at least thirty days after the student has started to participate in learning opportunities for the school year for which the payment is being made, provided the student has been continuously enrolled in the school during that time, as determined by the department. (ii) The statewide average base cost per-pupil X (1/920) X the lesser of the number of hours the student participates in learning opportunities in that fiscal year or 920; (iii) The lesser of ($500 X either the number of courses completed by the student in that fiscal year, in the case of a student enrolled in grade eight, or the number of credits earned by the student in that fiscal year, in the case of a student enrolled in grades nine through twelve) or $2,500. (2) Compute the sum of the amounts calculated under division (D)(1) of this section for all students enrolled in grades eight through twelve. (3) Compute the school's payment in accordance with the following formula: (The amount determined under division (D)(2) of this section) - (the number of full-time equivalent students enrolled in grades eight through twelve in the school X the statewide average base cost per-pupil) If the amount computed under division (D)(3) is a negative number, the school shall not receive a payment under this section. (E)(1) The department may complete a review of the enrollment of each eligible internet- or computer-based community school that chooses to participate in the program in accordance with division (K) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code. If the department determines a school has been overpaid based on a review completed under division (E)(1) of this section, the department shall require a repayment of the overpaid funds and may require the school to establish a plan to improve the reporting of enrollment. (2) To the extent that an eligible internet- or computer-based community school that chooses to participate in the program had, for the prior school year, a percentage of student engagement in learning opportunities that was less than sixty-five per cent, the school shall provide to the department a meaningful plan for increasing student engagement. (3) All eligible internet- or computer-based community schools that choose to participate in the program shall implement programming or protocol which documents enrollment and participation in learning opportunities in order to participate in the program. Sec. 3317.25. (A) As used in this section, "disadvantaged pupil impact aid" means the following: (1) For a city, local, or exempted village school district, the funds received under division (A)(4)(a) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (2) For a joint vocational school district, the funds received under division (A)(3) of section 3317.16 of the Revised Code; (3) For a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, the funds received under division (A)(4)(b) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code; (4) For a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, the funds received under division (A)(4)(b) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school, or STEM school shall spend the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives for any of the following initiatives or a combination of any of the following initiatives: (a) Extended school day and school year; (b) Reading improvement and intervention that is aligned with the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction; (c) Instructional technology or blended learning; (d) Professional development in the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction for teachers of students in kindergarten through third grade; (e) Dropout prevention; (f) School safety and security measures; (g) Community learning centers that address barriers to learning; (h) Academic interventions for students in any of grades six through twelve; (i) Employment of an individual who has successfully completed the bright new leaders for Ohio schools program as a principal or an assistant principal under section 3319.272 of the Revised Code; (j) Mental health services, including telehealth services, community-based behavioral health services, and recovery supports; (k) Culturally appropriate, evidence-based or evidence-informed prevention services, including youth-led programming and curricula to promote mental health and prevent substance use and suicide, and trauma-informed services; (l) Services for homeless youth; (m) Services for child welfare involved youth; (n) Community liaisons or programs that connect students to community resources, including behavioral wellness coordinators and city connects, communities in schools, and other similar programs; (o) Physical health care services, including telehealth services and community-based health services; (p) Family engagement and support services; (q) Student services provided prior to or after the regularly scheduled school day or any time school is not in session, including mentoring programs. (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school shall spend the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives for one or more initiatives specified by the general assembly. (C)(1) For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school that is subject to the requirements of this section shall develop a plan for utilizing the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives in coordination with at least one of the following community partners: (a) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services established under Chapter 340. of the Revised Code; (b) An educational service center; (c) A county board of developmental disabilities; (d) A community-based community mental health prevention or treatment provider; (e) A board of health of a city or general health district; (f) A county department of job and family services; (g) A nonprofit organization with experience serving children; (h) A public hospital agency. (2) For fiscal year 2026 2028 and each fiscal year thereafter, each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school that is subject to the requirements of this section shall develop a plan for utilizing the disadvantaged pupil impact aid it receives in the manner specified by the general assembly, if the general assembly requires city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school districts, community schools, and STEM schools to develop such a plan. (D) After the end of each fiscal year, each city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, community school, and STEM school shall submit a report to the department of education and workforce describing the initiative or initiatives on which the district's or school's disadvantaged pupil impact aid were spent during that fiscal year. For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, this report shall be submitted in a manner prescribed by the department and shall also describe the amount of money that was spent on each initiative. (E) Starting in 2015, the department shall submit a report of the information it receives under division (C) of this section to the general assembly not later than the first day of December of each odd-numbered year in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3317.27. The quality community school support program is established. Under the program, the department of education and workforce shall pay each community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and designated as a community school of quality under section 3317.28 of the Revised Code an amount up to three thousand dollars in each fiscal year for each student identified as economically disadvantaged and up to two thousand two hundred fifty dollars in each fiscal year for each student that is not identified as economically disadvantaged. The payment for a fiscal year shall be calculated using the adjusted full-time equivalent number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year as of the date the payment is made, as reported by the school under section 3314.08 of the Revised Code. The department shall make periodic payments to each designated school beginning in January of that fiscal year. Sec. 3317.28. Not later than the thirty-first day of December of each fiscal year, the department of education and workforce shall designate as a community school of quality each community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that meets the criteria established in division (A), (B), (C), (D), or (E) of this section. (A) A community school qualifies as a community school of quality if the school meets all of the following criteria: (1) The school's sponsor was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on the sponsor's most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (2) The school received a higher performance index score than the school district in which the school is located on the two most recent report cards issued for the school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (3) The school received a performance rating of four stars or higher for the progress component on the most recent report card issued for the school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or is a school described under division (B) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code and did not receive a rating for the progress component on the most recent report card. (4) At least fifty per cent of the students enrolled in the school in the prior fiscal year were economically disadvantaged, as determined by the department. (B) A community school qualifies as a community school of quality if the school meets all of the following criteria: (1) The school's sponsor was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on the sponsor's most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (2) The school received a higher performance index score than the school district in which the school is located on the most recent report card issued for the school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (3) The school received a performance rating of three stars or higher for the progress component on the most recent report card issued for the school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (4) The school received a performance rating of three stars or higher for the achievement component on the most recent report card issued for the school under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (C) A community school qualifies as a community school of quality if the school meets all of the following criteria: (1) The school's sponsor was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on the sponsor's most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (2) The school is in its first year of operation or the school opened as a kindergarten school and has added one grade per year and has been in operation for less than four school years. (3) The school is replicating an operational and instructional model used by a community school described in division (A) of this section. (4) If the school has an operator, the operator received a rating of three stars or better on its most recent performance report published under section 3314.031 of the Revised Code. (D) A community school qualifies as a community school of quality if the school meets all of the following criteria: (1) The school's sponsor was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on the sponsor's most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (2) The school satisfies either of the following: (a) The school contracts with an operator that operates schools in other states and meets at least one of the following criteria: (i) Has operated a school that received a grant funded through the federal charter school program established under 20 U.S.C. 7221 within the five years prior to the date of application or received funding from the charter school growth fund; (ii) Meets all of the following criteria: (I) One of the operator's schools in another state performed better than the school district in which the school is located, as determined by the department. (II) At least fifty per cent of the total number of students enrolled in all of the operator's schools are economically disadvantaged, as determined by the department. (III) The operator is in good standing in all states where it operates schools, as determined by the department. (IV) The department has determined that the operator does not have any financial viability issues that would prevent it from effectively operating a community school in Ohio. (b) The school is replicating an operational and instructional model through an agreement with a college or university used by a community school or its equivalent in another state that performed better than the school district in which the school is located, as determined by the department. (3) The school is in its first year of operation or, if not in its first year of operation and qualifying under division (D)(2)(b) of this section, meets either of the following conditions: (a) The school opened on July 1, 2022, and has not previously been designated as a community school of quality under this section, in which case the first payment under section 3317.27 of the Revised Code shall be made on or before January 31, 2024, and shall be calculated based on the adjusted full-time equivalent number of students enrolled in the school for fiscal year 2024. (b) The school opened on or after July 1, 2019, and has not previously been designated as a community school of quality under this section, in which case the first payment under section 3317.27 of the Revised Code shall be made within thirty days of the effective date of this section and shall be calculated based on the adjusted full-time equivalent number of students enrolled in the school for the fiscal year for which the payment is being made. (E) A community school qualifies as a community school of quality if it meets all of the following criteria: (1) The school is a dropout prevention and recovery school as defined under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (2) The school's sponsor was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on the sponsor's most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (3) The school received an "exceeds standards" on the performance indicator prescribed under division (C)(2) of section 3314.017 of the Revised Code on the two most recent report cards issued for the school under section 3314.017 of the Revised Code. (4) The school is not an internet- or computer-based community school. (F) A school designated as a community school of quality under division (A), (B), (C), or (E) of this section shall maintain that designation for the two fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the school was initially designated as a community school of quality. A school designated as a community school of quality under division (D) of this section shall maintain that designation for the four fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the school was initially designated as a community school of quality. (G) A school designated a community school of quality may renew its designation each year that it satisfies the criteria under division (A) or (B) of this section. The school shall maintain that designation for the two fiscal years following each fiscal year in which the criteria under division (A) or (B) of this section are satisfied. (H) A school that was designated as a community school of quality for the first time under division (C) of this section for the 2022-2023 school year shall be considered to have maintained that designation for the 2022-2023 school year, shall maintain that designation through the 2029-2030 school year, and may renew its designation under division (G) of this section after that year. (I) If two or more community schools have merged or merge in accordance with division (B) of section 3314.0211 of the Revised Code on or after June 30, 2022, the surviving community school is eligible to receive funds under this program, provided it otherwise qualifies as a community school of quality under division (A), (B), (C), (D), or (E) of this section. In such a case, the payment for a fiscal year shall be calculated using the adjusted full-time equivalent number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year as of the date the payments are made, as reported by the surviving community school under section 3314.08 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether those students were previously enrolled in a community school that was dissolved as part of the merger. A community school qualified to receive funds under the program prior to merging on or after June 30, 2022, and was dissolved due to the merger, shall be considered to have been eligible for funds under the program prior to the effective date of this section and shall not be required to return any funds received prior to that date. Sec. 3317.29. (A) The quality independent STEM school support program is established. Under the program, the department of education and workforce shall pay each STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code and designated as an independent STEM school of quality under this section an amount up to three thousand dollars in each fiscal year for each student identified as economically disadvantaged and up to two thousand two hundred fifty dollars in each fiscal year for each student that is not identified as economically disadvantaged. The payment for a fiscal year shall be calculated using the adjusted full-time equivalent number of students enrolled in the school for that fiscal year as of the date the payment is made, as reported by the school under section 3326.32 of the Revised Code. The department shall make periodic payments to each designated school beginning in January of a fiscal year. (B) Not later than the thirty-first day of December each fiscal year, the department shall designate a STEM school as an independent STEM school of quality if the school satisfies all of the following criteria: (1) The STEM school operates autonomously under section 3326.031 of the Revised Code. (2) The STEM school does not have a STEM school equivalent designation under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code. (3) The STEM school is not governed by a school district under section 3326.51 of the Revised Code. (4) The STEM school is not a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code. (5) The STEM school cannot levy taxes or issue tax-secured bonds in accordance with section 3326.49 of the Revised Code. (6) The STEM school satisfies the requirements prescribed by section 3326.03 of the Revised Code. (7) The STEM school satisfies the requirements described in the quality model for STEM and STEAM schools established by the department of education and workforce in accordance with Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (C) A school designated as an independent STEM school of quality under this section shall maintain that designation for the two fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the school was initially designated as an independent STEM school of quality. (D) A school designated as an independent STEM school of quality may renew its designation each year that it satisfies the criteria under division (B) of this section. The school shall maintain that designation for the two fiscal years following each fiscal year in which the criteria under division (B) of this section are satisfied. This division applies to schools designated as an independent STEM school of quality based on the report cards issued in accordance with sections 3302.03 and 3326.17 of the Revised Code for the 2017-2018 and 2018-2019 school years. Sec. 3317.31. The department of education and workforce shall pay each community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and each STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code an amount equal to twenty-five dollars in each fiscal year for each full-time equivalent student in an internet- or computer-based community school and one thousand dollars in each fiscal year for each full-time equivalent student in all other community or STEM schools for assistance with the cost associated with facilities. Sec. 3318.01. As used in sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code: (A) "Ohio facilities construction commission" means the commission created pursuant to section 123.20 of the Revised Code. (B) "Classroom facilities" means rooms in which pupils regularly assemble in public school buildings to receive instruction and education and such facilities and building improvements for the operation and use of such rooms as may be needed in order to provide a complete educational program, and may include space within which a child care facility or a community resource center is housed. "Classroom facilities" includes any space necessary for the operation of a vocational education program for secondary students in any school district that operates such a program. (C) "Project" means a project to construct or acquire classroom facilities, or to reconstruct or make additions to existing classroom facilities, to be used for housing the applicable school district and its functions. (D) "School district" means a local, exempted village, or city school district as such districts are defined in Chapter 3311. of the Revised Code, acting as an agency of state government, performing essential governmental functions of state government pursuant to sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code. For purposes of assistance provided under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, the term "school district" as used in this section and in divisions (A), (C), and (D) of section 3318.03 and in sections 3318.031, 3318.042, 3318.07, 3318.08, 3318.083, 3318.084, 3318.085, 3318.086, 3318.10, 3318.11, 3318.12, 3318.13, 3318.14, 3318.15, 3318.16, and 3318.20 of the Revised Code means a joint vocational school district established pursuant to section 3311.18 of the Revised Code. (E) "School district board" means the board of education of a school district. (F) "Net bonded indebtedness" means the difference between the sum of the par value of all outstanding and unpaid bonds and notes which a school district board is obligated to pay and any amounts the school district is obligated to pay under lease-purchase agreements entered into under section 3313.375 of the Revised Code, and the amount held in the sinking fund and other indebtedness retirement funds for their redemption. Notes issued for school buses in accordance with section 3327.08 of the Revised Code, notes issued in anticipation of the collection of current revenues, and bonds issued to pay final judgments shall not be considered in calculating the net bonded indebtedness. "Net bonded indebtedness" does not include indebtedness arising from the acquisition of land to provide a site for classroom facilities constructed, acquired, or added to pursuant to sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code or the par value of bonds that have been authorized by the electors and the proceeds of which will be used by the district to provide any part of its portion of the basic project cost. (G) "Board of elections" means the board of elections of the county containing the most populous portion of the school district. (H) "County auditor" means the auditor of the county in which the greatest value of taxable property of such school district is located. (I) "Tax duplicates" means the general tax lists and duplicates prescribed by sections 319.28 and 319.29 of the Revised Code. (J) "Required level of indebtedness" means: (1) In the case of school districts in the first percentile, five per cent of the district's valuation for the year preceding the year in which the controlling board approved the project under section 3318.04 of the Revised Code. (2) In the case of school districts ranked in a subsequent percentile, five per cent of the district's valuation for the year preceding the year in which the controlling board approved the project under section 3318.04 of the Revised Code, plus [two one-hundredths of one per cent multiplied by (the percentile in which the district ranks for the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year in which the controlling board approved the district's project minus one)]. (K) "Required percentage of the basic project costs" means one per cent of the basic project costs times the percentile in which the school district ranks for the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year in which the controlling board approved the district's project. (L) "Basic project cost" means a cost amount determined in accordance with rules adopted under section 111.15 of the Revised Code by the Ohio facilities construction commission. The basic project cost calculation shall take into consideration the square footage and cost per square foot necessary for the grade levels to be housed in the classroom facilities, the variation across the state in construction and related costs, the cost of the installation of site utilities and site preparation, the cost of demolition of all or part of any existing classroom facilities that are abandoned under the project, the cost of insuring the project until it is completed, any contingency reserve amount prescribed by the commission under section 3318.086 of the Revised Code, and the professional planning, administration, and design fees that a school district may have to pay to undertake a classroom facilities project. For a joint vocational school district that receives assistance under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, the basic project cost calculation for a project under those sections shall also take into account the types of laboratory spaces and program square footages needed for the vocational education programs for high school students offered by the school district. For a district that opts to divide its entire classroom facilities needs into segments, as authorized by section 3318.034 of the Revised Code, "basic project cost" means the cost determined in accordance with this division of a segment. (M)(1) Except for a joint vocational school district that receives assistance under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, a "school district's portion of the basic project cost" means the amount determined under section 3318.032 of the Revised Code. (2) For a joint vocational school district that receives assistance under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, a "school district's portion of the basic project cost" means the amount determined under division (C) of section 3318.42 of the Revised Code. (N) "Child care facility" means space within a classroom facility in which the needs of infants, toddlers, preschool children, and school children are provided for by persons other than the parent or guardian of such children for any part of the day, including persons not employed by the school district operating such classroom facility. (O) "Community resource center" means space within a classroom facility in which comprehensive services that support the needs of families and children are provided by community-based social service providers. (P) "Valuation" means the total value of all property in the school district as listed and assessed for taxation on the tax duplicates. (Q) "Percentile" means the percentile in which the school district is ranked pursuant to section 3318.011 of the Revised Code. (R) "Installation of site utilities" means the installation of a site domestic water system, site fire protection system, site gas distribution system, site sanitary system, site storm drainage system, and site telephone and data system. (S) "Site preparation" means the earthwork necessary for preparation of the building foundation system, the paved pedestrian and vehicular circulation system, playgrounds on the project site, and lawn and planting on the project site. (T) "The county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3318.032. (A) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (C)(B), (D), and (D)(E) of this section, the portion of the basic project cost supplied by the school district shall be the greater of: (1) The required percentage of the basic project costs; . (2)(a)(B) For all districts except a district that opts to divide its entire classroom facilities needs into segments to be completed separately as authorized by section 3318.034 of the Revised Code, an amount necessary to raise the school district's net bonded indebtedness the portion of the basic project cost supplied by the school district for the first segment shall be calculated using the required percentage of the basic project costs, as of the date the controlling board approved the project, to within five thousand dollars of the required level of indebtedness;. Any future segment's portion of the basic project cost shall use the same respective share as the first segment. (b) For a district that opts to divide its entire classroom facilities needs into segments to be completed separately as authorized by section 3318.034 of the Revised Code, an amount necessary to raise the school district's net bonded indebtedness, as of the date the controlling board approved the project, to within five thousand dollars of the following: The required level of indebtedness X (the basic project cost of the segment as approved by the controlling board / the estimated basic project cost of the district's entire classroom facilities needs as determined jointly by the staff of the Ohio facilities construction commission and the district) (B)(C) The amount of the district's share determined under this section shall be calculated only as of the date the controlling board approved the project, and that amount applies throughout the sixteen-month period permitted under section 3318.05 of the Revised Code for the district's electors to approve the propositions described in that section. If the amount reserved and encumbered for a project is released because the electors do not approve those propositions within that period, and the school district later receives the controlling board's approval for the project, subject to a new project scope and estimated costs under section 3318.054 of the Revised Code, the district's portion shall be recalculated in accordance with this section as of the date of the controlling board's subsequent approval. (C)(D) At no time shall a school district's portion of the basic project cost be greater than ninety-five per cent of the total basic project cost. (D)(E) If the controlling board approves a project under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code for a school district that previously received assistance under those sections or section 3318.37 of the Revised Code within the twenty-year period prior to the date on which the controlling board approves the new project, the district's portion of the basic project cost for the new project shall be the lesser of the following: (1) The portion calculated under division (A) of this section; (2) The greater of the following: (a) The required percentage of the basic project costs for the new project; (b) The percentage of the basic project cost paid by the district for the previous project. Sec. 3318.051. (A) Any city, exempted village, or local school district that commences a project under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20, 3318.36, 3318.37, or 3318.38 of the Revised Code on or after September 5, 2006, need not levy the tax otherwise required under division (B) of section 3318.05 of the Revised Code, if the district board of education adopts a resolution petitioning the Ohio facilities construction commission to approve the transfer of money in accordance with this section and the commission approves that transfer. If so approved, the commission and the district board shall enter into an agreement under which the board, in each of twenty-three consecutive years beginning in the year in which the board and the commission enter into the project agreement under section 3318.08 of the Revised Code, shall transfer into the maintenance fund required by division (D) of section 3318.05 of the Revised Code not less than an amount equal to one-half mill for each dollar of the district's valuation unless and until the agreement to make those transfers is rescinded by the district board pursuant to division (F) of this section. (B) On the first day of July each year, or on an alternative date prescribed by the commission, the district treasurer shall certify to the commission and the auditor of state that the amount required for the year has been transferred. The auditor of state shall include verification of the transfer as part of any audit of the district under section 117.11 of the Revised Code. If the auditor of state finds that less than the required amount has been deposited into a district's maintenance fund, the auditor of state shall notify the district board of education in writing of that fact and require the board to deposit into the fund, within ninety days after the date of the notice, the amount by which the fund is deficient for the year. If the district board fails to demonstrate to the auditor of state's satisfaction that the board has made the deposit required in the notice, the auditor of state shall notify the department of education and workforce. At that time, the department shall withhold an amount equal to ten per cent of the district's funds calculated for the current fiscal year under Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code until the auditor of state district notifies the department that the auditor of state is satisfied that the board has made the required transfer. (C) Money transferred to the maintenance fund shall be used for the maintenance or, upon approval of the Ohio facilities construction commission, upgrade of the facilities acquired under the district's project. (D) The transfers to the maintenance fund under this section does not affect a district's obligation to establish and maintain a capital and maintenance fund under section 3315.18 of the Revised Code. (E) Any decision by the commission to approve or not approve the transfer of money under this section is final and not subject to appeal. The commission shall not be responsible for errors or miscalculations made in deciding whether to approve a petition to make transfers under this section. (F) If the district board determines that it no longer can continue making the transfers agreed to under this section, the board may rescind the agreement only so long as the electors of the district have approved, in accordance with section 3318.063 of the Revised Code, the levy of a tax for the maintenance of the classroom facilities acquired under the district's project and that levy continues to be collected as approved by the electors. That levy shall be for a number of years that is equal to the difference between twenty-three years and the number of years that the district made transfers under this section and shall be at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each dollar of the district's valuation. The district board shall continue to make the transfers agreed to under this section until that levy has been approved by the electors. Sec. 3318.06. (A) After receipt of the conditional approval of the Ohio facilities construction commission, the school district board by a majority of all of its members shall, if it desires to proceed with the project, declare all of the following by resolution: (1) That by issuing bonds in an amount equal to the school district's portion of the basic project cost the district is unable to provide adequate classroom facilities without assistance from the state; (2) Unless the school district board has resolved to transfer money in accordance with section 3318.051 of the Revised Code or to apply the proceeds of a property tax or the proceeds of an income tax, or a combination of proceeds from such taxes, as authorized under section 3318.052 of the Revised Code, that to qualify for such state assistance it is necessary to do either of the following: (a) Levy a tax outside the ten-mill limitation the proceeds of which shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining and upgrading the classroom facilities included in the project. The use of the proceeds for upgrades is subject to the approval by the commission under division (E) of section 3318.05 of the Revised Code. (b) Earmark for maintenance of classroom facilities from the proceeds of an existing permanent improvement tax levied under section 5705.21 of the Revised Code, if such tax can be used for maintenance, an amount equivalent to the amount of the additional tax otherwise required under this section and sections 3318.05 and 3318.08 of the Revised Code. (3) That the question of any tax levy specified in a resolution described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section, if required, shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at the next general or primary election, if there be a general or primary election not less than ninety and not more than one hundred ten days after the day of the adoption of such resolution or, if not, at a special election to be held at a time specified in the resolution which shall be not less than ninety days after the day of the adoption of the resolution and which shall be in accordance with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. Such resolution shall also state that the question of issuing bonds of the board shall be combined in a single proposal with the question of such tax levy. More than one election under this section may be held in any one calendar year. Such resolution shall specify both of the following: (a) That the rate which it is necessary to levy shall be at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each one dollar of taxable value, and that such tax shall be levied for a period of twenty-three years; (b) That the proceeds of the tax shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining the classroom facilities included in the project or upgrading those facilities if approved by the commission. (B) A copy of a resolution adopted under division (A) of this section shall after its passage and not less than ninety days prior to the date set therein for the election be certified to the county board of elections. The resolution of the school district board, in addition to meeting other applicable requirements of section 133.18 of the Revised Code, shall state that the amount of bonds to be issued will be an amount equal to the school district's portion of the basic project cost, and state the maximum maturity of the bonds which may be any number of years not exceeding the term calculated under section 133.20 of the Revised Code as determined by the board. In estimating the amount of bonds to be issued, the board shall take into consideration the amount of moneys then in the bond retirement fund and the amount of moneys to be collected for and disbursed from the bond retirement fund during the remainder of the year in which the resolution of necessity is adopted. If the bonds are to be issued in more than one series, the resolution may state, in addition to the information required to be stated under division (B)(3) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code, the number of series, which shall not exceed five, the principal amount of each series, and the approximate date each series will be issued, and may provide that no series, or any portion thereof, may be issued before such date. Upon such a resolution being certified to the county auditor as required by division (C) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code, the county auditor, in calculating, advising, and confirming the estimated average annual property tax levy under that division, shall also calculate, advise, and confirm by certification the estimated average property tax levy for each series of bonds to be issued. Notice of the election shall include the fact that the tax levy shall be at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each one dollar of taxable value for a period of twenty-three years, and that the proceeds of the tax shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining or upgrading the classroom facilities included in the project. The notice shall also express the rate in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value and the county auditor's estimate of the amount the tax levy is estimated to collect for each tax year it is levied, as certified pursuant to section 5705.03 of the Revised Code. If the bonds are to be issued in more than one series, the board of education, when filing copies of the resolution with the board of elections as required by division (D) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code, may direct the board of elections to include in the notice of election the principal amount and approximate date of each series, the maximum number of years over which the principal of each series may be paid, the estimated additional average property tax levy for each series, and the first calendar year in which the tax is expected to be due for each series, in addition to the information required to be stated in the notice under divisions (E)(3)(a), (b), (c), (e), and (f) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the form of the ballot to be used at such election shall be: "A majority affirmative vote is necessary for passage. Shall bonds be issued by the ____________ (here insert name of school district) school district to pay the local share of school construction under the State of Ohio Classroom Facilities Assistance Program in the principal amount of $____________ (here insert principal amount of the bond issue), to be repaid annually over a maximum period of ____________ (here insert the maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid) years, and an annual levy of property taxes be made outside the ten-mill limitation, estimated by the county auditor to average over the repayment period of the bond issue ____________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $____________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of the bonds?" and, unless the additional levy of taxes is not required pursuant to division (C) of section 3318.05 of the Revised Code, "Shall an additional levy of taxes be made for a period of twenty-three years to benefit the ____________ (here insert name of school district) school district, the proceeds of which shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining (or upgrading if approved by the commission) the classroom facilities included in the project, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at the rate of __________ (here insert the number of mills, which shall not be less than one-half mill) mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value? FOR THE BOND ISSUE AND TAX LEVY AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE AND TAX LEVY " (2) If authority is sought to issue bonds in more than one series and the board of education so elects, the form of the ballot shall be as prescribed in section 3318.062 of the Revised Code. If the board of education elects the form of the ballot prescribed in that section, it shall so state in the resolution adopted under this section. (D) If it is necessary for the school district to acquire a site for the classroom facilities to be acquired pursuant to sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code, the district board may propose either to issue bonds of the board or to levy a tax to pay for the acquisition of such site, and may combine the question of doing so with the questions specified in division (B) of this section. Bonds issued under this division for the purpose of acquiring a site are a general obligation of the school district and are Chapter 133. securities. The form of that portion of the ballot to include the question of either issuing bonds or levying a tax for site acquisition purposes shall be one of the following: (1) "Shall bonds be issued by the ____________ (here insert name of the school district) school district to pay costs of acquiring a site for classroom facilities under the State of Ohio Classroom Facilities Assistance Program in the principal amount of $__________ (here insert principal amount of the bond issue), to be repaid annually over a maximum period of __________ (here insert maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid) years, and an annual levy of property taxes be made outside the ten-mill limitation, estimated by the county auditor to average over the repayment period of the bond issue __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of the bonds?" (2) "Shall an additional levy of taxes outside the ten-mill limitation be made for the benefit of the __________ (here insert name of the school district) school district for the purpose of acquiring a site for classroom facilities in the sum of $_________ (here insert annual amount the levy is to produce) estimated by the county auditor to average ________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for a period of _________ (here insert number of years the millage is to be imposed) years?" Where it is necessary to combine the question of issuing bonds of the school district and levying a tax as described in division (B) of this section with the question of issuing bonds of the school district for acquisition of a site, the question specified in that division to be voted on shall be "For the Bond Issues and the Tax Levy" and "Against the Bond Issues and the Tax Levy." Where it is necessary to combine the question of issuing bonds of the school district and levying a tax as described in division (B) of this section with the question of levying a tax for the acquisition of a site, the question specified in that division to be voted on shall be "For the Bond Issue and the Tax Levies" and "Against the Bond Issue and the Tax Levies." Where the school district board chooses to combine the question in division (B) of this section with any of the additional questions described in divisions (A) to (D) of section 3318.056 of the Revised Code, the question specified in division (B) of this section to be voted on shall be "For the Bond Issues and the Tax Levies" and "Against the Bond Issues and the Tax Levies." If a majority of those voting upon a proposition hereunder which includes the question of issuing bonds vote in favor thereof, and if the agreement provided for by section 3318.08 of the Revised Code has been entered into, the school district board may proceed under Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, with the issuance of bonds or bond anticipation notes in accordance with the terms of the agreement. Sec. 3318.061. This section applies only to school districts eligible to receive additional assistance under division (B)(2) of section 3318.04 of the Revised Code. The board of education of a school district in which a tax described by division (B) of section 3318.05 and levied under section 3318.06 of the Revised Code is in effect, may adopt a resolution by vote of a majority of its members to extend the term of that tax beyond the expiration of that tax as originally approved under that section. The school district board may include in the resolution a proposal to extend the term of that tax at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each dollar of taxable value for a period of twenty-three years from the year in which the school district board and the Ohio facilities construction commission enter into an agreement under division (B)(2) of section 3318.04 of the Revised Code or in the following year, as specified in the resolution. Such a resolution may be adopted at any time before such an agreement is entered into and before the tax levied pursuant to section 3318.06 of the Revised Code expires. If the resolution is combined with a resolution to issue bonds to pay the school district's portion of the basic project cost, it shall conform with the requirements of divisions (A)(1), (2), and (3) of section 3318.06 of the Revised Code, except that the resolution also shall state that the tax levy proposed in the resolution is an extension of an existing tax levied under that section. A resolution proposing an extension adopted under this section does not take effect until it is approved by a majority of electors voting in favor of the resolution at a general, primary, or special election as provided in this section. A tax levy extended under this section is subject to the same terms and limitations to which the original tax levied under section 3318.06 of the Revised Code is subject under that section, except the term of the extension shall be as specified in this section. The school district board and the county auditor shall proceed in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code. The board shall certify a copy of the resolution adopted under this section and the auditor's certification to the proper county board of elections not later than ninety days before the date set in the resolution as the date of the election at which the question will be submitted to electors. The notice of the election shall conform with the requirements of division (A)(3) of section 3318.06 of the Revised Code, except that the notice also shall state that the maintenance tax levy is an extension of an existing tax levy, the levy's estimated annual collections, and the levy's effective rate, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. The form of the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the existing tax levied to pay the cost of maintaining (or upgrading if approved by the Ohio facilities construction commission) classroom facilities constructed with the proceeds of the previously issued bonds, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at the rate of __________ (here insert the number of mills, which shall not be less than one-half mill) mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be extended until ________ (here insert the year that is twenty-three years after the year in which the district and commission will enter into an agreement under division (B)(2) of section 3318.04 of the Revised Code or the following year)? FOR EXTENDING THE EXISTING TAX LEVY AGAINST EXTENDING THE EXISTING TAX LEVY " Section 3318.07 of the Revised Code applies to ballot questions under this section. Sec. 3318.062. (A) If authority is sought to issue bonds in more than one series to pay the school district's portion of the basic project cost under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be: "Shall bonds be issued by the __________ (here insert name of school district) school district to pay the local share of school construction under the State of Ohio Classroom Facilities Assistance Program in the total principal amount of $__________ (total principal amount of the bond issue), to be issued in ______ (number of series) series, each series to be repaid annually over not more than ______ (maximum number of years over which the principal of each series may be paid) years, and an annual levy of property taxes be made outside the ten-mill limitation to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds and on any notes issued in anticipation of the bonds, at a rate estimated by the county auditor to average over the repayment period of each series as follows: __________ (insert the following for each series: "the __________ series, in a principal amount of $__________, that the county auditor estimates will require ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, commencing in __________ and first payable in __________)?" and, unless the additional levy of taxes is not required pursuant to division (C) of section 3318.05 of the Revised Code, "Shall an additional levy of taxes be made for a period of twenty-three years to benefit the __________ (here insert name of school district) school district, the proceeds of which shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining (or upgrading if approved by the Ohio facilities construction commission) the classroom facilities included in the project, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at the rate of __________ (here insert the number of mills, which shall not be less than one-half mill) mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value? For the bond issue Against the bond issue " (B) If it is necessary for the school district to acquire a site for the classroom facilities to be acquired pursuant to sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code, the district board may propose either to issue bonds of the board or to levy a tax to pay for the acquisition of such site, and may combine the question of doing so with the questions specified in division (A) of this section. Bonds issued under this division for the purpose of acquiring a site are a general obligation of the school district and are Chapter 133. securities. The form of that portion of the ballot to include the question of either issuing bonds or levying a tax for site acquisition purposes shall be one of the forms prescribed in division (D) of section 3318.06 of the Revised Code. (C) Where the school district board chooses to combine the question in division (A) of this section with any of the additional questions described in divisions (A) to (D) of section 3318.056 of the Revised Code, the question specified in division (A) of this section to be voted on shall be "For the Bond Issues and the Tax Levies" and "Against the Bond Issues and the Tax Levies." (D) If a majority of those voting upon a proposition prescribed in this section which includes the question of issuing bonds vote in favor of that issuance, and if the agreement prescribed in section 3318.08 of the Revised Code has been entered into, the school district board may proceed under Chapter 133. of the Revised Code with the issuance of bonds or bond anticipation notes in accordance with the terms of the agreement. Sec. 3318.063. If the board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district that has entered into an agreement under section 3318.051 of the Revised Code to make transfers of money in lieu of levying the tax for maintenance or upgrade of the classroom facilities included in the district's project determines that it no longer can continue making the transfers so agreed to and desires to rescind that agreement, the board shall adopt the resolution to submit the question of the tax levy prescribed in this section. The resolution shall declare that the question of a tax levy specified in division (F) of section 3318.051 of the Revised Code shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at the next general or primary election, if there be a general or primary election not less than seventy-five and not more than ninety-five days after the day of the adoption of such resolution or, if not, at a special election to be held at a time specified in the resolution which shall be not less than seventy-five days after the day of the adoption of the resolution and which shall be in accordance with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. Such resolution shall specify both of the following: (A) That the rate which it is necessary to levy shall be at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each one dollar of taxable value, and that such tax shall be levied for the number of years required by division (F) of section 3318.051 of the Revised Code; (B) That the proceeds of the tax shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining the classroom facilities included in the project. A copy of such resolution shall after its passage and not less than seventy-five days prior to the date set therein for the election be certified to the county board of elections. Notice of the election shall include the levy's estimated annual collections, the fact that the tax levy shall be at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each one dollar of taxable value for the number of years required by division (F) of section 3318.051 of the Revised Code, and that the proceeds of the tax shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining the classroom facilities included in the project. The notice shall also express the rate in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. The form of the ballot to be used at such election shall be: "Shall a levy of taxes be made for a period of ____________ (here insert the number of years, which shall not be less than the number required by division (F) of section 3318.051 of the Revised Code) years to benefit the ____________ (here insert name of school district) school district, the proceeds of which shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining (or upgrading if approved by the Ohio facilities construction commission) the classroom facilities included in the project, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at the rate of __________ (here insert the number of mills, which shall not be less than one-half mill) mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value? FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " Sec. 3318.12. (A) The Ohio facilities construction commission shall cause to be transferred to the school district's project construction fund the necessary amounts from amounts appropriated by the general assembly and set aside for such purpose, from time to time as may be necessary to pay obligations chargeable to such fund when due. All investment earnings of a school district's project construction fund shall be credited to the fund. (B)(1) The treasurer of the school district board shall disburse funds from the school district's project construction fund, including investment earnings credited to the fund, only upon the approval of the commission or the commission's designated representative. The commission or the commission's designated representative shall issue vouchers against such fund, in such amounts, and at such times as required by the contracts for construction of the project. (2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (B)(1) of this section, the school district board may, by a duly adopted resolution, choose to use all or part of the investment earnings of the district's project construction fund that are attributable to the district's contribution to the fund to pay the cost of classroom facilities or portions or components of classroom facilities that are not included in the district's basic project cost but that are related to the district's project. If the district board adopts a resolution in favor of using those investment earnings as authorized under division (B)(2) of this section, the treasurer shall disburse the amount as designated and directed by the board. However, if the district board chooses to use any part of the investment earnings for classroom facilities or portions or components of classroom facilities that are not included in the basic project cost, as authorized under division (B)(2) of this section, and, subsequently, the cost of the project exceeds the amount in the project construction fund, the district board shall restore to the project construction fund the full amount of the investment earnings used under division (B)(2) of this section before any additional state moneys shall be released for the project. (C) After a certificate of completion has been issued for a project under section 3318.48 of the Revised Code: (1) At the discretion of the school district board, any investment earnings remaining in the project construction fund that are attributable to the school district's contribution to the fund shall be: (a) Retained in the project construction fund for future projects; (b) Transferred to the district's maintenance fund required by division (B) of section 3318.05 or section 3318.43 of the Revised Code, and the money so transferred shall be used solely for maintaining the classroom facilities included in the project; (c) Transferred to the district's permanent improvement fund. (2) Any investment earnings remaining in the project construction fund that are attributable to the state's contribution to the fund shall be transferred to the commission for expenditure pursuant to sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 or sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code. (3) Any other surplus remaining in the school district's project construction fund shall be transferred to the commission and the school district board in proportion to their respective contributions to the fund. The commission shall use the money transferred to it under this division for expenditure pursuant to sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 or sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code. (D) Pursuant to appropriations of the general assembly, any moneys transferred to the commission under division (C)(2) or (3) of this section from a project construction fund for a project under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code may be used for future expenditures for projects under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, notwithstanding the two per cent annual limit specified in accordance with division (B) of section 3318.40 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3318.361. A school district board opting to qualify for state assistance pursuant to section 3318.36 of the Revised Code through levying the tax specified in division (D)(2)(a) or (D)(4) of that section shall declare by resolution that the question of a tax levy specified in division (D)(2)(a) or (4), as applicable, of section 3318.36 of the Revised Code shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at the next general or primary election, if there be a general or primary election not less than ninety and not more than one hundred ten days after the day of the adoption of such resolution or, if not, at a special election to be held at a time specified in the resolution which shall be not less than ninety days after the day of the adoption of the resolution and which shall be in accordance with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. Such resolution shall specify both of the following: (A) That the rate which it is necessary to levy shall be at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each one dollar of taxable value, and that such tax shall be levied for a period of twenty-three years; (B) That the proceeds of the tax shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining the classroom facilities included in the project or upgrading those facilities if approved by the Ohio facilities construction commission. A copy of such resolution shall after its passage and not less than ninety days prior to the date set therein for the election be certified to the county board of elections. Notice of the election shall include the levy's estimated annual collections, the fact that the tax levy shall be at the rate of not less than one-half mill for each one dollar of taxable value for a period of twenty-three years, and that the proceeds of the tax shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining or upgrading the classroom facilities included in the project. The notice shall also express the rate in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. The form of the ballot to be used at such election shall be: "Shall a levy of taxes be made for a period of twenty-three years to benefit the ____________ (here insert name of school district) school district, the proceeds of which shall be used to pay the cost of maintaining (or upgrading if approved by the Ohio facilities construction commission) the classroom facilities included in the project, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at the rate of __________ (here insert the number of mills, which shall not be less than one-half mill) mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value? FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " Sec. 3318.40. (A)(1) Sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code apply only to joint vocational school districts. (2) As used in sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code: (a) "Ohio facilities construction commission," "classroom facilities," "project," and "basic project cost" have the same meanings as in section 3318.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Acquisition of classroom facilities" means constructing, reconstructing, repairing, or making additions to classroom facilities. (B) There is hereby established the vocational school facilities assistance program. Under the program, the Ohio facilities construction commission shall provide assistance to joint vocational school districts for the acquisition of classroom facilities suitable to the vocational education programs of the districts in accordance with sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code. For purposes of the program, beginning July 1, 2003, the The commission annually may set aside up to two per cent a portion of the aggregate amount appropriated to it for classroom facilities assistance projects in the public school building fund, established under section 3318.15 of the Revised Code, and the school building program assistance fund, established under section 3318.25 of the Revised Code, to provide assistance to at least two joint vocational school districts per biennium. The amount set aside for this purpose shall be determined by the commission. (C) The commission shall not provide assistance for any distinct part of a project under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code that when completed will be used exclusively for an adult education program or exclusively for operation of a driver training school for instruction leading to the issuance of a commercial driver's license under Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code, except for life safety items and basic building components necessary for complete and continuous construction or renovation of a classroom facility as determined by the commission. (D) The commission shall not provide assistance under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code to acquire classroom facilities for vocational educational instruction at a location under the control of a school district that is a member of a joint vocational school district. Any assistance to acquire classroom facilities for vocational educational instruction at such location shall be provided to the school district that is a member of the joint vocational school district through other provisions of this chapter when that member school district is eligible for assistance under those provisions. (E) By September 1, 2003, the commission shall assess the classroom facilities needs of at least five joint vocational school districts, according to the order of priority prescribed in division (B) of section 3318.42 of the Revised Code, and based on the results of those assessments shall determine the extent to which amendments to the specifications adopted under section 3318.311 of the Revised Code are warranted. The commission, thereafter, may amend the specifications as provided in that section. (F) After the commission has conducted the assessments prescribed in division (E) of this section, the commission shall establish, by rule adopted in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code, guidelines for the commission to use in deciding whether to waive compliance with the design specifications adopted under section 3318.311 of the Revised Code when determining the number of facilities and the basic project cost of projects as prescribed in division (A)(1)(a) of section 3318.41 of the Revised Code. The guidelines shall address the following situations: (1) Under what circumstances, if any, particular classroom facilities are adequate to meet the needs of the school district even though the facilities do not comply with the specifications adopted under section 3318.311 of the Revised Code; (2) Under what circumstances, if any, particular classroom facilities will be renovated or repaired rather than replaced by construction of new facilities. Sec. 3318.45. (A) Unless division (B) of section 3318.44 of the Revised Code applies, if a joint vocational school district board of education proposes to issue securities to generate all or part of the school district's portion of the basic project cost of the school district's project under sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, the school district board shall adopt a resolution in accordance with Chapter 133. and section 3311.20 of the Revised Code. Unless the school district board seeks authority to issue securities in more than one series, the school district board shall adopt the form of the ballot prescribed in section 133.18 of the Revised Code. (B) If authority is sought to issue bonds in more than one series, the form of the ballot shall be: "Shall bonds be issued by the __________ (here insert name of joint vocational school district) joint vocational school district to pay the local share of school construction under the State of Ohio Joint Vocational School Facilities Assistance Program in the total principal amount of $__________ (total principal amount of the bond issue), to be issued in ______ (number of series) series, each series to be repaid annually over not more than ______ (maximum number of years over which the principal of each series may be paid) years, and an annual levy of property taxes be made outside the ten-mill limitation to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds and on any notes issued in anticipation of the bonds, at a rate estimated by the county auditor to average over the repayment period of each series as follows: __________ [insert the following for each series: "the __________ series, in a principal amount of $__________, that the county auditor estimates will require ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, commencing in __________ and first payable in __________"]? For the bond issue Against the bond issue " (C) If it is necessary for the school district to acquire a site for the classroom facilities to be acquired pursuant to sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code, the district board may propose either to issue bonds of the board or to levy a tax to pay for the acquisition of such site and may combine the question of doing so with the question specified by reference in division (A) of this section or the question specified in division (B) of this section. Bonds issued under this division for the purpose of acquiring a site are a general obligation of the school district and are Chapter 133. securities. The form of that portion of the ballot to include the question of either issuing bonds or levying a tax for site acquisition purposes shall be one of the following: (1) "Shall bonds be issued by the ____________ (here insert name of the joint vocational school district) joint vocational school district to pay costs of acquiring a site for classroom facilities under the State of Ohio Joint Vocational School Facilities Assistance Program in the principal amount of $__________ (here insert principal amount of the bond issue), to be repaid annually over a maximum period of __________ (here insert maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid) years, and an annual levy of property taxes be made outside the ten-mill limitation, estimated by the county auditor to average over the repayment period of the bond issue __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of the bonds?" (2) "Shall an additional levy of taxes outside the ten-mill limitation be made for the benefit of the __________ (here insert name of the joint vocational school district) joint vocational school district for the purpose of acquiring a site for classroom facilities in the sum of $_________ (here insert annual amount the levy is to produce) estimated by the county auditor to collect $_____ annually and to average ________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for a period of _________ (here insert number of years the millage is to be imposed) years?" Where it is necessary to combine the question of issuing bonds of the joint vocational school district as described in division (A) of this section with the question of issuing bonds of the school district for acquisition of a site, the question specified in that division to be voted on shall be "For the bond issues" and "Against the bond issues." Where it is necessary to combine the question of issuing bonds of the joint vocational school district as described in division (A) of this section with the question of levying a tax for the acquisition of a site, the question specified in that division to be voted on shall be "For the bond issue and the tax levy" and "Against the bond issue and the tax levy." (D) Where the school district board chooses to combine a question specified in this section with any of the additional questions described in division (C) of section 3318.44 of the Revised Code, the question to be voted on shall be "For the bond issues and the tax levies" and "Against the bond issues and the tax levies." (E) If a majority of those voting upon a proposition prescribed in this section which includes the question of issuing bonds vote in favor of that issuance and if the agreement prescribed in section 3318.08 of the Revised Code has been entered into, the school district board may proceed under Chapter 133. of the Revised Code with the issuance of bonds or bond anticipation notes in accordance with the terms of the agreement. Sec. 3318.48. (A) When all of the following have occurred, a project undertaken by a school district pursuant to this chapter shall be considered complete and the Ohio facilities construction commission shall issue a certificate of completion to the district board of education: (1) All facilities to be constructed under the project, as specified in the project agreement entered into under section 3318.08 of the Revised Code, have been completed and the board has received a permanent certificate of occupancy for each of those facilities. (2) The commission has issued certificates of contract completion on all prime construction contracts entered into by the board under section 3318.10 of the Revised Code. (3) The commission has completed a final accounting of the district's project construction fund and has determined that all payments from the fund were made in compliance with all policies of the commission. (4) Any litigation concerning the project has been finally resolved with no chance of appeal. (5) All construction management services typically provided by the commission to school districts have been delivered and the commission has canceled any remaining encumbrance of funds for those services. (B) The commission may issue a certificate of completion to a district board prior to all of the conditions described in division (A) of this section being satisfied, if the commission determines that the circumstances preventing the conditions from being satisfied are so minor in nature that the project should be considered complete. When issuing a certificate of completion under this division, the commission may specify any of the following: (1) Any construction or work that has yet to be completed and the manner in which the board shall oversee its completion, which may include procedures for reporting progress to the commission and for accounting of expenditures; (2) Terms and conditions for the resolution of any pending litigation; (3) Any remaining responsibilities of the construction manager regarding the project. (C) The commission may issue a certificate of completion to a district board that does not voluntarily participate in the process of closing out the district's project, if the construction manager for the project verifies that all facilities to be constructed under the project, as specified in the project agreement entered into under section 3318.08 of the Revised Code, have been completed and the commission determines that those facilities have been occupied for at least one year. In that case, all funds due to the commission under division (C) of section 3318.12 of the Revised Code shall be returned to the commission not later than thirty days after receipt of the certificate of completion. If the funds due to the commission have not been returned within sixty days after receipt of the certificate of completion, the auditor of state commission shall issue a finding for recovery against the school district and shall request legal action certify a claim to the attorney general for collection under section 117.42 131.02 of the Revised Code. (D) Upon issuance of a certificate of completion under this section, the commission's ownership of and interest in the project, as specified in division (F) of section 3318.08 of the Revised Code, shall cease. This cessation shall not alter or otherwise affect the state's or commission's interest in the project or any limitations on the use of the project as specified in the project agreement pursuant to divisions (G), (M), and (N) of that section or as specified in section 3318.16 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3319.073. (A) The board of education of each city and exempted village school district and the governing board of each educational service center shall adopt or adapt the curriculum developed by the department of education and workforce for, or shall develop in consultation with public or private agencies or persons involved in child abuse prevention or intervention programs, a program of in-service training in the prevention of child abuse, violence, and substance abuse and the promotion of positive youth development. Each person employed by any school district or service center to work in a school as a nurse, teacher, counselor, school psychologist, or administrator shall complete at least four hours of the in-service training within two years of commencing employment with the district or center, and every five years thereafter. A person who is employed by any school district or service center to work in an elementary school as a nurse, teacher, counselor, school psychologist, or administrator on March 30, 2007, shall complete at least four hours of the in-service training not later than March 30, 2009, and every five years thereafter. A person who is employed by any school district or service center to work in a middle or high school as a nurse, teacher, counselor, school psychologist, or administrator on October 16, 2009, shall complete at least four hours of the in-service training not later than October 16, 2011, and every five years thereafter. (B) Each board shall incorporate training in school safety and violence prevention, including human trafficking content, into the in-service training required by division (A) of this section. For this purpose, the board shall adopt or adapt the curriculum developed by the department or shall develop its own curriculum in consultation with public or private agencies or persons involved in school safety and violence prevention programs. (C) Each board shall incorporate training on the board's harassment, intimidation, or bullying policy adopted under section 3313.666 of the Revised Code into the in-service training required by division (A) of this section. Each board also shall incorporate training in the prevention of dating violence into the in-service training required by that division for middle and high school employees. The board shall develop its own curricula for these purposes. (D) Each board shall incorporate training in youth suicide awareness and prevention into the in-service training required by division (A) of this section for each person employed by a school district or service center to work in a school as a nurse, teacher, counselor, school psychologist, or administrator, and any other personnel that the board determines appropriate. The board shall require each such person to undergo training in youth suicide awareness and prevention programs once every two years. For this purpose, the board shall adopt or adapt the curriculum developed by the department under section 3301.221 of the Revised Code or shall develop its own curriculum in consultation with public or private agencies or persons involved in youth suicide awareness and prevention programs. The training completed under this division shall count toward the satisfaction of requirements for professional development required by the school district or service center board, and the training may be accomplished through self-review of suitable suicide prevention materials approved by the board. (E) Each board shall incorporate training on child sexual abuse into the in-service training required by division (A) of this section. The training completed under this division shall count toward the satisfaction of requirements for professional development required by the school district or service center board. Any training provided under this section may be presented by either of the following, at their own discretion, so long as they have experience in handling cases involving child sexual abuse or child sexual violence: (1) Law enforcement officers; (2) ProsecutorsFor this purpose, the board shall develop its own curriculum in consultation with public or private agencies or persons involved in child sexual abuse prevention or child sexual violence prevention. Sec. 3319.088. As used in this section, "educational assistant" means any nonteaching employee in a school district who directly assists a teacher as defined in section 3319.09 of the Revised Code, by performing duties for which a license issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code is not required. (A) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, the state board of education shall issue educational aide permits and educational paraprofessional licenses for educational assistants and shall adopt rules for the issuance and renewal of such permits and licenses which shall be consistent with the provisions of this section. Educational aide permits and educational paraprofessional licenses may be of several types and the rules shall prescribe the minimum qualifications of education and health for the service to be authorized under each type. The prescribed minimum qualifications may require special training or educational courses designed to qualify a person to perform effectively the duties authorized under an educational aide permit or educational paraprofessional license. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (G) of this section, any application for a permit or license, or a renewal or duplicate of a permit or license, under this section shall be accompanied by the payment of a fee in the amount established under division (A)(B) of section 3319.51 of the Revised Code. Any fees received under this division shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the state board of education licensure fund established under division (B) of section 3319.51 occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. (2) Any person applying for or holding a permit or license pursuant to this section is subject to sections 3123.41 to 3123.50 of the Revised Code and any applicable rules adopted under section 3123.63 of the Revised Code and sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code. (C) Educational assistants shall at all times while in the performance of their duties be under the supervision and direction of a teacher as defined in section 3319.09 of the Revised Code. Educational assistants may assist a teacher to whom assigned in the supervision of pupils, in assisting with instructional tasks, and in the performance of duties which, in the judgment of the teacher to whom the assistant is assigned, may be performed by a person not licensed pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code and for which a teaching license, issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code is not required. The duties of an educational assistant shall not include the assignment of grades to pupils. The duties of an educational assistant need not be performed in the physical presence of the teacher to whom assigned, but the activity of an educational assistant shall at all times be under the direction of the teacher to whom assigned. The assignment of an educational assistant need not be limited to assisting a single teacher. In the event an educational assistant is assigned to assist more than one teacher the assignments shall be clearly delineated and so arranged that the educational assistant shall never be subject to simultaneous supervision or direction by more than one teacher. Educational assistants assigned to supervise children shall, when the teacher to whom assigned is not physically present, maintain the degree of control and discipline that would be maintained by the teacher. Educational assistants may not be used in place of classroom teachers or other employees and any payment of compensation by boards of education to educational assistants for such services is prohibited. The ratio between the number of licensed teachers and the pupils in a school district may not be decreased by utilization of educational assistants and no grouping, or other organization of pupils, for utilization of educational assistants shall be established which is inconsistent with sound educational practices and procedures. A school district may employ up to one full time equivalent educational assistant for each six full time equivalent licensed employees of the district. Educational assistants shall not be counted as licensed employees for purposes of state support in the school foundation program and no grouping or regrouping of pupils with educational assistants may be counted as a class or unit for school foundation program purposes. Neither special courses required by the regulations of the state board of education, prescribing minimum qualifications of education for an educational assistant, nor years of service as an educational assistant shall be counted in any way toward qualifying for a teacher license, for a teacher contract of any type, or for determining placement on a salary schedule in a school district as a teacher. (D) Educational assistants employed by a board of education shall have all rights, benefits, and legal protection available to other nonteaching employees in the school district, except that provisions of Chapter 124. of the Revised Code shall not apply to any person employed as an educational assistant, and shall be members of the school employees retirement system. Educational assistants shall be compensated according to a salary plan adopted annually by the board. Except as provided in this section nonteaching employees shall not serve as educational assistants without first obtaining an appropriate educational aide permit or educational paraprofessional license from the state board of education. A nonteaching employee who is the holder of a valid educational aide permit or educational paraprofessional license shall neither render nor be required to render services inconsistent with the type of services authorized by the permit or license held. No person shall receive compensation from a board of education for services rendered as an educational assistant in violation of this provision. Nonteaching employees whose functions are solely secretarial-clerical and who do not perform any other duties as educational assistants, even though they assist a teacher and work under the direction of a teacher shall not be required to hold a permit or license issued pursuant to this section. Following the determination of the assignment and general job description of an educational assistant and subject to supervision by the teacher's immediate administrative officer, a teacher to whom an educational assistant is assigned shall make all final determinations of the duties to be assigned to such assistant. Teachers shall not be required to hold a license designated for being a supervisor or administrator in order to perform the necessary supervision of educational assistants. (E) No person who is, or who has been employed as an educational assistant shall divulge, except to the teacher to whom assigned, or the administrator of the school in the absence of the teacher to whom assigned, or when required to testify in a court or proceedings, any personal information concerning any pupil in the school district which was obtained or obtainable by the educational assistant while so employed. Violation of this provision is grounds for disciplinary action or dismissal, or both. (F) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, the superintendent of a school district may allow an employee who does not hold a permit or license issued under this section to work as a substitute for an educational assistant who is absent on account of illness or on a leave of absence, or to fill a temporary position created by an emergency, provided that the superintendent believes the employee's application materials indicate that the employee is qualified to obtain a permit or license under this section. An employee shall begin work as a substitute under this division not earlier than on the date on which the employee files an application with the state board for a permit or license under this section. An employee shall cease working as a substitute under this division on the earliest of the following: (1) The date on which the employee files a valid permit or license issued under this section with the superintendent; (2) The date on which the employee is denied a permit or license under this section; (3) Sixty days following the date on which the employee began work as a substitute under this division. The superintendent shall ensure that an employee assigned to work as a substitute under division (F) of this section has undergone a criminal records check in accordance with section 3319.391 of the Revised Code. (G) The state board shall issue an educational aide permit or educational paraprofessional license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a permit or license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as an educational aide or educational paraprofessional in a state that does not issue that permit or license or both. Sec. 3319.111. Notwithstanding section 3319.09 of the Revised Code, this section applies to any person who is employed under a teacher license issued under this chapter, or under a professional or permanent teacher's certificate issued under former section 3319.222 of the Revised Code, and who spends at least fifty per cent of the time employed providing student instruction. However, this section does not apply to any person who is employed as a substitute teacher or as an instructor of adult education. (A) The board of education of each school district, in consultation with teachers employed by the board, shall update its standards-based teacher evaluation policy to conform with either the framework for evaluation of teachers adopted under section 3319.112 of the Revised Code or a framework created or adopted by the board. The policy shall become operative at the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement covering teachers employed by the board that is in effect on November 2, 2018, and shall be included in any renewal or extension of such an agreement. (B) When using measures of student performance as evidence in a teacher's evaluation, those measures shall be high-quality student data. The board of education of each school district may use data from the assessments on the list developed under division (B)(2) of section 3319.112 of the Revised Code as high-quality student data. (C)(1) The board shall conduct an evaluation of each teacher employed by the board at least once each school year, except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section. The evaluation shall be completed by the first day of May and the teacher shall receive a written report of the results of the evaluation by the tenth day of May. (2)(a) The board may evaluate each teacher who received a rating of accomplished on the teacher's most recent evaluation conducted under this section once every three school years, so long as the teacher submits a self-directed professional growth plan to the evaluator that focuses on specific areas identified in the observations and evaluation and the evaluator determines that the teacher is making progress on that plan. (b) The board may evaluate each teacher who received a rating of skilled on the teacher's most recent evaluation conducted under this section once every two years, so long as the teacher and evaluator jointly develop a professional growth plan for the teacher that focuses on specific areas identified in the observations and evaluation and the evaluator determines that the teacher is making progress on that plan. (c) For each teacher who is evaluated pursuant to division (C)(2) of this section, the evaluation shall be completed by the first day of May of the applicable school year, and the teacher shall receive a written report of the results of the evaluation by the tenth day of May of that school year. (d) The board may elect not to conduct an evaluation of a teacher who meets one of the following requirements: (i) The teacher was on leave from the school district for fifty per cent or more of the school year, as calculated by the board. (ii) The teacher has submitted notice of retirement and that notice has been accepted by the board not later than the first day of December of the school year in which the evaluation is otherwise scheduled to be conducted. (e) The board may elect not to conduct an evaluation of a teacher who is participating in the teacher residency program established under section 3319.223 of the Revised Code for the year during which that teacher takes, for the first time, at least half of the performance-based assessment prescribed by the state board of education for resident educators. (3) In any year that a teacher is not formally evaluated pursuant to division (C) of this section as a result of receiving a rating of accomplished or skilled on the teacher's most recent evaluation, an individual qualified to evaluate a teacher under division (D) of this section shall conduct at least one observation of the teacher and hold at least one conference with the teacher. The conference shall include a discussion of progress on the teacher's professional growth plan. (D) Each evaluation conducted pursuant to this section shall be conducted by one or more of the following persons who hold a credential established by the state board of education for being an evaluator: (1) A person who is under contract with the board pursuant to section 3319.01 or 3319.02 of the Revised Code and holds a license designated for being a superintendent, assistant superintendent, or principal issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (2) A person who is under contract with the board pursuant to section 3319.02 of the Revised Code and holds a license designated for being a vocational director, administrative specialist, or supervisor in any educational area issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (3) A person designated to conduct evaluations under an agreement entered into by the board, including an agreement providing for peer review entered into by the board and representatives of teachers employed by the board; (4) A person who is employed by an entity contracted by the board to conduct evaluations and who holds a license designated for being a superintendent, assistant superintendent, principal, vocational director, administrative specialist, or supervisor in any educational area issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code or is qualified to conduct evaluations. (E) Notwithstanding division (A)(3) of section 3319.112 of the Revised Code, the board shall require at least three formal observations of each teacher who is under consideration for nonrenewal and with whom the board has entered into a limited contract or an extended limited contract under section 3319.11 of the Revised Code. (F) The board shall include in its evaluation policy procedures for using the evaluation results for retention and promotion decisions and for removal of poorly performing teachers. Seniority shall not be the basis for a decision to retain a teacher, except when making a decision between teachers who have comparable evaluations. (G) For purposes of section 3333.0411 of the Revised Code, the board annually shall report to the state board the number of teachers for whom an evaluation was conducted under this section and the number of teachers assigned each rating prescribed under division (B)(1) of section 3319.112 of the Revised Code or the equivalent framework created or adopted by the board, aggregated by the teacher preparation programs from which and the years in which the teachers graduated. The state board shall establish guidelines for reporting the information required by this division. The guidelines shall not permit or require that the name of, or any other personally identifiable information about, any teacher be reported under this division. (H) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code, the requirements of this section prevail over any conflicting provisions of a collective bargaining agreement entered into on or after November 2, 2018. Sec. 3319.173. (A) The superintendent of each school district shall assign teachers to positions based on the best interests of the students enrolled in the district. In assigning, reassigning, or transferring a teacher, whether voluntary or involuntary on the part of the teacher, the superintendent shall not use seniority or continuing contract status as the primary factor in determining the teacher's assignment. (B) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in section 4117.10 of the Revised Code, the requirements of this section prevail over any conflicting provisions of agreements between employee organizations and public employers entered into on or after the effective date of this section. Sec. 3319.223. (A) The superintendent of public instruction and the chancellor of higher education jointly shall establish the Ohio teacher residency program, which shall be a two-year, entry-level program for classroom teachers. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the teacher residency program shall include at least the following components: (1) Mentoring by teachers, which may be provided online or in person. The state superintendent shall provide participants and mentors with access to online professional development resources and sample videos of Ohio classroom lessons submitted for the assessment prescribed under division (A)(3) of this section at no cost. (2) Counseling, as determined necessary by the school district or school, to ensure that program participants receive needed professional development. The state superintendent shall provide to each participant who does not receive a passing score on the assessment under division (A)(3) of this section, at no cost, the opportunity to meet online with an instructional coach who is a certified assessor of the assessment to review the participant's assessment score results and discuss improvement strategies and professional development. Participants who choose to meet with an instructional coach shall select from an online pool of instructional coaches who have completed training and are approved by the state superintendent. The characteristics of each coach's school or district, including its size, typology, and demographics, shall be made available. However, participants shall not be required to choose an instructional coach from a similar district or school. Participants who have not taken the assessment under division (A)(3) of this section may meet online with instructional coaches approved by the state superintendent if the participant's school district or school pays the costs associated with the meetings. (3) Measures of appropriate progression through the program, which shall include the performance-based assessment prescribed by the state board of education for resident educators. The state board shall not limit the number of attempts to successfully complete the performance-based assessment. An individual may submit the assessment between the first Tuesday of October and the first Friday of April of the individual's second year of the program. The results of the assessment shall be returned within thirty days unless a new assessor is contracted, in which case the results shall be returned in forty-five days. The teacher evaluation system adopted under section 3319.111 of the Revised Code may be used to assess an individual participating in the teacher residency program. (B) No individual who is teaching career-technical courses under an alternative resident educator license issued under section 3319.26 of the Revised Code or rule of the state board shall be required to do either of the following: (1) Complete complete the conditions of the Ohio teacher residency program that a participant, as of September 29, 2015, would have been required to complete during the participant's first and second year of teaching under an alternative resident educator license. (2) Take a performance-based assessment. (C) The teacher residency program shall be aligned with the standards for teachers adopted by the state board under section 3319.61 of the Revised Code and best practices identified by the superintendent of public instruction. (D) Each person who holds a resident educator license issued under section 3319.22 or 3319.227 of the Revised Code or an alternative resident educator license issued under section 3319.26 of the Revised Code shall participate in the teacher residency program. Successful completion of the program shall be required to qualify any such person for a professional educator license issued under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3319.236. (A) Except as provided in section 3313.6033 of the Revised Code or in division (B) or (E) of this section, a school district shall require an individual to hold a valid educator license in computer science, or have a license endorsement in computer technology and a passing score on a content examination in the area of computer science, to teach computer science courses. (B) A school district may employ an individual, for the purpose of teaching computer science courses, who holds a valid educator license, provided the individual meets the requirements established by rules of the state board of education to qualify for a supplemental teaching license for teaching computer science. The rules shall require an applicant for a supplemental teaching license to pass a content examination in the area of computer science. The rules also shall permit an individual, after at least two years of successfully teaching computer science courses under the supplemental teaching license, to advance to a standard educator license in computer science by completing a pedagogy course applicable to the grade levels in which the individual is teaching. However, the rules may exempt an individual teaching computer science from the requirement to complete a pedagogy course if the individual previously completed a pedagogy course applicable to the grade levels in which the individual is teaching. (C) In order for an individual to teach advanced placement computer science courses, a school district shall require the individual to also complete a professional development program endorsed or provided by the organization that creates and administers national advanced placement examinations. For this purpose, the individual may complete the program at any time during the calendar year. (D) Notwithstanding section 3301.012 of the Revised Code, as used in this section, "computer science courses" means any courses that are reported in the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code as computer science courses and which are aligned to computer science standards adopted by the department of education and workforce. (E) The state board of education shall adopt rules to create a computer science teaching license for industry professionals to teach computer science to specific grades. The holder of a computer science teaching license for industry professionals shall be limited to teaching forty hours in a week in the subject area of computer science. The superintendent of public instruction shall consult with the chancellor of higher education in creating and revising the requirements for computer science teacher licensure. (F) Licenses issued under this section shall specify whether the educator is licensed to teach grades kindergarten through twelve, pre-kindergarten through five, grades four through nine, or grades seven through twelve. Sec. 3319.2310. (A) As used in this section, "other public school" has the same meaning as in section 3301.0711 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall do both of the following: (1) Maintain a training course for licensed educators that serves as an introduction to the science of reading; (2) Develop a competency-based training course for licensed educators that updates and reinforces educators' knowledge and skills in the science of reading. (C) Each individual employed by a school district or other public school as a teacher, administrator, school psychologist, or speech-language pathologist shall complete training in the science of reading in accordance with division (C) of this section. (1) An individual hired by the district or other public school as a teacher or administrator prior to July 1, 2025, shall complete the training described in division (B)(2) of this section by June 30, 2030, and every five years thereafter. (2) An individual hired by the district or other public school as a teacher or administrator on or after July 1, 2025, shall complete the training described in division (B)(1) of this section within one year after the date of hire and shall complete the training described in division (B)(2) of this section every five years thereafter. However, an individual shall not be required to complete the training described in division (B)(1) of this section if the district superintendent or head administrator of the other public school has verified that the individual did either of the following within five years prior to the date of hire: (a) Completed that training or a similar training, as determined by the department; (b) Completed appropriate coursework in the science of reading as part of the individual's educator or licensure preparation program. (3) An individual employed by the district or other public school as a school psychologist or speech-language pathologist shall complete the training described in division (B)(1) of this section by June 30, 2027, and shall complete the training described in division (B)(2) of this section every five years thereafter. (D) A professional development committee established under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code shall count training described in division (B) of this section toward professional development requirements for educator licensure renewal. The committee shall permit an individual to apply any hours earned over the minimum amount of hours required for professional development coursework for licensure renewal to the next renewal period for that license. Sec. 3319.263. Until July 1, 2028, notwithstandingNotwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3319.26 of the Revised Code or any rule of the state board of education adopted under that section, the state board shall not limit the subject areas for which an individual may receive an alternative resident educator license issued under that section. Sec. 3319.29. Each application for any license, certificate, or permit under this chapter, or renewal or duplicate of such a license, certificate, or permit, shall be accompanied by the payment of a fee in the amount established under division (A)(B) of section 3319.51 of the Revised Code. Any fees received under this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the state board of education licensure fund established under division (B) of section 3319.51 occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. Any person applying for or holding a license, certificate, or permit under this chapter is subject to sections 3123.41 to 3123.50 of the Revised Code and any applicable rules adopted under section 3123.63 of the Revised Code and sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3319.301. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Dropout prevention and recovery community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code in which a majority of the students are enrolled in a dropout prevention and recovery program that is operated by the school has the same meaning as in section 3314.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Industry-recognized credential program" means a career-technical course in which a student may earn an industry-recognized credential approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code. (3) "STEM school" means a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (B) The state board of education shall issue permits to individuals who are not licensed as required by sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code, but who are otherwise qualified, to teach classes for not more than a total of twelve hours a week, except that an individual teaching in a STEM school or an individual teaching an industry-recognized credential program offered at a dropout prevention and recovery community school may teach classes for not more than a total of forty hours a week. The state board, by rule, shall set forth the qualifications, other than licensure under sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code, to be met by individuals in order to be issued a permit as provided in this section. Such qualifications shall include the possession of a baccalaureate, master's, or doctoral degree in, or significant experience related to, the subject the individual is to teach. For an individual assigned to teach a career-technical class, significant experience related to a subject shall include career-technical experience. Applications for permits pursuant to this section shall be made in accordance with section 3319.29 of the Revised Code. A permit issued under this section shall be renewable. The state board, by rule, shall authorize the board of education of each school district and each STEM school to engage individuals holding permits issued under this section to teach classes for not more than the total number of hours a week specified in the permit. The rules shall include provisions with regard to each of the following: (1) That a board of education or STEM school shall engage a nonlicensed individual to teach pursuant to this section on a volunteer basis, or by entering into a contract with the individual or the individual's employer on such terms and conditions as are agreed to between the board or school and the individual or the individual's employer; (2) That an employee of the board of education or STEM school who is licensed under sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code shall directly supervise a nonlicensed individual who is engaged to teach pursuant to this section until the superintendent of the school district or the chief administrative officer of the STEM school is satisfied that the nonlicensed individual has sufficient understanding of, and experience in, effective teaching methods to teach without supervision. (C) A nonlicensed individual engaged to teach pursuant to this section is a teacher for the purposes of Title XXXIII of the Revised Code except for the purposes of Chapters 3307. and 3317. and sections 3319.07 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code. Such an individual is not an employee of the board of education or STEM school for the purpose of Titles I or XLI or Chapter 3309. of the Revised Code. (D) Students enrolled in a class taught by a nonlicensed individual pursuant to this section and rules adopted thereunder shall receive the same credit as if the class had been taught by an employee licensed pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.30 of the Revised Code. (E) No board of education of any school district shall engage any one or more nonlicensed individuals if such employment displaces from employment an existing licensed employee of the district. (F) Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code does not apply to permits issued under this section. Sec. 3319.311. (A)(1) The state board of education, or the superintendent of public instruction on behalf of the board, may investigate any information received about a person that reasonably appears to be a basis for action under section 3319.31 of the Revised Code, including information received pursuant to section 3314.40, 3319.291, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, 5126.253, or 5153.176 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the board shall contract with the office of the Ohio attorney general to conduct any investigation of that nature. The board shall pay for the costs of the contract only from moneys in the state board of education licensure fund established under section 3319.51 of occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, all information received pursuant to section 3314.40, 3319.291, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, 5126.253, or 5153.176 of the Revised Code, and all information obtained during an investigation is confidential and is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. If an investigation is conducted under this division regarding information received about a person and no action is taken against the person under this section or section 3319.31 of the Revised Code within two years of the completion of the investigation, all records of the investigation shall be expunged. (2) In the case of a person about whom the board has learned of a plea of guilty to, finding of guilt by a jury or court of, or a conviction of an offense listed in division (C) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code, or substantially comparable conduct occurring in a jurisdiction outside this state, the board or the superintendent of public instruction need not conduct any further investigation and shall take the action required by division (C) or (F) of that section. Except as provided in division (G) of this section, all information obtained by the board or the superintendent of public instruction pertaining to the action is a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (B) The superintendent of public instruction shall review the results of each investigation of a person conducted under division (A)(1) of this section and shall determine, on behalf of the state board, whether the results warrant initiating action under division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. The superintendent shall advise the board of such determination at a meeting of the board. Within fourteen days of the next meeting of the board, any member of the board may ask that the question of initiating action under section 3319.31 of the Revised Code be placed on the board's agenda for that next meeting. Prior to initiating that action against any person, the person's name and any other personally identifiable information shall remain confidential. (C) The board shall take no action against a person under division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code without providing the person with written notice of the charges and with an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (D) For purposes of an investigation under division (A)(1) of this section or a hearing under division (C) of this section or under division (E)(2) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code, the board, or the superintendent on behalf of the board, may administer oaths, order the taking of depositions, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents, and testimony. The issuance of subpoenas under this division may be by certified mail, regular mail with a certificate of mailing, or other form of delivery with proof of delivery, including electronic delivery with electronic proof of delivery, or personal delivery to the person. (E) The superintendent, on behalf of the board, may enter into a consent agreement with a person against whom action is being taken under division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code. The board may adopt rules governing the superintendent's action under this division. (F) No surrender of a license shall be effective until the board takes action to accept the surrender unless the surrender is pursuant to a consent agreement entered into under division (E) of this section. (G) The name of any person who is not required to report information under section 3314.40, 3319.313, 3326.24, 3328.19, 5126.253, or 5153.176 of the Revised Code, but who in good faith provides information to the state board or superintendent of public instruction about alleged misconduct committed by a person who holds a license or has applied for issuance or renewal of a license, shall be confidential and shall not be released. Any such person shall be immune from any civil liability that otherwise might be incurred or imposed for injury, death, or loss to person or property as a result of the provision of that information. (H)(1) No person shall knowingly make a false report to the superintendent of public instruction or the state board of education alleging misconduct by an employee of a public or chartered nonpublic school or an employee of the operator of a community school established under Chapter 3314. or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code. (2)(a) In any civil action brought against a person in which it is alleged and proved that the person violated division (H)(1) of this section, the court shall award the prevailing party reasonable attorney's fees and costs that the prevailing party incurred in the civil action or as a result of the false report that was the basis of the violation. (b) If a person is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (H)(1) of this section, if the subject of the false report that was the basis of the violation was charged with any violation of a law or ordinance as a result of the false report, and if the subject of the false report is found not to be guilty of the charges brought against the subject as a result of the false report or those charges are dismissed, the court that sentences the person for the violation of division (H)(1) of this section, as part of the sentence, shall order the person to pay restitution to the subject of the false report, in an amount equal to reasonable attorney's fees and costs that the subject of the false report incurred as a result of or in relation to the charges. Sec. 3319.51. (A)(1)(A) As used in this section, "operating expenses" includes the cost of administering requirements related to the issuance and renewal of licenses, certificates, or permits described in this chapter and sections 3301.071 and 3301.074 of the Revised Code and any other cost incurred by the state board of education to perform a duty prescribed by law. (B) The state board of education shall annually establish the amount of the fees required to be paid for any license, certificate, or permit issued under this chapter or division (B) of section 3301.071 or section 3301.074 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (A)(2) (C) of this section, the amount of these fees shall be such that they, along with any appropriation made to the fund established under division (B) of this section by the general assembly, will be sufficient to cover the annual estimated cost of administering the requirements related to the issuance and renewal of licenses, certificates, and permits described in this chapter and sections 3301.071 and 3301.074 of the Revised Codeoperating expenses of the state board. (2)(C) The state board shall not require any fee to be paid under division (A)(1) (B) of this section for a license, certificate, or permit issued for the purpose of teaching in a junior reserve officer training corps (JROTC) program approved by the congress of the United States under title 10 of the United States Code. (B) There is hereby established in the state treasury the state board of education licensure fund, which shall be used by the state board of education to pay the state board's operating expenses, including any cost incurred to perform a duty prescribed by law and the cost of administering requirements related to the issuance and renewal of licenses, certificates, and permits described in this chapter and sections 3301.071 and 3301.074 of the Revised Code. The fund shall consist of the amounts paid into the fund pursuant to division (B) of section 3301.071 and sections 3301.074 and 3319.29 of the Revised Code and any appropriations to the fund by the general assembly. (D) The operating expenses of the state board shall be paid primarily from, and all license, certificate, or permit fees received by the state board shall be deposited in, the state treasury to the credit of the occupational licensing and regulatory fund established in section 4743.05 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3320.04. Each school district board of education shall adopt a policy that reasonably accommodates the sincerely held religious beliefs and practices of individual students with regard to all examinations or other academic requirements and absences for reasons of faith or religious or spiritual belief system. The policy shall satisfy all of the following conditions: (A) The policy shall permit a student in any of grades kindergarten through twelve to be absent for up to three religious expression days each school year to take holidays for reasons of faith or religious or spiritual belief system or participate in organized activities conducted under the auspices of a religious denomination, church, or other religious or spiritual organization. The district shall not impose an academic penalty as a result of a student being absent as permitted in the policy. The policy shall also permit students to participate in interscholastic athletics or other extracurricular activities on days in which the student was otherwise absent for a religious expression day. (B)(1) The policy shall require that students be provided with alternative accommodations with regard to examinations and other academic requirements missed due to an absence described in division (A) of this section if not later than fourteen school days after the first day of school, or fourteen school days after the date of enrollment for a student who transfers to or enrolls in the district after the first day of school, the parent or guardian of a student provides the school principal with written notice of up to three specific dates for which alternative accommodations are requested, if an absence approved under division (B)(2) of this section conflicts with an examination or other academic requirement on that date. (2) The school principal shall approve not more than three written requests per school year from a student's parent or guardian for an excused absence under division (A) of this section. The school principal shall approve such requests without inquiry into the sincerity of a student's religious or spiritual belief system. However, the school principal may verify a request received under division (A) of this section by contacting the parent or guardian whose signature appears on the request. If a parent or guardian disputes having signed such a request, the school principal may deny the request. Upon approval of a request that satisfies division (B)(1) of this section, a school principal shall require the appropriate classroom teacher or teachers to schedule a time and date for an alternative examination or other academic requirement if the approved student absence creates a conflict, which may be before or after the time and date the examination or other academic requirement was originally scheduled. (C) The policy shall require the district board to post both of the following in a prominent location on the district's web site: (1) A copy of the policy adopted under this section, which shall include the contact information of an individual who can provide further information about the policy; (2) A nonexhaustive list of major religious holidays, festivals, and religious observations, which may include, Eid, Good Friday, Rosh Hashanah, Yom Kippur, and Passover, for which an excused absence under this section shall not be unreasonably withheld or denied. The director of education and workforce shall provide each district with a nonexhaustive list of major religious holidays or festivals for the next two school years, including Eid, Good Friday, Rosh Hashanah, Yom Kippur, and Passover, at the beginning of each school year. Each district may adopt the director's list in its entirety or choose which holidays to include on its list. Each time a district's policy is posted, printed, or published, including as described in divisions (C) and (D) of this section, the district shall include a statement that the list is nonexhaustive, and the list may not be used to deny accommodation to a student for a holiday or festival of the student's faith or religious or spiritual belief system that does not appear on the list. Nothing in this section, and no inclusion or exclusion of a religious holiday or festival on the list posted by a district, shall preclude a student from full and reasonable accommodations for any sincerely held religious beliefs and practices with regard to all examinations or other academic requirements and absences for reasons of faith or religious or spiritual belief system provided under this section. (D) The policy shall require school districts annually to convey to parents and guardians the policy adopted under this section, including a description of the general procedure for requesting accommodations. The manner in which the school district conveys the information shall be determined at the discretion of the district. (E) The policy shall include a procedure under which a student, parent, or guardian may notify the district of any grievance with regard to the implementation of the policy required under this section. (F) Any days excused under this section shall not be considered in determining absence hours for the purposes of parental notification under division (C)(1) of section 3321.191 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3321.043. (A) As used in this section, "driver education course" means a private driver training course approved by the director of public safety in accordance with Chapter 4508. of the Revised Code. (B) If a high school student enrolled in a school district is absent from school for the sole purpose of attending a driver education course, the district shall count that absence as an excused absence, up to a maximum of eight hours for that student. The student shall only be absent for up to two hours per day for not more than four days in meeting the maximum eight hours authorized by this section. The days may be nonconsecutive. No student may be released from a core curriculum subject course to attend a driver education course. (C) The district shall require any student absent from school in accordance with this section to complete any classroom assignments that the student misses because of the absence. Sec. 3321.16. (A) An attendance officer or assistant provided for by section 3321.14 or 3321.15 of the Revised Code may investigate any case of nonattendance at school or part-time school of a child under eighteen years of age or supposed to be under eighteen years of age resident in the district for which such attendance officer or assistant is employed, or of any such child found in the district or enrolled in any school within the district and of any child above eighteen years of age if enrolled in any school within the district, and may take such action as the superintendent of schools directs or as such attendance officer or assistant deems proper in the absence of specific direction. (B)(1) Subject to divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section, the attendance officer shall file a complaint in the juvenile court against a student on the sixty-first day after the implementation of an absence intervention plan or other intervention strategies, provided that all any student to which any of the following apply: (a) The student was absent without legitimate excuse from the public school the child is supposed to attend for thirty or more consecutive hours,. (b) The student was absent without legitimate excuse from the public school the child is supposed to attend for forty-two or more hours in one school month, or . (c) The student was absent without legitimate excuse from the public school the child is supposed to attend for seventy-two or more hours in a school year. (b) The school district or school has made meaningful attempts to re-engage the student through the absence intervention plan, other intervention strategies, and any offered alternatives to adjudication described under division (C)(2)(b) of section 3321.191 of the Revised Code. (c) The student has refused to participate in or failed to make satisfactory progress on the plan, as determined by the absence intervention team, or any offered intervention strategies or alternative to adjudication. (2) If the student, at any time during the implementation phase of the absence intervention plan or other intervention strategies, is absent without legitimate excuse for thirty or more consecutive hours or forty-two or more hours in one school month, the attendance officer shall file a complaint in juvenile court against that student, unless the absence intervention team has determined that the student has made substantial progress on the absence intervention plan student's district or school determines that the student and the student's family are making satisfactory progress in improving the student's attendance at school, the attendance officer shall not file a complaint. (3) In the event that the sixty-first day after the implementation of the absence intervention plan or other intervention strategies falls on a day during the summer months, in the school district's discretion, the absence intervention team or the attendance officer may extend the implementation of the plan and delay the filing of the complaint for an additional thirty days from the first day of instruction of the next school yearIf no determination of progress under division (B)(2) of this section is made, or if the student and the student's family cease to continue making progress in improving the student's attendance, the attendance officer shall file a complaint in the juvenile court against the student. A complaint filed in the juvenile court under division (B)(3) of this section shall allege that the child is an unruly child for being a habitual truant and that the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child has violated section 3321.38 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3321.19. (A) As used in this section and section 3321.191 3321.16 of the Revised Code, "habitual truant" has the same meaning as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. (B) When a board of education of any city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district or the governing board of any educational service center determines that a student in its district has been truant and the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child has failed to cause the student's attendance at school, the board may require the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child pursuant to division (B) of this section to attend an educational program established pursuant to rules adopted by the department of education and workforce for the purpose of encouraging parental involvement in compelling the attendance of the child at school. No parent, guardian, or other person having care of a child shall fail without good cause to attend an educational program described in this division if the parent, guardian, or other person has been served notice pursuant to division (C) of this section. (C) On the request of the superintendent of schools, the superintendent of any educational service center, the board of education of any city, exempted village, local, joint vocational, or cooperative education school district, or the governing board of any educational service center or when it otherwise comes to the notice of the attendance officer or other appropriate officer of the school district, the attendance officer or other appropriate officer shall examine into any case of supposed truancy within the district and shall warn the child, if found truant, and the child's parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child, in writing, of the legal consequences of being truant. When any child of compulsory school age, in violation of law, is not attending school, the attendance or other appropriate officer shall notify the parent, guardian, or other person having care of that child of the fact, and require the parent, guardian, or other person to cause the child to attend school immediately. The parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child shall cause the child's attendance at school. Upon the failure of the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child to do so, the attendance officer or other appropriate officer, if so directed by the superintendent, the district board, or the educational service center governing board, shall send notice requiring the attendance of that parent, guardian, or other person at a parental education program established pursuant to division (B) of this section and, subject to divisions (D) and (E) of this section, may file a complaint against the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child in any court of competent jurisdiction. (D)(1) Upon the failure of the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child to cause the child's attendance at school, if the child is considered an habitual truant, the board of education of the school district or the governing board of the educational service center, within ten days, subject to division (E) of this section, shall assign the student to an absence intervention team as described in division (C) of section 3321.191 of the Revised Code. (2) The attendance officer shall file a complaint in the juvenile court of the county in which the child has a residence or legal settlement or in which the child is supposed to attend school jointly against the child and the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child, in accordance with the timelines and conditions set forth in division (B) of section 3321.16 of the Revised Code. A complaint filed in the juvenile court under this division shall allege that the child is an unruly child for being an habitual truant and that the parent, guardian, or other person having care of the child has violated section 3321.38 of the Revised Code. (E) A school district with a chronic absenteeism percentage that is less than five per cent, as displayed on the district's most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, and the school buildings within that district, shall be exempt from the requirement to assign habitually truant students to an absence intervention team for the following school year and shall instead take any appropriate action as an intervention strategy contained in the policy developed by the district board pursuant to divisions (A) and (B) of section 3321.191 of the Revised Code. In the event that those intervention strategies fail, within sixty-one days after their implementation, the attendance officer shall file a complaint, provided that the conditions described in division (B) of section 3321.16 of the Revised Code are satisfied. Sec. 3321.191. (A) As used in this section, "chronically absent" means missing at least ten per cent of the minimum number of hours required in the school year under section 3313.48 of the Revised Code for the school a student attends. (B) Not later than August 1, 2026, the board of education of each school district shall adopt a policy to address student absences. In developing the policy, the board shall consult with the juvenile court of the county or counties in which the district is located; the parents, guardians, or other persons having care of a student attending school in the district; and appropriate state and local agencies. (C) The policy adopted under division (B) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Acknowledge that student absences from school for any reason, whether excused or unexcused, take away from instructional time and have an adverse effect on student learning; (2) Identify strategies to prevent students from becoming chronically absent; (3) Include procedures for notifying a student's parent, guardian, or custodian when the student has been absent from school for a number of hours determined by the board, which number shall not exceed five per cent of the minimum number of hours required in the school year under section 3313.48 of the Revised Code for the school the student attends; (4) Establish a tiered system that provides more intensive interventions and supports for students with greater numbers of absences and includes resources to help students and their families address the root causes of the absences; (5) Provide for one or more absence intervention teams to work with students at risk of becoming chronically absent and their families to improve the students' attendance at school; (6) Prohibit suspending, expelling, or otherwise preventing a student from attending school based on the student's absences as prescribed by section 3313.668 of the Revised Code. (D) The policy shall align with any other district or school improvement plan developed pursuant to state or federal law. (E) A district or school may consult or partner with public, nonprofit, or private entities to provide assistance as appropriate to students and their families in reducing absences. Sec. 3321.22. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, if If a complaint is filed against the parent, guardian, or other person in charge of a child for a failure to cause the child to attend school or a part-time school or class and if the parent, guardian, or other person proves an inability to do so, then the parent, guardian, or other person in charge of a child shall be discharged. Upon the discharge, the attendance officer shall file a complaint before the judge of the juvenile court of the county alleging that the child is a delinquent child, unruly child, or dependent child within the meaning of section 2151.022, 2151.04, or 2152.02 of the Revised Code. The judge shall hear the complaint and if the judge determines that the child is a delinquent, unruly, or dependent child within one of those sections the judge shall deal with the child according to section 2151.35 or 2151.36 of the Revised Code. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply regarding a complaint filed under division (D) or (E) of section 3321.19 of the Revised Code or otherwise filed and alleging that a child is an habitual truant. Sec. 3323.32. (A) The department of education and workforce shall contract with an entity to administer programs and coordinate services for infants, preschool and school-age children, and adults with autism and low incidence disabilities. The entity shall be selected by the director of education and workforce in consultation with the director of children and youth and the advisory board established under section 3323.33 of the Revised Code. When applicable, the department of children and youth shall contract with an entity to administer programs and coordinate services for infants, preschool and school-age children, and adults with autism and low incidence disabilities. The entity shall be selected by the director of children and youth in consultation with the director of education and workforce and the advisory board established under section 3323.33 of the Revised Code. The contract with the entity selected Any contract entered into under this section shall include, but not be limited to, the following provisions: (1)(A) A description of the programs to be administered and services to be provided or coordinated by the entity, which shall include at least the duties prescribed by sections 3323.34 and 3323.35 of the Revised Code; (2)(B) A description of the expected outcomes from the programs administered and services provided or coordinated by the entity; (3)(C) A stipulation that the entity's performance is subject to evaluation by the contracting department and renewal of the entity's contract is subject to the department's satisfaction with the entity's performance; (4)(D) A description of the measures and milestones the contracting department will use to determine whether the performance of the entity is satisfactory; (5)(E) Any other provision the contracting department determines is necessary to ensure the quality of services to individuals with autism and low incidence disabilities. (B) In selecting the entity under division (A) of this section, the director of education and workforce, the director of children and youth, and the advisory board shall give primary consideration to the Ohio Center for Autism and Low Incidence, established under section 3323.31 of the Revised Code, as long as the principal goals and mission of the Center, as determined by the director, the director, and the advisory board, are consistent with the requirements of divisions (A)(1) to (5) of this section. Sec. 3325.08. (A) A diploma shall be granted by the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services to any student enrolled in the state school for the blind or the state school for the deaf to whom all of the following apply: (1) The student has successfully completed the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the student for the student's high school education pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code; (2) Subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, the student has met the assessment requirements of division (A)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. (a) If the student entered the ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, the student either: (i) Has attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments prescribed by that division unless division (L) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code applies to the student; (ii) Has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (b) If the student entered the ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, the student has met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code, except to the extent that division (L) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code applies to the student. (3) The student is not eligible to receive an honors diploma granted pursuant to division (B) of this section. No diploma shall be granted under this division to anyone except as provided under this division. (B) In lieu of a diploma granted under division (A) of this section, the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall grant an honors diploma, in the same manner that the boards of education of school districts grant such diplomas under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code, to any student enrolled in the state school for the blind or the state school for the deaf who accomplishes all of the following: (1) Successfully completes the curriculum in any high school or the individualized education program developed for the student for the student's high school education pursuant to section 3323.08 of the Revised Code; (2) Subject to section 3313.614 of the Revised Code, has met the assessment requirements of division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, as applicable. (a) If the student entered the ninth grade prior to July 1, 2014, the student either: (i) Has attained at least the applicable scores designated under division (B)(1) of section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code on all the assessments prescribed under that division; (ii) Has satisfied the alternative conditions prescribed in section 3313.615 of the Revised Code. (b) If the student entered the ninth grade on or after July 1, 2014, the student has met the requirement prescribed by section 3313.618 of the Revised Code. (3) Has met additional criteria for granting an honors diploma. These additional criteria shall be the same as those prescribed by the state board department of education and workforce under division (B) of section 3313.61 of the Revised Code for the granting of such diplomas by school districts. No honors diploma shall be granted to anyone failing to comply with this division and not more than one honors diploma shall be granted to any student under this division. (C) A diploma or honors diploma awarded under this section shall be signed by the director of education and workforce and the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services. Each diploma shall bear the date of its issue and be in such form as the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services prescribes. (D) Upon granting a diploma to a student under this section, the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services shall provide notice of receipt of the diploma to the board of education of the school district where the student is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code when not residing at the state school for the blind or the state school for the deaf. The notice shall indicate the type of diploma granted. Sec. 3325.16. There is hereby created in the state treasury the state school for the deaf educational program expenses fund. Moneys received by Ohio deaf and blind education services for the state school for the deaf from donations, bequests, student fundraising activities, fees charged for camps and workshops, gate receipts from athletic contests, and the student work experience program operated by the school, and any other moneys designated for deposit in the fund by the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services, shall be credited to the fund. All investment earnings on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding section 3325.01 of the Revised Code, the approval of the department of education and workforce is not required to designate money for deposit into the fund. Ohio deaf and blind education services shall use moneys in the fund for educational programs, after-school activities, and expenses associated with student activities and clubs at the state school for the deaf. Sec. 3325.17. There is hereby created in the state treasury the state school for the blind educational program expense fund. Moneys received by Ohio deaf and blind education services for the state school for the blind from donations, bequests, student fundraising activities, fees charged for camps, workshops, and summer work and learn cooperative programs, gate receipts from school activities, and any other moneys designated for deposit in the fund by the superintendent of Ohio deaf and blind education services, shall be credited to the fund. All investment earnings on money in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding section 3325.01 of the Revised Code, the approval of the department of education and workforce is not required to designate money for deposit into the fund. Ohio deaf and blind education services shall use moneys in the fund for educational programs, after-school activities, and expenses associated with student activities at the state school for the blind. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.24, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.7118, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Sec. 3326.44. For fiscal years 2024 2026 and 20252027, a STEM school shall spend the funding it receives under division (A)(5) of section 3317.022 of the Revised Code only for services for English learners. Sec. 3326.51. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Resident district" has the same meaning as in section 3326.31 of the Revised Code. (2) "STEM school sponsoring district" means a municipal, city, local, or exempted village school district that governs and controls a STEM school pursuant to this section. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary: (1) If a proposal for a STEM school submitted under section 3326.03 of the Revised Code proposes that the governing body of the school be the board of education of a municipal, city, local, or exempted village school district that is one of the partners submitting the proposal, and the STEM committee approves that proposal, that school district board shall govern and control the STEM school as one of the schools of its district. (2) The STEM school sponsoring district shall maintain a separate accounting for the STEM school as a separate and distinct operational unit within the district's finances. The auditor of state, in the course of an annual or biennial audit of the school district serving as the STEM school sponsoring district, shall audit that school district for compliance with the financing requirements of this section. (3) With respect to students enrolled in a STEM school whose resident district is the STEM school sponsoring district: (a) The department of education and workforce shall make payments to the school in accordance with section 3317.022 of the Revised Code from the STEM school sponsoring district's state payments. (b) The STEM school sponsoring district is responsible for providing children with disabilities with a free appropriate public education under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (c) The STEM school sponsoring district shall provide student transportation in accordance with laws and policies generally applicable to the district. (4) With respect to students enrolled in the STEM school whose resident district is another school district, the department shall consider the students as open enrollment students and shall make payments to the school in accordance with section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. (5) A STEM school sponsoring district and its board may assign its district employees to the STEM school, in which case section 3326.18 of the Revised Code shall not apply. The district and board may apply any other resources of the district to the STEM school in the same manner that it applies district resources to other district schools. (6) Provisions of this chapter requiring a STEM school and its governing body to comply with specified laws as if it were a school district and in the same manner as a board of education shall instead require such compliance by the STEM school sponsoring district and its board of education, respectively, with respect to the STEM school. Where a STEM school or its governing body is required to perform a specific duty or permitted to take a specific action under this chapter, that duty is required to be performed or that action is permitted to be taken by the STEM school sponsoring district or its board of education, respectively, with respect to the STEM school. (7) No provision of this chapter limits the authority, as provided otherwise by law, of a school district and its board of education to levy taxes and issue bonds secured by tax revenues. (8) The treasurer of the STEM school sponsoring district or, if the STEM school sponsoring district is a municipal school district, the chief financial officer of the district, shall have all of the respective rights, authority, exemptions, and duties otherwise conferred upon the treasurer or chief financial officer by the Revised Code. Sec. 3327.017. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Eligible student" has the same meaning as in section 3327.016 of the Revised Code. (2) "Mass transit system" has the same meaning as in section 4511.78 of the Revised Code. (B) No city, local, or exempted village school district shall provide or arrange for transportation for any eligible student enrolled in any of grades kindergarten through eight in a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code or chartered nonpublic school to and from school using vehicles operated by a mass transit system, unless the district enters into an agreement with that school authorizing such transportation. An agreement under division (B) of this section shall not be effective unless both the school district and community or chartered nonpublic school approve it. (C) A city, local, or exempted village school district that elects to provide or arrange for transportation for any eligible student enrolled in any of grades nine through twelve in a community or chartered nonpublic school to and from school using vehicles operated by a mass transit system shall ensure that the student is assigned to a route that does not require the student to make more than one transfer. With respect to a mass transit system with a central transfer hub located in a county that has a population between five hundred thirty thousand and five hundred forty thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census, the city, local, or exempted village school district shall ensure that any transfer does not occur at the central transfer hub for the mass transit system. Sec. 3327.08. Boards of education of city school districts, local school districts, exempted village school districts, cooperative education school districts, and joint vocational school districts and governing boards of educational service centers may purchase on individual contract school buses, including multifunction school activity buses, and other equipment used in transporting children to and from school and to other functions as authorized by the boards, or the boards, at their discretion, may purchase the buses and equipment through any system of centralized purchasing established by the department of education and workforce for that purpose, provided that state subsidy payments shall be based on the amount of the lowest price available to the boards by either method of purchase. No board shall be deprived of any form of state assistance in the purchase of buses and equipment by reason of purchases of buses and equipment on an individual contract. The purchase of school buses and multifunction school activity buses shall be made only after competitive bidding in accordance with section 3313.46 of the Revised Code. All bids shall state that the buses, prior to delivery, will comply with the safety rules of the department of public safety adopted pursuant to section 4511.76 of the Revised Code and all other pertinent provisions of law. At no time shall bid bonds be required for the purchase of school buses and multifunction school activity buses, unless the district board or educational service center governing board requests that bid bonds be part of the competitive bidding process for a specified purchase. Sec. 3327.10. (A) Except as provided in division (L) of this section, no person shall be employed as driver of a school bus or motor van, owned and operated by any school district or educational service center or privately owned and operated under contract with any school district or service center in this state, who has not received a certificate from either the educational service center governing board that has entered into an agreement with the school district under section 3313.843 or 3313.845 of the Revised Code or the superintendent of the school district, certifying that such person is at least eighteen years of age and is qualified physically and otherwise for such position. The service center governing board or the superintendent, as the case may be, shall provide for an annual physical examination that conforms with rules adopted by the department of education and workforce of each driver to ascertain the driver's physical fitness for such employment. The examination shall be performed by one of the following: (1) A person licensed under Chapter 4731. or 4734. of the Revised Code or by another state to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or chiropractic; (2) A physician assistant; (3) A certified nurse practitioner; (4) A clinical nurse specialist; (5) A certified nurse-midwife; (6) A medical examiner who is listed on the national registry of certified medical examiners established by the federal motor carrier safety administration in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 390. Any certificate may be revoked by the authority granting the same on proof that the holder has been guilty of failing to comply with division (D)(1) of this section, or upon a conviction or a guilty plea for a violation, or any other action, that results in a loss or suspension of driving rights. Failure to comply with such division may be cause for disciplinary action or termination of employment under division (C) of section 3319.081, or section 124.34 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in division (L) of this section, no person shall be employed as driver of a school bus or motor van not subject to the rules of the department pursuant to division (A) of this section who has not received a certificate from the school administrator or contractor certifying that such person is at least eighteen years of age and is qualified physically and otherwise for such position. Each driver shall have an annual physical examination which conforms to the state highway patrol rules, ascertaining the driver's physical fitness for such employment. The examination shall be performed by one of the following: (1) A person licensed under Chapter 4731. or 4734. of the Revised Code or by another state to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or chiropractic; (2) A physician assistant; (3) A certified nurse practitioner; (4) A clinical nurse specialist; (5) A certified nurse-midwife; (6) A medical examiner who is listed on the national registry of certified medical examiners established by the federal motor carrier safety administration in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 390. Any written documentation of the physical examination shall be completed by the individual who performed the examination. Any certificate may be revoked by the authority granting the same on proof that the holder has been guilty of failing to comply with division (D)(2) of this section. (C) Any person who drives a school bus or motor van must give satisfactory and sufficient bond except a driver who is an employee of a school district and who drives a bus or motor van owned by the school district. (D) No person employed as driver of a school bus or motor van under this section who is convicted of a traffic violation or who has had the person's commercial driver's license suspended shall drive a school bus or motor van until the person has filed a written notice of the conviction or suspension, as follows: (1) If the person is employed under division (A) of this section, the person shall file the notice with the superintendent, or a person designated by the superintendent, of the school district for which the person drives a school bus or motor van as an employee or drives a privately owned and operated school bus or motor van under contract. (2) If employed under division (B) of this section, the person shall file the notice with the employing school administrator or contractor, or a person designated by the administrator or contractor. (E) In addition to resulting in possible revocation of a certificate as authorized by divisions (A) and (B) of this section, violation of division (D) of this section is a minor misdemeanor. (F)(1) Not later than thirty days after June 30, 2007, each owner of a school bus or motor van shall obtain the complete driving record for each person who is currently employed or otherwise authorized to drive the school bus or motor van. An owner of a school bus or motor van shall not permit a person to operate the school bus or motor van for the first time before the owner has obtained the person's complete driving record. Thereafter, the owner of a school bus or motor van shall obtain the person's driving record not less frequently than semiannually if the person remains employed or otherwise authorized to drive the school bus or motor van. An owner of a school bus or motor van shall not permit a person to resume operating a school bus or motor van, after an interruption of one year or longer, before the owner has obtained the person's complete driving record. (2) The owner of a school bus or motor van shall not permit a person to operate the school bus or motor van for ten years after the date on which the person pleads guilty to or is convicted of a violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (3) An owner of a school bus or motor van shall not permit any person to operate such a vehicle unless the person meets all other requirements contained in rules adopted by the department prescribing qualifications of drivers of school buses and other student transportation. (G) No superintendent of a school district, educational service center, community school, or public or private employer shall permit the operation of a vehicle used for pupil transportation within this state by an individual unless both of the following apply: (1) Information pertaining to that driver has been submitted to the department, pursuant to procedures adopted by that department. Information to be reported shall include the name of the employer or school district, name of the driver, driver license number, date of birth, date of hire, status of physical evaluation, and status of training. (2) The most recent criminal records check required by division (J) of this section has been completed and received by the superintendent or public or private employer. (H) A person, school district, educational service center, community school, nonpublic school, or other public or nonpublic entity that owns a school bus or motor van, or that contracts with another entity to operate a school bus or motor van, may impose more stringent restrictions on drivers than those prescribed in this section, in any other section of the Revised Code, and in rules adopted by the department. (I) For qualified drivers who, on July 1, 2007, are employed by the owner of a school bus or motor van to drive the school bus or motor van, any instance in which the driver was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code or a substantially equivalent municipal ordinance prior to two years prior to July 1, 2007, shall not be considered a disqualifying event with respect to division (F) of this section. (J)(1) This division applies to persons hired by a school district, educational service center, community school, chartered nonpublic school, or science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code to operate a vehicle used for pupil transportation. (a) For each person to whom this division applies who is hired on or after November 14, 2007, the employer shall request a criminal records check in accordance with section 3319.39 of the Revised Code and every six years thereafter. (b) For each person to whom this division applies who is hired prior to November 14, 2007, the employer shall request a criminal records check by a date prescribed by the department and every six years thereafter. (c) If, on the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, the most recent criminal records check requested for a person to whom division (J)(1) of this section applies was completed more than one year prior to that date or does not include information gathered pursuant to division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code, the employer shall request a new criminal records check that includes information gathered pursuant to division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code by a date prescribed by the state board of education and every six years thereafter. (2) This division applies to persons hired by a public or private employer not described in division (J)(1) of this section to operate a vehicle used for pupil transportation. (a) For each person to whom this division applies who is hired on or after November 14, 2007, the employer shall request a criminal records check prior to the person's hiring and every six years thereafter. (b) For each person to whom this division applies who is hired prior to November 14, 2007, the employer shall request a criminal records check by a date prescribed by the department and every six years thereafter. (c) If, on the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, the most recent criminal records check requested for a person to whom division (J)(2) of this section applies was completed more than one year prior to that date or does not include information gathered pursuant to division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code, the employer shall request a new criminal records check that includes information gathered pursuant to division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code by a date prescribed by the state board and every six years thereafter. (3) Each request for a criminal records check under division (J) of this section shall be made to the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation in the manner prescribed in section 3319.39 of the Revised Code, except that if both of the following conditions apply to the person subject to the records check, the employer shall request the superintendent only to obtain any criminal records that the federal bureau of investigation has on the person: (a) The employer previously requested the superintendent to determine whether the bureau of criminal identification and investigation has any information, gathered pursuant to division (A) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code, on the person in conjunction with a criminal records check requested under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code or under division (J) of this section. (b) The person presents proof that the person has been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date upon which the person becomes subject to a criminal records check under this section. Upon receipt of a request, the superintendent shall conduct the criminal records check in accordance with section 109.572 of the Revised Code as if the request had been made under section 3319.39 of the Revised Code. However, as specified in division (B)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, if the employer requests the superintendent only to obtain any criminal records that the federal bureau of investigation has on the person for whom the request is made, the superintendent shall not conduct the review prescribed by division (B)(1) of that section. (4) Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, the bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall make the initial criminal records check requested of a person by an employer under division (J)(1) or (2) of this section on or after the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, available to the state board of education. The state board shall use the information received to enroll the person in the retained applicant fingerprint database, established under section 109.5721 of the Revised Code, in the same manner as any teacher licensed under sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code. If the state board is unable to enroll the person in the retained applicant fingerprint database because the person has not satisfied the requirements for enrollment, the state board shall notify the employer that the person has not satisfied the requirements for enrollment. However, the bureau shall not be required to make available to the state board the criminal records check of any person who is already enrolled in the retained applicant fingerprint database on the date the person's employer requests a records check of the person under division (J)(1) or (2) of this section. If the state board receives notification of the arrest, guilty plea, or conviction of a person who is subject to this section, the state board shall promptly notify the person's employer in accordance with division (B) of section 3319.316 of the Revised Code. (K)(1) Until the effective date of the amendments to rule 3301-83-23 of the Ohio Administrative Code required by the second paragraph of division (E) of section 3319.39 of the Revised Code, any person who is the subject of a criminal records check under division (J) of this section and has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any offense described in division (B)(1) of section 3319.39 of the Revised Code shall not be hired or shall be released from employment, as applicable, unless the person meets the rehabilitation standards prescribed for nonlicensed school personnel by rule 3301-20-03 of the Ohio Administrative Code. (2) Beginning on the effective date of the amendments to rule 3301-83-23 of the Ohio Administrative Code required by the second paragraph of division (E) of section 3319.39 of the Revised Code, any person who is the subject of a criminal records check under division (J) of this section and has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to any offense that, under the rule, disqualifies a person for employment to operate a vehicle used for pupil transportation shall not be hired or shall be released from employment, as applicable, unless the person meets the rehabilitation standards prescribed by the rule. (L) The superintendent of a school district or an educational service center governing board shall issue a certificate as a driver of a school bus or motor van or a certificate to operate a vehicle used for pupil transportation in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a certificate in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a school bus or motor van driver or a pupil transportation vehicle operator in a state that does not issue one or both of those certificates. (M) As used in this section, "school bus" includes a multifunction school activity bus, as defined in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3328.16. (A) Each college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter shall have a designated fiscal officer. The auditor of state department of education and workforce may require by rule that the fiscal officer of any college-preparatory boarding school, before entering upon duties as fiscal officer, execute a bond in an amount and with surety to be approved by the school's board of trustees, payable to the state, conditioned for the faithful performance of all the official duties required of the fiscal officer. Any such bond shall be deposited with the school's board of trustees, and a copy of the bond shall be certified by the board and filed with the county auditor. (B) Before assuming the duties of fiscal officer, the fiscal officer designated under this section shall be licensed as a treasurer under section 3301.074 of the Revised Code. No college-preparatory boarding school shall allow a person to serve as fiscal officer who is not licensed as required by this division. Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.6031, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the school were a school district and the school's board of trustees were a district board of education. Sec. 3332.081. The student tuition recovery authority is created as a body corporate and politic of this state. The purpose of the authority is to protect students of any school registered by the state board of career colleges and schools from prepaid tuition loss for the academic term due to a school closure. The authority shall consist of five members as follows: the executive director of the state board of career colleges and schools, the executive director of the Ohio association of career colleges and schools, the treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's designee, the chairperson a member of the senate committee that primarily deals with educationappointed by the president of the senate, and the chairperson of the committee a member of the house of representatives that primarily deals with educationappointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. The chairpersons of the legislative committees that primarily deal with education general assembly members shall be nonvoting ex officio members. Each voting member of the authority, before entering upon the member's official duties, shall take an oath as provided by Section 7 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution. The authority shall elect one of its voting members as chairperson and another as vice-chairperson, and shall appoint a secretary-treasurer who need not be a member of the authority. All meetings of the authority shall be public. All final actions of the authority shall be journalized and such journal and the records of the authority shall be open to public inspection at all reasonable times. Sec. 3332.17. Each college or school that holds a certificate of registration under this chapter annually shall certify to state board of career colleges and schools, on a date and in the form and manner determined by the state board, a plan to preserve student records indefinitely if the college or school is to cease operations. The plan shall include the designation and signed confirmation of an official custodian of student records. If the state board determines it necessary, the the state board may require a college or school to produce an executed agreement with the designated custodian of student records, paid in full, to ensure the college or school's plan can be implemented. The director of the state board of career colleges and schools may consult with the chancellor of higher education, higher learning commission, and other appropriate entities to establish plans, processes, and procedures for colleges and schools to provide indefinite access to student records. Sec. 3332.21. (A) Each school that holds a certificate of registration from or is authorized to offer a certificate, diploma, or degree under a certificate of authorization issued by the state board of career colleges under this chapter annually shall provide to the state board and the chancellor of higher education all of the following: (1) Verification of current accreditation status and a copy of the most recent institutional report from the school's accrediting organization; (2) A plan to preserve student records indefinitely in the event of closure of the school or discontinuation of service. The plan shall include a method by which students and alumni of the school may retrieve student records by request. The plan also shall include a designation and signed confirmation of an official custodian of student records. Student records preserved under the plan shall include, but not be limited to: (a) Academic transcripts; (b) Financial aid documents; (c) International student forms; (d) Tax information. (3) The following program information: (a) A list of current degree programs offered by the school in this state; (b) The results of any external degree program evaluations conducted in the last year; (c) A list of any degree programs that have been eliminated in the last year; (4) The latest financial statement for the most recent fiscal year compiled and audited by an independent certified public accountant, including any management letters provided by the independent auditor; (5) Any other information requested by the state board or the chancellor. (B) If a school fails to submit the information required under division (A) of this section or if the state board or the chancellor finds that the information submitted under that division is insufficient, the state board may suspend, withdraw, or revoke a school's certificate of registration or program authorization. (C) Each school subject to this chapter that is authorized to offer courses or degrees under a certificate of authorization shall immediately notify the state board and the chancellor if the school does any of the following: (1) Receives notice from the federal government or an institutional accrediting organization that the school is subject to heightened reporting standards or special monitoring status, such as the United States department of education's heightened cash monitoring process; (2) Receives preliminary or final accreditation findings; (3) Becomes the subject of an investigation by a government agency related to the school's academic quality, financial stability, or student consumer protection; (4) Fails to make any payments to applicable retirement systems; (5) Fails to make any scheduled payroll payments; (6) Fails to make any payments to vendors when due as a result of a cash deficiency or a substantial deficiency in the payment processing system of the school; (7) Fails to make any scheduled payment of principal or interest for short- or long-term debt; (8) Makes budget revisions resulting in a substantially reduced ending fund balance or larger deficit; (9) Becomes aware of significant negative variance between the most recently adopted annual budget and actual revenues or expenses as projected at the end of the fiscal year. (D) A document received by the state board or the chancellor under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section that is confidential under federal law is not subject to release under a public records request until such time as the document is released publicly by the appropriate entity. Further, financial documentation of the school received by the state board or the chancellor under this section is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3332.22. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Online program manager" means an entity that is not an institution of higher education as defined under "The Higher Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 1001 that enters into an agreement with a career college or school to provide marketing and recruitment services and at least one additional service, including course design, technology, or faculty training, to support an accredited online degree program. (2) "Career college or school" means a school subject to this chapter and a private institution exempt from regulation under this chapter as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code, if the institution has a program with a certificate of authorization pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code. (B) If a career college or school enters into a contract with an online program manager, the career college or school shall ensure the contract is in compliance with relevant program standards and requirements. (C) A career college or school that enters into a contract with an online program manager shall post on each online degree program web site it maintains that it utilizes an online program manager for services. The career college or school shall require the online program manager to identify itself when providing services to students. (D) A career college or school shall not permit an online program manager to control, make decisions regarding, administer, or disburse student financial aid. Sec. 3333.04. The chancellor of higher education shall: (A) Make studies of state policy in the field of higher education and formulate a master plan for higher education for the state, considering the needs of the people, the needs of the state, and the role of individual public and private institutions within the state in fulfilling these needs; (B)(1) Report annually to the governor and the general assembly on the findings from the chancellor's studies and the master plan for higher education for the state; (2) Report at least semiannually to the general assembly and the governor the enrollment numbers at each state-assisted institution of higher education. (C) Approve or disapprove the establishment of new branches or academic centers of state colleges and universities; (D) Approve or disapprove the establishment of state technical colleges or any other state institution of higher education; (E) Recommend the nature of the programs, undergraduate, graduate, professional, state-financed research, and public services which should be offered by the state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education in order to utilize to the best advantage their facilities and personnel; (F) Recommend to the state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education graduate or professional programs, including, but not limited to, doctor of philosophy, doctor of education, and juris doctor programs, that could be eliminated because they constitute unnecessary duplication, as shall be determined using the process developed pursuant to this division, or for other good and sufficient cause. Prior to recommending a program for elimination, the chancellor shall hold at least one public hearing on the matter to determine whether the program should be recommended for elimination. The chancellor shall provide notice of each hearing within a reasonable amount of time prior to its scheduled date. For purposes of determining the amounts of any state instructional subsidies paid to state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education, the chancellor may exclude students enrolled in any program that the chancellor has recommended for elimination pursuant to this division except that the chancellor shall not exclude any such student who enrolled in the program prior to the date on which the chancellor initially commences to exclude students under this division. The chancellor and state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education shall jointly develop a process for determining which existing graduate or professional programs constitute unnecessary duplication. (G) Recommend to the state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education programs which should be added to their present programs; (H) Conduct studies for the state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education to assist them in making the best and most efficient use of their existing facilities and personnel; (I) Make recommendations to the governor and general assembly concerning the development of state-financed capital plans for higher education; the establishment of new state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education; and the establishment of new programs at the existing state colleges, universities, and other institutions of higher education; (J) Review the appropriation requests of the public community colleges and the state colleges and universities and submit to the office of budget and management and to the chairpersons of the finance committees of the house of representatives and of the senate the chancellor's recommendations in regard to the biennial higher education appropriation for the state, including appropriations for the individual state colleges and universities and public community colleges. For the purpose of determining the amounts of instructional subsidies to be paid to state-assisted colleges and universities, the chancellor shall define "full-time equivalent student" by program per academic year. The definition may take into account the establishment of minimum enrollment levels in technical education programs below which support allowances will not be paid. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the chancellor shall make no change in the definition of "full-time equivalent student" in effect on November 15, 1981, which would increase or decrease the number of subsidy-eligible full-time equivalent students, without first submitting a fiscal impact statement to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the legislative service commission, and the director of budget and management. The chancellor shall work in close cooperation with the director of budget and management in this respect and in all other matters concerning the expenditures of appropriated funds by state colleges, universities, and other institutions of higher education. (K) Seek the cooperation and advice of the officers and trustees of both public and private colleges, universities, and other institutions of higher education in the state in performing the chancellor's duties and making the chancellor's plans, studies, and recommendations; (L) Appoint advisory committees consisting of persons associated with public or private secondary schools, members of the state board of education, or personnel of the department of education and workforce; (M) Appoint advisory committees consisting of college and university personnel, or other persons knowledgeable in the field of higher education, or both, in order to obtain their advice and assistance in defining and suggesting solutions for the problems and needs of higher education in this state; (N) Approve or disapprove all new degrees and new degree programs at all state colleges, universities, and other state-assisted institutions of higher education. When considering approval of a new degree or degree program for a state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, the chancellor shall take into account the extent to which the degree or degree program aligns with the state's workforce development priorities. (O) Adopt such rules as are necessary to carry out the chancellor's duties and responsibilities. The rules shall prescribe procedures for the chancellor to follow when taking actions associated with the chancellor's duties and responsibilities and shall indicate which types of actions are subject to those procedures. The procedures adopted under this division shall be in addition to any other procedures prescribed by law for such actions. However, if any other provision of the Revised Code or rule adopted by the chancellor prescribes different procedures for such an action, the procedures adopted under this division shall not apply to that action to the extent they conflict with the procedures otherwise prescribed by law. The procedures adopted under this division shall include at least the following: (1) Provision for public notice of the proposed action; (2) An opportunity for public comment on the proposed action, which may include a public hearing on the action by the chancellor; (3) Methods for parties that may be affected by the proposed action to submit comments during the public comment period; (4) Written publication of the final action taken by the chancellor and the chancellor's rationale for the action; (5) A timeline for the process described in divisions (O)(1) to (4) of this section. (P) Make recommendations to the governor and the general assembly regarding the design and funding of the student financial aid programs specified in sections 3333.122, 3333.21 to 3333.26, and 5910.02 of the Revised Code; (Q) Participate in education-related state or federal programs on behalf of the state and assume responsibility for the administration of such programs in accordance with applicable state or federal law; (R) Adopt rules for student financial aid programs as required by sections 3333.122, 3333.21 to 3333.26, 3333.28, and 5910.02 of the Revised Code, and perform any other administrative functions assigned to the chancellor by those sections; (S) Conduct enrollment audits of state-supported institutions of higher education; (T) Appoint consortia of college and university personnel to advise or participate in the development and operation of statewide collaborative efforts, including the Ohio supercomputer center, the Ohio academic resources network, OhioLink, and the Ohio learning network. For each consortium, the chancellor shall designate a college or university to serve as that consortium's fiscal agent, financial officer, and employer. Any funds appropriated for the consortia shall be distributed to the fiscal agents for the operation of the consortia. A consortium shall follow the rules of the college or university that serves as its fiscal agent. The chancellor may restructure existing consortia, appointed under this division, in accordance with procedures adopted under divisions (O)(1) to (5) of this section. A consortium shall follow the rules of the college or university that serves as its fiscal agent, except that when making a purchase with appropriated funds of any product that includes semiconductors, a consortium shall conduct the purchase in accordance with rules adopted by the director of administrative services under division (B) of section 125.09 of the Revised Code for giving preference to Buy Ohio products. (U) Adopt rules establishing advisory duties and responsibilities of the department of higher education not otherwise prescribed by law; (V) Respond to requests for information about higher education from members of the general assembly and direct staff to conduct research or analysis as needed for this purpose. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and to reduce duplicative reporting, the chancellor may use data or information submitted to the higher education information system and other public data exchanges, as determined appropriate, to fulfill reporting requirements, provided the information is materially consistent. Sec. 3333.041. (A) On or before the last day of December of each year, the chancellor of higher education shall submit to the governor and, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, the general assembly a report or reports concerning all of the following: (1) The status of graduates of Ohio school districts at state institutions of higher education during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of September of the current calendar year. The report shall list, by school district, the number of graduates of each school district who attended a state institution of higher education and the percentage of each district's graduates enrolled in a state institution of higher education during the reporting period who were required during such period by the college or university, as a prerequisite to enrolling in those courses generally required for first-year students, to enroll in a remedial course in English, including composition or reading, mathematics, and any other area designated by the chancellor. The chancellor also shall make the information described in division (A)(1) of this section available to the board of education of each city, exempted village, and local school district. Each state institution of higher education shall, by the first day of November of each year, submit to the chancellor in the form specified by the chancellor the information the chancellor requires to compile the report. (2) The following information with respect to the Ohio tuition trust authority: (a) The name of each investment manager that is a minority business enterprise or a women's business enterprise with which the chancellor contracts; (b) The amount of assets managed by investment managers that are minority business enterprises or women's business enterprises, expressed as a percentage of assets managed by investment managers with which the chancellor has contracted; (c) Efforts by the chancellor to increase utilization of investment managers that are minority business enterprises or women's business enterprises. (3) The chancellor's strategy in assigning choose Ohio first scholarships, as established under section 3333.61 of the Revised Code, among state universities and colleges and how the actual awards fit that strategy. (4) The academic and economic impact of the Ohio co-op/internship program established under section 3333.72 of the Revised Code. At a minimum, the report shall include the following: (a) Progress and performance metrics for each initiative that received an award in the previous fiscal year; (b) Economic indicators of the impact of each initiative, and all initiatives as a whole, on the regional economies and the statewide economy; (c) The chancellor's strategy in allocating awards among state institutions of higher education and how the actual awards fit that strategy. (B) On or before the fifteenth day of February of each year, the chancellor shall submit to the governor and, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, the general assembly a report concerning aggregate academic growth data for students assigned to graduates of teacher preparation programs approved under section 3333.048 of the Revised Code who teach English language arts or mathematics in any of grades four to eight in a public school in Ohio. For this purpose, the chancellor shall use the value-added progress dimension prescribed by section 3302.021 of the Revised Code or the alternative student academic progress measure if adopted under division (C)(1)(e) of section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. The chancellor shall aggregate the data by graduating class for each approved teacher preparation program, except that if a particular class has ten or fewer graduates to which this division applies, the chancellor shall report the data for a group of classes over a three-year period. In no case shall the report identify any individual graduate. The department of education and workforce shall share any data necessary for the report with the chancellor. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Minority business enterprise" has the same meaning as in section 122.71 of the Revised Code. (2) "State institution of higher education" and "state university" have the same meanings as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (3) "State university or college" has the same meaning as in section 3345.12 of the Revised Code. (4) "Women's business enterprise" means a business, or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or joint venture of any kind, that is owned and controlled by women who are United States citizens and residents of this state. Sec. 3333.0415. Not later than December 31, 2025, the chancellor of higher education, in collaboration with the department of education and workforce and the governor's office of workforce transformation, shall establish the level of attainment necessary to achieve identified performance targets across a range of degrees and credentials. Sec. 3333.0420. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Online program manager" means an entity that is not an institution of higher education as defined under "The Higher Education Act of 1965," 20 U.S.C. 1001 that enters into an agreement with a state institution of higher education to provide marketing and recruitment services and at least one additional service, including course design, technology, or faculty training, to support an accredited online degree program. (2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) If a state institution of higher education enters into a contract with an online program manager, the institution shall ensure the contract is in compliance with relevant program standards and requirements. (C) A state institution of higher education that enters into a contract with an online program manager shall post on each online degree program web site it maintains that it utilizes an online program manager for services. The institution shall require the online program manager to identify itself when providing services to students. (D) A state institution of higher education shall not permit an online program manager to control, make decisions regarding, administer, or disburse student financial aid. Sec. 3333.053. The chancellor of higher education shall serve indefinitely as the records custodian for the eastern gateway community college upon that college ceasing operations. However, the chancellor may enter into an agreement authorizing a third party to serve as the records custodian in the chancellor's place. Sec. 3333.074. (A) Each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, annually shall submit, in a form and manner determined by the chancellor of higher education, the following information to assess the performance and compliance of the state institution: (1) Verification of current accreditation status and a copy of the state institution's most recent higher learning commission institutional update report; (2) A plan to preserve student records indefinitely in the event of closure of the state institution or discontinuation of service. The plan shall include a method by which students and alumni of the state institution may retrieve student records by request. The plan shall also include a designation and signed confirmation of an official custodian of student records. Student records preserved under the plan shall include, but not be limited to: (a) Academic transcripts; (b) Financial aid documents; (c) International student forms; (d) Tax information. (3) The results of any external degree program evaluations conducted in the last year; (4) A list of any degree programs that have been eliminated in the last year; (5) Any other information requested by the chancellor. (B) The chancellor may rescind program approval if a state institution of higher education fails to submit the information required under division (A) of this section or if the chancellor finds that the information submitted under that division is insufficient. (C) Each state institution of higher education shall immediately inform the chancellor if the state institution does any of the following: (1) Receives notice from the federal government or an institutional accrediting organization that the state institution is subject to heightened reporting standards or special monitoring status, such as the United States department of education's heightened cash monitoring process; (2) Receives preliminary or final accreditation findings; (3) Becomes the subject of an investigation by a government agency related to the institution's academic quality, financial stability, or student consumer protection; (4) Requests an advance of a state subsidy; (5) Fails to make any payments to applicable retirement systems, such as the public employees retirement system or the state teachers retirement system; (6) Fails to make any scheduled payroll payments; (7) Fails to make any payments to vendors when due as a result of a cash deficiency or a substantial deficiency in the payment processing system of the state institution; (8) Fails to make any scheduled payment of principal or interest for short- or long-term debt; (9) Makes budget revisions resulting in a substantially reduced ending fund balance or larger deficit; (10) Becomes aware of significant negative variance between the most recently adopted annual budget and actual revenues or expenses as projected at the end of the fiscal year. (D) A document received by the chancellor under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section that is confidential under federal law is not subject to release under a public record request until such time as the document is released publicly by the appropriate entity. Sec. 3333.129. (A) The "Teach CS" grant program is established to fund coursework, materials, and exams to support the increasing the number of existingOhio teachers who qualify to teach computer science, or expand the knowledge of existing teachers, through all of the following: (1) A supplemental license that involves a mentorship-based pathway for existing teachers; (2) A university endorsement program that involves a coursework-based path for existing teachers; (3) An alternative resident educator licensure pathway for industry experts and other nonteachers; (4) A continuing education program that offers professional development to existing teachers, including those that teach pre-kindergarten to twelve who are generalists and those seeking advanced content knowledge. The chancellor of higher education shall administer the program. Funds may be spent on coursework, materials, exams, teacher stipends, performance-based incentives, and for other purposes as determined by the chancellor to support the expansion of computer science education. (B) The chancellor, in consultation with the department of education and workforce, shall develop an application process and criteria for awards. Priority may be given to education consortia that include economically disadvantaged schools in which there are limited computer science courses offered or where there is an unmet need for teachers credentialed to teach computer science courses, as determined by the chancellor. Sec. 3333.1210. Beginning with first-time scholarships awarded for fiscal year 2027, each student who accepts a scholarship under the governor's merit scholarship program shall sign a statement of commitment to reside in this state for the three years immediately following the individual's graduation from an institution of higher education in this state. Sec. 3333.13. As used in sections 3333.13 to 3333.137 of the Revised Code, "employed as a service attorney" means either any of the following: (A) An attorney who works a minimum of thirty-five hours per week for a minimum of forty-five weeks each service year and who is employed by any of the following: (1) The state public defender; (2) The prosecuting attorney of a county; (3) A county public defender commission; (4) A joint county public defender commission to represent indigent persons. (B) Counsel appointed by the court or selected by an indigent person under division (E) of section 120.16 or division (E) of section 120.26 of the Revised Code, who works in an area designated as an underserved community under section 3333.132 of the Revised Code for a minimum of five hundred twenty hours each service year. (C) An attorney engaged in the private practice of law, who practices civil law, and who works in an area designated as an underserved community under section 3333.132 of the Revised Code for a minimum of five hundred twenty hours each service year. Sec. 3333.131. There is hereby created the rural practice incentive program, which shall be administered by the chancellor of higher education. The purpose of the program is to provide loan repayment on behalf of attorneys who agree to employment or practice as service attorneys in areas designated as underserved communities by the chancellor pursuant to section 3333.132 of the Revised Code. Under the program, the chancellor, by means of a contract entered into under section 3333.135 of the Revised Code, may agree to repay up to the amount set pursuant to section 3333.135 of the Revised Code of the principal and interest of a government or other educational loan taken by an individual for the following expenses, so long as the expenses were incurred while the individual was enrolled in a law school in the United States that was, during the time enrolled, accredited by the American bar association, or a law school located outside the United States for which the individual received a foreign equivalency evaluationthat meets accreditation standards established by the Ohio supreme court: (A) Tuition; (B) Other educational expenses, such as fees, books, and expenses, for specific purposes and in amounts determined to be reasonable by the chancellor; (C) Room and board, in an amount determined reasonable by the chancellor. Sec. 3333.132. Each biennium, the chancellor of higher education shall designate by rule any county with a ratio of attorneys maintaining interest-bearing trust accounts pursuant to section 4705.09 of the Revised Code to the population in the county equal to or less than one to seven fifteen hundred as an underserved community. The Ohio access to justice foundation, pursuant to division (A) of section 120.521 of the Revised Code, shall assist the chancellor by determining the ratio described in this section. Sec. 3333.133. (A) An individual who meets all of the following requirements may apply for participation in the rural practice incentive program: (1) The individual is a citizen of the United States, a national of the United States, or a permanent resident of the United States. (2) The individual either: (a) Is a student enrolled in the final year of law school; or (b) Has been admitted to the practice of law in this state by the Ohio supreme court for less than eight twelve years and remains in good standing. (3) The individual is not enrolled in any other state or federally funded student loan repayment or debt forgiveness program, including under the public service loan forgiveness program, 34 C.F.R. 685.219, or the "John R. Justice Prosecutors and Defenders Incentive Act of 2008," 34 U.S.C. 10671 et seq. (B) An application for participation in the rural practice incentive program shall be submitted to the chancellor of higher education on a form that the chancellor shall prescribe. The individual shall submit the following information with an application: (1) The individual's name, permanent address or address at which the individual is currently residing if different from the permanent address, and telephone number; (2) The law school the individual is attending or attended, the dates of attendance, and verification of attendance; (3) The individual's employer, as applicable; (4) A summary and verification of the educational expenses for which the individual seeks reimbursement under the program; (5) Verification that the individual has been admitted to the practice of law in this state for less than eight years by the Ohio supreme court and remains in good standing, unless the individual is a student; (6) Verification the individual is a citizen of the United States, a national of the United States, or a permanent resident of the United States. Sec. 3333.134. If funds are available in the rural practice incentive fund created under section 3333.136 of the Revised Code and the general assembly has appropriated funds for the rural practice incentive program, the chancellor of higher education shall approve an individual for participation in the program, for reimbursement up to fifty thousand dollars, if the chancellor finds that the individual is eligible for participation in the program. Upon approval, the chancellor shall notify and enter into discussions with the individual. The object of the discussions is to facilitate the recruitment of the individual to become or remain employed as a service attorney within an underserved community. If the chancellor and individual agree on the individual's employment as a service attorney within an underserved community, the individual shall prepare, sign, and deliver to the chancellor a letter of intent agreeing to that placement. The chancellor shall approve individuals for participation in the rural practice incentive program in a manner proportionate to the number of each of the following types of attorneys who apply to the program, with an aim toward disbursing loan repayments equitably among each type: (A) Attorneys employed by the prosecuting attorney of a county; (B) Attorneys employed by the state public defender, a county public defender commission, or a joint county public defender commission to represent indigent persons; (C) Attorneys described in division (B) of section 3333.13 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3333.135. (A) After signing a letter of intent under section 3333.134 of the Revised Code, an individual and the chancellor of higher education may enter into a contract for the individual's participation in the rural practice incentive program. The individual's employer also may be a party to the contractshall sign a promissory note payable to the state in the event that the individual does not satisfy the service obligation of division (B) of this section and as outlined in the note. The amount payable under the note shall be the amount corresponding to the agreed upon service obligation as outlined in division (C) of this section. (B) The contract individual shall include all of the following obligations: (1) The individual agrees to remain employed as a service attorney within the underserved community identified in the letter of intent for the number of hours and duration specified in the contractpromissory note; (2)(C) The chancellor agreesshall agree, as provided in section 3333.131 of the Revised Code, to repay, so long as the individual satisfies the service obligation agreed to under division (B)(1)(B) of this section, the following amount of the principal and interest of a government or other educational loan taken by the individual for expenses described in section 3333.131 of the Revised Code: (a)(1) For a three-year service obligation, up to thirty thousand dollars; (b)(2) For an additional fourth or fifth year of service, up to an additional twenty thousand dollars. (3) The individual agrees to pay the chancellor an amount established by rules adopted under section 3333.137 of the Revised Code if the individual fails to complete the service obligation agreed to under division (B)(1) of this section. (C)(D) The contract promissory note shall include the following terms as agreed upon by the partiesprescribed by the chancellor, including: (1) The individual's required length of service in the underserved community, which must be at least three years with an optional fourth year and optional fifth year; (2)(a) In the case of an attorney employed by the state public defender, the prosecuting attorney of a county, a county public defender commission, or a joint county public defender commission, the number of weekly hours the individual will be engaged in practice in the underserved community; (b) In the case of private counsel appointed by the court or selected by an indigent person pursuant to Chapter 120. of the Revised Code, the number of hours over the service year the individual will be engaged in practice in the underserved community. (3) The maximum amount that the chancellor will repay on behalf of the individual. (D)(E) If the amount specified in division (C)(3)(D)(2) of this section includes federal funds, the amount of state funds repaid on the individual's behalf shall be the same as the amount of those federal funds. Sec. 3333.164. (A) As used in this section, "state : (1) "Armed forces" has the same meaning as in section 3313.471 of the Revised Code. (2) "Private institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 5919.34 of the Revised Code. (3) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) Not later than December 31, 2014, the The chancellor of higher education shall do all of the following with regard to the awarding of college credit for military training, experience, and coursework: (1) Develop a set of standards and procedures for state institutions of higher education to utilize in the granting of college credit for military training, experience, and coursework; (2) Create a military articulation and transfer assurance guide for college credit that is earned through military training, experience, and coursework. The chancellor shall use the current articulation and transfer policy adopted pursuant to section 3333.16 of the Revised Code as a model in developing this guide. (3) Create a web site that contains information related to the awarding of college credit for military training, experience, and coursework. The web site shall include both of the following: (a) Standardized resources that address frequently asked questions regarding the awarding of such credit and related issues; (b) A statewide database that shows how specified military training, experience, and coursework translates to college credit. (4) Develop a statewide training program that prepares faculty and staff of state institutions of higher education to evaluate various military training, experience, and coursework and to award appropriate equivalent credit. The training program shall incorporate the best practices of awarding credit for military experiences, including both the recommendations of the American council on education and the standards developed by the council for adult and experiential learning. (C) Beginning on July 1, 2015, state State institutions of higher education shall ensure that appropriate equivalent credit is awarded for military training, experience, and coursework that meet the standards developed by the chancellor pursuant to this section. (D) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the chancellor may require a state institution of higher education or a private institution of higher education to establish a process to systematically evaluate military training, experience, and coursework and to award appropriate equivalent college credit to a student who is a veteran of the armed forces. The chancellor may adopt rules to implement this division. Sec. 3333.24. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Eligible student" means a student to whom all of the following apply: (a) The student is a resident of this state under rules adopted by the chancellor of higher education under section 3333.31 of the Revised Code. (b) The student has completed a free application for federal student aid for the year for which the grant is to be awarded. (c) The student enrolls in a qualified program at a community, state community, or technical college, an Ohio technical center, or a state university branch campus. (2) "Qualified program" means either of the following: (a) For a student who received a first-time grant under this section prior to the effective date of this amendment, a credit or noncredit program that leads to an industry-recognized credential, certificate, or degree and prepares the student for a job that meets either of the following criteria: (a)(i) It is identified as an "in-demand" or "critical" job as determined by the office of workforce transformation. (b)(ii) It is submitted by a community, state community, or technical college, an Ohio technical center, or a state university branch campus and will meet regional workforce needs, as approved by the chancellor. (b) For a student who receives a first-time grant under this section on or after the effective date of this amendment, a program that meets alternative criteria established by the chancellor of higher education, in consultation with the office of workforce transformation, based on the emerging workforce needs of the state. (B) The chancellor of higher education shall establish the Ohio work ready grant program. Under the program, the chancellor shall award a grant of up to three thousand dollars to eligible students enrolled in a qualified program. Grant award amounts made to eligible students enrolled on either a full-time or part-time basis shall be computed in accordance with rules adopted by the chancellor. No student shall be eligible to receive a grant for more than six semesters or the equivalent of three academic years. (C) Eligible students shall apply to participate in the program in a form and manner prescribed by the chancellor. The chancellor shall determine the form and manner of payments. (D)(1) The program shall be funded in the sums and manner designated for such purpose by the general assembly, but the chancellor also may receive funds from other sources to support the program. (2) If, for any academic year, the amounts available for support of the program are inadequate to provide grants to all eligible students, the chancellor may establish different grant amounts based on the number of applicants and the total amount of funds set aside for that purpose. (E) The chancellor, in consultation with the providers of qualified programs, shall collect and report program metrics that include all of the following: (1) Demographics of recipients, including: (a) Age, disaggregated as follows: (i) Twenty-four years and younger; (ii) Twenty-five to thirty-four years; (iii) Thirty-five to forty-nine years; (iv) Fifty years and older. (b) Gender; (c) Race and ethnicity; (d) Enrollment status as full- or part-time; (e) Pell grant status. (2) Success rates of recipients, including program retention and completion; (3) Total number of industry-recognized credentials, including technician-aligned associate degrees, awarded, disaggregated by subject or program area. Sec. 3333.374. (A) After receipt of recommendations from the scholarship rules advisory committee or if no recommendations are received, the The chancellor of higher education, with the approval of the treasurer of state, shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, establishing policy guidelines for the implementation of the scholarship and fellowship programs. (B) Nothing in this section or section 3333.373 of the Revised Code shall prevent the chancellor, with the approval of the treasurer of state, from amending or rescinding rules adopted pursuant to division (A) of this section, or from adopting new rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, from time to time as are necessary to further the purposes of sections 3333.37 to 3333.375 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3333.952. (A) The chancellor of higher education, in collaboration with the department of education and workforce, the department of job and family services, the inter-university council, the association of independent colleges and universities, and any other relevant entities, shall establish the public policy research consortium on higher education. The consortium shall develop and maintain a biennial statewide research agenda that identifies key policy challenges and research priorities crucial to the state's future, drawing on input from policymakers, practitioners, and community stakeholders. The goals of the statewide research agenda shall be to do all of the following: (1) Provide policymakers and practitioners with timely, relevant, and rigorous research findings on problems of significant importance to the state's citizens, enabling informed decision-making and effective policies; (2) Increase the active engagement of the state's higher education institutions in addressing real-world issues of direct relevance to the state's social, economic, and civic well-being, fostering a stronger connection between academia and public service; (3) Cultivate the next generation of policy-focused researchers and practitioners by providing valuable research opportunities to faculty and post-graduate students. (B) The chancellor shall do all of the following: (1) Award competitive research grants to faculty and post-graduate students whose research aligns with the biennial research agenda established under division (A) of this section. Grants shall be awarded in a tiered structure based on project scope and complexity. A grant award shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. Fifty per cent of funding shall be disbursed upon grant approval, with the remaining balance released upon successful completion of the research and submission of the final report. (2) Establish a clear rubric to evaluate proposed research projects that contains a peer-reviewed process, involving both academic experts and relevant practitioners; (3) Manage the grant process and disseminate research findings through the department's web site, policy briefs, annual presentations to the standing committees of each house of the general assembly that consider higher education legislation, and community forums. Sec. 3333.96. (A) The strategic square footage reduction fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money credited or transferred to it and grants, gifts, and contributions made directly to it. In addition to any such money, gift, or contribution, funds may be transferred from the Ohio tuition trust reserve fund to the strategic square footage reduction fund, in accordance with section 3334.11 of the Revised Code. (B) The strategic square footage reduction fund shall be used to make revolving loans to state institutions of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, that enable the voluntary reduction of physical square footage. (C) The chancellor of higher education shall administer and award, in consultation with the Ohio facilities construction commission, the revolving loans described in division (B) of this section. The chancellor, in consultation with the commission, shall establish all of the following: (1) Procedures and forms by which state institutions of higher education may apply for a loan; (2) A competitive process for ranking applicants and awarding the loans, with priority consideration given to state institutions of higher education that have experienced a decrease in their general student populations, as determined by the chancellor; (3) Procedures and timelines for distributing loans and collecting payments for the strategic square footage reduction fund. (D) Each state institution of higher education shall include in its application all of the following: (1) The extent to which the square footage may have value if sold or reallocated to serve other purposes, which may include kindergarten through twelve, career-technical, or adult educational purposes, community interests, or business and industry partnerships; (2) The relative age and condition of the facilities to be deconstructed; (3) Historical enrollment patterns as well as future enrollment projections; (4) The composition of classes offered in person versus in an online format; (5) The level of deferred maintenance; (6) The prior level of state investment; (7) The amount of annual operating expenses defrayed by eliminating the square footage; (8) A report from the office of budget and management detailing the extent and the status of past capital budget appropriations supporting the project and the existence of any outstanding bonded debt derived from such support. The chancellor and the Ohio facilities construction commission shall consider the information supplied under this division in making final awards. (E) Each state institution of higher education that receives a loan under this section annually shall certify to the chancellor, on a date and in such form and manner as prescribed by the chancellor, a summary of financial information regarding the loan. (F) Prior to a state institution using the loan to pay the demolition costs of a facility, the following shall occur: (1) The board of trustees of that institution shall adopt a resolution approving the demolition. (2) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, any net proceeds received from any demolition of real property made pursuant to this section shall, at the direction of the director of budget and management, be credited to the strategic square footage reduction fund. (G) Each state institution of higher education receiving loans under this section shall not construct any new facility during the time period in which demolition is occurring. Sec. 3333.97. (A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" and "state university" have the same meanings as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The chancellor of higher education shall do all of the following: (1) Determine and provide the criteria for approving accelerated ninety-hour degree programs established under the accelerated college and career pathways program established under section 3345.89 of the Revised Code; (2) Provide technical assistance to each state university during the development of accelerated ninety-hour degree programs and aligned model college credit plus pathways as required under section 3345.89 of the Revised Code; (3) Identify how students can count credit earned in high school, a nontraditional training program, another state institution of higher education, or work experiences as part of the ninety-hour degree programs at a state university. Each state university shall accept credit from incoming students that meet the criteria under this division. (4) Annually publish on the chancellor's web site all of the following: (a) Each ninety-hour degree program offered by a state university; (b) The number of students participating in each ninety-hour degree program; (c) The number of students that complete each ninety-hour degree program; (d) Any additional information as determined by the chancellor. Sec. 3334.11. (A) The assets of the Ohio tuition trust authority reserved for payment of the obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts shall be placed in a fund, which is hereby created and shall be known as the Ohio tuition trust fund. The fund shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state, but shall not be part of the state treasury. That portion of payments received by the authority or the treasurer of state from persons purchasing tuition units under tuition payment contracts that the authority determines is actuarially necessary for the payment of obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts, all interest and investment income earned by the fund, and all other receipts of the authority from any other source that the authority determines appropriate, shall be deposited in the fund. No purchaser or beneficiary of tuition units shall have any claim against the funds of any state institution of higher education. All investment fees and other costs incurred in connection with the exercise of the investment powers of the authority pursuant to divisions (D) and (E) of this section shall be paid from the assets of the fund. (B) Unless otherwise provided by the authority, the assets of the Ohio tuition trust fund shall be expended in the following order: (1) To make payments to beneficiaries, or institutions of higher education on behalf of beneficiaries, under division (B) of section 3334.09 of the Revised Code; (2) To make refunds as provided in divisions (A) and (C) of section 3334.10 of the Revised Code; (3) To pay the investment fees and other costs of administering the fund. (C)(1) Except as may be provided in an agreement under division (A)(19) of section 3334.08 of the Revised Code, all disbursements from the Ohio tuition trust fund shall be made by the treasurer of state on order of a designee of the authority. (2) The treasurer of state shall deposit any portion of the Ohio tuition trust fund not needed for immediate use in the same manner as state funds are deposited. (D) The authority is the trustee of the Ohio tuition trust fund. The authority shall have full power to invest the assets of the fund and in exercising this power shall be subject to the limitations and requirements contained in divisions (K) to (M) of this section and sections 145.112 and 145.113 of the Revised Code. The evidences of title of all investments shall be delivered to the treasurer of state or to a qualified trustee designated by the treasurer of state as provided in section 135.18 of the Revised Code. Assets of the fund shall be administered by the authority in a manner designed to be actuarially sound so that the assets of the fund will be sufficient to satisfy the obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts and defray the reasonable expenses of administering the fund. (E) The authority may enter into an agreement with any business, entity, or governmental agency to perform the investment duties of the authority as set forth in division (D) of this section. The investment powers shall be exercised by the business, entity, or governmental agency that entered into an agreement with the authority in a manner agreed upon by the authority that maximizes the return on investment and minimizes the administrative expenses. (F)(1) The authority shall maintain a separate account for each tuition payment contract entered into pursuant to division (A) of section 3334.09 of the Revised Code for the purchase of tuition units on behalf of a beneficiary or beneficiaries showing the beneficiary or beneficiaries of that contract and the number of tuition units purchased pursuant to that contract. Upon request of any beneficiary or person who has entered into a tuition payment contract, the authority shall provide a statement indicating, in the case of a beneficiary, the number of tuition units purchased on behalf of the beneficiary, or in the case of a person who has entered into a tuition payment contract, the number of tuition units purchased, used, or refunded pursuant to that contract. A beneficiary and person that have entered into a tuition payment contract each may file only one request under this division in any year. (2) The authority shall maintain an account for each scholarship program showing the number of tuition units that have been purchased for or donated to the program and the number of tuition units that have been used. Upon the request of the entity that established the scholarship program, the authority shall provide a statement indicating these numbers. (G)(1) In addition to the Ohio tuition trust fund, there is hereby established a reserve fund that shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state but shall not be part of the state treasury, and shall be known as the Ohio tuition trust reserve fund, and an operating fund that shall be part of the state treasury, and shall be known as the Ohio tuition trust operating fund. That portion of payments received by the authority or the treasurer of state from persons purchasing tuition units under tuition payment contracts that the authority determines is not actuarially necessary for the payment of obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts, any interest and investment income earned by the reserve fund, any administrative charges and fees imposed by the authority on transactions under this chapter or on purchasers or beneficiaries of tuition units, and all other receipts from any other source that the authority determines appropriate, shall be deposited in the reserve fund to pay the operating expenses of the authority and the costs of administering the program. The assets of the reserve fund may be invested in the same manner and subject to the same limitations set forth in divisions (D), (E), and (K) to (M) of this section and sections 145.112 and 145.113 of the Revised Code. All investment fees and other costs incurred in connection with the exercise of the investment powers shall be paid from the assets of the reserve fund. Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, all operating expenses of the authority and costs of administering the program shall be paid from the operating fund. (2) The treasurer of state shall, upon request of the authority, transfer funds from the reserve fund to the operating fund as the authority determines appropriate to pay those current operating expenses of the authority and costs of administering the program as the authority designates. Any interest or investment income earned on the assets of the operating fund shall be deposited in the operating fund. (3) The treasurer of state shall, upon request by the chancellor of higher education and approval by the director of budget and management, transfer funds from the reserve fund to the strategic square footage reduction fund created under section 3333.96 of the Revised Code. (H) In January of each year the authority shall report to each person who received any payments or refunds from the authority during the preceding year information relative to the value of the payments or refunds to assist in determining that person's tax liability. (I) The authority shall report to the tax commissioner any information, and at the times, as the tax commissioner requires to determine any tax liability that a person may have incurred during the preceding year as a result of having received any payments or refunds from the authority. (J) All records of the authority indicating the identity of purchasers and beneficiaries of tuition units or college savings bonds, the number of tuition units purchased, used, or refunded under a tuition payment contract, and the number of college savings bonds purchased, held, or redeemed are not public records within the meaning of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (K)(1) The authority and other fiduciaries shall discharge their duties with respect to the funds with care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims; and by diversifying the investments of the assets of the funds so as to minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so. (2) To facilitate investment of the funds, the authority may establish a partnership, trust, limited liability company, corporation, including a corporation exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code, 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, or any other legal entity authorized to transact business in this state. (L) In exercising its fiduciary responsibility with respect to the investment of the assets of the funds, it shall be the intent of the authority to give consideration to investments that enhance the general welfare of the state and its citizens where the investments offer quality, return, and safety comparable to other investments currently available to the authority. In fulfilling this intent, equal consideration shall also be given to investments otherwise qualifying under this section that involve minority owned and controlled firms and firms owned and controlled by women, either alone or in joint venture with other firms. The authority shall adopt, in regular meeting, policies, objectives, or criteria for the operation of the investment program that include asset allocation targets and ranges, risk factors, asset class benchmarks, time horizons, total return objectives, and performance evaluation guidelines. In adopting policies and criteria for the selection of agents with whom the authority may contract for the administration of the assets of the funds, the authority shall give equal consideration to minority owned and controlled firms, firms owned and controlled by women, and ventures involving minority owned and controlled firms and firms owned and controlled by women that otherwise meet the policies and criteria established by the authority. Amendments and additions to the policies and criteria shall be adopted in regular meeting. The authority shall publish its policies, objectives, and criteria under this provision no less often than annually and shall make copies available to interested parties. When reporting on the performance of investments, the authority shall comply with the performance presentation standards established by the association for investment management and research. (M) All investments shall be purchased at current market prices and the evidences of title of the investments shall be placed in the hands of the treasurer of state, who is hereby designated as custodian thereof, or in the hands of the treasurer of state's authorized agent. The treasurer of state or the agent shall collect the principal, dividends, distributions, and interest thereon as they become due and payable and place them when so collected into the custodial funds. The treasurer of state shall pay for investments purchased by the authority on receipt of written or electronic instructions from the authority or the authority's designated agent authorizing the purchase and pending receipt of the evidence of title of the investment by the treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's authorized agent. The authority may sell investments held by the authority, and the treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's authorized agent shall accept payment from the purchaser and deliver evidence of title of the investment to the purchaser on receipt of written or electronic instructions from the authority or the authority's designated agent authorizing the sale, and pending receipt of the moneys for the investments. The amount received shall be placed in the custodial funds. The authority and the treasurer of state may enter into agreements to establish procedures for the purchase and sale of investments under this division and the custody of the investments. No purchase or sale of any investment shall be made under this section except as authorized by the authority. Any statement of financial position distributed by the authority shall include fair value, as of the statement date, of all investments held by the authority under this section. Sec. 3335.39. (A)(1) The Salmon P. Chase center for civics, culture, and society is established as an independent academic unit within the Ohio state university, physically located in the college of public affairs. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) The board of trustees of the university may change the name of the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic unit physically located at the college of public affairs with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. Not fewer than fifteen tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to teach under the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship. (2) The center also shall focus on both of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community. (D)(1) Not later than November 20, 2023, the The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member Chase center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. The director shall consult with the dean of the college of public affairs; however, the director shall report directly to the provost or the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for all faculty and staff, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director shall oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval of the center's courses that meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted the authority to offer courses and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (F) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. Sec. 3339.06. (A)(1) The Miami university center for civics, culture, and society is established as an independent academic unit within Miami university, physically located in the college of arts and sciences. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) The board of trustees of the university may name the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic unit physically located at the college of arts and sciences with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. Not fewer than ten tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to teach under the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship. (2) The center also shall focus on both of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community. (D)(1) Not later than December 31, 2023, the The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. The director shall consult with the dean of the college of arts and sciences; however, the director shall report directly to the provost or the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for all faculty and staff of the center, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director shall oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval of the center's courses that meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted the authority to offer courses and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (F) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. Sec. 3344.07. (A)(1) The Cleveland state university center for civics, culture, and society is established as an independent academic unit within Cleveland state university, physically located in the Levin college of public affairs and education. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) The board of trustees of the university may name the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic unit physically located at the college of public affairs and education with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. Not fewer than ten tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to teach under the center. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship. (2) The center also shall focus on both of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community. (D)(1) Not later than December 31, 2023, the The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. The director shall consult with the dean of the college of public affairs and education; however, the director shall report directly to the provost or the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for all faculty and staff of the center, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director shall oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval of the center's courses that meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted the authority to offer courses and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (F) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. Sec. 3345.06. As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" and "state university" have the same meanings as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (A)(A)(1) Subject to divisions (B) and (C) of this section, a graduate of the twelfth grade shall be entitled to admission without examination to any college or university which is supported wholly or in part by the statestate institution of higher education, but for unconditional admission may be required to complete such units not included in the graduate's high school course as may be prescribed, not less than two years prior to the graduate's entrance, by the faculty of the institution. (2) Subject to divisions (B) and (C) of this section, each graduate of the twelfth grade who is in the top ten per cent of a graduating class as determined by the chancellor of higher education shall be entitled to admission to any state institution of higher education. If the student does not meet the standards for unconditional admission under division (A) of this section, a state university may delay main campus admission and admit the student to a university branch campus. (3) Subject to divisions (B) and (C) of this section, each graduate who is in the top five per cent of a graduating class as determined by the chancellor shall be entitled to admission to the main campus of a state institution of higher education, provided the recipient meets the application and acceptance deadlines for admission to the main campus. (4) The chancellor of higher education, in consultation with the director of education and workforce, shall identify a process to provide each state institution of higher education with information on students who are eligible for admission under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section. (B) Beginning with the 2014-2015 academic year, each state university listed in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, except for Central state university, Shawnee state university, and Youngstown state university, shall permit a resident of this state who entered ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, to begin undergraduate coursework at the university only if the person has successfully completed the requirements for high school graduation prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless one of the following applies: (1) The person has earned at least ten semester hours, or the equivalent, at a community college, state community college, university branch, technical college, or another post-secondary institution except a state university to which division (B) of this section applies, in courses that are college-credit-bearing and may be applied toward the requirements for a degree. The university shall grant credit for successful completion of those courses pursuant to any applicable articulation and transfer policy of the chancellor of higher education or any agreements the university has entered into in accordance with policies and procedures adopted under section 3333.16, 3333.161, or 3333.162 of the Revised Code. The university may count college credit that the student earned while in high school through the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code, or through other advanced standing programs, toward the requirements of division (B)(1) of this section if the credit may be applied toward a degree. (2) The person qualified to graduate from high school under division (D) or (F) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code and has successfully completed the topics or courses that the person lacked to graduate under division (C) of that section at any post-secondary institution or at a summer program at the state university. A state university may admit a person for enrollment contingent upon completion of such topics or courses or summer program. (3) The person met the high school graduation requirements by successfully completing the person's individualized education program developed under section 3323.08 of the Revised Code. (4) The person is receiving or has completed the final year of education at home as authorized under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, or has graduated from a nonchartered, nonpublic school in Ohio, and demonstrates mastery of the academic content and skills in reading, writing, and mathematics needed to successfully complete introductory level coursework at an institution of higher education and to avoid remedial coursework. (5) The person is a high school student participating in the college credit plus program under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code or another advanced standing program. (C) A state university subject to division (B) of this section may delay admission for or admit conditionally an undergraduate student who has successfully completed the requirements prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code if the university determines the student requires academic remedial or developmental coursework. The university may delay admission pending, or make admission conditional upon, the student's successful completion of the academic remedial or developmental coursework at a university branch, community college, state community college, or technical college. (D) This section does not deny the right of a college of law, medicine, or other specialized education to require college training for admission, or the right of a department of music or other art to require particular preliminary training or talent. Sec. 3345.382. (A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) Each state institution of higher education shall develop a course with not fewer than three credit hours in the subject area of American civic literacy. The course shall include a study of the American economic system and capitalism. The course shall comply with the criteria, policies, and procedures established under section 3333.16 of the Revised Code. The course may be offered under the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code. The course shall, at a minimum, require each student to read all the following: (1) The entire Constitution of the United States; (2) The entire Declaration of Independence; (3) A minimum of five essays in their entirety from the Federalist Papers. The essays shall be selected by the department chair. (4) The entire Emancipation Proclamation; (5) The entire Gettysburg Address; (6) The entire Letter from Birmingham Jail written by Dr. Martin Luther King Jr; (7) The writings of Adam Smith, including a study of the principles written in The Wealth of Nations. Any student who takes the course shall be required to pass a cumulative final examination at the conclusion of the course that assesses student proficiency about the documents described in divisions (B)(1) to (7) of this section. Each state institution of higher education board of trustees shall adopt a resolution approving a plan to offer the course developed under this section. Each state institution shall submit that plan to the chancellor of higher education. The chancellor shall review and approve each plan. Prior to approving a plan, the chancellor may require a state institution to revise the plan and the course. Each state institution of higher education board of trustees also shall adopt a resolution specifying the conditions under which the state institution's president or designee may exempt a student under division (D)(3) of this section. (C) Beginning with students who graduate from a state institution of higher education in the spring semester, or equivalent quarter, of the 2029-2030 academic year, no state institution of higher education shall grant a bachelor's degree to any student unless the student completes a course described in division (B) of this section. A state institution may require students to complete the course as part of the institution's general education courses of study. (D) The president of a state institution of higher education, or the president's designee, may exempt a student from the requirement to complete a course described in division (B) of this section, if the president or designee determines that the student has completed at least one of the following: (1) A course offered under the college credit plus program established under Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code that satisfies the content requirements described in division (B) of this section and is approved by the chancellor; (2) An advanced placement course and examination that satisfy the content requirements described in division (B) of this section and are approved by the chancellor, and the student receives a score of three or higher on that examination; (3) At least three credit hours, or the equivalent, in a course in the subject area of American history or American government which includes the study of the documents described in divisions (B)(1) to (7) of this section. Division (D)(3) of this section does not apply after the 2030-2031 academic year. (E) This section does not apply to associate's degree programs. Sec. 3345.457. (A) As used in this section, "state institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of trustees of each state institution of higher education has ultimate authority to establish new academic programs, schools, colleges, institutes, departments, and centers at the institution. Notwithstanding anything in section 3333.0420 of the Revised Code to the contrary, the board of trustees may not delegate the board's authority to adopt a curricular approval process under this section or to approve or reject academic programs. (C) The board of trustees of each state institution of higher education shall adopt a curricular approval process to establish and modify academic programs, curricula, courses, general education requirements, and degree programs. The process developed under this division shall do all of the following: (1) Grant the faculty senate, or comparable representative body, the opportunity to provide advice, feedback, and recommendations on the establishment and modification of academic programs, curricula, courses, general education requirements, and degree programs; (2) Clarify that all feedback and recommendations by the faculty senate, or comparable representative body, is advisory in nature; (3) Retain the board's final, overriding authority to approve or reject any establishment or modification of academic programs, curricula, courses, general education requirements, and degree programs. (D) Each board of trustees shall complete the initial curricular approval process developed under this section not later than six months after the effective date of this section, unless the institution's president grants a one-month extension, and every five years thereafter. The board of trustees shall submit each completed version of the approval process developed under this section to the chancellor of higher education. Sec. 3345.48. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Cohort" means a group of students who will complete their bachelor's degree requirements and graduate from a state university at the same time. A cohort may include transfer students and other selected undergraduate student academic programs as determined by the board of trustees of a state university. (2) "Eligible student" means an undergraduate student who: (a) Is enrolled full-time in a bachelor's degree program at a state university; (b) Is a resident of this state, as defined by the chancellor of higher education under section 3333.31 of the Revised Code. (3) "State university" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of trustees of each state university shall establish an undergraduate tuition guarantee program that allows eligible students in the same cohort to pay a fixed rate for general and instructional fees for four years. A board of trustees may include room and board and any additional fees in the program. The board shall adopt rules for the program that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (1) The number of credit hours required to earn an undergraduate degree in each major; (2) A guarantee that the general and instructional fees for each student in the cohort shall remain constant for four years so long as the student complies with the requirements of the program, except that, notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board may increase the guaranteed amount by up to six per cent above what has been charged in the previous academic year one time for the first cohort enrolled under the tuition guarantee program. If the board of trustees determines that economic conditions or other circumstances require an increase for the first cohort of above six per cent, the board shall submit a request to increase the amount by a specified percentage to the chancellor. The chancellor, based on information the chancellor requires from the board of trustees, shall approve or disapprove such a request. Thereafter, except as provided in division (F) of this section, the board of trustees may increase the guaranteed amount by up to the sum of the following above what has been charged in the previous academic year one time per subsequent cohort: (a) The average rate of inflation, as measured by the consumer price index prepared by the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor (all urban consumers, all items), for the previous thirty-six-month period; and (b) The percentage amount the general assembly restrains increases on in-state undergraduate instructional and general fees for the applicable fiscal year. If the general assembly does not enact a limit on the increase of in-state undergraduate instructional and general fees, then no limit shall apply under this division for the cohort that first enrolls in any academic year for which the general assembly does not prescribe a limit. If, beginning with the academic year that starts four years after September 29, 2013, the board of trustees determines that the general and instructional fees charged under the tuition guarantee have fallen significantly lower than those of other state universities, the board of trustees may submit a request to increase the amount charged to a cohort by a specified percentage to the chancellor, who shall approve or disapprove such a request. (3) A benchmark by which the board sets annual increases in general and instructional fees. This benchmark and any subsequent change to the benchmark shall be subject to approval of the chancellor. (4) Eligibility requirements for students to participate in the program; (5) Student rights and privileges under the program; (6) Consequences to the university for students unable to complete a degree program within four years, as follows: (a) For a student who could not complete the program in four years due to a lack of available classes or space in classes provided by the university, the university shall provide the necessary course or courses for completion to the student free of charge. (b) For a student who could not complete the program in four years due to military service or other circumstances beyond a student's control, as determined by the board of trustees, the university shall provide the necessary course or courses for completion to the student at the student's initial cohort rate. (c) For a student who did not complete the program in four years for any other reason, as determined by the board of trustees, the university shall provide the necessary course or courses for completion to the student at a rate determined through a method established by the board under division (B)(7) of this section. (7) Guidelines for adjusting a student's annual charges if the student, due to circumstances under the student's control, is unable to complete a degree program within four years; (8) A requirement that the rules adopted under division (B) of this section be published or posted in the university handbook, course catalog, and web site. (C) The board shall submit the rules adopted under division (B) of this section to the chancellor for approval before beginning implementation of the program. The chancellor shall not unreasonably withhold approval of a program if the program conforms in principle with the parameters and guidelines of this section. (D) A board of trustees of a state university may establish an undergraduate tuition guarantee program for nonresident students. (E) Except as provided in this section, no other limitation on the increase of in-state undergraduate instructional and general fees shall apply to a state university that has established an undergraduate tuition guarantee program under this section. (F) Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, the board of trustees of a state university shall not charge the cohort entering in the 2023-2024 or , 2024-2025, 2025-2026, or 2026-2027 academic year a guaranteed amount of general and instructional fees that is more than three per cent above what was charged to the cohort that entered the university in the previous academic year. Sec. 3345.58. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Academic civics centers" means the following institutes or centers: (a) The center at the Ohio state university established under section 3335.39 of the Revised Code; (b) The center at Miami university established under section 3339.06 of the Revised Code; (c) The center at Cleveland state university established under section 3344.07 of the Revised Code; (d) The center at Wright state university established under section 3352.16 of the Revised Code; (e) The institute at the university of Toledo established under section 3364.07 of the Revised Code. (2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The Ohio civics board is established. The board shall consist of the directors of the academic civics centers, who shall serve as ex officio members. If an academic civics center does not have a director, then the center's acting or interim director shall serve on behalf of that center until a director is selected. No additional appointment or confirmation by any authority is required for membership. (C) The board shall do all of the following: (1) Support the academic civics centers to more effectively pursue their mission of teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American and Ohio constitutional order and society; (2) Aid voluntary cooperation and coordination between the academic civics centers, including coordinating intercollegiate efforts and initiatives among the centers to promote collaboration and serve the entire state of Ohio; (3) Advise the general assembly and chancellor of higher education on matters pertaining to civic education, including best practices, program development, and statewide initiatives to enhance civic literacy and engagement; (4) Advise the general assembly and chancellor on curriculum development and standards in state institutions of higher education and primary and secondary public education providers, and on the operations of the academic civics centers; (5) Assist the academic councils of the academic civics centers in fulfilling their statutory duties, including facilitating the selection process for directors of each center. (D) The board shall annually elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from among its members. The chairperson shall preside over meetings and serve as the primary liaison to the chancellor and the general assembly. The vice-chairperson shall perform the duties of the chairperson in the absence of the chairperson. The board shall meet as necessary at the call of the chairperson or on the written request of three or more members of the board. The board shall meet at least twice annually. A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum, and the votes of a majority of the quorum present are required to validate any action of the board, including recommendations. The members of the board shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be reimbursed for the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties on the board. (E) The board shall submit an annual report to the general assembly and the chancellor not later than the first day of December each year. The report shall detail the board's activities, recommendations, and findings related to civic education, higher education curricula, primary and secondary public education curricula, and the operations of the academic civics centers. (F) The board, in consultation with the chancellor, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to implement this section. Sec. 3345.591. (A) As used in this section: (1) "People's Republic of China" means the government of China, the Chinese Communist Party, the People's Liberation Army, or any other extension of, or entity affiliated with, the government of China. (2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) No state institution of higher education shall accept gifts, donations, or contributions from the People's Republic of China or any organization the institution reasonably suspects is acting on behalf of the People's Republic of China. Nothing in this section prohibits a state institution of higher education from accepting payments from Chinese citizens related to instructional fees, general fees, special fees, cost of instruction, or educational expenses or donations from the institution's alumni. Nothing in this section prohibits a state institution of higher education from receiving philanthropic or unrestricted grants so long as it maintains the structural safeguard requirements provided for in division (E) of this section. (C) Each state institution shall submit to the chancellor of higher education a copy of the report it submits to the United States department of education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 1011(f). (D) Upon request, the chancellor shall make any information reported under division (C) of this section available to any member of the general assembly. (E) A state institution shall notify the chancellor of any new or renewed academic partnership with an academic or research institution located in China. A state institution shall only enter into a new or renewed academic partnership with an academic or research institution located in China if the state institution maintains sufficient structural safeguards to protect the state institution's intellectual property, the security of the state of Ohio, and the national security interests of the United States. The safeguards shall include, at a minimum, all of the following: (1) Compliance with all federal requirements, including the requirements of federal research sponsors and federal export control agencies, including regulations regarding international traffic in arms and export administration regulations, and economic and trade sanctions administered by the federal office of foreign assets control; (2) Annual formal institution-level programs for faculty on conflicts of interest and conflicts of commitment; (3) A formalized foreign visitor process and uniform visiting scholar agreement. (F) The auditor of state shall audit the safeguards implemented by state institutions of higher education under division (E) of this section in the course of a normal audit conducted under section 117.46 117.11 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3345.601. Each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, annually shall certify to the chancellor of higher education, on a date and in the form and manner determined by the chancellor, a plan to preserve student records indefinitely if the state institution was to cease operations. The plan shall include the designation and signed confirmation of an official custodian of student records. If the chancellor determines it necessary, the chancellor may require a state institution to produce an executed agreement with the designated custodian of student records, paid in full, to ensure the state institution's plan can be implemented. The chancellor may consult with the higher learning commission, the state board of career colleges and schools, and other appropriate entities to establish plans, processes, and procedures for state institutions to provide indefinite access to student records. Sec. 3345.71. As used in sections 3345.72 to 3345.77 of the Revised Code: (A) "State university or college" means any state university listed in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, the northeast Ohio medical university, any community college under Chapter 3354. of the Revised Code, any technical college under Chapter 3357. of the Revised Code, and any state community college under Chapter 3358. of the Revised Code. (B) "Fiscal caution" means the existence of a fiscal caution declared under section 3345.721 of the Revised Code. (C) "Fiscal watch" means the existence of a fiscal watch declared under section 3345.72 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3345.721. (A) The chancellor of higher education, in consultation with the office of budget and management, shall adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code that include all of the following: (1) Criteria for determining when to review and, if necessary, declare a state university or college under fiscal caution. The criteria may include, but not be limited to, consideration of the following: (a) A significant drop in enrollment from the prior year; (b) A decline in enrollment for consecutive years; (c) A significant increase in enrollment; (d) A significant increase in adjunct faculty; (e) An increase in student complaints; (f) A substantial increase in the number of third-party service providers who are paid based on success; (g) Federal financial aid processing delays; (h) Reduced or increased reliance on state share of instruction; (i) Receipt of substantial nonrecurring revenue, from any source, that could signify a structural budget deficit; (j) Failure to reconcile or file annual reports promptly, which may cause a delay in completing a yearly audit even if granted an extension; (k) A lack of proper institutional segregation of critical duties, functions, or responsibilities; (l) Significant turnover of faculty, staff, or administrators; (m) A significant amount of past due student receivables; (n) A significant increase in tuition or fee waivers; (o) Change in accreditation status by a nationally recognized accrediting agency; (p) A significant increase in indebtedness; (q) A federal program review or actions taken by a federal agency that adversely affects the state university's or college's finances, cash management, or educational program offerings; (r) Significant changes in a state university's or college's educational program eligibility or compliance with satisfactory academic progress requirements in 34 C.F.R. 668.34, including an increase in the use of correspondence or asynchronous learning materials. (2) A requirement that a state university or college declared to be on fiscal caution shall submit a financial recovery plan, within a defined period of time after the declaration as determined by the chancellor, that may include, but is not limited to, any of the following: (a) Projections of revenues and expenditures over a three-year time horizon and on such other time horizons as may be requested by the chancellor; (b) A comprehensive review of current staffing levels, a comparison of staffing levels to the number of enrolled students, and a five-year historical summary of staffing levels; (c) A review of the most recent submission of institutional recommendations for courses and programs based on enrollment and duplication with other state institutions of higher education, as required by section 3345.35 of the Revised Code, and submission of revised recommendations as determined to be necessary; (d) A review of any approved tuition waivers, tuition guarantees, reciprocity agreements, or scholarship programs; (e) A plan to reduce expenditures over a six-month, twelve-month, eighteen-month, and twenty-four-month period, as necessary, to align ongoing revenue with ongoing expenses; (f) A review of contracts that are the largest portion of the state university's or college's expenditures; (g) A program viability analysis, or analyses, as determined by the chancellor to be necessary in accordance with section 3333.073 of the Revised Code. (3) A requirement that a state university or college declared to be on fiscal caution shall submit a three-year forecast of revenues and expenditures, approved in a resolution adopted by the board of trustees of the state university or college. The three-year forecast shall be structurally balanced based on a set of underlying assumptions, including enrollment projections, tuition revenue, and state funding levels, that are evidence-based and practicable; (4) A requirement that a state university or college declared to be on fiscal caution shall consult with the auditor of state regarding any necessary or appropriate steps to bring the books of account, accounting systems, and financial procedures and reports of the state university or college into compliance with requirements prescribed by the auditor of state regarding desirable modifications and supplementary systems and procedures pertinent to the university or college. The auditor of state shall provide a written report to the board of trustees of the state university or college outlining the nature of the financial accounting and reporting problems of the university or college and recommendations for actions to be undertaken to correct the financial accounting and reporting problems. If requested by the state university or college or recommended by the chancellor, the auditor of state may additionally perform a performance audit of the state university or college. (5) A requirement that for the duration of a fiscal caution, a state university or college shall submit regular reports on any of the above matters or new matters identified by the auditor of state or the chancellor as contributing to the reason for the declaration, preventing the recovery of the state university or college, or the inability to be removed from fiscal caution. (6) Criteria for determining when to declare the termination of the fiscal caution of a state university or college. (B) A state university or college shall provide the chancellor with all information requested under this section in the time and manner determined by the chancellor. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, failure to comply in a satisfactory manner, as determined by the chancellor, may result in a declaration of fiscal watch under section 3345.72 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the chancellor may impose limitations on a state university or college that fails to comply with this section or the rules adopted pursuant to this section or fails to take decisive action to improve the state university's or college's financial condition. Such limitations may include, but are not limited to, the following: (1) Limitations on eligibility to participate in grants and programs administered by the chancellor; (2) Limitations on approval of a new degree program or associated certificates; (3) Suspension of additional enrollment in an educational program; (4) Restriction of an increase in any special fee or a creation of a new fee; (5) Limitations on the power of the board of trustees to enter into new or renewed contracts without prior approval from the chancellor; (6) Withholding approval of any controlling board request for capital projects. (D) The chancellor, the office of budget and management, or the auditor of state may conduct any audit or analysis necessary to assess the fiscal condition of any state university or college. Sec. 3345.74. (A) The chancellor of higher education at least annually shall apply the indicators and standards adopted under division (A) of section 3345.73 of the Revised Code to determine whether a state university or college under a fiscal watch is experiencing sufficient fiscal difficulties to warrant the appointment of a conservator under this section or if the board of trustees of a state university or college has taken any action related to pausing or stopping enrollment, submitted a withdrawal of accreditation, or taken any other action indicating it will no longer offer educational activity or will undergo a wind down and dissolution of existence. Upon making a determination that appointment of a conservator is warranted, the chancellor shall request from the office of budget and management, which shall provide, certification that sufficient fiscal difficulties exist to warrant appointment of a conservator. The chancellor shall then certify this determination to the governor. Notwithstanding section 3333.021 of the Revised Code, that section does not apply to certification by the chancellor under this section or to the declaration of a fiscal watch under section 3345.72 of the Revised Code. A determination by the chancellor under this division that sufficient fiscal difficulties exist or do not exist to warrant appointing a conservator is final and conclusive and not appealable. (B) The governor may appoint a conservator for any state university or college under a fiscal watch, upon certification by the chancellor under division (A) of this section that the appointment is warranted. The governor shall consult with the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives and the president and minority leader of the senate before making the appointment. From the time a conservator is appointed until the time the governor issues an order terminating the governance authority under division (B) of section 3345.76 of the Revised Code, the governor may remove any member of the board of trustees of the state university or college from office and not fill the vacancy. (C) Upon appointment of a conservator under this section for a state university or college, all of the following shall occur effective immediately: (1) All duties, responsibilities, and powers of the board of trustees of the university or college are suspended; (2) The management and control of the state university or college is assumed by the conservator; (3) Notwithstanding any section of the Revised Code, all duties, responsibilities, and powers assigned by law to the board of trustees are assigned to the conservator, and the conservator becomes the successor to, assumes the lawful obligations of, and otherwise constitutes the continuation of the board of trustees for purposes of all pending legal actions, contracts or other agreements, and obligations of the university or college; (4) Wherever the board of trustees is referred to in any contract or legal document, the reference is deemed to refer to the conservator. No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the assumption of the board's authority by the conservator under this section and any such validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability shall be administered by the conservator. No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of the assumption by the conservator of the board's authority is affected by that assumption and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the conservator. (5) The conservator assumes custody of all equipment, records, files, effects, and all other property real or personal of the state university or college; (6) All authority and duties of the president or chief executive officer, and the pay of the president or chief executive officer, are suspended. (D) The conservator for a state university or college shall conduct a preliminary performance evaluation of the president or chief executive officer of the university or college and provide a copy of findings and any recommendations to the governance authority established for the university or college under section 3345.75 of the Revised Code. (E) A conservator appointed under this section shall be immune, indemnified, and held harmless from civil liability, including any cause of action, legal, equitable, or otherwise, for any action taken or duties performed by the conservator in good faith and in furtherance of the performance of the duties of the conservator under this section. (F) The governor shall set the compensation for a conservator appointed for a state university or college. The expenses and compensation of the conservator and others employed by the conservator shall be paid out of the operating funds and revenues of that university or college. Sec. 3345.75. (A) Not later than thirty days after the date of the appointment of a conservator for a state university or college under section 3345.74 of the Revised Code, the governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a governance authority for the university or college consisting of five members, of which one shall have expertise in academic affairs and accreditation and one shall have expertise in either state agency budgets or state university or college finances. The members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and any vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as an original appointment. The governor shall designate one of the members of the governance authority as the chairperson and shall call the first meeting of the authority. A majority of the members of a governance authority constitutes a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members shall be necessary for any action taken by an authority. Meetings of a governance authority shall be called in the manner and at the times prescribed by the authority, but the authority shall meet at least four times annually and at other times necessary for the best interest of the university or college. A governance authority may adopt procedures for the conduct of its business. The members of a governance authority shall not receive compensation for their services, but shall be paid their reasonable and necessary expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties. (B)(1) A governance authority established under this section shall appoint an executive director who shall serve at the pleasure of the authority and with the compensation and other terms and conditions established by it. With the approval of the chairperson of the authority, the executive director may appoint additional personnel as the director considers appropriate. The executive director shall oversee the day-to-day operation of the university or college under the direction and supervision of the authority. (2) The governance authority shall conduct a final performance evaluation of the president or chief executive officer of the university or college. Following the evaluation, the governance authority may reinstate any duties, authority, or pay previously suspended under division (C)(6) of section 3345.74 of the Revised Code, or may terminate the president or chief executive officer in accordance with the terms of the person's employment contract. (C) Upon appointment of all members of a governance authority under this section and upon the effective date for the commencement of the duties of the executive director appointed by that authority under this section, all authority, responsibilities, duties, and references assumed by or conferred upon the conservator under divisions (C)(2) to (6) of section 3345.74 of the Revised Code terminate and all of the following shall occur, effective immediately: (1) The management and control of the state university or college is assumed by the governance authority; (2) Notwithstanding any section of the Revised Code, all duties, responsibilities, and powers assigned by law to the board of trustees or to the conservator are assigned to the governance authority and the governance authority becomes the successor to, assumes the lawful obligations of, and otherwise constitutes the continuation of the board of trustees and the conservator for purposes of all pending legal actions, contracts or other agreements, and obligations of the university or college; (3) Wherever the board of trustees or conservator is referred to in any contract or legal document, the reference is deemed to refer to the governance authority. No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the assumption of the authority of the board of trustees and the conservator by the governance authority under this section and any such validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability shall be administered by the governance authority. No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of the assumption by the governance authority of the authority of the board of trustees and the conservator is affected by that assumption and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the governance authority. (4) The governance authority assumes custody of all equipment, records, files, effects, and all other property real or personal of the state university or college. (D) A governance authority and executive director appointed under this section shall be immune, indemnified, and held harmless from civil liability, including any cause of action, legal, equitable, or otherwise, for any action taken or duties performed by the governance authority and executive director in good faith and in furtherance of the performance of the duties of the governance authority and executive director under this section. (E) The expenses of a governance authority and the expenses and compensation of an executive director appointed for a state university or college under this section and others employed by the executive director under this section shall be paid out of the operating funds and revenues of that university or college. (F) A governance authority appointed under this section shall prepare, in accordance with rules adopted by the office of budget and management, and submit to the chancellor of higher education, the governor, the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives, and the president and minority leader of the senate a quarterly report setting forth all of the following: (1) The general condition of the university or college; (2) The amounts of receipts and disbursements and the items for which the disbursements were made; (3) The numbers of professors, officers, teachers, and other employees and the position and compensation of each and the numbers of students by courses of instruction; (4) An estimate of expenses for the ensuing quarter; (5) A statement of the general progress of the university or college with indication of any improvements and specification of any experiments with institutional reform and the costs and results of those experiments; (6) If the governance authority determines closure is necessary or is appointed to facilitate an orderly closure as determined to be necessary by the board of trustees prior to the governance authority's appointment, all matters related to compliance with the requirements of a closure of an institution of higher education as specified by the chancellor; (7) Any other matters the governance authority considers useful to report. (G) The attorney general shall be the legal adviser to the conservator and the governance authority, and the attorney general may employ special counsel to aid the conservator or governance authority with respect to any legal matter on behalf of the institution. The conservator and the governance authority may as otherwise provided by law request the attorney general to bring or defend suits or proceedings in the name of the institution. Sec. 3345.83. (A) Beginning not later than the 2027-2028 academic year, each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, shall develop and implement a co-op internship program that aligns with JobsOhio's target economic sectors and connects students with Ohio-based employers to facilitate work-based learning opportunities, which may include apprenticeships, internships, externships, and co-ops, related to the student's course of study. Institutions shall work with JobsOhio to develop and implement their program, which shall include identifying industry and employer partners. (B) The chancellor of higher education shall consult with JobsOhio and any other appropriate stakeholders to develop the goals, structure, and parameters of the program. The chancellor may consult with other stakeholders. (C) Beginning on the thirtieth day of June following the academic year in which the co-op internship program under division (A) of this section is implemented and annually thereafter, each institution shall issue a report to the chancellor on the status of the institution's program, including the number of participating students, which employers are partnering with the institution, and how many participating students have received or accepted offers of employment after graduation as a direct result of their participation in the program. Sec. 3345.86. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Competency-based educational program" and "eligible individual" have the same meanings as in section 3313.902 of the Revised Code. (2) "Eligible provider" means a community college established under Chapter 3354. of the Revised Code, a university branch established under Chapter 3355. of the Revised Code, a technical college established under Chapter 3357. of the Revised Code, a state community college established under Chapter 3358. of the Revised Code, or an Ohio technical center as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code. (B) An eligible provider may establish a competency-based educational program that complies with standards adopted by the department of education and workforce and may enroll eligible individuals in the program for up to three consecutive school years for the purpose of earning a high school diploma. The provider shall establish a career plan for each individual enrolled in the program that specifies the individual's career goals and describes how the individual will demonstrate competency or earn course credits under division (C) of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code to earn a diploma and attain the individual's career goals. Notwithstanding sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.613, 3313.614, 3313.618, and 3313.619 of the Revised Code, the department shall award a high school diploma to an individual enrolled in a program who satisfies one of the conditions specified in division (C) of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code. (C) An eligible provider shall report each individual enrolled in a program under division (B) of this section to the department. The department annually shall certify the enrollment and attendance of each individual reported under this division and shall pay the provider up to $7,500 per school year, as determined by the department based on the extent of the individual's successful completion of the diploma requirements prescribed in division (C) of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code. (D) An eligible provider that enrolls individuals under division (B) of this section is subject to the requirements of section 3313.902 of the Revised Code, as applicable. Sec. 3345.89. (A) As used in this section: (1) "College credit plus pathways" means the pathways developed under section 3365.13 of the Revised Code. (2) "State university" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The accelerated college and career pathways program is established. Under the program, each state university shall establish at least one accelerated ninety-hour degree program aligned to an in-demand career area by the 2027-2028 academic year. Each state university shall determine the number and types of accelerated degrees to be offered. Each state university shall do all of the following: (1) Include accelerated ninety-hour degree programs in course and program catalogues; (2) Ensure that accelerated ninety-hour degree programs are properly accredited and meet the requirements for reduced credit hour degree programs. The chancellor of higher education shall approve each accelerated ninety-hour degree program developed by a state university that meets the requirements established under section 3333.97 of the Revised Code. (3) Work collaboratively with local and regional business community partners to identify in-demand career areas during the development of accelerated ninety-hour degree programs. (4) Report to the chancellor all of the following: (a) The accelerated ninety-hour degree programs the state university offers; (b) The number of students participating in each program; (c) The number of students that complete each program; (d) Any additional information required by the chancellor under section 3333.97 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Each state university shall develop, in consultation with local and regional primary and secondary education partners, model college credit plus pathways that are aligned with the accelerated ninety-hour degree programs offered by the state university and regional and state workforce needs. (2) Each public and participating nonpublic secondary school shall include the model college credit plus pathways developed under division (C)(1) of this section in the information required to be provided to students and parents under section 3365.04 of the Revised Code. (D) The chancellor shall not distribute state share of instruction funds to a state university in any fiscal year in which it does not comply with this section, as determined by the chancellor. Sec. 3352.16. (A)(1) The Wright state university center for civics, culture, and workforce development is established as an independent academic division within Wright state university, physically located on the Dayton campus of Wright state university. The center shall conduct teaching and research in the historical ideas, traditions, and texts that have shaped the American constitutional order and society and the United States armed forces. (2) The center shall establish bylaws requiring the center to do all of the following: (a) Educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth; (b) Affirm its duty to equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of social and political importance; (c) Affirm the value of intellectual diversity in higher education and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of the university; (d) Affirm a commitment to create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that shall naturally exist in a public university community. The requirements prescribed under divisions (A)(2)(a) to (d) of this section shall take priority over any other bylaws adopted by the center. (3) The board of trustees of the university may name the center in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. (B)(B)(1) The center shall be an independent academic division, physically located on the Dayton campus of Wright state university, with the authority to house faculty who hold their appointments within the center. Faculty appointed to the center shall not be required, but may, hold joint appointments within any other division of the university. No faculty outside of the center shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the center. No university policy shall govern the development and approval of curriculum within the center. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the center as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the center. (C)(1) The center shall offer instruction in all of the following: (a) The books and major debates which form the intellectual foundation of free societies, especially that of the United States; (b) The principles, ideals, and institutions of the American constitutional order, including the United States armed forces; (c) The foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship; (d) The origins, purpose, and role of Wright-Patterson air force base and surrounding defense-related industries in supporting the United States; (e) The workforce needs of Wright-Patterson air force base and industries that support the base. (2) The center also shall focus on all of the following: (a) Offering university-wide programming related to the values of free speech and civil discourse; (b) Expanding the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community; (c) Increasing the awareness of Wright-Patterson air force base and supporting workforce needs to sustain and attract missions at the base. (D)(1) Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section, the The board of trustees of the university shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member center academic council. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than three members of the council may be employees of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the advisory board be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (E)(1) The academic council established under division (D) of this section shall conduct a nationwide search for candidates for the director of the center and shall strictly adhere to all relevant state and federal laws. The academic council shall submit to the president of the university a list of finalists from which the president shall select and appoint a director, subject to approval by the board of trustees. Future directors shall be chosen in the same manner. (2) The director shall consult with the provost; however, the director shall report directly to the president of the university. (3) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for all faculty and staff of the center, and to terminate employment of all staff, subject to the approval of the board of trustees of the university. The director shall oversee, develop, and approve the center's curriculum, including approval of the center's courses that meet the university's general education requirements. The center shall be granted the authority to offer courses independently and develop certificate, minor, and major programs as well as graduate programs, and offer degrees. (4) Notwithstanding section 3333.164 of the Revised Code, the center shall develop a set of standards and procedures to maximize the granting of academic credit for military training, experience, and coursework. (5) Notwithstanding section 3333.31 of the Revised Code, Wright state university shall not charge more than its in-state instructional and general fees to any current or honorably discharged member of the United States armed forces, or the spouse or dependents of such a member, who enrolls in a program offered by the center, regardless of whether that member, spouse, or dependent is a resident of this state under rules adopted under section 3333.31 of the Revised Code. (F) The director of the center shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the center's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic division. Sec. 3354.19. (A) As used in sections 3354.19 to 3354.243354.21 of the Revised Code, "displaced homemaker" means an individual who: (A) Is twenty-seven years of age or older; (B) Has worked without pay as a homemaker for his or her family; (C) Is not gainfully employed and has had, or would be likely to have, difficulty in securing employment; and (D) Has either been deprived of the support of a person on whom he or she was dependent, or has become ineligible for public assistance as the parent of a needy child. Sec. 3358.08. The board of trustees of a state community college district may: (A) Own and operate a state community college; (B) Hold, encumber, control, acquire by donation, purchase or condemn, construct, own, lease, use, and sell, real and personal property as necessary for the conduct of the program of the state community college on whatever terms and for whatever consideration may be appropriate for the purpose of the institution; (C) Accept gifts, grants, bequests, and devises absolute or in trust for support of the state community college; (D) Employ a president, and appoint or approve the appointment of other necessary administrative officers, full-time faculty members, and operating staff. The board may delegate the appointment of operating staff and part-time faculty members to the college president. The board shall fix the rate of compensation of the president and all officers and full-time employees as are necessary and proper for state community colleges. (E) Provide for the state community college necessary lands, buildings, or other structures, equipment, means, and appliances; (F) Establish within the maximum amounts permitted by law, schedules of fees and tuition for students who are Ohio residents and students who are not;. If electors approve a levy under section 3358.11 of the Revised Code for current operating expenses, the board shall charge students who reside in the county in which the tax is levied a lower tuition rate than the rate charged to students who are residents of other counties in the state. (G) Grant appropriate degrees to students successfully completing the state community college's programs, and certificates of achievement to students who complete other programs; (H) Prescribe policies for the effective operation of the state community college and exercise such other powers as are necessary for the efficient management of the college; (I) Enter into contracts with neighboring colleges and universities for the conduct of state community college programs or technical courses outside the state community college district; (J) Purchase: (1) A policy or policies of insurance insuring the district against loss or damage to property, whether real, personal, or mixed, which is owned by the district or leased by it as lessee or which is in the process of construction by or for the district; (2) A policy or policies of fidelity insurance in such amounts and covering such trustees, officers, and employees of the district as the board may consider necessary or desirable; (3) A policy or policies of liability insurance from an insurer or insurers licensed to do business in this state insuring its members, officers, and employees against all civil liability arising from an act or omission by the member, officer, or employee, when the member, officer, or employee is not acting manifestly outside the scope of employment or official responsibilities with the institution, with malicious purpose or bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner, or may otherwise provide for the indemnification of such persons against such liability. All or any portion of the cost, premium, or charge for such a policy or policies or indemnification payment may be paid from any funds under the institution's control. The policy or policies of liability insurance or the indemnification policy of the institution may cover any risks including, but not limited to, damages resulting from injury to property or person, professional liability, and other special risks, including legal fees and expenses incurred in the defense or settlement claims of such damages. (4) A policy or policies of insurance insuring the district against any liabilities to which it may be subject on account of damage or injury to persons or property, including liability for wrongful death. Any instrument by which real property is acquired pursuant to this section shall identify the agency of the state that has the use and benefit of the real property as specified in section 5301.012 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3358.11. (A) In the same manner as a tax may be proposed by a board of trustees of a community college district under section 3354.12 of the Revised Code, the board of trustees of a state community college district may adopt and certify a resolution to the board of elections of one or more of the counties comprising the state community college district directing the board of elections to place on the ballot at any general or special election the question of levying a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation on all the taxable property in that county or those counties. The tax may be for any of the following purposes, as stated in the resolution: (1) The acquisition of sites in that county or those counties; (2) The erection, furnishing, and equipment of buildings in that county or those counties; (3) The acquisition, construction, or improvement of any property in that county or those counties which the board of trustees of a state community college is authorized to acquire, construct, or improve and which has an estimated life or usefulness of five years or more as certified by the treasurer of the board of trustees; (4) The payment of current expenses of the state community college district. This tax may only be levied in the county in which the main campus of the state community college is located. The resolution shall declare that, if the levy is for one or more of the purposes described in divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section, the proceeds of the levy or issue may be used solely within the county or counties in which the tax is levied and . If the levy is for the purpose described in division (A)(4) of this section, the resolution shall declare that the proceeds of the levy shall be used for costs associated with operations in the county in which the tax is levied. The resolution shall also state, regardless of the purposes for which the tax is levied, the term of the tax, which may be for any term authorized for a tax levied under section 3354.12 of the Revised Code. The question of such a tax may not be submitted at more than two special elections held in any one calendar year. Levies for a continuing period of time adopted under this section may be reduced in accordance with section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. The election shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of a tax levy under section 3354.12 of the Revised Code. A tax levied under this section may be renewed in the same manner as a tax levied under section 3354.12 of the Revised Code or replaced in accordance with section 5705.192 of the Revised Code. If electors approve the levy, the board of trustees may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and may, from time to time, issue anticipation notes in the same manner and subject to the same limitations provided under section 3354.12 of the Revised Code. (B) In accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, the board of trustees of a state community college district may adopt and certify a resolution to the board of elections of one or more of the counties comprising the district directing the board of elections to place on the ballot at any election authorized under section 133.18 of the Revised Code both of the following questions: (1) The question of issuing bonds for paying all or part of the cost of the following: (a) The purchase of sites in that county or those counties; (b) The erection, furnishings, and equipment of buildings in that county or those counties; (c) The acquisition or construction of any property in that county or those counties which the board of trustees is authorized to acquire or construct and which has an estimated life or usefulness of five years or more as certified by the treasurer of the board of trustees. (2) The question of levying a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation on all the taxable property in that county or those counties to pay the interest on and retire any bonds approved by the electors under division (B)(1) of this section. The election shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of a bond issuance and tax levy under section 3354.11 of the Revised Code. Bonds approved by electors under division (B)(1) of this section may be issued for one or more improvements which the district is authorized to acquire or construct, notwithstanding the fact that such improvements may not be for more than one purpose under Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. Notes may be issued in anticipation of any bonds that may be approved by the electors under division (B)(1) of this section in the manner provided under section 133.22 of the Revised Code. For the purpose of applying Chapter 133. of the Revised Code to division (B) of this section, the treasurer of the state community college district shall be considered to be the district's fiscal officer, and the board of trustees of the state community college district shall be considered to be the taxing authority. (C) The board of trustees of a state community college district that levies a tax or proposes to levy a tax under division (A) or (B) of this section shall be considered to be a taxing authority, the county or counties in which the tax is levied shall be considered to be a subdivision, and the treasurer of the board of trustees shall be considered to be a fiscal officer for the purposes of Chapter 5705. of the Revised Code, except for section 5705.19 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3364.07. (A)(A)(1) The institute of American constitutional thought and leadership is established for the purpose of creating and disseminating knowledge about American constitutional thought and to form future leaders of the legal profession through research, scholarship, teaching, collaboration, and mentorship. The institute shall be an independent academic unit within the university of Toledo, initially physically located at the college of law. The university shall require the college of law to provide adequate administrative space for the institute. (2) The university shall provide adequate and appropriate space for the institute as jointly determined by the director and either the president or provost of the university. The university shall not charge or assess overhead or indirect fees, costs, expenses, or charges to the institute. (B) The institute shall pursue all of the following goals: (1) To enrich the curriculum in American constitutional studies, including the core texts and great debates of western civilization; (2) To educate university students in the principles, ideals, and institutions of the American and Ohio constitutional order; (3) To educate university students in the foundations of responsible leadership and informed citizenship and to cultivate the next generation of leaders in the legal profession; (4) To offer university-wide programming related to the values of open inquiry and civil discourse; (5) To expand the intellectual diversity of the university's academic community and to create a rich forum for the development of ideas across the political and ideological spectrum; (6) To support faculty and graduate student scholarship that advances understanding of American constitutional thought and institutions; (7) To promote scholarly collaboration within the university and beyond; (8) To host lectures, debates, and symposia, and sponsor visiting scholars, jurists, and teachers. (C) The institute shall adhere to the following policies: (1) The institute shall educate students by means of free, open, and rigorous intellectual inquiry to seek the truth. (2) The institute shall equip students with the skills, habits, and dispositions of mind they need to reach their own informed conclusions on matters of legal, social, and political importance. (3) The institute shall value intellectual diversity in higher education, including in faculty recruitment, hiring, and appointment, and aspire to enhance the intellectual diversity of academic life at the university. (4) The institute shall create a community dedicated to an ethic of civil and free inquiry, which respects the intellectual freedom of each member, supports individual capacities for growth, and welcomes the differences of opinion that naturally occur in a public university community. (D)(1) Not later than sixty days after the effective date of this section , the The talent, compensation, and governance committee of the board of trustees of the university, if such a committee exists, shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the senate, a seven-member institute academic council. If no such committee exists, the board of trustees shall appoint members under this division. An initial member shall not begin service until confirmed by the senate. Four members shall form a quorum. (2) The academic council shall be comprised of scholars with relevant expertise and experience. Not more than one member of the council may be an employee of the university. Best efforts shall be made to have not fewer than three members of the council be from Ohio. (3) Three members of the academic council shall serve initial terms of two years and four members shall serve initial terms of four years, which the members shall determine at their first meeting, and select replacements for vacant seats. (4) To fill a vacancy for the institute director after the initial director, following a national search, the academic council shall transmit to the president a list of finalists from which the president shall select a director, subject to the approval of the talent, compensation, and governance committee of the board of trustees. (E)(1) The institute shall be led by a director who shall report directly to the president and provost of the university and consult with the dean of the college of law. The president of the university shall appoint an initial the director not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section . The director shall be an expert of the western tradition, the American founding, and American constitutional thought, and shall have shown a commitment to the purposes, goals, and policies of the institute. The director's term shall be for five years and shall be renewable. (2) The director shall have the protection of tenure or tenure eligibility. Any existing tenure with the university held by a director shall be maintained with the university. (F) The institute shall be an independent academic unit of the university with the authority to house tenure-track faculty who hold their appointments within the institute. Not fewer than five tenure-track faculty positions shall be allotted to the institute. Faculty appointed within the institute shall not be required, but may be permitted, to hold joint or courtesy appointments within any other division of the university. No faculty from outside the institute shall have the authority to block faculty hires into the institute. (G)(1) The director shall have the sole and exclusive authority to manage the recruitment and hiring process and to extend offers for employment for all faculty and staff, and to terminate employment of all staff. The director shall oversee, develop, and approve the institute's curriculum, including approval of the institute's courses that meet the university's general education requirements. The institute shall be granted the authority to offer courses and develop certificate, minor, major, and graduate programs, and offer degrees. (2) Employment contracts offered under division (G)(1) of this section to tenure-track faculty appointed to the institute shall guarantee reappointment elsewhere in the university, at the same rank and compensation, in the event the institute is discontinued. (H) The director of the institute shall submit an annual report to the board of trustees of the university and the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall provide a full account of the institute's achievements, opportunities, challenges, and obstacles in the development of this academic unit. (I) The board of trustees of the university may change the name of the institute in accordance with the philanthropic naming policies and practices of the university. Sec. 3365.15. The chancellor of higher education and the department of education and workforce jointly shall do all of the following: (A) Adopt data reporting guidelines specifying the types of data that public and participating nonpublic secondary schools and public and participating private colleges, including eligible out-of-state colleges participating in the program, must annually collect, report, and track under division (G) of section 3365.04 and division (H) of section 3365.05 of the Revised Code. The types of data shall include all of the following: (1) For each secondary school and college: (a) The number of participants disaggregated by grade level, socioeconomic status, race, gender, and disability; (b) The number of completed courses and credit hours, disaggregated by the college in which participants were enrolled; (c) The number of courses in which participants enrolled, disaggregated by subject area and level of difficulty. (2) For each secondary school, the number of students who were denied participation in the program under division (A)(1)(a) or (C) of section 3365.03 or section 3365.031 or 3365.032 of the Revised Code. Each participating nonpublic secondary school shall also include the number of students who were denied participation due to the student not being awarded funding by the department pursuant to section 3365.071 of the Revised Code. (3) For each college: (a) The number of students who applied to enroll in the college under the program but were not granted admission; (b) The average number of completed courses per participant; (c) The average grade point average for participants in college courses under the program. The guidelines adopted under this division shall also include policies and procedures for the collection, reporting, and tracking of such data. (B) Annually compile the data required under division (A) of this section. Not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year, the data from the previous school year shall be posted in a prominent location on both the chancellor of higher education's and the department's web sites. (C) Submit an annual report on outcomes of the college credit plus program that are supported by empirical evidence to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairpersons of the education committees of the senate and house of representatives not later than the thirty-first day of December each year. The report shall include all of the following, disaggregated by cohort: (1) Number of degrees attained; (2) Level and type of degrees attained; (3) Number of students who receive a degree in two different subject areas; (4) Time to completion of a degree, disaggregated by level and type of degree attained; (5) Time to enrollment in a graduate or doctoral degree program; (6) The number of students who participate in a study abroad course; (7) How all of the measures described in division (C) of this section compare to both: (a) The overall student population who did not participate in the college credit plus program; (b) Any similar measures compiled under the former postsecondary enrollment options program, to the extent that such data is available. The first report shall be submitted not later than December 31, 2018, and each subsequent report shall be submitted not later than the thirty-first day of December each year thereafter until December 2023. (D) Establish a college credit plus advisory committee to assist in the development of performance metrics and the monitoring of the program's progress. At least one member of the advisory committee shall be a school guidance counselor. The chancellor shall also, in consultation with the department, create a standard packet of information for the college credit plus program directed toward students and parents that are interested in the program. (E) The chancellor and the department also may submit a biennial report detailing the status of the college credit plus program, including an analysis of quality assurance measures related to the program, to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the chairpersons of the education committees of the senate and house of representatives. If the chancellor and the department choose to jointly submit the biennial report, both of the following shall apply: (1) The report shall include only data available through the higher education information system administered by the chancellor. (2) The first report shall be submitted not later than December 31, 2017, and each subsequent report shall be submitted not later than the thirty-first day of December every two years thereafter. (F) For purposes of this section, "cohort" means a group of students who participated in the college credit plus program and who, upon graduation from high school, enroll in an Ohio institution of higher education during the same academic year. Sec. 3375.15. (A) In any school district in which a free public library has been established by resolution adopted by the board of education of such school district prior to September 4, 1947, or by resolution adopted by the board of education of such school district under section 3375.151 of the Revised Code after the effective date of this amendment but prior to January 1, 2014, such library shall be under the control and management of a board of library trustees consisting of seven members. No one is eligible to membership on such board of library trustees who is or has been for a year previous to appointment a member of a board of education making such appointment. A majority of the trustees shall be qualified electors of the school district, but a minority may be qualified electors of the county who reside outside the school district, and all shall be appointed by the board of education of the school district. (B) The trustees shall serve for a term of seven years and without compensation. Trustees appointed prior to the effective date of this amendment shall serve for a term of seven years. Trustees appointed on or after that date shall serve for a term of four years. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all vacancies on the board of library trustees shall be filled by the board of education by appointment for the unexpired term. The board of library trustees shall organize in accordance with section 3375.32 of the Revised Code. The board of library trustees shall have the control and management of the school district free public library and in the exercise of such control and management shall be governed by sections 3375.33 to 3375.41 of the Revised Code. This section does not affect the term of any member of a board of library trustees of a school district free public library appointed prior to September 4, 1947. (C) The board of education shall make appointments to the board of library trustees not later than forty-five days after the date a member's term expires or after the date a vacancy occurs, whichever is applicable. If the board of education does not make an appointment by that time, the appointment shall be made within the next fourteen days by the probate court of the county in which the library is situated. Sec. 3375.22. In any county in which there has been created a county library district, the free public library of said district shall be under the control and management of a board of library trustees consisting of seven members. Such trustees shall be qualified electors of the library district or county. Three shall be appointed by the judges of the court of common pleas and four shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county in which said district is situated. The term of office of said trustees, if appointed prior to the effective date of this amendment, shall be seven years, except that at the first appointment the terms of those appointed by the judges shall expire in two, four, and six years respectively, and the terms of those appointed by the board of county commissioners shall expire in one, three, five, and seven years respectively. The term of office of trustees appointed on or after the effective date of this amendment shall be four years, except that at the first appointment the terms of those appointed by the judges shall expire in two, three, and four years respectively, and the terms of those appointed by the board of county commissioners shall expire in one, two, three, and four years respectively. Any appointment made to fill a vacancy shall be made by the same body which appointed the trustee whose place has become vacant and shall be for his the remainder of the unexpired term. The successor of any trustee of any county library district shall be appointed by the same board or officers which appointed his the trustee's predecessor and all subsequent appointments shall be for seven years. The members of such board of library trustees shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Such board of library trustees shall organize in accordance with section 3375.32 of the Revised Code. Such board of library trustees shall have the control and management of the county district free public library and in the exercise of such control and management shall be governed by sections 3375.33 to 3375.41, inclusive, of the Revised Code. Sec. 3375.30. In any two or more contiguous counties in which there has been created a regional library district, there shall be a board of library trustees consisting of seven members. Such trustees shall be qualified electors of the district. The first appointments to such board of library trustees shall be made by the boards of county commissioners of such counties in joint meeting. Thereafter each appointment to fill an expiring term shall be made by the board of county commissioners of a participating county in the rotating order represented by the alphabetical arrangement of the names of the counties. The term of office of said trustees, if appointed prior to the effective date of this amendment, shall be seven years, or, if appointed on or after that date, shall be four years, except that at the first appointment the terms must be such that one member retires each year. Any appointment made to fill a vacancy shall be made by the same body which appointed the trustee whose place has become vacant and shall be for his the remainder of the unexpired term. The members of such board of library trustees shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Such board of library trustees shall organize in accordance with section 3375.32 of the Revised Code. Such board of library trustees shall have the control and management of the regional district free public library and in exercise of such control and management shall be governed by sections 3375.33 to 3375.41, inclusive, and section 3375.19 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3375.39. At the expiration of the term of a fiscal officer of a board of library trustees of a free public library or before such board approves the surety of any fiscal officer, such board shall require the fiscal officer to produce all money, bonds, or other securities in the fiscal officer's hands, which shall then be counted by the board or a committee of the board, or by a representative of the auditor of state. A certificate setting forth the exact amount of such money, bonds, or other securities and signed by the representatives making such count shall be entered upon the records of the board and shall be prima-facie evidence that the amount stated in such certificate is actually in the treasury at that date. Sec. 3375.47. A public library created under Chapter 3375. of the Revised Code shall place material related to sexual orientation or gender identity or expression in a portion of the public library that is not primarily open to the view of persons under the age of eighteen. Sec. 3375.92. The fiscal officer of the board of trustees of the regional library system is the treasurer of the organization's funds. Before entering upon their duties, the fiscal officer and the deputy fiscal officer shall execute a bond in an amount and with surety to be approved by the board, and conditioned for the faithful performance of the official duties required of them. All moneys received by the fiscal officer shall be immediately placed by the fiscal officer in a depository designated by the board. The fiscal officer shall keep an account of the funds credited to the board. The fiscal officer shall render a monthly statement to the board showing the revenues and receipts from whatever sources derived, the disbursements and the purposes for such disbursements, and the assets and liabilities of the board. At the end of each fiscal year the fiscal officer shall submit to the board, to the state library board and, if requested, to any granting authority, a complete financial statement showing the receipts and expenditures in detail for the entire fiscal year. Such financial records shall be open to public inspection at all reasonable times. At the expiration of the term of the fiscal officer or before the board of trustees approves the surety of any fiscal officer, the board shall require the fiscal officer to produce all moneys, bonds, or other securities in the fiscal officer's hands, which shall then be counted by the board or a committee of the board, or by a representative of the auditor of state. A certificate setting forth the exact amount of such money, bonds, or other securities and signed by the persons making such count shall be entered upon the records of the board and shall be prima-facie evidence that the amount stated in such certificate is actually in the treasury at that date. Sec. 3379.03. The Ohio arts council shall: (A) Conduct a survey of the cultural and artistic resources and needs of the state and maintain a continuing inventory of such resources; (B) Develop a plan for better and fuller use and enjoyment of the state's cultural and artistic resources by all the people of the state; (C) Assess the role of the arts in the growth and development of the state; (D) Report at least biennially to the governor and the general assembly on the state of the arts. Such report may include recommendations based on the council's surveys. (E) Administer the per cent for arts program pursuant to section 3379.10 of the Revised Code; (F) Establish guidelines for the administration of the council's duties that pertain to the position of Ohio poet laureate pursuant to section 3379.12 of the Revised Code and for the qualifications of the Ohio poet laureate appointed under that section. Sec. 3379.12. (A) The position of Ohio poet laureate is hereby created. The Ohio poet laureate shall be appointed by the governor from a list of not less than three candidates recommended by the Ohio arts council based on qualifications developed by the arts council under division (F)(E) of section 3379.03 of the Revised Code. The arts council shall submit its list of candidates to the governor not less than ninety days prior to the beginning of the Ohio poet laureate's term of office. (B) The term of office for the Ohio poet laureate shall be for two years. The initial term shall begin on January 1, 2016. (C) In the event of the death, resignation, or any other vacancy or inability to perform the duties of Ohio poet laureate during an individual's unexpired term of office, not later than sixty days after the vacancy occurs, the Ohio arts council shall recommend a candidate to the governor to serve as poet laureate for the remainder of that unexpired term of office. (D) An individual may be reappointed to subsequent terms of office, at the discretion of the governor. Sec. 3381.03. Any county, or any two or more counties, municipal corporations, or townships, or any combination of these may create a regional arts and cultural district by the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by the board of county commissioners of each county, the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of each township that desires to create or to join in the creation of the district. The resolution or ordinance shall state all of the following: (A) The purposes for the creation of the district; (B) The counties, municipal corporations, or townships that are to be included in the district; (C) The official name by which the district shall be known; (D) The location of the principal office of the district or the manner in which the location shall be selected; (E) Subject to section 3381.05 of the Revised Code, the number, term, and compensation, which shall not exceed the sum of fifty dollars for each board and committee meeting attended by a member, of the members of the board of trustees of the district; (F) Subject to section 3381.05 of the Revised Code, the manner in which members of the board of trustees of the district shall be appointed; the method of filling vacancies; and the period, if any, for which a trustee continues in office after expiration of the trustee's term pending the appointment of the trustee's successor; (G) The manner of apportioning expenses of the district among the participating counties, municipal corporations, and townships. The resolution or ordinance may also provide that the authority of the districts to make grants under section 3381.20 of the Revised Code may be totally or partially delegated to one or more area arts councils, as defined in section 757.03 of the Revised Code, located within the district. The district provided for in the resolution or ordinance shall be created upon the adoption of the resolution or ordinance by the board of county commissioners of each county, the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of each township enumerated in the resolution or ordinance. The resolution or ordinance may be amended to include additional counties, municipal corporations, or townships or for any other purpose by the adoption of an amendment by the board of county commissioners of each county, the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of each township that has created or joined or proposes to join the district. After each county, municipal corporation, and township has adopted a resolution or ordinance approving inclusion of additional counties, municipal corporations, or townships in the district, a copy of the resolution or ordinance shall be filed with the clerk of the board of the county commissioners of each county, the clerk of the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, and the fiscal officer of the board of trustees of each township proposed to be included in the district. The inclusion is effective when all such filing is completed unless the district to which territory is to be added has authority to levy an ad valorem tax on property within its territory, in which event the inclusion shall become effective upon voter approval of the joinder and the tax. If a tax on property is to be levied, the board and the county auditor shall proceed in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the additional territory has been added to the district. The board of trustees shall promptly certify the proposal and the auditor's certification to the board or boards of elections for the purpose of having the proposal placed on the ballot at the next general or primary election that occurs not less than sixty days after the date of the meeting of the board of trustees, or at a special election held on a date specified in the certification that is not less than sixty days after the date of the meeting of the board. If territory of more than one county, municipal corporation, or township is to be added to the regional arts and cultural district, the electors of the territories of the counties, municipal corporations, or townships which are to be added shall vote as a district, and the outcome of the election shall be determined by the vote cast in the entire district. Upon certification of a proposal to the board or boards of elections pursuant to this section, the board or boards of elections shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of the questions to the electors of the territory to be added to the district, and the election shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall the territory within the ____________________ (name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) be added to ________________________________ (name) regional arts and cultural district? And shall a property tax that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually at a rate not exceeding __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_____ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be levied for purposes of such district?" If the question is approved by a majority of the electors voting on the question, the joinder is effective immediately, and the district may extend the levy of the tax against all the taxable property within the territory that has been added. If the question is approved at a general election or at a special election occurring prior to a general election but after the fifteenth day of July in any calendar year, the district may amend its budget and resolution adopted pursuant to section 5705.34 of the Revised Code, and the levy shall be placed on the current tax list and duplicate and collected as other taxes are collected from all taxable property within the territory of the district, including the territory added as a result of the election. The territory of a district shall be coextensive with the territory of the counties, municipal corporations, and townships included within the district, provided that the same territory may not be included in more than one regional arts and cultural district, and provided, that if a district includes only a portion of an entire county, a district may be created in the remaining portion of the same county by resolution of the board of county commissioners acting alone or in conjunction with municipal corporations and townships as provided in this section. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3381.11. The board of trustees of a regional arts and cultural district or any officer or employee designated by such board may make any contract for the purchase of supplies or material or for labor for any work, under the supervision of the board, the cost of which shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. When an expenditure, other than for the acquisition of real estate, the discharge of noncontractual claims, personal services, or for the product or services of public utilities, exceeds ten thousand dollars, such expenditure shall be made only after a notice calling for bids has been published once a week for two consecutive weeks in one newspaper of general circulation within the territory of the district or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. The board may then let said contract to the lowest and best bidder, who shall give a good and approved bond with ample security conditioned on the carrying out of the contract. Such contract shall be in writing and shall be accompanied by or shall refer to plans and specifications for the work to be done, approved by the board. The plans and specifications shall at all times be made and considered part of the contract. The contract shall be approved by the board and signed on behalf of the district and by the contractor. No sale of any real or personal property or a lease thereof having a term thereof in excess of five years shall be made except with the highest and best bidder after publication of notice for bids in the manner above provided. Competitive bidding under this section is not required when: (A) The board, by a two-thirds affirmative vote of its members, determines that a real and present emergency exists and such determination and the reasons therefor are entered in the proceedings of the board, when: (1) The estimated cost is less than fifteen thousand dollars; or (2) There is actual physical damage to structures or equipment. (B) Such purchase consists of supplies or a replacement or supplemental part or parts for a product or equipment owned or leased by the district and the only source of supply for such supplies, part, or parts is limited to a single supplier; (C) The lease is a renewal of a lease for electronic data processing equipment, services, or systems; (D) Services or supplies are available from a qualified nonprofit agency pursuant to sections 4115.31 to 4115.35 section 125.601 of the Revised Code; (E) With respect to any contract, agreement, or lease by a district with any arts or cultural organization or any governmental body or agency. Sec. 3381.17. From the funds available therefor from a tax levy authorized under section 3381.16 or, if applicable, sections 5743.021, and 5743.321, 5743.511, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code, a regional arts and cultural district by action of its board of trustees shall make annual grants to support the operating or capital expenses of such of the arts or cultural organizations located within the territory of the district as the board of trustees shall determine; provided, however, that not more than ten per cent of the amount granted in any calendar year shall be granted to arts and cultural organizations that are not qualifying arts or cultural organizations; and further provided that prior to making any grants in any calendar year, the board of trustees shall afford an opportunity for the presentation, either in person or in writing, of the suggestions of any area arts council, as defined in section 757.03 of the Revised Code, located within the district. Any such grant to an arts or cultural organization shall be on such terms and conditions as the board considers advisable. Sec. 3501.01. As used in the sections of the Revised Code relating to elections and political communications: (A) "General election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in each November. (B) "Regular municipal election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each odd-numbered year. (C) "Regular state election" means the election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November in each even-numbered year. (D) "Special election" means any election other than those elections defined in other divisions of this section. A special election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May or November, on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August in accordance with section 3501.022 of the Revised Code, or on the day authorized by a particular municipal or county charter for the holding of a primary election, except that in any year in which a presidential primary election is held, no special election shall be held in May, except as authorized by a municipal or county charter, but may be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March. (E)(1) "Primary" or "primary election" means an election held for the purpose of nominating persons as candidates of political parties for election to offices, and for the purpose of electing persons as members of the controlling committees of political parties and as delegates and alternates to the conventions of political parties. Primary elections shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in May of each year except in years in which a presidential primary election is held. (2) "Presidential primary election" means a primary election as defined by division (E)(1) of this section at which an election is held for the purpose of choosing delegates and alternates to the national conventions of the major political parties pursuant to section 3513.12 of the Revised Code. Unless otherwise specified, presidential primary elections are included in references to primary elections. In years in which a presidential primary election is held, all primary elections shall be held on the third Tuesday after the first Monday in March except as otherwise authorized by a municipal or county charter. (F) "Political party" means any group of voters meeting the requirements set forth in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code for the formation and existence of a political party. (1) "Major political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state whose candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received not less than twenty per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. (2) "Minor political party" means any political party organized under the laws of this state that meets either of the following requirements: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the political party's candidate for governor or nominees for presidential electors received less than twenty per cent but not less than three per cent of the total vote cast for such office at the most recent regular state election. A political party that meets the requirements of this division remains a political party for a period of four years after meeting those requirements. (b) The political party has filed with the secretary of state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division (F)(2)(a) of this section, a petition that meets the requirements of section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. A newly formed political party shall be known as a minor political party until the time of the first election for governor or president which occurs not less than twelve months subsequent to the formation of such party, after which election the status of such party shall be determined by the vote for the office of governor or president. (G) "Dominant party in a precinct" or "dominant political party in a precinct" means that political party whose candidate for election to the office of governor at the most recent regular state election at which a governor was elected received more votes than any other person received for election to that office in such precinct at such election. (H) "Candidate" means any qualified person certified in accordance with the provisions of the Revised Code for placement on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state, or any qualified person who claims to be a write-in candidate, or who knowingly assents to being represented as a write-in candidate by another at either a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state. (I) "Independent candidate" means any candidate who claims not to be affiliated with a political party, and whose name has been certified on the office-type ballot at a general or special election through the filing of a statement of candidacy and nominating petition, as prescribed in section 3513.257 of the Revised Code. (J) "Nonpartisan candidate" means any candidate whose name is required, pursuant to section 3505.04 of the Revised Code, to be listed on the nonpartisan ballot, including all candidates for judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, for member of any board of education, for municipal or township offices in which primary elections are not held for nominating candidates by political parties, and for offices of municipal corporations having charters that provide for separate ballots for elections for these offices. (K) "Party candidate" means any candidate who claims to be a member of a political party and who has been certified to appear on the office-type ballot at a general or special election as the nominee of a political party because the candidate has won the primary election of the candidate's party for the public office the candidate seeks, has been nominated under section 3517.012, or is selected by party committee in accordance with section 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (L) "Officer of a political party" includes, but is not limited to, any member, elected or appointed, of a controlling committee, whether representing the territory of the state, a district therein, a county, township, a city, a ward, a precinct, or other territory, of a major or minor political party. (M) "Question or issue" means any question or issue certified in accordance with the Revised Code for placement on an official ballot at a general or special election to be held in this state. (N) "Elector" or "qualified elector" means a person having the qualifications provided by law to be entitled to vote. (O) "Voter" means an elector who votes at an election. (P) "Voting residence" means that place of residence of an elector which shall determine the precinct in which the elector may vote. (Q) "Precinct" means a district within a county established by the board of elections of such county within which all qualified electors having a voting residence therein may vote at the same polling place. (R) "Polling place" means that place provided for each precinct at which the electors having a voting residence in such precinct may vote. (S) "Board" or "board of elections" means the board of elections appointed in a county pursuant to section 3501.06 of the Revised Code. (T) "Political subdivision" means a county, township, city, village, or school district. (U) "Election officer" or "election official" means any of the following: (1) Secretary of state; (2) Employees of the secretary of state serving the division of elections in the capacity of attorney, administrative officer, administrative assistant, elections administrator, office manager, or clerical supervisor; (3) Director of a board of elections; (4) Deputy director of a board of elections; (5) Member of a board of elections; (6) Employees of a board of elections; (7) Precinct election officials; (8) Employees appointed by the boards of elections on a temporary or part-time basis. (V) "Acknowledgment notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, informing a voter registration applicant or an applicant who wishes to change the applicant's residence or name of the status of the application; the information necessary to complete or update the application, if any; and if the application is complete, the precinct in which the applicant is to vote. (W) "Confirmation notice" means a notice sent by a board of elections, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, to a registered elector to confirm the registered elector's current address. (X) "Designated agency" means an office or agency in the state that provides public assistance or that provides state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities and that is required by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 to implement a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, or any other public or government office or agency that implements a program designed and administered by the secretary of state for registering voters, including the department of job and family services, the program administered under section 3701.132 of the Revised Code by the department of health, the department of mental health and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, the opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency, and any other agency the secretary of state designates. "Designated agency" does not include public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, or the office of a county treasurer. (Y) "National Voter Registration Act of 1993" means the "National Voter Registration Act of 1993," 107 Stat. 77, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973gg. (Z) "Voting Rights Act of 1965" means the "Voting Rights Act of 1965," 79 Stat. 437, 42 U.S.C.A. 1973, as amended. (AA)(1) "Photo identification" means one of the following documents that includes the individual's name and photograph and is not expired: (a) An Ohio driver's license, state identification card, or interim identification form issued by the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code; (b) A United States passport or passport card; (c) A United States military identification card, Ohio national guard identification card, or United States department of veterans affairs identification card. (2) A "copy" of an individual's photo identification means images of both the front and back of a document described in division (AA)(1) of this section, except that if the document is a United States passport, a copy of the photo identification means an image of the passport's identification page that includes the individual's name, photograph, and other identifying information and the passport's expiration date. (BB) "Driver's license" means a license or permit issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under Chapter 4506. or 4507. of the Revised Code that authorizes an individual to drive. "Driver's license" includes a driver's license, commercial driver's license, probationary license, restricted license, motorcycle operator's license, or temporary instruction permit identification card. "Driver's license" does not include a limited term license issued under section 4506.14 or 4507.09 of the Revised Code. (CC) "State identification card" means a card issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code. (DD) "Interim identification form" means the document issued by the registrar or a deputy registrar to an applicant for a driver's license or state identification card that contains all of the information otherwise found on the license or card and that an applicant may use as a form of identification until the physical license or card arrives in the mail. Sec. 3501.02. General elections in the state and its political subdivisions shall be held as follows: (A) For the election of electors of president and vice-president of the United States, in the year of 1932 and every four years thereafter; (B) For the election of a member of the senate of the United States, in the years 1932 and 1934, and every six years after each of such years; except as otherwise provided for filling vacancies; (C) For the election of representatives in the congress of the United States and of elective state and county officers including elected members of the state board of education, in the even-numbered years; except as otherwise provided for filling vacancies; (D) For municipal and township officers, members of boards of education, judges and clerks of municipal courts, in the odd-numbered years; (E) Proposed constitutional amendments or proposed measures submitted by the general assembly or by initiative or referendum petitions to the voters of the state at large may be submitted to the general election in any year occurring at least sixty days, in case of a referendum, and ninety one hundred twenty-five days, in the case of an initiated measure, subsequent to the filing of the petitions therefor. Proposed constitutional amendments submitted by the general assembly to the voters of the state at large may be submitted at a special election occurring on the day in any year specified by division (E) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code for the holding of a primary election, when a special election on that date is designated by the general assembly in the resolution adopting the proposed constitutional amendment. No special election shall be held on a day other than the day of a general election, unless a law or charter provides otherwise, regarding the submission of a question or issue to the voters of a county, township, city, village, or school district. (F)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, any question or issue, except a candidacy, to be voted upon at an election shall be certified, for placement upon the ballot, to the board of elections not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the election. (2) Any question or issue that is certified for placement on a ballot on or after the effective date of this amendmentJuly 2, 2010, shall be certified not later than the ninetieth day before the day of the applicable election, notwithstanding any deadlines appearing in any section of the Revised Code governing the placement of that question or issue on the ballot. Sec. 3501.05. The secretary of state shall do all of the following: (A) Appoint all members of boards of elections; (B) Issue instructions by directives and advisories in accordance with section 3501.053 of the Revised Code to members of the boards as to the proper methods of conducting elections. (C) Prepare rules and instructions for the conduct of elections; (D) Publish and furnish to the boards from time to time a sufficient number of indexed copies of all election laws then in force; (E) Edit and issue all pamphlets concerning proposed laws or amendments required by law to be submitted to the voters; (F) Prescribe the form of registration cards, blanks, and records; (G) Determine and prescribe the forms of ballots and the forms of all blanks, cards of instructions, pollbooks, tally sheets, certificates of election, and forms and blanks required by law for use by candidates, committees, and boards; (H) Prepare the ballot title or statement to be placed on the ballot for any proposed law or amendment to the constitution to be submitted to the voters of the state; (I) Except as otherwise provided in section 3519.08 of the Revised Code, certify to the several boards the forms of ballots and names of candidates for state offices, and the form and wording of state referendum questions and issues, as they shall appear on the ballot; (J) Except as otherwise provided in division (I)(2)(b) of section 3501.38 of the Revised Code, give final approval to ballot language for any local question or issue approved and transmitted by boards of elections under section 3501.11 of the Revised Code; (K) Receive all initiative and referendum petitions on state questions and issues and determine and certify to the sufficiency of those petitions; (L) Require such reports from the several boards as are provided by law, or as the secretary of state considers necessary; (M) Compel the observance by election officers in the several counties of the requirements of the election laws; (N)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (N)(2) of this section, through the election integrity unit created under section 3501.055 of the Revised Code, investigate the administration of election laws, frauds, and irregularities in elections in any county, and report violations of election laws to the attorney general or prosecuting attorney, or both, for prosecution; (2) On and after August 24, 1995, report a failure to comply with or a Receive and process complaints regarding any alleged violation of a provision in sections 3517.08 to 3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3599.03, or 3599.031 of the Revised Code, whenever the secretary of state has or should have knowledge of a failure to comply with or a violation of a provision in one of those sections, by filing a complaint with the Ohio elections commission under section 3517.153 of law over which the Ohio election integrity commission has jurisdiction, in accordance with sections 3517.14 to 3517.18 of the Revised Code. (O) Make an annual report to the governor containing the results of elections, the cost of elections in the various counties, a tabulation of the votes in the several political subdivisions, and other information and recommendations relative to elections the secretary of state considers desirable; (P) Prescribe and distribute to boards of elections a list of instructions indicating all legal steps necessary to petition successfully for local option elections under sections 4301.32 to 4301.41, 4303.29, 4305.14, and 4305.15 of the Revised Code; (Q) Adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the removal by boards of elections of ineligible voters from the statewide voter registration database and, if applicable, from the poll list or signature pollbook used in each precinct, which rules shall provide for all of the following: (1) A process for the removal of voters who have changed residence, which shall be uniform, nondiscriminatory, and in compliance with the Voting Rights Act of 1965 and the National Voter Registration Act of 1993, including a program that uses the national change of address service provided by the United States postal system through its licensees; (2) A process for the removal of ineligible voters under section 3503.21 of the Revised Code; (3) A uniform system for marking or removing the name of a voter who is ineligible to vote from the statewide voter registration database and, if applicable, from the poll list or signature pollbook used in each precinct and noting the reason for that mark or removal. (R)(1) Prescribe a general program for registering voters or updating voter registration information, such as name and residence changes, by boards of elections, designated agencies, public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, and offices of county treasurers consistent with the requirements of section 3503.09 of the Revised Code; (2) Prescribe a general program for registering voters or updating voter registration information through the registrar of motor vehicles and deputy registrars, consistent with the requirements of section 3503.11 of the Revised Code. (S) Prescribe a program of distribution of voter registration forms through boards of elections, designated agencies, offices of the registrar and deputy registrars of motor vehicles, public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, and offices of county treasurers; (T) To the extent feasible, provide copies, at no cost and upon request, of the voter registration form in post offices in this state; (U) Adopt rules pursuant to section 111.15 of the Revised Code for the purpose of implementing the programs for registering voters through boards of elections, designated agencies, and the offices of the registrar and deputy registrars of motor vehicles consistent with this chapter; (V) Establish the full-time position of Americans with Disabilities Act coordinator within the office of the secretary of state to do all of the following: (1) Assist the secretary of state with ensuring that there is equal access to polling places for persons with disabilities; (2) Assist the secretary of state with ensuring that each voter may cast the voter's ballot in a manner that provides the same opportunity for access and participation, including privacy and independence, as for other voters; (3) Advise the secretary of state in the development of standards for the certification of voting machines, marking devices, and automatic tabulating equipment. (W) Establish and maintain a computerized statewide database of all legally registered voters under section 3503.15 of the Revised Code that complies with the requirements of the "Help America Vote Act of 2002," Pub. L. No. 107-252, 116 Stat. 1666, and provide training in the operation of that system; (X) Ensure that all directives, advisories, other instructions, or decisions issued or made during or as a result of any conference or teleconference call with a board of elections to discuss the proper methods and procedures for conducting elections, to answer questions regarding elections, or to discuss the interpretation of directives, advisories, or other instructions issued by the secretary of state are posted on a web site of the office of the secretary of state as soon as is practicable after the completion of the conference or teleconference call, but not later than the close of business on the same day as the conference or teleconference call takes place. (Y) Publish a report on a web site of the office of the secretary of state not later than one month after the completion of the canvass of the election returns for each primary and general election, identifying, by county, the number of absent voter's ballots cast and the number of those ballots that were counted, and the number of provisional ballots cast and the number of those ballots that were counted, for that election. The secretary of state shall maintain the information on the web site in an archive format for each subsequent election. (Z) Conduct voter education outlining voter identification, absent voters ballot, provisional ballot, and other voting requirements; (AA) Establish a procedure by which a registered elector may make available to a board of elections a more recent signature to be used in the poll list or signature pollbook produced by the board of elections of the county in which the elector resides; (BB) Disseminate information, which may include all or part of the official explanations and arguments, by means of direct mail or other written publication, broadcast, or other means or combination of means, as directed by the Ohio ballot board under division (F) of section 3505.062 of the Revised Code, in order to inform the voters as fully as possible concerning each proposed constitutional amendment, proposed law, or referendum; (CC) Be the single state office responsible for the implementation of the "Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act," Pub. L. No. 99-410, 100 Stat. 924, 42 U.S.C. 1973ff, et seq., as amended, in this state. The secretary of state may delegate to the boards of elections responsibilities for the implementation of that act, including responsibilities arising from amendments to that act made by the "Military and Overseas Voter Empowerment Act," Subtitle H of the "National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2010," Pub. L. No. 111-84, 123 Stat. 3190. (DD) Adopt rules, under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, to establish procedures and standards for determining when a board of elections shall be placed under the official oversight of the secretary of state, placing a board of elections under the official oversight of the secretary of state, a board that is under official oversight to transition out of official oversight, and the secretary of state to supervise a board of elections that is under official oversight of the secretary of state. (EE) Perform other duties required by law. Whenever a primary election is held under section 3513.32 of the Revised Code or a special election is held under section 3521.03 of the Revised Code to fill a vacancy in the office of representative to congress, the secretary of state shall establish a deadline, notwithstanding any other deadline required under the Revised Code, by which any or all of the following shall occur: the filing of a declaration of candidacy and petitions or a statement of candidacy and nominating petition together with the applicable filing fee; the filing of protests against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy or nominating petition; the filing of a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate; the filing of campaign finance reports; the preparation of, and the making of corrections or challenges to, precinct voter registration lists; the receipt of applications for absent voter's ballots or uniformed services or overseas absent voter's ballots; the supplying of election materials to precincts by boards of elections; the holding of hearings by boards of elections to consider challenges to the right of a person to appear on a voter registration list; and the scheduling of programs to instruct or reinstruct election officers. In the performance of the secretary of state's duties as the chief election officer, the secretary of state may administer oaths, issue subpoenas, summon witnesses, compel the production of books, papers, records, and other evidence, and fix the time and place for hearing any matters relating to the administration and enforcement of the election laws, including for the purposes described in division (N)(2) of this section. In any controversy involving or arising out of the adoption of registration or the appropriation of funds for registration, the secretary of state may, through the attorney general, bring an action in the name of the state in the court of common pleas of the county where the cause of action arose or in an adjoining county, to adjudicate the question. In any action involving the laws in Title XXXV of the Revised Code wherein the interpretation of those laws is in issue in such a manner that the result of the action will affect the lawful duties of the secretary of state or of any board of elections, the secretary of state may, on the secretary of state's motion, be made a party. The secretary of state may apply to any court that is hearing a case in which the secretary of state is a party, for a change of venue as a substantive right, and the change of venue shall be allowed, and the case removed to the court of common pleas of an adjoining county named in the application or, if there are cases pending in more than one jurisdiction that involve the same or similar issues, the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Public high schools and vocational schools, public libraries, and the office of a county treasurer shall implement voter registration programs as directed by the secretary of state pursuant to this section. Sec. 3501.055. (A) There is in the office of the secretary of state the election integrity unit. (B) Under the direction of the secretary of state, the election integrity unit shall do all of the following: (1) Investigate alleged violations of Title XXXV of the Revised Code on the unit's own initiative, upon receiving a complaint under this section, or upon the filing of a complaint with the secretary of state under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code; (2) Allow the public to submit allegations of violations of Title XXXV of the Revised Code to the unit; (3) Submit a report to the governor and the general assembly not later than the fifteenth day of January of each year. The report shall include all of the following with respect to the previous calendar year: (a) The number of allegations the unit received from members of the public; (b) The number of allegations the unit investigated on its own initiative; (c) The number of allegations the unit referred to another agency for further investigation or prosecution; (d) All of the following concerning each allegation: (i) The general nature of the allegation; (ii) The county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred; (iii) Whether the allegation has been referred to another agency for further investigation or prosecution, and if so, to which agency; (iv) The current status of the investigation or any resulting criminal or civil proceeding. (C) In performing its duties, the election integrity unit may administer oaths, issue subpoenas, summon witnesses, compel the production of books, papers, records, and other evidence, and hold hearings. (D) Within one year after receiving a referral for further investigation or prosecution from the election integrity unit, the prosecuting attorney shall either prosecute the violation or provide to the election integrity unit a written statement explaining the reason for declining to prosecute the referral or requesting any additional evidence needed to meet the prima facie standard established under section 3599.42 of the Revised Code. If the prosecuting attorney declines to prosecute the violation within one year after receiving the referral, the election integrity unit may refer the violation to the attorney general for further investigation or prosecution. If the prosecuting attorney or the attorney general requests additional evidence, the election integrity unit shall provide such evidence, if available, within ninety days after receiving the request. Within one hundred eighty days after receiving the additional evidence, the prosecuting attorney either shall prosecute the violation or provide a written statement to the election integrity unit explaining a reason for declining to prosecute. If the prosecuting attorney fails to provide this statement or prosecute within one hundred eighty days after receiving the additional evidence, the election integrity unit may refer the violation to the attorney general for further investigation or prosecution. Sec. 3501.12. (A) The annual compensation of members of the board of elections shall be determined on the basis of the population of the county according to the next preceding federal census, and shall be paid monthly out of the appropriations made to the board and upon vouchers or payrolls certified by the chairperson, or a member of the board designated by it, and countersigned by the director or in the director's absence by the deputy director. Upon presentation of any such voucher or payroll, the county auditor shall issue a warrant upon the county treasurer for the amount thereof as in the case of vouchers or payrolls for county offices and the treasurer shall pay such warrant. (B) In calendar year 2018, the amount of annual compensation of each member of the board of elections shall be the greater of the following: (1) The sum of the following: (a) One hundred two dollars and forty-one cents for each full one thousand of the first one hundred thousand population; (b) Forty-eight dollars and seventy-nine cents for each full one thousand of the second one hundred thousand population; (c) Twenty-six dollars and fifty cents for each full one thousand of the third one hundred thousand population; (d) Eight dollars and thirteen cents for each full one thousand above three hundred thousand population. (2) Six thousand dollars. (C) The annual compensation of each member of the board shall be computed after increasing the dollar amounts specified in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section as follows: (1) In calendar year 2019 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 20282025, the annual compensation of each member of the board shall be computed after increasing the dollar amounts specified in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section by one and three-quarters per cent; (2) In calendar year 2026 and in each calendar year thereafter through calendar year 2029, by five per cent. (D) For the purposes of this section, members of boards of elections shall be deemed to be appointed and not elected, and therefore not subject to Section 20 of Article II of the Ohio Constitution. Sec. 3501.17. (A) The expenses of the board of elections shall be paid from the county treasury, in pursuance of appropriations by the board of county commissioners, in the same manner as other county expenses are paid. If the board of county commissioners fails to appropriate an amount sufficient to provide for the necessary and proper expenses of the board of elections pertaining to the conduct of elections, the board of elections may apply to the court of common pleas within the county, which shall fix the amount necessary to be appropriated and the amount shall be appropriated. Payments shall be made upon vouchers of the board of elections certified to by its chairperson or acting chairperson and the director or deputy director, upon warrants of the county auditor. The board of elections shall not incur any obligation involving the expenditure of money unless there are moneys sufficient in the funds appropriated therefor to meet the obligation. If the board of elections requests a transfer of funds from one of its appropriation items to another, the board of county commissioners shall adopt a resolution providing for the transfer except as otherwise provided in section 5705.40 of the Revised Code. The expenses of the board of elections shall be apportioned among the county and the various subdivisions as provided in this section, and the amount chargeable to each subdivision shall be paid as provided in division (J) of this section or withheld by the county auditor from the moneys payable thereto at the time of the next tax settlement. At the time of submitting budget estimates in each year, the board of elections shall submit to the taxing authority of each subdivision, upon the request of the subdivision, an estimate of the amount to be paid or withheld from the subdivision during the current or next fiscal year. A board of township trustees may, by resolution, request that the county auditor withhold expenses charged to the township from a specified township fund that is to be credited with revenue at a tax settlement. The resolution shall specify the tax levy ballot issue, the date of the election on the levy issue, and the township fund from which the expenses the board of elections incurs related to that ballot issue shall be withheld. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (F) of this section, the compensation of the members of the board of elections and of the director, deputy director, and regular employees in the board's offices, other than compensation for overtime worked; the expenditures for the rental, furnishing, and equipping of the office of the board and for the necessary office supplies for the use of the board; the expenditures for the acquisition, repair, care, and custody of the polling places, booths, guardrails, and other equipment for polling places; the cost of tally sheets, maps, flags, ballot boxes, and all other permanent records and equipment; the cost of all elections held in and for the state and county; and all other expenses of the board which are not chargeable to a political subdivision in accordance with this section shall be paid in the same manner as other county expenses are paid. (C) The compensation of precinct election officials and intermittent employees in the board's offices; the cost of renting, moving, heating, and lighting polling places and of placing and removing ballot boxes and other fixtures and equipment thereof, including voting machines, marking devices, and automatic tabulating equipment; the cost of printing and delivering ballots, cards of instructions, registration lists required under section 3503.23 of the Revised Code, and other election supplies, including the supplies required to comply with division (H) of section 3506.01 of the Revised Code; the cost of contractors engaged by the board to prepare, program, test, and operate voting machines, marking devices, and automatic tabulating equipment; and all other expenses of conducting primaries and elections in the odd-numbered years shall be charged to the subdivisions in and for which such primaries or elections are held. The charge for each primary or general election in odd-numbered years for each subdivision shall be determined in the following manner: first, the total cost of all chargeable items used in conducting such elections shall be ascertained; second, the total charge shall be divided by the number of precincts participating in such election, in order to fix the cost per precinct; third, the cost per precinct shall be prorated by the board of elections to the subdivisions conducting elections for the nomination or election of offices in such precinct; fourth, the total cost for each subdivision shall be determined by adding the charges prorated to it in each precinct within the subdivision. (D) The (D)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section, the entire cost of special elections held on a day other than the day of a primary or general election, both in odd-numbered or in even-numbered years, shall be charged to the subdivision. Where a special election is held on the same day as a primary or general election in an even-numbered year, the subdivision submitting the special election shall be charged only for the cost of ballots and advertising. Where a special election is held on the same day as a primary or general election in an odd-numbered year, the subdivision submitting the special election shall be charged for the cost of ballots and advertising for such special election, in addition to the charges prorated to such subdivision for the election or nomination of candidates in each precinct within the subdivision, as set forth in the preceding paragraph. (2) The entire cost of a local option election held pursuant to sections 4301.32 to 4301.391 of the Revised Code on a day other than the day of a primary or general election, both in odd-numbered or in even-numbered years, or on a day other than the day of a special election of a political subdivision seeking to submit a question or issue, a nomination for office, or an election to office, shall be charged to the petitioner. (E) Where a special election is held on the day specified by division (E) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code for the holding of a primary election, for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the state constitutional amendments proposed by the general assembly, and a subdivision conducts a special election on the same day, the entire cost of the special election shall be divided proportionally between the state and the subdivision based upon a ratio determined by the number of issues placed on the ballot by each, except as otherwise provided in division (G) of this section. Such proportional division of cost shall be made only to the extent funds are available for such purpose from amounts appropriated by the general assembly to the secretary of state. If a primary election is also being conducted in the subdivision, the costs shall be apportioned as otherwise provided in this section. (F) When a precinct is open during a general, primary, or special election solely for the purpose of submitting to the voters a statewide ballot issue, the state shall bear the entire cost of the election in that precinct and shall reimburse the county for all expenses incurred in opening the precinct. (G)(1) The state shall bear the entire cost of advertising in newspapers statewide ballot issues, explanations of those issues, and arguments for or against those issues, as required by Section 1g of Article II and Section 1 of Article XVI, Ohio Constitution, and any other section of law. Appropriations made to the controlling board shall be used to reimburse the secretary of state for all expenses the secretary of state incurs for such advertising under division (G) of section 3505.062 of the Revised Code. (2) There is hereby created in the state treasury the statewide ballot advertising fund. The fund shall receive transfers approved by the controlling board, and shall be used by the secretary of state to pay the costs of advertising state ballot issues as required under division (G)(1) of this section. Any such transfers may be requested from and approved by the controlling board prior to placing the advertising, in order to facilitate timely provision of the required advertising. (H) The cost of renting, heating, and lighting registration places; the cost of the necessary books, forms, and supplies for the conduct of registration; and the cost of printing and posting precinct registration lists shall be charged to the subdivision in which such registration is held. (I)(1)(a) At the request of a majority of the members of the board of elections, the board of county commissioners may, by resolution, establish an elections revenue fund. Except as otherwise provided in this division and in division (I)(2) of this section, the purpose of the fund shall be to accumulate revenue withheld by or paid to the county under this section for the payment of any expense related to the duties of the board of elections specified in section 3501.11 of the Revised Code, upon approval of a majority of the members of the board of elections. The fund shall not accumulate any revenue withheld by or paid to the county under this section for the compensation of the members of the board of elections or of the director, deputy director, or other regular employees in the board's offices, other than compensation for overtime worked. (b) Notwithstanding sections 5705.14, 5705.15, and 5705.16 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners may, by resolution, transfer money to the elections revenue fund from any other fund of the political subdivision from which such payments lawfully may be made. Following an affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board of elections, the board of county commissioners may, by resolution, rescind an elections revenue fund established under this division. If an elections revenue fund is rescinded, money that has accumulated in the fund shall be transferred to the county general fund. (2)(a) The board of county commissioners of a county that receives a payment from a political subdivision under division (J) of this section shall, by resolution, establish a special elections fund. The purpose of the fund shall be to accumulate revenue paid to the county by political subdivisions under division (J) of this section for the cost of preparing for and conducting special elections. (b) If both of the following apply, the board of county commissioners may, by resolution, rescind the special elections fund and transfer any remaining money in the fund to the county general fund or to the elections revenue fund: (i) All notifications and payments required under division (J)(3) of this section have been made. (ii) The county has not received any payments from political subdivisions under division (J)(2) of this section for a future special election. (J)(1) Not less than fifteen business days before the deadline for submitting a question or issue for placement on the ballot at a special election, the board of elections shall prepare and file with the board of county commissioners and the office of the secretary of state the estimated cost, based on the factors enumerated in this section, for preparing for and conducting an election on one question or issue, one nomination for office, or one election to office in each precinct in the county at that special election and shall divide that cost by the number of registered voters in the county. (2) The board of elections shall provide to a political subdivision seeking to submit a question or issue, a nomination for office, or an election to office for placement on the ballot at a special election with the estimated cost for preparing for and conducting that election, which shall be calculated either by multiplying the number of registered voters in the political subdivision with the cost calculated under division (J)(1) of this section or by multiplying the cost per precinct with the number or precincts in the political subdivision. A political subdivision submitting a question or issue, a nomination for office, or an election to office for placement on the ballot at that special election shall pay to the county special elections fund sixty-five per cent of the estimated cost of the election not less than ten business days after the deadline for submitting a question or issue for placement on the ballot for that special election. (3) Not later than sixty days after the date of a special election, the board of elections shall provide to each political subdivision the true and accurate cost for the question or issue, nomination for office, or election to office that the subdivision submitted to the voters on the special election ballots. If the board of elections determines that a subdivision paid less for the cost of preparing and conducting a special election under division (J)(2) of this section than the actual cost calculated under this division, the subdivision shall remit to the county special elections fund the difference between the payment made under division (J)(2) of this section and the final cost calculated under this division within thirty days after being notified of the final cost. If the board of elections determines that a subdivision paid more for the cost of preparing and conducting a special election under division (J)(2) of this section than the actual cost calculated under this division, the board of elections promptly shall notify the board of county commissioners of that difference. The board of county commissioners shall remit from the county special elections fund to the political subdivision the difference between the payment made under division (J)(2) of this section and the final cost calculated under this division within thirty days after receiving that notification. (K) As used in this section: (1) "Political subdivision" and "subdivision" mean any board of county commissioners, board of township trustees, legislative authority of a municipal corporation, board of education, or any other board, commission, district, or authority that is empowered to levy taxes or permitted to receive the proceeds of a tax levy, regardless of whether the entity receives tax settlement moneys as described in division (A) of this section; (2) "Statewide ballot issue" means any ballot issue, whether proposed by the general assembly or by initiative or referendum, that is submitted to the voters throughout the state. Sec. 3501.28. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Fair Labor Standards Act" or "Act" means the "Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938," 52 Stat. 1062, 29 U.S.C.A. 201, as amended. (2) "Full election day" means the period of time between the opening of the polls and the completion of the procedures contained in section 3501.26 of the Revised Code. (3) "Services" means services at each general, primary, or special election. (B) Beginning with calendar year 2004, each precinct election official in a county shall be paid for the official's services at the same hourly rate, which shall be not less than the minimum hourly rate established by the Fair Labor Standards Act and not more than ninety-five dollars per diem. (C) The secretary of state shall establish, by rule adopted under section 111.15 of the Revised Code, the maximum amount of per diem compensation that may be paid to precinct election officials under this section each time the Fair Labor Standards Act is amended to increase the minimum hourly rate established by the act. Upon learning of such an increase, the secretary of state shall determine by what percentage the minimum hourly rate has been increased under the act and establish a new maximum amount of per diem compensation that precinct election officials may be paid under this section that is increased by the same percentage that the minimum hourly rate has been increased under the act. (D)(1)(a) No board of elections shall increase the pay of a precinct election official under this section during a calendar year unless the board has given written notice of the proposed increase to the board of county commissioners not later than the first day of October of the preceding calendar year. (b) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section, a board of elections may increase the pay of a precinct election official during a calendar year by up to, but not exceeding, nine per cent over the compensation paid to a precinct election official in the county where the board is located during the previous calendar year, if the compensation so paid during the previous calendar year was eighty-five dollars or less per diem. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) of this section, a board of elections may increase the pay of a precinct election official during a calendar year by up to, but not exceeding, four and one-half per cent over the compensation paid to a precinct election official in the county where the board is located during the previous calendar year, if the compensation so paid during the previous calendar year was more than eighty-five but less than ninety-five dollars per diem. (2) The board of county commissioners may review and comment upon a proposed increase and may enter into a written agreement with a board of elections to permit an increase in the compensation paid to precinct election officials for their services during a calendar year that is greater than the applicable percentage limitation described in division (E)(1)(b)(D)(1)(b) or (c) of this section. (E) No precinct election official who works less than the full election day shall be paid the maximum amount allowed under this section or the maximum amount as set by the board of elections, whichever is less. (F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (F)(4) to (6) of this section, any employee of the state or of any political subdivision of the state may serve as a precinct election official on the day of an election without loss of the employee's regular compensation for that day as follows: (a) For employees of a county office, department, commission, board, or other entity, or of a court of common pleas, county court, or county-operated municipal court, as defined in section 1901.03 of the Revised Code, the employee's appointing authority may permit leave with pay for this service in accordance with a resolution setting forth the terms and conditions for that leave passed by the board of county commissioners. (b) For all other employees of a political subdivision of the state, leave with pay for this service shall be subject to the terms and conditions set forth in an ordinance or a resolution passed by the legislative authority of the applicable political subdivision. (c) For state employees, leave with pay for this service shall be subject to the terms and conditions set forth by the head of the state agency, as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code, by which the person is employed. (2) Any terms and conditions set forth by a board of county commissioners, legislative authority of a political subdivision, or head of a state agency under division (G)(1)(F)(1) of this section shall include a standard procedure for deciding which employees are permitted to receive leave with pay if multiple employees of an entity or court described in division (G)(1)(a)(F)(1)(a) of this section, of an entity of a political subdivision described in division (G)(1)(b)(F)(1)(b) of this section, or of a state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code apply to serve as a precinct election official on the day of an election. This procedure shall be applied uniformly to all similarly situated employees. (3) Any employee who is eligible for leave with pay under division (G)(1)(F)(1) of this section shall receive, in addition to the employee's regular compensation, the compensation paid to the precinct election official under division (B) or (C) of this section. (4) Division (F)(1) of this section does not apply to either of the following: (a) Election officials; (b) Public school teachers. (5) Nothing in division (F)(1) of this section supersedes or negates any provision of a collective bargaining agreement in effect under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. (6) If a board of county commissioners, legislative authority of a political subdivision, or head of a state agency fails to set forth any terms and conditions under division (F)(1) of this section, an employee of an entity or court described in division (F)(1)(a) of this section, of an entity of a political subdivision described in division (F)(1)(b) of this section, or of a state agency as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code may use personal leave, vacation leave, or compensatory time, or take unpaid leave, to serve as a precinct election official on the day of an election. (G) The board of elections may withhold the compensation of any precinct election official for failure to obey the instructions of the board or to comply with the law relating to the duties of a precinct election official. Any payment a precinct election official is entitled to receive under section 3501.36 of the Revised Code is in addition to the compensation the official is entitled to receive under this section. Sec. 3505.03. (A) On the office type ballot shall be printed the names of all candidates for election to offices, except the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, who were nominated at the most recent primary election as candidates of a political party or who were nominated in accordance with section 3513.02 of the Revised Code, and the names of all candidates for election to offices who were nominated by nominating petitions, except candidates for the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, for member of the state board of education, for member of a board of education, for municipal offices, and for township offices. (B) The face of the ballot below the stub shall be substantially in the following form: "OFFICIAL OFFICE TYPE BALLOT (1) To vote for a candidate record your vote in the manner provided next to the name of such candidate. (2) If you tear, soil, deface, or erroneously mark this ballot, return it to the precinct election officers or, if you cannot return it, notify the precinct election officers, and obtain another ballot." (C) The order in which the offices shall be listed on the ballot shall be prescribed by, and certified to each board of elections by, the secretary of state; provided that for state, district, and county offices the order from top to bottom shall be as follows: governor and lieutenant governor, attorney general, auditor of state, secretary of state, treasurer of state, chief justice of the supreme court, justice of the supreme court, United States senator, representative to congress, state senator, state representative, judge of a court of appeals, member of a board of education, county commissioner, county auditor, prosecuting attorney, clerk of the court of common pleas, sheriff, county recorder, county treasurer, county engineer, and coroner. The offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be printed on the ballot in a manner that requires a voter to cast one vote jointly for the candidates who have been nominated by the same political party or petition. (D) Within the rectangular space within which the title of each judicial office listed in division (C) of this section is printed on the ballot and immediately below the title shall be printed the date of the commencement of the term of the office, if it is a full term, as follows: "Full term commencing _______(Date)_______," or the date of the end of the term of the office, if it is an unexpired term, as follows: "Unexpired term ending _______(Date)________" (E)(1) The names of all candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office, and, except for absentee ballots or when the number of candidates for a particular office is the same as the number of candidates to be elected for that office, shall be rotated from one precinct to another. On absentee ballots, the names of all candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office and shall be so alternated that each name shall appear, insofar as may be reasonably possible, substantially an equal number of times at the beginning, at the end, and in each intermediate place, if any, of the group in which such name belongs, unless the number of candidates for a particular office is the same as the number of candidates to be elected for that office. (2) Within the rectangular space within which the title of each office for member of a board of education is printed on the ballot shall be printed "For Member of Board of Education," and the number to be elected, directions to the voter as to voting for one, two, or more, and, if the office to be voted for is member of a board of education of a city school district, words shall be printed in said space on the ballot to indicate whether candidates are to be elected from subdistricts or at large. (3) The method of printing the ballots to meet the rotation requirement of this section shall be as follows: the least common multiple of the number of names in each of the several groups of candidates shall be used, and the number of changes made in the printer's forms in printing the ballots shall correspond with that multiple. The board of elections shall number all precincts in regular serial sequence. In the first precinct, the names of the candidates in each group shall be listed in alphabetical order. In each succeeding precinct, the name in each group that is listed first in the preceding precinct shall be listed last, and the name of each candidate shall be moved up one place. In each precinct using paper ballots, the printed ballots shall then be assembled in tablets. (F) Under the name of each candidate nominated at a primary election, nominated by petition under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code, or certified by a party committee to fill a vacancy under section 3513.31 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the name of the political party by which the candidate was nominated or certified. Under the name of each candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested a ballot designation as a nonparty candidate under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the designation of "nonparty candidate." Under the name of each candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested a ballot designation as an other-party candidate under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code shall be printed, in less prominent type face than that in which the candidate's name is printed, the designation of "other-party candidate." No designation shall appear under the name of a candidate appearing on the ballot who filed a nominating petition and requested that no ballot designation appear under the candidate's name under section 3513.257 of the Revised Code, or who filed a nominating petition and failed to request a ballot designation either as a nonparty candidate or as an other-party candidate under that section. (G) Except as provided in this section, no words, designations, or emblems descriptive of a candidate or the candidate's political affiliation, or indicative of the method by which the candidate was nominated or certified, shall be printed under or after a candidate's name that is printed on the ballot. Sec. 3505.04. On the nonpartisan ballot shall be printed the names of all nonpartisan candidates for election to the office of judge of a municipal court, county court, or court of common pleas, the office of member of the state board of education, the office of member of a board of education, municipal or township offices for municipal corporations and townships in which primary elections are not held for nomination of candidates by political parties, and municipal offices of municipal corporations having charters which provide for separate ballots for elections for such municipal offices. Such ballots shall have printed across the top, and below the stubs, "Official Nonpartisan Ballot." The order in which the offices are listed on the ballot shall be prescribed by, and certified to each board of elections by, the secretary of state; provided that the office of member of the state board of education county judicial offices shall be listed first on the ballot, then county judicial offices, followed by municipal and township offices, and by offices of member of a board of education, in the order stated. Within the rectangular space within which the title of each judicial office is printed on the ballot and immediately below such title shall be printed the date of the commencement of the term of the office, if a full term, as follows: "Full term commencing _______(Date)_______," or the date of the end of the term of the office, if an unexpired term, as follows: "Unexpired term ending _______(Date)________" The secretary of state shall prescribe the information and directions to the voter to be printed on the ballot within the rectangular space in which the title of office of member of the state board of education appears. Within the rectangular space within which the title of each office for member of a board of education is printed on the ballot shall be printed "For Member of Board of Education," and the number to be elected, directions to the voter as to voting for one, two, or more, and, if the office to be voted for is member of a board of education of a city school district, words shall be printed in said space on the ballot to indicate whether candidates are to be elected from subdistricts or at large. The names of all nonpartisan candidates for an office shall be arranged in a group under the title of that office, and shall be rotated and printed on the ballot as provided in section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. No name or designation of any political party nor any words, designations, or emblems descriptive of a candidate or the candidate's political affiliation, or indicative of the method by which such candidate was nominated or certified, shall be printed under or after any nonpartisan candidate's name which is printed on the ballot. Sec. 3505.06. (A) On the questions and issues ballot shall be printed all questions and issues to be submitted at any one election together with the percentage of affirmative votes necessary for passage as required by law. Such ballot shall have printed across the top thereof, and below the stubs, "Official Questions and Issues Ballot." (B)(1) Questions and issues shall be grouped together on the ballot from top to bottom as provided in division (B)(1) of this section, except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section. State questions and issues shall always appear as the top group of questions and issues. In calendar year 1997, the following questions and issues shall be grouped together on the ballot, in the following order from top to bottom, after the state questions and issues: (a) County questions and issues; (b) Municipal questions and issues; (c) Township questions and issues; (d) School or other district questions and issues. In each succeeding calendar year after 1997, each group of questions and issues described in division (B)(1)(a) to (d) of this section shall be moved down one place on the ballot except that the group that was last on the ballot during the immediately preceding calendar year shall appear at the top of the ballot after the state questions and issues. The rotation shall be performed only once each calendar year, beginning with the first election held during the calendar year. The rotation of groups of questions and issues shall be performed during each calendar year as required by division (B)(1) of this section, even if no questions and issues from any one or more such groups appear on the ballot at any particular election held during that calendar year. (2) Questions and issues shall be grouped together on the ballot, from top to bottom, in the following order when it is not practicable to group them together as required by division (B)(1) of this section because of the type of voting machines used by the board of elections: state questions and issues, county questions and issues, municipal questions and issues, township questions and issues, and school or other district questions and issues. The particular order in which each of a group of state questions or issues is placed on the ballot shall be determined by, and certified to each board of elections by, the secretary of state. (3) Failure of the board of elections to rotate questions and issues as required by division (B)(1) of this section does not affect the validity of the election at which the failure occurred, and is not grounds for contesting an election under section 3515.08 of the Revised Code. (C) The particular order in which each of a group of county, municipal, township, or school district questions or issues is placed on the ballot shall be determined by the board providing the ballots. (D) The printed matter pertaining to each question or issue on the ballot shall be enclosed at the top and bottom thereof by a heavy horizontal line across the width of the ballot. Immediately below such top line shall be printed a brief title descriptive of the question or issue below it, such as "Proposed Constitutional Amendment," "Proposed Bond Issue," "Proposed Annexation of Territory," "Proposed Increase in Tax Rate," or such other brief title as will be descriptive of the question or issue to which it pertains, together with a brief statement of the percentage of affirmative votes necessary for passage, such as "A sixty-five per cent affirmative vote is necessary for passage," "A majority vote is necessary for passage," or such other brief statement as will be descriptive of the percentage of affirmative votes required. (E) The questions and issues ballot need not contain the full text of the proposal to be voted upon. A condensed text that will properly describe the question, issue, or an amendment proposed by other than the general assembly shall be used as prepared and certified by the secretary of state for state-wide questions or issues or by the board for local questions or issues. If other than a full text is used, the full text of the proposed question, issue, or amendment together with the percentage of affirmative votes necessary for passage as required by law shall be posted in each polling place in some spot that is easily accessible to the voters. (F)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(2) of this section, each question and issue appearing on the questions and issues ballot may be consecutively numbered. The question or issue determined to appear at the top of the ballot may be designated on the face thereof by the Arabic numeral "1" and all questions and issues placed below on the ballot shall be consecutively numbered. Such numeral shall be placed below the heavy top horizontal line enclosing such question or issue and to the left of the brief title thereof. (2) Beginning with the general election to be held on November 5, 2024, a state question or issue determined to appear at the top of the ballot shall be designated on the face thereof by the Arabic numeral "1" and all state questions and issues placed below on the ballot shall be consecutively numbered. For elections occurring after the general election held on November 5, 2024, a state question or issue determined to appear at the top of the ballot shall be designated on the face thereof by the Arabic numeral that is consecutive to the Arabic numeral of the last state question or issue that appeared on the ballot at the immediately preceding election at which a state question or issue appeared on the ballot and all state questions or issues placed below on the ballot shall be consecutively numbered. Such numeral shall be placed below the heavy top horizontal line enclosing such question or issue and to the left of the brief title thereof. Once a state question or issue appears on the ballot designated by the Arabic numeral "500," the state question or issue appearing at the top of the ballot at the immediately following election at which a state question or issue appears on the ballot shall be designated by the Arabic numeral "1." (G) No portion of a ballot question proposing to levy a property tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation under any section of the Revised Code, including the renewal or replacement of such a levy, may be printed in boldface type or in a font size that is different from the font size of other text in the ballot question. The prohibitions in division (G) of this section do not apply to printed matter either described in division (D) of this section related to such a ballot question or located in the area of the ballot in which votes are indicated for or against that question. Sec. 3505.33. When the board of elections has completed the canvass of the election returns from the precincts in its county, in which electors were entitled to vote at any general or special election, it shall determine and declare the results of the elections determined by the electors of such county or of a district or subdivision within such county. If more than the number of candidates to be elected to an office received the largest and an equal number of votes, such tie shall be resolved by lot by the chairperson of the board in the presence of a majority of the members of the board. Such declaration shall be in writing and shall be signed by at least a majority of the members of the board. It shall bear the date of the day upon which it is made, and a copy thereof shall be posted by the board in a conspicuous place in its office. The board shall keep such copy posted for a period of at least five days. Thereupon the board shall promptly certify abstracts of the results of such elections within its county, in such forms as the secretary of state prescribes. Such forms shall be designated and shall contain abstracts as follows: Form No. 1. An abstract of the votes cast for the office of president and vice-president of the United States. Form No. 2. An abstract of the votes cast for the office of governor and lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, chief justice of the supreme court of Ohio, judge of the supreme court of Ohio, member of the senate of the congress of the United States, member at large of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States, district member of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States, and an abstract of the votes cast upon each question or issue submitted at such election to electors throughout the entire state. Form No. 3. An abstract of the votes cast for the office of member of the senate of the general assembly, and member of the house of representatives of the general assembly. Form No. 4. A report of the votes cast for the office of member of the state board of education, judge of the court of appeals, judge of the court of common pleas, judge of the probate court, judge of the county court, county commissioner, county auditor, prosecuting attorney, clerk of the court of common pleas, sheriff, county recorder, county treasurer, county engineer, and coroner. Form No. 5. A report of the votes cast upon all questions and issues other than such questions and issues which were submitted to electors throughout the entire state. Form No. 6. A report of the votes cast for municipal offices, judge of the municipal court, township offices, and the office of member of a board of education. One copy of each of these forms shall be kept in the office of the board. One copy of each of these forms shall promptly be sent to the secretary of state, who shall place the records contained in forms No. 1, No. 2, No. 3, No. 4, and No. 6 in electronic format. One copy of Form No. 2 shall promptly be sent by electronic mail to the president of the senate of the general assembly. The board shall also at once upon completion of the official count send a certified copy of that part of each of the forms which pertains to an election in which only electors of a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state voted to the board of the most populous county in such district. It shall also at once upon completion of the official count send a certified copy of that part of each of the forms which pertains to an election in which only electors of a subdivision located partly within the county voted to the board of the county in which the major portion of the population of such subdivision is located. If, after certifying and sending abstracts and parts thereof, a board finds that any such abstract or part thereof is incorrect, it shall promptly prepare, certify, and send a corrected abstract or part thereof to take the place of each incorrect abstract or part thereof theretofore certified and sent. Sec. 3505.38. Election officials who are required to declare the results of a special or general election in which persons were elected to offices shall, unless otherwise provided by law, issue to the persons declared elected by them appropriate certificates of election in such form as is prescribed by the secretary of state. Such certificates of election shall be issued by such election officials after the time within which applications may be made for recounts of votes has expired, and after recounts of votes which have been applied for are completed. All persons declared to be elected by the president of the senate as provided for in section 3505.34 of the Revised Code shall be issued certificates of election by the secretary of state as provided for in such section and shall be issued commissions for such offices by the governor, provided that the board of elections required to determine and declare the results of the election for candidates for election to the office of member of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States or member of the state board of education shall, in lieu of issuing a certificate of election, certify to the secretary of state the names of such candidates declared elected, and the secretary of state, from such certification, shall issue to the persons certified to the secretary of state as elected as a member of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States or member of the state board of education a certificate of the person's election, signed by the governor, sealed with the great seal of the state, and countersigned by the secretary of state. Certificates of election of members of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States shall be forwarded by registered mail to the clerk of the house of representatives of the congress of the United States, Washington, D.C., and the person elected to such office shall be advised by letter from the secretary of state that the person's certificate of election has been forwarded to said clerk. Sec. 3513.04. Candidates for party nominations to state, district, county, and municipal offices or positions, for which party nominations are provided by law, and for election as members of party controlling committees shall have their names printed on the official primary ballot by filing a declaration of candidacy and paying the fees specified for the office under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code, except that the joint candidates for party nomination to the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall, for the two of them, file one declaration of candidacy. The joint candidates also shall pay the fees specified for the joint candidates under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall not accept for filing the declaration of candidacy of a candidate for party nomination to the office of governor unless the declaration of candidacy also shows a joint candidate for the same party's nomination to the office of lieutenant governor, shall not accept for filing the declaration of candidacy of a candidate for party nomination to the office of lieutenant governor unless the declaration of candidacy also shows a joint candidate for the same party's nomination to the office of governor, and shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy that shows a candidate for party nomination to the office of governor or lieutenant governor who, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any other state office or any federal or county office. No person who seeks party nomination for an office or position at a primary election by declaration of candidacy or by declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate and no person who is a first choice for president of candidates seeking election as delegates and alternates to the national conventions of the different major political parties who are chosen by direct vote of the electors as provided in this chapter shall be permitted to become a candidate by nominating petition, including a nominating petition filed under section 3517.012 of the Revised Code, by declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or by filling a vacancy under section 3513.31 of the Revised Code at the following general election for any office other than the office of member of the state board of education, office of member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, office of member of a governing board of an educational service center, or office of township trustee. Sec. 3513.05. (A) Each person desiring to become a candidate for a party nomination at a primary election or for election to an office or position to be voted for at a primary election, except persons desiring to become joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor and except as otherwise provided in section 3513.051 of the Revised Code, shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election, file a declaration of candidacy and petition and pay the fees required under divisions (A) and (B) of section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. The declaration of candidacy and all separate petition papers shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. When the offices are to be voted for at a primary election, persons desiring to become joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall, not later than four p.m. of the ninetieth day before the day of the primary election, comply with section 3513.04 of the Revised Code. The prospective joint candidates' declaration of candidacy and all separate petition papers of candidacies shall be filed at the same time as one instrument. The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy and petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or has become a candidate by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code for any federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of candidacy is for a state or county office, or for any municipal or township office, if the declaration of candidacy is for a municipal or township office. (B) If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy which is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, the petition, including a petition for joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, shall be signed by at least one thousand qualified electors who are members of the same political party as the candidate or joint candidates, and the declaration of candidacy and petition shall be filed with the secretary of state; provided that the secretary of state shall not accept or file any such petition appearing on its face to contain signatures of more than three thousand electors. (C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraphsection, if the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors within a district, political subdivision, or portion thereof, the petition shall be signed by not less than fifty qualified electors who are members of the same political party as the political party of which the candidate is a member. If (2) If the declaration of candidacy is for party nomination as a candidate for member of the legislative authority of a municipal corporation elected by wardany of the following, the petition shall be signed by not less than twenty-five qualified electors who are members of the political party of which the candidate is a member: (a) Member of the legislative authority of a municipal corporation elected by ward; (b) Member of a local or exempted village board of education; (c) Member of a board of education of a city school district having a population of less than twenty thousand, as determined by the most recent federal decennial census. (D) No such petition, except the petition for a candidacy that is to be submitted to electors throughout the entire state, shall be accepted for filing if it appears to contain on its face signatures of more than three times the minimum number of signatures. When a petition of a candidate has been accepted for filing by a board of elections, the petition shall not be deemed invalid if, upon verification of signatures contained in the petition, the board of elections finds the number of signatures accepted exceeds three times the minimum number of signatures required. A board of elections may discontinue verifying signatures on petitions when the number of verified signatures equals the minimum required number of qualified signatures. (E) If the declaration of candidacy declares a candidacy for party nomination or for election as a candidate of a minor party, the minimum number of signatures on such petition is one-half the minimum number provided in this section, except that, when the candidacy is one for election as a member of the state central committee or the county central committee of a political party, the minimum number shall be the same for a minor party as for a major party. (F) If a declaration of candidacy is one for election as a member of the state central committee or the county central committee of a political party, the petition shall be signed by five qualified electors of the district, county, ward, township, or precinct within which electors may vote for such candidate. The electors signing such petition shall be members of the same political party as the political party of which the candidate is a member. (G) For purposes of signing or circulating a petition of candidacy for party nomination or election, an elector is considered to be a member of a political party if the elector voted in that party's primary election within the preceding two calendar years, or if the elector did not vote in any other party's primary election within the preceding two calendar years. (H) If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors within a county, or within a district or subdivision or part thereof smaller than a county, the petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the county. If the declaration of candidacy is of one that is to be submitted only to electors of a district or subdivision or part thereof that is situated in more than one county, the petition shall be filed with the board of elections of the county within which the major portion of the population thereof, as ascertained by the next preceding federal census, is located. (I) A petition shall consist of separate petition papers, each of which shall contain signatures of electors of only one county. Petitions or separate petition papers containing signatures of electors of more than one county shall not thereby be declared invalid. In case petitions or separate petition papers containing signatures of electors of more than one county are filed, the board shall determine the county from which the majority of signatures came, and only signatures from such county shall be counted. Signatures from any other county shall be invalid. (J) Each separate petition paper shall be circulated by one person only, who shall be the candidate or a joint candidate or a member of the same political party as the candidate or joint candidates, and each separate petition paper shall be governed by the rules set forth in section 3501.38 of the Revised Code. (K) The secretary of state shall promptly transmit to each board such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with the secretary of state as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of such board. The board of the most populous county of a district shall promptly transmit to each board within such district such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport to contain signatures of electors of the county of each such board. The board of a county within which the major portion of the population of a subdivision, situated in more than one county, is located, shall promptly transmit to the board of each other county within which a portion of such subdivision is located such separate petition papers of each petition accompanying a declaration of candidacy filed with it as purport to contain signatures of electors of the portion of such subdivision in the county of each such board. (L) All petition papers so transmitted to a board and all petitions accompanying declarations of candidacy filed with a board shall, under proper regulations, be open to public inspection until four p.m. of the eightieth day before the day of the next primary election. Each board shall, not later than the seventy-eighth day before the day of that primary election, examine and determine the validity or invalidity of the signatures on the petition papers so transmitted to or filed with it and shall return to the secretary of state all petition papers transmitted to it by the secretary of state, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of signatures thereon, and shall return to each other board all petition papers transmitted to it by such board, together with its certification of its determination as to the validity or invalidity of the signatures thereon. All other matters affecting the validity or invalidity of such petition papers shall be determined by the secretary of state or the board with whom such petition papers were filed. (M)(1) Protests against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy for party nomination or for election to an office or position, as provided in this section, may be filed by any qualified elector who is a member of the same political party as the candidate and who is eligible to vote at the primary election for the candidate whose declaration of candidacy the elector objects to, or by the controlling committee of that political party. The protest shall be in writing, and shall be filed not later than four p.m. of the seventy-fourth day before the day of the primary election. The protest shall be filed with the election officials with whom the declaration of candidacy and petition was filed. Upon the filing of the protest, the election officials with whom it is filed shall promptly fix the time for hearing it, and shall forthwith mail notice of the filing of the protest and the time fixed for hearing to the person whose candidacy is so protested. They shall also forthwith mail notice of the time fixed for such hearing to the person who filed the protest. At the time fixed, such election officials shall hear the protest and determine the validity or invalidity of the declaration of candidacy and petition. If they find that such candidate is not an elector of the state, district, county, or political subdivision in which the candidate seeks a party nomination or election to an office or position, or has not fully complied with this chapter, the candidate's declaration of candidacy and petition shall be determined to be invalid and shall be rejected; otherwise, it shall be determined to be valid. That determination shall be final. (2) A protest against the candidacy of any persons filing a declaration of candidacy for joint party nomination to the offices of governor and lieutenant governor shall be filed, heard, and determined in the same manner as a protest against the candidacy of any person filing a declaration of candidacy singly. (N)(1) The secretary of state shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to each board in the state the forms of the official ballots to be used at the primary election, together with the names of the candidates to be printed on the ballots whose nomination or election is to be determined by electors throughout the entire state and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. (2) The board of the most populous county in a district comprised of more than one county but less than all of the counties of the state shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to the board of each county in the district the names of the candidates to be printed on the official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose nomination or election is to be determined only by electors within the district and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. (3) The board of a county within which the major portion of the population of a subdivision smaller than the county and situated in more than one county is located shall, on the seventieth day before the day of a primary election, certify to the board of each county in which a portion of that subdivision is located the names of the candidates to be printed on the official ballots to be used at the primary election, whose nomination or election is to be determined only by electors within that subdivision and who filed valid declarations of candidacy and petitions. Sec. 3513.052. (A) No person shall seek nomination or election to any of the following offices or positions at the same election by filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or by becoming a candidate through party nomination in a primary election, or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code: (1) Two or more state offices; (2) Two or more county offices; (3) A state office and a county office; (4) A federal office and a state or county office; (5) Any combination of two or more municipal or township offices, positions as a member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or positions as a member of a governing board of an educational service center. (B) The secretary of state or a board of elections shall not accept for filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition of a person seeking to become a candidate if that person, for the same election, has already filed a declaration of candidacy, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, or has become a candidate through party nomination at a primary election or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code for: (1) Any federal, state, or county office, if the declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition is for a state or county office; (2) Any municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center, if the declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition is for a municipal or township office, or for member of a city, local, or exempted village board of education, or for member of a governing board of an educational service center. (C)(1) If the secretary of state determines, before the day of the primary election, that a person is seeking nomination to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the secretary of state shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and none of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the board determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the secretary of state shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the secretary of state determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (2) If a board of elections determines, before the day of the primary election, that a person is seeking nomination to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the board shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within that county and none of those offices is a federal office, the board shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the board determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state then shall determine the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for each of those offices by filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office for which the person sought to become a candidate after the date on which the person first sought to become a candidate for any of those offices. If the secretary of state determines that the person sought to become a candidate for more than one of those offices on the same date, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks nomination, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking nomination is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking nomination is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state then shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. (D)(1) If the secretary of state determines, after the day of the primary election and before the day of the general election, that a person is seeking election to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the secretary of state shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within a single county and none of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the secretary of state shall promptly investigate and determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within a single county and any of those offices is a federal office, the secretary of state shall notify the board of elections of that county. The board then shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (2) If a board of elections determines, after the day of the primary election and before the day of the general election, that a person is seeking election to more than one office at that election in violation of division (A) of this section, the board of elections shall do one of the following: (a) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within that county and none of those offices is a federal office, the board shall determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (b) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office or an office with a district larger than a single county and none of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state promptly shall investigate and determine the offices for which the person seeks to appear as a candidate on the ballot. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that would be listed on the ballot below the highest office for which that person seeks election, according to the ballot order prescribed under section 3505.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If each office or the district for each office for which the person is seeking election is wholly within that county and any of those offices is a federal office, the board shall vote promptly to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (d) If one or more of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a state office and any of the offices for which the person is seeking election is a federal office, the board shall notify the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall order the board of elections of each county in which the person is seeking to appear on the ballot to disqualify that person as a candidate for each office that is not a federal office. Each board of elections so notified shall vote promptly to disqualify the person as a candidate in accordance with the order of the secretary of state. If the person sought nomination at a primary election and has not yet been issued a certificate of nomination, the board shall not issue that certificate for that person for any office that is not a federal office. (E) When a person is disqualified as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section, on or before the seventieth day before the day of the applicable election, the board of elections shall remove the person's name from the ballot for any office for which that person has been disqualified as a candidate according to the directions of the secretary of state. When a person is disqualified as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section after the seventieth day before the day of the applicable election, the board of elections shall not remove the person's name from the ballot for any office for which that person has been disqualified as a candidate. The board of elections shall post a notice at each polling location on the day of the applicable election, and shall enclose with each absent voter's ballot given or mailed after the candidate is disqualified, a notice that votes for the person for the office for which the person has been disqualified as a candidate will be void and will not be counted. If the name is not removed from the ballots before the day of the election, the votes for the disqualified candidate are void and shall not be counted. (F) Any vacancy created by the disqualification of a person as a candidate under division (C) or (D) of this section may be filled in the manner provided for in sections 3513.30 and 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (G) Nothing in this section or section 3513.04, 3513.041, 3513.05, 3513.251, 3513.253, 3513.254, 3513.255, 3513.257, 3513.259, or 3513.261 of the Revised Code prohibits, and the secretary of state or a board of elections shall not disqualify, a person from being a candidate for an office, if that person timely withdraws as a candidate for any offices specified in division (A) of this section for which that person first sought to become a candidate by filing a declaration of candidacy and petition, a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or a nominating petition, by party nomination in a primary election, or by the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code. (H) As used in this section: (1) "State office" means the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, member of the general assembly, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) "Timely withdraws" means either of the following: (a) Withdrawing as a candidate before the applicable deadline for filing a declaration of candidacy, declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, or nominating petition for the subsequent office for which the person is seeking to become a candidate at the same election; (b) Withdrawing as a candidate before the applicable deadline for the filling of a vacancy under section 3513.30 or 3513.31 of the Revised Code, if the person is seeking to become a candidate for a subsequent office at the same election under either of those sections. Sec. 3513.10. (A) At the time of filing a declaration of candidacy for nomination for any office, or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate, each candidate, except joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor, shall pay a fee as follows: 1 2 A For statewide office $100 B For court of appeals judge $50 C For court of common pleas judge $50 D For county court judge $50 E For municipal court judge $50 F For district office, including member of the United States house of representatives and member of the general assembly $50 G For county office $50 H For city office $20 I For village office $10 J For township office $10 K For member of state board of education $20 L For member of local, city, or exempted village board of education or educational service center governing board $10 At the time of filing a declaration of candidacy or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, the joint candidates shall jointly pay to the secretary of state a fee of one hundred dollars. (B)(1) At the same time the fee required under division (A) of this section is paid, each candidate shall pay an additional fee as follows: 1 2 A For the joint candidates for governor and lieutenant governor $50 B For statewide office $50 C For district office, including member of the United States house of representatives and member of the general assembly $35 D For member of state board of education $35 E For court of appeals judge $30 F For court of common pleas judge $30 G For county court judge $30 H For municipal court judge $30 I For county office $30 J For city office $25 K For village office $20 L For township office $20 M For member of local, city, or exempted village board of education or educational service center governing board $20 (2) Whoever seeks to propose a ballot question or issue to be submitted to the electors shall pay the following fee at the time the petition proposing the question or issue is filed: (a) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors throughout the entire state, twenty-five dollars; (b) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors of a county or of a district that consists of all or part of two or more counties but less than the entire state, fifteen dollars; (c) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors of a city, twelve dollars and fifty cents; (d) If the question or issue is to be submitted to the electors of a village, a township, a local, city, county, or exempted village school district, a precinct, or another district consisting of less than an entire county, ten dollars. (C) No fee shall be required of candidates filing for the office of delegate or alternate to the national convention of political parties, member of the state central committee of a political party, or member of the county central committee of a political party. (D) All fees required under division (A) of this section immediately shall be paid by the officer receiving them into the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund, in the case of fees received by the secretary of state, and into the county treasury to the credit of the county general fund, in the case of fees received by a board of elections. (E) The officer who receives a fee required under division (B) of this section immediately shall pay the fee to the credit of the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund created by division (I) of under section 3517.152 111.29 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) In no case shall a fee paid under this section be returned to a candidate. (2) Whenever a section of law refers to a filing fee to be paid by a candidate or by a committee proposing a ballot question or issue to be submitted to the electors, that fee includes the fees required under divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (G) As used in divisions (A) and (B) of this section, "statewide office" means the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, justice and chief justice of the supreme court, and member of the United States senate. Sec. 3513.19. (A) It is the duty of any precinct election official, whenever any such official doubts that a person attempting to vote at a primary election is legally entitled to vote at that election, to challenge the right of that person to vote. The right of a person to vote at a primary election may be challenged upon the following grounds: (1) That the person whose right to vote is challenged is not a legally qualified elector; (2) That the person has received or has been promised some valuable reward or consideration for the person's vote; (3) That the person is not affiliated with or is not a member of the political party whose ballot the person desires to vote. Such party affiliation shall be determined by examining the elector's voting record for the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years as shown on the voter's registration card, using the standards of affiliation specified in the seventh paragraph division (G) of section 3513.05 of the Revised Code. Division (A)(3) of this section and the seventh paragraph division (G) of section 3513.05 of the Revised Code do not prohibit a person who holds an elective office for which candidates are nominated at a party primary election from doing any of the following: (a) If the person voted as a member of a different political party at any primary election within the current year and the immediately preceding two calendar years, being a candidate for nomination at a party primary held during the times specified in division (C)(2) of section 3513.191 of the Revised Code provided that the person complies with the requirements of that section; (b) Circulating the person's own petition of candidacy for party nomination in the primary election. (B) When the right of a person to vote is challenged upon the ground set forth in division (A)(3) of this section, membership in or political affiliation with a political party shall be determined by the person's statement, made under penalty of election falsification, that the person desires to be affiliated with and supports the principles of the political party whose primary ballot the person desires to vote. Sec. 3517.01. (A)(1) A political party within the meaning of Title XXXV of the Revised Code is any group of voters that meets either of the following requirements: (a) Except as otherwise provided in this division, at the most recent regular state election, the group polled for its candidate for governor in the state or nominees for presidential electors at least three per cent of the entire vote cast for that office. A group that meets the requirements of this division remains a political party for a period of four years after meeting those requirements. (b) The group filed with the secretary of state, subsequent to its failure to meet the requirements of division (A)(1)(a) of this section, a party formation petition that meets all of the following requirements: (i) The petition is signed by qualified electors equal in number to at least one per cent of the total vote for governor or nominees for presidential electors at the most recent election for such office. (ii) The petition is signed by not fewer than five hundred qualified electors from each of at least a minimum of one-half of the congressional districts in this state. If an odd number of congressional districts exists in this state, the number of districts that results from dividing the number of congressional districts by two shall be rounded up to the next whole number. (iii) The petition declares the petitioners' intention of organizing a political party, the name of which shall be stated in the declaration, and of participating in the succeeding general election, held in even-numbered years, that occurs more than one hundred twenty-five days after the date of filing. (iv) The petition designates a committee of not less than three nor more than five individuals of the petitioners, who shall represent the petitioners in all matters relating to the petition. Notice of all matters or proceedings pertaining to the petition may be served on the committee, or any of them, either personally or by registered mail, or by leaving such notice at the usual place of residence of each of them. (2) No such group of electors shall assume a name or designation that is similar, in the opinion of the secretary of state, to that of an existing political party as to confuse or mislead the voters at an election. (B) A campaign committee shall be legally liable for any debts, contracts, or expenditures incurred or executed in its name. (C) Notwithstanding the definitions found in section 3501.01 of the Revised Code, as used in this section and sections 3517.08 to 3517.14, 3517.99, and 3517.992 3517.991 of the Revised Code: (1) "Campaign committee" means a candidate or a combination of two or more persons authorized by a candidate under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code to receive contributions and make expenditures. (2) "Campaign treasurer" means an individual appointed by a candidate under section 3517.081 of the Revised Code. (3) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in division (H) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code and also includes any person who, at any time before or after an election, receives contributions or makes expenditures or other use of contributions, has given consent for another to receive contributions or make expenditures or other use of contributions, or appoints a campaign treasurer, for the purpose of bringing about the person's nomination or election to public office. When two persons jointly seek the offices of governor and lieutenant governor, "candidate" means the pair of candidates jointly. "Candidate" does not include candidates for election to the offices of member of a county or state central committee, presidential elector, and delegate to a national convention or conference of a political party. (4) "Continuing association" means an association, other than a campaign committee, political party, legislative campaign fund, political contributing entity, or labor organization, that is intended to be a permanent organization that has a primary purpose other than supporting or opposing specific candidates, political parties, or ballot issues, and that functions on a regular basis throughout the year. "Continuing association" includes organizations that are determined to be not organized for profit under subsection 501 and that are described in subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. (5) "Contribution" means a loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, payment, or transfer of funds or anything of value, including a transfer of funds from an inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's estate, and the payment by any person other than the person to whom the services are rendered for the personal services of another person, which contribution is made, received, or used for the purpose of influencing the results of an election. Any loan, gift, deposit, forgiveness of indebtedness, donation, advance, payment, or transfer of funds or of anything of value, including a transfer of funds from an inter vivos or testamentary trust or decedent's estate, and the payment by any campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, political contributing entity, or person other than the person to whom the services are rendered for the personal services of another person, that is made, received, or used by a state or county political party, other than the moneys an entity may receive under sections 3517.101, 3517.1012, and 3517.1013 of the Revised Code, shall be considered to be a "contribution" for the purpose of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code and shall be included on a statement of contributions filed under that section. "Contribution" does not include any of the following: (a) Services provided without compensation by individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on behalf of a person; (b) Ordinary home hospitality; (c) The personal expenses of a volunteer paid for by that volunteer campaign worker; (d) Any gift given to an entity pursuant to section 3517.101 of the Revised Code; (e) Any contribution as defined in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code that is made, received, or used to pay the direct costs of producing or airing an electioneering communication; (f) Any gift given to a state or county political party for the party's restricted fund under division (A)(2) of section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code; (g) Any gift given to a state political party for deposit in a Levin account pursuant to section 3517.1013 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "Levin account" has the same meaning as in that section. (h) Any donation given to a transition fund under section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. (6) "Expenditure" means the disbursement or use of a contribution for the purpose of influencing the results of an election or of making a charitable donation under division (G) of section 3517.08 of the Revised Code. Any disbursement or use of a contribution by a state or county political party is an expenditure and shall be considered either to be made for the purpose of influencing the results of an election or to be made as a charitable donation under division (G) of section 3517.08 of the Revised Code and shall be reported on a statement of expenditures filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. During the thirty days preceding a primary or general election, any disbursement to pay the direct costs of producing or airing a broadcast, cable, or satellite communication that refers to a clearly identified candidate shall be considered to be made for the purpose of influencing the results of that election and shall be reported as an expenditure or as an independent expenditure under section 3517.10 or 3517.105 of the Revised Code, as applicable, except that the information required to be reported regarding contributors for those expenditures or independent expenditures shall be the same as the information required to be reported under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "broadcast, cable, or satellite communication" and "refers to a clearly identified candidate" have the same meanings as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. (7) "Personal expenses" includes, but is not limited to, ordinary expenses for accommodations, clothing, food, personal motor vehicle or airplane, and home telephone. (8) "Political action committee" means a combination of two or more persons, the primary or major purpose of which is to support or oppose any candidate, political party, or issue, or to influence the result of any election through express advocacy, and that is not a political party, a campaign committee, a political contributing entity, or a legislative campaign fund. "Political action committee" does not include either of the following: (a) A continuing association that makes disbursements for the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications and that does not engage in express advocacy; (b) A political club that is formed primarily for social purposes and that consists of one hundred members or less, has officers and periodic meetings, has less than two thousand five hundred dollars in its treasury at all times, and makes an aggregate total contribution of one thousand dollars or less per calendar year. (9) "Public office" means any state, county, municipal, township, or district office, except an office of a political party, that is filled by an election and the offices of United States senator and representative. (10) "Anything of value" has the same meaning as in section 1.03 of the Revised Code. (11) "Beneficiary of a campaign fund" means a candidate, a public official or employee for whose benefit a campaign fund exists, and any other person who has ever been a candidate or public official or employee and for whose benefit a campaign fund exists. (12) "Campaign fund" means money or other property, including contributions. (13) "Public official or employee" has the same meaning as in section 102.01 of the Revised Code. (14) "Caucus" means all of the members of the house of representatives or all of the members of the senate of the general assembly who are members of the same political party. (15) "Legislative campaign fund" means a fund that is established as an auxiliary of a state political party and associated with one of the houses of the general assembly. (16) "In-kind contribution" means anything of value other than money that is used to influence the results of an election or is transferred to or used in support of or in opposition to a candidate, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, political action committee, or political contributing entity and that is made with the consent of, in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of the benefited candidate, committee, fund, party, or entity. The financing of the dissemination, distribution, or republication, in whole or part, of any broadcast or of any written, graphic, or other form of campaign materials prepared by the candidate, the candidate's campaign committee, or their authorized agents is an in-kind contribution to the candidate and an expenditure by the candidate. (17) "Independent expenditure" means an expenditure by a person advocating the election or defeat of an identified candidate or candidates, that is not made with the consent of, in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of any candidate or candidates or of the campaign committee or agent of the candidate or candidates. As used in division (C)(17) of this section: (a) "Person" means an individual, partnership, unincorporated business organization or association, political action committee, political contributing entity, separate segregated fund, association, or other organization or group of persons, but not a labor organization or a corporation unless the labor organization or corporation is a political contributing entity. (b) "Advocating" means any communication containing a message advocating election or defeat. (c) "Identified candidate" means that the name of the candidate appears, a photograph or drawing of the candidate appears, or the identity of the candidate is otherwise apparent by unambiguous reference. (d) "Made in coordination, cooperation, or consultation with, or at the request or suggestion of, any candidate or the campaign committee or agent of the candidate" means made pursuant to any arrangement, coordination, or direction by the candidate, the candidate's campaign committee, or the candidate's agent prior to the publication, distribution, display, or broadcast of the communication. An expenditure is presumed to be so made when it is any of the following: (i) Based on information about the candidate's plans, projects, or needs provided to the person making the expenditure by the candidate, or by the candidate's campaign committee or agent, with a view toward having an expenditure made; (ii) Made by or through any person who is, or has been, authorized to raise or expend funds, who is, or has been, an officer of the candidate's campaign committee, or who is, or has been, receiving any form of compensation or reimbursement from the candidate or the candidate's campaign committee or agent; (iii) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of section 3517.105 of the Revised Code, made by a political party in support of a candidate, unless the expenditure is made by a political party to conduct voter registration or voter education efforts. (e) "Agent" means any person who has actual oral or written authority, either express or implied, to make or to authorize the making of expenditures on behalf of a candidate, or means any person who has been placed in a position with the candidate's campaign committee or organization such that it would reasonably appear that in the ordinary course of campaign-related activities the person may authorize expenditures. (18) "Labor organization" means a labor union; an employee organization; a federation of labor unions, groups, locals, or other employee organizations; an auxiliary of a labor union, employee organization, or federation of labor unions, groups, locals, or other employee organizations; or any other bona fide organization in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment. (19) "Separate segregated fund" means a separate segregated fund established pursuant to the Federal Election Campaign Act. (20) "Federal Election Campaign Act" means the "Federal Election Campaign Act of 1971," 86 Stat. 11, 2 U.S.C.A. 431, et seq., as amended. (21) "Restricted fund" means the fund a state or county political party must establish under division (A)(1) of section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code. (22) "Electioneering communication" has the same meaning as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. (23) "Express advocacy" means a communication that contains express words advocating the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate or that contains express words advocating the adoption or defeat of a question or issue, as determined by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. (24) "Political committee" has the same meaning as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. (25) "Political contributing entity" means any entity, including a corporation or labor organization, that may lawfully make contributions and expenditures and that is not an individual or a political action committee, continuing association, campaign committee, political party, legislative campaign fund, designated state campaign committee, or state candidate fund. For purposes of this division, "lawfully" means not prohibited by any section of the Revised Code, or authorized by a final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. (26) "Internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.08. (A) The personal expenses of a candidate paid for by the candidate, from the candidate's personal funds, shall not be considered as a contribution by or an expenditure by the candidate and shall not be reported under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) An expenditure by a political action committee or a political contributing entity shall not be considered a contribution by the political action committee or the political contributing entity or an expenditure by or on behalf of the candidate if the purpose of the expenditure is to inform only its members by means of mailed publications of its activities or endorsements. (2) An expenditure by a political party shall not be considered a contribution by the political party or an expenditure by or on behalf of the candidate if the purpose of the expenditure is to inform predominantly the party's members by means of mailed publications or other direct communication of its activities or endorsements, or for voter contact such as sample ballots, absent voter's ballots application mailings, voter registration, or get-out-the-vote activities. (C) An expenditure by a continuing association, political contributing entity, or political party shall not be considered a contribution to any campaign committee or an expenditure by or on behalf of any campaign committee if the purpose of the expenditure is for the staff and maintenance of the continuing association's, political contributing entity's, or political party's headquarters, or for a political poll, survey, index, or other type of measurement not on behalf of a specific candidate. (D) The expenses of maintaining a constituent office paid for, from the candidate's personal funds, by a candidate who is a member of the general assembly at the time of the election shall not be considered a contribution by or an expenditure by or on behalf of the candidate, and shall not be reported, if the constituent office is not used for any candidate's campaign activities. (E) The net contribution of each social or fund-raising activity shall be calculated by totaling all contributions to the activity minus the expenditures made for the activity. (F) An expenditure that purchases goods or services shall be attributed to an election when the disbursement of funds is made, rather than at the time the goods or services are used. The secretary of state, under the procedures of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall establish rules for the attribution of expenditures to a candidate when the candidate is a candidate for more than one office during a reporting period and for expenditures made in a year in which no election is held. The secretary of state shall further define by rule those expenditures that are or are not by or on behalf of a candidate. (G) An expenditure for the purpose of a charitable donation may be made if it is made to an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19) of the Internal Revenue Code or is approved by advisory opinion of the Ohio elections election integrity commission as a legitimate charitable organization. Each expenditure under this division shall be separately itemized on statements made pursuant to section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.081. (A) Each candidate shall have no more than one campaign committee for purposes of receiving contributions and making expenditures. No campaign committee shall receive any contribution or make any expenditure other than through the campaign treasurer. The campaign treasurer shall file all statements required of a candidate or campaign committee under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. The candidate shall designate the candidate or a member of the candidate's campaign committee as the candidate's campaign treasurer as required by division (D) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. The campaign treasurer may appoint deputy campaign treasurers as required. Deputy campaign treasurers may exercise any of the powers and duties of a campaign treasurer when specifically authorized to do so by the campaign treasurer or the candidate. Each candidate shall file a written statement, as required by division (D) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, setting forth the full name and address of the campaign treasurer and also of each deputy treasurer. Each candidate shall file supplemental statements giving the full name and address of each deputy treasurer at the time of appointment. A candidate may remove the campaign treasurer or any deputy campaign treasurer at any time. In the case of death, resignation, or removal of the treasurer or deputy treasurer before compliance with all obligations of a campaign treasurer, the candidate shall fill the vacancy thus created in the same manner as provided in the case of an original appointment. (B)(1) Two or more candidates may be the beneficiaries of a single campaign committee if all of the following apply: (a) Each candidate is seeking nomination or election to the same office at the same election. (b) The office for which each candidate is seeking nomination or election is the office of member of a board, commission, or other similar body of elected officials to which multiple members are nominated or elected at the same election. (c) The number of candidates who will be the beneficiaries of the campaign committee does not exceed the number of open positions on the board, commission, or other similar body of elected officials to which the candidates are seeking nomination or election. (d) The candidates jointly designate one of the candidates or one member of the campaign committee as the treasurer of that campaign committee as required under division (A) of this section. (e) The candidates jointly file the written statements required under division (A) of this section. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, any penalty that may be imposed on a candidate under section 3517.992 of the Revised Code for a violation of this chapter shall be imposed jointly and severally on each beneficiary of a multi-beneficiary campaign committee. If the Ohio elections commission or the appropriate prosecutor trier of fact is able to determine that a specific beneficiary of a multi-beneficiary campaign committee violated this chapter, the applicable penalty under section 3517.992 of the Revised Code shall be imposed only on that candidate and not on the other beneficiaries of that multi-beneficiary campaign committee. (3)(a) If any of the following occur after a multi-beneficiary campaign committee is established, that campaign committee shall be terminated: (i) The beneficiaries of the campaign committee disagree as to the designation or removal of a campaign treasurer. (ii) Any beneficiary of the campaign committee desires to end the beneficiary's candidacy for the office for which the beneficiaries are seeking nomination or election. (iii) Any beneficiary of the campaign committee desires to form an individual campaign committee. (b) Prior to the termination of a multi-beneficiary campaign committee in accordance with division (B)(3)(a) of this section, any contributions received by that campaign committee that have not been expended shall be disposed of in the manner provided in division (C) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code. No contributions from the multi-beneficiary campaign committee shall be contributed or transferred into any candidate's individual campaign committee. (4) No candidate who has a campaign committee for which that candidate is the sole beneficiary shall become the beneficiary of a campaign committee with multiple beneficiaries under division (B)(1) of this section unless the candidate first terminates the candidate's individual campaign committee. Prior to the termination of that individual campaign committee, any contributions received by that campaign committee that have not been expended shall be disposed of in the manner provided in division (C) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code. No contributions from the candidate's individual campaign committee shall be contributed or transferred into the multi-beneficiary campaign committee. Sec. 3517.092. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Appointing authority" has the same meaning as in section 124.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "State elected officer" means any person appointed or elected to a state elective office. (3) "State elective office" means any of the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, member of the general assembly, and justice and chief justice of the supreme court. (4) "Contribution" includes a contribution to any political party, campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, or legislative campaign fund. (B)(1) No state elected officer, no campaign committee of such an officer, no employee of the state elected officer's office, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to a state elected officer or to such an officer's campaign committee, and no state elected officer and no campaign committee of such an officer shall accept a contribution, from any of the following: (a) A state employee whose appointing authority is the state elected officer; (b) A state employee whose appointing authority is authorized or required by law to be appointed by the state elected officer; (c) A state employee who functions in or is employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as the state elected officer. (2) No candidate for a state elective office, no campaign committee of such a candidate, no employee of the candidate's office if the candidate is a state elected officer or an elected officer of a political subdivision of the state, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to a candidate for a state elective office or to such a candidate's campaign committee, and no candidate for a state elective office and no campaign committee of such a candidate shall accept a contribution, from any of the following: (a) A state employee at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be the candidate, if elected; (b) A state employee at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be appointed by the candidate, if elected, as authorized or required by law; (c) A state employee at the time of the solicitation, who will function in or be employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as the candidate, if elected. (C)(1) No elected officer of a political subdivision of the state, no campaign committee of such an officer, no employee of such an officer's office, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to an elected officer of a political subdivision of the state or to such an officer's campaign committee from any of the following: (a) An employee of that political subdivision whose appointing authority is that elected officer; (b) An employee of that political subdivision whose appointing authority is authorized or required by law to be appointed by that elected officer; (c) An employee of that political subdivision who functions in or is employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as that elected officer. (2) No candidate for an elective office of a political subdivision of the state, no campaign committee of such a candidate, no employee of the candidate's office if the candidate is a state elected officer or elected officer of a political subdivision of the state, and no other person or entity shall knowingly solicit a contribution to a candidate for an elective office of a political subdivision of the state or to such a candidate's campaign committee from any of the following: (a) An employee of that political subdivision at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be the candidate, if elected; (b) An employee of that political subdivision at the time of the solicitation, whose appointing authority will be appointed by the candidate, if elected, as authorized or required by law; (c) An employee of that political subdivision at the time of the solicitation, who will function in or be employed in or by the same public agency, department, division, or office as the candidate, if elected. (D)(1) No public employee shall solicit a contribution from any person while the public employee is performing the public employee's official duties or in those areas of a public building where official business is transacted or conducted. (2) No person shall solicit a contribution from any public employee while the public employee is performing the public employee's official duties or is in those areas of a public building where official business is transacted or conducted. (3) As used in division (D) of this section, "public employee" does not include any person holding an elective office. (E) The prohibitions in divisions (B), (C), and (D) of this section are in addition to the prohibitions in sections 124.57, 3304.22, and 4503.032 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.10. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this division, every campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, and political contributing entity that made or received a contribution or made an expenditure in connection with the nomination or election of any candidate or in connection with any ballot issue or question at any election held or to be held in this state shall file, on a form prescribed under this section or by electronic means of transmission as provided in this section and section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, a full, true, and itemized statement, made under penalty of election falsification, setting forth in detail the contributions and expenditures, not later than four p.m. of the following dates: (1) The twelfth day before the election to reflect contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the twentieth day before the election; (2) The thirty-eighth day after the election to reflect the contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the seventh day before the filing of the statement; (3) The last business day of January of every year to reflect the contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the last day of December of the previous year; (4) The last business day of July of every year to reflect the contributions received and expenditures made from the close of business on the last day reflected in the last previously filed statement, if any, to the close of business on the last day of June of that year. A campaign committee shall only be required to file the statements prescribed under divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section in connection with the nomination or election of the committee's candidate. The statement required under division (A)(1) of this section shall not be required of any campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity that has received contributions of less than one thousand dollars and has made expenditures of less than one thousand dollars at the close of business on the twentieth day before the election. Those contributions and expenditures shall be reported in the statement required under division (A)(2) of this section. If an election to select candidates to appear on the general election ballot is held within sixty days before a general election, the campaign committee of a successful candidate in the earlier election may file the statement required by division (A)(1) of this section for the general election instead of the statement required by division (A)(2) of this section for the earlier election if the pregeneral election statement reflects the status of contributions and expenditures for the period twenty days before the earlier election to twenty days before the general election. If a person becomes a candidate less than twenty days before an election, the candidate's campaign committee is not required to file the statement required by division (A)(1) of this section. No statement under division (A)(3) of this section shall be required for any year in which a campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity is required to file a postgeneral election statement under division (A)(2) of this section. However, a statement under division (A)(3) of this section may be filed, at the option of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity. No campaign committee of a candidate for the office of chief justice or justice of the supreme court, and no campaign committee of a candidate for the office of judge of any court in this state, shall be required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and in the next paragraph of this section, the only campaign committees required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of this section are the campaign committee of a statewide candidate and the campaign committee of a candidate for county office. The campaign committee of a candidate for any other nonjudicial office is required to file a statement under division (A)(4) of this section if that campaign committee receives, during that period, contributions exceeding ten thousand dollars. No statement under division (A)(4) of this section shall be required of a campaign committee, a political action committee, a legislative campaign fund, a political party, or a political contributing entity for any year in which the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity is required to file a postprimary election statement under division (A)(2) of this section. However, a statement under division (A)(4) of this section may be filed at the option of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity. No statement under division (A)(3) or (4) of this section shall be required if the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity has no contributions that it has received and no expenditures that it has made since the last date reflected in its last previously filed statement. However, the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity shall file a statement to that effect, on a form prescribed under this section and made under penalty of election falsification, on the date required in division (A)(3) or (4) of this section, as applicable. The campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall file a monthly statement of contributions received during each of the months of July, August, and September in the year of the general election in which the candidate seeks office. The campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall file the monthly statement not later than three business days after the last day of the month covered by the statement. During the period beginning on the nineteenth day before the general election in which a statewide candidate seeks election to office and extending through the day of that general election, each time the campaign committee of the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or of a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general receives a contribution from a contributor that causes the aggregate amount of contributions received from that contributor during that period to equal or exceed ten thousand dollars and each time the campaign committee of a candidate for the office of chief justice or justice of the supreme court receives a contribution from a contributor that causes the aggregate amount of contributions received from that contributor during that period to exceed ten thousand dollars, the campaign committee shall file a two-business-day statement reflecting that contribution. Contributions reported on a two-business-day statement required to be filed by a campaign committee of a statewide candidate in a primary election shall also be included in the postprimary election statement required to be filed by that campaign committee under division (A)(2) of this section. A two-business-day statement required by this paragraph shall be filed not later than two business days after receipt of the contribution. The statements required by this paragraph shall be filed in addition to any other statements required by this section. Subject to the secretary of state having implemented, tested, and verified the successful operation of any system the secretary of state prescribes pursuant to divisions (C)(6)(b) and (D)(6) of this section and division (F)(1) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code for the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission, a campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall file a two-business-day statement under the preceding paragraph by electronic means of transmission if the campaign committee is required to file a pre-election, postelection, or monthly statement of contributions and expenditures by electronic means of transmission under this section or section 3517.106 of the Revised Code. If a campaign committee or political action committee has no balance on hand and no outstanding obligations and desires to terminate itself, it shall file a statement to that effect, on a form prescribed under this section and made under penalty of election falsification, with the official with whom it files a statement under division (A) of this section after filing a final statement of contributions and a final statement of expenditures, if contributions have been received or expenditures made since the period reflected in its last previously filed statement. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(7) of this section, each statement required by division (A) of this section shall contain the following information: (1) The full name and address of each campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity, including any treasurer of the committee, fund, party, or entity, filing a contribution and expenditure statement; (2)(a) In the case of a campaign committee, the candidate's full name and address; (b) In the case of a political action committee, the registration number assigned to the committee under division (D)(1) of this section. (3) The date of the election and whether it was or will be a general, primary, or special election; (4) A statement of contributions received, which shall include the following information: (a) The month, day, and year of the contribution; (b)(i) The full name and address of each person, political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity from whom contributions are received and the registration number assigned to the political action committee under division (D)(1) of this section. The requirement of filing the full address does not apply to any statement filed by a state or local committee of a political party, to a finance committee of such committee, or to a committee recognized by a state or local committee as its fund-raising auxiliary. Notwithstanding division (F) of this section, the requirement of filing the full address shall be considered as being met if the address filed is the same address the contributor provided under division (E)(1) of this section. (ii) If a political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party that is required to file campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission under section 3517.106 of the Revised Code or a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly receives a contribution from an individual that exceeds one hundred dollars, the name of the individual's current employer, if any, or, if the individual is self-employed, the individual's occupation and the name of the individual's business, if any; (iii) If a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly receives a contribution transmitted pursuant to section 3599.031 of the Revised Code from amounts deducted from the wages and salaries of two or more employees that exceeds in the aggregate one hundred dollars during any one filing period under division (A)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section, the full name of the employees' employer and the full name of the labor organization of which the employees are members, if any. (c) A description of the contribution received, if other than money; (d) The value in dollars and cents of the contribution; (e) A separately itemized account of all contributions and expenditures regardless of the amount, except a receipt of a contribution from a person in the sum of twenty-five dollars or less at one social or fund-raising activity and a receipt of a contribution transmitted pursuant to section 3599.031 of the Revised Code from amounts deducted from the wages and salaries of employees if the contribution from the amount deducted from the wages and salary of any one employee is twenty-five dollars or less aggregated in a calendar year. An account of the total contributions from each social or fund-raising activity shall include a description of and the value of each in-kind contribution received at that activity from any person who made one or more such contributions whose aggregate value exceeded two hundred fifty dollars and shall be listed separately, together with the expenses incurred and paid in connection with that activity. A campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity shall keep records of contributions from each person in the amount of twenty-five dollars or less at one social or fund-raising activity and contributions from amounts deducted under section 3599.031 of the Revised Code from the wages and salary of each employee in the amount of twenty-five dollars or less aggregated in a calendar year. No continuing association that is recognized by a state or local committee of a political party as an auxiliary of the party and that makes a contribution from funds derived solely from regular dues paid by members of the auxiliary shall be required to list the name or address of any members who paid those dues. Contributions that are other income shall be itemized separately from all other contributions. The information required under division (B)(4) of this section shall be provided for all other income itemized. As used in this paragraph, "other income" means a loan, investment income, or interest income. (f) In the case of a campaign committee of a state elected officer, if a person doing business with the state elected officer in the officer's official capacity makes a contribution to the campaign committee of that officer, the information required under division (B)(4) of this section in regard to that contribution, which shall be filed together with and considered a part of the committee's statement of contributions as required under division (A) of this section but shall be filed on a separate form provided by the secretary of state. As used in this division: (i) "State elected officer" has the same meaning as in section 3517.092 of the Revised Code. (ii) "Person doing business" means a person or an officer of an entity who enters into one or more contracts with a state elected officer or anyone authorized to enter into contracts on behalf of that officer to receive payments for goods or services, if the payments total, in the aggregate, more than five thousand dollars during a calendar year. (5) A statement of expenditures which shall include the following information: (a) The month, day, and year of the expenditure; (b) The full name and address of each person, political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity to whom the expenditure was made and the registration number assigned to the political action committee under division (D)(1) of this section; (c) The object or purpose for which the expenditure was made; (d) The amount of each expenditure. (C)(1) The statement of contributions and expenditures shall be signed by the person completing the form. If a statement of contributions and expenditures is filed by electronic means of transmission pursuant to this section or section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, the electronic signature of the person who executes the statement and transmits the statement by electronic means of transmission, as provided in division (F) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, shall be attached to or associated with the statement and shall be binding on all persons and for all purposes under the campaign finance reporting law as if the signature had been handwritten in ink on a printed form. (2) The person filing the statement, under penalty of election falsification, shall include with it a list of each anonymous contribution, the circumstances under which it was received, and the reason it cannot be attributed to a specific donor. (3) Each statement of a campaign committee of a candidate who holds public office shall contain a designation of each contributor who is an employee in any unit or department under the candidate's direct supervision and control. In a space provided in the statement, the person filing the statement shall affirm that each such contribution was voluntarily made. (4) A campaign committee that did not receive contributions or make expenditures in connection with the nomination or election of its candidate shall file a statement to that effect, on a form prescribed under this section and made under penalty of election falsification, on the date required in division (A)(2) of this section. (5) The campaign committee of any person who attempts to become a candidate and who, for any reason, does not become certified in accordance with Title XXXV of the Revised Code for placement on the official ballot of a primary, general, or special election to be held in this state, and who, at any time prior to or after an election, receives contributions or makes expenditures, or has given consent for another to receive contributions or make expenditures, for the purpose of bringing about the person's nomination or election to public office, shall file the statement or statements prescribed by this section and a termination statement, if applicable. Division (C)(5) of this section does not apply to any person with respect to an election to the offices of member of a county or state central committee, presidential elector, or delegate to a national convention or conference of a political party. (6)(a) The statements required to be filed under this section shall specify the balance in the hands of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity and the disposition intended to be made of that balance. (b) The secretary of state shall prescribe the form for all statements required to be filed under this section and shall furnish the forms to the boards of elections in the several counties. The boards of elections shall supply printed copies of those forms without charge. The secretary of state shall prescribe the appropriate methodology, protocol, and data file structure for statements required or permitted to be filed by electronic means of transmission to the secretary of state or a board of elections under division (A) of this section, division (E) of section 3517.106, division (D) of section 3517.1011, division (B) of section 3517.1012, division (C) of section 3517.1013, and divisions (D) and (I) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. Subject to division (A) of this section, division (E) of section 3517.106, division (D) of section 3517.1011, division (B) of section 3517.1012, division (C) of section 3517.1013, and divisions (D) and (I) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code, the statements required to be stored on computer by the secretary of state under division (B) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code shall be filed in whatever format the secretary of state considers necessary to enable the secretary of state to store the information contained in the statements on computer. Any such format shall be of a type and nature that is readily available to whoever is required to file the statements in that format. (c) The secretary of state shall assess the need for training regarding the filing of campaign finance statements by electronic means of transmission and regarding associated technologies for candidates, campaign committees, political action committees, legislative campaign funds, political parties, or political contributing entities, for individuals, partnerships, or other entities, for persons making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or for treasurers of transition funds, required or permitted to file statements by electronic means of transmission under this section or section 3517.105, 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. If, in the opinion of the secretary of state, training in these areas is necessary, the secretary of state shall arrange for the provision of voluntary training programs for candidates, campaign committees, political action committees, legislative campaign funds, political parties, or political contributing entities, for individuals, partnerships, and other entities, for persons making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications, or for treasurers of transition funds, as appropriate. (7) Each monthly statement and each two-business-day statement required by division (A) of this section shall contain the information required by divisions (B)(1) to (4), (C)(2), and, if appropriate, (C)(3) of this section. Each statement shall be signed as required by division (C)(1) of this section. (D)(1)(a) Prior to receiving a contribution or making an expenditure, every campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity shall appoint a treasurer and shall file, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, a designation of that appointment, including the full name and address of the treasurer and of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity. That designation shall be filed with the official with whom the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. The name of a campaign committee shall include at least the last name of the campaign committee's candidate. If two or more candidates are the beneficiaries of a single campaign committee under division (B) of section 3517.081 of the Revised Code, the name of the campaign committee shall include at least the last name of each candidate who is a beneficiary of that campaign committee. The secretary of state shall assign a registration number to each political action committee that files a designation of the appointment of a treasurer under this division if the political action committee is required by division (A)(1) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code to file the statements prescribed by this section with the secretary of state. (b) The secretary of state shall not accept for filing a designation of treasurer of a political action committee or political contributing entity if, in the opinion of the secretary of state, the name of the political action committee or political contributing entity would lead a reasonable person to believe that the political action committee or political contributing entity acts on behalf of or represents a county political party, unless the designation is accompanied by a written statement, signed by the chairperson of the county political party's executive committee, granting the political action committee or political contributing entity permission to act on behalf of or represent the county political party. (2) The treasurer appointed under division (D)(1) of this section shall keep a strict account of all contributions, from whom received and the purpose for which they were disbursed. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.108 of the Revised Code, a campaign committee shall deposit all monetary contributions received by the committee into an account separate from a personal or business account of the candidate or campaign committee. (b) A political action committee shall deposit all monetary contributions received by the committee into an account separate from all other funds. (c) A state or county political party may establish a state candidate fund that is separate from all other funds. A state or county political party may deposit into its state candidate fund any amounts of monetary contributions that are made to or accepted by the political party subject to the applicable limitations, if any, prescribed in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code. A state or county political party shall deposit all other monetary contributions received by the party into one or more accounts that are separate from its state candidate fund. (d) Each state political party shall have only one legislative campaign fund for each house of the general assembly. Each such fund shall be separate from any other funds or accounts of that state party. A legislative campaign fund is authorized to receive contributions and make expenditures for the primary purpose of furthering the election of candidates who are members of that political party to the house of the general assembly with which that legislative campaign fund is associated. Each legislative campaign fund shall be administered and controlled in a manner designated by the caucus. As used in this division, "caucus" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code and includes, as an ex officio member, the chairperson of the state political party with which the caucus is associated or that chairperson's designee. (4) Every expenditure in excess of twenty-five dollars shall be vouched for by a receipted bill, stating the purpose of the expenditure, that shall be filed with the statement of expenditures. A canceled check with a notation of the purpose of the expenditure is a receipted bill for purposes of division (D)(4) of this section. (5) The secretary of state or the board of elections, as the case may be, shall issue a receipt for each statement filed under this section and shall preserve a copy of the receipt for a period of at least six years. All statements filed under this section shall be open to public inspection in the office where they are filed and shall be carefully preserved for a period of at least six years after the year in which they are filed. (6) The secretary of state, by rule adopted pursuant to section 3517.23 of the Revised Code, shall prescribe both of the following: (a) The manner of immediately acknowledging, with date and time received, and preserving the receipt of statements that are transmitted by electronic means of transmission to the secretary of state or a board of elections pursuant to this section or section 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code; (b) The manner of preserving the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in the statements described in division (D)(6)(a) of this section. The secretary of state shall preserve the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in those statements for at least ten years after the year in which they are filed by electronic means of transmission. (7)(a) The secretary of state, pursuant to division (G) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, shall make available online to the public through the internet the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in all of the following documents: (i) All statements, all addenda, amendments, or other corrections to statements, and all amended statements filed with the secretary of state by electronic or other means of transmission under this section, division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105, or section 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, 3517.1014, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code; (ii) All statements filed with a board of elections by electronic means of transmission, and all addenda, amendments, corrections, and amended versions of those statements, filed with the board under this section, division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105, or section 3517.106, 3517.1012, or 3517.11 of the Revised Code. (b) The secretary of state may remove the information from the internet after a reasonable period of time. (E)(1) Any person, political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity that makes a contribution in connection with the nomination or election of any candidate or in connection with any ballot issue or question at any election held or to be held in this state shall provide its full name and address to the recipient of the contribution at the time the contribution is made. The political action committee also shall provide the registration number assigned to the committee under division (D)(1) of this section to the recipient of the contribution at the time the contribution is made. (2) Any individual who makes a contribution that exceeds one hundred dollars to a political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or political party or to a campaign committee of a statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly shall provide the name of the individual's current employer, if any, or, if the individual is self-employed, the individual's occupation and the name of the individual's business, if any, to the recipient of the contribution at the time the contribution is made. Sections 3599.39 and 3599.40 of the Revised Code do not apply to division (E)(2) of this section. (3) If a campaign committee shows that it has exercised its best efforts to obtain, maintain, and submit the information required under divisions (B)(4)(b)(ii) and (iii) of this section, that committee is considered to have met the requirements of those divisions. A campaign committee shall not be considered to have exercised its best efforts unless, in connection with written solicitations, it regularly includes a written request for the information required under division (B)(4)(b)(ii) of this section from the contributor or the information required under division (B)(4)(b)(iii) of this section from whoever transmits the contribution. (4) Any check that a political action committee uses to make a contribution or an expenditure shall contain the full name and address of the committee and the registration number assigned to the committee under division (D)(1) of this section. (F) As used in this section: (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(1) of this section, "address" means all of the following if they exist: apartment number, street, road, or highway name and number, rural delivery route number, city or village, state, and zip code as used in a person's post-office address, but not post-office box. (b) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(1) of this section, if an address is required in this section, a post-office box and office, room, or suite number may be included in addition to, but not in lieu of, an apartment, street, road, or highway name and number. (c) If an address is required in this section, a campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity may use the business or residence address of its treasurer or deputy treasurer. The post-office box number of the campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity may be used in addition to that address. (d) For the sole purpose of a campaign committee's reporting of contributions on a statement of contributions received under division (B)(4) of this section, "address" has one of the following meanings at the option of the campaign committee: (i) The same meaning as in division (F)(1)(a) of this section; (ii) All of the following, if they exist: the contributor's post-office box number and city or village, state, and zip code as used in the contributor's post-office address. (e) As used with regard to the reporting under this section of any expenditure, "address" means all of the following if they exist: apartment number, street, road, or highway name and number, rural delivery route number, city or village, state, and zip code as used in a person's post-office address, or post-office box. If an address concerning any expenditure is required in this section, a campaign committee, political action committee, legislative campaign fund, political party, or political contributing entity may use the business or residence address of its treasurer or deputy treasurer or its post-office box number. (2) "Statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, chief justice of the supreme court, or justice of the supreme court. (3) "Candidate for county office" means a candidate for the office of county auditor, county treasurer, clerk of the court of common pleas, judge of the court of common pleas, sheriff, county recorder, county engineer, county commissioner, prosecuting attorney, or coroner. (G) An independent expenditure shall be reported whenever and in the same manner that an expenditure is required to be reported under this section and shall be reported pursuant to division (B)(2)(a) or (C)(2)(a) of section 3517.105 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(2) of this section, if, during the combined pre-election and postelection reporting periods for an election, a campaign committee has received contributions of five hundred dollars or less and has made expenditures in the total amount of five hundred dollars or less, it may file a statement to that effect, under penalty of election falsification, in lieu of the statement required by division (A)(2) of this section. The statement shall indicate the total amount of contributions received and the total amount of expenditures made during those combined reporting periods. (2) In the case of a successful candidate at a primary election, if either the total contributions received by or the total expenditures made by the candidate's campaign committee during the preprimary, postprimary, pregeneral, and postgeneral election periods combined equal more than five hundred dollars, the campaign committee may file the statement under division (H)(1) of this section only for the primary election. The first statement that the campaign committee files in regard to the general election shall reflect all contributions received and all expenditures made during the preprimary and postprimary election periods. (3) Divisions (H)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply if a campaign committee receives contributions or makes expenditures prior to the first day of January of the year of the election at which the candidate seeks nomination or election to office or if the campaign committee does not file a termination statement with its postprimary election statement in the case of an unsuccessful primary election candidate or with its postgeneral election statement in the case of other candidates. (I) In the case of a contribution made by a partner of a partnership or an owner or a member of another unincorporated business from any funds of the partnership or other unincorporated business, all of the following apply: (1) The recipient of the contribution shall report the contribution by listing both the partnership or other unincorporated business and the name of the partner, owner, or member making the contribution. (2) In reporting the contribution, the recipient of the contribution shall be entitled to conclusively rely upon the information provided by the partnership or other unincorporated business, provided that the information includes one of the following: (a) The name of each partner, owner, or member as of the date of the contribution or contributions, and a statement that the total contributions are to be allocated equally among all of the partners, owners, or members; or (b) The name of each partner, owner, or member as of the date of the contribution or contributions who is participating in the contribution or contributions, and a statement that the contribution or contributions are to be allocated to those individuals in accordance with the information provided by the partnership or other unincorporated business to the recipient of the contribution. (3) For purposes of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the contribution shall be considered to have been made by the partner, owner, or member reported under division (I)(1) of this section. (4) No contribution from a partner of a partnership or an owner or a member of another unincorporated business shall be accepted from any funds of the partnership or other unincorporated business unless the recipient reports the contribution under division (I)(1) of this section together with the information provided under division (I)(2) of this section. (5) No partnership or other unincorporated business shall make a contribution or contributions solely in the name of the partnership or other unincorporated business. (6) As used in division (I) of this section, "partnership or other unincorporated business" includes, but is not limited to, a cooperative, a sole proprietorship, a general partnership, a limited partnership, a limited partnership association, a limited liability partnership, and a limited liability company. (J) A candidate shall have only one campaign committee at any given time for all of the offices for which the person is a candidate or holds office. (K)(1) In addition to filing a designation of appointment of a treasurer under division (D)(1) of this section, the campaign committee of any candidate for an elected municipal office that pays an annual amount of compensation of five thousand dollars or less, the campaign committee of any candidate for member of a board of education except member of the state board of education, or the campaign committee of any candidate for township trustee or township fiscal officer may sign, under penalty of election falsification, a certificate attesting that the committee will not accept contributions during an election period that exceed in the aggregate two thousand dollars from all contributors and one hundred dollars from any one individual, and that the campaign committee will not make expenditures during an election period that exceed in the aggregate two thousand dollars. The certificate shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall be filed not later than ten days after the candidate files a declaration of candidacy and petition, a nominating petition, or a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(3) of this section, a campaign committee that files a certificate under division (K)(1) of this section is not required to file the statements required by division (A) of this section. (3) If, after filing a certificate under division (K)(1) of this section, a campaign committee exceeds any of the limitations described in that division during an election period, the certificate is void and thereafter the campaign committee shall file the statements required by division (A) of this section. If the campaign committee has not previously filed a statement, then on the first statement the campaign committee is required to file under division (A) of this section after the committee's certificate is void, the committee shall report all contributions received and expenditures made from the time the candidate filed the candidate's declaration of candidacy and petition, nominating petition, or declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate. (4) As used in division (K) of this section, "election period" means the period of time beginning on the day a person files a declaration of candidacy and petition, nominating petition, or declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate through the day of the election at which the person seeks nomination to office if the person is not elected to office, or, if the candidate was nominated in a primary election, the day of the election at which the candidate seeks office. (L) A political contributing entity that receives contributions from the dues, membership fees, or other assessments of its members or from its officers, shareholders, and employees may report the aggregate amount of contributions received from those contributors and the number of individuals making those contributions, for each filing period under divisions (A)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, rather than reporting information as required under division (B)(4) of this section, including, when applicable, the name of the current employer, if any, of a contributor whose contribution exceeds one hundred dollars or, if such a contributor is self-employed, the contributor's occupation and the name of the contributor's business, if any. Division (B)(4) of this section applies to a political contributing entity with regard to contributions it receives from all other contributors. Sec. 3517.102. (A) Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.103 of the Revised Code, as used in this section and sections 3517.103 and 3517.104 of the Revised Code: (1) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code but includes only candidates for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, member of the general assembly, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) "Statewide candidate" or "any one statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, chief justice of the supreme court, or justice of the supreme court. (3) "Senate candidate" means a candidate for the office of state senator. (4) "House candidate" means a candidate for the office of state representative. (5)(a) "Primary election period" for a candidate begins on the beginning date of the candidate's pre-filing period specified in division (A)(9) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code and ends on the day of the primary election. (b) In regard to any candidate, the "general election period" begins on the day after the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which the candidate seeks an office specified in division (A)(1) of this section and ends on the thirty-first day of December following that general election. (6) "State candidate fund" means the state candidate fund established by a state or county political party under division (D)(3)(c) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (7) "Postgeneral election statement" means the statement filed under division (A)(2) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code by the campaign committee of a candidate after the general election in which the candidate ran for office or filed by legislative campaign fund after the general election in an even-numbered year. (8) "Contribution" means any contribution that is required to be reported in the statement of contributions under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (9)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(9)(b) of this section, "designated state campaign committee" means: (i) In the case of contributions to or from a state political party, a campaign committee of a statewide candidate, statewide officeholder, senate candidate, house candidate, or member of the general assembly. (ii) In the case of contributions to or from a county political party, a campaign committee of a senate candidate or house candidate whose candidacy is to be submitted to some or all of the electors in that county, or member of the general assembly whose district contains all or part of that county. (iii) In the case of contributions to or from a legislative campaign fund, a campaign committee of any of the following: (I) A senate or house candidate who, if elected, will be a member of the same party that established the legislative campaign fund and the same house with which the legislative campaign fund is associated; (II) A state senator or state representative who is a member of the same party that established the legislative campaign fund and the same house with which the legislative campaign fund is associated. (b) A campaign committee is no longer a "designated state campaign committee" after the campaign committee's candidate changes the designation of treasurer required to be filed under division (D)(1) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code to indicate that the person intends to be a candidate for, or becomes a candidate for nomination or election to, any office that, if elected, would not qualify that candidate's campaign committee as a "designated state campaign committee" under division (A)(9)(a) of this section. (B)(1)(a) No individual who is seven years of age or older shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iv) Ten thousand dollars to a county political party of the county in which the individual's designated Ohio residence is located for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (v) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund in a calendar year; (vi) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (vii) Ten thousand dollars to any one political action committee in a calendar year; (viii) Ten thousand dollars to any one political contributing entity in a calendar year. (b) No individual shall make a contribution or contributions to the state candidate fund of a county political party of any county other than the county in which the individual's designated Ohio residence is located. (c) No individual who is under seven years of age shall make any contribution. (2)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political action committee shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iv) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund in a calendar year; (v) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (vi) Ten thousand dollars to another political action committee or to a political contributing entity in a calendar year. This division does not apply to a political action committee that makes a contribution to a political action committee or a political contributing entity affiliated with it. For purposes of this division, a political action committee is affiliated with another political action committee or with a political contributing entity if they are both established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or if they are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person. (b) No political action committee shall make a contribution or contributions to a county political party for the party's state candidate fund. (3) No campaign committee shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (a) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (b) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (c) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (d) Ten thousand dollars to any one political action committee in a calendar year; (e) Ten thousand dollars to any one political contributing entity in a calendar year. (4)(a) Subject to division (D)(3) of this section, no political party shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars to any one political action committee or to any one political contributing entity in a calendar year. (b) No county political party shall make a contribution or contributions to another county political party. (5)(a) Subject to division (B)(5)(b) of this section, no campaign committee, other than a designated state campaign committee, shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating in a calendar year more than: (i) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund; (ii) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to any one county political party for the party's state candidate fund. (b) No campaign committee shall make a contribution or contributions to a county political party for the party's state candidate fund unless one of the following applies: (i) The campaign committee's candidate will appear on a ballot in that county. (ii) The campaign committee's candidate is the holder of an elected public office that represents all or part of the population of that county at the time the contribution is made. (6)(a) No state candidate fund of a county political party shall make a contribution or contributions, except a contribution or contributions to a designated state campaign committee, in a primary election period or a general election period, aggregating more than: (i) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate. (b)(i) No state candidate fund of a state or county political party shall make a transfer or a contribution or transfers or contributions of cash or cash equivalents to a designated state campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period aggregating more than: (I) Five hundred thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate; (II) One hundred thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate; (III) Fifty thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate. (ii) No legislative campaign fund shall make a transfer or a contribution or transfers or contributions of cash or cash equivalents to a designated state campaign committee aggregating more than: (I) Fifty thousand dollars in a primary election period or one hundred thousand dollars in a general election period to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate; (II) Twenty-five thousand dollars in a primary election period or fifty thousand dollars in a general election period to the campaign committee of any one house candidate. (iii) As used in divisions (B)(6)(b) and (C)(6) of this section, "transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents" does not include any in-kind contributions. (c) A county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand may make one or more contributions from other accounts to any one statewide candidate or to any one designated state campaign committee that do not exceed, in the aggregate, two thousand five hundred dollars in any primary election period or general election period. (d) No legislative campaign fund shall make a contribution, other than to a designated state campaign committee or to the state candidate fund of a political party. (7)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political contributing entity shall make a contribution or contributions aggregating more than: (i) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one statewide candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (ii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one senate candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Ten thousand dollars to the campaign committee of any one house candidate in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iv) Fifteen thousand dollars to any one legislative campaign fund in a calendar year; (v) Thirty thousand dollars to any one state political party for the party's state candidate fund in a calendar year; (vi) Ten thousand dollars to another political contributing entity or to a political action committee in a calendar year. This division does not apply to a political contributing entity that makes a contribution to a political contributing entity or a political action committee affiliated with it. For purposes of this division, a political contributing entity is affiliated with another political contributing entity or with a political action committee if they are both established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or if they are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person. (b) No political contributing entity shall make a contribution or contributions to a county political party for the party's state candidate fund. (C)(1)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall do any of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period; (iii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars from any one or combination of state candidate funds of county political parties in a primary election period or in a general election period. (b) No campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in a general election period from a county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. (2)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section and except for a designated state campaign committee, no campaign committee of a senate candidate shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, from any one state candidate fund of a county political party, or from any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period. (b) No campaign committee of a senate candidate shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in a general election period from a county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. (3)(a) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section and except for a designated state campaign committee, no campaign committee of a house candidate shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, from any one state candidate fund of a county political party, or from any one other campaign committee in a primary election period or in a general election period. (b) No campaign committee of a house candidate shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than two thousand five hundred dollars in a primary election period or in a general election period from a county political party that has no state candidate fund and that is located in a county having a population of less than one hundred fifty thousand. (4)(a)(i) Subject to division (C)(4)(a)(ii) of this section and except for a designated state campaign committee, no county political party shall knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age, or accept a contribution or contributions for the party's state candidate fund aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual whose designated Ohio residence is located within that county and who is seven years of age or older or from any one campaign committee in a calendar year. (ii) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no county political party shall accept a contribution or contributions for the party's state candidate fund from any individual whose designated Ohio residence is located outside of that county and who is seven years of age or older, from any campaign committee unless the campaign committee's candidate will appear on a ballot in that county or unless the campaign committee's candidate is the holder of an elected public office that represents all or part of the population of that county at the time the contribution is accepted, or from any political action committee or any political contributing entity. (iii) No county political party shall accept a contribution or contributions from any other county political party. (b) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no state political party shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions for the party's state candidate fund aggregating more than thirty thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from any one campaign committee, other than a designated state campaign committee, in a calendar year. (5) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no legislative campaign fund shall do either of the following: (a) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (b) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than fifteen thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one political action committee, from any one political contributing entity, or from any one campaign committee, other than a designated state campaign committee, in a calendar year. (6)(a) No designated state campaign committee shall accept a transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from a state candidate fund of a state political party aggregating in a primary election period or a general election period more than: (i) Five hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a statewide candidate; (ii) One hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a senate candidate; (iii) Fifty thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a house candidate. (b) No designated state campaign committee shall accept a transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from a legislative campaign fund aggregating more than: (i) Fifty thousand dollars in a primary election period or one hundred thousand dollars in a general election period, in the case of a campaign committee of a senate candidate; (ii) Twenty-five thousand dollars in a primary election period or fifty thousand dollars in a general election period, in the case of a campaign committee of a house candidate. (c) No campaign committee of a candidate for the office of member of the general assembly, including a designated state campaign committee, shall accept a transfer or contribution of cash or cash equivalents from any one or combination of state candidate funds of county political parties aggregating in a primary election period or a general election period more than: (i) One hundred thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a senate candidate; (ii) Fifty thousand dollars, in the case of a campaign committee of a house candidate. (7)(a) Subject to division (D)(3) of this section, no political action committee and no political contributing entity shall do either of the following: (i) Knowingly accept a contribution or contributions from any individual who is under seven years of age; (ii) Accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one individual who is seven years of age or older, from any one campaign committee, or from any one political party in a calendar year. (b) Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political action committee shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from another political action committee or from a political contributing entity in a calendar year. Subject to division (D)(1) of this section, no political contributing entity shall accept a contribution or contributions aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from another political contributing entity or from a political action committee in a calendar year. This division does not apply to a political action committee or political contributing entity that accepts a contribution from a political action committee or political contributing entity affiliated with it. For purposes of this division, a political action committee is affiliated with another political action committee or with a political contributing entity if they are both established, financed, maintained, or controlled by the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person. (D)(1)(a) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in division (B)(2) of this section and the limitations prescribed in divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (7)(b) of this section, whichever is applicable, all contributions made by and all contributions accepted from political action committees that are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or that are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, are considered to have been made by or accepted from a single political action committee. (b) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in division (B)(7) of this section and the limitations prescribed in divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), and (7)(b) of this section, whichever is applicable, all contributions made by and all contributions accepted from political contributing entities that are established, financed, maintained, or controlled by, or that are, the same corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, including any parent, subsidiary, division, or department of that corporation, organization, labor organization, continuing association, or other person, are considered to have been made by or accepted from a single political contributing entity. (2) As used in divisions (B)(1)(a)(vii), (B)(3)(d), (B)(4)(a), and (C)(7) of this section, "political action committee" does not include a political action committee that is organized to support or oppose a ballot issue or question and that makes no contributions to or expenditures on behalf of a political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity. As used in divisions (B)(1)(a)(viii), (B)(3)(e), (B)(4)(a), and (C)(7) of this section, "political contributing entity" does not include a political contributing entity that is organized to support or oppose a ballot issue or question and that makes no contributions to or expenditures on behalf of a political party, campaign committee, legislative campaign fund, political action committee, or political contributing entity. (3) For purposes of the limitations prescribed in divisions (B)(4) and (C)(7)(a) of this section, all contributions made by and all contributions accepted from a national political party, a state political party, and a county political party are considered to have been made by or accepted from a single political party and shall be combined with each other to determine whether the limitations have been exceeded. (E)(1) If a legislative campaign fund has kept a total amount of contributions exceeding one hundred fifty thousand dollars at the close of business on the seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, the legislative campaign fund shall comply with division (E)(2) of this section. (2)(a) Any legislative campaign fund that has kept a total amount of contributions in excess of the amount specified in division (E)(1) of this section at the close of business on the seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code shall dispose of the excess amount in the manner prescribed in division (E)(2)(b)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section not later than ninety days after the day the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. Any legislative campaign fund that is required to dispose of an excess amount of contributions under this division shall file a statement on the ninetieth day after the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code indicating the total amount of contributions the fund has at the close of business on the seventh day before the postgeneral election statement is required to be filed under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code and that the excess contributions were disposed of pursuant to this division and division (E)(2)(b) of this section. The statement shall be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and shall contain any additional information the secretary of state considers necessary. (b) Any legislative campaign fund that is required to dispose of an excess amount of contributions under division (E)(2) of this section shall dispose of that excess amount by doing any of the following: (i) Giving the amount to the treasurer of state for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund created by division (I) of section 3517.152 111.29 of the Revised Code; (ii) Giving the amount to individuals who made contributions to that legislative campaign fund as a refund of all or part of their contributions; (iii) Giving the amount to a corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. (F)(1) No legislative campaign fund shall fail to file a statement required by division (E) of this section. (2) No legislative campaign fund shall fail to dispose of excess contributions as required by division (E) of this section. (G) Nothing in this section shall affect, be used in determining, or supersede a limitation on campaign contributions as provided for in the Federal Election Campaign Act. Sec. 3517.103. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, or attorney general, or member of the state board of education. (2)(a) "Personal funds" means contributions to the campaign committee of a candidate by the candidate. (b) A loan obtained by, guaranteed by, or for the benefit of a statewide candidate, senate candidate, or house candidate shall be considered "personal funds" subject to the provisions of this section to the extent that the loan is obtained or guaranteed by the candidate. A loan that is obtained or guaranteed and that is for the benefit of a statewide candidate, senate candidate, or house candidate shall not be considered "personal funds" for the purposes of this section but shall be considered to be a "contribution" for the purposes of this chapter if the loan is obtained or guaranteed by anyone other than the candidate. (c) When a debt or other obligation incurred by a committee or by a candidate on behalf of the candidate's committee is to be paid from "personal funds," those funds are considered to be expended when the debt or other obligation is incurred, regardless of when it is paid. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, no statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly shall make an expenditure of personal funds to influence the results of an election for that candidate's nomination or election to office unless the personal funds are first deposited into the campaign fund of that candidate's campaign committee. (2) A statewide candidate or candidate for the office of member of the general assembly may make an expenditure of personal funds without first depositing those funds into the campaign committee's funds as long as the aggregate total of those expenditures does not exceed five hundred dollars at any time during an election period. After the candidate's campaign committee reimburses the candidate for any direct expenditure of personal funds, the amount that was reimbursed is no longer included in the aggregate total of expenditures of personal funds subject to the five-hundred-dollar limit. Sec. 3517.104. (A) In January of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of state, in accordance with this division and division (B) of this section, shall adjust each amount specified in section 3517.102, in division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10, and in division (B) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code. The adjustment shall be based on the yearly average of the previous two years of the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers or its successive equivalent, as determined by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, or its successor in responsibility, for all items, Series A. Using the 1996 yearly average as the base year, the secretary of state shall compare the most current average consumer price index with that determined in the preceding odd-numbered year, and shall determine the percentage increase or decrease. The percentage increase or decrease shall be multiplied by the actual dollar figure for each office or entity specified in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code and by each actual dollar figure specified in division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10 and in division (B) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code as determined in the previous odd-numbered year, and the product shall be added to or subtracted from its corresponding actual dollar figure, as necessary, for that previous odd-numbered year. The resulting amount shall be rounded to the nearest twenty-five dollars if the calculations are made regarding the amounts specified in division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. If the calculations are made regarding the amounts specified in section 3517.101 or 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the resulting amount shall not be rounded. If that resulting amount is less than one hundred dollars, the secretary of state shall retain a record of the resulting amount and the manner in which it was calculated, but shall not make an adjustment unless the resulting amount, when added to the resulting amount calculated in each prior odd-numbered year since the last adjustment was made, equals or exceeds one hundred dollars. (B)(1) The secretary of state shall calculate the adjustment under division (A) of this section and shall report the calculations and necessary materials to the auditor of state, on or before the thirty-first day of January of each odd-numbered year. The secretary of state shall base the adjustment on the most current consumer price index that is described in division (A) of this section and that is in effect as of the first day of January of each odd-numbered year. (2) The calculations made by the secretary of state under divisions (A) and (B)(1) of this section shall be certified by the auditor of state on or before the fifteenth day of February of each odd-numbered year. (3) On or before the twenty-fifth day of February of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of state shall prepare a report setting forth the maximum contribution limitations under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the maximum amounts, if any, of contributions permitted to be kept under that section, the amounts required under division (B)(4)(e) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code for reporting contributions and in-kind contributions at social or fund-raising activities and contributions from amounts deducted from an employee's wages and salary, and the maximum office facility gift limitations under section 3517.101 of the Revised Code, as calculated and certified pursuant to divisions (A) and (B)(1) and (2) of this section. The report and all documents relating to the calculations contained in the report are public records. The report shall contain an indication of the period in which the limitations, the maximum contribution or gift amounts, and the reporting amounts apply, a summary of how the limitations, the maximum contribution or gift amounts, and the reporting amounts were calculated, and a statement that the report and all related documents are available for inspection and copying at the office of the secretary of state. (4) On or before the twenty-fifth day of February of each odd-numbered year, the secretary of state shall transmit the report to the general assembly and shall send the report by mail to the board of elections of each county. (5) The secretary of state shall send the report by mail to each person who files a declaration of candidacy or nominating petition with the secretary of state for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, chief justice of the supreme court, or justice of the supreme court. The report shall be mailed on or before the tenth day after the filing. (6) A board of elections shall send the report by mail to each person who files a declaration of candidacy or nominating petition with the board for the office of state representative or state senator. The report shall be mailed on or before the tenth day after the filing. Sec. 3517.108. (A) As used in divisions (A) and (B) of this section: (1) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code but includes only candidates for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, member of the general assembly, chief justice of the supreme court, and justice of the supreme court. (2) A "general election period" begins on the day after the primary election immediately preceding the general election at which a candidate seeks an office specified in division (A)(1) of this section and ends on the thirty-first day of December following that general election. (3) A "primary election period" begins on the first day of January of the year following the year in which the general election was held for the office that the candidate seeks, including any mid-term election, and ends on the day of the primary election. (B) Whenever the campaign committee of a candidate has unpaid debt at the end of a primary election period or at the end of a general election period, the committee may accept additional contributions during the immediately following election period up to the applicable limitation prescribed under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code from any individual, political action committee, political contributing entity, or other campaign committee who, during the primary or general election period for which debt remains unpaid, has contributed less than the contribution limitations prescribed under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code applicable to that individual, political action committee, political contributing entity, or other campaign committee. Any additional contribution that a campaign committee accepts under this division shall count toward the applicable limitations prescribed under section 3517.102 of the Revised Code for that primary or general election period at the end of which the debt remains unpaid, and shall not count toward the applicable limitations for any other primary or general election period if all of the following conditions apply: (1) The campaign committee reports, on the statement required to be filed under division (A)(2) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, all debt remaining unpaid at the end of the election period. The committee shall also file a separate statement, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, at the same time that the committee is required to file a statement of contributions and expenditures under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. The separate statement shall include the name and address of each contributor who makes an additional contribution under division (B) of this section, how the contribution was applied to pay the unpaid debt as required by division (B)(3) of this section, and the balance of the unpaid debt after each contribution was applied to it. (2) The additional contributions are accepted only during the primary or general election period, whichever is applicable, immediately following the election period covered in the statement filed under division (B)(1) of this section. (3) All additional contributions made under division (B) of this section are used by the campaign committee that receives them only to pay the debt of the committee reported under division (B)(1) of this section. (4) The campaign committee maintains a separate account for all additional contributions made under division (B) of this section and uses moneys in that account only to pay the unpaid debt reported under division (B)(1) of this section and to administer the account. (5) The campaign committee stops accepting additional contributions after funds sufficient to repay the unpaid debt reported under division (B)(1) of this section have been raised and promptly disposes of any contributions received that exceed the amount of the unpaid debt by returning the excess contributions to the contributors or by giving the excess contributions to an organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3), (4), (8), (10), or (19) of the Internal Revenue Code. Sec. 3517.109. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code but includes only candidates for the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, and member of the general assembly. (2) "Statewide candidate" means the joint candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant governor or a candidate for the office of secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, and attorney general, and member of the state board of education. (3) "Senate candidate" means a candidate for the office of state senator. (4) "House candidate" means a candidate for the office of state representative. (5) "State office" means the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, and member of the general assembly. (6) "Aggregate contribution" means the total of all contributions from a contributor during the pre-filing period. (7) "Allowable aggregate contribution" means all of the following: (a) In the case of a contribution from a contributor whose contributions are subject to the contribution limits described in division (B)(1), (2), (3), (6)(a), or (7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, that portion of the amount of the contributor's aggregate contribution that does not exceed the preprimary contribution limit applicable to that contributor. (b) In the case of a contribution or contributions from a contributor whose contributions are not subject to the contribution limits described in divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), (6)(a), or (7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, the total of the following: (i) That portion of the aggregate contribution that was received as in-kind services; (ii) That portion of the aggregate contribution that was received as cash and does not exceed the applicable preprimary cash transfer or contribution limits described in division (B)(6)(b) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code. (8) "Excess aggregate contribution" means, for each contributor, the amount by which that contributor's aggregate contribution exceeds that contributor's allowable aggregate contribution. (9) "Pre-filing period" means the period of time ending on the day that the candidacy petitions are due for the state office for which the candidate has filed and beginning on the latest date of the following: (a) The first day of January of the year following the general election in which that state office was last on the ballot; (b) The first day of January of the year following the general election in which the candidate was last a candidate for any office; (c) The first day of the month following the primary election in which the candidate was last a candidate for any office. (10) "Filing date" means the last date on which a candidacy petition may be filed for an office. (11) "Applicable carry-in limit" means thirty-five thousand dollars if the candidate is a house candidate or a candidate for the state board of education, one hundred thousand dollars if the candidate is a senate candidate, and two hundred thousand dollars if the candidate is a statewide candidate other than a candidate for the state board of education. (12) "Campaign asset" means prepaid, purchased, or donated assets available to the candidate on the date of the filing deadline for the office the candidate is seeking that will be consumed or depleted in the course of the candidate's election campaign, including, but not limited to, postage, prepaid rent for campaign headquarters, prepaid radio, television, and newspaper advertising, and other prepaid consulting and personal services. (13) "Permitted funds" means the sum of the following: (a) The total of the allowable aggregate contribution of each contributor; (b) The applicable carry-in limit. (14) "Excess funds" means the amount by which the sum of the total cash on hand and total reported campaign assets exceeds permitted funds. (15) "Covered candidate" means both of the following: (a) A candidate who, during the pre-filing period, accepts or has a campaign committee that accepts contributions on the candidate's behalf for the purpose of nominating or electing the candidate to any office not subject to the contribution limits prescribed in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code; (b) A person who, during the pre-filing period, accepts or has a campaign committee that accepts contributions on the person's behalf prior to the person deciding upon or announcing the office for which the person will become a candidate for nomination or election. (B) Each candidate who files for state office, not later than the filing date for that office, shall dispose of any excess funds. Each covered candidate who files for state office, not later than the filing date for that office, shall dispose of any excess aggregate contributions. (C) Any campaign committee that is required to dispose of excess funds or excess aggregate contributions under division (B) of this section shall dispose of that excess amount or amounts by doing any of the following: (1) Giving the amount to the treasurer of state for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund created by division (I) of under section 3517.152 111.29 of the Revised Code; (2) Giving the amount to individuals who made contributions to that campaign committee as a refund of all or part of their contributions; (3) Giving the amount to a corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. (D)(1) Subject to division (D)(2) of this section, no candidate or covered candidate shall appear on the ballot, even if certified to appear on the ballot, unless the candidate's or covered candidate's campaign committee has disposed of excess funds, excess aggregate contributions, or both as required by divisions (B) and (C) of this section. (2) If the excess aggregate contributions accepted by a covered candidate or a covered candidate's campaign committee aggregate a total of less than five thousand dollars from all contributors, that candidate shall not be prohibited from appearing on the ballot under division (D)(1) of this section. (E)(1) The campaign committee of each candidate required to dispose of excess funds under this section shall file a report, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, with the official or board with which the candidate is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. The report shall be filed by the seventh day following the filing deadline for the office the candidate is seeking, shall indicate the amount of excess funds disposed of, and shall describe the manner in which the campaign committee disposed of the excess amount. (2) In addition to the information required to be included in a report filed under division (E)(1) of this section, the campaign committee of each covered candidate required to dispose of excess aggregate contributions under this section shall include in that report the source and amount of each excess aggregate contribution disposed of and shall describe the manner in which the campaign committee disposed of the excess amount. (F)(1) Each campaign committee of a candidate who has filed a declaration of candidacy or a nominating petition for a state office, not later than seven days after the filing date for the office the candidate is seeking, shall file a declaration of filing-day finances, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, with the official or board with which the candidate is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code. (2) A declaration of filing-day finances shall list all of the following: (a) The amount of cash on hand in the candidate's campaign fund on the filing date for the office the candidate is seeking. (b) The value and description of all campaign assets worth five hundred dollars or more available to the candidate on the filing date. Assets purchased by the campaign shall be valued at actual cost, and in-kind contributions shall be valued at market value. (c) The total of all aggregate contributions; (d) The total of all allowable aggregate contributions; (e) The applicable carry-in limit, if any. (3) In addition to the information required to be included in a report of filing-day finances filed under division (F)(1) of this section, the campaign committee of each covered candidate shall include both of the following in that report: (a) The total of all excess aggregate contributions; (b) For each contributor, if any, for whom there is an excess aggregate contribution, the name, address, aggregate contribution, and excess aggregate contribution. (G) A campaign committee of a candidate is not required to file a declaration of filing-day finances under division (F) of this section if all of the following apply: (1) The campaign committee has not accepted, during the pre-filing period, any aggregate contribution greater than the applicable amount. (2) The campaign committee had less than the carry-in amount in cash on hand at the beginning of the pre-filing period. (3) The candidate files a declaration, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, with the official or board with which the candidate is required to file statements under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code not later than seven days after the filing date for the office that candidate is seeking, stating that the candidate's campaign committee has not accepted aggregate contributions as described in division (G)(1) of this section and has less than the carry-in amount in cash on hand as described in division (G)(2) of this section. Sec. 3517.1012. (A)(1) Each state and county political party shall establish a restricted fund that is separate from all other accounts of the political party. (2) A state or county political party shall deposit into its restricted fund all gifts that are made to or accepted by the political party from a corporation or labor organization subject to the applicable limitations prescribed in division (X) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code. A state or county political party may deposit into its restricted fund any gifts that are made to or accepted by the political party from a source other than a corporation or labor organization. (3) Moneys in a state or county political party's restricted fund may be disbursed to pay costs incurred for any of the following purposes specified in division (A) of section 3517.18 of the Revised Code: (a) The defraying of operating and maintenance costs associated with political party headquarters, including rental or leasing costs, staff salaries, office equipment and supplies, postage, and the purchase, lease, or maintenance of computer hardware and software; (b) The organization of voter registration programs and get-out-the-vote campaigns and the costs associated with voter registration and get-out-the-vote activities, including, but not limited to, rental costs for booth spaces at fairs, festivals, or similar events if voter registration forms are available at those booths, printing costs for registration forms, mailing costs for communications soliciting voter registration, and payments for the services of persons conducting voter registration and get-out-the-vote activities; (c) The administration of party fund-raising drives; (d) Direct mail campaigns or other communications with the registered voters of a party that are not related to any particular candidate or election; (e) The preparation of reports required by law. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a state or county political party shall file deposit and disbursement statements, in the same manner as the party is required to file statements of contributions and expenditures under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, regarding all deposits made into, and all disbursements made from, the party's restricted fund. Deposit and disbursement statements filed in accordance with this division by a county political party shall be filed by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state at the times specified in division (A) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code for the filing of statements of contributions and expenditures if the county political party accepts gifts from a corporation or labor organization under division (A)(2) of this section. Sec. 3517.11. (A)(1) Campaign committees of candidates for statewide office or the state board of education, political action committees or political contributing entities that make contributions to campaign committees of candidates that are required to file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code with the secretary of state, political action committees or political contributing entities that make contributions to campaign committees of candidates for member of the general assembly, political action committees or political contributing entities that make contributions to state and national political parties and to legislative campaign funds, political action committees or political contributing entities that receive contributions or make expenditures in connection with a statewide ballot issue, political action committees or political contributing entities that make contributions to other political action committees or political contributing entities, political parties, and campaign committees, except as set forth in division (A)(3) of this section, legislative campaign funds, and state and national political parties shall file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code with the secretary of state. (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (E) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, campaign committees of candidates for all other offices shall file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code with the board of elections where their candidates are required to file their petitions or other papers for nomination or election. (b) A campaign committee of a candidate for office of member of the general assembly or a campaign committee of a candidate for the office of judge of a court of appeals shall file two copies of the printed version of any statement, addendum, or amended statement if the committee does not file pursuant to division (E) or (J) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code but files by printed version only with the appropriate board of elections. The board of elections shall send one of those copies by certified mail or an electronic copy to the secretary of state before the close of business on the day the board of elections receives the statement, addendum, or amended statement. (3) Political action committees or political contributing entities that only contribute to a county political party, contribute to campaign committees of candidates whose nomination or election is to be submitted only to electors within a county, subdivision, or district, excluding candidates for member of the general assembly, and receive contributions or make expenditures in connection with ballot questions or issues to be submitted only to electors within a county, subdivision, or district shall file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code with the board of elections in that county or in the county contained in whole or part within the subdivision or district having a population greater than that of any other county contained in whole or part within that subdivision or district, as the case may be. (4) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(1)(e) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code with respect to state candidate funds, county political parties shall file the statements prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code with the board of elections of their respective counties. (B)(1) The official with whom petitions and other papers for nomination or election to public office are filed shall furnish each candidate at the time of that filing a copy of sections 3517.01, 3517.08 to 3517.11, 3517.13 to 3517.9933517.991, 3599.03, and 3599.031 of the Revised Code and any other materials that the secretary of state may require. Each candidate receiving the materials shall acknowledge their receipt in writing. (2) On or before the tenth day before the dates on which statements are required to be filed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, the secretary of state shall notify every candidate subject to the provisions of this section and sections 3517.10 and 3517.106 of the Revised Code of the requirements and applicable penalties of those sections. The secretary of state shall notify all candidates required to file those statements with the secretary of state's office either by certified mail, or, if the secretary of state has record of an internet identifier of record associated with the candidate, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record. The board of elections of every county shall notify by first class mail any candidate who has personally appeared at the office of the board on or before the tenth day before the statements are required to be filed and signed a form, to be provided by the secretary of state, attesting that the candidate has been notified of the candidate's obligations under the campaign finance law. The board shall forward the completed form to the secretary of state. The board shall notify all other candidates required to file those statements with it either by certified mail, or, if the secretary of state has record of an internet identifier of record associated with the candidate, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record. (3)(a) Any statement required to be filed under sections 3517.081 to 3517.14 3517.13 of the Revised Code that is found to be incomplete or inaccurate by the officer to whom it is submitted shall be accepted on a conditional basis, and the person who filed it shall be notified by certified mail as to the incomplete or inaccurate nature of the statement. The secretary of state may examine statements filed for candidates for the office of member of the general assembly and candidates for the office of judge of a court of appeals for completeness and accuracy. The secretary of state shall examine for completeness and accuracy statements that campaign committees of candidates for the office of member of the general assembly and campaign committees of candidates for the office of judge of a court of appeals file pursuant to division (E) or (J) of section 3517.106 of the Revised Code. If an officer at the board of elections where a statement filed for a candidate for the office of member of the general assembly or for a candidate for the office of judge of a court of appeals was submitted finds the statement to be incomplete or inaccurate, the officer shall immediately notify the secretary of state of its incomplete or inaccurate nature. If either an officer at the board of elections or the secretary of state finds a statement filed for a candidate for the office of member of the general assembly or for a candidate for the office of judge of a court of appeals to be incomplete or inaccurate, only the secretary of state shall send the notification as to the incomplete or inaccurate nature of the statement. Within twenty-one days after receipt of the notice, in the case of a pre-election statement, a postelection statement, a monthly statement, an annual statement, or a semiannual statement prescribed by section 3517.10, an annual statement prescribed by section 3517.101, or a statement prescribed by division (B)(2)(b) or (C)(2)(b) of section 3517.105 or section 3517.107 of the Revised Code, the recipient shall file an addendum, amendment, or other correction to the statement providing the information necessary to complete or correct the statement. The secretary of state may require that, in lieu of filing an addendum, amendment, or other correction to a statement that is filed by electronic means of transmission to the office of the secretary of state or a board of elections pursuant to section 3517.106 of the Revised Code, the recipient of the notice described in this division file by electronic means of transmission an amended statement that incorporates the information necessary to complete or correct the statement. The secretary of state shall determine by rule when an addendum, amendment, or other correction to any of the following or when an amended statement of any of the following shall be filed: (i) A two-business-day statement prescribed by section 3517.10 of the Revised Code; (ii) A disclosure of electioneering communications statement prescribed by division (D) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code; (iii) A deposit and disbursement statement prescribed under division (B) of section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code; (iv) A gift and disbursement statement prescribed under section 3517.1013 of the Revised Code; (v) A donation and disbursement statement prescribed under section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code. An addendum, amendment, or other correction to a statement that is filed by electronic means of transmission pursuant to section 3517.106 of the Revised Code shall be filed in the same manner as the statement. The provisions of sections 3517.10, 3517.106, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, and 3517.1014 of the Revised Code pertaining to the filing of statements of contributions and expenditures, statements of independent expenditures, disclosure of electioneering communications statements, deposit and disbursement statements, gift and disbursement statements, and donation and disbursement statements by electronic means of transmission apply to the filing of addenda, amendments, or other corrections to those statements by electronic means of transmission and the filing of amended statements by electronic means of transmission. (b) Within five business days after the secretary of state receives, by electronic or other means of transmission, an addendum, amendment, or other correction to a statement or an amended statement under division (B)(3)(a) of this section, the secretary of state, pursuant to divisions (E) and (G) of section 3517.106 or division (D) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code, shall make the contribution and expenditure, contribution and disbursement, deposit and disbursement, gift and disbursement, or donation and disbursement information in that addendum, amendment, correction, or amended statement available online to the public through the internet. (4)(a) The secretary of state or the board of elections shall examine all statements for compliance with sections 3517.08 to 3517.14 3517.13 of the Revised Code. (b) The secretary of state may contract with an individual or entity not associated with the secretary of state and experienced in interpreting the campaign finance law of this state to conduct examinations of statements filed by any statewide candidate, as defined in section 3517.103 of the Revised Code. (c) The examination shall be conducted by a person or entity qualified to conduct it. The results of the examination shall be available to the public, and, when the examination is conducted by an individual or entity not associated with the secretary of state, the results of the examination shall be reported to the secretary of state. (C)(1) In the event of a failure to file or a late filing of a statement required to be filed under sections 3517.081 to 3517.14 3517.13 of the Revised Code, or if a filed statement or any addendum, amendment, or other correction to a statement or any amended statement, if an addendum, amendment, or other correction or an amended statement is required to be filed, is incomplete or inaccurate or appears to disclose a failure to comply with or a violation of law, the official whose duty it is to examine the statement shall promptly file a complaint with the Ohio elections commission under section 3517.153 3517.16 of the Revised Code if the law is one over which the commission has jurisdiction to hear complaintslisted in division (A) of section 3517.15 of the Revised Code, or the official shall promptly report the failure or violation to the board of elections and the board shall promptly report it to the prosecuting attorney in accordance with division (J) of section 3501.11 of the Revised Code. If the official files a complaint with the commission, the commission shall proceed in accordance with sections 3517.154 to 3517.157 of the Revised Code. (2) For purposes of division (C)(1) of this section, a statement or an addendum, amendment, or other correction to a statement or an amended statement required to be filed under sections 3517.081 to 3517.14 3517.13 of the Revised Code is incomplete or inaccurate under this section if the statement, addendum, amendment, other correction, or amended statement fails to disclose substantially all contributions, gifts, or donations that are received or deposits that are made that are required to be reported under sections 3517.10, 3517.107, 3517.108, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, and 3517.1014 of the Revised Code or if the statement, addendum, amendment, other correction, or amended statement fails to disclose at least ninety per cent of the total contributions, gifts, or donations received or deposits made or of the total expenditures or disbursements made during the reporting period. (D) No certificate of nomination or election shall be issued to a person, and no person elected to an office shall enter upon the performance of the duties of that office, until that person or that person's campaign committee, as appropriate, has fully complied with this section and sections 3517.08, 3517.081, 3517.10, and 3517.13 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.121. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the Revised Code: (A) As used in this section: (1) "Electioneering communication" has the same meaning as in section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code. (2) "Foreign national" means any of the following, as applicable: (a) In the case of an individual, an individual who is not a United States citizen or national; (b) A government of a foreign country or of a political subdivision of a foreign country; (c) A foreign political party; (d) A person, other than an individual, that is organized under the laws of, or has its principal place of business in, a foreign country. (B) No foreign national shall, directly or indirectly through any person or entity, do any of the following: (1) Make a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure in support of or opposition to a candidate for any elective office in this state, including an office of a political party; (2) Make a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure in support of or opposition to a statewide ballot issue or question, regardless of whether the ballot issue or question has yet been certified to appear on the ballot; (3) Make a disbursement for the direct cost of producing or airing an electioneering communication; (4) Make a contribution to a candidate, campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, state candidate fund, political party, or separate segregated fund, to any committee created to support or oppose a ballot issue or question, or, to the maximum extent permitted by law and by the constitutions of the United States and of this state, to a continuing association; (5) Promise, either expressly or implicitly, to make a contribution, expenditure, independent expenditure, or disbursement described in division (B)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section. (C) No individual, candidate, campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, state candidate fund, political party, separate segregated fund, or committee created to support or oppose a ballot issue or question and, to the maximum extent permitted by law and by the constitutions of the United States and of this state, no continuing association shall, directly or indirectly through any other person or entity, knowingly do either of the following: (1) Solicit, accept, or receive any funds from a foreign national for any purpose described in division (B) of this section; (2) Make a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure using any funds the person knows were received from a foreign national for any purpose described in division (B) of this section. (D) No person shall knowingly aid or facilitate a violation of division (B) or (C) of this section. (E) Any complaint that alleges a violation of division (W) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be treated as instead alleging a violation of this section. (F)(1) Whoever knowingly violates division (B) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree on a second or subsequent offense. The violator also shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount involved in the violation or ten thousand dollars, whichever amount is greater. (2) Whoever knowingly violates division (C) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree on a second or subsequent offense. The violator also shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount involved in the violation or ten thousand dollars, whichever amount is greater, and shall be required to return the total amount accepted in violation of that division to the foreign national from whom it was accepted. (3) Whoever knowingly violates division (D) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree and shall be fined one thousand dollars. (G)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1)(b) of this section, the attorney general has exclusive authority to prosecute a violation of this section and has exclusive supervision and control of all investigations, prosecutions, and enforcement proceedings under this section. (b) If the attorney general is a victim or witness or otherwise involved in an alleged violation of this section, the attorney general shall refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor, as determined under division (A)(2) (C) of section 3517.155 3517.17 of the Revised Code, except that if applicable, the attorney general shall make the determination described in division (A)(2)(b) (B)(2) of that section instead of the Ohio elections election integrity commission. (2) Upon the occurrence of either of the following, the attorney general shall investigate an alleged violation of this section in consultation with the secretary of state: (a) The submission of a written request to the attorney general by the governor, the secretary of state, the general assembly, or the Ohio elections election integrity commission, alleging a violation of this section; (b) The filing of a complaint with the attorney general by an elector of this state, alleging a violation of this section. (3) If it appears to the attorney general, after conducting an investigation under division (G)(2) of this section, that there is probable cause to believe that a violation of this section has occurred, the attorney general may prosecute the violation in a court of competent jurisdiction. (H) When proceeding under this section, the attorney general and any assistant or special counsel designated by the attorney general for that purpose have all the rights, privileges, and powers conferred by law on prosecuting attorneys, including the power to appear before grand juries and to interrogate witnesses before such grand juries. These powers of the attorney general are in addition to any other applicable powers of the attorney general. Sec. 3517.13. (A)(1) No campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall fail to file a complete and accurate statement required under division (A)(1) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (2) No campaign committee of a statewide candidate shall fail to file a complete and accurate monthly statement, and no campaign committee of a statewide candidate or a candidate for the office of chief justice or justice of the supreme court shall fail to file a complete and accurate two-business-day statement, as required under section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "statewide candidate" has the same meaning as in division (F)(2) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (B) No campaign committee shall fail to file a complete and accurate statement required under division (A)(1) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (C) No campaign committee shall fail to file a complete and accurate statement required under division (A)(2) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (D) No campaign committee shall fail to file a complete and accurate statement required under division (A)(3) or (4) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (E) No person other than a campaign committee shall knowingly fail to file a statement required under section 3517.10 or 3517.107 of the Revised Code. (F) No person shall make cash contributions to any person totaling more than one hundred dollars in each primary, special, or general election. (G)(1) No person shall knowingly conceal or misrepresent contributions given or received, expenditures made, or any other information required to be reported by a provision in sections 3517.08 to 3517.13 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) No person shall make a contribution to a campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, political party, or person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications in the name of another person. (b) A person does not make a contribution in the name of another when either of the following applies: (i) An individual makes a contribution from a partnership or other unincorporated business account, if the contribution is reported by listing both the name of the partnership or other unincorporated business and the name of the partner or owner making the contribution as required under division (I) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (ii) A person makes a contribution in that person's spouse's name or in both of their names. (H) No person within this state, publishing a newspaper or other periodical, shall charge a campaign committee for political advertising a rate in excess of the rate such person would charge if the campaign committee were a general rate advertiser whose advertising was directed to promoting its business within the same area as that encompassed by the particular office that the candidate of the campaign committee is seeking. The rate shall take into account the amount of space used, as well as the type of advertising copy submitted by or on behalf of the campaign committee. All discount privileges otherwise offered by a newspaper or periodical to general rate advertisers shall be available upon equal terms to all campaign committees. No person within this state, operating a radio or television station or network of stations in this state, shall charge a campaign committee for political broadcasts a rate that exceeds: (1) During the forty-five days preceding the date of a primary election and during the sixty days preceding the date of a general or special election in which the candidate of the campaign committee is seeking office, the lowest unit charge of the station for the same class and amount of time for the same period; (2) At any other time, the charges made for comparable use of that station by its other users. (I) Subject to divisions (K), (L), (M), and (N) of this section, no agency or department of this state or any political subdivision shall award any contract, other than one let by competitive bidding or a contract incidental to such contract or which is by force account, for the purchase of goods costing more than five hundred dollars or services costing more than five hundred dollars to any individual, partnership, association, including, without limitation, a professional association organized under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, estate, or trust if the individual has made or the individual's spouse has made, or any partner, shareholder, administrator, executor, or trustee or the spouse of any of them has made, as an individual, within the two previous calendar years, one or more contributions totaling in excess of one thousand dollars to the holder of the public office having ultimate responsibility for the award of the contract or to the public officer's campaign committee. (J) Subject to divisions (K), (L), (M), and (N) of this section, no agency or department of this state or any political subdivision shall award any contract, other than one let by competitive bidding or a contract incidental to such contract or which is by force account, for the purchase of goods costing more than five hundred dollars or services costing more than five hundred dollars to a corporation or business trust, except a professional association organized under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, if an owner of more than twenty per cent of the corporation or business trust or the spouse of that person has made, as an individual, within the two previous calendar years, taking into consideration only owners for all of that period, one or more contributions totaling in excess of one thousand dollars to the holder of a public office having ultimate responsibility for the award of the contract or to the public officer's campaign committee. (K) For purposes of divisions (I) and (J) of this section, if a public officer who is responsible for the award of a contract is appointed by the governor, whether or not the appointment is subject to the advice and consent of the senate, excluding members of boards, commissions, committees, authorities, councils, boards of trustees, task forces, and other such entities appointed by the governor, the office of the governor is considered to have ultimate responsibility for the award of the contract. (L) For purposes of divisions (I) and (J) of this section, if a public officer who is responsible for the award of a contract is appointed by the elected chief executive officer of a municipal corporation, or appointed by the elected chief executive officer of a county operating under an alternative form of county government or county charter, excluding members of boards, commissions, committees, authorities, councils, boards of trustees, task forces, and other such entities appointed by the chief executive officer, the office of the chief executive officer is considered to have ultimate responsibility for the award of the contract. (M)(1) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section do not apply to contracts awarded by the board of commissioners of the sinking fund, municipal legislative authorities, boards of education, boards of county commissioners, boards of township trustees, or other boards, commissions, committees, authorities, councils, boards of trustees, task forces, and other such entities created by law, by the supreme court or courts of appeals, by county courts consisting of more than one judge, courts of common pleas consisting of more than one judge, or municipal courts consisting of more than one judge, or by a division of any court if the division consists of more than one judge. This division shall apply to the specified entity only if the members of the entity act collectively in the award of a contract for goods or services. (2) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section do not apply to actions of the controlling board. (N)(1) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section apply to contributions made to the holder of a public office having ultimate responsibility for the award of a contract, or to the public officer's campaign committee, during the time the person holds the office and during any time such person was a candidate for the office. Those divisions do not apply to contributions made to, or to the campaign committee of, a candidate for or holder of the office other than the holder of the office at the time of the award of the contract. (2) Divisions (I) and (J) of this section do not apply to contributions of a partner, shareholder, administrator, executor, trustee, or owner of more than twenty per cent of a corporation or business trust made before the person held any of those positions or after the person ceased to hold any of those positions in the partnership, association, estate, trust, corporation, or business trust whose eligibility to be awarded a contract is being determined, nor to contributions of the person's spouse made before the person held any of those positions, after the person ceased to hold any of those positions, before the two were married, after the granting of a decree of divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or after the granting of an order in an action brought solely for legal separation. Those divisions do not apply to contributions of the spouse of an individual whose eligibility to be awarded a contract is being determined made before the two were married, after the granting of a decree of divorce, dissolution of marriage, or annulment, or after the granting of an order in an action brought solely for legal separation. (O) No beneficiary of a campaign fund or other person shall convert for personal use, and no person shall knowingly give to a beneficiary of a campaign fund or any other person, for the beneficiary's or any other person's personal use, anything of value from the beneficiary's campaign fund, including, without limitation, payments to a beneficiary for services the beneficiary personally performs, except as reimbursement for any of the following: (1) Legitimate and verifiable prior campaign expenses incurred by the beneficiary; (2) Legitimate and verifiable ordinary and necessary prior expenses incurred by the beneficiary in connection with duties as the holder of a public office, including, without limitation, expenses incurred through participation in nonpartisan or bipartisan events if the participation of the holder of a public office would normally be expected; (3) Legitimate and verifiable ordinary and necessary prior expenses incurred by the beneficiary while doing any of the following: (a) Engaging in activities in support of or opposition to a candidate other than the beneficiary, political party, or ballot issue; (b) Raising funds for a political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, campaign committee, or other candidate; (c) Participating in the activities of a political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or campaign committee; (d) Attending a political party convention or other political meeting. For purposes of this division, an expense is incurred whenever a beneficiary has either made payment or is obligated to make payment, as by the use of a credit card or other credit procedure or by the use of goods or services received on account. (P) No beneficiary of a campaign fund shall knowingly accept, and no person shall knowingly give to the beneficiary of a campaign fund, reimbursement for an expense under division (O) of this section to the extent that the expense previously was reimbursed or paid from another source of funds. If an expense is reimbursed under division (O) of this section and is later paid or reimbursed, wholly or in part, from another source of funds, the beneficiary shall repay the reimbursement received under division (O) of this section to the extent of the payment made or reimbursement received from the other source. (Q) No candidate or public official or employee shall accept for personal or business use anything of value from a political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or campaign committee other than the candidate's or public official's or employee's own campaign committee, and no person shall knowingly give to a candidate or public official or employee anything of value from a political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or such a campaign committee, except for the following: (1) Reimbursement for legitimate and verifiable ordinary and necessary prior expenses not otherwise prohibited by law incurred by the candidate or public official or employee while engaged in any legitimate activity of the political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or such campaign committee. Without limitation, reimbursable expenses under this division include those incurred while doing any of the following: (a) Engaging in activities in support of or opposition to another candidate, political party, or ballot issue; (b) Raising funds for a political party, legislative campaign fund, campaign committee, or another candidate; (c) Attending a political party convention or other political meeting. (2) Compensation not otherwise prohibited by law for actual and valuable personal services rendered under a written contract to the political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or such campaign committee for any legitimate activity of the political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or such campaign committee. Reimbursable expenses under this division do not include, and it is a violation of this division for a candidate or public official or employee to accept, or for any person to knowingly give to a candidate or public official or employee from a political party, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, or campaign committee other than the candidate's or public official's or employee's own campaign committee, anything of value for activities primarily related to the candidate's or public official's or employee's own campaign for election, except for contributions to the candidate's or public official's or employee's campaign committee. For purposes of this division, an expense is incurred whenever a candidate or public official or employee has either made payment or is obligated to make payment, as by the use of a credit card or other credit procedure, or by the use of goods or services on account. (R)(1) Division (O) or (P) of this section does not prohibit a campaign committee from making direct advance or post payment from contributions to vendors for goods and services for which reimbursement is permitted under division (O) of this section, except that no campaign committee shall pay its candidate or other beneficiary for services personally performed by the candidate or other beneficiary. (2) If any expense that may be reimbursed under division (O), (P), or (Q) of this section is part of other expenses that may not be paid or reimbursed, the separation of the two types of expenses for the purpose of allocating for payment or reimbursement those expenses that may be paid or reimbursed may be by any reasonable accounting method, considering all of the surrounding circumstances. (3) For purposes of divisions (O), (P), and (Q) of this section, mileage allowance at a rate not greater than that allowed by the internal revenue service at the time the travel occurs may be paid instead of reimbursement for actual travel expenses allowable. (S)(1) As used in division (S) of this section: (a) "State elective office" has the same meaning as in section 3517.092 of the Revised Code. (b) "Federal office" means a federal office as defined in the Federal Election Campaign Act. (c) "Federal campaign committee" means a principal campaign committee or authorized committee as defined in the Federal Election Campaign Act. (2) No person who is a candidate for state elective office and who previously sought nomination or election to a federal office shall transfer any funds or assets from that person's federal campaign committee for nomination or election to the federal office to that person's campaign committee as a candidate for state elective office. (3) No campaign committee of a person who is a candidate for state elective office and who previously sought nomination or election to a federal office shall accept any funds or assets from that person's federal campaign committee for that person's nomination or election to the federal office. (T)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(6)(c) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, a state or county political party shall not disburse moneys from any account other than a state candidate fund to make contributions to any of the following: (a) A state candidate fund; (b) A legislative campaign fund; (c) A campaign committee of a candidate for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, auditor of state, treasurer of state, attorney general, member of the state board of education, or member of the general assembly. (2) No state candidate fund, legislative campaign fund, or campaign committee of a candidate for any office described in division (T)(1)(c) of this section shall knowingly accept a contribution in violation of division (T)(1) of this section. (U) No person shall fail to file a statement required under section 3517.12 of the Revised Code. (V) No campaign committee shall fail to file a statement required under division (K)(3) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code. (W)(1) No foreign national shall, directly or indirectly through any other person or entity, make a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure or promise, either expressly or implicitly, to make a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure in support of or opposition to a candidate for any elective office in this state, including an office of a political party. (2) No candidate, campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, state candidate fund, political party, or separate segregated fund shall solicit or accept a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure from a foreign national. The secretary of state may direct any candidate, committee, entity, fund, or party that accepts a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure in violation of this division to return the contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure or, if it is not possible to return the contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure, then to return instead the value of it, to the contributor. (3) As used in division (W) of this section, "foreign national" has the same meaning as in section 441e(b) of the Federal Election Campaign Act. (X)(1) No state or county political party shall transfer any moneys from its restricted fund to any account of the political party into which contributions may be made or from which contributions or expenditures may be made. (2)(a) No state or county political party shall deposit a contribution or contributions that it receives into its restricted fund. (b) No state or county political party shall make a contribution or an expenditure from its restricted fund. (3)(a) No corporation or labor organization shall make a gift or gifts from the corporation's or labor organization's money or property aggregating more than ten thousand dollars to any one state or county political party for the party's restricted fund in a calendar year. (b) No state or county political party shall accept a gift or gifts for the party's restricted fund aggregating more than ten thousand dollars from any one corporation or labor organization in a calendar year. (4) No state or county political party shall transfer any moneys in the party's restricted fund to any other state or county political party. (5) No state or county political party shall knowingly fail to file a statement required under section 3517.1012 of the Revised Code. (Y) The administrator of workers' compensation and the employees of the bureau of workers' compensation shall not conduct any business with or award any contract, other than one awarded by competitive bidding, for the purchase of goods costing more than five hundred dollars or services costing more than five hundred dollars to any individual, partnership, association, including, without limitation, a professional association organized under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, estate, or trust, if the individual has made, or the individual's spouse has made, or any partner, shareholder, administrator, executor, or trustee, or the spouses of any of those individuals has made, as an individual, within the two previous calendar years, one or more contributions totaling in excess of one thousand dollars to the campaign committee of the governor or lieutenant governor or to the campaign committee of any candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor. (Z) The administrator of workers' compensation and the employees of the bureau of workers' compensation shall not conduct business with or award any contract, other than one awarded by competitive bidding, for the purchase of goods costing more than five hundred dollars or services costing more than five hundred dollars to a corporation or business trust, except a professional association organized under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, if an owner of more than twenty per cent of the corporation or business trust, or the spouse of the owner, has made, as an individual, within the two previous calendar years, taking into consideration only owners for all of such period, one or more contributions totaling in excess of one thousand dollars to the campaign committee of the governor or lieutenant governor or to the campaign committee of any candidate for the office of governor or lieutenant governor. Sec. 3517.152 3517.14. (A)(1) There is hereby created in the office of the secretary of state the Ohio elections election integrity commission, consisting of seven the following five members: (a) A chairperson appointed by the secretary of state; (b) One member appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (c) One member appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; (d) One member appointed by the president of the senate; (e) One member appointed by the senate minority leader. Not later than forty-five days after August 24, 1995, the speaker of the house of representatives and the leader in the senate of the political party of which the speaker is a member shall jointly submit to the governor a list of five persons who are affiliated with that political party. Not later than forty-five days after August 24, 1995, the two legislative leaders in the two houses of the general assembly of the major political party of which the speaker is not a member shall jointly submit to the governor a list of five persons who are affiliated with the major political party of which the speaker is not a member. Not later than fifteen days after receiving each list, the governor shall appoint three persons from each list to the commission. The governor shall appoint one person from each list to a term that ends on December 31, 1996, one person from each list to a term that ends on December 31, 1997, and one person from each list to a term that ends on December 31, 1998. Not later than thirty days after the governor appoints these six members, they shall, by a majority vote, appoint to the commission a seventh member, who shall not be affiliated with a political party. If the six members fail to appoint the seventh member within this thirty-day period, the chief justice of the supreme court, not later than thirty days after the end of the period during which the six members were required to appoint a member, shall appoint the seventh member, who shall not be affiliated with a political party. The seventh member shall be appointed to a term that ends on December 31, 2001. Terms of the initial members appointed under this division begin on January 1, 1996. (2)(a) If a vacancy occurs in the position of the seventh member, who is not affiliated with a political party, the six remaining members by a majority vote shall appoint, not later than forty-five days after the date of the vacancy, the seventh member of the commission, who shall not be affiliated with a political party. If these members fail to appoint the seventh member within this forty-five-day period, the chief justice of the supreme court, within fifteen days after the end of this period, shall appoint the seventh member, who shall not be affiliated with a political party. (b) If a vacancy occurs in any of the other six positions on the commission, the legislative leaders of the political party from whose list of persons the member being replaced was appointed shall submit to the governor, not later than thirty days after the date of the vacancy, a list of three persons who are affiliated with that political party. Not later than fifteen days after receiving the list, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint one person from the list to the commission. (3)(a) For the purpose of appointing alternates to the commission, not later than forty-five days after the effective date of this section, the speaker of the house of representatives and the leader in the senate of the political party of which the speaker is a member shall jointly submit to the governor a list of three persons who are affiliated with that political party. Not later than forty-five days after the effective date of this section, the two legislative leaders in the two houses of the general assembly of the major political party of which the speaker is not a member shall jointly submit to the governor a list of three persons who are affiliated with the major political party of which the speaker is not a member. Not later than fifteen days after receiving each list, the governor shall appoint one person from each list as an alternate to the commission to a term that ends on December 31, 2026. The initial term described in this division begins upon appointment by the governor. If a vacancy occurs in the position of alternate under this division, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as described in division (A)(2)(b) of this section. (b) For the purpose of appointing an alternate for the seventh member who is not affiliated with a political party, the six members who are affiliated with a political party by a majority vote shall appoint, not later than forty-five days after the effective date of this amendment, the alternate for the seventh member of the commission, who shall not be affiliated with a political party. If these members fail to appoint the alternate for the seventh member within this forty-five-day period, the chief justice of the supreme court, within fifteen days after the end of that period, shall appoint the alternate for the seventh member, who shall not be affiliated with a political party. The seventh member shall be appointed to a term that ends on December 31, 2026. The initial term described in this division begins upon the appointment of the alternate. If a vacancy occurs in the position of alternate for the seventh member who is not affiliated with a political party, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (4) At no time shall more than six members of the commission be affiliated with a political party, and, of these six members, not more than three shall be affiliated with the same political party. (5) In making appointments to the commission, including alternates, the governor shall take into consideration the various geographic areas of this state and shall appoint members and alternates so that those areas are represented on the commission in a balanced manner, to the extent feasible. (6) Members and alternates (2)(a) Subject to division (A)(2)(b) of this section, each member of the commission shall be a registered electors and shall be of good moral character elector to whom at least one of the following applies: (i) The person is an attorney in good standing before the supreme court of Ohio. (ii) The person has at least four years of work experience in election administration. (7) Alternates shall serve on the commission when a member of the commission is recused from hearing a complaint or is otherwise unable to hear a complaint. Alternates shall serve on the commission during a vacancy until the vacancy is filled. An alternate may only serve in lieu of a member affiliated with the same political party as the alternate. The alternate for the unaffiliated seventh member of the commission may only serve in lieu of the unaffiliated seventh member of the commission. When serving in this capacity, alternates count as members of the commission for the purpose of constituting a quorum under division (G)(3) of this section. (b) At all times, at least three members of the commission shall be attorneys in good standing before the supreme court of Ohio. If, at any time that multiple appointments to the commission are made simultaneously, too few of the intended appointees are attorneys, the following appointing officials shall have priority in selecting their preferred appointees who are not attorneys, in the order stated, and the appointing officials with lower priority shall select appointees who are attorneys: the secretary of state, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the senate minority leader, and the house minority leader. (3) The members of the commission appointed under divisions (A)(1)(a), (c), and (d) of this section shall serve initial terms of four years beginning on January 1, 2026, and the members appointed under divisions (A)(1)(b) and (e) of this section shall serve initial terms of two years beginning on January 1, 2026. Thereafter, all terms shall be four years. (B) Each member and alternate of the Ohio elections commission shall hold office from the date of the member's appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. A member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. After the initial terms of office provided for in divisions (A)(1) and (3) of this section, terms of office shall be for five years. (C) A vacancy in on the Ohio elections commission may be caused by death, or resignation, or three absences from commission meetings in a calendar year if those absences are caused by reasons declared invalid by a vote of five members of the remaining members of the commissionby removal under division (I) of this section. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as for the original appointment. (D) Each member of the Ohio elections commission while in the performance of the business of the commission shall be entitled to receive compensation at the rate of twenty-five thousand dollars per year. Members shall be reimbursed for expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties. Each alternate of the Ohio elections commission, when serving on the commission as described in division (A)(7) of this section, shall be paid at the per diem rate of one hundred fifty dollars, and shall be reimbursed for expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of the alternate's duties. (E) No member of the Ohio elections commission shall serve for more than one full term unless the terms served are served nonconsecutively two successive terms of four years. Terms are considered successive unless separated by a period of at least four years. In determining a person's eligibility to be a member of the commission, all of the following apply: (1) Time spent as a member in fulfillment of a term to which another person was first appointed shall not be considered, provided that a period of at least four years has passed between the time, if any, when the person previously was a member and the time the person is appointed to fulfill the unexpired term. (2) A person who is appointed to serve a full term and resigns before completing the term is considered to have served the full term. (3) A two year term served under division (A)(3) of this section is considered a full term of four years. (F)(1) No member or alternate of the Ohio elections election integrity commission shall do or be any of the following: (a) Hold, or be a candidate for, a public office; (b) Serve on a committee supporting or opposing a candidate or ballot question or issue; (c) Be an officer of the state central committee, a county central committee, or a district, city, township, or other committee of a political party or an officer of the executive committee of the state central committee, a county central committee, or a district, city, township, or other committee of a political party; (d) Be a legislative agent as defined in section 101.70 of the Revised Code or an executive agency lobbyist as defined in section 121.60 of the Revised Code; (e) Solicit or be involved in soliciting contributions on behalf of a candidate, campaign committee, political party, political action committee, or political contributing entity; (f) Be in the unclassified service under section 124.11 of the Revised Code; (g) Be a person or employee who is excluded from the definition of public employee pursuant to division (C) of section 4117.01 of the Revised Code. (2) No member, alternate, or employee of the commission shall make a contribution to, or for the benefit of, a campaign committee or committee in support of or opposition to a ballot question or issue, a political party, a legislative campaign fund, a political action committee, or a political contributing entity. (G)(1) The members of the Ohio elections commission shall elect a chairperson and a vice-chairperson. At no time shall the chairperson and vice-chairperson be affiliated with the same political party. The chairperson shall serve in that capacity for one year and shall not serve as chairperson more than twice during a term as a member of the commission. No two successive chairpersons shall be affiliated with the same political party. (2) The commission shall meet at the call of the chairperson or upon the written request of a majority of the members. The meetings and hearings of the commission or a panel of the commission under sections 3517.153 to 3517.157 3517.15 to 3517.18 of the Revised Code are subject to section 121.22 of the Revised Code. (3) (2) The commission shall adopt rules for its procedures in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Five Four of the seven five members constitute a quorum. Except as otherwise provided in this section and in sections 3517.154 to 3517.157 3517.15 to 3517.18 of the Revised Code, no action shall be taken without the concurrence of a majority of the members. (H)(1) (H) The Ohio elections commission secretary of state shall employ the technical, professional, and clerical employees that are necessary for it the commission to carry out its duties, and the attorney general shall provide legal counsel to the commission upon the commission's request. (2)(a) Notwithstanding section 109.02 of the Revised Code, the commission shall employ a full-time attorney, and, as needed, one or more investigatory attorneys to conduct investigations for the commission or a panel of the commission. The commission may employ or contract for the services of additional attorneys, as needed. The full-time attorney shall do all of the following: (i) Serve as the commission's attorney in regard to all legal matters, including representing the commission at appeals from a final determination of the commission, except that the full-time attorney shall not perform the duties that an investigatory attorney is required or requested to perform or that another attorney the commission employs or contracts with for services is required or requested to perform, and shall not represent the commission in any legal proceeding in which the commission is a named party; (ii) At the request of the commission or a panel of the commission, be present at a hearing held under sections 3517.154 to 3517.156 of the Revised Code to rule on the admissibility of evidence and to advise on the conduct of procedure; (iii) Perform other duties as required by rule of the commission. (b) An attorney employed by or under contract with the commission shall be licensed to practice law in this state. (3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(3)(b) of this section, at least five members of the commission shall agree on the employment of a person, a majority of the members shall agree on the discharge of an employee, and a person employed by the commission shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. (b) At least five of the seven members shall agree on the discharge of an investigatory attorney. (I) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Ohio elections commission fund. All moneys credited to the fund shall be used solely for the purpose of paying expenses related to the operation of the Ohio elections commission.(I)(1) The secretary of state, the speaker or minority leader of the house of representatives, or the president or minority leader of the senate may file a complaint in the supreme court of Ohio, seeking the removal of a member of the commission on any of the following grounds: (a) That the member does not meet the applicable requirements of division (A)(2) of this section; (b) That the member has violated division (F) of this section; (c) That the member has been absent from three or more meetings of the commission in a calendar year; (d) That the member is guilty of misconduct in office, as described in section 3.07 of the Revised Code. (2) The court shall hear a complaint filed with it under division (I)(1) of this section on an expedited basis. If the court determines that the charges in the complaint are true, the court shall order the member removed from the commission, and the seat shall be considered vacant. Sec. 3517.153 3517.15. (A) Upon the filing of a complaint with the Ohio elections commission, which shall be made by affidavit of any person, on personal knowledge, and subject to the penalties for perjury, or upon the filing of a complaint made by the secretary of state or an official at the board of elections, setting forth a failure to comply with or a violation of any provision in sections 3517.08 to 3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3599.03, or 3599.031 of the Revised Code, the commission shall proceed in accordance with sections 3517.154 to 3517.157 of the Revised Code. (B) The commission shall prescribe the form for complaints made under division (A) of this section. The secretary of state and boards of elections shall furnish the information that the commission requests. The commission or a member of the commission may administer oaths, and the commission may issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. Section 101.42 of the Revised Code governs the issuance of subpoenas insofar as applicable. Upon the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. (C) (A)(1) No prosecution shall commence for a violation of a provision in sections 145.054, 742.043, 3307.073, 3309.073, 3517.08 to 3517.12, 3517.13, 3517.17, 3517.18, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3599.03, or 3599.031, or 5505.045 of the Revised Code unless a complaint has been filed with the commission secretary of state under this section 3517.16 of the Revised Code and all proceedings of the commission or a panel of the commission, as appropriate, under sections 3517.154 to 3517.157 3517.16 to 3517.18 of the Revised Code are completed. (D) (2) A complaint may be filed with the secretary of state under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code for a violation of a provision in sections 3501.35, 3599.13, 3599.14, or 3599.21, division (A) of section 3599.11, or division (A)(1) or (2) of section 3599.12 of the Revised Code that occurs on or after the effective date of this amendment. A prosecution may commence for a violation of such a provision at any time before or after a complaint has been filed with the secretary of state under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The Ohio election integrity commission shall hear all matters referred to the commission by the secretary of state under division (E)(3) of section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. (2) The commission may recommend legislation and render advisory opinions concerning sections 3517.08, 3517.082, 3517.092, 3517.102, 3517.105, 3517.1014, 3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3599.03, and 3599.031 the provisions of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of this section for persons over whose acts it the commission has or may have jurisdiction. When the commission renders an advisory opinion relating to a specific set of circumstances involving any of those sections stating that there is no violation of a provision in those sections, the person to whom the opinion is directed or a person who is similarly situated may reasonably rely on the opinion and is immune from criminal prosecution and a civil action, including, without limitation, a civil action for removal from public office or employment, based on facts and circumstances covered by the opinion. An advisory opinion issued by the Ohio elections commission that is in effect as of the effective date of this amendment is considered an advisory opinion of the Ohio election integrity commission, unless and until the Ohio election integrity commission amends or rescinds the advisory opinion. (E) (C) The secretary of state and the boards of elections shall furnish the information that the commission requests. The commission or a member of the commission may administer oaths, and the commission may issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. Section 101.42 of the Revised Code governs the issuance of subpoenas insofar as applicable. Upon the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. (D) The Ohio election integrity commission shall establish a web site on which it shall post, at a minimum, all decisions and advisory opinions issued by the commission, all decisions and advisory opinions issued by the Ohio elections commission before the effective date of this amendment, and copies of each election law as it is amended by the general assembly. The Ohio election integrity commission shall update the web site regularly to reflect any changes to those decisions and advisory opinions and any new decisions and advisory opinions. Sec. 3517.154 3517.16. (A)(1) The full-time attorney for the Ohio elections commission shall review each complaint filed with the commission under section 3517.153 of the Revised Code, shall determine the nature of the complaint, and, unless division (A)(2)(a) of this section requires that the complaint receive an automatic expedited hearing, shall make a recommendation to the commission for its disposition, in accordance with this section. The attorney shall make the determination and the recommendation, if required, not later than one business day after the complaint is filed. (2)(a) If the attorney determines that the complaint sets forth a violation of division (B) of section 3517.21 or division (B) of section 3517.22 of the Revised Code and that the complaint is filed during one of the periods of time specified in division (B)(1) of section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, the complaint shall receive an automatic expedited hearing under section 3517.156 of the Revised Code. (b) If the attorney determines that the complaint sets forth a failure to comply with or a violation of division (G), (I), (J), (O), (P), or (Q) of section 3517.13, division (A) of section 3517.21, or division (A) of section 3517.22 of the Revised Code and that the complaint is filed during one of the periods of time specified in division (B)(1) of section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, the attorney shall recommend to the commission that the complaint receive an expedited hearing under section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, and the complaint shall receive such a hearing. (c) If the attorney determines that the complaint sets forth a failure to comply with or a violation of a section of the Revised Code over which the commission has jurisdiction to hear complaints other than the sections described in divisions (A)(2)(a) and (b) of this section, and unless the attorney makes a determination as provided for in division (A)(3) of this section, the attorney shall recommend to the commission that the complaint be submitted to the commission under section 3517.155 of the Revised Code. After the attorney makes that recommendation, the attorney shall notify all parties to the complaint of the attorney's recommendation. (3)(a) If a complaint sets forth a failure to comply with or a violation of a section of the Revised Code over which the commission has jurisdiction to hear complaints other than the sections described in divisions (A)(2)(a) and (b) of this section and if the complaint is filed during one of the periods of time specified in division (B)(1) of section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, the attorney may determine that the complaint should receive an expedited hearing under that section. The attorney shall make that determination by considering one or more of the following: (i) The number of prior failures to comply with or violations of Title XXXV of the Revised Code that the person or entity against whom the complaint has been brought has committed and any prior penalties the commission has imposed on the person or entity; (ii) If the complaint involves a statement required to be filed under section 3517.10, division (E) of section 3517.102, or section 3517.105, 3517.107, 3517.108, 3517.109, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code or an addendum required to be filed under section 3517.11 of the Revised Code that is filed late, how late the filing is and how much time has elapsed between the deadline for filing the statement or addendum and the filing of the complaint; (iii) If the complaint involves contributions and expenditures, contributions and disbursements, deposits and disbursements, gifts and disbursements, or donations and disbursements required to be reported under section 3517.10, division (E) of section 3517.102, or section 3517.105, 3517.107, 3517.108, 3517.109, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code that are either not reported or reported late, the number of contributions and expenditures, contributions and disbursements, deposits and disbursements, gifts and disbursements, or donations and disbursements not reported or how late they were reported; (iv) If the complaint involves contributions required to be reported by a campaign committee under section 3517.10, division (E) of section 3517.102, or section 3517.105, 3517.107, 3517.108, or 3517.109 of the Revised Code that are not reported, whether any of the contributors of the contributions not reported have a personal or professional relationship with the campaign committee's candidate; (v) If the complaint involves a statement required to be filed under section 3517.10, division (E) of section 3517.102, or section 3517.105, 3517.107, 3517.108, 3517.109, 3517.1011, 3517.1012, 3517.1013, or 3517.1014 of the Revised Code that is incomplete, the degree to which it is incomplete; (vi) If the complaint involves the receipt of contributions in violation of section 3599.03 of the Revised Code, the dollar amount and number of contributions received in violation of that section; (vii) If the complaint involves a failure to make the identification or a misstatement of the identification required under section 3517.105 or 3517.20 of the Revised Code, whether the failure or misstatement was purposely made; (viii) If the complaint sets forth a failure to comply with or a violation of a section of the Revised Code described in division (A)(2)(c) of this section, whether the person or entity against whom the complaint has been made has committed more than one such failure or violation within a reasonable amount of time, or whether the cumulative nature of the failures or violations indicates a systematic disregard for the law. (b) Prior to making a determination under division (A)(3)(a) of this section that the complaint should receive an expedited hearing under section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, the attorney shall take into consideration the number of panels of the commission that have cases pending before them and the number of cases pending before the panels and shall not make a determination that will place an undue burden on a panel of the commission. (c) If the attorney determines that the complaint should receive an expedited hearing under section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, the attorney shall recommend to the commission that the complaint receive an expedited hearing, and, if a majority of the members of the commission agrees with the recommendation, the complaint shall receive an expedited hearing under that section. (4) (A)(1) Any person who has personal knowledge of a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.15 of the Revised Code may file a complaint with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed under penalty of perjury. (2) An official at a board of elections may file a complaint with the secretary of state, on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and signed under penalty of perjury, alleging a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.15 of the Revised Code. (3) The election integrity unit of the office of the secretary of state may initiate a complaint alleging a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Subject to division (F) of this section, the election integrity unit shall review each complaint filed with the secretary of state under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. If the complaint does not allege a violation of a provision of the Revised Code listed in division (A) of section 3517.15 of the Revised Code or, in the case of a complaint filed under division (A)(1) of this section, is not based on personal knowledge, the secretary of state shall dismiss the complaint. Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, a dismissal under this division is without prejudice. (2) After a complaint is dismissed under division (B)(1) of this section on the ground that the complaint is not based on personal knowledge, if the same person files another complaint alleging the same or a substantially similar violation and the complaint is not based on personal knowledge, the secretary of state shall dismiss the complaint with prejudice. (3) If the complaint is not dismissed under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, the election integrity unit shall investigate the complaint. (C) Subject to division (F) of this section, the election integrity unit shall draft a report to the secretary of state concerning each complaint filed under division (A) of this section that is not dismissed under division (B) of this section. The report shall recommend that the secretary of state make a particular finding and, if applicable, impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution, in accordance with section 3517.17 of the Revised Code. (D) The attorney election integrity unit may join two or more complaints if the attorney unit determines that the allegations in each complaint are of the same or similar character, are based on the same act or failure to act, or are based on two or more acts or failures to act constituting parts of a common scheme or plan. If one complaint contains two or more allegations, the attorney unit may separate the allegations if they are not of the same or similar character, if they are not based on the same act or failure to act, or if they are not based on two or more acts or failures to act constituting parts of a common scheme or plan. If the attorney unit separates the allegations in a complaint, the attorney unit may make separate recommendations under division (A)(2) or (3) (C) of this section for each allegation. (B) Whenever a person or other entity files a complaint with the commission setting forth a failure to comply with or a violation of a section of the Revised Code as described in division (A)(2)(c) of this section and the complaint is filed during one of the periods of time specified in division (B)(1) of section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, the person or entity may request an expedited hearing under that section at the time the complaint is filed. The attorney for the commission shall inform the members of the commission of that request at the time the attorney makes a recommendation under division (A) of this section. The commission may grant the request for an expedited hearing under this division if it determines that an expedited hearing is practicable.(E)(1) Upon receiving the recommendation of the election integrity unit under division (C) of this section, the secretary of state shall review the report and recommendation and shall do one of the following: (a) Refer the matter back to the unit for further investigation and a revised recommendation under division (C) of this section; (b) Make a finding in accordance with section 3517.17 of the Revised Code, and, if applicable, impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution. (2) The secretary of state shall serve notice of the secretary of state's decision under division (E)(1)(b) of this section on the person who is alleged to have committed the violation in accordance with section 119.05 of the Revised Code. (3) If, within fourteen days after service of the notice is complete under section 119.05 of the Revised Code, the person objects to the secretary of state's decision, the secretary of state shall not impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution, and immediately shall refer the matter to the Ohio election integrity commission for its determination under section 3517.17 of the Revised Code. (4) If the person does not object to the secretary of state's decision within fourteen days after receiving the notice, the secretary of state's decision is final and, if applicable, the secretary of state shall impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution as determined under division (E)(1)(b) of this section. (F)(1) If any of the following apply to a complaint, the secretary of state shall proceed under division (F)(2) of this section: (a) The secretary of state is a party to the complaint. (b) A candidate for an office for which the secretary of state is also a candidate is a party to the complaint or is otherwise involved in the complaint. (c) The complaint involves a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure made to advocate the election or defeat of the secretary of state or a candidate for an office for which the secretary of state is also a candidate. (d) The secretary of state determines that the secretary of state otherwise has a conflict of interest with respect to the complaint or that the secretary of state should proceed under division (F)(2) of this section to avoid any appearance of impropriety. (2) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of divisions (B) to (E) of this section, when division (F)(1) of this section applies to a complaint, the secretary of state shall request the attorney general to designate one or more persons to fulfill the duties of the election integrity unit described in divisions (B) to (D) of this section. The attorney general shall designate those persons and shall fulfill the duties of the secretary of state under divisions (B) to (D) of this section. Sec. 3517.155 3517.17. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this sectionUpon the referral of a matter for a hearing under division (E)(3) of section 3517.16 of the Revised Code, the Ohio elections election integrity commission shall hold its first hearing on a appoint an attorney in good standing before the supreme court of Ohio to review and hear the complaint filed in accordance with it, other than a complaint that receives an expedited hearing under section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, not later than ninety business days after the complaint is filed unless the commission has good cause to hold the hearing after that time, in which case it shall hold the hearing not later than one hundred eighty business days after the complaint is filedChapter 119. of the Revised Code. At the hearing, the commission The attorney shall draft a report and recommend that the commission make a finding and, if applicable, impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution, in accordance with division (B) of this section. (2) All hearings conducted by the attorney with respect to the matter, and all meetings of the commission with respect to the matter, shall be conducted in person, except that the person who is alleged to have committed the violation may choose for the person, the person's legal counsel, or both to appear at any hearing or meeting with respect to the matter by means of video conference. (3) Upon receiving the recommendation of the attorney under division (A)(1) of this section, the commission shall review the report and recommendation and shall do one of the following: (a) Refer the matter back to the attorney for further investigation and a revised recommendation under division (A)(1) of this section; (b) Make a finding in accordance with division (B) of this section and, if applicable, impose a fine or refer the matter for prosecution. (4) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(5) of this section, the commission shall act under division (A)(3)(b) of this section not later than one hundred eighty days after the matter is referred to the commission for a hearing under division (E)(3) of section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. (5) If the matter is referred to the commission for a hearing under division (E)(3) of section 3517.16 of the Revised Code less than one hundred eighty days before an election and the matter involves a candidate for nomination or election at the election or involves a ballot issue or question that appears on the ballot at the election, then if practicable, the commission shall act under division (A)(3)(b) of this section before the day of the election. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, the secretary of state or the commission, as applicable, shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence whether or not the failure to act or the a violation alleged in the a complaint has occurred and shall do only one of the following, except as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section or in division (B) of section 3517.151 of the Revised Code: (a) Enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose a fine or not to refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutorFind that no violation has occurred; (b) Impose Find that a violation has occurred and impose a fine under section 3517.993 3517.171 of the Revised Code; (c) Refer Find that a significant violation has occurred or that repeated violations have occurred and refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor;, as determined under division (C) of this section. (2) As used in In the case of a complaint that alleges a violation of division (A) or (B) of section 3517.21 or division (A) or (B) of section 3517.22 of the Revised Code, the secretary of state or the commission, as applicable, shall determine by clear and convincing evidence whether or not the violation has occurred and shall do only one of the following: (a) Find that no violation has occurred; (b) Find that a violation has occurred and refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor, as determined under division (C) of this section. (C) For purposes of division (A) (B) of this section, "the appropriate prosecutor" means is a prosecutor as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code and either of the following: (a) (1) In the case of a failure to comply with or a violation of law involving a campaign committee or the committee's candidate, a political party, a legislative campaign fund, a political action committee, or a political contributing entity, that is required to file a statement of contributions and expenditures with the secretary of state under division (A) of section 3517.11 of the Revised Code, the prosecutor of Franklin county; (b) (2) In the case of a failure to comply with or a violation of law involving any other campaign committee or committee's candidate, or any other political party, political action committee, or political contributing entity either person, one of the following as determined by the secretary of state or the commission, as applicable: (i) The prosecutor of Franklin county; (ii) The prosecutor of the county in which the candidacy or ballot question or issue, if applicable, is submitted to the electors or, if it is submitted in more than one county, the most populous of those counties; (iii) The prosecutor of the county in which the person resides. (B) If the commission decides that the evidence is insufficient for it to determine whether or not the failure to act or the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred, the commission, by the affirmative vote of five members, may request that an investigatory attorney investigate the complaint. Upon that request, an investigatory attorney shall make an investigation in order to produce sufficient evidence for the commission to decide the matter. If the commission requests an investigation under this division, for good cause shown by the investigatory attorney, the commission may extend by sixty days the deadline for holding its first hearing on the complaint as required in division (A) of this section. (C) The commission shall take one of the actions required under division (A) of this section not later than thirty days after the close of all the evidence presented. (D)(1) The commission shall make any finding of a failure to comply with or a violation of law in regard to a complaint that alleges a violation of division (A) or (B) of section 3517.21, or division (A) or (B) of section 3517.22 of the Revised Code by clear and convincing evidence. The commission shall make any finding of a failure to comply with or a violation of law in regard to any other complaint by a preponderance of the evidence. (2) If the commission finds a violation of division (B) of section 3517.21 or division (B) of section 3517.22 of the Revised Code, it shall refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor under division (A)(1)(c) of this section and shall not impose a fine under division (A)(1)(b) of this section or section 3517.993 of the Revised Code. (E) In an action before the commission or a panel of the commission, if (D) If the allegations of the complainant are not proved, and the secretary of state or the commission takes the action described in division (A)(1)(a) of this section or a panel of the commission takes the action described in division (C)(1) of section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, as applicable, determines that no violation has occurred, the secretary of state or the commission or a panel of the commission , as applicable, may find that the complaint is frivolous, and, if the commission or panel so finds, the commission shall order the complainant to pay reasonable attorney's fees and to pay the costs of the secretary of state or the commission or panel as determined by a majority of the members of the commission, as applicable. The costs paid to the commission or panel under this division shall be deposited into the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund. Sec. 3517.993 3517.171. This section authorizes the establishment of fines that may be imposed only with respect to acts or failures to act that occur on and after August 24, 1995. (A) (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(2) divisions (A)(2) and (D) of this section 3517.155 of the Revised Code, when section 3517.17 of the Revised Code authorizes the imposition of an administrative fine, the secretary of state or the Ohio elections election integrity commission , as applicable, may impose an administrative fines under division (A)(1)(b) of section 3517.155 of the Revised Code in accordance with the amounts set forth under sections 3517.992, 3599.03, and 3599.031 of the Revised Codefine for each violation that does not exceed the maximum fine a court could impose for the violation. (B) The commission may suspend all or part of a fine it imposes under this section upon whatever terms and conditions the commission considers just. (C)(1) (2) When section 3517.17 of the Revised Code authorizes the imposition of an administrative fine for a violation of a provision in sections 3501.35, 3599.13, 3599.14, or 3599.21, division (A) of section 3599.11, or division (A)(1) or (2) of section 3599.12 of the Revised Code, the secretary of state or the commission, as applicable, may impose an administrative fine of up to one thousand dollars for each violation. (B)(1) The secretary of state or the commission , as applicable, shall consider any of the following circumstances in determining whether to impose a maximum fine under division (A) of this section: (a) Whether the violator has been found guilty of any other violation of section 145.054, 742.043, 3307.073, 3309.073, or 5505.045 or Title XXXV of the Revised Code; (b) Whether the violation was made knowingly or purposely; (c) Whether any relevant statements, addenda, or affidavits required to be filed have not been filed; (d) Whether the violator has any outstanding fines imposed for a violation of section 145.054, 742.043, 3307.073, 3309.073, or 5505.045 or Title XXXV of the Revised Code; (e) Whether the violation occurred during the course of a campaign. (2) The secretary of state or the commission , as applicable, shall consider any of the following circumstances in determining whether to impose a minimal lesser fine or no fine under division (A) of this section: (a) Whether the violator previously has not been found guilty of any other violation of section 145.054, 742.043, 3307.073, 3309.073, or 5505.045 or Title XXXV of the Revised Code; (b) Whether the violator has promptly corrected the violator's violation; (c) Whether the nature and circumstances of the violation merit a minimum lesser fine; (d) Whether there are substantial grounds tending to excuse or justify the violation, although failing to establish a defense to the violation; (e) Whether the violation was not purposely committed. (3) The circumstances set forth in divisions (C)(1) (B)(1) and (2) of this section shall be considered by, but shall not control the decision of, the secretary of state or the commission , as applicable, in imposing a fine. (D) Notwithstanding divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section, when section 3517.17 of the Revised Code authorizes the imposition of an administrative fine with respect to an act or failure to act that occurred before the effective date of this section, the secretary of state or the commission, as applicable, shall impose the fine authorized under the Revised Code and, if applicable, under the rules of the Ohio elections commission, as they existed at the time of the violation. (E)(1) Fines imposed by the commission under this section shall be paid deposited into the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund created by section 111.29 of the Revised Code. (2) The secretary of state shall certify to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code the amount of any fine imposed by the secretary of state, by the Ohio election integrity commission, or by the Ohio elections commission under this section or under a former version of this section that is not paid within forty-five days after it is imposed. Sec. 3517.157 3517.18. (A) A complaint shall be filed with the Ohio elections commission secretary of state under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code within two years after the occurrence of the act or failure to act that is the subject of the complaint, except that if the act or failure to act involves fraud, concealment, or misrepresentation and was not discovered during that two-year period, a complaint may be filed within one year after discovery of such act or failure to act. (B) Whoever files a complaint with the commission secretary of state under section 3517.153 3517.16 of the Revised Code may withdraw it at the following times: (1) If the complaint receives an expedited hearing under section 3517.156 of the Revised Code, at any time prior to the hearing without the permission of the commission, or at any time after the hearing begins but only with the permission of the commission; (2) If the complaint does not receive an expedited hearing, at any time. (C) The commission may dismiss a complaint pending before it or before a panel of the commission. (D) The commission or a panel of the commission shall conduct hearings in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and the Rules of Civil Procedure, except as they are inconsistent with rules adopted by the commission. A party adversely affected by a final determination of the commission, including the secretary of state, may appeal from the determination under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. (E) The privilege granted to an attorney under section 2317.02 of the Revised Code shall be granted to the full-time attorney employed by the commission under division (H)(2) of section 3517.152 of the Revised Code, and the commission or a panel of the commission shall be considered the client of that attorney for purposes of that privilege. (F) (D) The members of the commission shall not do either of the following except at a meeting of the commission subject to section 121.22 of the Revised Code: (1) Discuss among themselves a complaint pending before the commission or a panel of the commission; (2) Discuss a complaint pending before the commission or a panel of the commission with a party to the complaint, an attorney representing a party to the complaint, or an investigatory attorney of the commission appointed to hear the complaint. Sec. 3517.20. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Political publication for or against a candidate" means a notice, placard, advertisement, sample ballot, brochure, flyer, direct mailer, or other form of general publication that is designed to promote the nomination, election, or defeat of a candidate. (2) "Political publication for or against an issue" means a notice, placard, advertisement, sample ballot, brochure, flyer, direct mailer, or other form of general publication that is designed to promote the adoption or defeat of a ballot issue or question or to influence the voters in an election. (3) "Public political advertising" means newspapers, magazines, outdoor advertising facilities, direct mailings, or other similar types of general public political advertising, or flyers, handbills, or other nonperiodical printed matter. (4) "Statewide candidate" has the same meaning as in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code. (5) "Legislative candidate" means a candidate for the office of member of the general assembly. (6) "Local candidate" means a candidate for an elective office of a political subdivision of this state. (7) "Legislative campaign fund" has the same meaning as in section 3517.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Limited political action committee" means a political action committee of fewer than ten members. (9) "Limited political contributing entity" means a political contributing entity of fewer than ten members. (10) "Designated amount" means one hundred dollars in the case of a local candidate or a local ballot issue, two hundred fifty dollars in the case of a legislative candidate, or five hundred dollars in the case of a statewide candidate or a statewide ballot issue. (11) "To issue" includes to print, post, distribute, reproduce for distribution, or cause to be issued, printed, posted, distributed, or reproduced for distribution. (12) "Telephone bank" means more than five hundred telephone calls of an identical or substantially similar nature within any thirty-day period, whether those telephone calls are made by individual callers or by recording. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, no entity shall do any of the following unless the name of the entity appears in a conspicuous place on or is contained or included within the publication, communication, or telephone call: (a) Issue a form of political publication in support of or opposition to a candidate or a ballot issue or question; (b) Make an expenditure for the purpose of financing political communications in support of or opposition to a candidate or a ballot issue or question through public political advertising; (c) Utter or cause to be uttered, over the broadcasting facilities of any radio or television station within this state, any communication in support of or opposition to a candidate or a ballot issue or question or any communication that is designed to influence the voters in an election; (d) Conduct a telephone bank for the purpose of supporting or opposing a candidate or a ballot issue or question or for the purpose of influencing the voters in an election. (2) A limited political action committee or limited political contributing entity may do any of the following without including its name in the publication or communication: (a) Issue a form of political publication in support of or opposition to a candidate or a ballot issue or question that does not cost in excess of the designated amount or that is not issued in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a campaign committee, a legislative campaign fund, a political party, a political action committee with ten or more members, a political contributing entity with ten or more members, or a limited political action committee or limited political contributing entity that spends in excess of the designated amount on a related or the same or similar political publication in support of or opposition to a candidate or a ballot issue or question; (b) Make an expenditure that is not in excess of the designated amount in support of or opposition to a candidate or a ballot issue or question or make an expenditure that is not made in cooperation, consultation, or concert with, or at the request or suggestion of, a candidate, a campaign committee, a legislative campaign fund, a political party, a political action committee with ten or more members, a political contributing entity with ten or more members, or a limited political action committee or limited political contributing entity that spends in excess of the designated amount in support of or opposition to the same candidate or a ballot issue or question, for the purpose of financing political communications in support of or opposition to that candidate or a ballot issue or question through public political advertising. (C) If more than one piece of printed matter or printed political communications are mailed as a single packet, the requirements of division (B) of this section are met if one of the pieces of printed matter or printed political communications in the packet contains the name of the organization or entity that issues or is responsible for the printed matter or other printed political communications. (D) This section does not apply to the transmittal of personal correspondence that is not reproduced by machine for general distribution. (E) The secretary of state, by rule, may exempt from the requirements of this section, printed matter and certain other kinds of printed communications such as campaign buttons, balloons, pencils, or similar items, the size or nature of which makes it unreasonable to add an identification or disclaimer. (F) The disclaimer or identification described in division (B) of this section, when paid for by a candidate, legislative campaign fund, or campaign committee, shall be identified by the words "paid for by" followed by the name of the entity. The identification or disclaimer may use reasonable abbreviations for common terms such as "committee." The disclaimer "paid political advertisement" is not sufficient to meet the requirements of this section. (G)(1) No person operating a broadcast station or an organ of printed media shall broadcast or print a paid political communication that does not contain the identification required by this section. (2) Division (B)(1)(c) of this section does not apply to any communications made on behalf of a radio or television station or network by any employee of such radio or television station or network while acting in the course of the employee's employment. (H)(1) No candidate or entity shall use or cause to be used a false, fictitious, or fraudulent name or address in the making or issuing of a publication or communication included within the provisions of this section. (2) No political action committee or political contributing entity shall use or cause to be used, in the making or issuing of a publication or communication included within the provisions of this section, a name or address that would lead a reasonable person to believe that the publication or communication is made by or on behalf of a county political party, unless the political action committee or political contributing committee entity has obtained a written statement, signed by the chairperson of the county political party's executive committee, granting the political action committee or political contributing entity permission to act on behalf of or represent the county political party. (I) Before a prosecution may commence under this section, a complaint shall be filed with the Ohio elections commission under section 3517.153 of the Revised Code. After the complaint is filed, the commission shall proceed in accordance with sections 3517.154 to 3517.157 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.21. (A) No person, during the course of any campaign for nomination or election to public office or office of a political party, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the outcome of such campaign do any of the following: (1) Serve, or place another person to serve, as an agent or employee in the election campaign organization of a candidate for the purpose of acting to impede the conduct of the candidate's campaign for nomination or election or of reporting information to the employee's employer or the agent's principal without the knowledge of the candidate or the candidate's organization; (2) Promise, offer, or give any valuable thing or valuable benefit to any person who is employed by or is an agent of a candidate or a candidate's election campaign organization for the purpose of influencing the employee or agent with respect to the improper discharge of the employee's or agent's campaign duties or to obtain information about the candidate or the candidate's campaign organization. (B) No person, during the course of any campaign for nomination or election to public office or office of a political party, by means of campaign materials, including sample ballots, an advertisement on radio or television or in a newspaper or periodical, a public speech, press release, or otherwise, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the outcome of such campaign do any of the following: (1) Use the title of an office not currently held by a candidate in a manner that implies that the candidate does currently hold that office or use the term "re-elect" when the candidate has never been elected at a primary, general, or special election to the office for which he or she is a candidate; (2) Make a false statement concerning the formal schooling or training completed or attempted by a candidate; a degree, diploma, certificate, scholarship, grant, award, prize, or honor received, earned, or held by a candidate; or the period of time during which a candidate attended any school, college, community technical school, or institution; (3) Make a false statement concerning the professional, occupational, or vocational licenses held by a candidate, or concerning any position the candidate held for which the candidate received a salary or wages; (4) Make a false statement that a candidate or public official has been indicted or convicted of a theft offense, extortion, or other crime involving financial corruption or moral turpitude; (5) Make a statement that a candidate has been indicted for any crime or has been the subject of a finding by the Ohio elections commission, the secretary of state, or the Ohio election integrity commission without disclosing the outcome of any legal proceedings resulting from the indictment or finding; (6) Make a false statement that a candidate or official has a record of treatment or confinement for mental disorder; (7) Make a false statement that a candidate or official has been subjected to military discipline for criminal misconduct or dishonorably discharged from the armed services; (8) Falsely identify the source of a statement, issue statements under the name of another person without authorization, or falsely state the endorsement of or opposition to a candidate by a person or publication; (9) Make a false statement concerning the voting record of a candidate or public official; (10) Post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise disseminate a false statement concerning a candidate, either knowing the same to be false or with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not, if the statement is designed to promote the election, nomination, or defeat of the candidate. As used in this section, "voting record" means the recorded "yes" or "no" vote on a bill, ordinance, resolution, motion, amendment, or confirmation. (C) Before a prosecution may commence under this section, a complaint shall be filed with the Ohio elections commission under section 3517.153 of the Revised Code. After the complaint is filed, the commission shall proceed in accordance with sections 3517.154 to 3517.157 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.22. (A) No person during the course of any campaign in advocacy of or in opposition to the adoption of any proposition or issue submitted to the voters shall knowingly and with intent to affect the outcome of such campaign do any of the following: (1) Serve, or place another person to serve, as an agent or employee in the election campaign organization of a committee which advocates or is in opposition to the adoption of any ballot proposition or issue for the purpose of acting to impede the conduct of the campaign on the proposition or issue or of reporting information to the employee's employer or the agent's principal without the knowledge of the committee; (2) Promise, offer, or give any valuable thing or valuable benefit to any person who is employed by or is an agent of a committee in advocacy of or in opposition to the adoption of any ballot proposition or issue, for the purpose of influencing the employee or agent with respect to the improper discharge of the employee's or agent's campaign duties or to obtain information about the committee's campaign organization. (B) No person, during the course of any campaign in advocacy of or in opposition to the adoption of any ballot proposition or issue, by means of campaign material, including sample ballots, an advertisement on radio or television or in a newspaper or periodical, a public speech, a press release, or otherwise, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the outcome of such campaign do any of the following: (1) Falsely identify the source of a statement, issue statements under the name of another person without authorization, or falsely state the endorsement of or opposition to a ballot proposition or issue by a person or publication; (2) Post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise disseminate, a false statement, either knowing the same to be false or acting with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not, that is designed to promote the adoption or defeat of any ballot proposition or issue. (C) Before a prosecution may commence under this section, a complaint shall be filed with the Ohio elections commission under section 3517.153 of the Revised Code. After the complaint is filed, the commission shall proceed in accordance with sections 3517.154 to 3517.157 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.23. The secretary of state shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are necessary for the administration and enforcement of sections 3517.08 to 3517.13, 3517.18, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3599.03, and 3599.031 of the Revised Code and shall provide each candidate, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, political party, and person making disbursements to pay the direct costs of producing or airing electioneering communications with written instructions and explanations in order to ensure compliance with sections 3517.08 to 3517.13, 3517.20 to 3517.22, 3599.03, and 3599.031 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3517.992 3517.99. This section establishes penalties only with respect to acts or failures to act that occur on and after August 24, 1995. Except as otherwise provided in section 3517.991 of the Revised Code: (A)(1) A candidate whose campaign committee violates division (A), (B), (C), (D), or (V) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code, or a treasurer of a campaign committee who violates any of those divisions, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of violation. (2) Whoever violates division (E) or (X)(5) of section 3517.13 or division (E)(1) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of violation. (B) An entity that violates division (G)(1) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of violation. (C) Whoever violates division (G)(2) of section 3517.101, division (G) of section 3517.13, or division (E)(2) or (3) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars or, if the offender is a person who was nominated or elected to public office, shall forfeit the nomination or the office to which the offender was elected, or both. (D) Whoever violates division (F) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than three times the amount contributed. (E) Whoever violates division (H) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars. (F) Whoever violates division (O), (P), or (Q) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (G) A state or county committee of a political party that violates division (B)(1) of section 3517.18 of the Revised Code as that section existed before its repeal by H.B. 166 of the 133rd general assembly shall be fined not more than twice the amount of the improper expenditure. (H) An entity that violates division (H) of section 3517.101 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than twice the amount of the improper expenditure or use. (I)(1) Any individual who violates division (B)(1) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code and knows that the contribution the individual makes violates that division shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2) Any political action committee that violates division (B)(2) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (3) Any campaign committee that violates division (B)(3) or (5) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (4)(a) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (B)(6) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division, as applicable. (b) Any state political party, county political party, or state candidate fund of a state political party or county political party that violates division (B)(6) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division, as applicable. (c) Any political contributing entity that violates division (B)(7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (5) Any political party that violates division (B)(4) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (6) Notwithstanding divisions (I)(1), (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this section, no violation of division (B) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code occurs, and the secretary of state shall not refer parties to the Ohio elections commission file a complaint under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code, if the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted by that division meets either of the following conditions: (a) It is completely refunded within five business days after it is accepted. (b) It is completely refunded on or before the tenth business day after notification to the recipient of the excess transfer or contribution by the board of elections or the secretary of state that a transfer or contribution in excess of the permitted amount has been received. (J)(1) Any campaign committee that violates division (C)(1), (2), (3), or (6) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2)(a) Any county political party that violates division (C)(4)(a)(ii) or (iii) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted. (b) Any county political party that violates division (C)(4)(a)(i) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount from its state candidate fund equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (c) Any state political party that violates division (C)(4)(b) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount from its state candidate fund equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (3) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (C)(5) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (4) Any political action committee or political contributing entity that violates division (C)(7) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (5) Notwithstanding divisions (J)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section, no violation of division (C) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code occurs, and the secretary of state shall not refer parties to the Ohio elections commission file a complaint under section 3517.16 of the Revised Code, if the amount transferred or contributed in excess of the amount permitted to be accepted by that division meets either of the following conditions: (a) It is completely refunded within five business days after its acceptance. (b) It is completely refunded on or before the tenth business day after notification to the recipient of the excess transfer or contribution by the board of elections or the secretary of state that a transfer or contribution in excess of the permitted amount has been received. (K)(1) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (F)(1) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall be fined twenty-five dollars for each day of violation. (2) Any legislative campaign fund that violates division (F)(2) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code shall give to the treasurer of state for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund all excess contributions not disposed of as required by division (E) of section 3517.102 of the Revised Code. (L) Whoever violates section 3517.105 of the Revised Code shall be fined one thousand dollars. (M)(1) Whoever solicits a contribution in violation of section 3517.092 or violates division (B) of section 3517.09 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) Whoever knowingly accepts a contribution in violation of division (B) or (C) of section 3517.092 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in violation of either of those divisions and shall return to the contributor any amount so accepted. Whoever unknowingly accepts a contribution in violation of division (B) or (C) of section 3517.092 of the Revised Code shall return to the contributor any amount so accepted. (N) Whoever violates division (S) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount of funds transferred or three times the value of the assets transferred in violation of that division. (O) Any campaign committee that accepts a contribution or contributions in violation of section 3517.108 of the Revised Code, uses a contribution in violation of that section, or fails to dispose of excess contributions in violation of that section shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted, used, or kept in violation of that section. (P) Any political party, state candidate fund, legislative candidate fund, or campaign committee that violates division (T) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed or accepted in violation of that section. (Q) A treasurer of a committee or another person who violates division (U) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than two hundred fifty dollars. (R) Whoever violates division (I) or (J) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars. Whenever a person is found guilty of violating division (I) or (J) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code, the contract awarded in violation of either of those divisions shall be rescinded if its terms have not yet been performed. (S) A candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a campaign committee who violates section 3517.081 of the Revised Code, and a candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a campaign committee or another person who violates division (C) of section 3517.10 of the Revised Code, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars. (T) A candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a committee who violates division (B) of section 3517.09 of the Revised Code, or a candidate whose campaign committee violates or a treasurer of a campaign committee or another person who violates division (C) of section 3517.09 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars. (U) Whoever violates section 3517.20 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars. (V) Whoever violates section 3517.21 or 3517.22 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for not more than six months or fined not more than five thousand dollars, or both. (W) A campaign committee that is required to file a declaration of no limits under division (D)(2) of section 3517.103 of the Revised Code that, before filing that declaration, accepts a contribution or contributions that exceed the limitations prescribed in section 3517.102 of the Revised Code, shall return that contribution or those contributions to the contributor. (X) Any campaign committee that fails to file the declaration of filing-day finances required by division (F) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code shall be fined twenty-five dollars for each day of violation. (Y)(1) (X)(1) Any campaign committee that fails to dispose of excess funds or excess aggregate contributions under division (B) of section 3517.109 of the Revised Code in the manner required by division (C) of that section shall give to the treasurer of state for deposit into the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund created under division (I) of section 3517.152 111.29 of the Revised Code all funds not disposed of pursuant to that division. (2) Any treasurer of a transition fund that fails to dispose of assets remaining in the transition fund as required under division (H)(1) or (2) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall give to the treasurer of state for deposit into the Ohio elections election integrity commission fund all assets not disposed of pursuant to that division. (Z) (Y) Any individual, campaign committee, political action committee, political contributing entity, legislative campaign fund, political party, treasurer of a transition fund, or other entity that violates any provision of sections 3517.09 to 3517.12 of the Revised Code for which no penalty is provided for under any other division of this section shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars. (AA)(1) (Z)(1) Whoever knowingly violates division (W)(1) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount contributed, expended, or promised in violation of that division or ten thousand dollars, whichever amount is greater. (2) Whoever knowingly violates division (W)(2) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount solicited or accepted in violation of that division or ten thousand dollars, whichever amount is greater. (BB) (AA) Whoever knowingly violates division (C) or (D) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars plus not more than one thousand dollars for each day of violation. (CC)(1) (BB)(1) Subject to division (CC)(2)(BB)(2) of this section, whoever violates division (H) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount up to three times the amount disbursed for the direct costs of airing the communication made in violation of that division. (2) Whoever has been ordered by the Ohio elections election integrity commission or by a court of competent jurisdiction to cease making communications in violation of division (H) of section 3517.1011 of the Revised Code who again violates that division shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount disbursed for the direct costs of airing the communication made in violation of that division. (DD)(1) (CC)(1) Any corporation or labor organization that violates division (X)(3)(a) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount given in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2) Any state or county political party that violates division (X)(3)(b) of section 3517.13 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (EE)(1) (DD)(1) Any campaign committee or person who violates division (C)(1)(b) or (c) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount donated in excess of the amount permitted by that division. (2) Any officeholder or treasurer of a transition fund who violates division (C)(3)(a) or (b) of section 3517.1014 of the Revised Code shall be fined an amount equal to three times the amount accepted in excess of the amount permitted by that division. Sec. 3517.991. A person who is convicted of a violation of this chapter or section 145.054, 742.043, 3307.073, 3309.073, 3599.03, 3599.031, or 5505.045 of the Revised Code shall be sentenced under the law as it existed at the time the violation occurred. Sec. 3701.021. (A) The director of health shall adopt, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, such rules as are necessary to carry out sections 3701.021 to 3701.0210 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, rules to establish the following: (1) Subject to division (D) of this section, medical and financial eligibility requirements for the program for children and youth with special health care needs; (2) Subject to division (C) of this section, eligibility requirements for providers who provide goods and services for the program for children and youth with special health care needs; (3) Procedures to be followed by the department of health in disqualifying providers for violating requirements adopted under division (A)(2) of this section; (4) Procedures to be used by the department regarding application for diagnostic services under division (B) of section 3701.023 of the Revised Code and payment for those services under division (E) of that section; (5) Standards for the provision of service coordination by the department of health and city and general health districts; (6) Procedures for the department to use to determine the amount to be paid annually by each county for services for children and youth with special health care needs and to allow counties to retain funds under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of section 3701.024 of the Revised Code; (7) Financial eligibility requirements for services for Ohio residents twenty-one years of age or older who have cystic fibrosis; (8) Criteria for payment of approved providers who provide goods and services for children and youth with special health care needs; (9) Criteria for the department to use in determining whether the payment of health insurance premiums of participants in the program for children and youth with special health care needs is cost-effective; (10) Procedures for appeal of denials of applications under divisions (A) and (D) of section 3701.023 of the Revised Code, disqualification of providers, and amounts paid for services; (11) Terms of appointment for members of the children and youth with special health care needs medical advisory council created in section 3701.025 of the Revised Code; (12) Eligibility requirements for the hemophilia program, including income and hardship requirements; (13) If a manufacturer discount program is established under division (J)(1) of section 3701.023 of the Revised Code, procedures for administering the program, including criteria and other requirements for participation in the program by manufacturers of drugs and nutritional formulas. (B) The department of health shall develop a manual of operational procedures and guidelines for the program for children and youth with special health care needs to implement sections 3701.021 to 3701.0210 of the Revised Code. (C) A medicaid provider, as defined in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code, is eligible to be a provider of the same goods and services for the program for children and youth with special health care needs that the provider is approved to provide for the medicaid program and the director shall approve such a provider for participation in the program for children and youth with special health care needs. (D) In establishing medical and financial eligibility requirements for the program for children and youth with special health care needs, the director of health shall not specify an age restriction that excludes from eligibility an individual who is either of the following: (1) Beginning on July 1, 2021, less than twenty-two years of age; (2) Beginning on July 1, 2022, less than twenty-three years of age; (3) Beginning on July 1, 2023, less than twenty-four years of age; (4) Beginning on July 1, 2024, less than twenty-five years of ageless than twenty-six years of age. Sec. 3701.033. (A) This section establishes the order of priority to be followed by the department of health when distributing funds for the purpose of providing family planning services, including funds the department receives through the "Maternal and Child Health Block Grant," Title V of the "Social Security Act," 95 Stat. 818 (1981), 42 U.S.C. 701, as amended, and funds the department receives through Title X of the "Public Health Service Act," 84 Stat. 1504 (1970), 42 U.S.C. 300a, as amended. This section does not apply to grants awarded by the department under section 3701.046 of the Revised Code. (B) With respect to each period during which funds from a particular source are distributed for the purpose of providing family planning services, the department is subject to both of the following when distributing the funds to applicants seeking those funds: (1) Foremost priority shall be given to public entities that are operated by state or local government entities and that provide or are able to provide family planning services. (2) If any funds remain after the department distributes funds to public entities under division (B)(1) of this section, the department may distribute funds to nonpublic entities. If funds are distributed to nonpublic entities, the department shall distribute the funds in the following order of descending priority: (a) Nonpublic entities that are federally qualified health centers or federally qualified health center look-alikes, both as defined in section 3701.047 of the Revised Code, or community action agencies, as defined in section 122.66 5101.311 of the Revised Code; (b) Nonpublic entities that provide comprehensive primary and preventive care services in addition to family planning services; (c) Nonpublic entities that provide family planning services, but do not provide comprehensive primary and preventive care services. Sec. 3701.045. (A) The department of health, in consultation with the children's trust fund board established under section 3109.15 of the Revised Code department of children and youth and any bodies acting as child fatality review boards on October 5, 2000, shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish a procedure for county or regional child fatality review boards to follow in conducting a review of the death of a child. The rules shall do all of the following: (1) Establish the format for the annual reports required by section 307.626 of the Revised Code; (2) Establish guidelines for a county or regional child fatality review board to follow in compiling statistics for annual reports so that the reports do not contain any information that would permit any person's identity to be ascertained from a report; (3) Establish guidelines for a county or regional child fatality review board to follow in creating and maintaining the comprehensive database of child deaths required by section 307.623 of the Revised Code, including provisions establishing uniform record-keeping procedures; (4) Establish guidelines for reporting child fatality review data to the department of health or a national child death review database, either of which must maintain the confidentiality of information that would permit a person's identity to be ascertained; (5) Establish guidelines, materials, and training to help educate members of county or regional child fatality review boards about the purpose of the review process and the confidentiality of the information described in section 307.629 of the Revised Code and to make them aware that such information is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (B) On or before the thirtieth day of September of each year, the department of health and the children's trust fund board department of children and youth jointly shall prepare and publish a report organizing and setting forth the data from the department of health child death review database or the national child death review database, data in all the reports provided by county or regional child fatality review boards in their annual reports for the previous calendar year, and recommendations for any changes to law and policy that might prevent future deaths. The department of health and the children's trust fund board department of children and youth jointly shall provide a copy of the report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the minority leaders of the house of representatives and the senate, each county or regional child fatality review board, and each county or regional family and children first council. Sec. 3701.511. None of the funds appropriated to administer the programs authorized by sections 3701.501 and 3701.502 of the Revised Code shall be used to counsel or refer for abortion, except in the case of a medical emergency. Sec. 3701.79. (A) As used in this section and in sections 3701.791 and 3701.792 of the Revised Code: (1) "Abortion" has the same meaning as in section 2919.11 of the Revised Code. (2) "Abortion report" means a form completed pursuant to division (C) of this section. (3) "Ambulatory surgical facility" has the same meaning as in section 3702.30 of the Revised Code. (4) "Department" means the department of health. (5) "Hospital" means any building, structure, institution, or place devoted primarily to the maintenance and operation of facilities for the diagnosis, treatment, and medical or surgical care for three or more unrelated individuals having illness, disease, injury, or deformity, and regularly making available at least clinical laboratory services, diagnostic x-ray services, treatment facilities for surgery or obstetrical care, or other definitive medical treatment. "Hospital" does not include a "home" as defined in section 3721.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Physician's office" means an office or portion of an office that is used to provide medical or surgical services to the physician's patients. "Physician's office" does not mean an ambulatory surgical facility, a hospital, or a hospital emergency department. (7) "Postabortion care" means care given after the uterus has been evacuated by abortion. (B) The department shall be responsible for collecting and collating abortion data reported to the department as required by this section. (C) The attending physician shall complete an individual abortion report for the abortion, by surgical procedure or by abortion-inducing drugs, of each zygote, blastocyte, embryo, or fetus the physician performs. The report shall be confidential and shall not contain the woman's name. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following, insofar as the patient makes the data available that is not within the physician's knowledge: (1) Patient number; (2) The name and address of the facility in which the abortion was performed, and whether the facility is a hospital, ambulatory surgical facility, physician's office, or other facility; (3) The date of the abortion; (4) If a surgical abortion, the method of final disposition of the fetal remains under Chapter 3726. of the Revised Code; (5) All of the following regarding the woman on whom the abortion was performed: (a) Zip State and zip code of residence; (b) Age; (c) Race; (d) Marital status; (e) Number of previous pregnancies; (f) Years of education; (g) Number of living children; (h) Number of zygotes, blastocytes, embryos, or fetuses previously aborted; (i) Date of last induced abortion; (j) Date of last live birth; (k) Method of contraception at the time of conception; (l) Date of the first day of the last menstrual period; (m) Medical condition at the time of the abortion; (n) Rh-type; (o) The number of weeks of gestation at the time of the abortion. (6) The type of abortion procedure performed; (7) Complications by type; (8) Written acknowledgment by the attending physician that the pregnant woman is not seeking the abortion, in whole or in part, because of any of the following: (a) A test result indicating Down syndrome in an unborn child; (b) A prenatal diagnosis of Down syndrome in an unborn child; (c) Any other reason to believe that an unborn child has Down syndrome. (9) Type of procedure performed after the abortion; (10) Type of family planning recommended; (11) Type of additional counseling given; (12) Signature of attending physician. (D) The physician who completed the abortion report under division (C) of this section shall submit the abortion report to the department within fifteen days after the woman is discharged. (E) The appropriate vital records report or certificate shall be made out after the twentieth week of gestation. (F) A copy of the abortion report shall be made part of the medical record of the patient of the facility in which the abortion was performed. (G) Each hospital shall file monthly and annual reports listing the total number of women who have undergone a post-twelve-week-gestation abortion and received postabortion care. The reports also shall include the total number of Ohio residents and the total number of non-Ohio residents who have undergone a post-twelve-week gestation abortion and received postabortion care. The annual report shall be filed following the conclusion of the state's fiscal year. Each report shall be filed within thirty days after the end of the applicable reporting period. (H) Each case in which a physician treats a post abortion complication shall be reported on a postabortion complication form. The report shall be made upon a form prescribed by the department, shall be signed by the attending physician, and shall be confidential. (I)(1) Not later than the first day of October March of each year, the department shall issue an annual report of the abortion data reported to the department for the previous calendar year as required by this section. The department shall develop a public electronic dashboard to publish on a monthly basis the abortion data reported to the department. The annual report and monthly dashboard update shall include at least the following information: (a) The total number of zygotes, blastocytes, embryos, or fetuses that were aborted; (b) The number of abortions performed on Ohio residents and the number performed on out-of-state residents, sorted by the age of the woman on whom the abortion was performed, using the following categories: under sixteen years of age, sixteen to seventeen years of age, eighteen to twenty-four years of age, twenty-five to twenty-nine years of age, thirty to thirty-four years of age, thirty-five to thirty-nine years of age, forty to forty-four years of age, forty-five years of age or older; (c) The number of abortions performed, sorted by each of the following: (i) The age of the woman on whom the abortion was performed, using the following categories: under fifteen sixteen years of age, fifteen sixteen to nineteen seventeen years of age, twenty eighteen to twenty-four years of age, twenty-five to twenty-nine years of age, thirty to thirty-four years of age, thirty-five to thirty-nine years of age, forty to forty-four years of age, forty-five years of age or older; (ii) The race and Hispanic ethnicity of the woman on whom the abortion was performed; (iii) The education level of the woman on whom the abortion was performed, using the following categories or their equivalents: less than ninth grade, ninth through twelfth grade, one or more years of college; (iv) The marital status of the woman on whom the abortion was performed; (v) The number of living children of the woman on whom the abortion was performed, using the following categories: none, one, or two or more; (vi) The number of weeks of gestation of the woman at the time the abortion was performed, using the following categories: less than nine weeks, nine to twelve weeks, thirteen to nineteen weeks, or twenty weeks or more; (vii) The county in which the abortion was performed; (viii) The type of abortion procedure performed; (ix) The number of zygotes, blastocytes, embryos, or fetuses previously aborted by the woman on whom the abortion was performed, sorted by the age of the woman on whom the abortion was performed, using the following categories: under sixteen years of age, sixteen to seventeen years of age, eighteen to twenty-four years of age, twenty-five to twenty-nine years of age, thirty to thirty-four years of age, thirty-five to thirty-nine years of age, forty to forty-four years of age, forty-five years of age or older; (x) The type of facility in which the abortion was performed; (xi) For Ohio residents, the county of residence of the woman on whom the abortion was performed; (xii) The total number of abortions performed on minors by each facility in the categories of under sixteen years of age and sixteen to seventeen years of age. (2) The report also shall indicate the number and type of the abortion complications reported to the department either on the abortion report required under division (C) of this section or the postabortion complication report required under division (H) of this section. (3) In addition to the annual report required under division (I)(1) of this section, the department shall make available, on request, the number of abortions performed by zip code of residence. (J) The director of health shall implement this section and shall apply to the court of common pleas for temporary or permanent injunctions restraining a violation or threatened violation of its requirements. This action is an additional remedy not dependent on the adequacy of the remedy at law. Sec. 3701.841. The tobacco use prevention fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money deposited by the treasurer of state into the fund from the liquidation, pursuant to Sub. H.B. 544 of the 127th general assembly, of the former tobacco use prevention and control endowment fund and any gifts, grants, or donations received by the director of health for the purposes of the tobacco use prevention fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The treasurer, in consultation with the director, may invest moneys in the fund in accordance with section 135.143 of the Revised Code. Moneys in the fund shall be used to pay outstanding expenses of the former tobacco use prevention and control foundation at the discretion of the director of health pursuant to Sub. H.B. 544 of the 127th general assembly and shall be used in accordance with section 3701.84 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3701.88. (A) As used in this section: "340B covered entity" means an entity described in section 340B(a)(4) of the "Public Health Service Act," 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4). "340B drug" means a covered outpatient drug that has been subject to discount pricing under the 340B drug pricing program and is purchased by a 340B covered entity. "340B drug pricing program" means the federal drug pricing program established under 42 U.S.C. 256b. "Charity care" means free or discounted health care items and services provided to an individual who meets the 340B covered entity's financial assistance criteria and is unable to pay for the items or services, as reported on the 340B covered entity's medicare cost report. "Contract pharmacy" means a retail pharmacy under contract with a 340B covered entity to provide 340B drugs to patients on behalf of that covered entity under the 340B drug discount program or contract pharmacy on behalf of the covered entity. "Low-income patient" means a patient with a household income below two hundred per cent of the federal poverty line. (B) Not later than July 1, 2026, and not later than the first day of July in each year thereafter, each 340B covered entity shall submit a report to the department of health. The report shall be submitted in the form and manner specified by the department, in consultation with any other agency the department of health determines appropriate. The report shall contain all of the following information, for the 340B covered entity and each offsite facility associated with it, from the previous calendar year: (1) All of the following data, delineated by patient payor type, including private insurance, medicare, medicaid, other third-party payor, uninsured, or self-pay: (a) The aggregate acquisition cost for all 340B drugs dispensed or administered by the covered entity, associated facility, or contract pharmacy; (b) The aggregate payments received from third-party payors, including insurers, for all 340B drugs dispensed or administered by the covered entity, associated facility, or contract pharmacy; (c) The total number of prescriptions dispensed or administered by the covered entity, associated facility, or contract pharmacy, and the percentage of that total number that were 340B drugs; (d) The percentage of patients served on a sliding fee scale for 340B drugs that were dispensed or administered at the covered entity, associated facility, or contract pharmacy. (2) The total operating cost of the covered entity, including an itemized cost report of all of the following: (a) Implementing a direct pass through of 340B profits to patients, in the form of lower cost-sharing for 340B drugs that are dispensed or administered by the covered entity, associated facility, or contracted pharmacy; (b) Implementing a sliding fee scale for low-income patients for 340B drugs that are dispensed or administered by the covered entity, associated facility, or contract pharmacy; (c) The covered entity's charity care costs. (3) In connection with administering and providing services under the 340B drug pricing program, the total payments made by the covered entity to contract pharmacies, third-party administrators, or any other party or entity. (4) Information regarding the covered entity's contract pharmacies, including all of the following: (a) The covered entity's total number of contract pharmacies; (b) The number of those contract pharmacies that are located outside of this state, including the state where each of those pharmacies are located; (c) The total number of the covered entity's prescriptions that were filled at a contract pharmacy, the percentage of that number that are contract pharmacies located outside of this state, and the percentage of all of the covered entity's prescriptions that were filled by contract pharmacies; (d) The total reimbursements paid by the covered entity to contract pharmacies or their affiliates for any 340B drugs dispensed or administered on behalf of the covered entity, and the percentage change in that amount compared to the previous year. (5) A detailed, itemized accounting of the covered entity's expenditures from 340B drug pricing program profits, including all programs, services, and equipment funded or purchased with those profits. (C) The department of health shall post the information in the reports required under this section on its public web site. Sec. 3704.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Administrator" means the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency or the chief executive of any successor federal agency responsible for implementation of the federal Clean Air Act. (B) "Air contaminant" means particulate matter, dust, fumes, gas, mist, radionuclides, smoke, vapor, or odorous substances, or any combination thereof, but does not mean emissions from agricultural production activities, as defined in section 929.01 of the Revised Code, that are consistent with generally accepted agricultural practices, were established prior to adjacent nonagricultural activities, have no substantial, adverse effect on the public health, safety, or welfare, do not result from the negligent or other improper operations of any such agricultural activities, and would not be required to obtain a Title V permit. For the purposes of this chapter, agricultural production activities do not include the installation and operation of off-farm facilities for the storage or processing of agricultural products, including, but not limited to, alfalfa dehydrating facilities, rendering plants, and feed and grain mills, elevators, and terminals. (C) "Air contaminant source" means each separate operation or activity that results or may result in the emission of any air contaminant. (D) "Air pollution" means the presence in the ambient air of one or more air contaminants or any combination thereof in sufficient quantity and of such characteristics and duration as is or threatens to be injurious to human health or welfare, plant or animal life, or property, or as unreasonably interferes with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property. (E) "Ambient air" means that portion of the atmosphere outside of buildings and other enclosures, stacks, or ducts that surrounds human, plant, or animal life or property. (F) "Best available technology" means any combination of work practices, raw material specifications, throughput limitations, source design characteristics, an evaluation of the annualized cost per ton of pollutant removed, and air pollution control devices that have been previously demonstrated to the director of environmental protection to operate satisfactorily in this state or other states with similar air quality on substantially similar air pollution sources. (G) "Change within a permitted facility" means, within the context of the Title V permit program established under section 3704.036 of the Revised Code, a change that is limited by a federally enforceable provision of an applicable Title V permit and that does not include physical, production, or other changes that are neither addressed nor limited by the federally enforceable portion of a Title V permit unless the change would result in a violation of a federally enforceable requirement or a modification under Title I of the federal Clean Air Act or would be subject to any requirements under Title IV of that act. (H) "Community air monitoring" means any measurement or quantification of ambient air concentrations of an air contaminant, including both one-time monitoring events and multi-sampling events. "Community air monitoring" does not include any of the following: (1) Monitoring conducted using monitoring devices identified in the most recent approved version of the United States environmental protection agency's document entitled "List of Designated Reference and Equivalent Methods"; (2) Monitoring conducted using monitoring devices identified in the most recent approved version of the United State environmental protection agency's document entitled "Air Monitoring Network Plan" that are installed and operated in accordance with 40 C.F.R. 58 by the environmental protection agency or by a local air pollution control authority under the terms of a delegation agreement entered into under section 3704.111 of the Revised Code; (3) Any measurement or quantification of ambient air concentrations of an air contaminant that is specifically identified or described in and either required or allowed to be used for the particular air contaminant source or source category for which it is being used under any of the following: (a) The federal Clean Air Act; (b) Any implementation plan promulgated or approved before the effective date of this amendment; (c) Any permit, variance, or order issued before the effective date of this amendment or any renewal thereof after the effective date of this amendment; (d) Any other permit, variance, or order issued on or after the effective date of this amendment, if the use of the measurement system, testing equipment, tool, or process was proposed, requested, or voluntarily accepted by the air contaminant source or sources subject to that permit, variance, or order. (4) Any monitoring system installed and used by the environmental protection agency or by a local air pollution control authority under the terms of a delegation agreement entered into under section 3704.111 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (a) A monitoring system used to measure polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) in ambient air or precipitation, using a technique approved for that purpose by the United States environmental protection agency; (b) A monitoring system used to measure contaminants identified by the American conference of governmental industrial hygienists using methodologies consistent with the procedures identified under method guidelines 1 and 2 of the United States occupational safety and health administration; (c) A monitoring system used to investigate and respond to any accidents, spills, or releases under the authority of any emergency response program developed and implemented under Chapter 3750. of the Revised Code or Chapter 3745-104 of the Administrative Code; (d) A monitoring system used to investigate any release that exceeds the reporting quantities under 40 C.F.R. 302; (e) A monitoring system used to measure any of the compounds identified under section 112(b) of the federal Clean Air Act or Chapter 3745-114 of the Administrative Code; (f) A monitoring system used under the national atmospheric deposition program; (g) A monitoring system used to measure contaminants consistent with the "National Emission Standards for Hazardous Air Pollutants from Petroleum Refineries," 40 C.F.R. 63, Subpart CC. (I) "Emit" or "emission" means the release into the ambient air of an air contaminant. (I)(J) "Emission limitation" and "emission standard" mean a requirement that limits the quantity, rate, or concentration of emissions of air contaminants, including any requirement relating to the operation or maintenance of an air contaminant source. (J)(K) "Facility," for the purposes of the Title V permit program established under section 3704.036 of the Revised Code, means all of the emitting activities that are located on contiguous or adjacent properties that are under the control of the same person or persons or are under common control and that are in the same major group as described in the standard Industrial Classification Manual, 1987. (K)(L) "Federal Clean Air Act" means "Air Quality Act of 1967," 81 Stat. 485, 42 U.S.C. 1857, as amended by "Clean Air Act Amendments of 1970," 84 Stat. 1676, 42 U.S.C. 1857, "Act of November 18, 1971," 85 Stat. 464, 42 U.S.C. 1857, "Act of April 9, 1973," 87 Stat. 11, 42 U.S.C. 1857, "Act of June 24, 1974," 88 Stat. 248, 42 U.S.C. 1857, "Clean Air Act Amendments of 1977," 91 Stat. 685, 42 U.S.C. 7401, "Safe Drinking Water Act Amendments of 1977," 91 Stat. 1393, 42 U.S.C. 7401, "Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990," 104 Stat. 2399, 42 U.S.C.A. 7401, and any other amendments that have been or may hereafter be adopted, or any supplements to those acts and laws of the United States that have been or may hereafter be enacted in substitution therefor, together with any regulations that have been or may hereafter be adopted by the administrator by virtue of and in accordance with those acts and laws. Reference to a particular title or section of the federal Clean Air Act includes any amendments that have been or may hereafter be enacted in substitution therefor and any regulations pertaining to the title or section that have been or may hereafter be adopted by the administrator by virtue of and in accordance with the federal Clean Air Act. (L)(M) "Hazardous air pollutant" means any pollutant listed under section 112(b) of the federal Clean Air Act. (M)(N) "Implementation plan" means a program for the prevention and abatement of air pollution in the state that has been promulgated or approved by the administrator pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act. (N)(O) "Local air pollution control authority" includes all of the following unless terminated by the political subdivisions represented thereby: (1) All of the following agencies representing the following political subdivisions, as those agencies existed on July 1, 1993: (a) The Akron regional air quality management district representing Medina, Summit, and Portage counties; (b) The Canton city health department representing Stark county; (c) The Hamilton county department of environmental services, southwest Ohio air quality agency representing Butler, Warren, Hamilton, and Clermont counties; (d) The city of Cleveland division of the environment representing Cuyahoga county; (e) The regional air pollution control agency representing Darke, Preble, Miami, Montgomery, Clark, and Greene counties; (f) The Lake county general health district representing Lake and Geauga counties; (g) The Portsmouth city health department representing Brown, Adams, Scioto, and Lawrence counties; (h) The city of Toledo division of pollution control representing Lucas county and the city of Rossford in Wood county. (2) Any successor to an existing local air pollution control authority listed in divisions (N)(1)(a) to (i)division (O)(1) of this section that results from a change in the political subdivisions comprising the local air pollution control authority through the withdrawal of a political subdivision from membership in the local air pollution control authority or the inclusion of an additional political subdivision in the membership of the local air pollution control authority; (3) Any new local air pollution control authority established on or after July 1, 1993, by one or more political subdivisions of this state for the purposes of exercising the powers reserved to political subdivisions of this state under division (A) of section 3704.11 of the Revised Code. (O)(P) "Person" means the federal government or any agency thereof, the state or any agency thereof, any political subdivision or any agency thereof, or any public or private corporation, individual, partnership, or other entity. (P)(Q) "Research and development sources" means sources whose activities are conducted for nonprofit scientific or educational purposes; sources whose activities are conducted to test more efficient production processes or methods for preventing or reducing adverse environmental impacts, provided that the activities do not include the production of an intermediate or final product for sale or exchange for commercial profit, except in a de minimis manner; a research or laboratory source the primary purpose of which is to conduct research and development into new processes and products, that is operated under the close supervision of technically trained personnel, and that is not engaged in the manufacture of products for sale or exchange for commercial profit, except in a de minimis manner; the temporary use of normal production sources in a research and development mode to test the technical or commercial viability of alternative raw materials or production processes, provided that the use does not include the production of an intermediate or final product for sale or exchange for commercial profit, except in a de minimis manner; the experimental firing of any fuel or combination of fuels in a boiler, heater, furnace, or dryer for the purpose of conducting research and development of more efficient combustion or more effective prevention or control of air pollutant emissions, provided that, during those periods of research and development, the heat generated is not used for normal production purposes or for producing a product for sale or exchange for commercial profit, except in a de minimis manner; and such other similar sources as the director may prescribe by rule. (Q)(R) "Responsible official" means one of the following, as applicable: (1) For a corporation: a president, secretary, treasurer, or vice-president of the corporation in charge of a principal business function, any other person who performs similar policy or decision-making functions for the corporation, or a duly authorized representative of any such person if the representative is responsible for the overall operation of one or more manufacturing, production, or operating facilities applying for or subject to a Title V permit and if one of the following applies: (a) The facilities employ more than two hundred fifty individuals or have gross annual sales or expenditures exceeding twenty-five million dollars, in second quarter 1980 dollars; (b) The delegation of authority to the representative is approved in advance by the director. (2) For a partnership or sole proprietorship: a general partner or the proprietor, respectively. (3) For the federal government or any agency thereof, the state or any agency thereof, a political subdivision or any agency thereof, or any other public agency, either a principal executive officer or authorized elected official. For the purposes of this division, a principal executive officer of a federal agency includes the chief executive officer having responsibility for the overall operation of a principal geographic unit of the agency. (4) For affected sources, both of the following: (a) The designated representative insofar as actions, standards, requirements, or prohibitions under Title IV of the federal Clean Air Act or regulations adopted under it are concerned; (b) The designated representative for any other purposes under 40 C.F.R. part 70. (R)(S) "Small business stationary source" means any building, structure, facility, or installation that emits any federally regulated air pollutant and is owned or operated by a person who employs one hundred or fewer individuals; is a small business concern as defined in the "Small Business Act," 72 Stat. 384 (1958), 15 U.S.C.A. 632, as amended; is not a major stationary source as defined in section 302(j) of the federal Clean Air Act; does not emit fifty tons or more per year of any federally regulated air pollutant or any hazardous air pollutant; and emits less than seventy-five tons per year of all federally regulated air pollutants. (S)(T) "Title V permit" means an operating permit required to be issued by the state under section 502 of the federal Clean Air Act and issued under section 3704.036 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. (T)(U) For the purposes of the Title V permit program established under this chapter and rules adopted under it, all terms defined in 40 C.F.R. part 70 have the same meaning as in that part. Sec. 3704.03. The director of environmental protection may do any of the following: (A) Develop programs for the prevention, control, and abatement of air pollution; (B) Advise, consult, contract, and cooperate with any governmental or private agency in the furtherance of the purposes of this chapter; (C) Encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, and research relating to air pollution, collect and disseminate information, and conduct education and training programs relating to the causes, prevention, control, and abatement of air pollution; (D) Adopt, modify, and rescind rules prescribing ambient air quality standards for the state as a whole or for various areas of the state that are consistent with and no more stringent than the national ambient air quality standards in effect under the federal Clean Air Act; (E) Adopt, modify, suspend, and rescind rules for the prevention, control, and abatement of air pollution, including rules prescribing for the state as a whole or for various areas of the state emission standards for air contaminants, and other necessary rules for the purpose of achieving and maintaining compliance with ambient air quality standards in all areas within the state as expeditiously as practicable, but not later than any deadlines applicable under the federal Clean Air Act; rules for the prevention or control of the emission of hazardous or toxic air contaminants; rules prescribing fugitive dust limitations and standards that are related, on an areawide basis, to attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality standards; rules prescribing shade, density, or opacity limitations and standards for emissions, provided that with regard to air contaminant sources for which there are particulate matter emission standards in addition to a shade, density, or opacity rule, upon demonstration by such a source of compliance with those other standards, the shade, density, or opacity rule shall provide for establishment of a shade, density, or opacity limitation for that source that does not require the source to reduce emissions below the level specified by those other standards; rules for the prevention or control of odors and air pollution nuisances; rules that prevent significant deterioration of air quality to the extent required by the federal Clean Air Act; rules for the protection of visibility as required by the federal Clean Air Act; and rules prescribing open burning limitations and standards. In adopting, modifying, suspending, or rescinding any such rules, the director, to the extent consistent with the federal Clean Air Act, shall hear and give consideration to evidence relating to all of the following: (1) Conditions calculated to result from compliance with the rules, the overall cost within this state of compliance with the rules, and their relation to benefits to the people of the state to be derived from that compliance; (2) The quantity and characteristics of air contaminants, the frequency and duration of their presence in the ambient air, and the dispersion and dilution of those contaminants; (3) Topography, prevailing wind directions and velocities, physical conditions, and other factors that may or may combine to affect air pollution. Consistent with division (K) of section 3704.036 of the Revised Code, the director shall consider alternative emission limits proposed by the owner or operator of an air contaminant source that is subject to an emission limit established in rules adopted under this division and shall accept those alternative emission limits that the director determines to be equivalent to emission limits established in rules adopted under this division. (F)(1) Adopt, modify, suspend, and rescind rules consistent with the purposes of this chapter prohibiting the location, installation, construction, or modification of any air contaminant source or any machine, equipment, device, apparatus, or physical facility intended primarily to prevent or control the emission of air contaminants unless an installation permit therefor has been obtained from the director or the director's authorized representative. (2)(a) Applications for installation permits shall be accompanied by plans, specifications, construction schedules, and such other pertinent information and data, including data on ambient air quality impact and a demonstration of best available technology, as the director may require. Installation permits shall be issued for a period specified by the director and are transferable. The director shall specify in each permit the applicable emission standards and that the permit is conditioned upon payment of the applicable fees as required by section 3745.11 of the Revised Code and upon the right of the director's authorized representatives to enter upon the premises of the person to whom the permit has been issued, at any reasonable time and subject to safety requirements of the person in control of the premises, for the purpose of determining compliance with such standards, this chapter, the rules adopted thereunder, and the conditions of any permit, variance, or order issued thereunder. Each proposed new or modified air contaminant source shall provide such notice of its proposed installation or modification to other states as is required under the federal Clean Air Act. Installation permits shall include the authorization to operate sources installed and operated in accordance with terms and conditions of the installation permits for a period not to exceed one year from commencement of operation, which authorization shall constitute an operating permit under division (G) of this section and rules adopted under it. No installation permit shall be required for activities that are subject to and in compliance with a plant-wide applicability limit issued by the director in accordance with rules adopted under this section. No installation permit shall be issued except in accordance with all requirements of this chapter and rules adopted thereunder. No application shall be denied or permit revoked or modified without a written order stating the findings upon which denial, revocation, or modification is based. A copy of the order shall be sent to the applicant or permit holder by certified mail. (b) An air contaminant source that is the subject of an installation permit shall be installed or modified in accordance with the permit not later than eighteen months after the permit's effective date at which point the permit shall terminate unless one of the following applies: (i) The owner or operator has undertaken a continuing program of installation or modification during the eighteen-month period. (ii) The owner or operator has entered into a binding contractual obligation to undertake and complete within a reasonable period of time a continuing program of installation or modification of the air contaminant source during the eighteen-month period. (iii) The director has extended the date by which the air contaminant source that is the subject of the installation permit must be installed or modified. (iv) The installation permit is the subject of an appeal by a party other than the owner or operator of the air contaminant source that is the subject of the installation permit, in which case the date of termination of the permit is not later than eighteen months after the effective date of the permit plus the number of days between the date in which the permit was appealed and the date on which all appeals concerning the permit have been resolved. (v) The installation permit has been superseded by a subsequent installation permit, in which case the original installation permit terminates on the effective date of the superseding installation permit. Division (F)(2)(b) of this section applies to an installation permit that has not terminated as of October 16, 2009. The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the purpose of establishing additional requirements that are necessary for the implementation of division (F)(2)(b) of this section. (3) Not later than two years after August 3, 2006, the director shall adopt a rule in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code specifying that a permit to install is required only for new or modified air contaminant sources that emit any of the following air contaminants: (a) An air contaminant or precursor of an air contaminant for which a national ambient air quality standard has been adopted under the federal Clean Air Act; (b) An air contaminant for which the air contaminant source is regulated under the federal Clean Air Act; (c) An air contaminant that presents, or may present, through inhalation or other routes of exposure, a threat of adverse human health effects, including, but not limited to, substances that are known to be, or may reasonably be anticipated to be, carcinogenic, mutagenic, teratogenic, or neurotoxic, that cause reproductive dysfunction, or that are acutely or chronically toxic, or a threat of adverse environmental effects whether through ambient concentrations, bioaccumulation, deposition, or otherwise, and that is identified in the rule by chemical name and chemical abstract service number. The director may modify the rule adopted under division (F)(3)(c) of this section for the purpose of adding or deleting air contaminants. For each air contaminant that is contained in or deleted from the rule adopted under division (F)(3)(c) of this section, the director shall include in a notice accompanying any proposed or final rule an explanation of the director's determination that the air contaminant meets the criteria established in that division and should be added to, or no longer meets the criteria and should be deleted from, the list of air contaminants. The explanation shall include an identification of the scientific evidence on which the director relied in making the determination. Until adoption of the rule under division (F)(3)(c) of this section, nothing shall affect the director's authority to issue, deny, modify, or revoke permits to install under this chapter and rules adopted under it. (4)(a) Applications for permits to install new or modified air contaminant sources shall contain sufficient information regarding air contaminants for which the director may require a permit to install to determine conformity with the environmental protection agency's document entitled "Review of New Sources of Air Toxics Emissions, Option A," dated May 1986, which the director shall use to evaluate toxic emissions from new or modified air contaminant sources. The director shall make copies of the document available to the public upon request at no cost and post the document on the environmental protection agency's web site. Any inconsistency between the document and division (F)(4) of this section shall be resolved in favor of division (F)(4) of this section. (b) The maximum acceptable ground level concentration of an air contaminant shall be calculated in accordance with the document entitled "Review of New Sources of Air Toxics Emissions, Option A." Modeling shall be conducted to determine the increase in the ground level concentration of an air contaminant beyond the facility's boundary caused by the emissions from a new or modified source that is the subject of an application for a permit to install. Modeling shall be based on the maximum hourly rate of emissions from the source using information including, but not limited to, any emission control devices or methods, operational restrictions, stack parameters, and emission dispersion devices or methods that may affect ground level concentrations, either individually or in combination. The director shall determine whether the activities for which a permit to install is sought will cause an increase in the ground level concentration of one or more relevant air contaminants beyond the facility's boundary by an amount in excess of the maximum acceptable ground level concentration. In making the determination as to whether the maximum acceptable ground level concentration will be exceeded, the director shall give consideration to the modeling conducted under division (F)(4)(b) of this section and other relevant information submitted by the applicant. (c) If the modeling conducted under division (F)(4)(b) of this section with respect to an application for a permit to install demonstrates that the maximum ground level concentration from a new or modified source will be greater than or equal to eighty per cent, but less than one hundred per cent of the maximum acceptable ground level concentration for an air contaminant, the director may establish terms and conditions in the permit to install for the air contaminant source that will require the owner or operator of the air contaminant source to maintain emissions of that air contaminant commensurate with the modeled level, which shall be expressed as allowable emissions per day. In order to calculate the allowable emissions per day, the director shall multiply the hourly emission rate modeled under division (F)(4)(b) of this section to determine the ground level concentration by the operating schedule that has been identified in the permit to install application. Terms and conditions imposed under division (F)(4)(c) of this section are not federally enforceable requirements and, if included in a Title V permit, shall be placed in the portion of the permit that is only enforceable by the state. (d) If the modeling conducted under division (F)(4)(b) of this section with respect to an application for a permit to install demonstrates that the maximum ground level concentration from a new or modified source will be less than eighty per cent of the maximum acceptable ground level concentration, the owner or operator of the source annually shall report to the director, on a form prescribed by the director, whether operations of the source are consistent with the information regarding the operations that was used to conduct the modeling with regard to the permit to install application. The annual report to the director shall be in lieu of an emission limit or other permit terms and conditions imposed pursuant to division (F)(4) of this section. The director may consider any significant departure from the operations of the source described in the permit to install application that results in greater emissions than the emissions rate modeled to determine the ground level concentration as a modification and require the owner or operator to submit a permit to install application for the increased emissions. The requirements established in division (F)(4)(d) of this section are not federally enforceable requirements and, if included in a Title V permit, shall be placed in the portion of the permit that is only enforceable by the state. (e) Division (F)(4) of this section and the document entitled "Review of New Sources of Air Toxics Emissions, Option A" shall not be included in the state implementation plan under section 110 of the federal Clean Air Act and do not apply to an air contaminant source that is subject to a maximum achievable control technology standard or residual risk standard under section 112 of the federal Clean Air Act, to a particular air contaminant identified under 40 C.F.R. 51.166, division (b)(23), for which the director has determined that the owner or operator of the source is required to install best available control technology for that particular air contaminant, or to a particular air contaminant for which the director has determined that the source is required to meet the lowest achievable emission rate, as defined in 40 C.F.R. part 51, Appendix S, for that particular air contaminant. (f)(i) Division (F)(4) of this section and the document entitled "Review of New Sources of Air Toxics Emissions, Option A" do not apply to parking lots, storage piles, storage tanks, transfer operations, grain silos, grain dryers, emergency generators, gasoline dispensing operations, air contaminant sources that emit air contaminants solely from the combustion of fossil fuels, or the emission of wood dust, sand, glass dust, coal dust, silica, and grain dust. (ii) Notwithstanding division (F)(4)(f)(i) of this section, the director may require an individual air contaminant source that is within one of the source categories identified in division (F)(4)(f)(i) of this section to submit information in an application for a permit to install a new or modified source in order to determine the source's conformity to the document if the director has information to conclude that the particular new or modified source will potentially cause an increase in ground level concentration beyond the facility's boundary that exceeds the maximum acceptable ground level concentration as set forth in the document. (iii) The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are consistent with the purposes of this chapter and that add to or delete from the source category exemptions established in division (F)(4)(f)(i) of this section. (5) Not later than one year after August 3, 2006, the director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code specifying activities that do not, by themselves, constitute beginning actual construction activities related to the installation or modification of an air contaminant source for which a permit to install is required such as the grading and clearing of land, on-site storage of portable parts and equipment, and the construction of foundations or buildings that do not themselves emit air contaminants. The rules also shall allow specified initial activities that are part of the installation or modification of an air contaminant source, such as the installation of electrical and other utilities for the source, prior to issuance of a permit to install, provided that the owner or operator of the source has filed a complete application for a permit to install, the director or the director's designee has determined that the application is complete, and the owner or operator of the source has notified the director that this activity will be undertaken prior to the issuance of a permit to install. Any activity that is undertaken by the source under those rules shall be at the risk of the owner or operator. The rules shall not apply to activities that are precluded prior to permit issuance under section 111, section 112, Part C of Title I, and Part D of Title I of the federal Clean Air Act. (G) Adopt, modify, suspend, and rescind rules prohibiting the operation or other use of any new, modified, or existing air contaminant source unless an operating permit has been obtained from the director or the director's authorized representative, or the air contaminant source is being operated in compliance with the conditions of a variance issued pursuant to division (H) of this section. Applications for operating permits shall be accompanied by such plans, specifications, and other pertinent information as the director may require. Operating permits may be issued for a period determined by the director not to exceed ten years, are renewable, and are transferable. The director shall specify in each operating permit that the permit is conditioned upon payment of the applicable fees as required by section 3745.11 of the Revised Code and upon the right of the director's authorized representatives to enter upon the premises of the person to whom the permit has been issued, at any reasonable time and subject to safety requirements of the person in control of the premises, for the purpose of determining compliance with this chapter, the rules adopted thereunder, and the conditions of any permit, variance, or order issued thereunder. Operating permits may be denied or revoked for failure to comply with this chapter or the rules adopted thereunder. An operating permit shall be issued only upon a showing satisfactory to the director or the director's representative that the air contaminant source is being operated in compliance with applicable emission standards and other rules or upon submission of a schedule of compliance satisfactory to the director for a source that is not in compliance with all applicable requirements at the time of permit issuance, provided that the compliance schedule shall be consistent with and at least as stringent as that contained in any judicial consent decree or administrative order to which the air contaminant source is subject. The rules shall provide for the issuance of conditional operating permits for such reasonable periods as the director may determine to allow the holder of an installation permit, who has constructed, installed, located, or modified a new air contaminant source in accordance with the provisions of an installation permit, to make adjustments or modifications necessary to enable the new air contaminant source to comply with applicable emission standards and other rules. Terms and conditions of operating permits issued pursuant to this division shall be federally enforceable for the purpose of establishing the potential to emit of a stationary source and shall be expressly designated as federally enforceable. Any such federally enforceable restrictions on a source's potential to emit shall include both an annual limit and a short-term limit of not more than thirty days for each pollutant to be restricted together with adequate methods for establishing compliance with the restrictions. In other respects, operating permits issued pursuant to this division are enforceable as state law only. No application shall be denied or permit revoked or modified without a written order stating the findings upon which denial, revocation, or modification is based. A copy of the order shall be sent to the applicant or permit holder by certified mail. (H) Adopt, modify, and rescind rules governing the issuance, revocation, modification, or denial of variances that authorize emissions in excess of the applicable emission standards. No variance shall be issued except pursuant to those rules. The rules shall prescribe conditions and criteria in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter and consistent with the federal Clean Air Act governing eligibility for issuance of variances, which shall include all of the following: (1) Provisions requiring consistency of emissions authorized by a variance with timely attainment and maintenance of ambient air quality standards; (2) Provisions prescribing the classes and categories of air contaminants and air contaminant sources for which variances may be issued; (3) Provisions defining the circumstances under which an applicant shall demonstrate that compliance with applicable emission standards is technically infeasible, economically unreasonable, or impossible because of conditions beyond the control of the applicant; (4) Other provisions prescribed in furtherance of the goals of this chapter. The rules shall prohibit the issuance of variances from any emission limitation that was applicable to a source pursuant to an installation permit and shall prohibit issuance of variances that conflict with the federal Clean Air Act. Applications for variances shall be accompanied by such information as the director may require. In issuing variances, the director may order the person to whom a variance is issued to furnish plans and specifications and such other information and data, including interim reports, as the director may require and to proceed to take such action within such time as the director may determine to be appropriate and reasonable to prevent, control, or abate the person's existing emissions of air contaminants. The director shall specify in each variance that the variance is conditioned upon payment of the applicable fees as required by section 3745.11 of the Revised Code and upon the right of the director's authorized representatives to enter upon the premises of the person to whom the variance has been issued, at any reasonable time and subject to safety requirements of the person in control of the premises, for the purpose of determining compliance with this chapter, the rules adopted thereunder, and the conditions of any permit, variance, or order issued thereunder. The director may hold a public hearing on an application for a variance or renewal thereof at a location in the county where the variance is sought. The director shall give not less than twenty days' notice of the hearing to the applicant by certified mail or another type of mail accompanied by a receipt. The director also shall cause at least one publication of notice in a newspaper with general circulation in the county where the variance is sought or may instead provide public notice by publication on the environmental protection agency's web site. The director shall keep available for public inspection at the principal office of the environmental protection agency a current schedule of pending applications for variances and a current schedule of pending variance hearings. The director shall make a complete stenographic record or electronic record of testimony and other evidence submitted at the hearing. The director shall make a written determination to issue, renew, or deny the variance and shall enter the determination and the basis therefor into the record of the hearing. The director shall issue, renew, or deny an application for a variance or renewal thereof, or issue a proposed action upon the application pursuant to section 3745.07 of the Revised Code, within six months of the date upon which the director receives a complete application with all pertinent information and data required by the director. Any variance granted pursuant to rules adopted under this division shall be for a period specified by the director, not to exceed three years, and may be renewed from time to time on such terms and for such periods, not to exceed three years each, as the director determines to be appropriate. A variance may be revoked, or renewal denied, for failure to comply with conditions specified in the variance. No variance shall be issued, denied, revoked, or modified without a written order stating the findings upon which the issuance, denial, revocation, or modification is based. A copy of the order shall be sent to the applicant or variance holder by certified mail. (I) Require the owner or operator of an air contaminant source to install, employ, maintain, and operate such emissions, ambient air quality, meteorological, or other monitoring devices or methods as the director shall prescribe; to sample those emissions at such locations, at such intervals, and in such manner as the director prescribes; to maintain records and file periodic reports with the director containing information as to location, size, and height of emission outlets, rate, duration, and composition of emissions, and any other pertinent information the director prescribes; and to provide such written notice to other states as the director shall prescribe. In requiring monitoring devices, records, and reports, the director, to the extent consistent with the federal Clean Air Act, shall give consideration to technical feasibility and economic reasonableness and allow reasonable time for compliance. For sources where a specific monitoring, record-keeping, or reporting requirement is specified for a particular air contaminant from a particular air contaminant source in an applicable regulation adopted by the United States environmental protection agency under the federal Clean Air Act or in an applicable rule adopted by the director, the director shall not impose an additional requirement in a permit that is a different monitoring, record-keeping, or reporting requirement other than the requirement specified in the applicable regulation or rule for that air contaminant except as otherwise agreed to by the owner or operator of the air contaminant source and the director. For sources where no specific monitoring requirement is specified for a particular air contaminant from a particular air contaminant source in an applicable regulation adopted by the United States environmental protection agency under the federal Clean Air Act or in an applicable rule adopted by the director, the director shall not impose a monitoring requirement in a permit that requires community air monitoring, except as otherwise agreed to by the owner or air operator of the air contaminant source and the director. If two or more regulations or rules impose different monitoring, record-keeping, or reporting requirements for the same air contaminant from the same air contaminant source, the director may impose permit terms and conditions that consolidate or streamline the monitoring, record-keeping, or reporting requirements in a manner that conforms with each applicable requirement. To the extent consistent with the federal Clean Air Act and except as otherwise agreed to by the owner or operator of an air contaminant source and the director, the director shall not require an operating restriction that has the practical effect of increasing the stringency of an existing applicable emission limitation or standard. (J) Establish, operate, and maintain monitoring stations and other devices designed to measure air pollution and enter into contracts with any public or private agency for the establishment, operation, or maintenance of such stations and devices, except that the director shall not enter into contracts with any private agency for the establishment, operation, or maintenance of community air monitoring where the intended use of the data produced by such monitoring stations and other devices would violate divisions (B) or (C) of section 3704.09 of the Revised Code; (K) By rule adopt procedures for giving reasonable public notice and conducting public hearings on any plans for the prevention, control, and abatement of air pollution that the director is required to submit to the federal government; (L) Through any employee, agent, or authorized representative of the director or the environmental protection agency, enter upon private or public property, including improvements thereon, at any reasonable time, to make inspections, take samples, conduct tests, and examine records or reports pertaining to any emission of air contaminants and any monitoring equipment or methods and to determine if there are any actual or potential emissions from such premises and, if so, to determine the sources, amounts, contents, and extent of those emissions, or to ascertain whether there is compliance with this chapter, any orders issued or rules adopted thereunder, or any other determination of the director. The director, at reasonable times, may have access to and copy any such records. If entry or inspection authorized by this division is refused, hindered, or thwarted, the director or the director's authorized representative may by affidavit apply for, and any judge of a court of record may issue, an appropriate inspection warrant necessary to achieve the purposes of this chapter within the court's territorial jurisdiction. (M) Accept and administer gifts or grants from the federal government and from any other source, public or private, for carrying out any of the functions under this chapter; (N) Obtain necessary scientific, technical, and laboratory services; (O) Establish advisory boards in accordance with section 121.13 of the Revised Code; (P) Delegate to any city or general health district or political subdivision of the state any of the director's enforcement and monitoring powers and duties, other than rule-making powers, as the director elects to delegate, and in addition employ, compensate, and prescribe the powers and duties of such officers, employees, and consultants as are necessary to enable the director to exercise the authority and perform duties imposed upon the director by law. Technical and other services shall be performed, insofar as practical, by personnel of the environmental protection agency. (Q) Certify to the government of the United States or any agency thereof that an industrial air pollution facility is in conformity with the state program or requirements for control of air pollution whenever such certificate is required for a taxpayer pursuant to any federal law or requirements; (R) Issue, modify, or revoke orders requiring abatement of or prohibiting emissions that violate applicable emission standards or other requirements of this chapter and rules adopted thereunder, or requiring emission control devices or measures in order to comply with applicable emission standards or other requirements of this chapter and rules adopted thereunder. Any such order shall require compliance with applicable emission standards by a specified date and shall not conflict with any requirement of the federal Clean Air Act. In the making of such orders, the director, to the extent consistent with the federal Clean Air Act, shall give consideration to, and base the determination on, evidence relating to the technical feasibility and economic reasonableness of compliance with such orders and their relation to benefits to the people of the state to be derived from such compliance. If, under the federal Clean Air Act, any such order shall provide for the posting of a bond or surety to secure compliance with the order as a condition of issuance of the order, the order shall so provide, but only to the extent required by the federal Clean Air Act. (S) To the extent provided by the federal Clean Air Act, adopt, modify, and rescind rules providing for the administrative assessment and collection of monetary penalties, not in excess of those required pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act, for failure to comply with any emission limitation or standard, compliance schedule, or other requirement of any rule, order, permit, or variance issued or adopted under this chapter or required under the applicable implementation plan whether or not the source is subject to a federal or state consent decree. The director may require the submission of compliance schedules, calculations of penalties for noncompliance, and related information. Any orders, payments, sanctions, or other requirements imposed pursuant to rules adopted under this division shall be in addition to any other permits, orders, payments, sanctions, or other requirements established under this chapter and shall not affect any civil or criminal enforcement proceedings brought under any provision of this chapter or any other provision of state or local law. This division does not apply to any requirement of this chapter regarding the prevention or abatement of odors. (T) Require new or modified air contaminant sources to install best available technology, but only in accordance with this division. With respect to permits issued pursuant to division (F) of this section beginning three years after August 3, 2006, best available technology for air contaminant sources and air contaminants emitted by those sources that are subject to standards adopted under section 112, Part C of Title I, and Part D of Title I of the federal Clean Air Act shall be equivalent to and no more stringent than those standards. For an air contaminant or precursor of an air contaminant for which a national ambient air quality standard has been adopted under the federal Clean Air Act, best available technology only shall be required to the extent required by rules adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for permit to install applications filed three or more years after August 3, 2006. Best available technology requirements established in rules adopted under this division shall be expressed only in one of the following ways that is most appropriate for the applicable source or source categories: (1) Work practices; (2) Source design characteristics or design efficiency of applicable air contaminant control devices; (3) Raw material specifications or throughput limitations averaged over a twelve-month rolling period; (4) Monthly allowable emissions averaged over a twelve-month rolling period. Best available technology requirements shall not apply to an air contaminant source that has the potential to emit, taking into account air pollution controls installed on the source, less than ten tons per year of emissions of an air contaminant or precursor of an air contaminant for which a national ambient air quality standard has been adopted under the federal Clean Air Act. In addition, best available technology requirements established in rules adopted under this division shall not apply to any existing, new, or modified air contaminant source that is subject to a plant-wide applicability limit that has been approved by the director. Further, best available technology requirements established in rules adopted under this division shall not apply to general permits issued prior to January 1, 2006, under rules adopted under this chapter. For permits to install issued three or more years after August 3, 2006, any new or modified air contaminant source that has the potential to emit, taking into account air pollution controls installed on the source, ten or more tons per year of volatile organic compounds or nitrogen oxides shall meet, at a minimum, the requirements of any applicable reasonably available control technology rule in effect as of January 1, 2006, regardless of the location of the source. (U) Consistent with section 507 of the federal Clean Air Act, adopt, modify, suspend, and rescind rules for the establishment of a small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program as provided in section 3704.18 of the Revised Code; (V) Provide for emissions trading, marketable permits, auctions of emission rights, and economic incentives that would reduce the cost or increase the efficiency of achieving a specified level of environmental protection; (W) Provide for the construction of an air contaminant source prior to obtaining a permit to install pursuant to division (F) of this section if the applicant demonstrates that the source will be installed to comply with all applicable emission limits and will not adversely affect public health or safety or the environment and if the director determines that such an action will avoid an unreasonable hardship on the owner or operator of the source. Any such determination shall be consistent with the federal Clean Air Act. (X) Exercise all incidental powers, including adoption of rules, required to carry out this chapter. The environmental protection agency shall develop a plan to control air pollution resulting from state-operated facilities and property. Sec. 3704.031. Prior (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, prior to issuance or renewal of a permit or a variance under division (F), (G), or (H) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code, the director of environmental protection may require the applicant to install such equipment and conduct such tests and analyses as the director finds reasonable and necessary to determine adequately the amount and content of any emissions from such sources, the ambient air quality at the proposed site and in areas that may be affected by emissions from such sources, and any violation or potential violation of Chapter 3704. of the Revised Code, or the regulations or orders promulgated thereunder. (B) Prior to the issuance or renewal of a permit or a variance under division (F), (G), or (H) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code, the director shall not require an applicant to conduct community air monitoring . Sec. 3704.0310. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Air nuisance rule" means a rule adopted by the director of environmental protection that declares any of the following to be a public nuisance: (a) The emission or escape into the open air from any source or sources whatsoever, of smoke, ashes, dust, dirt, grime, acids, fumes, gases, vapors, or any other substances or combinations of substances, in such manner or in such amounts as to endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the public, or cause unreasonable injury or damage to property; (b) The emission or escape into the open air from any source or sources of odors whatsoever that is subject to regulation under Chapter 3704. of the Revised Code and is operated in such a manner to emit such amounts of odor as to endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the public, or cause unreasonable injury or damage to property; (c) Activities that are substantially similar to those described in divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section. (2) "State implementation plan" means the state implementation plan regarding national ambient air quality standards required to be submitted under section 110 of the "Clean Air Act," 42 U.S.C. 7410. (B) If the state implementation plan includes an air nuisance rule, the director of environmental protection shall remove the air nuisance rule from the plan and take such steps as are necessary to do so. On and after the effective date of this section, the director shall not include an air nuisance rule in the state implementation plan or rely upon an air nuisance rule to implement or enforce ambient air quality standards adopted pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act. Sec. 3704.09. (A) Determinations made by the director of environmental protection or other persons acting under sections 3704.03 and 3704.04 of the Revised Code shall not be used as evidence in civil actions nor create any presumption of law or finding of fact which shall inure to or be for the benefit of any person other than the state, and sections 3704.01 to 3704.07 of the Revised Code do not create, enlarge, or abrogate existing private rights. Nothing in Chapter 3704. of the Revised Code shall be construed to abridge, limit, or otherwise impair the right of any person to damages or other relief on account of injury to persons or property and to maintain any action or other appropriate proceedings therefor. (B) Data produced from community air monitoring shall not be used as evidence to support either of the following: (1) A fine, penalty, or notice of violation against any person for violations of or noncompliance with the federal Clean Air Act, this chapter, the rules adopted thereunder, or any other applicable law, rule, or regulation for which the state has primary enforcement authority; (2) An administrative, regulatory, or judicial enforcement action, lawsuit, or proceeding for violations of or noncompliance with the federal Clean Air Act, this chapter, the rules adopted thereunder, or any other applicable law, rule, or regulation for which the state has primary enforcement authority. (C) Data produced from community air monitoring shall not be considered or relied upon by the environmental protection agency or a local air pollution control authority in any rulemaking action or in any action relating to the issuance of an installation permit or operating permit unless such consideration or reliance is requested by the owner or operator of the air contaminant source requesting the permit. Sec. 3704.111. (A) Not later than October 1, 1993, the director of environmental protection shall enter into a delegation agreement with each local air pollution control authority listed in divisions (N)(1)(a) to (h)division (O)(1) of section 3704.01 of the Revised Code under which the local air pollution control authority agrees to perform on behalf of the environmental protection agency air pollution control regulatory services within the political subdivision represented by the local air pollution control authority. The director may enter into such a delegation agreement with a local air pollution control authority established on or after the effective date of this section, subject to the condition established in division (B) of this section. Each delegation agreement shall be self-renewing on an annual basis on the first day of October of each year. The terms of each such delegation agreement shall remain unchanged from year to year unless they are amended by mutual agreement of the director and the local air pollution control authority. (B) The director may conduct a periodic performance evaluation of the air pollution control program operated by each local air pollution control authority. Based upon the findings of such a performance evaluation, the director may terminate or refuse to renew the delegation agreement with a local air pollution control authority if the director determines that the local air pollution control authority is not adequately performing its obligations under the agreement. (C) The director may enter into contracts for payments to local air pollution control authorities from moneys credited to the clean air fund created in section 3704.035 of the Revised Code, subject to the limitation specified in that section, and any other moneys appropriated by the general assembly for that purpose. The director shall distribute the moneys available for making payments to the local air pollution control authorities pursuant to such contracts equitably among the local air pollution control authorities based upon the amount of local funding and the workload of each local air pollution control authority, including, without limitation, population served, number of air permits issued for both new and existing sources, land area, and number of air contaminant sources. The director biennially shall review the workload of each local air pollution control authority and shall determine the percentage of the moneys available for the purpose of making payments under the contracts. In determining the percentage of those moneys that is to be so distributed, the director shall consider the recommendations of the local air pollution control authorities. (D) The director may modify a contract between the director and a local air pollution control authority to authorize the local air pollution control authority to perform air pollution control activities outside the geographic boundaries of that local air pollution control authority. Sec. 3704.14. (A)(1) If the director of environmental protection determines that implementation of a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is necessary for the state to effectively comply with the federal Clean Air Act after June 30, 20232025, the director may provide for the implementation of the program in those counties in this state in which such a program is federally mandated. Upon making such a determination, the director of environmental protection may request the director of administrative services to extend the terms of the contract that was entered into under the authority of Am. Sub. H.B. 64 33 of the 131st 135th general assembly. Upon receiving the request, the director of administrative services shall extend the contract, beginning on July 1, 20232025, in accordance with this section. The contract shall be extended for a period of up to twenty-four months with the contractor who conducted the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program under that contract. (2) Prior to the expiration of the contract extension that is was authorized by division (A)(1) of this section under the authority of H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly, the director of environmental protection shall request the director of administrative services to enter into a contract with a vendor to operate a decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program in each county in this state in which such a program is federally mandated through June 30, 2027, with an option for the state to renew the contract for a period of up to twenty-four months through June 30, 2029. The contract shall ensure that the decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program achieves at least the same an equivalent amount of emission reductions as achieved by the program operated under the authority of the contract that was extended under division (A)(1) of this section under the authority of H.B. 33 of the 135th general assembly. The director of administrative services shall select a vendor through a competitive selection process in compliance with Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. (3) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director of administrative services shall ensure that a competitive selection process regarding a contract to operate a decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program in this state incorporates the following, which shall be included in the contract: (a) For purposes of expanding the number of testing locations for consumer convenience, a requirement that the vendor utilize established local businesses, auto repair facilities, or leased properties to operate state-approved inspection and maintenance testing facilities; (b) A requirement that the vendor selected to operate the program provide notification of the program's requirements to each owner of a motor vehicle that is required to be inspected under the program. The contract shall require the notification to be provided not later than sixty days prior to the date by which the owner of the motor vehicle is required to have the motor vehicle inspected. The director of environmental protection and the vendor shall jointly agree on the content of the notice. However, the notice shall include at a minimum the locations of all inspection facilities within a specified distance of the address that is listed on the owner's motor vehicle registration;. (c) A requirement that the vendor comply with testing methodology and supply the required equipment approved by the director of environmental protection as specified in the competitive selection process in compliance with Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. (4) A decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program operated under this section shall comply with division (B) of this section. The director of environmental protection shall administer the decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program operated under this section. (B) The director shall establish a decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program as authorized by this section and, at a minimum, the director shall ensure that the program does all of the following: (1) Complies with the federal Clean Air Act; (2) Provides for the issuance of inspection certificates and alternative emissions certificates as specified in rules adopted under division (C)(2) of this section; (3) Provides for a new car exemption for motor vehicles six years old or newer and provides that a new motor vehicle is exempt for six years regardless of whether legal title to the motor vehicle is transferred during that period; (4) Provides for an exemption for battery electric motor vehicles; (5) Provides for an exemption for hybrid motor vehicles seven years old or newer and provides that a hybrid motor vehicle is exempt for seven years regardless of whether legal title to the motor vehicle is transferred during that period. (C)(1) The director of environmental protection shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that the director determines are necessary to implement this section. The director may continue to implement and enforce rules pertaining to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program previously implemented under former section 3704.14 of the Revised Code as that section existed prior to its repeal and reenactment by Am. Sub. H.B. 66 of the 126th general assembly, provided that the rules do not conflict with this section. (2) The rules adopted under division (C)(1) of this section shall provide for the issuance of inspections certificates and alternative emissions certificates. Under the rules, an inspection certificate shall be issued to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle when the motor vehicle passes an emissions inspection conducted in accordance with the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under this section. In lieu of obtaining an inspection certificate, the rules shall establish a system by which the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle may request an alternative emissions certificate from the director. (a) The rules providing for the issuance of alternative emissions certificates shall require an owner or lessee of a motor vehicle to do the following in order to receive the certificate: (i) Complete and submit an attestation form created by the director that includes a statement that reads substantially as follows: "I, _______, attest that, to the best of my knowledge, the motor vehicle concerning which I am the owner or lessee complies with all laws of Ohio and the United States governing motor vehicle emissions. I, ______, am aware that a false statement on this form is not permitted." (ii) Sign and date the form either manually or electronically; (iii) Submit the form to the director either by regular mail, certified mail, or electronically. (b) The rules shall require the director to include both of the following additional information on the attestation form: (i) A provision that allows the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle to specify one of the following methods by which the owner or lessee may request delivery of the alternative emissions certificate: certified mail, noncertified mail, or electronically; (ii) A provision that allows the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle to specify the vehicle identification number, make, model, and year of the relevant motor vehicle and the date the attestation form is submitted to the director. (c) Subject to division (C)(2)(d) of this section, the rules shall require the director to deliver an alternative emission certificate to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who complies with rules adopted under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. The director shall deliver the certificate within thirty business days after the director's receipt of the attestation form or, if the owner or lessee submits the form electronically, within five business days after receipt of the form. The director shall confirm the receipt of the attestation form if the director receives it by electronic means. (d) The rules shall require the director to reject an attestation form for any of the following reasons: (i) The motor vehicle that is the subject of the attestation form was in an accident or collision within the two years prior to the date of submission of the form, and the accident or collision caused substantial damage to the internal structure of the motor vehicle. (ii) The owner or lessee of the motor vehicle that is the subject of the attestation form has received a ticket, citation, or summons with regard to that motor vehicle within the two years prior to the date of submission of the form for a violation of section 4513.22 of the Revised Code or substantially equivalent municipal ordinance. (iii) The information in the attestation form is determined by the director to be false. If the director rejects an attestation form under division (C)(2)(d)(iii) of this section, the director shall provide notice to the owner or lessee that the attestation form was determined to be false. The notice shall inform the owner or lessee that the owner or lessee may submit a corrected form to the director within thirty days of the receipt of the notice. If the owner or lessee submits a corrected attestation form that complies with rules adopted under division (C)(2) of this section within that thirty-day period, the director shall issue an alternative emissions certificate to the owner or lessee. If the owner or lessee fails to correct the attestation form, the director shall require the owner or lessee to complete an emissions inspection and obtain an inspection certificate in accordance with rules adopted under this section. If the director rejects an attestation form under division (C)(2)(d)(i) or (ii) of this section, the director shall require the owner or lessee to complete an emissions inspection and obtain an inspection certificate in accordance with rules adopted under this section. (e) In adopting rules under division (C)(2) of this section, the director shall ensure that the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who falsifies an attestation form receives a notice that includes a statement that reads substantially as follows: "You have falsified an attestation form for your vehicle under the E-Check/motor vehicle emissions testing program. Your vehicle is registered in one of [insert the number of counties] counties in this state that has federal emission mandates imposed on it that the State of Ohio is required, under threat of penalty, to enforce. This letter serves as Ohio's only penalty for falsification of an attestation form. You have thirty days from the date of this notice to amend your attestation form and submit the amended form to the Environmental Protection Agency. However, if you choose not to submit an amended attestation form, you must have a motor vehicle emissions inspection conducted for your vehicle in accordance with section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it." (f) No penalties apply to a person who the director has determined to have falsified an attestation form, other than the issuance of the notice required under division (C)(2)(e) of this section. (D) There is hereby created in the state treasury the auto emissions test fund, which shall consist of money received by the director from any cash transfers, state and local grants, and other contributions that are received for the purpose of funding the program established under this section. The director of environmental protection shall use money in the fund solely for the implementation, supervision, administration, operation, and enforcement of the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under this section. Money in the fund shall not be used for either of the following: (1) To pay for the inspection costs incurred by a motor vehicle dealer so that the dealer may provide inspection certificates to an individual purchasing a motor vehicle from the dealer when that individual resides in a county that is subject to the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program; (2) To provide payment for more than one free passing emissions inspection or a total of three emissions inspections for a motor vehicle in any three-hundred-sixty-five-day period. The owner or lessee of a motor vehicle is responsible for inspection fees that are related to emissions inspections beyond one free passing emissions inspection or three total emissions inspections in any three-hundred-sixty-five-day period. Inspection fees that are charged by a contractor conducting emissions inspections under a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program shall be approved by the director of environmental protection. (E) The motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under this section expires upon the termination of all contracts entered into under this section and shall not be implemented beyond the final date on which termination occurs. (F) As used in this section "battery electric motor vehicle" and "hybrid motor vehicle" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (G) On the effective date of this amendmentJune 30, 2025, the director shall immediately begin procedures to submit to the United States environmental protection agency the alternative emissions certification program for approval as part of the Ohio state implementation plan. If the United States environmental protection agency approves the modification of the decentralized motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program as providing sufficient air pollution reductions to meet the federal Clean Air Act requirements for a vehicle inspection and maintenance program and modifies the Ohio state implementation plan, the director shall immediately begin to modify the Ohio environmental protection agency rules to implement the alternative emissions certification program. Nothing in this division requires the Ohio environmental protection agency to take action to implement the alternative emissions certification program until the United States environmental protection agency approves the alternative program as part of the Ohio state implementation plan. (H) If the United States environmental protection agency determines that the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program implemented in accordance with this section is not necessary for the state or any area of the state to comply with the federal Clean Air Act, the director shall immediately discontinue the program and take any actions necessary to effectuate the termination of the program. Sec. 3705.126. The department of health shall neither open an adoption file nor make its contents available except as follows: (A) The department shall inspect the file to determine the court involved for the purpose of division (D) of section 3107.09 or section 3107.091 or 3107.171 of the Revised Code. (B) The department shall make the file's contents available to an adopted person or lineal descendant of an adopted person in accordance with section 3107.38 of the Revised Code. (C) The department shall open the file to transfer releases to the file in accordance with section 3107.381 of the Revised Code. (D) The department shall open the file to file a contact preference form from a biological parent pursuant to section 3107.39 of the Revised Code and remove any previously filed contact preference form from the biological parent. (E) The department shall open the file to file a biological parent's name redaction request form pursuant to division (C) of section 3107.391 of the Revised Code or to remove and destroy the a name redaction request form pursuant to division (D)(A) of that section 3107.391 of the Revised Code. (F) The department shall open the file to file a denial of release form under division (A) of section 3107.46 of the Revised Code or an authorization of release form under division (B) of that section. (G) The department shall make the file's contents available to an adopted person or adoptive parent in accordance with section 3107.47 of the Revised Code. (H) The department shall open the file to file a request from an adopted person under division (A) of section 3107.48 of the Revised Code or to remove and destroy the request pursuant to division (B) of that section. (I) The department shall inspect the file to assist a birth parent or birth sibling in finding the adopted person's name by adoption in accordance with section 3107.49 of the Revised Code. (J) The court that decreed the adoption may order that the contents be made open for inspection or available for copying. Sec. 3705.16. (A) For purposes of this section notwithstanding section 3705.01 of the Revised Code, "fetal death" does not include death of the product of human conception prior to twenty weeks of gestation. (B) Each death or fetal death that occurs in this state shall be registered with the local registrar of vital statistics of the district in which the death or fetal death occurred, by the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains. The personal and statistical information in the death or fetal death certificate shall be obtained from the best qualified persons or sources available, by the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains. The statement of facts relating to the disposition of the body and information relative to the armed services referred to in section 3705.19 of the Revised Code shall be signed by the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains. (C) The (1) For certification of the cause of death, the funeral director or other person in charge of the final disposition of the remains shall present the death or fetal death certificate to one of the attending physician of the decedent, the coroner, or the medical examiner, as appropriate for certification of the cause of death. If following individuals: (a) If a death or fetal death occurs under any circumstances mentioned circumstance described in section 313.12 of the Revised Code, the coroner in the county in which the death occurs, or a deputy coroner,the medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner serving in an equivalent capacity, shall certify the cause of death unless that death was reported to the coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner and that person, after a preliminary examination, declined to assert jurisdiction with respect to the death or fetal death. A physician other than the coroner in the county in which a death or fetal death occurs, or a deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner serving in an equivalent capacity, may certify only those deaths that occur under natural circumstances; (b) If a death or fetal death occurs under a circumstance other than as described in section 313.12 of the Revised Code, the attending physician of the decedent, except that, in the case of decedent who did not have an attending physician, the physician who, either in person or through a means of telehealth, last examined or treated the decedent for any illness or condition. (2) After the death or fetal death certificate is presented, the cause of death shall be certified and the medical certificate of death shall be completed and signed as follows: (a) If the death or fetal death certificate is presented to the coroner or medical examiner, the coroner, or a deputy coroner, medical examiner, or deputy medical examiner serving in an equivalent capacity, shall certify the cause of death. (b) If the death or fetal death certificate is presented to the physician described in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, that physician shall certify the cause of death. (3) The medical certificate of death shall be completed and signed by the physician who attended the decedent or by the coroner or medical examiner, physician who attended the decedent, or physician who last examined or treated the decedent, as appropriate, within forty-eight hours after notification of the death or fetal death. A A coroner or medical examiner may satisfy the requirement of signing a medical certificate showing the cause of death or fetal death as pending either by stamping it with a stamp of the coroner's or medical examiner's signature or by signing it in the coroner's or medical examiner's own hand, but within forty-eight hours after notification of the death or fetal death, provided that the coroner or medical examiner shall sign any other medical certificate of death or supplementary medical certification in the coroner's or medical examiner's own handwithin forty-eight hours after the cause of death has been determined. A physician described in division (C)(1)(b) of this section may satisfy the requirement of signing a medical certificate by signing with an electronic signature. (D) A coroner, medical examiner, or physician who acts in good faith in accordance with this section, without fraud or malice, and upon reasonable belief of the cause of death or fetal death based on the information, if any, presented is not subject to civil liability or professional disciplinary action for any act or omission in certifying the cause of death or in completing and signing the medical certificate of death. (E) Any death certificate registered pursuant to this section shall contain the social security number of the decedent, if available. A social security number obtained under this section is a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3705.17. The body of a person whose death occurs in this state shall not be interred, deposited in a vault or tomb, cremated, or otherwise disposed of by a funeral director until a burial permit is issued by a local registrar or sub-registrar of vital statistics. No such permit shall be issued by a local registrar or sub-registrar until a satisfactory death, fetal death, or provisional death certificate is filed with the local registrar or sub-registrar. When the medical certification as to the cause of death cannot be provided by the attending physician or coroner prior to burial, for sufficient cause, as determined by rule of the director of health, the funeral director may file a provisional death certificate with the local registrar or sub-registrar for the purpose of securing a burial or burial-transit permit. When the funeral director files a provisional death certificate to secure a burial or burial-transit permit, the funeral director shall file a satisfactory and complete death certificate within five days after the date of death. The director of health, by rule, may provide additional time for filing a satisfactory death certificate. A burial permit authorizing cremation shall not be issued upon the filing of a provisional certificate of death. When a funeral director or other person obtains a burial permit from a local registrar or sub-registrar, the registrar or sub-registrar shall charge a fee of three ten dollars for the issuance of the burial permit. Two Nine dollars and fifty cents of each fee collected for a burial permit shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the cemetery registration fund created under section 4767.03 of the Revised Code to be used by the division of real estate and professional licensing in the department of commerce in discharging its duties prescribed in Chapter 4767. of the Revised Code and the Ohio cemetery dispute resolution commission created by section 4767.05 of the Revised Code. A local registrar or sub-registrar shall transmit payments of that portion of the amount of each fee collected under this section to the treasurer of state on a quarterly basis or more frequently, if possible. The director of health, by rule, shall provide for the issuance of a burial permit without the payment of the fee required by this section if the total cost of the burial will be paid by an agency or instrumentality of the United States, the state or a state agency, or a political subdivision of the state. The director of commerce may by rule adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code reduce the total amount of the fee required by this section and that portion of the amount of the fee required to be paid to the credit of the division of real estate and professional licensing for the use of the division and the Ohio cemetery dispute resolution commission, if the director determines that the total amount of funds the fee is generating at the amount required by this section exceeds the amount of funds the division of real estate and professional licensing and the commission need to carry out their powers and duties prescribed in Chapter 4767. of the Revised Code. No person in charge of any premises in which interments or cremations are made shall inter or cremate or otherwise dispose of a body, unless it is accompanied by a burial permit. Each person in charge of a cemetery, crematory, or other place of disposal shall indorse upon a burial permit the date of interment, cremation, or other disposal and shall retain such permits for a period of at least five years. The person in charge shall keep an accurate record of all interments, cremations, or other disposal of dead bodies, made in the premises under the person's charge, stating the name of the deceased person, place of death, date of burial, cremation, or other disposal, and name and address of the funeral director. Such record shall at all times be open to public inspection. Sec. 3706.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Governmental agency" means a department, division, or other unit of state government, a municipal corporation, county, township, and other political subdivision, or any other public corporation or agency having the power to acquire, construct, or operate air quality facilities, the United States or any agency thereof, and any agency, commission, or authority established pursuant to an interstate compact or agreement. (B) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association, or corporation, or any combination thereof. (C) "Air contaminant" means particulate matter, dust, fumes, gas, mist, smoke, noise, vapor, heat, radioactivity, radiation, or odorous substance, or any combination thereof. (D) "Air pollution" means the presence in the ambient air of one or more air contaminants in sufficient quantity and of such characteristics and duration as to injure human health or welfare, plant or animal life, or property, or that unreasonably interferes with the comfortable enjoyment of life or property. (E) "Ambient air" means that portion of the atmosphere outside of buildings and other enclosures, stacks, or ducts that surrounds human, plant, or animal life, or property. (F) "Emission" means the release into the outdoor atmosphere of an air contaminant. (G) "Air quality facility" means any of the following: (1) Any method, modification or replacement of property, process, device, structure, or equipment that removes, reduces, prevents, contains, alters, conveys, stores, disperses, or disposes of air contaminants or substances containing air contaminants, or that renders less noxious or reduces the concentration of air contaminants in the ambient air, including, without limitation, facilities and expenditures that qualify as air pollution control facilities under section 103 (C)(4)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, and regulations adopted thereunder; (2) Motor vehicle inspection stations operated in accordance with, and any equipment used for motor vehicle inspections conducted under, section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it; (3) Ethanol or other biofuel facilities, including any equipment used at the ethanol or other biofuel facility for the production of ethanol or other biofuels; (4) Any property or portion thereof used for the collection, storage, treatment, utilization, processing, or final disposal of a by-product or solid waste resulting from any method, process, device, structure, or equipment that removes, reduces, prevents, contains, alters, conveys, stores, disperses, or disposes of air contaminants, or that renders less noxious or reduces the concentration of air contaminants in the ambient air; (5) Any property, device, or equipment that promotes the reduction of emissions of air contaminants into the ambient air through improvements in the efficiency of energy utilization or energy conservation; (6) Any coal research and development project conducted under Chapter 1555. of the Revised Code; (7) As determined by the director of the Ohio coal development office, any property or portion thereof that is used for the collection, storage, treatment, utilization, processing, or final disposal of a by-product resulting from a coal research and development project as defined in section 1555.01 of the Revised Code or from the use of clean coal technology, excluding any property or portion thereof that is used primarily for other subsequent commercial purposes; (8) Any property or portion thereof that is part of the FutureGen project of the United States department of energy or related to the siting of the FutureGen projectAny property, device, or equipment comprising a facility generating green energy; (9) Any property, device, or equipment that promotes the reduction of emissions of air contaminants into the ambient air through the generation of clean, renewable energy with renewable energy resources or advanced energy resources as defined in section 3706.25 of the Revised Code; (10) Any property, device, structure, or equipment necessary for the manufacture and production of equipment described as an air quality facility under this chapter; (11) Any property, device, or equipment related to the recharging or refueling of vehicles that promotes the reduction of emissions of air contaminants into the ambient air through the use of an alternative fuel as defined in section 125.831 of the Revised Code or the use of a renewable energy resource as defined in section 3706.25 of the Revised Code; (12) Any special energy improvement project, as defined in section 1710.01 of the Revised Code, that promotes the reduction of emissions of air contaminants into the ambient air. "Air quality facility" further includes any property or system to be used in whole or in part for any of the purposes in divisions (G)(1) to (12) of this section, whether another purpose is also served, and any property or system incidental to or that has to do with, or the end purpose of which is, any of the foregoing. Air quality facilities that are defined in this division for industry, commerce, distribution, or research, including public utility companies, are hereby determined to be those that qualify as facilities for the control of air pollution and thermal pollution related to air under Section 13 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. (H) "Project" or "air quality project" means any air quality facility, including undivided or other interests therein, acquired or to be acquired or constructed or to be constructed by the Ohio air quality development authority under this chapter, or acquired or to be acquired or constructed or to be constructed by a governmental agency or person with all or a part of the cost thereof being paid from a loan or grant from the authority under this chapter or otherwise paid from the proceeds of air quality revenue bonds, including all buildings and facilities that the authority determines necessary for the operation of the project, together with all property, rights, easements, and interests that may be required for the operation of the project. (I) "Cost" as applied to an air quality project means the cost of acquisition and construction, the cost of acquisition of all land, rights-of-way, property rights, easements, franchise rights, and interests required for such acquisition and construction, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of acquiring or constructing and equipping a principal office and sub-offices of the authority, the cost of diverting highways, interchange of highways, and access roads to private property, including the cost of land or easements for such access roads, the cost of public utility and common carrier relocation or duplication, the cost of all machinery, furnishings, and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and for no more than eighteen months after completion of construction, engineering, expenses of research and development with respect to air quality facilities, the cost of any commodity contract, including fees and expenses related thereto, legal expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, studies, estimates of cost and revenues, working capital, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of acquiring or constructing such project, administrative expense, and such other expense as may be necessary or incident to the acquisition or construction of the project, the financing of such acquisition or construction, including the amount authorized in the resolution of the authority providing for the issuance of air quality revenue bonds to be paid into any special funds from the proceeds of such bonds, and the financing of the placing of such project in operation. Any obligation, cost, or expense incurred by any governmental agency or person for surveys, borings, preparation of plans and specifications, and other engineering services, or any other cost described above, in connection with the acquisition or construction of a project may be regarded as a part of the cost of that project and may be reimbursed out of the proceeds of air quality revenue bonds as authorized by this chapter. (J) "Owner" includes an individual, copartnership, association, or corporation having any title or interest in any property, rights, easements, or interests authorized to be acquired by this chapter. (K) "Revenues" means all rentals and other charges received by the authority for the use or services of any air quality project, any gift or grant received with respect to any air quality project, any moneys received with respect to the lease, sublease, sale, including installment sale or conditional sale, or other disposition of an air quality project, moneys received in repayment of and for interest on any loans made by the authority to a person or governmental agency, whether from the United States or any department, administration, or agency thereof, or otherwise, proceeds of such bonds to the extent that use thereof for payment of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on the bonds is authorized by the authority, amounts received or otherwise derived from a commodity contract or from the sale of the related commodity under such a contract, proceeds from any insurance, condemnation, or guaranty pertaining to a project or property mortgaged to secure bonds or pertaining to the financing of the project, and income and profit from the investment of the proceeds of air quality revenue bonds or of any revenues. (L) "Public roads" includes all public highways, roads, and streets in the state, whether maintained by the state, county, city, township, or other political subdivision. (M) "Public utility facilities" includes tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances of any public utility. (N) "Construction," unless the context indicates a different meaning or intent, includes reconstruction, enlargement, improvement, or providing furnishings or equipment. (O) "Air quality revenue bonds," unless the context indicates a different meaning or intent, includes air quality revenue notes, air quality revenue renewal notes, and air quality revenue refunding bonds, except that notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds shall have a maximum maturity of five years as provided in section 3706.05 of the Revised Code and notes or renewal notes issued as the definitive obligation may be issued maturing at such time or times with a maximum maturity of forty years from the date of issuance of the original note. (P) "Solid waste" means any garbage; refuse; sludge from a waste water treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility; and other discarded material, including solid, liquid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations, and from community activities, but not including solid or dissolved material in domestic sewage, or solid or dissolved material in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that are point sources subject to permits under section 402 of the "Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972," 86 Stat. 880, 33 U.S.C.A. 1342, as amended, or source, special nuclear, or byproduct material as defined by the "Atomic Energy Act of 1954," 68 Stat. 921, 42 U.S.C.A. 2011, as amended. (Q) "Sludge" means any solid, semisolid, or liquid waste, other than a recyclable by-product, generated from a municipal, commercial, or industrial waste water treatment plant, water supply plant, or air pollution control facility or any other such wastes having similar characteristics and effects. (R) "Ethanol or other biofuel facility" means a plant at which ethanol or other biofuel is produced. (S) "Ethanol" means fermentation ethyl alcohol derived from agricultural products, including potatoes, cereal, grains, cheese whey, and sugar beets; forest products; or other renewable or biomass resources, including residue and waste generated from the production, processing, and marketing of agricultural products, forest products, and other renewable or biomass resources, that meets all of the specifications in the American society for testing and materials (ASTM) specification D 4806-88 and is denatured as specified in Parts 20 and 21 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (T) "Biofuel" means any fuel that is made from cellulosic biomass resources, including renewable organic matter, crop waste residue, wood, aquatic plants and other crops, animal waste, solid waste, or sludge, and that is used for the production of energy for transportation or other purposes. (U) "FutureGen project" means the buildings, equipment, and real property and functionally related buildings, equipment, and real property, including related research projects that support the development and operation of the buildings, equipment, and real property, designated by the United States department of energy and the FutureGen industrial alliance, inc., as the coal-fueled, zero-emissions power plant designed to prove the technical and economic feasibility of producing electricity and hydrogen from coal and nearly eliminating carbon dioxide emissions through capture and permanent storage. (V) "Commodity contract" means a contract or series of contracts entered into in connection with the acquisition or construction of air quality facilities for the purchase or sale of a commodity that is eligible for prepayment with the proceeds of federally tax exempt bonds under sections 103, 141, and 148 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and regulations adopted under it. (W) "Green energy" has the same meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3707.61. (A) The department of health shall create informational materials on type 1 diabetes for parents, guardians, educators, and other persons having care or charge of children. The materials shall include pertinent information to inform and educate parents, guardians, educators, and other caretakers about type 1 diabetes in children, including the following: (1) A description of type 1 diabetes; (2) A description of type 1 diabetes risk factors and warning signs; (3) A recommendation that the parents or guardian of a student who is displaying type 1 diabetes warning signs should immediately consult with the student's primary care provider to determine if immediate screening is appropriate; (4) A description of the type 1 diabetes screening process, the significance of the three stages of type 1 diabetes, and the implications of test results identifying the presence of each stage; (5) A recommendation that, following a diagnosis of type 1 diabetes, the student's parents or guardian should consult with the student's primary care provider to develop an appropriate treatment plan, which may include consultation with and examination by a specialty care provider, including a properly qualified endocrinologist. (B) The department shall make the informational materials available on its internet web site in a format suitable for easy downloading and printing. Sec. 3709.15. The board of health of a city or general health district may appoint as many persons for sanitary duty as the public health and sanitary conditions of the district require, and such persons shall have general police powers and be known as "sanitarians." The board may also appoint as many registered nurses for public health nurse duty as the public health and sanitary conditions of the district require, who shall be known as "public health nurses," and where such are appointed, the board may appoint licensed practical nurses as defined by section 4723.15 4723.02 of the Revised Code. The legislative authority of the city may determine the maximum number of sanitarians and public health nurses and licensed practical nurses to be appointed. The board of health of a city or general health district may provide nursing care and other therapeutic and supportive care services to maintain an ill or infirm person in a place of residence used as such person's home or elsewhere. The board shall charge and collect reasonable fees not to exceed the cost of service for such care from patients financially able to pay, or may accept payment for such services from persons or public or private agencies on behalf of the recipient, either directly or by contract with such persons or agencies. The fees shall be retained by the board and placed in a special fund to be known as the home health services fund, and shall be used by the board only for defraying the cost of personnel, equipment, supplies, rental of physical facilities including real property, utilities, and administrative costs in providing services under this section. The approval of the auditor of state referred to in section 5705.12 of the Revised Code shall not be required for the establishment of the fund. The board, in addition, may contract with any individual or a public or private agency to furnish services authorized by this section on behalf of a city or general health district for such time and for such compensation as may be agreed upon by the board and the individual or agency. The compensation shall be paid by the board from the home health services fund, or from any other available fund of the board. Sec. 3715.021. (A) As used in this section, "food : (1) "Food processing establishment" means a premises or part of a premises where food is processed, packaged, manufactured, or otherwise held or handled for distribution to another location or for sale at wholesale. "Food processing establishment" includes the activities of a bakery, confectionery, cannery, bottler, warehouse, or distributor, and the activities of an entity that receives or salvages distressed food for sale or use as food. A "food processing establishment" does not include a cottage food production operation; a small egg producer; a processor of tree syrup who boils sap when a minimum of seventy-five per cent of the sap used to produce the syrup is collected directly from trees by that processor; a processor of sorghum who processes sorghum juice when a minimum of seventy-five per cent of the sorghum juice used to produce the sorghum is extracted directly from sorghum plants by that processor; a beekeeper who jars honey when a minimum of seventy-five per cent of the honey is from that beekeeper's own hives; or a processor of apple syrup or apple butter who directly harvests from trees a minimum of seventy-five per cent of the apples used to produce the apple syrup or apple butter. (2) "Small egg producer" means any person that is engaged in the operation of egg production and annually maintains five hundred or fewer birds. (B) The director of agriculture shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish, when otherwise not established by the Revised Code, standards and good manufacturing practices for food processing establishments, including the facilities of food processing establishments and their sanitation. The rules shall conform with or be equivalent to the standards for foods established by the United States food and drug administration in Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations. A business or that portion of a business that is regulated by the department of agriculture under Chapter 917. or 918. of the Revised Code is not subject to regulation under this section as a food processing establishment. Sec. 3717.071. (A) The director of agriculture and director of health shall prescribe forms for use in calculating the licensing fees that may be charged under sections 3717.25 and 3717.45 of the Revised Code. Each licensor that charges licensing fees shall use the forms in calculating its costs according to the uniform methodologies established in rules adopted under section 3717.07 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) If the licensor is a board of health, the board shall submit the form to the director of agriculture in the case of fees being charged for retail food establishment licenses, and to the director of health in the case of fees being charged for food service operation licenses. The board shall submit the form to the appropriate director not later than the first day of the fiscal year in which the fees will apply. A form that is mailed to the director shall be considered to have been submitted on its postmark date. (2) On receipt of a form from a board of health, the director of agriculture or director of health shall review the form to determine if the board has calculated its fees in accordance with the uniform methodologies. The director may request that the auditor of state conduct an audit of the board to determine if the fees it established are appropriate. The audit is in addition to the annual or biennial audit conducted pursuant to division (A) of section 117.11 of the Revised Code, and the cost of the audit is the responsibility of the board of health. If at any time the director of agriculture or director of health has reasonable cause to believe that a different an audit of a board of health, in addition to the annual or biennial audit conducted pursuant to division (A) of section 117.11 of the Revised Code, is in the public interest, the director may request that the auditor of state conduct the audit. If the audit is conducted, the cost of the audit is the responsibility of the board of health. (C)(1) If a board of health fails to submit the forms as required under division (B)(1) of this section and the failure has occurred not more than twice in the immediately preceding five-year period, the board is subject to the following penalties: (a) If the form is late by one but not more than five working days, a fine of fifty dollars for each working day the form is late; (b) If the form is late by six working days but not more than ten working days, a fine of one hundred dollars for each working day the form is late; (c) If the form is late by more than ten working days, the board shall reduce by twenty per cent the fees it charges under section 3717.25 or 3717.45 of the Revised Code during the next succeeding fiscal year. (2) If a board fails to submit the forms and the failure has occurred more than twice in the immediately preceding five-year period, the board shall reduce by twenty per cent the fees it charges under section 3717.25 or 3717.45 of the Revised Code during the next succeeding fiscal year. (3) A board of health that is required to pay a fine or reduce its licensing fees shall not include any part of the cost of the penalty in the fees it charges under section 3717.25 or 3717.45 of the Revised Code or the fees it charges in operating any other licensing program. Sec. 3718.02. (A) The director of health, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt, and subsequently may amend and rescind, rules of general application throughout the state to administer this chapter. Rules adopted under division (A) of this section shall do at least all of the following: (1) Require that the appropriate board of health approve or disapprove the installation, operation, and alteration of a sewage treatment system if it is not connected to a sanitary sewerage system; (2) Require a board of health, or other person as established by rule, to conduct a site evaluation for any proposed installation of a sewage treatment system; (3) Prescribe standards for the siting, design, installation, operation, monitoring, maintenance, and abandonment of sewage treatment systems that may be used in this state and for the progressive or incremental alteration or repair of an existing sewage treatment system or the progressive or incremental installation of a new system to replace an existing sewage treatment system. The rules shall be adopted so as to establish a preference for the repair of an existing sewage treatment system, when technically and economically feasible, rather than its replacement with a new system. The standards shall include at a minimum all of the following: (a) Soil absorption specifications and vertical separation distances. (i) Soil absorption specifications established in rules shall include standards regarding the sizing of sewage treatment systems in use in the state. (ii) In establishing soil absorption specifications and vertical separation distances, the rules shall identify those soil conditions that present a low or moderate risk of inadequate treatment or dispersal of sewage from sewage treatment systems. For low and moderate risk conditions, the required vertical separation distance shall not exceed eighteen inches except as authorized pursuant to rules adopted under divisions (A)(3)(a)(iii) and (iv) of this section. In addition, the rules shall identify those soil conditions that present a high risk of inadequate treatment or dispersal of sewage. For such high risk conditions, the vertical separation distance shall be set at a depth from twenty-four to thirty-six inches and shall not be lowered unless a reduction of vertical separation is granted in accordance with rules adopted under division (A)(3)(a)(iii) of this section. (iii) The rules shall establish options to be utilized by a board of health when approving the reductions of or compliance with vertical separation distances that are established in rules adopted under division (A)(3)(a)(ii) of this section. The options for a board of health in providing such approval shall include, but not be limited to: the use where deemed appropriate for a particular site of subsurface interceptor drains, perimeter drains, or engineered drainage; pretreatment of sewage; or soil elevation. (iv) The rules shall provide that a board of health may petition the director to increase the vertical separation distances required for sewage treatment systems in the applicable health district or a portion of the district when conditions present a high risk of inadequate treatment or dispersal of sewage. The rules also shall provide that the director may approve such a request upon a demonstration by the board of health that unusual or unique local conditions relating to terrain, bedrock, water table, soil fragments, or soil textures require the establishment of greater vertical separation distances within the jurisdiction of the board of health or a portion thereof. If, under the rules, the director of health approves a greater vertical separation distance, a board of health still may approve a reduction of that vertical separation distance for an individual sewage treatment system pursuant to rules adopted under division (A)(3)(a)(iii) of this section. Further, if, under the rules, the director approves a greater vertical separation distance, a person who is denied permission by a board of health to install or replace a sewage treatment system as a result of the director's approval may request a hearing in accordance with section 3718.11 of the Revised Code. (b) Specifications for the quality of treated sewage effluent from household sewage treatment systems that is applied to soil on the property where a household sewage treatment system is located. The specifications established in the rules for the quality of effluent from discharging systems shall comply with discharge requirements imposed by the national pollutant discharge elimination system permit program established under section 6111.03 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. (c) Requirements for the reasonable maintenance of a system according to maintenance requirements approved by the director of health as recommended by the sewage treatment system technical advisory committee or according to accepted standards and practices established in rules, as applicable. The requirements may include standards for service contracts or other arrangements that assure regular maintenance and upkeep of the system. In determining the reasonableness of a maintenance requirement, the director shall consider a manufacturer's maintenance requirements as well as all other maintenance alternatives. (4) Prescribe procedures for notification to boards of health of the approval of a sewage treatment system or components of a system by the director of health under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code; (5) Prescribe criteria and procedures under which boards of health shall issue installation permits, operation permits, and alteration permits for sewage treatment systems. The rules shall require as a condition of an installation permit that the installer of a system must warrant that the system was installed in accordance with all applicable rules and design requirements. In addition, the rules shall require a board of health, not later than sixty days after the issuance of an installation, operation, or alteration permit, to notify the director that the permit was issued. The rules shall require the notification to be in a format prescribed by the director and to include information related to the issuance of the permit. With the assistance of the department of health, a board of health, to the extent practicable, shall computerize the process of the issuance of permits for sewage treatment systems. (6) Require a board of health to inspect a sewage treatment system not later than twelve months after its installation to ensure that the system is operating properly. The rules shall require a board of health, not later than sixty days after the inspection, to certify to the director on a form provided by the director that the inspection was performed. (7) Require each board of health to develop a program for the administration of maintenance requirements established in rules adopted under division (A)(3)(c) of this section. The rules shall include requirements and procedures under which a person may demonstrate the required maintenance of a system in lieu of having an inspection conducted when an inspection otherwise is required. The rules shall require a board of health to provide written notice to a person that is demonstrating maintenance of a system in lieu of an inspection that if proof of the required maintenance of the system is not provided as required by rules, the system is subject to inspection by the board and the reasonable cost of the inspection must be paid by the person. The rules shall authorize a board of health to inspect any sewage treatment system if there is a good-faith complaint regarding the system, there is probable cause for the inspection, or proof of the required maintenance of the system has not been provided as required by rules. In addition, the rules shall authorize a board of health to inspect a sewage treatment system without prior notice in any instance in which the board has probable cause to believe that the system is endangering or threatening to endanger public health. The rules shall require that the reasonable costs for sewage effluent testing or evaluation be paid by the owner of a sewage treatment system that is being investigated. Further, the rules shall establish a methodology for determining the reasonable costs of an inspection in accordance with section 3709.09 of the Revised Code. The rules shall allow, but shall not require, a board of health to continue an inspection program that was established by the board prior to the effective date of the rules, provided that the program authorizes a person to demonstrate the required maintenance of a system in lieu of an inspection. (8) Require a board of health to register installers, service providers, and septage haulers that perform work within the health district; prescribe criteria and procedures for the registration; and prescribe criteria for a demonstration of competency as a part of the registration. The rules shall establish uniform statewide bonding requirements or other financial security requirements for installers, service providers, and septage haulers as a condition of registration within any health district. The rules shall establish a methodology by which the required amount of a bond or other security may be calculated for each installer, service provider, and septage hauler. The methodology, at a minimum, shall consider the number of systems installed or serviced and the type of system installed or serviced by an installer, service provider, or septage hauler on an annual basis. The rules shall provide that no board of health shall require an additional or different bond or security requirement as a condition of registration beyond the bonding and security requirements established in the rules adopted under division (A)(8) of this section. The rules shall establish a cost methodology for determining the fee for the registration of an installer, service provider, or septage hauler in any health district. (9) Prescribe requirements for the collection, transportation, disposal, and land application of domestic septage in this state from a sewage treatment system; (10) Require boards of health to maintain records that are determined necessary to ascertain compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under it; (11) Require the manufacturer of a sewage treatment system that is authorized for use in this state in rules adopted under this section or that is approved for use in this state under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code to provide instructions for the operation and maintenance of the system. The rules shall provide that a board of health may require a copy of a manufacturer's instructions for the operation and maintenance of a system to be filed with the board prior to the installation and use of the system in the health district in which the board has jurisdiction. In addition, the rules shall require a board of health and a manufacturer to provide a copy of the operation and maintenance instructions, if available, when a board of health or a manufacturer receives a written request for instructions. (12) Prescribe criteria for the provision of written evidence of compliance with rules pertaining to sewage treatment for purposes of sections 711.05 and 711.10 of the Revised Code; (13) Pursuant to divisions (A)(1) and (3) of this section, prescribe standards for the siting, design, installation, operation, monitoring, maintenance, and abandonment of small flow on-site sewage treatment systems that may be used in this state; (14) Prescribe minimum criteria and procedures under which boards of health may establish household sewage treatment district management programs for the purpose of providing a responsive approach toward preventing or solving sewage treatment problems resulting from household sewage treatment systems within the districts established under the program. For purposes of division (A)(14) of this section, a board of health may enter into a contract with any entity to administer a household sewage treatment district management program. (15) Prescribe standards for the use of subsurface interceptor drains, perimeter drains, and engineered drainage to remove or divert any subsurface water from an area to be used for soil absorption of sewage in the soil of a sewage treatment system; (16) Prescribe standards for the inspection of septage hauling truck tanks by boards of health, including, but not limited to, tank seal safety specifications; (17) Establish standards and testing methods to ensure that all septic tanks, other disposal component tanks, dosing tanks, pump vaults, household sewage treatment disposal system holding tanks and privy vaults, or other applicable sewage disposal system components manufactured after September 17, 2010, and used in this state are watertight and structurally sound; (18) Require a board of health to give notice and an opportunity for a hearing, pursuant to section 3718.11 of the Revised Code, to an affected property owner regarding any of the following: (a) The denial of an installation, operation, or alteration permit for a sewage treatment system; (b) The imposition of a condition on the installation of a sewage treatment system; (c) The required replacement of a sewage treatment system; (d) Any other final order or decision of a board of health that is made under this chapter concerning which a property owner is claiming to be aggrieved or adversely affected. The rules also shall establish procedures for giving such notice and for conducting the hearing required in rules adopted under division (A)(18) of this section. (19) Prescribe standards for the regulation of gray water recycling systems; (20) Prohibit a sewage treatment system from causing a public health nuisance; (21) Define economic impact for purposes of division (B) of this section and section 3718.022 of the Revised Code; (22) Establish statistical methods for evaluating sewage treatment system compliance for a twelve inch soil depth credit relative to bacterial parameters, such as fecal coliform and E. coli., that are derived from a minimum of one hundred forty-four consecutive data points. Such statistical methods shall include one of the following: (a) The upper confidence limit of the mean method using log-transformed data, with the upper confidence limit derived from one of the following: (i) A two-sided ninety-five per cent confidence interval for the mean and the maximum number of individual data points exceeding the treatment standard being five per cent; (ii) A two-sided ninety-nine per cent confidence interval for the mean and the maximum number of individual data points exceeding the treatment standard being ten per cent. (b) Any other statistical method that is equally protective of public health and welfare. The rule also shall specify that a soil depth credit shall be approved when the upper confidence limit of the mean using log-transformed data is less than the applicable fecal coliform or E. coli. treatment standard set forth in rules adopted in accordance with this division. The director may adopt other rules under division (A) of this section that the director determines are necessary to implement this chapter and to protect the public health and welfare. At least sixty days prior to adopting a rule under division (A) of this section, the director shall provide boards of health and any other interested parties an opportunity to comment on the rule. (B)(1) In accordance with section 3709.20 or 3709.21 of the Revised Code, as applicable, and subject to review by and approval of the director under division (C) of section 3718.05 of the Revised Code, a board of health may adopt rules necessary for the public health providing for more stringent standards than those established in rules adopted by the director under division (A) of this section. In proposing or adopting the rules, a board of health shall consider and document the economic impact of the rules on property owners within the applicable health district. (2) A board that intends to adopt rules shall notify the department of health of the proposed rules and submit a copy of the proposed rules and the documentation of the economic impact of the rules at least ninety days prior to the proposed date of adoption. The director shall approve or disapprove any such proposed rule within ninety days after receiving a copy of the proposed rule from the board of health. (3) In reviewing a proposed rule, the director shall approve the rule if all of the following apply: (a) The proposed rule is not in conflict with this chapter or rules adopted under it. (b) The proposed rule is authorized by division (B) of this section. (c) The proposed rule is no less stringent than rules adopted by the director. (d) Unless otherwise authorized by this chapter or rules adopted under it, the proposed rule does not require design changes to a sewage treatment system, or component thereof, that differ from a design authorized in rules adopted under division (A) of this section, including rules adopted under division (A)(1) or (A)(3)(a)(iii) or (iv) of this section, or approved by the director under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code. (e) The proposed rule does not require operation or maintenance procedures for a sewage treatment system that conflict with operation or maintenance procedures authorized in rules adopted under division (A) of this section, including rules adopted under division (A)(1) or (A)(3)(a)(iii) or (iv) of this section, or approved by the director under section 3718.04 of the Revised Code. (4) If a board of health fails to submit a proposed rule to the director or fails to demonstrate that the board has considered the economic impact of the proposed rule, the rule shall have no force or effect and is not enforceable. (C) The director shall not adopt rules under this chapter requiring a soil evaluator or soil scientist to evaluate the soil type and slope with respect to a sewage treatment system or a proposed sewage treatment system. Sec. 3718.04. (A) A manufacturer seeking approval for the installation and use of a sewage treatment system or a component of a system in this state that differs in design or function from systems or components of systems the use of which is authorized in rules adopted under section 3718.02 of the Revised Code shall request an application form from the department of health. The applicant shall complete the form and include with it all of the information that is required by the department and the sewage treatment system technical advisory committee. The applicant shall submit a completed application and all required information to the director of health. (B) Upon receipt of an application, the director shall examine the application and all accompanying information to determine if the application is complete. If the director determines that the application is not complete, the director shall notify the applicant not later than sixty days after submission of the application that the application is not complete, provide a description of the information that is missing from the application, and return the application and all accompanying information to the applicant. The applicant may resubmit the application to the director if the application includes the information that was identified by the director. Not later than thirty days after receipt of a complete application, the director shall notify the committee of the complete application and send a copy of the complete application and all accompanying information to the committee together with a request that the committee recommend that the director approve or disapprove the system. Not later than ninety days after receipt of a complete application, the committee shall recommend approval or disapproval of the application and submit its recommendation in writing to the director. The director shall approve or disapprove the application not later than sixty days after the committee submits its recommendation to the director or, if the committee fails to recommend approval or disapproval within the required time, not later than one hundred twenty days after the submission of a complete application. If the director fails to approve or disapprove an application within the required time, the application shall be deemed approved. (C) In approving or disapproving an application, the director shall use the standards, guidelines, and protocols that the committee developed with the department for that purpose. The director shall not approve an application that fails to comply with those standards, guidelines, and protocols. If the committee recommends approval or disapproval of an application, the director shall consider the committee's recommendation before approving or disapproving the application. If the committee fails to provide advice or if the committee fails to recommend approval or disapproval of the application within the required time, the director may approve or disapprove the application without considering the advice of the committee. The director shall establish and include any appropriate terms and conditions with the approval of a sewage treatment system or component of a system for use in this state. For purposes of establishing soil absorption specifications for a sewage treatment system, the terms and conditions shall include standards regarding the sizing of the system. (D) If the director approves an application under this section, the director shall notify the applicant in writing. The director also shall notify boards of health in accordance with the procedures established in rules adopted under section 3718.02 of the Revised Code that the sewage treatment system or component of a system that is the subject of the application is approved for statewide use. If the director disapproves an application under this section, the director shall notify the applicant in writing and provide a brief explanation for the disapproval. (E) Decisions of the director approving or disapproving applications under this section may be appealed in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (F) No approval shall be required under this section with respect to a sewage treatment system or component of a system that has been approved by the director prior to the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 17, 2010, unless the manufacturer of the system or component changes the design or seeks modifications to any terms and conditions of the prior approval. (G) The director may revoke the approval of a sewage treatment system or component of a system if the director finds, based on substantial evidence, that the system or component fails to comply with applicable standards for the system or component. The revocation of an approval under this division may be appealed in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (H)(1) The director shall not implement or enforce any special device approval or similar policy imposing additional requirements or restrictions on a sewage treatment system or component of a system that combines the treatment of effluent with subsurface dispersal of treated effluent directly to the soil, sand bed, or gravel for any approval in effect as of December 31, 2020. (2) If the director issued an approval for such a system and the approval was in effect as of December 31, 2020, the system may be modified upon request by the manufacturer if the system meets the intent of applicable standards, guidelines, and protocols. However, the system's approval otherwise remains valid under the original terms and conditions and may not be revoked or subjected to any new application or monitoring requirements unless clear, independent statistically significant evidence demonstrates that the system design consistently underperforms relative to gravel distribution trenches. (3) Divisions (H)(1) and (2) of this section apply only to subsurface dispersal systems or components of a system and do not apply to effluent discharged into waters of the state. Sec. 3719.04. (A) A person identified in division (B)(1)(a) of section 4729.52 of the Revised Code who holds a category III license issued under that section 4729.52 of the Revised Code granting authority with respect to controlled substances may sell at wholesale controlled substances to any of the following persons and is subject to the following conditions: (1) To another person who holds a category III license issued under section 4729.52 of the Revised Code granting authority with respect to controlled substances or to a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs with a category III license issued under section 4729.54 of the Revised Code granting authority with respect to controlled substances; (2) To a person in the employ of the United States government or of any state, territorial, district, county, municipal, or insular government, purchasing, receiving, possessing, or dispensing controlled substances by reason of official duties; (3) To a master of a ship or a person in charge of any aircraft upon which no physician is regularly employed, for the actual medical needs of persons on board the ship or aircraft, when not in port; provided such controlled substances shall be sold to the master of the ship or person in charge of the aircraft only in pursuance of a special official written order approved by a commissioned medical officer or acting assistant surgeon of the United States public health service; (4) To a person in a foreign country, if the federal drug abuse control laws are complied with. (B) An official written order for any schedule II controlled substances shall comply with all requirements of the federal drug abuse control laws and rules adopted by the state board of pharmacy. Except as provided in section 3719.05 of the Revised Code or as otherwise specified in rules adopted by the board, each party engaged in the sale of schedule II controlled substances shall maintain all records relating to the order for a period of five years in such a way as to be readily accessible for inspection by any public officer or employee engaged in the enforcement of this chapter. Sec. 3721.074. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Independent living facility" has the same meaning as in section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. (2) "Residential facility" has the same meaning as in section 5119.34 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, an independent living facility or residential facility that applies to the director of health pursuant to section 3721.07 of the Revised Code for a license as a residential care facility may continue to operate as an independent living facility or residential facility in accordance with this section during the period of time that the application is under consideration by the director. (2) An independent living facility or residential facility shall not provide care to more than two residents while its application under section 3721.07 of the Revised Code is pending. Sec. 3721.32. (A) The director of health shall establish a state nurse aide registry listing all individuals who have done any of the following: (1) Were used by a long-term care facility as nurse aides on a full-time, temporary, per diem, or other basis at any time during the period commencing July 1, 1989, and ending January 1, 1990, and successfully completed, not later than October 1, 1990, a competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section; (2) Successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or met the conditions specified in division (F)(1) or (2) of section 3721.28 of the Revised Code, and, if the training and competency evaluation program or the training, instruction, or education the individual completed in meeting the conditions specified in division (F)(1) of section 3721.28 of the Revised Code was conducted in or by a long-term care facility, has successfully completed a competency evaluation program conducted by the director; (3) Successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code; (4) Successfully completed, prior to July 1, 1989, a program that the director has determined under division (B)(3) of section 3721.28 of the Revised Code included a competency evaluation component no less stringent than the competency evaluation programs approved or conducted by the director under section 3721.31 of the Revised Code, and was otherwise comparable to the training and competency evaluation program being approved by the director under section 3721.31 of the Revised Code; (5) Are listed in a nurse aide registry maintained by another state that certifies that its program for training and evaluation of competency of nurse aides complies with Titles XVIII and XIX of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, or regulations adopted thereunder; (6) Were found competent, as provided in division (B)(5) of section 3721.28 of the Revised Code, prior to July 1, 1989, after the completion of a course of nurse aide training of at least one hundred hours' duration; (7) Are enrolled in a prelicensure program of nursing education approved by the board of nursing or by an agency of another state that regulates nursing education, have provided the long-term care facility with a certificate from the program indicating that the individual has successfully completed the courses that teach basic nursing skills including infection control, safety and emergency procedures, and personal care, and have successfully completed a competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code; (8) Have the equivalent of twelve months or more of full-time employment in the five years preceding listing in the registry as a hospital aide or orderly and have successfully completed a competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code; (9) Successfully completed a prelicensure program of nursing education approved by the board of nursing under section 4723.06 of the Revised Code or by an agency of another state that regulates nursing education and passed the examination accepted by the board of nursing under section 4723.10 of the Revised Code, which shall be deemed as successfully completing a competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code; (10) Successfully completed both of the following: (a) A training course provided by the United States department of veterans affairs in a community living center operated by the department of veterans affairs that the director of health determines is similar to a training and competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code; (b) A competency evaluation program conducted by the director of health under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code. (B) In addition to the list of individuals required by division (A) of this section, the registry shall include both of the following: (1) The statement required by section 3721.23 of the Revised Code detailing findings by the director under that section regarding alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a resident or misappropriation of resident property; (2) Any statement provided by an individual under section 3721.23 of the Revised Code disputing the director's findings. Whenever an inquiry is received as to the information contained in the registry concerning an individual about whom a statement required by section 3721.23 of the Revised Code is included in the registry, the director shall disclose the statement or a summary of the statement together with any statement provided by the individual under section 3721.23 or a clear and accurate summary of that statement. (C) The director may by rule specify additional information that must be provided to the registry by long-term care facilities and persons or government agencies conducting approved training and competency evaluation programs. (D) Information contained in the registry is a public record for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, and is subject to inspection and copying under section 1347.08 of the Revised Code. (E) An individual who is listed on the registry in good standing shall be referred to as a certified nurse aide. Only individuals listed on the registry shall use the designation "certified nurse aide" or "CNA." Sec. 3722.15. (A) A hospital that is a medicaid provider and that operates a maternity unit shall agree to a written transfer agreement with any freestanding birthing center if both of the following apply: (1) The freestanding birthing center is located within a thirty mile radius of the hospital. (2) The freestanding birthing center has requested a transfer agreement. (B) A transfer agreement shall specify an effective procedure for the safe and immediate transfer of patients from the freestanding birthing center to the hospital when medical care beyond the care that can be provided at the freestanding birthing center is necessary, including when emergency situations occur or medical complications arise. (C) The freestanding birthing center shall file a copy of the transfer agreement with the director of health. Sec. 3727.46. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Facility fee" means the portion of a bill for health care treatment that covers all the costs of delivering patient care, except for those that are billed by one or more physicians and other professionals. (2) "Governmental health plan" means a plan established or maintained for its beneficiaries by the government of the United States, the government of any state or political subdivision thereof, or by any agency or instrumentality of the government of the United States or the government of any state or political subdivision thereof, including medicare and medicaid managed care organization plans. (3) "Hospital" means an institution or facility licensed under Chapter 3722. of the Revised Code. (4) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery. (5) "Primary care services" means professional comprehensive personal health services, which may include health education and disease prevention, treatment of uncomplicated health problems, diagnosis of chronic health problems, and management of health care services for an individual. "Primary care services" does not include imaging services or diagnostic testing performed in a primary care setting. (6) "Third-party payor" means an entity, excluding any governmental health plan, that is, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care service. (7) "Self-pay individual" means an individual who does not have benefits for a health care service under a health plan offered by a third-party payor or who does not seek to have a claim for that service submitted to the third-party payer for payment. (B)(1) Beginning January 1, 2028, and subject to division (B)(2) of this section, a medical practice specializing in primary care that is owned or operated by a hospital or hospital system shall not require a self-pay individual or third-party payor to pay a facility fee in connection with any primary care service provided to a patient at the practice. (2) The prohibition described in division (B)(1) of this section applies only if both of the following are the case: (a) The medical practice was owned or operated solely by a physician or group of physicians at the time of its purchase by the hospital or hospital system; (b) The hospital or hospital system purchased the medical practice after January 1, 2010. (C) This section shall not be construed to apply to a medical practice specializing in primary care that is established by a hospital or hospital system. Sec. 3728.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Administer epinephrine" means to inject an individual with epinephrine using an autoinjector in a manufactured dosage form. (B) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 109.71 of the Revised Code and also includes a sheriff. (C) "Prescriber" means an individual who is authorized by law to prescribe drugs or dangerous drugs or drug therapy related devices in the course of the individual's professional practice, including only the following: (1) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner who holds a certificate to prescribe issued under section 4723.48 of the Revised Code; (2) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; (3) A physician assistant who is licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority. (D) "Qualified entity" means either of the following: (1) Any public or private entity that is associated with a location where allergens capable of causing anaphylaxis may be present, including child care centers, colleges and universities, places of employment, restaurants, amusement parks, recreation camps, sports playing fields and arenas, and other similar locations, except that "qualified entity" does not include either of the following: (a) A chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; community school; science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school; college-preparatory boarding school; or a school operated by the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, as those entities are otherwise authorized to procure epinephrine autoinjectors pursuant to sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, or 3328.29 of the Revised Code; (b) A camp described in section 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code that is authorized to procure epinephrine autoinjectors pursuant to that section; (2) Either of the following served by a peace officer: a law enforcement agency or other entity described in division (A) of section 109.71 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3734.021. (A) Infectious wastes shall be segregated, managed, treated, and disposed of in accordance with rules adopted under this section. (B) The director of environmental protection, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules necessary or appropriate to protect human health or safety or the environment that do both of the following: (1) Establish standards for generators of infectious wastes that include, without limitation, the following requirements and authorizations that: (a) All generators of infectious wastes: (i) Either treat all specimen cultures and cultures of viable infectious agents on the premises where they are generated to render them noninfectious by methods, techniques, or practices prescribed by rules adopted under division (B)(2)(a) of this section before they are transported off that premises for disposal or ensure that such wastes are treated to render them noninfectious at an infectious waste treatment facility off that premises prior to disposal of the wastes; (ii) Transport and dispose of infectious wastes, if a generator produces fewer than fifty pounds of infectious wastes during any one month that are subject to and packaged and labeled in accordance with federal requirements, in the same manner as solid wastes. Such generators who treat specimen cultures and cultures of viable infectious agents on the premises where they are generated shall not be considered treatment facilities as "treatment" and "facility" are defined in section 3734.01 of the Revised Code. (iii) Dispose of infectious wastes subject to and treated in accordance with rules adopted under division (B)(1)(a)(i) of this section in the same manner as solid wastes; (iv) May take wastes generated in providing care to a patient by an emergency medical services organization, as defined in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code, to and leave them at a hospital, as defined in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code, for treatment at a treatment facility owned or operated by the hospital or, in conjunction with infectious wastes generated by the hospital, at another treatment facility regardless of whether the wastes were generated in providing care to the patient at the scene of an emergency or during the transportation of the patient to a hospital; (v) May take wastes generated by an individual for purposes of the individual's own care or treatment to and leave them at a hospital, as defined in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code, for treatment at a treatment facility owned or operated by the hospital or, in conjunction with infectious wastes generated by the hospital, at another treatment facility. (b) Each generator of fifty pounds or more of infectious wastes during any one month: (i) Register with the environmental protection agency as a generator of infectious wastes and obtain a registration certificate. The fee for issuance of a generator registration certificate is one hundred forty dollars payable at the time of application. The registration certificate applies to all the premises owned or operated by the generator in this state where infectious wastes are generated and shall list the address of each such premises. If a generator owns or operates facilities for the treatment of infectious wastes it generates, the certificate shall list the address and method of treatment used at each such facility. A generator registration certificate is valid for three years from the date of issuance and shall be renewed for a term of three years upon the generator's submission of an application for renewal and payment of a one hundred forty dollar renewal fee. The rules may establish a system of staggered renewal dates with approximately one-third of such certificates subject to renewal each year. The applicable renewal date shall be prescribed on each registration certificate. Registration fees shall be prorated according to the time remaining in the registration cycle to the nearest year. The registration and renewal fees collected under division (B)(1)(b)(i) of this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the waste management fund created in section 3734.061 of the Revised Code. (ii) Segregate infectious wastes from other wastes at the point of generation. Nothing in this section and rules adopted under it prohibits a generator of infectious wastes from designating and managing any wastes, in addition to those defined as infectious wastes under section 3734.01 of the Revised Code, as infectious wastes. After designating any such other wastes as infectious, the generator shall manage those wastes in compliance with the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under it applicable to the management of infectious wastes. (iii) Either treat the infectious wastes that it generates at a facility owned or operated by the generator by methods, techniques, or practices prescribed by rules adopted under division (B)(2)(a) of this section to render them noninfectious, or designate the wastes for treatment off that premises at an infectious waste treatment facility holding a license issued under division (B) of section 3734.05 of the Revised Code, at an infectious waste treatment facility that is located in another state that is in compliance with applicable state and federal laws, or at a treatment facility authorized by rules adopted under division (B)(2)(d) of this section, prior to disposal of the wastes. After being treated to render them noninfectious, the wastes shall be disposed of at a solid waste disposal facility holding a license issued under division (A) of section 3734.05 of the Revised Code or at a disposal facility in another state that is in compliance with applicable state and federal laws. (iv) Not compact or grind any type of infectious wastes prior to treatment in accordance with rules adopted under division (B)(2)(a) of this section; (v) May discharge untreated liquid or semiliquid infectious wastes consisting of blood, blood products, body fluids, and excreta into a disposal system, as defined in section 6111.01 of the Revised Code, unless the discharge of those wastes into a disposal system is inconsistent with the terms and conditions of the permit for the system issued under Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code; (vi) May transport or cause to be transported infectious wastes that have been treated to render them noninfectious in the same manner as solid wastes are transported. (2) Establish standards for owners and operators of infectious waste treatment facilities that include, without limitation, the following requirements and authorizations that: (a) Require treatment of all wastes received to be performed in accordance with methods, techniques, and practices approved by the director; (b) Govern the location, design, construction, and operation of infectious waste treatment facilities. The rules adopted under division (B)(2)(b) of this section shall require that a new infectious waste incineration facility be located so that the incinerator unit and all areas where infectious wastes are handled on the premises where the facility is proposed to be located are at least three hundred feet inside the property line of the tract of land on which the facility is proposed to be located and are at least one thousand feet from any domicile, school, prison, or jail that is in existence on the date on which the application for the permit to establish the incinerator is submitted under division (B)(2)(b) of section 3734.05 of the Revised Code. (c) Establish quality control and testing procedures to ensure compliance with the rules adopted under division (B)(2)(b) of this section; (d) Authorize infectious wastes to be treated at a facility that holds a license or renewal of a license to operate a crematory facility issued under Chapter 4717., and a permit issued under Chapter 3704., of the Revised Code to the extent that the treatment of those wastes is consistent with that permit and its terms and conditions. The rules adopted under divisions (B)(2)(b) and (c) of this section do not apply to a facility holding such a license and permit. In adopting the rules required by divisions (B)(2)(a) to (d) of this section, the director shall consider and, to the maximum feasible extent, utilize existing standards and guidelines established by professional and governmental organizations having expertise in the fields of infection control and infectious wastes management. (e) Require shipping papers to accompany shipments of wastes that have been treated to render them noninfectious. The shipping papers shall include only the following elements: (i) The name of the owner or operator of the facility where the wastes were treated and the address of the treatment facility; (ii) A certification by the owner or operator of the treatment facility where the wastes were treated indicating that the wastes have been treated by the methods, techniques, and practices prescribed in rules adopted under division (B)(2)(a) of this section. (C) This section and rules adopted under it do not apply to the treatment or disposal of wastes consisting of dead animals or parts thereof, or the blood of animals: (1) By the owner of the animal after slaughter by the owner on the owner's premises to obtain meat for consumption by the owner and the members of the owner's household; (2) In accordance with Chapter 941. of the Revised Code; or (3) By persons who are subject to any of the following: (a) Inspection under the "Federal Meat Inspection Act," 81 Stat. 584 (1967), 21 U.S.C.A. 603, as amended; (b) Chapter 918. of the Revised Code; (c) Chapter 953. of the Revised Code. (D) As used in this section, "generator" means a person who produces infectious wastes at a specific premises. (E) Rules adopted under this section shall not concern or relate to personnel policies, salaries, wages, fringe benefits, or other conditions of employment of employees of persons owning or operating infectious waste treatment facilities. (F)(1) The director, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules governing the issuance, modification, revocation, suspension, and denial of variances from the rules adopted under division (B) of this section. Variances shall be issued, modified, revoked, suspended, or denied in accordance with division (F) of this section, rules adopted under it, and Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code. (2) A person who desires to obtain a variance or renew a variance from the rules adopted under division (B) of this section shall submit to the director an application as prescribed by the director. The application shall contain detail plans, specifications, and information regarding objectives, procedures, controls, and any other information that the director may require. The director shall issue, renew, or deny a variance or renewal of a variance within six months of the date on which the director receives a complete application with all required information and data. (3) The director may hold a public hearing on an application submitted under division (F) of this section for a variance at a location in the county in which the operations that are the subject of the application for a variance or renewal of variance are conducted. Not less than twenty days before the hearing, the director shall provide to the applicant notice of the hearing by certified mail or by another type of mail that is accompanied by a receipt and shall publish notice of the hearing at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the hearing is to be held or may instead provide public notice by publication on the environmental protection agency's web site. The director shall make a complete stenographic record or electronic record of testimony and other evidence submitted at the hearing. Not later than ten days after the hearing, the director shall make a written determination to issue, renew, or deny the variance and shall enter the determination and the basis for it into the record of the hearing. (4) A variance shall not be issued, modified, revoked, or denied under division (F) of this section until the director has considered the relative interests of the applicant, other persons and property that will be affected by the variance, and the general public. The director shall grant a variance only if the applicant demonstrates to the director's satisfaction that the requested action will not create a nuisance or a hazard to the health or safety of the public or to the environment. In granting a variance, the director shall state the specific provision or provisions whose terms are to be varied and also shall state specific terms or conditions imposed on the applicant in place of the provision or provisions. (5) A variance granted under division (F) of this section shall be for a period specified by the director and may be renewed from time to time on terms and for periods that the director determines to be appropriate. The director may order the person to whom a variance has been issued to take action within the time that the director determines to be appropriate and reasonable to prevent the creation of a nuisance or a hazard to the health or safety of the public or to the environment. (6) An application submitted under division (F) of this section shall not be denied and a variance shall not be revoked or modified under that division without a written order of the director stating the findings on which the denial, revocation, or modification is based. A copy of the order shall be sent to the applicant or holder of a variance by certified mail or by another type of mail that is accompanied by a receipt. (7) The director shall make available for public inspection at the principal office of the environmental protection agency a current list of pending applications for variances submitted under division (F) of this section and a current schedule of pending variance hearings under it. Sec. 3734.05. (A)(1) Except as provided in divisions (A)(6) and (7) of this section, no person shall operate or maintain a solid waste facility without a license issued under this division by the board of health of the health district in which the facility is located or by the director of environmental protection when the health district in which the facility is located is not on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code. During the month of December, but before the first day of January of the next year, every person proposing to continue to operate an existing solid waste facility shall procure a license under this division to operate the facility for that year from the board of health of the health district in which the facility is located or, if the health district is not on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code, from the director. The application for such a license shall be submitted to the board of health or to the director, as appropriate, on or before the last day of September of the year preceding that for which the license is sought. In addition to the application fee prescribed in division (A)(2) of this section, a person who submits an application after that date shall pay an additional ten per cent of the amount of the application fee for each week that the application is late. Late payment fees accompanying an application submitted to the board of health shall be credited to the special fund of the health district created in division (B) of section 3734.06 of the Revised Code, and late payment fees accompanying an application submitted to the director shall be credited to the general revenue fund. A person who has received a license, upon sale or disposition of a solid waste facility, and upon consent of the board of health and the director, may have the license transferred to another person. The board of health or the director may include such terms and conditions in a license or revision to a license as are appropriate to ensure compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it. The terms and conditions may establish the authorized maximum daily waste receipts for the facility. Limitations on maximum daily waste receipts shall be specified in cubic yards of volume for the purpose of regulating the design, construction, and operation of solid waste facilities. Terms and conditions included in a license or revision to a license by a board of health shall be consistent with, and pertain only to the subjects addressed in, the rules adopted under division (A) of section 3734.02 and division (D) of section 3734.12 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) Except as provided in divisions (A)(2)(b), (6), and (7) of this section, each person proposing to open a new solid waste facility or to modify an existing solid waste facility shall submit an application for a permit with accompanying detail plans and specifications to the environmental protection agency for required approval under the rules adopted by the director pursuant to division (A) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code and applicable rules adopted under division (D) of section 3734.12 of the Revised Code at least two hundred seventy days before proposed operation of the facility and shall concurrently make application for the issuance of a license under division (A)(1) of this section with the board of health of the health district in which the proposed facility is to be located. (b) On and after the effective date of the rules adopted under division (A) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3734.12 of the Revised Code governing solid waste transfer facilities, each person proposing to open a new solid waste transfer facility or to modify an existing solid waste transfer facility shall submit an application for a permit with accompanying engineering detail plans, specifications, and information regarding the facility and its method of operation to the environmental protection agency for required approval under those rules at least two hundred seventy days before commencing proposed operation of the facility and concurrently shall make application for the issuance of a license under division (A)(1) of this section with the board of health of the health district in which the facility is located or proposed. (c) Each application for a permit under division (A)(2)(a) or (b) of this section shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of four hundred dollars that shall be credited to the general revenue fund. Each application for an annual license under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of one hundred dollars. If the application for an annual license is submitted to a board of health on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code, the application fee shall be credited to the special fund of the health district created in division (B) of section 3734.06 of the Revised Code. If the application for an annual license is submitted to the director, the application fee shall be credited to the general revenue fund. If a permit or license is issued, the amount of the application fee paid shall be deducted from the amount of the permit fee due under division (Q)(P) of section 3745.11 of the Revised Code or the amount of the license fee due under division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 3734.06 of the Revised Code. (d) As used in divisions (A)(2)(d), (e), and (f) of this section, "modify" means any of the following: (i) Any increase of more than ten per cent in the total capacity of a solid waste facility; (ii) Any expansion of the limits of solid waste placement at a solid waste facility; (iii) Any increase in the depth of excavation at a solid waste facility; (iv) Any change in the technique of waste receipt or type of waste received at a solid waste facility that may endanger human health, as determined by the director by rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Not later than forty-five days after submitting an application under division (A)(2)(a) or (b) of this section for a permit to open a new or modify an existing solid waste facility, the applicant, in conjunction with an officer or employee of the environmental protection agency, shall hold a public meeting on the application within the county in which the new or modified solid waste facility is or is proposed to be located or within a contiguous county. Not Not less than thirty days before holding the public meeting on the application, the applicant shall publish notice of the meeting in each newspaper of general circulation that is published in the county in which the facility is or is proposed to be located. If no newspaper of general circulation is published in the county, the applicant shall publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. The notice shall contain the date, time, and location of the public meeting and a general description of the proposed new or modified facility. Not Not later than five days after publishing the notice, the applicant shall send by certified mail a copy of the notice and the date the notice was published to the director and the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, township, and county, and to the chief executive officer of each municipal corporation, in which the facility is or is proposed to be located. At At the public meeting, the applicant shall provide information and describe the application and respond to comments or questions concerning the application, and the officer or employee of the agency shall describe the permit application process. At the public meeting, any person may submit written or oral comments on or objections to the application. Not Not more than thirty days after the public meeting, the applicant shall provide the director with a copy of a transcript of the full meeting, copies of any exhibits, displays, or other materials presented by the applicant at the meeting, and the original copy of any written comments submitted at the meeting. (e) Except as provided in division (A)(2)(f) of this section, prior to taking an action, other than a proposed or final denial, upon an application submitted under division (A)(2)(a) of this section for a permit to open a new or modify an existing solid waste facility, the director shall hold a public information session and a public hearing on the application within the county in which the new or modified solid waste facility is or is proposed to be located or within a contiguous county. If the application is for a permit to open a new solid waste facility, the director shall hold the hearing not less than fourteen days after the information session. If the application is for a permit to modify an existing solid waste facility, the director may hold both the information session and the hearing on the same day unless any individual affected by the application requests in writing that the information session and the hearing not be held on the same day, in which case the director shall hold the hearing not less than fourteen days after the information session. The director shall publish notice of the public information session or public hearing not less than thirty days before holding the information session or hearing, as applicable. The notice shall be published in each newspaper of general circulation that is published in the county in which the facility is or is proposed to be located. If no newspaper of general circulation is published in the county, the director shall publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or by publication on the environmental protection agency's official web site. The notice shall contain the date, time, and location of the information session or hearing, as applicable, and a general description of the proposed new or modified facility. At the public information session, an officer or employee of the environmental protection agency shall describe the status of the permit application and be available to respond to comments or questions concerning the application. At the public hearing, any person may submit written or oral comments on or objections to the approval of the application. The applicant, or a representative of the applicant who has knowledge of the location, construction, and operation of the facility, shall attend the information session and public hearing to respond to comments or questions concerning the facility directed to the applicant or representative by the officer or employee of the environmental protection agency presiding at the information session and hearing. (f) The solid waste management policy committee of a county or joint solid waste management district may adopt a resolution requesting expeditious consideration of a specific application submitted under division (A)(2)(a) of this section for a permit to modify an existing solid waste facility within the district. The resolution shall make the finding that expedited consideration of the application without the public information session and public hearing under division (A)(2)(e) of this section is in the public interest and will not endanger human health, as determined by the director by rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Upon receiving such a resolution, the director, at the director's discretion, may issue a final action upon the application without holding a public information session or public hearing pursuant to division (A)(2)(e) of this section. (3) The director may issue an order in accordance with Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code to the owner or operator of a solid waste facility requiring the person to submit to the director updated engineering detail plans, specifications, and information regarding the facility and its method of operation for approval under rules adopted under division (A) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code and applicable rules adopted under division (D) of section 3734.12 of the Revised Code if, in the director's judgment, conditions at the facility constitute a substantial threat to public health or safety or are causing or contributing to or threatening to cause or contribute to air or water pollution or soil contamination. Any person who receives such an order shall submit the updated engineering detail plans, specifications, and information to the director within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of the order. (4) The director shall act upon any updated engineering plans, specifications, and information submitted under division (A)(3) of this section within one hundred eighty days after receiving them. If the director issues an order disapproving the plans, specifications, and information submitted under division (A)(3) of this section, the order shall include all of the following requirements: (a) That the owner or operator submit a plan for closure and post-closure care of the facility to the director for approval within six months after issuance of the order; (b) That the owner or operator cease accepting solid wastes for disposal or transfer at the facility; and (c) The owner or operator commence closure of the facility not later than one year after issuance of the order. If the director determines that closure of the facility within that one-year period would result in the unavailability of sufficient solid waste management facility capacity within the county or joint solid waste management district in which the facility is located to dispose of or transfer the solid waste generated within the district, the director in the order of disapproval may postpone commencement of closure of the facility for such period of time as the director finds necessary for the board of county commissioners or directors of the district to secure access to or for there to be constructed within the district sufficient solid waste management facility capacity to meet the needs of the district, provided that the director shall certify in the director's order that postponing the date for commencement of closure will not endanger ground water or any property surrounding the facility, allow methane gas migration to occur, or cause or contribute to any other type of environmental damage. If an emergency need for disposal capacity that may affect public health and safety exists as a result of closure of a facility under division (A)(4) of this section, the director may issue an order designating another solid waste facility to accept the wastes that would have been disposed of at the facility to be closed. (5) If the director determines that standards more stringent than those applicable in rules adopted under division (A) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3734.12 of the Revised Code, or standards pertaining to subjects not specifically addressed by those rules, are necessary to ensure that a solid waste facility constructed at the proposed location will not cause a nuisance, cause or contribute to water pollution, or endanger public health or safety, the director may issue a permit for the facility with such terms and conditions as the director finds necessary to protect public health and safety and the environment. If a permit is issued, the director shall state in the order issuing it the specific findings supporting each such term or condition. (6) Divisions (A)(1) and (2)(a) of this section do not apply to a solid waste compost facility that accepts exclusively source separated yard wastes and that is registered under division (C) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code or, unless otherwise provided in rules adopted under division (N)(3) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code, to a solid waste compost facility if the director has adopted rules establishing an alternative system for authorizing the establishment, operation, or modification of a solid waste compost facility under that division. (7) Divisions (A)(1) to (5) of this section do not apply to scrap tire collection, storage, monocell, monofill, and recovery facilities. The approval of plans and specifications, as applicable, and the issuance of registration certificates, permits, and licenses for those facilities are subject to sections 3734.75 to 3734.78 of the Revised Code, as applicable, and section 3734.81 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) No person shall operate or maintain an infectious waste treatment facility without a license issued by the board of health of the health district in which the facility is located or by the director when the health district in which the facility is located is not on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) During the month of December, but before the first day of January of the next year, every person proposing to continue to operate an existing infectious waste treatment facility shall procure a license to operate the facility for that year from the board of health of the health district in which the facility is located or, if the health district is not on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code, from the director. The application for such a license shall be submitted to the board of health or to the director, as appropriate, on or before the last day of September of the year preceding that for which the license is sought. In addition to the application fee prescribed in division (B)(2)(c) of this section, a person who submits an application after that date shall pay an additional ten per cent of the amount of the application fee for each week that the application is late. Late payment fees accompanying an application submitted to the board of health shall be credited to the special infectious waste fund of the health district created in division (C) of section 3734.06 of the Revised Code, and late payment fees accompanying an application submitted to the director shall be credited to the general revenue fund. A person who has received a license, upon sale or disposition of an infectious waste treatment facility and upon consent of the board of health and the director, may have the license transferred to another person. The board of health or the director may include such terms and conditions in a license or revision to a license as are appropriate to ensure compliance with the infectious waste provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under them. (b) Each person proposing to open a new infectious waste treatment facility or to modify an existing infectious waste treatment facility shall submit an application for a permit with accompanying detail plans and specifications to the environmental protection agency for required approval under the rules adopted by the director pursuant to section 3734.021 of the Revised Code two hundred seventy days before proposed operation of the facility and concurrently shall make application for a license with the board of health of the health district in which the facility is or is proposed to be located. Not later than ninety days after receiving a complete application under division (B)(2)(b) of this section for a permit to open a new infectious waste treatment facility or modify an existing infectious waste treatment facility to expand its treatment capacity, or receiving a complete application under division (A)(2)(a) of this section for a permit to open a new solid waste incineration facility, or modify an existing solid waste incineration facility to also treat infectious wastes or to increase its infectious waste treatment capacity, that pertains to a facility for which a notation authorizing infectious waste treatment is included or proposed to be included in the solid waste incineration facility's license pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section, the director shall hold a public hearing on the application within the county in which the new or modified infectious waste or solid waste facility is or is proposed to be located or within a contiguous county. Not less than thirty days before holding the public hearing on the application, the director shall publish notice of the hearing in each newspaper that has general circulation and that is published in the county in which the facility is or is proposed to be located. If there is no newspaper that has general circulation and that is published in the county, the director shall publish the notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or by publication on the environmental protection agency's official web site. The notice shall contain the date, time, and location of the public hearing and a general description of the proposed new or modified facility. At the public hearing, any person may submit written or oral comments on or objections to the approval or disapproval of the application. The applicant, or a representative of the applicant who has knowledge of the location, construction, and operation of the facility, shall attend the public hearing to respond to comments or questions concerning the facility directed to the applicant or representative by the officer or employee of the environmental protection agency presiding at the hearing. (c) Each application for a permit under division (B)(2)(b) of this section shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of four hundred dollars that shall be credited to the general revenue fund. Each application for an annual license under division (B)(2)(a) of this section shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of one hundred dollars. If the application for an annual license is submitted to a board of health on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code, the application fee shall be credited to the special infectious waste fund of the health district created in division (C) of section 3734.06 of the Revised Code. If the application for an annual license is submitted to the director, the application fee shall be credited to the general revenue fund. If a permit or license is issued, the amount of the application fee paid shall be deducted from the amount of the permit fee due under division (Q)(P) of section 3745.11 of the Revised Code or the amount of the license fee due under division (C) of section 3734.06 of the Revised Code. (d) The director may issue an order in accordance with Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code to the owner or operator of an infectious waste treatment facility requiring the person to submit to the director updated engineering detail plans, specifications, and information regarding the facility and its method of operation for approval under rules adopted under section 3734.021 of the Revised Code if, in the director's judgment, conditions at the facility constitute a substantial threat to public health or safety or are causing or contributing to or threatening to cause or contribute to air or water pollution or soil contamination. Any person who receives such an order shall submit the updated engineering detail plans, specifications, and information to the director within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of the order. (e) The director shall act on any updated engineering plans, specifications, and information submitted under division (B)(2)(d) of this section within one hundred eighty days after receiving them. If the director disapproves any such updated engineering plans, specifications, and information, the director shall include in the order disapproving the plans the requirement that the owner or operator cease accepting infectious wastes for treatment at the facility. (3) Division (B) of this section does not apply to a generator of infectious wastes that meets any of the following conditions: (a) Treats, by methods, techniques, and practices established by rules adopted under division (B)(2)(a) of section 3734.021 of the Revised Code, any of the following wastes: (i) Infectious wastes that are generated on any premises that are owned or operated by the generator; (ii) Infectious wastes that are generated by a generator who has staff privileges at a hospital as defined in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code; (iii) Infectious wastes that are generated in providing care to a patient by an emergency medical services organization as defined in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (b) Holds a license or renewal of a license to operate a crematory facility issued under Chapter 4717. and a permit issued under Chapter 3704. of the Revised Code; (c) Treats or disposes of dead animals or parts thereof, or the blood of animals, and is subject to any of the following: (i) Inspection under the "Federal Meat Inspection Act," 81 Stat. 584 (1967), 21 U.S.C.A. 603, as amended; (ii) Chapter 918. of the Revised Code; (iii) Chapter 953. of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (B) of this section requires a facility that holds a license issued under division (A) of this section as a solid waste facility and that also treats infectious wastes by the same method, technique, or process to obtain a license under division (B) of this section as an infectious waste treatment facility. However, the solid waste facility license for the facility shall include the notation that the facility also treats infectious wastes. The director shall not issue a permit to open a new solid waste incineration facility unless the proposed facility complies with the requirements for the location of new infectious waste incineration facilities established in rules adopted under division (B)(2)(b) of section 3734.021 of the Revised Code. (C) Except for a facility or activity described in division (E)(3) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code, a person who proposes to establish or operate a hazardous waste facility shall submit a complete application for a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit and accompanying detail plans, specifications, and such information as the director may require to the environmental protection agency at least one hundred eighty days before the proposed beginning of operation of the facility. The applicant shall notify by certified mail the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, township, and county in which the facility is proposed to be located of the submission of the application within ten days after the submission or at such earlier time as the director may establish by rule. If the application is for a proposed new hazardous waste disposal or thermal treatment facility, the applicant also shall give actual notice of the general design and purpose of the facility to the legislative authority of each municipal corporation, township, and county in which the facility is proposed to be located at least ninety days before the permit application is submitted to the environmental protection agency. In accordance with rules adopted under section 3734.12 of the Revised Code, prior to the submission of a complete application for a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit, the applicant shall hold at least one meeting in the township or municipal corporation in which the facility is proposed to be located, whichever is geographically closer to the proposed location of the facility. The meeting shall be open to the public and shall be held to inform the community of the proposed hazardous waste management activities and to solicit questions from the community concerning the activities. (D)(1) Except as provided in section 3734.123 of the Revised Code, upon receipt of a complete application for a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit under division (C) of this section, the director shall consider the application and accompanying information to determine whether the application complies with agency rules and the requirements of division (D)(2) of this section. After making a determination, the director shall issue either a draft permit or a notice of intent to deny the permit. The director, in accordance with rules adopted under section 3734.12 of the Revised Code or with rules adopted to implement Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code, shall provide public notice of the application and the draft permit or the notice of intent to deny the permit, provide an opportunity for public comments, and, if significant interest is shown, schedule a public meeting in the county in which the facility is proposed to be located and give public notice of the date, time, and location of the public meeting in a newspaper of general circulation in that county. (2) The director shall not approve an application for a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit or an application for a modification under division (I)(3) of this section unless the director finds and determines as follows: (a) The nature and volume of the waste to be treated, stored, or disposed of at the facility; (b) That the facility complies with the director's hazardous waste standards adopted pursuant to section 3734.12 of the Revised Code; (c) That the facility represents the minimum adverse environmental impact, considering the state of available technology and the nature and economics of various alternatives, and other pertinent considerations; (d) That the facility represents the minimum risk of all of the following: (i) Fires or explosions from treatment, storage, or disposal methods; (ii) Release of hazardous waste during transportation of hazardous waste to or from the facility; (iii) Adverse impact on the public health and safety. (e) That the facility will comply with this chapter and Chapters 3704. and 6111. of the Revised Code and all rules and standards adopted under them; (f) That if the owner of the facility, the operator of the facility, or any other person in a position with the facility from which the person may influence the installation and operation of the facility has been involved in any prior activity involving transportation, treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste, that person has a history of compliance with this chapter and Chapters 3704. and 6111. of the Revised Code and all rules and standards adopted under them, the "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976," 90 Stat. 2806, 42 U.S.C.A. 6921, as amended, and all regulations adopted under it, and similar laws and rules of other states if any such prior operation was located in another state that demonstrates sufficient reliability, expertise, and competency to operate a hazardous waste facility under the applicable provisions of this chapter and Chapters 3704. and 6111. of the Revised Code, the applicable rules and standards adopted under them, and terms and conditions of a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit, given the potential for harm to the public health and safety and the environment that could result from the irresponsible operation of the facility. For off-site facilities, as defined in section 3734.41 of the Revised Code, the director may use the investigative reports of the attorney general prepared pursuant to section 3734.42 of the Revised Code as a basis for making a finding and determination under division (D)(2)(f) of this section. (g) That the active areas within a new hazardous waste facility where acute hazardous waste as listed in 40 C.F.R. 261.33 (e), as amended, or organic waste that is toxic and is listed under 40 C.F.R. 261, as amended, is being stored, treated, or disposed of and where the aggregate of the storage design capacity and the disposal design capacity of all hazardous waste in those areas is greater than two hundred fifty thousand gallons, are not located or operated within any of the following: (i) Two thousand feet of any residence, school, hospital, jail, or prison; (ii) Any naturally occurring wetland; (iii) Any flood hazard area if the applicant cannot show that the facility will be designed, constructed, operated, and maintained to prevent washout by a one-hundred-year flood. Division (D)(2)(g) of this section does not apply to the facility of any applicant who demonstrates to the director that the limitations specified in that division are not necessary because of the nature or volume of the waste and the manner of management applied, the facility will impose no substantial danger to the health and safety of persons occupying the structures listed in division (D)(2)(g)(i) of this section, and the facility is to be located or operated in an area where the proposed hazardous waste activities will not be incompatible with existing land uses in the area. (h) That the facility will not be located within the boundaries of a state park established or dedicated under Chapter 1546. of the Revised Code, a state park purchase area established under section 1546.06 of the Revised Code, any unit of the national park system, or any property that lies within the boundaries of a national park or recreation area, but that has not been acquired or is not administered by the secretary of the United States department of the interior, located in this state, or any candidate area located in this state identified for potential inclusion in the national park system in the edition of the "national park system plan" submitted under paragraph (b) of section 8 of "The Act of August 18, 1970," 84 Stat. 825, 16 U.S.C.A. 1a-5, as amended, current at the time of filing of the application for the permit, unless the facility will be used exclusively for the storage of hazardous waste generated within the park or recreation area in conjunction with the operation of the park or recreation area. Division (D)(2)(h) of this section does not apply to the facility of any applicant for modification of a permit unless the modification application proposes to increase the land area included in the facility or to increase the quantity of hazardous waste that will be treated, stored, or disposed of at the facility. (3) Not later than one hundred eighty days after the end of the public comment period, the director, without prior hearing, shall issue or deny the permit in accordance with Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code. If the director approves an application for a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit, the director shall issue the permit, upon such terms and conditions as the director finds are necessary to ensure the construction and operation of the hazardous waste facility in accordance with the standards of this section. (E) No political subdivision of this state shall require any additional zoning or other approval, consent, permit, certificate, or condition for the construction or operation of a hazardous waste facility authorized by a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit issued pursuant to this chapter, nor shall any political subdivision adopt or enforce any law, ordinance, or rule that in any way alters, impairs, or limits the authority granted in the permit. (F) The director may issue a single hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit to a person who operates two or more adjoining facilities where hazardous waste is stored, treated, or disposed of if the application includes detail plans, specifications, and information on all facilities. For the purposes of this section, "adjoining" means sharing a common boundary, separated only by a public road, or in such proximity that the director determines that the issuance of a single permit will not create a hazard to the public health or safety or the environment. (G) No person shall falsify or fail to keep or submit any plans, specifications, data, reports, records, manifests, or other information required to be kept or submitted to the director by this chapter or the rules adopted under it. (H)(1) Each person who holds an installation and operation permit issued under this section and who wishes to obtain a permit renewal shall submit a completed application for an installation and operation permit renewal and any necessary accompanying general plans, detail plans, specifications, and such information as the director may require to the director no later than one hundred eighty days prior to the expiration date of the existing permit or upon a later date prior to the expiration of the existing permit if the permittee can demonstrate good cause for the late submittal. The director shall consider the application and accompanying information, inspection reports of the facility, results of performance tests, a report regarding the facility's compliance or noncompliance with the terms and conditions of its permit and rules adopted by the director under this chapter, and such other information as is relevant to the operation of the facility and shall issue a draft renewal permit or a notice of intent to deny the renewal permit. The director, in accordance with rules adopted under this section or with rules adopted to implement Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code, shall give public notice of the application and draft renewal permit or notice of intent to deny the renewal permit, provide for the opportunity for public comments within a specified time period, schedule a public meeting in the county in which the facility is located if significant interest is shown, and give public notice of the public meeting. (2) Within sixty days after the public meeting or close of the public comment period, the director, without prior hearing, shall issue or deny the renewal permit in accordance with Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code. The director shall not issue a renewal permit unless the director determines that the facility under the existing permit has a history of compliance with this chapter, rules adopted under it, the existing permit, or orders entered to enforce such requirements that demonstrates sufficient reliability, expertise, and competency to operate the facility henceforth under this chapter, rules adopted under it, and the renewal permit. If the director approves an application for a renewal permit, the director shall issue the permit subject to the payment of the annual permit fee required under division (E) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code and upon such terms and conditions as the director finds are reasonable to ensure that continued operation, maintenance, closure, and post-closure care of the hazardous waste facility are in accordance with the rules adopted under section 3734.12 of the Revised Code. (3) An installation and operation permit renewal application submitted to the director that also contains or would constitute an application for a modification shall be acted upon by the director in accordance with division (I) of this section in the same manner as an application for a modification. In approving or disapproving the renewal portion of a permit renewal application containing an application for a modification, the director shall apply the criteria established under division (H)(2) of this section. (4) An application for renewal or modification of a permit that does not contain an application for a modification as described in divisions (I)(3)(a) to (d) of this section shall not be subject to division (D)(2) of this section. (I)(1) As used in this section, "modification" means a change or alteration to a hazardous waste facility or its operations that is inconsistent with or not authorized by its existing permit or authorization to operate. Modifications shall be classified as Class 1, 2, or 3 modifications in accordance with rules adopted under division (K) of this section. Modifications classified as Class 3 modifications, in accordance with rules adopted under that division, shall be further classified by the director as either Class 3 modifications that are to be approved or disapproved by the director under divisions (I)(3)(a) to (d) of this section or as Class 3 modifications that are to be approved or disapproved by the director under division (I)(5) of this section. Not later than thirty days after receiving a request for a modification under division (I)(4) of this section that is not listed in Appendix I to 40 C.F.R. 270.42 or in rules adopted under division (K) of this section, the director shall classify the modification and shall notify the owner or operator of the facility requesting the modification of the classification. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a modification that involves the transfer of a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit to a new owner or operator for any off-site facility as defined in section 3734.41 of the Revised Code shall be classified as a Class 3 modification. The transfer of a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit to a new owner or operator for a facility that is not an off-site facility shall be classified as a Class 1 modification requiring prior approval of the director. (2) Except as provided in section 3734.123 of the Revised Code, a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit may be modified at the request of the director or upon the written request of the permittee only if any of the following applies: (a) The permittee desires to accomplish alterations, additions, or deletions to the permitted facility or to undertake alterations, additions, deletions, or activities that are inconsistent with or not authorized by the existing permit; (b) New information or data justify permit conditions in addition to or different from those in the existing permit; (c) The standards, criteria, or rules upon which the existing permit is based have been changed by new, amended, or rescinded standards, criteria, or rules, or by judicial decision after the existing permit was issued, and the change justifies permit conditions in addition to or different from those in the existing permit; (d) The permittee proposes to transfer the permit to another person. (3) The director shall approve or disapprove an application for a modification in accordance with division (D)(2) of this section and rules adopted under division (K) of this section for all of the following categories of Class 3 modifications: (a) Authority to conduct treatment, storage, or disposal at a site, location, or tract of land that has not been authorized for the proposed category of treatment, storage, or disposal activity by the facility's permit; (b) Modification or addition of a hazardous waste management unit, as defined in rules adopted under section 3734.12 of the Revised Code, that results in an increase in a facility's storage capacity of more than twenty-five per cent over the capacity authorized by the facility's permit, an increase in a facility's treatment rate of more than twenty-five per cent over the rate so authorized, or an increase in a facility's disposal capacity over the capacity so authorized. The authorized disposal capacity for a facility shall be calculated from the approved design plans for the disposal units at that facility. In no case during a five-year period shall a facility's storage capacity or treatment rate be modified to increase by more than twenty-five per cent in the aggregate without the director's approval in accordance with division (D)(2) of this section. Notwithstanding any provision of division (I) of this section to the contrary, a request for modification of a facility's annual total waste receipt limit shall be classified and approved or disapproved by the director under division (I)(5) of this section. (c) Authority to add any of the following categories of regulated activities not previously authorized at a facility by the facility's permit: storage at a facility not previously authorized to store hazardous waste, treatment at a facility not previously authorized to treat hazardous waste, or disposal at a facility not previously authorized to dispose of hazardous waste; or authority to add a category of hazardous waste management unit not previously authorized at the facility by the facility's permit. Notwithstanding any provision of division (I) of this section to the contrary, a request for authority to add or to modify an activity or a hazardous waste management unit for the purposes of performing a corrective action shall be classified and approved or disapproved by the director under division (I)(5) of this section. (d) Authority to treat, store, or dispose of waste types listed or characterized as reactive or explosive, in rules adopted under section 3734.12 of the Revised Code, or any acute hazardous waste listed in 40 C.F.R. 261.33(e), as amended, at a facility not previously authorized to treat, store, or dispose of those types of wastes by the facility's permit unless the requested authority is limited to wastes that no longer exhibit characteristics meeting the criteria for listing or characterization as reactive or explosive wastes, or for listing as acute hazardous waste, but still are required to carry those waste codes as established in rules adopted under section 3734.12 of the Revised Code because of the requirements established in 40 C.F.R. 261(a) and (e), as amended, that is, the "mixture," "derived-from," or "contained-in" regulations. (4) A written request for a modification from the permittee shall be submitted to the director and shall contain such information as is necessary to support the request. Requests for modifications shall be acted upon by the director in accordance with this section and rules adopted under it. (5) Class 1 modification applications that require prior approval of the director, as provided in division (I)(1) of this section or as determined in accordance with rules adopted under division (K) of this section, Class 2 modification applications, and Class 3 modification applications that are not described in divisions (I)(3)(a) to (d) of this section shall be approved or disapproved by the director in accordance with rules adopted under division (K) of this section. The board of county commissioners of the county, the board of township trustees of the township, and the city manager or mayor of the municipal corporation in which a hazardous waste facility is located shall receive notification of any application for a modification for that facility and shall be considered as interested persons with respect to the director's consideration of the application. As used in division (I) of this section: (a) "Owner" means the person who owns a majority or controlling interest in a facility. (b) "Operator" means the person who is responsible for the overall operation of a facility. The director shall approve or disapprove an application for a Class 1 modification that requires the director's approval within sixty days after receiving the request for modification. The director shall approve or disapprove an application for a Class 2 modification within three hundred days after receiving the request for modification. The director shall approve or disapprove an application for a Class 3 modification within three hundred sixty-five days after receiving the request for modification. (6) The approval or disapproval by the director of a Class 1 modification application is not a final action that is appealable under Chapter 3745. of the Revised Code. The approval or disapproval by the director of a Class 2 modification or a Class 3 modification is a final action that is appealable under that chapter. In approving or disapproving a request for a modification, the director shall consider all comments pertaining to the request that are received during the public comment period and the public meetings. The administrative record for appeal of a final action by the director in approving or disapproving a request for a modification shall include all comments received during the public comment period relating to the request for modification, written materials submitted at the public meetings relating to the request, and any other documents related to the director's action. (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a change or alteration to a hazardous waste facility described in division (E)(3)(a) or (b) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code, or its operations, is a modification for the purposes of this section. An application for a modification at such a facility shall be submitted, classified, and approved or disapproved in accordance with divisions (I)(1) to (6) of this section in the same manner as a modification to a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit. (J)(1) Except as provided in division (J)(2) of this section, an owner or operator of a hazardous waste facility that is operating in accordance with a permit by rule under rules adopted by the director under division (E)(3)(b) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code shall submit either a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit application for the facility or a modification application, whichever is required under division (J)(1)(a) or (b) of this section, within one hundred eighty days after the director has requested the application or upon a later date if the owner or operator demonstrates to the director good cause for the late submittal. (a) If the owner or operator does not have a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit for any hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal activities at the facility, the owner or operator shall submit an application for such a permit to the director for the activities authorized by the permit by rule. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the director shall approve or disapprove the application for the permit in accordance with the procedures governing the approval or disapproval of permit renewals under division (H) of this section. (b) If the owner or operator has a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit for hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal activities at the facility other than those authorized by the permit by rule, the owner or operator shall submit to the director a request for modification in accordance with division (I) of this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the director shall approve or disapprove the modification application in accordance with division (I)(5) of this section. (2) The owner or operator of a boiler or industrial furnace that is conducting thermal treatment activities in accordance with a permit by rule under rules adopted by the director under division (E)(3)(b) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code shall submit a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit application if the owner or operator does not have such a permit for any hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal activities at the facility or, if the owner or operator has such a permit for hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal activities at the facility other than thermal treatment activities authorized by the permit by rule, a modification application to add those activities authorized by the permit by rule, whichever is applicable, within one hundred eighty days after the director has requested the submission of the application or upon a later date if the owner or operator demonstrates to the director good cause for the late submittal. The application shall be accompanied by information necessary to support the request. The director shall approve or disapprove an application for a hazardous waste facility installation and operation permit in accordance with division (D) of this section and approve or disapprove an application for a modification in accordance with division (I)(3) of this section, except that the director shall not disapprove an application for the thermal treatment activities on the basis of the criteria set forth in division (D)(2)(g) or (h) of this section. (3) As used in division (J) of this section: (a) "Modification application" means a request for a modification submitted in accordance with division (I) of this section. (b) "Thermal treatment," "boiler," and "industrial furnace" have the same meanings as in rules adopted under section 3734.12 of the Revised Code. (K) The director shall adopt, and may amend, suspend, or rescind, rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code in order to implement divisions (H) and (I) of this section. Except when in actual conflict with this section, rules governing the classification of and procedures for the modification of hazardous waste facility installation and operation permits shall be substantively and procedurally identical to the regulations governing hazardous waste facility permitting and permit modifications adopted under the "Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976," 90 Stat. 2806, 42 U.S.C.A. 6921, as amended. Sec. 3734.57. (A) The following fees are hereby levied on the transfer or disposal of solid wastes in this state: (1) Seventy-one cents per ton through June 30, 20262028, eleven cents of the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the hazardous waste facility management fund created in section 3734.18 of the Revised Code and sixty cents of the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the hazardous waste clean-up fund created in section 3734.28 of the Revised Code; (2) An additional ninety cents per ton through June 30, 20262028, the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the waste management fund created in section 3734.061 of the Revised Code; (3) An additional two dollars and eighty-one cents per ton through June 30, 20262028, the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the environmental protection fund created in section 3745.015 of the Revised Code; (4) An additional twenty-five cents per ton through June 30, 20262028, the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the soil and water conservation district assistance fund created in section 940.15 of the Revised Code; (5) An additional eight cents per ton through June 30, 20262028, the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the national priority list remedial support fund created in section 3734.579 of the Revised Code. In the case of solid wastes that are taken to a solid waste transfer facility located in this state prior to being transported for disposal at a solid waste disposal facility located in this state or outside of this state, the fees levied under this division shall be collected by the owner or operator of the transfer facility as a trustee for the state. The amount of fees required to be collected under this division at such a transfer facility shall equal the total tonnage of solid wastes received at the facility multiplied by the fees levied under this division. In the case of solid wastes that are not taken to a solid waste transfer facility located in this state prior to being transported to a solid waste disposal facility, the fees shall be collected by the owner or operator of the solid waste disposal facility as a trustee for the state. The amount of fees required to be collected under this division at such a disposal facility shall equal the total tonnage of solid wastes received at the facility that was not previously taken to a solid waste transfer facility located in this state multiplied by the fees levied under this division. Fees levied under this division do not apply to materials separated from a mixed waste stream for recycling by a generator or materials removed from the solid waste stream through recycling, as "recycling" is defined in rules adopted under section 3734.02 of the Revised Code. The owner or operator of a solid waste transfer facility or disposal facility, as applicable, shall prepare and file with the director of environmental protection each month a return indicating the total tonnage of solid wastes received at the facility during that month and the total amount of the fees required to be collected under this division during that month. In addition, the owner or operator of a solid waste disposal facility shall indicate on the return the total tonnage of solid wastes received from transfer facilities located in this state during that month for which the fees were required to be collected by the transfer facilities. The monthly returns shall be filed on a form prescribed by the director. Not later than thirty days after the last day of the month to which a return applies, the owner or operator shall mail to the director the return for that month together with the fees required to be collected under this division during that month as indicated on the return or may submit the return and fees electronically in a manner approved by the director. If the return is filed and the amount of the fees due is paid in a timely manner as required in this division, the owner or operator may retain a discount of three-fourths of one per cent of the total amount of the fees that are required to be paid as indicated on the return. The owner or operator may request an extension of not more than thirty days for filing the return and remitting the fees, provided that the owner or operator has submitted such a request in writing to the director together with a detailed description of why the extension is requested, the director has received the request not later than the day on which the return is required to be filed, and the director has approved the request. If the fees are not remitted within thirty days after the last day of the month to which the return applies or are not remitted by the last day of an extension approved by the director, the owner or operator shall not retain the three-fourths of one per cent discount and shall pay an additional ten per cent of the amount of the fees for each month that they are late. For purposes of calculating the late fee, the first month in which fees are late begins on the first day after the deadline has passed for timely submitting the return and fees, and one additional month shall be counted every thirty days thereafter. The owner or operator of a solid waste facility may request a refund or credit of fees levied under this division and remitted to the director that have not been paid to the owner or operator. Such a request shall be made only if the fees have not been collected by the owner or operator, have become a debt that has become worthless or uncollectable for a period of six months or more, and may be claimed as a deduction, including a deduction claimed if the owner or operator keeps accounts on an accrual basis, under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1954," 68A Stat. 50, 26 U.S.C. 166, as amended, and regulations adopted under it. Prior to making a request for a refund or credit, an owner or operator shall make reasonable efforts to collect the applicable fees. A request for a refund or credit shall not include any costs resulting from those efforts to collect unpaid fees. A request for a refund or credit of fees shall be made in writing, on a form prescribed by the director, and shall be supported by evidence that may be required in rules adopted by the director under this chapter. After reviewing the request, and if the request and evidence submitted with the request indicate that a refund or credit is warranted, the director shall grant a refund to the owner or operator or shall permit a credit to be taken by the owner or operator on a subsequent monthly return submitted by the owner or operator. The amount of a refund or credit shall not exceed an amount that is equal to ninety days' worth of fees owed to an owner or operator by a particular debtor of the owner or operator. A refund or credit shall not be granted by the director to an owner or operator more than once in any twelve-month period for fees owed to the owner or operator by a particular debtor. If, after receiving a refund or credit from the director, an owner or operator receives payment of all or part of the fees, the owner or operator shall remit the fees with the next monthly return submitted to the director together with a written explanation of the reason for the submittal. For purposes of computing the fees levied under this division or division (B) of this section, any solid waste transfer or disposal facility that does not use scales as a means of determining gate receipts shall use a conversion factor of three cubic yards per ton of solid waste or one cubic yard per ton for baled waste, as applicable. The fees levied under this division and divisions (B) and (C) of this section are in addition to all other applicable fees and taxes and shall be paid by the customer or a political subdivision to the owner or operator of a solid waste transfer or disposal facility. In the alternative, the fees shall be paid by a customer or political subdivision to a transporter of waste who subsequently transfers the fees to the owner or operator of such a facility. The fees shall be paid notwithstanding the existence of any provision in a contract that the customer or a political subdivision may have with the owner or operator or with a transporter of waste to the facility that would not require or allow such payment regardless of whether the contract was entered prior to or after October 16, 2009. For those purposes, "customer" means a person who contracts with, or utilizes the solid waste services of, the owner or operator of a solid waste transfer or disposal facility or a transporter of solid waste to such a facility. (B) For the purposes specified in division (G) of this section, the solid waste management policy committee of a county or joint solid waste management district may levy fees upon the following activities: (1) The disposal at a solid waste disposal facility located in the district of solid wastes generated within the district; (2) The disposal at a solid waste disposal facility within the district of solid wastes generated outside the boundaries of the district, but inside this state; (3) The disposal at a solid waste disposal facility within the district of solid wastes generated outside the boundaries of this state. The solid waste management plan of the county or joint district approved under section 3734.521 or 3734.55 of the Revised Code and any amendments to it, or the resolution adopted under this division, as appropriate, shall establish the rates of the fees levied under divisions (B)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, if any, and shall specify whether the fees are levied on the basis of tons or cubic yards as the unit of measurement. A solid waste management district that levies fees under this division on the basis of cubic yards shall do so in accordance with division (A) of this section. The fee levied under division (B)(1) of this section shall be not less than one dollar per ton nor more than two dollars per ton, the fee levied under division (B)(2) of this section shall be not less than two dollars per ton nor more than four dollars per ton, and the fee levied under division (B)(3) of this section shall be not more than the fee levied under division (B)(1) of this section. Prior to the approval of the solid waste management plan of a district under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code, the solid waste management policy committee of a district may levy fees under this division by adopting a resolution establishing the proposed amount of the fees. Upon adopting the resolution, the committee shall deliver a copy of the resolution to the board of county commissioners of each county forming the district and to the legislative authority of each municipal corporation and township under the jurisdiction of the district and shall prepare and publish the resolution and a notice of the time and location where a public hearing on the fees will be held. Upon adopting the resolution, the committee shall deliver written notice of the adoption of the resolution; of the amount of the proposed fees; and of the date, time, and location of the public hearing to the director and to the fifty industrial, commercial, or institutional generators of solid wastes within the district that generate the largest quantities of solid wastes, as determined by the committee, and to their local trade associations. The committee shall make good faith efforts to identify those generators within the district and their local trade associations, but the nonprovision of notice under this division to a particular generator or local trade association does not invalidate the proceedings under this division. The publication shall occur at least thirty days before the hearing. After the hearing, the committee may make such revisions to the proposed fees as it considers appropriate and thereafter, by resolution, shall adopt the revised fee schedule. Upon adopting the revised fee schedule, the committee shall deliver a copy of the resolution doing so to the board of county commissioners of each county forming the district and to the legislative authority of each municipal corporation and township under the jurisdiction of the district. Within sixty days after the delivery of a copy of the resolution adopting the proposed revised fees by the policy committee, each such board and legislative authority, by ordinance or resolution, shall approve or disapprove the revised fees and deliver a copy of the ordinance or resolution to the committee. If any such board or legislative authority fails to adopt and deliver to the policy committee an ordinance or resolution approving or disapproving the revised fees within sixty days after the policy committee delivered its resolution adopting the proposed revised fees, it shall be conclusively presumed that the board or legislative authority has approved the proposed revised fees. The committee shall determine if the resolution has been ratified in the same manner in which it determines if a draft solid waste management plan has been ratified under division (B) of section 3734.55 of the Revised Code. The committee may amend the schedule of fees levied pursuant to a resolution adopted and ratified under this division by adopting a resolution establishing the proposed amount of the amended fees. The committee may repeal the fees levied pursuant to such a resolution by adopting a resolution proposing to repeal them. Upon adopting such a resolution, the committee shall proceed to obtain ratification of the resolution in accordance with this division. Not later than fourteen days after declaring the new fees to be ratified or the fees to be repealed under this division, the committee shall notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fees of the ratification and the amount of the fees or of the repeal of the fees. Collection of any fees shall commence or collection of repealed fees shall cease on the first day of the second month following the month in which notification is sent to the owner or operator. Fees levied under this division also may be established, amended, or repealed by a solid waste management policy committee through the adoption of a new district solid waste management plan, the adoption of an amended plan, or the amendment of the plan or amended plan in accordance with sections 3734.55 and 3734.56 of the Revised Code or the adoption or amendment of a district plan in connection with a change in district composition under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code. Not later than fourteen days after the director issues an order approving a district's solid waste management plan, amended plan, or amendment to a plan or amended plan that establishes, amends, or repeals a schedule of fees levied by the district, the committee shall notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fees of the approval of the plan or amended plan, or the amendment to the plan, as appropriate, and the amount of the fees, if any. In the case of an initial or amended plan approved under section 3734.521 of the Revised Code in connection with a change in district composition, other than one involving the withdrawal of a county from a joint district, the committee, within fourteen days after the change takes effect pursuant to division (G) of that section, shall notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fees that the change has taken effect and of the amount of the fees, if any. Collection of any fees shall commence or collection of repealed fees shall cease on the first day of the second month following the month in which notification is sent to the owner or operator. If, in the case of a change in district composition involving the withdrawal of a county from a joint district, the director completes the actions required under division (G)(1) or (3) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code, as appropriate, forty-five days or more before the beginning of a calendar year, the policy committee of each of the districts resulting from the change that obtained the director's approval of an initial or amended plan in connection with the change, within fourteen days after the director's completion of the required actions, shall notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the district's fees that the change is to take effect on the first day of January immediately following the issuance of the notice and of the amount of the fees or amended fees levied under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section pursuant to the district's initial or amended plan as so approved or, if appropriate, the repeal of the district's fees by that initial or amended plan. Collection of any fees set forth in such a plan or amended plan shall commence on the first day of January immediately following the issuance of the notice. If such an initial or amended plan repeals a schedule of fees, collection of the fees shall cease on that first day of January. If, in the case of a change in district composition involving the withdrawal of a county from a joint district, the director completes the actions required under division (G)(1) or (3) of section 3734.521 of the Revised Code, as appropriate, less than forty-five days before the beginning of a calendar year, the director, on behalf of each of the districts resulting from the change that obtained the director's approval of an initial or amended plan in connection with the change proceedings, shall notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the district's fees that the change is to take effect on the first day of January immediately following the mailing of the notice and of the amount of the fees or amended fees levied under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section pursuant to the district's initial or amended plan as so approved or, if appropriate, the repeal of the district's fees by that initial or amended plan. Collection of any fees set forth in such a plan or amended plan shall commence on the first day of the second month following the month in which notification is sent to the owner or operator. If such an initial or amended plan repeals a schedule of fees, collection of the fees shall cease on the first day of the second month following the month in which notification is sent to the owner or operator. If the schedule of fees that a solid waste management district is levying under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section is amended or repealed, the fees in effect immediately prior to the amendment or repeal shall continue to be collected until collection of the amended fees commences or collection of the repealed fees ceases, as applicable, as specified in this division. In the case of a change in district composition, money so received from the collection of the fees of the former districts shall be divided among the resulting districts in accordance with division (B) of section 343.012 of the Revised Code and the agreements entered into under division (B) of section 343.01 of the Revised Code to establish the former and resulting districts and any amendments to those agreements. For the purposes of the provisions of division (B) of this section establishing the times when newly established or amended fees levied by a district are required to commence and the collection of fees that have been amended or repealed is required to cease, "fees" or "schedule of fees" includes, in addition to fees levied under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section, those levied under section 3734.573 or 3734.574 of the Revised Code. (C) For the purposes of defraying the added costs to a municipal corporation or township of maintaining roads and other public facilities and of providing emergency and other public services, and compensating a municipal corporation or township for reductions in real property tax revenues due to reductions in real property valuations resulting from the location and operation of a solid waste disposal facility within the municipal corporation or township, a municipal corporation or township in which such a solid waste disposal facility is located may levy a fee of not more than twenty-five cents per ton on the disposal of solid wastes at a solid waste disposal facility located within the boundaries of the municipal corporation or township regardless of where the wastes were generated. The legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township may levy fees under this division by enacting an ordinance or adopting a resolution establishing the amount of the fees. Upon so doing the legislative authority shall mail a certified copy of the ordinance or resolution to the board of county commissioners or directors of the county or joint solid waste management district in which the municipal corporation or township is located or, if a regional solid waste management authority has been formed under section 343.011 of the Revised Code, to the board of trustees of that regional authority, the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility in the municipal corporation or township that is required to collect the fee by the ordinance or resolution, and the director of environmental protection. Although the fees levied under this division are levied on the basis of tons as the unit of measurement, the legislative authority, in its ordinance or resolution levying the fees under this division, may direct that the fees be levied on the basis of cubic yards as the unit of measurement based upon a conversion factor of three cubic yards per ton generally or one cubic yard per ton for baled wastes. Not later than five days after enacting an ordinance or adopting a resolution under this division, the legislative authority shall so notify by certified mail the owner or operator of each solid waste disposal facility that is required to collect the fee. Collection of any fee levied on or after March 24, 1992, shall commence on the first day of the second month following the month in which notification is sent to the owner or operator. (D)(1) The fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section do not apply to the disposal of solid wastes that: (a) Are disposed of at a facility owned by the generator of the wastes when the solid waste facility exclusively disposes of solid wastes generated at one or more premises owned by the generator regardless of whether the facility is located on a premises where the wastes are generated; (b) Are generated from the combustion of coal, or from the combustion of primarily coal, regardless of whether the disposal facility is located on the premises where the wastes are generated; (c) Are asbestos or asbestos-containing materials or products disposed of at a construction and demolition debris facility that is licensed under Chapter 3714. of the Revised Code or at a solid waste facility that is licensed under this chapter. (2) Except as provided in section 3734.571 of the Revised Code, any fees levied under division (B)(1) of this section apply to solid wastes originating outside the boundaries of a county or joint district that are covered by an agreement for the joint use of solid waste facilities entered into under section 343.02 of the Revised Code by the board of county commissioners or board of directors of the county or joint district where the wastes are generated and disposed of. (3) When solid wastes, other than solid wastes that consist of scrap tires, are burned in a disposal facility that is an incinerator or energy recovery facility, the fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section shall be levied upon the disposal of the fly ash and bottom ash remaining after burning of the solid wastes and shall be collected by the owner or operator of the sanitary landfill where the ash is disposed of. (4) When solid wastes are delivered to a solid waste transfer facility, the fees levied under divisions (B) and (C) of this section shall be levied upon the disposal of solid wastes transported off the premises of the transfer facility for disposal and shall be collected by the owner or operator of the solid waste disposal facility where the wastes are disposed of. (5) The fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section do not apply to sewage sludge that is generated by a waste water treatment facility holding a national pollutant discharge elimination system permit and that is disposed of through incineration, land application, or composting or at another resource recovery or disposal facility that is not a landfill. (6) The fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section do not apply to solid wastes delivered to a solid waste composting facility for processing. When any unprocessed solid waste or compost product is transported off the premises of a composting facility and disposed of at a landfill, the fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section shall be collected by the owner or operator of the landfill where the unprocessed waste or compost product is disposed of. (7) When solid wastes that consist of scrap tires are processed at a scrap tire recovery facility, the fees levied under divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section shall be levied upon the disposal of the fly ash and bottom ash or other solid wastes remaining after the processing of the scrap tires and shall be collected by the owner or operator of the solid waste disposal facility where the ash or other solid wastes are disposed of. (8) The director of environmental protection may issue an order exempting from the fees levied under this section solid wastes, including, but not limited to, scrap tires, that are generated, transferred, or disposed of as a result of a contract providing for the expenditure of public funds entered into by the administrator or regional administrator of the United States environmental protection agency, the director of environmental protection, or the director of administrative services on behalf of the director of environmental protection for the purpose of remediating conditions at a hazardous waste facility, solid waste facility, or other location at which the administrator or regional administrator or the director of environmental protection has reason to believe that there is a substantial threat to public health or safety or the environment or that the conditions are causing or contributing to air or water pollution or soil contamination. An order issued by the director of environmental protection under division (D)(8) of this section shall include a determination that the amount of the fees not received by a solid waste management district as a result of the order will not adversely impact the implementation and financing of the district's approved solid waste management plan and any approved amendments to the plan. Such an order is a final action of the director of environmental protection. (E) The fees levied under divisions (B) and (C) of this section shall be collected by the owner or operator of the solid waste disposal facility where the wastes are disposed of as a trustee for the county or joint district and municipal corporation or township where the wastes are disposed of. Moneys from the fees levied under division (B) of this section shall be forwarded to the board of county commissioners or board of directors of the district in accordance with rules adopted under division (H) of this section. Moneys from the fees levied under division (C) of this section shall be forwarded to the treasurer or such other officer of the municipal corporation as, by virtue of the charter, has the duties of the treasurer or to the fiscal officer of the township, as appropriate, in accordance with those rules. (F) Moneys received by the treasurer or other officer of the municipal corporation under division (E) of this section shall be paid into the general fund of the municipal corporation. Moneys received by the fiscal officer of the township under that division shall be paid into the general fund of the township. The treasurer or other officer of the municipal corporation or the township fiscal officer, as appropriate, shall maintain separate records of the moneys received from the fees levied under division (C) of this section. (G) Moneys received by the board of county commissioners or board of directors under division (E) of this section or section 3734.571, 3734.572, 3734.573, or 3734.574 of the Revised Code shall be paid to the county treasurer, or other official acting in a similar capacity under a county charter, in a county district or to the county treasurer or other official designated by the board of directors in a joint district and kept in a separate and distinct fund to the credit of the district. If a regional solid waste management authority has been formed under section 343.011 of the Revised Code, moneys received by the board of trustees of that regional authority under division (E) of this section shall be kept by the board in a separate and distinct fund to the credit of the district. Moneys in the special fund of the county or joint district arising from the fees levied under division (B) of this section and the fee levied under division (A) of section 3734.573 of the Revised Code shall be expended by the board of county commissioners or directors of the district in accordance with the district's solid waste management plan or amended plan approved under section 3734.521, 3734.55, or 3734.56 of the Revised Code exclusively for the following purposes: (1) Preparation of the solid waste management plan of the district under section 3734.54 of the Revised Code, monitoring implementation of the plan, and conducting the periodic review and amendment of the plan required by section 3734.56 of the Revised Code by the solid waste management policy committee; (2) Implementation of the approved solid waste management plan or amended plan of the district, including, without limitation, the development and implementation of solid waste recycling or reduction programs; (3) Providing financial assistance to boards of health within the district, if solid waste facilities are located within the district, for enforcement of this chapter and rules, orders, and terms and conditions of permits, licenses, and variances adopted or issued under it, other than the hazardous waste provisions of this chapter and rules adopted and orders and terms and conditions of permits issued under those provisions; (4) Providing financial assistance to each county within the district to defray the added costs of maintaining roads and other public facilities and of providing emergency and other public services resulting from the location and operation of a solid waste facility within the county under the district's approved solid waste management plan or amended plan; (5) Pursuant to contracts entered into with boards of health within the district, if solid waste facilities contained in the district's approved plan or amended plan are located within the district, for paying the costs incurred by those boards of health for collecting and analyzing samples from public or private water wells on lands adjacent to those facilities; (6) Developing and implementing a program for the inspection of solid wastes generated outside the boundaries of this state that are disposed of at solid waste facilities included in the district's approved solid waste management plan or amended plan; (7) Providing financial assistance to boards of health within the district for the enforcement of section 3734.03 of the Revised Code or to local law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction within the district for enforcing anti-littering laws and ordinances; (8) Providing financial assistance to boards of health of health districts within the district that are on the approved list under section 3734.08 of the Revised Code to defray the costs to the health districts for the participation of their employees responsible for enforcement of the solid waste provisions of this chapter and rules adopted and orders and terms and conditions of permits, licenses, and variances issued under those provisions in the training and certification program as required by rules adopted under division (L) of section 3734.02 of the Revised Code; (9) Providing financial assistance to individual municipal corporations and townships within the district to defray their added costs of maintaining roads and other public facilities and of providing emergency and other public services resulting from the location and operation within their boundaries of a composting, energy or resource recovery, incineration, or recycling facility that either is owned by the district or is furnishing solid waste management facility or recycling services to the district pursuant to a contract or agreement with the board of county commissioners or directors of the district; (10) Payment of any expenses that are agreed to, awarded, or ordered to be paid under section 3734.35 of the Revised Code and of any administrative costs incurred pursuant to that section. In the case of a joint solid waste management district, if the board of county commissioners of one of the counties in the district is negotiating on behalf of affected communities, as defined in that section, in that county, the board shall obtain the approval of the board of directors of the district in order to expend moneys for administrative costs incurred. Prior to the approval of the district's solid waste management plan under section 3734.55 of the Revised Code, moneys in the special fund of the district arising from the fees shall be expended for those purposes in the manner prescribed by the solid waste management policy committee by resolution. Notwithstanding division (G)(6) of this section as it existed prior to October 29, 1993, or any provision in a district's solid waste management plan prepared in accordance with division (B)(2)(e) of section 3734.53 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to that date, any moneys arising from the fees levied under division (B)(3) of this section prior to January 1, 1994, may be expended for any of the purposes authorized in divisions (G)(1) to (10) of this section. (H) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing procedures for collecting and forwarding the fees levied under divisions (B) and (C) of this section to the boards of county commissioners or directors of county or joint solid waste management districts and to the treasurers or other officers of municipal corporations and the fiscal officers of townships. The rules also shall prescribe the dates for forwarding the fees to the boards and officials and may prescribe any other requirements the director considers necessary or appropriate to implement and administer divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section. Sec. 3734.79. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, each application for a permit submitted under sections 3734.76 to 3734.78 of the Revised Code shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of four hundred dollars that shall be credited to the scrap tire management fund created in section 3734.82 of the Revised Code. If a permit is issued, the amount of the application fee paid shall be deducted from the amount of the applicable permit fee due under division (R)(Q) of section 3745.11 of the Revised Code. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to an application for a permit for a scrap tire storage facility submitted under section 3734.76 of the Revised Code if the owner or operator of the facility or proposed facility is a motor vehicle salvage dealer licensed under Chapter 4738. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3734.901. (A)(1) For the purpose of providing revenue to defray the cost of administering and enforcing the scrap tire provisions of this chapter, rules adopted under those provisions, and terms and conditions of orders, variances, and licenses issued under those provisions; to abate accumulations of scrap tires; to make grants supporting market development activities for scrap tires and synthetic rubber from tire manufacturing processes and tire recycling processes and to support scrap tire amnesty and cleanup events; to make loans to promote the recycling or recovery of energy from scrap tires; and to defray the costs of administering and enforcing sections 3734.90 to 3734.9014 of the Revised Code, a fee of fifty cents per tire is hereby levied on the sale of tires. The proceeds of the fee shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the scrap tire management fund created in section 3734.82 of the Revised Code. The fee is levied from the first day of the calendar month that begins next after thirty days from October 29, 1993, through June 30, 20262028. (2) Beginning on July 1, 2011, and ending on June 30, 20262028, there is hereby levied an additional fee of fifty cents per tire on the sale of tires the proceeds of which shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the soil and water conservation district assistance fund created in section 940.15 of the Revised Code. (B) Only one sale of the same article shall be used in computing the amount of the fee due. Sec. 3734.904. (A) By the twentieth day of each month, each person required to pay the fee imposed by section 3734.901 of the Revised Code shall file with the tax commissioner a return as prescribed by the tax commissioner and shall make payment of the full amount of the fee due for the preceding month after deduction of any discount provided for under division (E) of this section. The return shall be signed by the person required to file it, or an authorized employee, officer, or agent. The return shall be deemed filed when received by the tax commissioner. (B) Any person required by this section to file a return who fails to file such a return within the period prescribed may be required to pay an additional charge of fifty dollars or ten per cent of the fee required to be paid for the reporting period, whichever is greater. The commissioner may collect the additional charge by assessment pursuant to section 3734.907 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may remit all or a portion of the additional charge and may adopt rules relating thereto. (C) If any fee due is not paid timely in accordance with this section, the person liable for the fee shall pay interest, calculated at the rate per annum as prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code, from the date the fee payment was due to the date of payment or to the date an assessment is issued, whichever occurs first. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the fee, and the commissioner may collect the interest by assessment pursuant to section 3734.907 of the Revised Code. (D) If, in the estimation of the tax commissioner, the average liability of the person liable for the fee is such as not to merit monthly filing, the commissioner may authorize the person to file and pay at less frequent intervals. Returns are due by the twentieth day of the month following the close of the applicable reporting period authorized under this division. (E) If a return is filed and the amount of the fee shown to be due on the return is paid on or before the date that the return is required to be filed under division (A) of this section or pursuant to division (D) of this section, whichever is applicable, the person liable for the fee is entitled to a discount of four per cent of the amount shown to be due on the return. (F) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state as revenue arising from the fee imposed by section 3734.901 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3734.907. (A) Any person required to pay the fee imposed by section 3734.901 of the Revised Code is personally liable for the fee. The tax commissioner may make an assessment, based upon any information in the commissioner's possession, against any person who fails to file a return or pay any fee, interest, or additional charge as required by sections 3734.90 to 3734.9014 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall give the person assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) When the information in the possession of the tax commissioner indicates that a person liable for the fee imposed by section 3734.901 of the Revised Code has not paid the full amount of fee due, the commissioner may audit a representative sample of the person's business and may issue an assessment based on the audit. (C) A penalty of up to fifteen per cent may be added to all amounts assessed under this section. The commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of the penalties. (D) Unless the person assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the person assessed or that person's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the person assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the person assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (E) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including accrued interest, remains unpaid, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the person assessed resides or in which the person's business is conducted. If the person assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state tire fee," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of the fee due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until the day the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the fee and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (F) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the fee will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the fee are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the person liable for the fee. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (E) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the person assessed or the person's legal representative, as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code, within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the person assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (D) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (G) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state as revenue arising from the fee imposed by section 3734.901 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3735.67. (A) The owner of real property located in a community reinvestment area and eligible for exemption from taxation under a resolution adopted pursuant to section 3735.66 of the Revised Code may file an application for an exemption from real property taxation of a percentage of the assessed valuation of a new structure, or of the increased assessed valuation of an existing structure after remodeling began, if the new structure or remodeling is completed after the effective date of the resolution adopted pursuant to section 3735.66 of the Revised Code. The application shall be filed with the housing officer designated for the community reinvestment area in which the property is located. If any part of the new structure or remodeled structure that would be exempted is of real property to be used for commercial or industrial purposes, the legislative authority and the owner of the property shall enter into a written agreement pursuant to section 3735.671 of the Revised Code prior to commencement of construction or remodeling; if such an agreement is subject to approval by the board of education of the school district within the territory of which the property is or will be located, the agreement shall not be formally approved by the legislative authority until the board of education approves the agreement in the manner prescribed by that section. If a structure is already subject to a written agreement pursuant to section 3735.671 of the Revised Code, is on the site of a proposed megaproject, and is expected to be owned or occupied by a megaproject operator as defined in division (A)(12) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, or is not situated on the site of a proposed megaproject but is expected to be owned or occupied by a megaproject supplier that meets the requirements described in division (A)(13)(b) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, the legislative authority may amend the agreement to cause the exemption for the structure to continue for a maximum amended term not exceeding thirty years by following the process for approving an agreement described in section 3735.671 of the Revised Code. (B) The housing officer shall verify the construction of the new structure or the cost of the remodeling of the existing structure and the facts asserted in the application. The housing officer shall determine whether the construction or remodeling meets the requirements for an exemption under this section. In cases involving a structure of historical or architectural significance, the housing officer shall not determine whether the remodeling meets the requirements for a tax exemption unless the appropriateness of the remodeling has been certified, in writing, by the society, association, agency, or legislative authority that has designated the structure or by any organization or person authorized, in writing, by such society, association, agency, or legislative authority to certify the appropriateness of the remodeling. (C) If the construction or remodeling meets the requirements for exemption, the housing officer shall forward the application to the county auditor with a certification as to the division of this section under which the exemption is granted, and the period and percentage of the exemption as determined by the legislative authority pursuant to that division. If the construction or remodeling is of commercial or industrial property and the legislative authority is not required to certify a copy of a resolution under section 3735.671 of the Revised Code, the housing officer shall comply with the notice requirements prescribed under section 5709.83 of the Revised Code, unless the board has adopted a resolution under that section waiving its right to receive such a notice. (D) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, the tax exemption shall first apply in the year the construction or remodeling would first be taxable but for this section. In the case of remodeling that qualifies for exemption, a percentage, not to exceed one hundred per cent, of the increased assessed valuation of an existing structure after remodeling began shall be exempted from real property taxation. In the case of construction of a structure that qualifies for exemption, a percentage, not to exceed one hundred per cent, of the assessed value of the structure shall be exempted from real property taxation. In either case, the percentage shall be the percentage set forth in the agreement if the structure or remodeling is to be used for commercial or industrial purposes, or the percentage set forth in the resolution describing the community reinvestment area if the structure or remodeling is to be used for residential purposes. The construction of new structures and the remodeling of existing structures are hereby declared to be a public purpose for which exemptions from real property taxation may be granted for the following periods: (1) For every dwelling and commercial or industrial properties, located within the same community reinvestment area, upon which the cost of remodeling is at least two thousand five hundred dollars in the case of a dwelling containing not more than two family units or at least five thousand dollars in the case of all other property, a period to be determined by the legislative authority adopting the resolution, but not exceeding fifteen years. The period of exemption for a dwelling described in division (D)(1) of this section may be extended by a legislative authority for up to an additional ten years if the dwelling is a structure of historical or architectural significance, is a certified historic structure that has been subject to federal tax treatment under 26 U.S.C. 47 and 170(h), and units within the structure have been leased to individual tenants for five consecutive years; (2) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, for construction of every dwelling, and commercial or industrial structure located within the same community reinvestment area, a period to be determined by the legislative authority adopting the resolution, but not exceeding one of the following: (a) Thirty years, if the commercial or industrial structure is situated on the site of a megaproject and is owned and or occupied by a megaproject operator as defined in division (A)(12) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, or is not situated on the site of a megaproject but is owned and or occupied by a megaproject supplier that meets the requirements described in division (A)(13)(b) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code; (b) Fifteen years, for any other dwelling or commercial or industrial structure. (E) Any person, board, or officer authorized by section 5715.19 of the Revised Code to file complaints with the county board of revision may file a complaint with the housing officer challenging the continued exemption of any property granted an exemption under this section. A complaint against exemption shall be filed prior to the thirty-first day of December of the tax year for which taxation of the property is requested. The housing officer shall determine whether the property continues to meet the requirements for exemption and shall certify the housing officer's findings to the complainant. If the housing officer determines that the property does not meet the requirements for exemption, the housing officer shall notify the county auditor, who shall correct the tax list and duplicate accordingly. (F) The owner of a dwelling constructed in a community reinvestment area may file an application for an exemption after the year the construction first became subject to taxation. The application shall be processed in accordance with the procedures prescribed under this section and shall be granted if the construction that is the subject of the application otherwise meets the requirements for an exemption under this section. If approved, the exemption sought in the application first applies in the year the application is filed. An exemption approved pursuant to this division continues only for those years remaining in the period described in division (D)(2) of this section. No exemption may be claimed for any year in that period that precedes the year in which the application is filed. Sec. 3735.671. (A) If construction or remodeling of commercial or industrial property is to be exempted from taxation pursuant to section 3735.67 of the Revised Code, the legislative authority and the owner of the property, prior to the commencement of construction or remodeling, shall enter into a written agreement, binding on both parties for a period of time that does not end prior to the end of the period of the exemption, that includes all of the information and statements described in divisions (B)(1) to (8) of this section. Agreements may include terms not described in those divisions or otherwise prescribed by the model agreement adopted by the director of development under division (B) of this section, but such terms shall in no way derogate from the information and statements described in divisions (B)(1) to (8) of this section. (1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, an agreement entered into under this section shall not be approved by the legislative authority unless the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district within the territory of which the property is or will be located approves the agreement. For the purpose of obtaining such approval, the legislative authority shall certify a copy of the agreement to the board of education not later than forty-five days prior to approving the agreement, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and a legal holiday as defined in section 1.14 of the Revised Code. The board of education, by resolution adopted by a majority of the board, shall approve or disapprove the agreement and certify a copy of the resolution to the legislative authority not later than fourteen days prior to the date stipulated by the legislative authority as the date upon which approval of the agreement is to be formally considered by the legislative authority. The board of education may include in the resolution conditions under which the board would approve the agreement. The legislative authority may approve an agreement at any time after the board of education certifies its resolution approving the agreement to the legislative authority, or, if the board approves the agreement conditionally, at any time after the conditions are agreed to by the board and the legislative authority. (2) Approval of an agreement by the board of education is not required under division (A)(1) of this section if, for each tax year the real property is exempted from taxation, the sum of the following quantities, as estimated at or prior to the time the agreement is formally approved by the legislative authority, equals or exceeds twenty-five per cent of the amount of taxes, as estimated at or prior to that time, that would have been charged and payable that year upon the real property had that property not been exempted from taxation: (a) The amount of taxes charged and payable on any portion of the assessed valuation of the new structure or of the increased assessed valuation of an existing structure after remodeling began that will not be exempted from taxation under the agreement; (b) The amount of taxes charged and payable on tangible personal property located on the premises of the new structure or of the structure to be remodeled under the agreement, whether payable by the owner of the structure or by a related member, as defined in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code without regard to division (B) of that section. (c) The amount of any cash payment by the owner of the new structure or structure to be remodeled to the school district, the dollar value, as mutually agreed to by the owner and the board of education, of any property or services provided by the owner of the property to the school district, whether by gift, loan, or otherwise, and any payment by the legislative authority to the school district pursuant to section 5709.82 of the Revised Code. The estimates of quantities used for purposes of division (A)(2) of this section shall be estimated by the legislative authority. The legislative authority shall certify to the board of education that the estimates have been made in good faith. Departures of the actual quantities from the estimates subsequent to approval of the agreement by the board of education do not invalidate the agreement. (3) If a board of education has adopted a resolution waiving its right to approve agreements and the resolution remains in effect, approval of an agreement by the board is not required under division (A)(1) of this section. If a board of education has adopted a resolution allowing a legislative authority to deliver the notice required under this division fewer than forty-five business days prior to the legislative authority's execution of the agreement, the legislative authority shall deliver the notice to the board not later than the number of days prior to such execution as prescribed by the board in its resolution. If a board of education adopts a resolution waiving its right to approve agreements or shortening the notification period, the board shall certify a copy of the resolution to the legislative authority. If the board of education rescinds such a resolution, it shall certify notice of the rescission to the legislative authority. (4) If the owner of the property or the legislative authority agree to make any payment to the school district as described in division (A)(2)(c) of this section, the owner or legislative authority shall agree to make payments to the joint vocational school district within which the property is located at the same rate or amount and under the same terms received by the city, local, or exempted village school district. (B) The director of development shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing the form of a model agreement that a legislative authority may, in its discretion, use as the basis for an agreement to be executed under this section. The model agreement may include any term necessary for the administration and enforcement of such agreements by the director and legislative authority, but must include all of the following: (1) A space to include the description of real property to be exempted from taxation under the agreement and to identify the property's owners; (2) A space to denote the percentage of the assessed valuation of real property exempted from taxation and the period for which the exemption is granted; (3) A statement requiring the owner to pay real property taxes not exempted under the agreement, as required by law, and requiring rescission of the agreement if the owner fails to pay those taxes beginning in and after the year any such taxes are charged; (4) A statement that the owner certifies, at the time the agreement is executed, that the owner does not owe any delinquent property taxes or taxes for which the owner is liable under Chapter 5735., 5739., 5741., 5743., 5747., or 5753. of the Revised Code, or, if such delinquent taxes are owed, that the owner is paying the delinquent taxes pursuant to an undertaking enforceable by the state or an agent or instrumentality thereof, has filed a petition in bankruptcy, or has had a bankruptcy petition filed against the owner; (5) A statement requiring the owner to provide to the property tax incentive review council any information reasonably required by the council to evaluate the applicant's compliance with the agreement; (6) A statement that the agreement is not transferable or assignable without the approval of the legislative authority; (7) A statement describing the circumstances under which the legislative authority may revoke an agreement for noncompliance; (8) A statement requiring the owner to provide an estimate of the following for each agreement: (a) The number of employment opportunities created due to the remodeling or construction, as well as the payroll attributable to those opportunities; (b) The number of employment opportunities retained due to the remodeling or construction, as well as the payroll attributable to those opportunities. The model agreement shall also provide that a legislative authority may, but is not required to, include a statement describing the manner by which the legislative authority may recover already-received benefits, which may include an action brought in law or equity, a lien on the exempted property in the amount to be recovered, or other means. In the case of a lien on the exempted property, the lien shall attach, and may be perfected, collected, and enforced, in the same manner as a mortgage lien on real property, and otherwise has the same force and effect as a mortgage lien on real property. Once the director adopts rules prescribing a model agreement under this division, the model agreement may not be changed unless the director adopts, amends, or rescinds those rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (C) If any person that is party to an agreement granting an exemption from taxation discontinues operations at the structure to which that exemption applies prior to the expiration of the term of the agreement, that person, any successor to that person, and any related member shall not enter into an agreement under this section or section 5709.62, 5709.63, or 5709.632 of the Revised Code, and no legislative authority shall enter into such an agreement with such a person, successor, or related member prior to the expiration of three years after the person's discontinuation of operations. As used in this division, "successor" means a person to which the assets or equity of another person has been transferred, which transfer resulted in the full or partial nonrecognition of gain or loss, or resulted in a carryover basis, both as determined by rule adopted by the tax commissioner. "Related member" has the same meaning as defined in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code without regard to division (B) of that section. The director of development shall review all agreements submitted to the director under section 3735.672 of the Revised Code for the purpose of enforcing this division. If the director determines there has been a violation of this division, the director shall notify the legislative authority of such violation, and the legislative authority immediately shall revoke the exemption granted under the agreement. (D) A political subdivision other than the legislative authority is not required to be a party to an agreement authorized under this section unless the political subdivision is a fee simple owner of real property subject to an exemption pursuant to section 3735.67 of the Revised Code that would otherwise be obligated to pay real property taxes for such real property. Sec. 3737.83. The state fire marshal shall, as part of the state fire code, adopt rules to: (A) Establish minimum standards of performance for fire protection equipment and fire fighting equipment; (B) Establish minimum standards of training, fix minimum qualifications, and require certificates for all persons who engage in the business for profit of installing, testing, repairing, or maintaining fire protection equipment; (C) Provide for the issuance of certificates required under division (B) of this section and establish the fees to be charged for such certificates. A certificate shall be granted, renewed, or revoked according to rules the state fire marshal shall adopt, except that the state fire marshal shall grant a certificate in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license or certificate in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a person engaged in the business of installing, testing, repairing, or maintaining fire protection equipment in a state that does not issue that certificate. (D) Establish minimum standards of flammability for consumer goods in any case where the federal government or any department or agency thereof has established, or may from time to time establish standards of flammability for consumer goods. The standards established by the state fire marshal shall be identical to the minimum federal standards. In any case where the federal government or any department or agency thereof, establishes standards of flammability for consumer goods subsequent to the adoption of a flammability standard by the state fire marshal, standards previously adopted by the state fire marshal shall not continue in effect to the extent such standards are not identical to the minimum federal standards. With respect to the adoption of minimum standards of flammability, this division shall supersede any authority granted a political subdivision by any other section of the Revised Code. (E) Establish minimum standards pursuant to section 5104.05 of the Revised Code for fire prevention and fire safety in child care centers and in type A family child care homes, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (F) Establish minimum standards for fire prevention and safety in a residential facility licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code that provides accommodations, supervision, and personal care services for three to sixteen unrelated adults. The state fire marshal shall adopt the rules under this division in consultation with the director of mental health and addiction services and interested parties designated by the director of mental health and addiction services. (G)(1) Establish that, for buildings and structures incident to the agricultural purposes of the land and determined to be exempt from the rules of the board of building standards pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 3781.06 or section 3781.061 of the Revised Code, the occupant load of a covered patio and its area are not to be included in the fire area calculation of the building for the determination of sprinkler thresholds, if all the following apply: (a) The building or structure would be classified as an assembly occupancy. (b) The covered patio is either: (i) Completely open to the atmosphere without enclosing walls on at least three sides all year with accessible means of egress on each open side; (ii) Completely open to the atmosphere without enclosing walls on two sides all year with accessible means of egress on each open side, but only if no point in the covered patio area is more than twenty feet from an accessible means of egress and not more than fifty per cent of the perimeter of the covered patio area is enclosed by walls. (c) The occupant load of the covered patio does not exceed one hundred occupants. (d) The floor area of the covered patio is at the level of exit discharge. (e) If the patio is constructed on or after the effective date of this amendment, the horizontal assembly or roof and columns are constructed of materials that are non-combustible, limited-combustible, or fire-retardant treated wood. (2) If a building or zoning official makes a determination pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 3781.06 or section 3781.061 of the Revised Code that results in a building or structure being exempt from the rules of the board of building standards, such official shall provide a written notification to the affected party that the state fire code applies to the exempt location, including as specified in this section. (3) Nothing in division (G) of this section shall be construed to limit or restrict the scope of application of the state fire code, except as expressly provided in division (G)(1) of this section, including the distinct hazard or serious hazard standards specified in the state fire code. (4) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under division (G)(1) of this section is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3742.32. (A) The director of health shall appoint an advisory council to assist in the ongoing development and implementation of the child lead poisoning prevention program created under section 3742.31 of the Revised Code. The advisory council shall consist of the following members: (1) A representative of the department of medicaid; (2) A representative of the bureau of child care in the department of job and family services; (3) A representative of the department of environmental protection; (4)(3) A representative of the department of education and workforce; (5)(4) A representative of the department of development; (6)(5) A representative of the department of children and youth; (7)(6) A representative of the Ohio apartment owner's association; (8)(7) A representative of the Ohio healthy homes network; (9)(8) A representative of the Ohio environmental health association; (10)(9) An Ohio representative of the American coatings association; (11)(10) A representative from Ohio realtors; (12)(11) A representative of the Ohio housing finance agency; (13)(12) A physician knowledgeable in the field of lead poisoning prevention; (14)(13) A certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner knowledgeable in the field of lead poisoning prevention; (15)(14) A representative of the public. (B) The advisory council shall do both of the following: (1) Provide the director with advice regarding the policies the child lead poisoning prevention program should emphasize, preferred methods of financing the program, and any other matter relevant to the program's operation; (2) Submit a report of the state's activities to the governor, president of the senate, and speaker of the house of representatives on or before the first day of March each year. (C) The advisory council is not subject to sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3742.50. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Lead abatement costs" means costs incurred by a taxpayer for either of the following: (a) A lead abatement specialist to conduct a lead risk assessment, a lead abatement project, or a clearance examination, provided the specialist is authorized under this chapter to conduct the respective task; (b) Relocation costs incurred in the relocation of occupants of an eligible dwelling to achieve occupant protection, as described in 24 C.F.R. 35.1345(a). "Lead abatement costs" do not include such costs for which the taxpayer is reimbursed or such costs the taxpayer deducts or excludes in computing the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income for federal income tax purposes or Ohio adjusted gross income as determined under section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Eligible dwelling" means a residential unit constructed in this state before 1978. (3) "Lead abatement specialist" means an individual who holds a valid license issued under section 3742.05 of the Revised Code. (4) "Taxable year" and "taxpayer" have the same meanings as in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A taxpayer who incurs lead abatement costs on an eligible dwelling during a taxable year may apply to the director of health for a lead abatement tax credit certificate. The applicant shall list on the application the amount of lead abatement costs the applicant incurred for the eligible dwelling during the taxable year. The director, in consultation with the tax commissioner, shall prescribe the form of a lead abatement tax credit certificate, the manner by which an applicant shall apply for the certificate, and requirements for the submission of any record or other information an applicant must furnish with the application to verify the lead abatement costs. (C)(1) Upon receipt of an application under division (B) of this section, the director of health shall verify all of the following: (a) The residential unit that is the subject of the application is an eligible dwelling. (b) The taxpayer incurred lead abatement costs during the taxable year related to the eligible dwelling. (c) The eligible dwelling has passed a clearance examination in accordance with standards prescribed in rules adopted by the director under section 3742.03 or 3742.45 of the Revised Code. (2) After verifying the conditions described in division (C)(1) of this section, the director shall issue a lead abatement tax credit certificate to the applicant equal to the lesser of (a) the lead abatement costs incurred by the taxpayer on the eligible dwelling during the taxable year, (b) the amount of lead abatement costs listed on the application, or (c) ten forty thousand dollars, subject to the limitation in division (C)(3) of this section. (3) The director may not issue more than five three million dollars in lead abatement tax credit certificates in any fiscal year. (D) The director of health, in consultation with the tax commissioner, may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary for the administration of this section. Sec. 3743.04. (A) The license of a manufacturer of fireworks is effective for one year beginning on the first day of December, and the state fire marshal shall issue or renew a license only on that date and at no other time. If a manufacturer of fireworks wishes to continue manufacturing fireworks at the designated fireworks plant after its then effective license expires, it shall apply no later than the first day of October for a new license pursuant to section 3743.02 of the Revised Code. The state fire marshal shall send a written notice of the expiration of its license to a licensed manufacturer at least three months before the expiration date. (B) If, during the effective period of its licensure, a licensed manufacturer of fireworks wishes to construct, locate, or relocate any buildings or other structures on the premises of its fireworks plant, to make any structural change or renovation in any building or other structure on the premises of its fireworks plant, to change the nature of its manufacturing of fireworks so as to include the processing of fireworks, or to relocate its fireworks plant to a new licensed premises, the manufacturer shall notify the state fire marshal in writing. The state fire marshal may require a licensed manufacturer also to submit documentation, including, but not limited to, plans covering the proposed construction, location, relocation, structural change or renovation, change in manufacturing of fireworks, or new licensed premises, if the state fire marshal determines the documentation is necessary for evaluation purposes in light of the proposed construction, location, relocation, structural change or renovation, change in manufacturing of fireworks, or new licensed premises. Upon receipt of the notification and additional documentation required by the state fire marshal, the state fire marshal shall inspect the existing premises of the fireworks plant, or proposed new licensed premises, to determine if the proposed construction, location, relocation, structural change or renovation, change in manufacturing of fireworks, or new licensed premises conform to sections 3743.02 to 3743.08 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to section 3743.05 of the Revised Code. The state fire marshal shall issue a written authorization to the manufacturer for the construction, location, relocation, structural change or renovation, change in manufacturing of fireworks, or new licensed premises, if the state fire marshal determines, upon the inspection and a review of submitted documentation, that the construction, location, relocation, structural change or renovation, change in manufacturing of fireworks, or new licensed premises conform to those sections and rules. Upon authorizing a change in manufacturing of fireworks to include the processing of fireworks, the state fire marshal shall make notations on the manufacturer's license and in the list of licensed manufacturers in accordance with section 3743.03 of the Revised Code. On or before June 1, 1998, a licensed manufacturer shall install, in every licensed building in which fireworks are manufactured, stored, or displayed and to which the public has access, interlinked fire detection, smoke exhaust, and smoke evacuation systems that are approved by the superintendent of industrial compliance, and shall comply with floor plans showing occupancy load limits and internal circulation and egress patterns that are approved by the state fire marshal and superintendent, and that are submitted under seal as required by section 3791.04 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding section 3743.59 of the Revised Code, the construction and safety requirements established in this division are not subject to any variance, waiver, or exclusion. (C) The license of a manufacturer of fireworks authorizes the manufacturer to engage only in the following activities: (1) The manufacturing of fireworks on the premises of the fireworks plant as described in the application for licensure or in the notification submitted under division (B) of this section, except that a licensed manufacturer shall not engage in the processing of fireworks unless authorized to do so by its license. (2) To possess for sale at wholesale and sell at wholesale the fireworks manufactured by the manufacturer, to persons who are licensed wholesalers of fireworks, to persons in accordance with sections 3743.44 to 3743.46 of the Revised Code, or to persons located in another state provided the fireworks are shipped directly out of this state to them by the manufacturer. A person who is licensed as a manufacturer of fireworks on June 14, 1988, also may possess for sale and sell pursuant to division (C)(2) of this section fireworks other than those the person manufactures. The possession for sale shall be on the premises of the fireworks plant described in the application for licensure or in the notification submitted under division (B) of this section, and the sale shall be from the inside of a licensed building and from no other structure or device outside a licensed building. At no time shall a licensed manufacturer sell any class of fireworks outside a licensed building. (3) Possess for sale at retail and sell at retail the fireworks manufactured by the manufacturer, other than 1.4G fireworks as designated by the state fire marshal in rules adopted pursuant to division (A) of section 3743.05 of the Revised Code, to licensed exhibitors in accordance with sections 3743.50 to 3743.55 of the Revised Code, and possess for sale at retail and sell at retail the fireworks manufactured by the manufacturer, including 1.4G fireworks, to persons in accordance with sections 3743.44 to 3743.46 3743.48 of the Revised Code, or to persons located in another state provided the fireworks are shipped directly out of this state to them by the manufacturer. A person who is licensed as a manufacturer of fireworks on June 14, 1988, may also possess for sale and sell pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section fireworks other than those the person manufactures. The possession for sale shall be on the premises of the fireworks plant described in the application for licensure or in the notification submitted under division (B) of this section, and, except as otherwise provided in section 3743.48 of the Revised Code, the sale shall be from the inside of a licensed building and from no other structure or device outside a licensed building. At no time shall Except as otherwise provided in section 3743.48 of the Revised Code, a licensed manufacturer shall not sell any class of fireworks outside a licensed building. A licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall sell under division (C) of this section only fireworks that meet the standards set by the consumer product safety commission or by the American fireworks standard laboratories or that have received an EX number from the United States department of transportation. (D) The license of a manufacturer of fireworks shall be protected under glass and posted in a conspicuous place on the premises of the fireworks plant. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the license is not transferable or assignable. (1) The ownership of a manufacturer of fireworks license may be transferred to another person for the same fireworks plant for which the license was issued, or approved pursuant to division (B) of this section, if the assets of the plant are transferred to that person by inheritance or by a sale approved by the state fire marshal. (2) The license of a manufacturer of fireworks may be geographically relocated in accordance with division (D) of section 3743.75 of the Revised Code. (3) The license is subject to revocation in accordance with section 3743.08 of the Revised Code. (E) The state fire marshal shall not place the license of a manufacturer of fireworks in a temporarily inactive status while the holder of the license is attempting to qualify to retain the license. (F) Each licensed manufacturer of fireworks that possesses fireworks for sale and sells fireworks under division (C) of section 3743.04 of the Revised Code, or a designee of the manufacturer, whose identity is provided to the state fire marshal by the manufacturer, annually shall attend a continuing education program. The state fire marshal shall develop the program and the state fire marshal or a person or public agency approved by the state fire marshal shall conduct it. A licensed manufacturer or the manufacturer's designee who attends a program as required under this division, within one year after attending the program, shall conduct in-service training as approved by the state fire marshal for other employees of the licensed manufacturer regarding the information obtained in the program. A licensed manufacturer shall provide the state fire marshal with notice of the date, time, and place of all in-service training. For any program conducted under this division, the state fire marshal shall, in accordance with rules adopted by the state fire marshal under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, establish the subjects to be taught, the length of classes, the standards for approval, and time periods for notification by the licensee to the state fire marshal of any in-service training. (G) A licensed manufacturer shall maintain comprehensive general liability insurance coverage in the amount and type specified under division (B)(2) of section 3743.02 of the Revised Code at all times. Each policy of insurance required under this division shall contain a provision requiring the insurer to give not less than fifteen days' prior written notice to the state fire marshal before termination, lapse, or cancellation of the policy, or any change in the policy that reduces the coverage below the minimum required under this division. Prior to canceling or reducing the amount of coverage of any comprehensive general liability insurance coverage required under this division, a licensed manufacturer shall secure supplemental insurance in an amount and type that satisfies the requirements of this division so that no lapse in coverage occurs at any time. A licensed manufacturer who secures supplemental insurance shall file evidence of the supplemental insurance with the state fire marshal prior to canceling or reducing the amount of coverage of any comprehensive general liability insurance coverage required under this division. (H) The state fire marshal shall adopt rules for the expansion or contraction of a licensed premises and for approval of such expansions or contractions. The boundaries of a licensed premises, including any geographic expansion or contraction of those boundaries, shall be approved by the state fire marshal in accordance with rules the state fire marshal adopts. If the licensed premises consists of more than one parcel of real estate, those parcels shall be contiguous unless an exception is allowed pursuant to division (I) of this section. (I)(1) A licensed manufacturer may expand its licensed premises within this state to include not more than two storage locations that are located upon one or more real estate parcels that are noncontiguous to the licensed premises as that licensed premises exists on the date a licensee submits an application as described below, if all of the following apply: (a) The licensee submits an application to the state fire marshal and an application fee of one hundred dollars per storage location for which the licensee is requesting approval. (b) The identity of the holder of the license remains the same at the storage location. (c) The storage location has received a valid certificate of zoning compliance as applicable and a valid certificate of occupancy for each building or structure at the storage location issued by the authority having jurisdiction to issue the certificate for the storage location, and those certificates permit the distribution and storage of fireworks regulated under this chapter at the storage location and in the buildings or structures. The storage location shall be in compliance with all other applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations. (d) Every building or structure located upon the storage location is separated from occupied residential and nonresidential buildings or structures, railroads, highways, or any other buildings or structures on the licensed premises in accordance with the distances specified in the rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to section 3743.05 of the Revised Code. (e) Neither the licensee nor any person holding, owning, or controlling a five per cent or greater beneficial or equity interest in the licensee has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States, after September 29, 2005. (f) The state fire marshal approves the application for expansion. (2) The state fire marshal shall approve an application for expansion requested under division (I)(1) of this section if the state fire marshal receives the application fee and proof that the requirements of divisions (I)(1)(b) to (e) of this section are satisfied. The storage location shall be considered part of the original licensed premises and shall use the same distinct number assigned to the original licensed premises with any additional designations as the state fire marshal deems necessary in accordance with section 3743.03 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) A licensee who obtains approval for the use of a storage location in accordance with division (I) of this section shall use the storage location exclusively for the following activities, in accordance with division (C) of this section: (a) The packaging, assembling, or storing of fireworks, which shall only occur in buildings or structures approved for such hazardous uses by the building code official having jurisdiction for the storage location or, for 1.4G fireworks, in containers or trailers approved for such hazardous uses by the state fire marshal if such containers or trailers are not subject to regulation by the building code adopted in accordance with Chapter 3781. of the Revised Code. All such storage shall be in accordance with the rules adopted by the state fire marshal under division (G) of section 3743.05 of the Revised Code for the packaging, assembling, and storage of fireworks. (b) Distributing fireworks to other parcels of real estate located on the manufacturer's licensed premises, to licensed wholesalers or other licensed manufacturers in this state or to similarly licensed persons located in another state or country; (c) Distributing fireworks to a licensed exhibitor of fireworks pursuant to a properly issued permit in accordance with section 3743.54 of the Revised Code. (2) A licensed manufacturer shall not engage in any sales activity, including the retail sale of fireworks otherwise permitted under division (C)(2) or (C)(3) of this section, or pursuant to section 3743.44 or 3743.45 of the Revised Code, at the storage location approved under this section. (3) A storage location may not be relocated for a minimum period of five years after the storage location is approved by the state fire marshal in accordance with division (I) of this section. (K) The licensee shall prohibit public access to the storage location. The state fire marshal shall adopt rules to describe the acceptable measures a manufacturer shall use to prohibit access to the storage site. Sec. 3743.06. In addition to conforming to the rules of the fire marshal adopted pursuant to section 3743.05 of the Revised Code, licensed manufacturers of fireworks shall operate their fireworks plants in accordance with the following: (A) Signs indicating that smoking is generally forbidden and trespassing is prohibited on the premises of a fireworks plant shall be posted on the premises in a manner determined by the fire marshal. (B) Reasonable precautions shall be taken to protect the premises of a fireworks plant from trespass, loss, theft, or destruction. Only persons employed by the manufacturer, authorized governmental personnel, and persons who have obtained permission from a member of the manufacturer's office to be on the premises, are to be allowed to enter and remain on the premises. (C) Smoking or the carrying of pipes, cigarettes, or cigars, matches, lighters, other flame-producing items, or open flame on, or the carrying of a concealed source of ignition into, the premises of a fireworks plant is prohibited, except that a manufacturer may permit smoking in specified lunchrooms or restrooms in buildings or other structures in which no manufacturing, handling, sales, or storage of fireworks takes place. "NO SMOKING" signs shall be posted on the premises as required by the fire marshal. (D) Fire and explosion prevention and other reasonable safety measures and precautions shall be implemented by a manufacturer. (E) Persons shall not be permitted to have in their possession or under their control, while they are on the premises of the fireworks plant, any intoxicating liquor, beer, or controlled substance, and they shall not be permitted to enter or remain on the premises if they are found to be under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, beer, or controlled substance. (F) A manufacturer shall conform to all building, safety, and zoning statutes, ordinances, rules, or other enactments that apply to the premises of its fireworks plant. (G) Each fireworks plant shall have at least one class 1 magazine that is approved by the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, and firearms of the United States department of the treasury and that is otherwise in conformity with federal law. This division does not apply to fireworks plants existing on or before August 3, 1931. (H) Awnings, tents, and canopies shall not be used as facilities for the sale or storage of fireworks, except as expressly permitted by section 3743.48 of the Revised Code. This division does not prohibit the use of an awning or canopy attached to a public access showroom for storing nonflammable shopping convenience items such as shopping carts or baskets or providing a shaded area for patrons waiting to enter the public sales area. (I) Fireworks may be stored in trailers if the trailers are properly enclosed, secured, and grounded and are separated from any structure to which the public is admitted by a distance that will, in the fire marshal's judgment, allow fire-fighting equipment to have full access to the structures on the licensed premises. Such trailers may be moved into closer proximity to any structure only to accept or discharge cargo for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. Only two such trailers may be placed in such closer proximity at any one time. At no time may trailers be used for conducting sales of any class of fireworks, nor may members of the public have access to the trailers. Storage areas for fireworks that are in the same building where fireworks are displayed and sold to the public shall be separated from the areas to which the public has access by an appropriately rated fire wall. (J) A fire suppression system as defined in section 3781.108 of the Revised Code may be turned off only for repair, drainage of the system to prevent damage by freezing during the period of time, approved by the fire marshal, that the facility is closed to all public access during winter months, or maintenance of the system. If any repair or maintenance is necessary during times when the facility is open for public access and business as approved by the fire marshal, the licensed manufacturer shall notify in advance the appropriate insurance company and fire chief or fire prevention officer regarding the nature of the maintenance or repair and the time when it will be performed. (K) If any fireworks item is removed from its original package or is manufactured with any fuse other than a safety fuse approved by the consumer product safety commission, then the item shall be covered completely by repackaging or bagging or it shall otherwise be covered so as to prevent ignition prior to sale. (L) A safety officer shall be present during regular business hours at a building open to the public during the period commencing fourteen days before, and ending two days after, each fourth day of July. The officer shall be highly visible, enforce this chapter and any applicable building codes to the extent the officer is authorized by law, and be one of the following: (1) A deputy sheriff; (2) A law enforcement officer of a municipal corporation, township, or township or joint police district; (3) A private uniformed security guard registered under section 4749.06 of the Revised Code. (M) All doors of all buildings on the licensed premises shall swing outward. (N) All wholesale and commercial sales of fireworks shall be packaged, shipped, placarded, and transported in accordance with United States department of transportation regulations applicable to the transportation, and the offering for transportation, of hazardous materials. For purposes of this division, "wholesale and commercial sales" includes all sales for resale and any nonretail sale made in furtherance of a commercial enterprise. For purposes of enforcement of these regulations under section 4923.99 of the Revised Code, any sales transaction exceeding one thousand pounds shall be rebuttably presumed to be a wholesale or commercial sale. Sec. 3743.17. (A) The license of a wholesaler of fireworks is effective for one year beginning on the first day of December, and the state fire marshal shall issue or renew a license only on that date and at no other time. If a wholesaler of fireworks wishes to continue engaging in the wholesale sale of fireworks at the particular location after its then effective license expires, it shall apply not later than the first day of October for a new license pursuant to section 3743.15 of the Revised Code. The state fire marshal shall send a written notice of the expiration of its license to a licensed wholesaler at least three months before the expiration date. (B) If, during the effective period of its licensure, a licensed wholesaler of fireworks wishes to perform any construction, or make any structural change or renovation, on the premises on which the fireworks are sold, or to relocate its sales operations to a new licensed premises, the wholesaler shall notify the state fire marshal in writing. The state fire marshal may require a licensed wholesaler also to submit documentation, including, but not limited to, plans covering the proposed construction or structural change or renovation, or proposed new licensed premises, if the state fire marshal determines the documentation is necessary for evaluation purposes in light of the proposed construction, structural change or renovation, or relocation. Upon receipt of the notification and additional documentation required by the state fire marshal, the state fire marshal shall inspect the premises on which the fireworks are sold, or the proposed new licensed premises, to determine if the proposed construction, structural change or renovation, or relocation conforms to sections 3743.15 to 3743.21 of the Revised Code, divisions (C)(1) and (2) of section 3743.25 of the Revised Code, and the rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to section 3743.18 of the Revised Code. The state fire marshal shall issue a written authorization to the wholesaler for the construction, structural change or renovation, or new licensed premises if the state fire marshal determines, upon the inspection and a review of submitted documentation, that the construction, structural change or renovation, or new licensed premises conform to those sections and rules. (C) The license of a wholesaler of fireworks authorizes the wholesaler to engage only in the following activities: (1) Possess for sale at wholesale and sell at wholesale fireworks to persons who are licensed wholesalers of fireworks, to persons in accordance with sections 3743.44 to 3743.46 of the Revised Code, or to persons located in another state provided the fireworks are shipped directly out of this state to them by the wholesaler. The possession for sale shall be at the location described in the application for licensure or in the notification submitted under division (B) of this section, and the sale shall be from the inside of a licensed building and from no structure or device outside a licensed building. At no time shall a licensed wholesaler sell any class of fireworks outside a licensed building. (2) Possess for sale at retail and sell at retail fireworks, other than 1.4G fireworks as designated by the state fire marshal in rules adopted pursuant to division (A) of section 3743.05 of the Revised Code, to licensed exhibitors in accordance with sections 3743.50 to 3743.55 of the Revised Code, and possess for sale at retail and sell at retail fireworks, including 1.4G fireworks, to persons in accordance with sections 3743.44 to 3743.46 3743.48 of the Revised Code, or to persons located in another state provided the fireworks are shipped directly out of this state to them by the wholesaler. The possession for sale shall be at the location described in the application for licensure or in the notification submitted under division (B) of this section, and, except as otherwise provided in section 3743.48 of the Revised Code, the sale shall be from the inside of the licensed building and from no other structure or device outside this licensed building. At no time shallExcept as otherwise provided in section 3743.48 of the Revised Code, a licensed wholesaler shall not sell any class of fireworks outside a licensed building. A licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall sell under division (C) of this section only fireworks that meet the standards set by the consumer product safety commission or by the American fireworks standard laboratories or that have received an EX number from the United States department of transportation. (D) The license of a wholesaler of fireworks shall be protected under glass and posted in a conspicuous place at the location described in the application for licensure or in the notification submitted under division (B) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the license is not transferable or assignable. (1) The ownership of a wholesaler of fireworks license may be transferred to another person for the same location for which the license was issued, or approved pursuant to division (B) of this section, if the assets of the wholesaler are transferred to that person by inheritance or by a sale approved by the state fire marshal. (2) The license of a wholesaler of fireworks may be geographically relocated in accordance with division (D) of section 3743.75 of the Revised Code. (3) The license is subject to revocation in accordance with section 3743.21 of the Revised Code. (E) The state fire marshal shall adopt rules for the expansion or contraction of a licensed premises and for the approval of an expansion or contraction. The boundaries of a licensed premises, including any geographic expansion or contraction of those boundaries, shall be approved by the state fire marshal in accordance with rules the state fire marshal adopts. If the licensed premises of a licensed wholesaler from which the wholesaler operates consists of more than one parcel of real estate, those parcels must be contiguous, unless an exception is allowed pursuant to division (F) of this section. (F)(1) A licensed wholesaler may expand its licensed premises within this state to include not more than two storage locations that are located upon one or more real estate parcels that are noncontiguous to the licensed premises as that licensed premises exists on the date a licensee submits an application as described below, if all of the following apply: (a) The licensee submits an application to the state fire marshal requesting the expansion and an application fee of one hundred dollars per storage location for which the licensee is requesting approval. (b) The identity of the holder of the license remains the same at the storage location. (c) The storage location has received a valid certificate of zoning compliance, as applicable, and a valid certificate of occupancy for each building or structure at the storage location issued by the authority having jurisdiction to issue the certificate for the storage location, and those certificates permit the distribution and storage of fireworks regulated under this chapter at the storage location and in the buildings or structures. The storage location shall be in compliance with all other applicable federal, state, and local laws and regulations. (d) Every building or structure located upon the storage location is separated from occupied residential and nonresidential buildings or structures, railroads, highways, and any other buildings or structures on the licensed premises in accordance with the distances specified in the rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to section 3743.18 of the Revised Code. (e) Neither the licensee nor any person holding, owning, or controlling a five per cent or greater beneficial or equity interest in the licensee has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States, after September 29, 2005. (f) The state fire marshal approves the application for expansion. (2) The state fire marshal shall approve an application for expansion requested under division (F)(1) of this section if the state fire marshal receives the application fee and proof that the requirements of divisions (F)(1)(b) to (e) of this section are satisfied. The storage location shall be considered part of the original licensed premises and shall use the same distinct number assigned to the original licensed premises with any additional designations as the state fire marshal deems necessary in accordance with section 3743.16 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) A licensee who obtains approval for use of a storage location in accordance with division (F) of this section shall use the site exclusively for the following activities, in accordance with division (C)(1) of this section: (a) Packaging, assembling, or storing fireworks, which shall occur only in buildings or structures approved for such hazardous uses by the building code official having jurisdiction for the storage location or, for 1.4G fireworks, in containers or trailers approved for such hazardous uses by the state fire marshal if such containers or trailers are not subject to regulation by the building code adopted in accordance with Chapter 3781. of the Revised Code. All such storage shall be in accordance with the rules adopted by the state fire marshal under division (B)(4) of section 3743.18 of the Revised Code for the packaging, assembling, and storage of fireworks. (b) Distributing fireworks to other parcels of real estate located on the wholesaler's licensed premises, to licensed manufacturers or other licensed wholesalers in this state or to similarly licensed persons located in another state or country; (c) Distributing fireworks to a licensed exhibitor of fireworks pursuant to a properly issued permit in accordance with section 3743.54 of the Revised Code. (2) A licensed wholesaler shall not engage in any sales activity, including the retail sale of fireworks otherwise permitted under division (C)(2) of this section or pursuant to section 3743.44 or 3743.45 of the Revised Code, at a storage location approved under this section. (3) A storage location may not be relocated for a minimum period of five years after the storage location is approved by the state fire marshal in accordance with division (F) of this section. (H) A licensee shall prohibit public access to all storage locations it uses. The state fire marshal shall adopt rules establishing acceptable measures a wholesaler shall use to prohibit access to storage sites. (I) The state fire marshal shall not place the license of a wholesaler of fireworks in temporarily inactive status while the holder of the license is attempting to qualify to retain the license. (J) Each licensed wholesaler of fireworks or a designee of the wholesaler, whose identity is provided to the state fire marshal by the wholesaler, annually shall attend a continuing education program. The state fire marshal shall develop the program and the state fire marshal or a person or public agency approved by the state fire marshal shall conduct it. A licensed wholesaler or the wholesaler's designee who attends a program as required under this division, within one year after attending the program, shall conduct in-service training as approved by the state fire marshal for other employees of the licensed wholesaler regarding the information obtained in the program. A licensed wholesaler shall provide the state fire marshal with notice of the date, time, and place of all in-service training. For any program conducted under this division, the state fire marshal shall, in accordance with rules adopted by the state fire marshal under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, establish the subjects to be taught, the length of classes, the standards for approval, and time periods for notification by the licensee to the state fire marshal of any in-service training. (K) A licensed wholesaler shall maintain comprehensive general liability insurance coverage in the amount and type specified under division (B)(2) of section 3743.15 of the Revised Code at all times. Each policy of insurance required under this division shall contain a provision requiring the insurer to give not less than fifteen days' prior written notice to the state fire marshal before termination, lapse, or cancellation of the policy, or any change in the policy that reduces the coverage below the minimum required under this division. Prior to canceling or reducing the amount of coverage of any comprehensive general liability insurance coverage required under this division, a licensed wholesaler shall secure supplemental insurance in an amount and type that satisfies the requirements of this division so that no lapse in coverage occurs at any time. A licensed wholesaler who secures supplemental insurance shall file evidence of the supplemental insurance with the state fire marshal prior to canceling or reducing the amount of coverage of any comprehensive general liability insurance coverage required under this division. Sec. 3743.19. In addition to conforming to the rules of the fire marshal adopted pursuant to section 3743.18 of the Revised Code, licensed wholesalers of fireworks shall conduct their business operations in accordance with the following: (A) A Except as otherwise provided in section 3743.48 of the Revised Code, a wholesaler shall conduct its business operations from the location described in its application for licensure or in a notification submitted under division (B) of section 3743.17 of the Revised Code. (B) Signs indicating that smoking is generally forbidden and trespassing is prohibited on the premises of a wholesaler shall be posted on the premises as determined by the fire marshal. (C) Reasonable precautions shall be taken to protect the premises of a wholesaler from trespass, loss, theft, or destruction. (D) Smoking or the carrying of pipes, cigarettes, or cigars, matches, lighters, other flame-producing items, or open flame on, or the carrying of a concealed source of ignition into, the premises of a wholesaler is prohibited, except that a wholesaler may permit smoking in specified lunchrooms or restrooms in buildings or other structures in which no sales, handling, or storage of fireworks takes place. "NO SMOKING" signs shall be posted on the premises as required by the fire marshal. (E) Fire and explosion prevention and other reasonable safety measures and precautions shall be implemented by a wholesaler. (F) Persons shall not be permitted to have in their possession or under their control, while they are on the premises of a wholesaler, any intoxicating liquor, beer, or controlled substance, and they shall not be permitted to enter or remain on the premises if they are found to be under the influence of any intoxicating liquor, beer, or controlled substance. (G) A wholesaler shall conform to all building, safety, and zoning statutes, ordinances, rules, or other enactments that apply to its premises. (H) Each building used in the sale of fireworks shall be kept open to the public for at least four hours each day between the hours of eight a.m. and five p.m., five days of each week, every week of the year. Upon application from a licensed wholesaler, the fire marshal may waive any of the requirements of this division. (I) Awnings, tents, or canopies shall not be used as facilities for the storage or sale of fireworks, except as expressly permitted by section 3743.48 of the Revised Code. This division does not prohibit the use of an awning or canopy attached to a public access showroom for storing nonflammable shopping convenience items such as shopping carts or baskets or providing a shaded area for patrons waiting to enter the public sales area. (J) 1.4G fireworks may be stored in trailers if the trailers are properly enclosed, secured, and grounded and are separated from any structure to which the public is admitted by a distance that will, in the fire marshal's judgment, allow fire-fighting equipment to have full access to the structures on the licensed premises. Such trailers may be moved into closer proximity to any structure only to accept or discharge cargo for a period not to exceed forty-eight hours. Only two such trailers may be placed in such closer proximity at any one time. At no time may trailers be used for conducting sales of any class of fireworks nor may members of the public have access to the trailers. Storage areas for fireworks that are in the same building where fireworks are displayed and sold to the public shall be separated from the areas to which the public has access by an appropriately rated fire wall. If the licensee installs and properly maintains an early suppression fast response sprinkler system or equivalent fire suppression system as described in the fire code adopted by the fire marshal in accordance with section 3737.82 of the Revised Code throughout the structure, a fire barrier wall may be substituted for a fire wall between the areas to which the public has access and the storage portions of the structure. (K) A fire suppression system as defined in section 3781.108 of the Revised Code may be turned off only for repair, drainage of the system to prevent damage by freezing during the period of time, approved by the fire marshal under division (I) of this section, that the facility is closed to public access during winter months, or maintenance of the system. If any repair or maintenance is necessary during times when the facility is open for public access and business, the licensed wholesaler shall notify in advance the appropriate insurance company and fire chief or fire prevention officer regarding the nature of the maintenance or repair and the time when it will be performed. (L) If any fireworks item is removed from its original package or is manufactured with any fuse other than a fuse approved by the consumer product safety commission, then the item shall be covered completely by repackaging or bagging or it shall otherwise be covered so as to prevent ignition prior to sale. (M) A safety officer shall be present during regular business hours at a building open to the public during the period commencing fourteen days before, and ending two days after, each fourth day of July. The officer shall be highly visible, enforce this chapter and any applicable building codes to the extent the officer is authorized by law, and be one of the following: (1) A deputy sheriff; (2) A law enforcement officer of a municipal corporation, township, or township or joint police district; (3) A private uniformed security guard registered under section 4749.06 of the Revised Code. (N) All doors of all buildings on the licensed premises shall swing outward. (O) All wholesale and commercial sales of fireworks shall be packaged, shipped, placarded, and transported in accordance with United States department of transportation regulations applicable to the transportation, and the offering for transportation, of hazardous materials. For purposes of this division, "wholesale and commercial sales" includes all sales for resale and any nonretail sale made in furtherance of a commercial enterprise. For purposes of enforcement of these regulations under section 4923.99 of the Revised Code, any sales transaction exceeding one thousand pounds shall be rebuttably presumed to be a wholesale or commercial sale. Sec. 3743.25. (A)(1) Except as described in division (A)(2) of this section and in section 3743.48 of the Revised Code, all retail sales of 1.4G fireworks by a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler shall only occur from an approved retail sales showroom on a licensed premises or from a representative sample showroom as described in this section on a licensed premises. For the purposes of this section, a retail sale includes the transfer of the possession of the 1.4G fireworks from the licensed manufacturer or wholesaler to the purchaser of the fireworks. (2) Sales of 1.4G fireworks to a licensed exhibitor for a properly permitted exhibition shall occur in accordance with the provisions of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the state fire marshal under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Such rules shall specify, at a minimum, that the licensed exhibitor holds a license under section 3743.51 of the Revised Code, that the exhibitor possesses a valid exhibition permit issued in accordance with section 3743.54 of the Revised Code, and that the fireworks shipped are to be used at the specifically permitted exhibition. (B) All wholesale sales of fireworks by a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler shall only occur from a licensed premises to persons who intend to resell the fireworks purchased at wholesale. A wholesale sale by a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler may occur as follows: (1) The direct sale and shipment of fireworks to a person outside of this state; (2) From an approved retail sales showroom as described in this section; (3) From a representative sample showroom as described in this section; (4) By delivery of wholesale fireworks to a purchaser at a licensed premises outside of a structure or building on that premises. All other portions of the wholesale sales transaction may occur at any location on a licensed premises. (5) Any other method as described in rules adopted by the state fire marshal under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (C) A Except as otherwise provided in section 3743.48 of the Revised Code, a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler shall only sell 1.4G fireworks from a representative sample showroom or a retail sales showroom. Each licensed premises shall only contain one sales structure. A representative sample showroom shall consist of a structure constructed and maintained in accordance with the nonresidential building code adopted under Chapter 3781. of the Revised Code and the fire code adopted under section 3737.82 of the Revised Code for a use and occupancy group that permits mercantile sales. A representative sample showroom shall not contain any pyrotechnics, pyrotechnic materials, fireworks, explosives, explosive materials, or any similar hazardous materials or substances. A representative sample showroom shall be used only for the public viewing of fireworks product representations, including paper materials, packaging materials, catalogs, photographs, or other similar product depictions. The delivery of product to a purchaser of fireworks at a licensed premises that has a representative sample structure shall not occur inside any structure on a licensed premises. Such product delivery shall occur on the licensed premises in a manner prescribed by rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If a manufacturer or wholesaler elects to conduct sales from a retail sales showroom, the showroom structures, to which the public may have any access and in which employees are required to work, on all licensed premises, shall comply with the following safety requirements: (1) A fireworks showroom that is constructed or upon which expansion is undertaken on and after June 30, 1997, shall be equipped with interlinked fire detection, fire suppression, smoke exhaust, and smoke evacuation systems that are approved by the superintendent of industrial compliance in the department of commerce. (2)(a) A fireworks showroom that first begins to operate on or after June 30, 1997, or that resumes operations at any time after a period of inactive status of licensure greater than one year, and to which the public has access for retail purposes shall not exceed seven thousand five hundred square feet in floor area. (b) A fireworks showroom that, through construction of a new showroom, expansion of an existing showroom, or similar means, first exceeds five thousand square feet, to which the public has access for retail purposes, after the effective date of this amendment February 7, 2022, shall be equipped with a sprinkler system that meets the criteria for sprinkler systems in extra hazard (group 2) occupancies under "NFPA 13, Standard for the Installation of Sprinkler Systems (2019 Edition)." (c) Notwithstanding division (D) of this section, the state fire marshal may provide a variance to the requirements of division (C)(2)(b) of this section pursuant to section 3743.59 of the Revised Code for a sprinkler system that matches or exceeds the degree of safety provided by a sprinkler system that meets the criteria for sprinkler systems in extra hazard (group 2) occupancies under "NFPA 13, Standard for the Installation of Sprinkler Systems (2019 Edition)." (3) A newly constructed or an existing fireworks showroom structure that exists on September 23, 2008, but that, on or after September 23, 2008, is altered or added to in a manner requiring the submission of plans, drawings, specifications, or data pursuant to section 3791.04 of the Revised Code, shall comply with a graphic floor plan layout that is approved by the state fire marshal and superintendent showing width of aisles, parallel arrangement of aisles to exits, number of exits per wall, maximum occupancy load, evacuation plan for occupants, height of storage or display of merchandise, and other information as may be required by the state fire marshal and superintendent. (4) A fireworks showroom structure that exists on June 30, 1997, shall be in compliance on or after June 30, 1997, with floor plans showing occupancy load limits and internal circulation and egress patterns that are approved by the state fire marshal and superintendent, and that are submitted under seal as required by section 3791.04 of the Revised Code. (D) The safety requirements established in division (C) of this section are not subject to any variance, waiver, or exclusion pursuant to this chapter or any applicable building code. Sec. 3743.48. (A) For the purposes of this section, "online sale" means a retail sale through an internet web site or other digital platform. (B) A licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler may conduct online sales of 1.4G fireworks in accordance with this section. A licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler shall ensure that all selection, ordering, payment, and delivery is carried out in accordance with the procedures and requirements of this chapter and all rules adopted thereunder, except to the extent that those procedures, requirements, and rules directly conflict with this section. (C) Each online sale of 1.4G fireworks shall be specifically associated with a single licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler, identified by license identification number and the address of the licensed premises. A licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler shall transfer possession of 1.4G fireworks purchased in an online sale only in the retail showroom of the licensed premises or via curbside delivery made in accordance with all of the following: (1) The delivery is made to the verified purchaser of the 1.4G fireworks. (2) The delivery occurs on the licensed premises associated with sale. (3) The delivery occurs in a designated customer pick-up zone which may be accessible by motor vehicles. (4) The purchaser is provided a safety pamphlet, in accordance with section 3743.47 of the Revised Code, at the point of delivery. (5) The purchaser is offered safety glasses for a nominal fee at the point of delivery in accordance section 3743.47 of the Revised Code. (D) A licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler may construct a tent or other temporary structure on a licensed premises to provide shelter for employees and purchasers at the point of curbside delivery, provided that such structures are approved by the state fire marshal and are in compliance with all state and local laws, including the state building code, the state fire code, and any applicable zoning requirements. (E) A licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler shall not transfer possession of 1.4G fireworks purchased in an online sale to any person other than the verified purchaser. Before transferring possession, the licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler shall verify all of the following: (1) The number and types of items included in the order; (2) That the purchaser is at least eighteen years of age; (3) That the purchaser's name is the same name associated with the credit or debit card with which the order was placed; (4) That the purchaser attests to understanding and agrees to comply with all applicable federal, state, and local laws regarding consumer fireworks storage and use; (5) That the purchaser signs all forms required by law; (6) That the purchaser pays the fee imposed by section 3743.22 of the Revised Code. (F) A licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler that conducts online sales of 1.4G fireworks shall do all of the following: (1) Comply with all applicable state and local laws, including the state building code, state fire code, and zoning requirements; (2) Implement reasonable traffic control measures for curbside deliveries; (3) Maintain all regular fireworks sales records, including any records necessary to demonstrate compliance with this section, and make those records available upon request of the state fire marshal or any law enforcement officer, fire code official, or building code official with jurisdiction. (G) A licensed manufacturer or licensed wholesaler shall not do any of the following: (1) Deliver fireworks via mail order, parcel service, or any other delivery process that occurs outside of the licensed premises; (2) Sell or offer for sale fireworks or other items outside of the licensed retail showroom except as expressly authorized by this section; (3) Display fireworks for sale outside of a retail showroom; (4) Permit any member of the public to access any areas on the licensed premises other than the retail showroom and the designated area for curbside delivery. (H) Nothing in this section shall be construed to do any of the following: (1) Reduce, waive, or otherwise eliminate any licensure or safety requirements in this chapter or the rules adopted thereunder; (2) Exempt any retail sales of 1.4G fireworks from the fee imposed by section 3743.22 of the Revised Code; (3) Reduce, waive, or otherwise eliminate any of a licensed manufacturer's or licensed wholesaler's liability, insurance, workers compensation, or other legal obligations. (I)(1) A licensed wholesaler or licensed manufacturer is not required to conduct online sales of fireworks. (2) A licensed wholesaler or licensed manufacturer may implement a hybrid firework purchase and delivery system composed of one or more of the following: (a) Standard retail showroom sales; (b) Online selection of, or payment for, 1.4G fireworks products and in-store showroom delivery of those products; (c) Online selection of, or payment for, 1.4G fireworks products and curb-side delivery of those products; (d) Retail showroom-based product selection and payment, and curb-side delivery of those products; (e) Other similar purchase and delivery systems approved in writing by the state fire marshal in accordance with division (J) of this section. (J) A licensed wholesaler or licensed manufacturer may submit to the state fire marshal proposals for alternative 1.4G firework purchase and delivery systems that satisfy the requirements of this section. The state fire marshal shall review each such proposal and, if the alternative firework purchase and delivery system satisfies the requirements of this section, may approve that firework purchase and delivery system for use by the licensed wholesaler or licensed manufacturer. (K) This section does not apply to 1.3G fireworks or wholesale sales. (L) The state fire marshal shall adopt rules and standards in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to implement and enforce this section. Sec. 3743.60. (A) No person shall manufacture fireworks in this state unless it is a licensed manufacturer of fireworks, and no person shall operate a fireworks plant in this state unless it has been issued a license as a manufacturer of fireworks for the particular fireworks plant. (B) No person shall operate a fireworks plant in this state after its license as a manufacturer of fireworks for the particular fireworks plant has expired, is suspended, has been denied renewal, or has been revoked, unless a new license has been obtained or the suspension lifted. (C) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks, during the effective period of its licensure, shall construct, locate, or relocate any buildings or other structures on the premises of its fireworks plant, make any structural change or renovation in any building or other structure on the premises of its fireworks plant, or change the nature of its manufacturing of fireworks so as to include the processing of fireworks without first obtaining a written authorization from the state fire marshal pursuant to division (B) of section 3743.04 of the Revised Code. (D) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall manufacture fireworks, possess fireworks for sale at wholesale or retail, or sell fireworks at wholesale or retail, in a manner not authorized by division (C) of section 3743.04 of the Revised Code. (E) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall knowingly fail to comply with the rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to section sections 3743.05 and 3743.48 of the Revised Code or the requirements of section sections 3743.06 and 3743.48 of the Revised Code. (F) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall fail to maintain complete inventory, wholesale sale, and retail records as required by section 3743.07 of the Revised Code, or to permit inspection of these records or the premises of a fireworks plant pursuant to section 3743.08 of the Revised Code. (G) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall fail to comply with an order of the state fire marshal issued pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 3743.08 of the Revised Code, within the specified period of time. (H) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall fail to comply with an order of the state fire marshal issued pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 3743.08 of the Revised Code until the nonconformities are eliminated, corrected, or otherwise remedied or the seventy-two hour period specified in that division has expired, whichever first occurs. (I) No person shall smoke or shall carry a pipe, cigarette, or cigar, or a match, lighter, other flame-producing item, or open flame on, or shall carry a concealed source of ignition into, the premises of a fireworks plant, except as smoking is authorized in specified lunchrooms or restrooms by a manufacturer pursuant to division (C) of section 3743.06 of the Revised Code. (J) No person shall have possession or control of, or be under the influence of, any intoxicating liquor, beer, or controlled substance, while on the premises of a fireworks plant. (K) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall negligently fail to furnish a safety pamphlet to a purchaser of 1.4G fireworks as required by division (A) of section 3743.47 of the Revised Code. (L) No licensed manufacturer of fireworks shall negligently fail to have safety glasses available for sale as required by division (B) of section 3743.47 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3743.61. (A) No person, except a licensed manufacturer of fireworks engaging in the wholesale sale of fireworks as authorized by division (C)(2) of section 3743.04 of the Revised Code, shall operate as a wholesaler of fireworks in this state unless it is a licensed wholesaler of fireworks, or shall operate as a wholesaler of fireworks at any location in this state unless it has been issued a license as a wholesaler of fireworks for the particular location. (B) No person shall operate as a wholesaler of fireworks at a particular location in this state after its license as a wholesaler of fireworks for the particular location has expired, is suspended, has been denied renewal, or has been revoked, unless a new license has been obtained or the suspension lifted. (C) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks, during the effective period of its licensure, shall perform any construction, or make any structural change or renovation, on the premises on which the fireworks are sold without first obtaining a written authorization from the state fire marshal pursuant to division (B) of section 3743.17 of the Revised Code. (D) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall possess fireworks for sale at wholesale or retail, or sell fireworks at wholesale or retail, in a manner not authorized by division (C) of section 3743.17 of the Revised Code. (E) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall knowingly fail to comply with the rules adopted by the state fire marshal pursuant to section sections 3743.18 and 3743.48 or the requirements of section sections 3743.19 and 3743.48 of the Revised Code. (F) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall fail to maintain complete inventory, wholesale sale, and retail records as required by section 3743.20 of the Revised Code, or to permit inspection of these records or the premises of the wholesaler pursuant to section 3743.21 of the Revised Code. (G) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall fail to comply with an order of the state fire marshal issued pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 3743.21 of the Revised Code, within the specified period of time. (H) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall fail to comply with an order of the state fire marshal issued pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 3743.21 of the Revised Code until the nonconformities are eliminated, corrected, or otherwise remedied or the seventy-two hour period specified in that division has expired, whichever first occurs. (I) No person shall smoke or shall carry a pipe, cigarette, or cigar, or a match, lighter, other flame-producing item, or open flame on, or shall carry a concealed source of ignition into, the premises of a wholesaler of fireworks, except as smoking is authorized in specified lunchrooms or restrooms by a wholesaler pursuant to division (D) of section 3743.19 of the Revised Code. (J) No person shall have possession or control of, or be under the influence of, any intoxicating liquor, beer, or controlled substance, while on the premises of a wholesaler of fireworks. (K) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall negligently fail to furnish a safety pamphlet to a purchaser of 1.4G fireworks as required by division (A) of section 3743.47 of the Revised Code. (L) No licensed wholesaler of fireworks shall negligently fail to have safety glasses available for sale as required by division (B) of section 3743.47 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3743.63. (A) No person who purchases fireworks in this state shall obtain possession of the fireworks in this state unless the person complies with sections 3743.44 to 3743.463743.48 of the Revised Code. (B) Except for the purchase of 1.4G fireworks made under section 3743.45 of the Revised Code, no person who resides in another state and who purchases fireworks in this state shall obtain possession of fireworks in this state other than from a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler, or fail, when transporting 1.3G fireworks, to transport them directly out of this state within seventy-two hours after the time of their purchase. (C) No person who purchases fireworks in this state under section 3743.45 of the Revised Code shall give or sell to any other person in this state fireworks that the person has acquired in this state. Sec. 3743.65. (A) No person shall possess fireworks in this state or shall possess for sale or sell fireworks in this state, except a licensed manufacturer of fireworks as authorized by sections 3743.02 to 3743.08 and 3743.48 of the Revised Code, a licensed wholesaler of fireworks as authorized by sections 3743.15 to 3743.21 and 3743.48 of the Revised Code, a shipping permit holder as authorized by section 3743.40 of the Revised Code, a licensed fountain device retailer as authorized by section 3743.27 of the Revised Code, a person as authorized by sections 3743.44 and , 3743.45, and 3743.48 of the Revised Code, or a licensed exhibitor of fireworks as authorized by sections 3743.50 to 3743.55 of the Revised Code, and except as provided in section 3743.80 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in sections 3743.45 and 3743.80 of the Revised Code and except for licensed exhibitors of fireworks authorized to conduct a fireworks exhibition pursuant to sections 3743.50 to 3743.55 of the Revised Code, no person shall discharge, ignite, or explode any fireworks in this state. (C) No person shall use in a theater or public hall, what is technically known as fireworks showers, or a mixture containing potassium chlorate and sulphur. (D) No person shall sell fireworks of any kind to a person under eighteen years of age. No person under eighteen years of age shall enter a fireworks sales showroom unless that person is accompanied by a parent, legal guardian, or other responsible adult. No person under eighteen years of age shall touch or possess fireworks on a licensed premises without the consent of the licensee. A licensee may eject any person from a licensed premises that is in any way disruptive to the safe operation of the premises. (E) Except as otherwise provided in section 3743.44 of the Revised Code, no person, other than a licensed manufacturer, licensed wholesaler, licensed exhibitor, or shipping permit holder, shall possess 1.3G fireworks in this state. (F) Except as otherwise provided in division (J) of section 3743.06 and division (K) of section 3743.19 of the Revised Code, no person shall knowingly disable a fire suppression system as defined in section 3781.108 of the Revised Code on the premises of a fireworks plant of a licensed manufacturer of fireworks or on the premises of the business operations of a licensed wholesaler of fireworks. (G) No person shall negligently discharge, ignite, or explode fireworks while in possession or control of, or under the influence of, any intoxicating liquor, beer, or controlled substance. (H) No person shall negligently discharge, ignite, or explode fireworks on the property of another person without that person's permission to use fireworks on that property. Sec. 3745.11. (A) Applicants for and holders of permits, licenses, variances, plan approvals, and certifications issued by the director of environmental protection pursuant to Chapters 3704., 3734., 6109., and 6111. of the Revised Code shall pay a fee to the environmental protection agency for each such issuance and each application for an issuance as provided by this section. No fee shall be charged for any issuance for which no application has been submitted to the director. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2) of this section, beginning July 1, 1994, each person who owns or operates an air contaminant source and who is required to apply for and obtain a Title V permit under section 3704.036 of the Revised Code shall pay an annual fee of five thousand dollars in addition to the fees set forth in this division. For the purposes of this division, total emissions of air contaminants may be calculated using engineering calculations, emissions factors, material balance calculations, or performance testing procedures, as authorized by the director. The following fees shall be assessed on the total actual emissions from a source in tons per year of the regulated pollutants particulate matter, sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, organic compounds, and lead: (1) Fifteen dollars per ton on the total actual emissions of each such regulated pollutant during the period July through December 1993, to be collected no sooner than July 1, 1994; (2) Twenty dollars per ton on the total actual emissions of each such regulated pollutant during calendar year 1994, to be collected no sooner than April 15, 1995; (3) Twenty-five dollars per ton on the total actual emissions of each such regulated pollutant in calendar year 1995, and each subsequent calendar year, to be collected no sooner than the fifteenth day of April of the year next succeeding the calendar year in which the emissions occurred. The fees levied under this division do not apply to that portion of the emissions of a regulated pollutant at a facility that exceed four thousand tons during a calendar year. (C)(1) The fees assessed under division (B) of this section are for the purpose of providing funding for the Title V permit program. (2) The fees assessed under division (B) of this section do not apply to emissions from any electric generating unit designated as a Phase I unit under Title IV of the federal Clean Air Act prior to calendar year 2000. Those fees shall be assessed on the emissions from such a generating unit commencing in calendar year 2001 based upon the total actual emissions from the generating unit during calendar year 2000 and shall continue to be assessed each subsequent calendar year based on the total actual emissions from the generating unit during the preceding calendar year. (3) The director shall issue invoices to owners or operators of air contaminant sources who are required to pay a fee assessed under division (B) or (D) of this section. Any such invoice shall be issued no sooner than the applicable date when the fee first may be collected in a year under the applicable division, shall identify the nature and amount of the fee assessed, and shall indicate that the fee is required to be paid within thirty days after the issuance of the invoice. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, beginning January 1, 2004, each person who owns or operates an air contaminant source; who is required to apply for a permit to operate pursuant to rules adopted under division (G), or a variance pursuant to division (H), of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code; and who is not required to apply for and obtain a Title V permit under section 3704.03 of the Revised Code shall pay a single fee based upon the sum of the actual annual emissions from the facility of the regulated pollutants particulate matter, sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, organic compounds, and lead in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Total tons per year of regulated pollutants emitted Annual fee per facility B More than 0, but less than 10 $100 C 10 or more, but less than 50 200 D 50 or more, but less than 100 300 E 100 or more 700 (2)(a) As used in division (D) of this section, "synthetic minor facility" means a facility for which one or more permits to install or permits to operate have been issued for the air contaminant sources at the facility that include terms and conditions that lower the facility's potential to emit air contaminants below the major source thresholds established in rules adopted under section 3704.036 of the Revised Code. (b) Beginning January 1, 2000, through June 30, 2026Through June 30, 2028, each person who owns or operates a synthetic minor facility shall pay an annual fee of five thousand dollars in addition to a fee based on the sum of the actual annual emissions from the facility of particulate matter, sulfur dioxide, nitrogen dioxide, organic compounds, and lead in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Combined total tons per year of all regulated pollutants emitted Annual fee per facility B Less than 10 $170 $255 C 10 or more, but less than 20 340510 D 20 or more, but less than 30 6701,005 E 30 or more, but less than 40 1,0101,515 F 40 or more, but less than 50 1,3402,010 G 50 or more, but less than 60 1,6802,520 H 60 or more, but less than 70 2,0103,015 I 70 or more, but less than 80 2,3503,525 J 80 or more, but less than 90 2,6804,020 K 90 or more, but less than 100 3,0204,530 L 100 or more 3,3505,025 (3) The fees assessed under division (D)(1) of this section shall be collected annually no sooner than the fifteenth day of April, commencing in 2005. The fees assessed under division (D)(2) of this section shall be collected no sooner than the fifteenth day of April, commencing in 2000. The fees assessed under division (D) of this section in a calendar year shall be based upon the sum of the actual emissions of those regulated pollutants during the preceding calendar year. For the purpose of division (D) of this section, emissions of air contaminants may be calculated using engineering calculations, emission factors, material balance calculations, or performance testing procedures, as authorized by the director. The director, by rule, may require persons who are required to pay the fees assessed under division (D) of this section to pay those fees biennially rather than annually. (E)(1) Consistent with the need to cover the reasonable costs of the Title V permit program, the director annually shall increase the fees assessed on emissions prescribed in division (B) of this section by the percentage, if any, by which the consumer price index for the most recent calendar year ending before the beginning of a year exceeds the consumer price index for calendar year 1989. Upon calculating an increase in fees authorized by division (E)(1) of this section, the director shall compile revised fee schedules for the purposes of division (B) of this section and shall make the revised schedules available to persons required to pay the fees assessed under that division and to the public. (2) For the purposes of division (E)(1) of this section: (a) The consumer price index for any year is the average of the consumer price index for all urban consumers published by the United States department of labor as of the close of the twelve-month period ending on the thirty-first day of August of that year. (b) If the 1989 consumer price index is revised, the director shall use the revision of the consumer price index that is most consistent with that for calendar year 1989. (F) Each person who is issued a permit to install pursuant to rules adopted under division (F) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code on or after July 1, 2003, shall pay the fees specified in the following schedules: (1) Fuel-burning equipment (boilers, furnaces, or process heaters used in the process of burning fuel for the primary purpose of producing heat or power by indirect heat transfer) 1 2 A Input capacity (maximum) (million British thermal units per hour) Permit to install B Greater than 0, but less than 10 $200 $300 C 10 or more, but less than 100 400600 D 100 or more, but less than 300 10001,500 E 300 or more, but less than 500 22503,375 F 500 or more, but less than 1000 37505,625 G 1000 or more, but less than 5000 60009,000 H 5000 or more 900013,500 Units burning exclusively natural gas, number two fuel oil, or both shall be assessed a fee that is one-half the applicable amount shown in division (F)(1) of this section. (2) Combustion turbines and stationary internal combustion engines designed to generate electricity 1 2 A Generating capacity (mega watts) Permit to install B 0 or more, but less than 10 $25 $37.50 C 10 or more, but less than 25 150225 D 25 or more, but less than 50 300450 E 50 or more, but less than 100 500750 F 100 or more, but less than 250 10001,500 G 250 or more 20003,000 (3) Incinerators 1 2 A Input capacity (pounds per hour) Permit to install B 0 to 100 $100 $150 C 101 to 500 500750 D 501 to 2000 10001,500 E 2001 to 20,000 15002,250 F more than 20,000 37505,625 (4)(a) Process 1 2 A Process weight rate (pounds per hour) Permit to install B 0 to 1000 $200 $300 C 1001 to 5000 500750 D 5001 to 10,000 7501,125 E 10,001 to 50,000 10001,500 F more than 50,000 12501,875 In any process where process weight rate cannot be ascertained, the minimum fee shall be assessed. A boiler, furnace, combustion turbine, stationary internal combustion engine, or process heater designed to provide direct heat or power to a process not designed to generate electricity shall be assessed a fee established in division (F)(4)(a) of this section. A combustion turbine or stationary internal combustion engine designed to generate electricity shall be assessed a fee established in division (F)(2) of this section. (b) Notwithstanding division (F)(4)(a) of this section, any person issued a permit to install pursuant to rules adopted under division (F) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code shall pay the fees set forth in division (F)(4)(c) of this section for a process used in any of the following industries, as identified by the applicable two-digit, three-digit, or four-digit standard industrial classification code according to the Standard Industrial Classification Manual published by the United States office of management and budget in the executive office of the president, 1987, as revised: Major group 10, metal mining; Major group 12, coal mining; Major group 14, mining and quarrying of nonmetallic minerals; Industry group 204, grain mill products; 2873 Nitrogen fertilizers; 2874 Phosphatic fertilizers; 3281 Cut stone and stone products; 3295 Minerals and earth, ground or otherwise treated; 4221 Grain elevators (storage only); 5159 Farm related raw materials; 5261 Retail nurseries and lawn and garden supply stores. (c) The fees set forth in the following schedule apply to the issuance of a permit to install pursuant to rules adopted under division (F) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code for a process identified in division (F)(4)(b) of this section: 1 2 A Process weight rate (pounds per hour) Permit to install B 0 to 10,000 $200 $300 C 10,001 to 50,000 400600 D 50,001 to 100,000 500750 E 100,001 to 200,000 600900 F 200,001 to 400,000 7501,125 G 400,001 or more 9001,350 (5) Storage tanks 1 2 A Gallons (maximum useful capacity) Permit to install B 0 to 20,000 $100 $150 C 20,001 to 40,000 150225 D 40,001 to 100,000 250375 E 100,001 to 500,000 400600 F 500,001 or greater 7501,125 (6) Gasoline/fuel dispensing facilities 1 2 A For each gasoline/fuel dispensing facility (includes all units at the facility) Permit to install $100$150 (7) Dry cleaning facilities 1 2 A For each dry cleaning facility (includes all units at the facility) Permit to install $100$150 (8) Registration status 1 2 A For each source covered by registration status Permit to install $75$112.50 (G) An owner or operator who is responsible for an asbestos demolition or renovation project pursuant to rules adopted under section 3704.03 of the Revised Code shall pay, upon submitting a notification pursuant to rules adopted under that section, the fees set forth in the following schedule: 1 2 A Action Fee B Each notification $75 C Asbestos removal $3/unit D Asbestos cleanup $4/cubic yard For purposes of this division, "unit" means any combination of linear feet or square feet equal to fifty. (H) A person who is issued an extension of time for a permit to install an air contaminant source pursuant to rules adopted under division (F) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee equal to one-half the fee originally assessed for the permit to install under this section, except that the fee for such an extension shall not exceed two hundred dollars. (I) A person who is issued a modification to a permit to install an air contaminant source pursuant to rules adopted under section 3704.03 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee equal to one-half of the fee that would be assessed under this section to obtain a permit to install the source. The fee assessed by this division only applies to modifications that are initiated by the owner or operator of the source and shall not exceed two thousand dollars. (J) Notwithstanding division (F) of this section, a person who applies for or obtains a permit to install pursuant to rules adopted under division (F) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code after the date actual construction of the source began shall pay a fee for the permit to install that is equal to twice the fee that otherwise would be assessed under the applicable division unless the applicant received authorization to begin construction under division (W) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code. This division only applies to sources for which actual construction of the source begins on or after July 1, 1993. The imposition or payment of the fee established in this division does not preclude the director from taking any administrative or judicial enforcement action under this chapter, Chapter 3704., 3714., 3734., or 6111. of the Revised Code, or a rule adopted under any of them, in connection with a violation of rules adopted under division (F) of section 3704.03 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "actual construction of the source" means the initiation of physical on-site construction activities in connection with improvements to the source that are permanent in nature, including, without limitation, the installation of building supports and foundations and the laying of underground pipework. (K)(1) Money received under division (B) of this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the Title V clean air fund created in section 3704.035 of the Revised Code. Annually, not more than fifty cents per ton of each fee assessed under division (B) of this section on actual emissions from a source and received by the environmental protection agency pursuant to that division may be transferred by the director using an interstate transfer voucher to the state treasury to the credit of the small business assistance fund created in section 3706.19 of the Revised Code. In addition, annually, the amount of money necessary for the operation of the office of ombudsperson as determined under division (B) of that section shall be transferred to the state treasury to the credit of the small business ombudsperson fund created by that section. (2) Money received by the agency pursuant to divisions (D), (F), (G), (H), (I), and (J) of this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the non-Title V clean air fund created in section 3704.035 of the Revised Code. (L)(1) A person applying for a plan approval for a wastewater treatment works pursuant to section 6111.44, 6111.45, or 6111.46 of the Revised Code shall pay a nonrefundable fee of one hundred dollars plus sixty-five one-hundredths of one per cent of the estimated project cost through June 30, 20262028, and a nonrefundable application fee of one hundred dollars plus two-tenths of one per cent of the estimated project cost on and after July 1, 20262028, except that the total fee shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars through June 30, 20262028, and five thousand dollars on and after July 1, 20262028. The fee shall be paid at the time the application is submitted. (2) A person who has entered into an agreement with the director under section 6111.14 of the Revised Code shall pay an administrative service fee for each plan submitted under that section for approval that shall not exceed the minimum amount necessary to pay administrative costs directly attributable to processing plan approvals. The director annually shall calculate the fee and shall notify all persons who have entered into agreements under that section, or who have applied for agreements, of the amount of the fee. (3)(a)(i) Not later than January 30, 20242026, and January 30, 20252027, a person holding an NPDES discharge permit issued pursuant to Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code with an average daily discharge flow of five thousand gallons or more shall pay a nonrefundable annual discharge fee. Any person who fails to pay the fee at that time shall pay an additional amount that equals ten per cent of the required annual discharge fee. (ii) The billing year for the annual discharge fee established in division (L)(3)(a)(i) of this section shall consist of a twelve-month period beginning on the first day of January of the year preceding the date when the annual discharge fee is due. In the case of an existing source that permanently ceases to discharge during a billing year, the director shall reduce the annual discharge fee, including the surcharge applicable to certain industrial facilities pursuant to division (L)(3)(c) of this section, by one-twelfth for each full month during the billing year that the source was not discharging, but only if the person holding the NPDES discharge permit for the source notifies the director in writing, not later than the first day of October of the billing year, of the circumstances causing the cessation of discharge. (iii) The annual discharge fee established in division (L)(3)(a)(i) of this section, except for the surcharge applicable to certain industrial facilities pursuant to division (L)(3)(c) of this section, shall be based upon the average daily discharge flow in gallons per day calculated using first day of May through thirty-first day of October flow data for the period two years prior to the date on which the fee is due. In the case of NPDES discharge permits for new sources, the fee shall be calculated using the average daily design flow of the facility until actual average daily discharge flow values are available for the time period specified in division (L)(3)(a)(iii) of this section. The annual discharge fee may be prorated for a new source as described in division (L)(3)(a)(ii) of this section. (b)(i) An NPDES permit holder that is a public discharger shall pay the fee specified in the following schedule: 1 2 A Average daily discharge flow Fee due by January 30, 20242026, and January 30, 20252027 B 5,000 to 49,999 $200 C 50,000 to 100,000 500 D 100,001 to 250,000 1,050 E 250,001 to 1,000,000 2,600 F 1,000,001 to 5,000,000 5,200 G 5,000,001 to 10,000,000 10,350 H 10,000,001 to 20,000,000 15,550 I 20,000,001 to 50,000,000 25,900 J 50,000,001 to 100,000,000 41,400 K 100,000,001 or more 62,100 (ii) Public dischargers owning or operating two or more publicly owned treatment works serving the same political subdivision, as "treatment works" is defined in section 6111.01 of the Revised Code, and that serve exclusively political subdivisions having a population of fewer than one hundred thousand persons shall pay an annual discharge fee under division (L)(3)(b)(i) of this section that is based on the combined average daily discharge flow of the treatment works. (c)(i) An NPDES permit holder that is an industrial discharger, other than a coal mining operator identified by P in the third character of the permittee's NPDES permit number, shall pay the fee specified in the following schedule: 1 2 A Average daily discharge flow Fee due by January 30, 20242026, and January 30, 20252027 B 5,000 to 49,999 $250 C 50,000 to 250,000 1,200 D 250,001 to 1,000,000 2,950 E 1,000,001 to 5,000,000 5,850 F 5,000,001 to 10,000,000 8,800 G 10,000,001 to 20,000,000 11,700 H 20,000,001 to 100,000,000 14,050 I 100,000,001 to 250,000,000 16,400 J 250,000,001 or more 18,700 (ii) In addition to the fee specified in the above schedule, an NPDES permit holder that is an industrial discharger classified as a major discharger during all or part of the annual discharge fee billing year specified in division (L)(3)(a)(ii) of this section shall pay a nonrefundable annual surcharge of seven thousand five hundred dollars not later than January 30, 20242026, and not later than January 30, 20252027. Any person who fails to pay the surcharge at that time shall pay an additional amount that equals ten per cent of the amount of the surcharge. (d) Notwithstanding divisions (L)(3)(b) and (c) of this section, a public discharger, that is not a separate municipal storm sewer system, identified by I in the third character of the permittee's NPDES permit number and an industrial discharger identified by I, J, L, V, W, X, Y, or Z in the third character of the permittee's NPDES permit number shall pay a nonrefundable annual discharge fee of one hundred eighty dollars not later than January 30, 2024 2026, and not later than January 30, 20252027. Any person who fails to pay the fee at that time shall pay an additional amount that equals ten per cent of the required fee. (4) Each person obtaining an NPDES permit for municipal storm water discharge shall pay a nonrefundable storm water annual discharge fee of ten dollars per one-tenth of a square mile of area permitted. The fee shall not exceed ten thousand dollars and shall be payable on or before January 30, 2004, and the thirtieth day of January of each year thereafter. Any person who fails to pay the fee on the date specified in division (L)(4) of this section shall pay an additional amount per year equal to ten per cent of the annual fee that is unpaid. (5) The director shall transmit all moneys collected under division (L) of this section to the treasurer of state for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the surface water protection fund created in section 6111.038 of the Revised Code. (6) As used in this section: (a) "NPDES" means the federally approved national pollutant discharge elimination system individual and general program for issuing, modifying, revoking, reissuing, terminating, monitoring, and enforcing permits and imposing and enforcing pretreatment requirements under Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. (b) "Public discharger" means any holder of an NPDES permit identified by P in the second character of the NPDES permit number assigned by the director. (c) "Industrial discharger" means any holder of an NPDES permit identified by I in the second character of the NPDES permit number assigned by the director. (d) "Major discharger" means any holder of an NPDES permit classified as major by the regional administrator of the United States environmental protection agency in conjunction with the director. (M) Through June 30, 20262028, a person applying for a license or license renewal to operate a public water system under section 6109.21 of the Revised Code shall pay the appropriate fee established under this division at the time of application to the director. Any person who fails to pay the fee at that time shall pay an additional amount that equals ten per cent of the required fee. The director shall transmit all moneys collected under this division to the treasurer of state for deposit into the drinking water protection fund created in section 6109.30 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in divisions (M)(4) and (5) of this section, fees required under this division shall be calculated and paid in accordance with the following schedule: (1) For the initial license required under section 6109.21 of the Revised Code for any public water system that is a community water system as defined in section 6109.01 of the Revised Code, and for each license renewal required for such a system prior to January 31, 20262028, the fee is: 1 2 A Number of service connections Fee amount B Not more than 49 $112 C 50 to 99 176 D Number of service connections Average cost per connection E 100 to 2,499 $1.92 F 2,500 to 4,999 1.48 G 5,000 to 7,499 1.42 H 7,500 to 9,999 1.34 I 10,000 to 14,999 1.16 J 15,000 to 24,999 1.10 K 25,000 to 49,999 1.04 L 50,000 to 99,999 .92 M 100,000 to 149,999 .86 N 150,000 to 199,999 .80 O 200,000 or more .76 A public water system may determine how it will pay the total amount of the fee calculated under division (M)(1) of this section, including the assessment of additional user fees that may be assessed on a volumetric basis. As used in division (M)(1) of this section, "service connection" means the number of active or inactive pipes, goosenecks, pigtails, and any other fittings connecting a water main to any building outlet. (2) For the initial license required under section 6109.21 of the Revised Code for any public water system that is not a community water system and serves a nontransient population, and for each license renewal required for such a system prior to January 31, 20262028, the fee is: 1 2 A Population served Fee amount B Fewer than 150 $112 C 150 to 299 176 D 300 to 749 384 E 750 to 1,499 628 F 1,500 to 2,999 1,268 G 3,000 to 7,499 2,816 H 7,500 to 14,999 5,510 I 15,000 to 22,499 9,048 J 22,500 to 29,999 12,430 K 30,000 or more 16,820 As used in division (M)(2) of this section, "population served" means the total number of individuals having access to the water supply during a twenty-four-hour period for at least sixty days during any calendar year. In the absence of a specific population count, that number shall be calculated at the rate of three individuals per service connection. (3) For the initial license required under section 6109.21 of the Revised Code for any public water system that is not a community water system and serves a transient population, and for each license renewal required for such a system prior to January 31, 20262028, the fee is: 1 2 A Number of wells or sources, other than surface water, supplying system Fee amount B 1 $112 C 2 112 D 3 176 E 4 278 F 5 568 G System designated as using a surface water source 792 As used in division (M)(3) of this section, "number of wells or sources, other than surface water, supplying system" means those wells or sources that are physically connected to the plumbing system serving the public water system. (4) A public water system designated as using a surface water source shall pay a fee of seven hundred ninety-two dollars or the amount calculated under division (M)(1) or (2) of this section, whichever is greater. (5) An applicant for an initial license who is proposing to operate a new public water supply system shall submit a fee that equals a prorated amount of the appropriate fee for the remainder of the licensing year. (N)(1) A person applying for a plan approval for a public water supply system under section 6109.07 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of one hundred fifty dollars plus thirty-five hundredths of one per cent of the estimated project cost, except that the total fee shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars through June 30, 20262028, and fifteen thousand dollars on and after July 1, 20262028. The fee shall be paid at the time the application is submitted. (2) A person who has entered into an agreement with the director under division (A)(2) of section 6109.07 of the Revised Code shall pay an administrative service fee for each plan submitted under that section for approval that shall not exceed the minimum amount necessary to pay administrative costs directly attributable to processing plan approvals. The director annually shall calculate the fee and shall notify all persons that have entered into agreements under that division, or who have applied for agreements, of the amount of the fee. (3) Through June 30, 20262028, the following fee, on a per survey basis, shall be charged any person for services rendered by the state in the evaluation of laboratories and laboratory personnel for compliance with accepted analytical techniques and procedures established pursuant to Chapter 6109. of the Revised Code for determining the qualitative characteristics of water: 1 2 A microbiological B MMO-MUG $2,000 C MF 2,100 D MMO-MUG and MF 2,550 E organic chemical 5,400 F trace metals 5,400 G standard chemistry 2,800 H limited chemistry 1,550 On and after July 1, 20262028, the following fee, on a per survey basis, shall be charged any such person: 1 2 A microbiological $1,650 B organic chemicals 3,500 C trace metals 3,500 D standard chemistry 1,800 E limited chemistry 1,000 The fee for those services shall be paid at the time the request for the survey is made. Through June 30, 20262028, an individual laboratory shall not be assessed a fee under this division more than once in any three-year period unless the person requests the addition of analytical methods or analysts, in which case the person shall pay five hundred dollars for each additional survey requested. As used in division (N)(3) of this section: (a) "MF" means membrane filtration. (b) "MMO" means minimal medium ONPG. (c) "MUG" means 4-methylumbelliferyl-beta-D-glucuronide. (d) "ONPG" means o-nitrophenyl-beta-D-galactopyranoside. The director shall transmit all moneys collected under this division to the treasurer of state for deposit into the drinking water protection fund created in section 6109.30 of the Revised Code. (O) Any person applying to the director to take an examination for certification as an operator of a water supply system or wastewater system under Chapter 6109. or 6111. of the Revised Code that is administered by the director, at the time the application is submitted, shall pay a fee in accordance with the following schedule through November 30, 20262028: 1 2 A Class A operator $80 B Class I operator 105 C Class II operator 120 D Class III operator 130 E Class IV operator 145 On and after December 1, 20262028, the applicant shall pay a fee in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Class A operator $50 B Class I operator 70 C Class II operator 80 D Class III operator 90 E Class IV operator 100 Any person applying to the director for certification as an operator of a water supply system or wastewater system who has passed an examination administered by an examination provider approved by the director shall pay a certification fee of forty-five dollars. A person shall pay a biennial certification renewal fee for each applicable class of certification in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Class A operator $25 B Class I operator 35 C Class II operator 45 D Class III operator 55 E Class IV operator 65 If a certification renewal fee is received by the director more than thirty days, but not more than one year, after the expiration date of the certification, the person shall pay a certification renewal fee in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Class A operator $45 B Class I operator 55 C Class II operator 65 D Class III operator 75 E Class IV operator 85 A person who requests a replacement certificate shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars at the time the request is made. Any person applying to be a water supply system or wastewater treatment system examination provider shall pay an application fee of five hundred dollars. Any person approved by the director as a water supply system or wastewater treatment system examination provider shall pay an annual fee that is equal to ten per cent of the fees that the provider assesses and collects for administering water supply system or wastewater treatment system certification examinations in this state for the calendar year. The fee shall be paid not later than forty-five days after the end of a calendar year. The director shall transmit all moneys collected under this division to the treasurer of state for deposit into the drinking water protection fund created in section 6109.30 of the Revised Code. (P) Any person submitting an application for an industrial water pollution control certificate under section 6111.31 of the Revised Code, as that section existed before its repeal by H.B. 95 of the 125th general assembly, shall pay a nonrefundable fee of five hundred dollars at the time the application is submitted. The director shall transmit all moneys collected under this division to the treasurer of state for deposit into the surface water protection fund created in section 6111.038 of the Revised Code. A person paying a certificate fee under this division shall not pay an application fee under division (S)(1) of this section. On and after June 26, 2003, persons shall file such applications and pay the fee as required under sections 5709.20 to 5709.27 of the Revised Code, and proceeds from the fee shall be credited as provided in section 5709.212 of the Revised Code. (Q) Except as otherwise provided in division (R)(Q) of this section, a person issued a permit by the director for a new solid waste disposal facility other than an incineration or composting facility, a new infectious waste treatment facility other than an incineration facility, or a modification of such an existing facility that includes an increase in the total disposal or treatment capacity of the facility pursuant to Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of ten dollars per thousand cubic yards of disposal or treatment capacity, or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater, except that the total fee for any such permit shall not exceed eighty thousand dollars. A person issued a modification of a permit for a solid waste disposal facility or an infectious waste treatment facility that does not involve an increase in the total disposal or treatment capacity of the facility shall pay a fee of one thousand dollars. A person issued a permit to install a new, or modify an existing, solid waste transfer facility under that chapter shall pay a fee of two thousand five hundred dollars. A person issued a permit to install a new or to modify an existing solid waste incineration or composting facility, or an existing infectious waste treatment facility using incineration as its principal method of treatment, under that chapter shall pay a fee of one thousand dollars. The increases in the permit fees under this division resulting from the amendments made by Amended Substitute House Bill 592 of the 117th general assembly do not apply to any person who submitted an application for a permit to install a new, or modify an existing, solid waste disposal facility under that chapter prior to September 1, 1987; any such person shall pay the permit fee established in this division as it existed prior to June 24, 1988. In addition to the applicable permit fee under this division, a person issued a permit to install or modify a solid waste facility or an infectious waste treatment facility under that chapter who fails to pay the permit fee to the director in compliance with division (V)(U) of this section shall pay an additional ten per cent of the amount of the fee for each week that the permit fee is late. Permit and late payment fees paid to the director under this division shall be credited to the general revenue fund. (R)(1)(Q)(1) A person issued a registration certificate for a scrap tire collection facility under section 3734.75 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of two hundred dollars, except that if the facility is owned or operated by a motor vehicle salvage dealer licensed under Chapter 4738. of the Revised Code, the person shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars. (2) A person issued a registration certificate for a new scrap tire storage facility under section 3734.76 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of three hundred dollars, except that if the facility is owned or operated by a motor vehicle salvage dealer licensed under Chapter 4738. of the Revised Code, the person shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars. (3) A person issued a permit for a scrap tire storage facility under section 3734.76 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of one thousand dollars, except that if the facility is owned or operated by a motor vehicle salvage dealer licensed under Chapter 4738. of the Revised Code, the person shall pay a fee of fifty dollars. (4) A person issued a permit for a scrap tire monocell or monofill facility under section 3734.77 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of ten dollars per thousand cubic yards of disposal capacity or one thousand dollars, whichever is greater, except that the total fee for any such permit shall not exceed eighty thousand dollars. (5) A person issued a registration certificate for a scrap tire recovery facility under section 3734.78 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of one hundred dollars. (6) A person issued a permit for a scrap tire recovery facility under section 3734.78 of the Revised Code shall pay a fee of one thousand dollars. (7) In addition to the applicable registration certificate or permit fee under divisions (R)(1)(Q)(1) to (6) of this section, a person issued a registration certificate or permit for any such scrap tire facility who fails to pay the registration certificate or permit fee to the director in compliance with division (V)(U) of this section shall pay an additional ten per cent of the amount of the fee for each week that the fee is late. (8) The registration certificate, permit, and late payment fees paid to the director under divisions (R)(1)(Q)(1) to (7) of this section shall be credited to the scrap tire management fund created in section 3734.82 of the Revised Code. (S)(1)(a)(R)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided, any person applying for a permit, variance, or plan approval under Chapter 6109. or 6111. of the Revised Code shall pay a nonrefundable application fee of one hundred dollars at the time the application is submitted through June 30, 20262028, and a nonrefundable application fee of fifteen dollars at the time the application is submitted on and after July 1, 20262028. (b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (S)(1)(b)(iii)(R)(1)(b)(iii) and (iv) of this section, through June 30, 20262028, any person applying for an NPDES permit under Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code shall pay a nonrefundable application fee of two hundred dollars at the time of application for the permit. On and after July 1, 20262028, such a person shall pay a nonrefundable application fee of fifteen dollars at the time of application. (ii) In addition to the nonrefundable application fee, any person applying for an NPDES permit under Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code shall pay a design flow discharge fee based on each point source to which the issuance is applicable in accordance with the following schedule: 1 2 A Design flow discharge (gallons per day) Fee B 0 to 1,000 $0 C 1,001 to 5,000 100 D 5,001 to 50,000 200 E 50,001 to 100,000 300 F 100,001 to 300,000 525 G over 300,000 750 (iii) Notwithstanding divisions (S)(1)(b)(i)(R)(1)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the application and design flow discharge fee for an NPDES permit for a public discharger identified by the letter I in the third character of the NPDES permit number shall not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars. (iv) Notwithstanding divisions (S)(1)(b)(i)(R)(1)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the application and design flow discharge fee for an NPDES permit for a coal mining operation regulated under Chapter 1513. of the Revised Code shall not exceed four hundred fifty dollars per mine. (v) A person issued a modification of an NPDES permit shall pay a nonrefundable modification fee equal to the application fee and one-half the design flow discharge fee based on each point source, if applicable, that would be charged for an NPDES permit, except that the modification fee shall not exceed six hundred dollars. (c) In addition to the application fee established under division (S)(1)(b)(i)(R)(1)(b)(i) of this section, any person applying for an NPDES general storm water construction permit shall pay a nonrefundable fee of twenty dollars per acre for each acre that is permitted above five acres at the time the application is submitted. However, the per acreage fee shall not exceed three hundred dollars. In addition to the application fee established under division (S)(1)(b)(i)(R)(1)(b)(i) of this section, any person applying for an NPDES general storm water industrial permit shall pay a nonrefundable fee of one hundred fifty dollars at the time the application is submitted. (d) The director shall transmit all moneys collected under division (S)(1)(R)(1) of this section pursuant to Chapter 6109. of the Revised Code to the treasurer of state for deposit into the drinking water protection fund created in section 6109.30 of the Revised Code. (e) The director shall transmit all moneys collected under division (S)(1)(R)(1) of this section pursuant to Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code and under division (S)(2)(R)(2) of this section to the treasurer of state for deposit into the surface water protection fund created in section 6111.038 of the Revised Code. (f) If a person submits an electronic application for a registration certificate, permit, variance, or plan approval for which an application fee is established under division (S)(1)(R)(1) of this section, the person shall pay all applicable fees as expeditiously as possible after the submission of the electronic application. An application for a registration certificate, permit, variance, or plan approval for which an application fee is established under division (S)(1)(R)(1) of this section shall not be reviewed or processed until the applicable application fee, and any other fees established under this division, are paid. (2) A person applying for coverage under an NPDES general discharge permit for household sewage treatment systems shall pay a nonrefundable fee of two hundred dollars at the time of application for initial permit coverage. No fee is required for an application for permit coverage renewal. (T)(S) The director may adopt, amend, and rescind rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that do all of the following: (1) Prescribe fees to be paid by applicants for and holders of any license, permit, variance, plan approval, or certification required or authorized by Chapter 3704., 3734., 6109., or 6111. of the Revised Code that are not specifically established in this section. The fees shall be designed to defray the cost of processing, issuing, revoking, modifying, denying, and enforcing the licenses, permits, variances, plan approvals, and certifications. The director shall transmit all moneys collected under rules adopted under division (T)(1)(S)(1) of this section pursuant to Chapter 6109. of the Revised Code to the treasurer of state for deposit into the drinking water protection fund created in section 6109.30 of the Revised Code. The director shall transmit all moneys collected under rules adopted under division (T)(1)(S)(1) of this section pursuant to Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code to the treasurer of state for deposit into the surface water protection fund created in section 6111.038 of the Revised Code. (2) Exempt the state and political subdivisions thereof, including education facilities or medical facilities owned by the state or a political subdivision, or any person exempted from taxation by section 5709.07 or 5709.12 of the Revised Code, from any fee required by this section; (3) Provide for the waiver of any fee, or any part thereof, otherwise required by this section whenever the director determines that the imposition of the fee would constitute an unreasonable cost of doing business for any applicant, class of applicants, or other person subject to the fee; (4) Prescribe measures that the director considers necessary to carry out this section. (U)(T) When the director reasonably demonstrates that the direct cost to the state associated with the issuance of a permit, license, variance, plan approval, or certification exceeds the fee for the issuance or review specified by this section, the director may condition the issuance or review on the payment by the person receiving the issuance or review of, in addition to the fee specified by this section, the amount, or any portion thereof, in excess of the fee specified under this section. The director shall not so condition issuances for which a fee is prescribed in division (S)(1)(b)(iii)(R)(1)(b)(iii) of this section. (V)(U) Except as provided in divisions (L), (M), (P), and (S)(R) of this section or unless otherwise prescribed by a rule of the director adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, all fees required by this section are payable within thirty days after the issuance of an invoice for the fee by the director or the effective date of the issuance of the license, permit, variance, plan approval, or certification. If payment is late, the person responsible for payment of the fee shall pay an additional ten per cent of the amount due for each month that it is late. (W)(V) As used in this section, "fuel-burning equipment," "fuel-burning equipment input capacity," "incinerator," "incinerator input capacity," "process," "process weight rate," "storage tank," "gasoline dispensing facility," "dry cleaning facility," "design flow discharge," and "new source treatment works" have the meanings ascribed to those terms by applicable rules or standards adopted by the director under Chapter 3704. or 6111. of the Revised Code. (X)(W) As used in divisions (B), (D), (E), (F), (H), (I), and (J) of this section, and in any other provision of this section pertaining to fees paid pursuant to Chapter 3704. of the Revised Code: (1) "Facility," "federal Clean Air Act," "person," and "Title V permit" have the same meanings as in section 3704.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Title V permit program" means the following activities as necessary to meet the requirements of Title V of the federal Clean Air Act and 40 C.F.R. part 70, including at least: (a) Preparing and adopting, if applicable, generally applicable rules or guidance regarding the permit program or its implementation or enforcement; (b) Reviewing and acting on any application for a Title V permit, permit revision, or permit renewal, including the development of an applicable requirement as part of the processing of a permit, permit revision, or permit renewal; (c) Administering the permit program, including the supporting and tracking of permit applications, compliance certification, and related data entry; (d) Determining which sources are subject to the program and implementing and enforcing the terms of any Title V permit, not including any court actions or other formal enforcement actions; (e) Emission and ambient monitoring; (f) Modeling, analyses, or demonstrations; (g) Preparing inventories and tracking emissions; (h) Providing direct and indirect support to small business stationary sources to determine and meet their obligations under the federal Clean Air Act pursuant to the small business stationary source technical and environmental compliance assistance program required by section 507 of that act and established in sections 3704.18, 3704.19, and 3706.19 of the Revised Code. (3) "Organic compound" means any chemical compound of carbon, excluding carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, carbonic acid, metallic carbides or carbonates, and ammonium carbonate. (Y)(1)(X)(1) Except as provided in divisions (Y)(2)(X)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, each sewage sludge facility shall pay a nonrefundable annual sludge fee equal to three dollars and fifty cents per dry ton of sewage sludge, including the dry tons of sewage sludge in materials derived from sewage sludge, that the sewage sludge facility treats or disposes of in this state. The annual volume of sewage sludge treated or disposed of by a sewage sludge facility shall be calculated using the first day of January through the thirty-first day of December of the calendar year preceding the date on which payment of the fee is due. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (Y)(2)(d)(X)(2)(d) of this section, each sewage sludge facility shall pay a minimum annual sewage sludge fee of one hundred dollars. (b) The annual sludge fee required to be paid by a sewage sludge facility that treats or disposes of exceptional quality sludge in this state shall be thirty-five per cent less per dry ton of exceptional quality sludge than the fee assessed under division (Y)(1)(X)(1) of this section, subject to the following exceptions: (i) Except as provided in division (Y)(2)(d)(X)(2)(d) of this section, a sewage sludge facility that treats or disposes of exceptional quality sludge shall pay a minimum annual sewage sludge fee of one hundred dollars. (ii) A sewage sludge facility that treats or disposes of exceptional quality sludge shall not be required to pay the annual sludge fee for treatment or disposal in this state of exceptional quality sludge generated outside of this state and contained in bags or other containers not greater than one hundred pounds in capacity. A thirty-five per cent reduction for exceptional quality sludge applies to the maximum annual fees established under division (Y)(3)(X)(3) of this section. (c) A sewage sludge facility that transfers sewage sludge to another sewage sludge facility in this state for further treatment prior to disposal in this state shall not be required to pay the annual sludge fee for the tons of sewage sludge that have been transferred. In such a case, the sewage sludge facility that disposes of the sewage sludge shall pay the annual sludge fee. However, the facility transferring the sewage sludge shall pay the one-hundred-dollar minimum fee required under division (Y)(2)(a)(X)(2)(a) of this section. In the case of a sewage sludge facility that treats sewage sludge in this state and transfers it out of this state to another entity for disposal, the sewage sludge facility in this state shall be required to pay the annual sludge fee for the tons of sewage sludge that have been transferred. (d) A sewage sludge facility that generates sewage sludge resulting from an average daily discharge flow of less than five thousand gallons per day is not subject to the fees assessed under division (Y)(X) of this section. (3) No sewage sludge facility required to pay the annual sludge fee shall be required to pay more than the maximum annual fee for each disposal method that the sewage sludge facility uses. The maximum annual fee does not include the additional amount that may be charged under division (Y)(5)(X)(5) of this section for late payment of the annual sludge fee. The maximum annual fee for the following methods of disposal of sewage sludge is as follows: (a) Incineration: five thousand dollars; (b) Preexisting land reclamation project or disposal in a landfill: five thousand dollars; (c) Land application, land reclamation, surface disposal, or any other disposal method not specified in division (Y)(3)(a)(X)(3)(a) or (b) of this section: twenty thousand dollars. (4)(a) In the case of an entity that generates sewage sludge or a sewage sludge facility that treats sewage sludge and transfers the sewage sludge to an incineration facility for disposal, the incineration facility, and not the entity generating the sewage sludge or the sewage sludge facility treating the sewage sludge, shall pay the annual sludge fee for the tons of sewage sludge that are transferred. However, the entity or facility generating or treating the sewage sludge shall pay the one-hundred-dollar minimum fee required under division (Y)(2)(a)(X)(2)(a) of this section. (b) In the case of an entity that generates sewage sludge and transfers the sewage sludge to a landfill for disposal or to a sewage sludge facility for land reclamation or surface disposal, the entity generating the sewage sludge, and not the landfill or sewage sludge facility, shall pay the annual sludge fee for the tons of sewage sludge that are transferred. (5) Not later than the first day of April of the calendar year following March 17, 2000, and each first day of April thereafter, the director shall issue invoices to persons who are required to pay the annual sludge fee. The invoice shall identify the nature and amount of the annual sludge fee assessed and state the first day of May as the deadline for receipt by the director of objections regarding the amount of the fee and the first day of July as the deadline for payment of the fee. Not later than the first day of May following receipt of an invoice, a person required to pay the annual sludge fee may submit objections to the director concerning the accuracy of information regarding the number of dry tons of sewage sludge used to calculate the amount of the annual sludge fee or regarding whether the sewage sludge qualifies for the exceptional quality sludge discount established in division (Y)(2)(b)(X)(2)(b) of this section. The director may consider the objections and adjust the amount of the fee to ensure that it is accurate. If the director does not adjust the amount of the annual sludge fee in response to a person's objections, the person may appeal the director's determination in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Not later than the first day of June, the director shall notify the objecting person regarding whether the director has found the objections to be valid and the reasons for the finding. If the director finds the objections to be valid and adjusts the amount of the annual sludge fee accordingly, the director shall issue with the notification a new invoice to the person identifying the amount of the annual sludge fee assessed and stating the first day of July as the deadline for payment. Not later than the first day of July, any person who is required to do so shall pay the annual sludge fee. Any person who is required to pay the fee, but who fails to do so on or before that date shall pay an additional amount that equals ten per cent of the required annual sludge fee. (6) The director shall transmit all moneys collected under division (Y)(X) of this section to the treasurer of state for deposit into the surface water protection fund created in section 6111.038 of the Revised Code. The moneys shall be used to defray the costs of administering and enforcing provisions in Chapter 6111. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it that govern the use, storage, treatment, or disposal of sewage sludge. (7) Beginning in fiscal year 2001, and every two years thereafter, the director shall review the total amount of moneys generated by the annual sludge fees to determine if that amount exceeded six hundred thousand dollars in either of the two preceding fiscal years. If the total amount of moneys in the fund exceeded six hundred thousand dollars in either fiscal year, the director, after review of the fee structure and consultation with affected persons, shall issue an order reducing the amount of the fees levied under division (Y)(X) of this section so that the estimated amount of moneys resulting from the fees will not exceed six hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year. If, upon review of the fees under division (Y)(7)(X)(7) of this section and after the fees have been reduced, the director determines that the total amount of moneys collected and accumulated is less than six hundred thousand dollars, the director, after review of the fee structure and consultation with affected persons, may issue an order increasing the amount of the fees levied under division (Y)(X) of this section so that the estimated amount of moneys resulting from the fees will be approximately six hundred thousand dollars. Fees shall never be increased to an amount exceeding the amount specified in division (Y)(7)(X)(7) of this section. Notwithstanding section 119.06 of the Revised Code, the director may issue an order under division (Y)(7)(X)(7) of this section without the necessity to hold an adjudicatory hearing in connection with the order. The issuance of an order under this division is not an act or action for purposes of section 3745.04 of the Revised Code. (8) As used in division (Y)(X) of this section: (a) "Sewage sludge facility" means an entity that performs treatment on or is responsible for the disposal of sewage sludge. (b) "Sewage sludge" means a solid, semi-solid, or liquid residue generated during the treatment of domestic sewage in a treatment works as defined in section 6111.01 of the Revised Code. "Sewage sludge" includes, but is not limited to, scum or solids removed in primary, secondary, or advanced wastewater treatment processes. "Sewage sludge" does not include ash generated during the firing of sewage sludge in a sewage sludge incinerator, grit and screenings generated during preliminary treatment of domestic sewage in a treatment works, animal manure, residue generated during treatment of animal manure, or domestic septage. (c) "Exceptional quality sludge" means sewage sludge that meets all of the following qualifications: (i) Satisfies the class A pathogen standards in 40 C.F.R. 503.32(a); (ii) Satisfies one of the vector attraction reduction requirements in 40 C.F.R. 503.33(b)(1) to (b)(8); (iii) Does not exceed the ceiling concentration limitations for metals listed in table one of 40 C.F.R. 503.13; (iv) Does not exceed the concentration limitations for metals listed in table three of 40 C.F.R. 503.13. (d) "Treatment" means the preparation of sewage sludge for final use or disposal and includes, but is not limited to, thickening, stabilization, and dewatering of sewage sludge. (e) "Disposal" means the final use of sewage sludge, including, but not limited to, land application, land reclamation, surface disposal, or disposal in a landfill or an incinerator. (f) "Land application" means the spraying or spreading of sewage sludge onto the land surface, the injection of sewage sludge below the land surface, or the incorporation of sewage sludge into the soil for the purposes of conditioning the soil or fertilizing crops or vegetation grown in the soil. (g) "Land reclamation" means the returning of disturbed land to productive use. (h) "Surface disposal" means the placement of sludge on an area of land for disposal, including, but not limited to, monofills, surface impoundments, lagoons, waste piles, or dedicated disposal sites. (i) "Incinerator" means an entity that disposes of sewage sludge through the combustion of organic matter and inorganic matter in sewage sludge by high temperatures in an enclosed device. (j) "Incineration facility" includes all incinerators owned or operated by the same entity and located on a contiguous tract of land. Areas of land are considered to be contiguous even if they are separated by a public road or highway. (k) "Annual sludge fee" means the fee assessed under division (Y)(1)(X)(1) of this section. (l) "Landfill" means a sanitary landfill facility, as defined in rules adopted under section 3734.02 of the Revised Code, that is licensed under section 3734.05 of the Revised Code. (m) "Preexisting land reclamation project" means a property-specific land reclamation project that has been in continuous operation for not less than five years pursuant to approval of the activity by the director and includes the implementation of a community outreach program concerning the activity. Sec. 3745.21. (A) There is hereby created within the environmental protection agency the Ohio environmental education fund advisory council consisting of the directors of environmental protection, natural resources, and education and workforce, or their designees, as members ex officio, one member of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives or the member's designee, one member of the senate to be appointed by the president of the senate or the member's designee, one member to be appointed by the chancellor of higher education who shall have experience in providing environmental education at the university or college level, and six members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Of the members appointed by the governor, two shall be from statewide environmental advocacy organizations, one shall represent the interests of the industrial community in this state, one shall represent the interests of employers in this state with one hundred fifty or fewer employees, one shall represent municipal corporations, and one shall represent the interests of elementary and secondary school teachers in this state. Within thirty days after October 1, 1990, the appointing authorities shall make their initial appointments to the council. The initial appointment to the council by the chancellor shall be for a term ending two years after October 1, 1990. Of the initial appointments made to the council by the governor, three shall be for a term ending one year after October 1, 1990, and three shall be for a term ending two years after October 1, 1990. Thereafter, the terms of office of the members appointed by the chancellor and the governor shall be for two years, with each term ending on the same day of the same month as the term that it succeeds. Each member shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Members may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration date of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office as a member of the board of trustees for the remainder of that term. A member of the council appointed by the chancellor or the governor shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. The council shall hold at least two regular, semiannual meetings each year. Special meetings may be held at the behest of the chairperson or a majority of the members. The director of environmental protection shall serve as the chairperson of the council. The council annually shall select from among its members a vice-chairperson and a secretary to keep a record of its proceedings. A majority vote of the members of the council is necessary to take action on any matter. Serving as a member of the council does not constitute holding a public office or a position of employment under the laws of this state and does not constitute grounds for the removal of public officers or employees from their offices or positions of employment. The chancellor may at any time remove a member of the council appointed by the chancellor for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in office. The governor may at any time remove a member of the council appointed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in office. Members of the council appointed by the chancellor and the governor shall serve without compensation. Members of the council shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the council from moneys credited to the environmental education fund created in section 3745.22 of the Revised Code. (B) The council shall advise and assist the director of environmental protection in the implementation and administration of section 3745.22 of the Revised Code and shall review and comment on all expenditures from the fund proposed by the director. (C) The council may adopt bylaws for the regulation and conduct of the council's affairs and may propose to the director of environmental protection expenditures from the fund. Sec. 3748.13. (A) The director of health shall inspect sources of radiation for which licensure or registration by the handler is required, and the sources' shielding and surroundings, according to the schedule established in rules adopted under division (D) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. In accordance with rules adopted under section 3748.04 of the Revised Code, the director shall inspect all records and operating procedures of handlers that install or service sources of radiation and all sources of radiation for which licensure of radioactive material or registration of radiation-generating equipment by the handler is required. The director may make other inspections upon receiving complaints or other evidence of a violation of this chapter or rules adopted under it. The director shall require any hospital registered under division (A) of section 3701.07 of the Revised Code to develop and maintain a quality assurance program for all sources of radiation-generating equipment. A certified radiation expert shall conduct oversight and maintenance of the program and shall file a report of audits of the program with the director on forms prescribed by the director. The audit reports shall become part of the inspection record. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, a facility shall pay inspection fees for radioactive material and radiation-generating equipment according to the schedule and categories established in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) A facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group shall pay inspection fees for radiation-generating equipment according to the following schedule and categories: 1 2 A First dental x-ray tube $155.00 $310.00 B Each additional dental x-ray tube at the same location $77.00 $154.00 C First medical x-ray tube $307.00 $614.00 D Each additional medical x-ray tube at the same location $163.00 $326.00 E Each unit of ionizing radiation-generating equipment capable of operating at or above 250 kilovoltage peak $610.00 $1,220.00 F First nonionizing radiation-generating equipment of any kind $307.00 $614.00 G Each additional nonionizing radiation-generating equipment of any kind at the same location $163.00 $326.00 (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the fee for the inspection of a facility that proposes to handle radioactive material or radiation-generating equipment and is not licensed or registered, and for which no license or registration application is pending at the time of inspection, is four hundred seventy-four dollars plus the applicable fee specified in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) For a facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group and proposes to handle radiation-generating equipment, the fee for an inspection if the facility is not licensed or registered, and no license or registration is pending at the time of inspection, is four hundred seventy-four dollars plus the fee applicable under the schedule in division (B)(2) of this section. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, for a facility that handles radioactive material or radiation-generating equipment, the fee for an inspection to determine whether violations cited in a previous inspection have been corrected is the amount specified in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) For a facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group and handles radiation-generating equipment, the fee for an inspection to determine whether violations cited in a previous inspection have been corrected is fifty per cent of the applicable fee under the schedule in division (B)(2) of this section. (E) The director may conduct a review of shielding plans or the adequacy of shielding on the request of a licensee or registrant or an applicant for licensure or registration or during an inspection when the director considers a review to be necessary. (1) Except as provided in division (E)(2) of this section, the fee for the review is the applicable amount specified in rules adopted under division (A)(9) of section 3748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) For a facility that is, or is operated by, a medical practitioner or medical-practitioner group and handles or proposes to handle radiation-generating equipment, the fee for the review is seven hundred sixty-two dollars for each room where a source of radiation is used and is in addition to any other fee applicable under the schedule in division (B)(2) of this section. (F) All fees shall be paid to the department of health no later than thirty days after the invoice for the fee is mailed. Fees shall be deposited in the general operations fund created in section 3701.83 of the Revised Code. The fees shall be used solely to administer and enforce this chapter and rules adopted under it. (G) Any fee required under this section that remains unpaid on the ninety-first day after the original invoice date shall be assessed an additional amount equal to ten per cent of the original fee. (H) If the director determines that a board of health of a city or general health district is qualified to conduct inspections of radiation-generating equipment, the director may delegate to the board, by contract, the authority to conduct such inspections. In making a determination of the qualifications of a board of health to conduct those inspections, the director shall evaluate the credentials of the individuals who are to conduct the inspections of radiation-generating equipment and the radiation detection and measuring equipment available to them for that purpose. If a contract is entered into, the board shall have the same authority to make inspections of radiation-generating equipment as the director has under this chapter and rules adopted under it. The contract shall stipulate that only individuals approved by the director as qualified shall be permitted to inspect radiation-generating equipment under the contract's provisions. The contract shall provide for such compensation for services as is agreed to by the director and the board of health of the contracting health district. The director may reevaluate the credentials of the inspection personnel and their radiation detecting and measuring equipment as often as the director considers necessary and may terminate any contract with the board of health of any health district that, in the director's opinion, is not satisfactorily performing the terms of the contract. (I) The director may enter at all reasonable times upon any public or private property to determine compliance with this chapter and rules adopted under it. Sec. 3750.02. (A) There is hereby created the emergency response commission consisting of the directors of environmental protection and , health, and administrative services, the chairperson of the public utilities commission, the fire marshal, the director of public safety, the director of transportation, the director of natural resources, the superintendent of the highway patrol, and the attorney general as members ex officio, or their designees; notwithstanding section 101.26 of the Revised Code, the chairpersons of the respective standing committees of the senate and house of representatives that are primarily responsible for considering environmental issues a member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and a member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, who may participate fully in all the commission's deliberations and activities, except that they shall serve as nonvoting members; and ten members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The appointed members, to the extent practicable, shall have technical expertise in the field of emergency response. Of the appointed members, two shall represent environmental advocacy organizations, one shall represent the interests of petroleum refiners or marketers or chemical manufacturers, one shall represent the interests of another industry subject to this chapter, one shall represent the interests of municipal corporations, one shall represent the interests of counties, one shall represent the interests of chiefs of fire departments, one shall represent the interests of professional firefighters, one shall represent the interests of volunteer firefighters, and one shall represent the interests of local emergency management agencies. An appointed member of the commission also may serve as a member of the local emergency planning committee of an emergency planning district. An appointed member of the commission who is also a member of a local emergency planning committee shall not participate as a member of the commission in the appointment of members of the local emergency planning committee of which the member is a member, in the review of the chemical emergency response and preparedness plan submitted by the local emergency planning committee of which the member is a member, in any vote to approve a grant to the member's district, or in any vote of the commission on any motion or resolution pertaining specifically to the member's district or the local emergency planning committee on which the member serves. A commission member who is also a member of a local emergency planning committee shall not lobby or otherwise act as an advocate for the member's district to other members of the commission to obtain from the commission anything of value for the member's district or the local emergency planning committee of which the member is a member. A member of the commission who is also a member of a local emergency planning committee may vote on resolutions of the commission that apply uniformly to all local emergency planning committees and districts in the state and do not provide a grant or other pecuniary benefit to the member's district or the committee of which the member is a member. The governor shall make the initial appointments to the commission within thirty days after December 14, 1988. Of the initial appointments to the commission, five shall be for a term of two years and five shall be for a term of one year. Thereafter, terms of office of the appointed members of the commission shall be for two years, with each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term that it succeeds. Each member shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Members may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. The commission may at any time by a vote of two-thirds of all the members remove any appointed member of the commission for misfeasance, nonfeasance, or malfeasance. Members of the commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for the reasonable expenses incurred by them in the discharge of their duties as members of the commission. The commission shall meet at least annually and shall hold such additional meetings as are necessary to implement and administer this chapter. Additional meetings may be held at the behest of either a co-chairperson or a majority of the members. The commission shall, by adoption of internal management rules under division (B)(9) of this section, establish an executive committee and delegate to it the performance of such of the commission's duties and powers under this chapter as are required or authorized to be so delegated by that division. The commission may organize itself into such additional committees as it considers necessary or convenient to implement and administer this chapter. The director of environmental protection and the director of public safety or their designees shall serve as co-chairpersons of the commission and the executive committee. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a majority of the voting members of the commission constitutes a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of the voting members of the commission is necessary for any action taken by the commission. Meetings of the executive committee conducted for the purpose of determining whether to issue an enforcement order or request that a civil action, civil penalty action, or criminal action be brought to enforce this chapter or rules adopted or orders issued under it are not subject to section 121.22 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (D) of that section. Except for the purposes of Chapters 102. and 2921. and sections 9.86 and 109.36 to 109.366 of the Revised Code, serving as an appointed member of the commission does not constitute holding a public office or position of employment under the laws of this state and does not constitute grounds for removal of public officers or employees from their offices or positions of employment. (B) The commission shall: (1) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are consistent with and equivalent in scope, content, and coverage to the "Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1729, 42 U.S.C.A. 11001, and applicable regulations adopted under it: (a) Identifying or listing extremely hazardous substances and establishing a threshold planning quantity for each such substance. To the extent consistent with that act and applicable regulations adopted under it, the rules may establish threshold planning quantities based upon classes of those substances or categories of facilities at which such substances are present. (b) Listing hazardous chemicals, establishing threshold quantities for those chemicals, establishing categories of health and physical hazards of those chemicals, establishing criteria or procedures for identifying those chemicals and the appropriate hazard categories of those chemicals, and establishing ranges of quantities for those chemicals to be used in preparing emergency and hazardous chemical inventory forms under section 3750.08 of the Revised Code. To the extent consistent with that act and applicable regulations adopted under it, the rules may establish threshold quantities based upon classes of those chemicals or categories of facilities where those chemicals are present. To the extent consistent with that act, the threshold quantities for purposes of the submission of lists of hazardous chemicals under section 3750.07 and the submission of emergency and hazardous chemical inventory forms under section 3750.08 of the Revised Code may differ. (c) Identifying or listing hazardous substances and establishing reportable quantities of each of those substances and each extremely hazardous substance. In addition to being consistent with and equivalent in scope, content, and coverage to that act and applicable regulations adopted under it, the rules shall be consistent with and equivalent in scope, content, and coverage to regulations identifying or listing hazardous substances and reportable quantities of those substances adopted under the "Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 2779, 42 U.S.C.A. 9602, as amended. (d) Prescribing the information to be included in the lists of hazardous chemicals required to be submitted under section 3750.07 of the Revised Code; (e) Prescribing the information to be included in the emergency and hazardous chemical inventory forms required to be submitted under section 3750.08 of the Revised Code. If the commission establishes its own emergency and hazardous chemical inventory form, the rules shall authorize owners and operators of facilities who also have one or more facilities located outside the state for which they are required to submit inventory forms under the federal act and regulations adopted under it to submit their annual inventories on forms prescribed by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency under that act instead of on forms prescribed by the commission and shall require those owners or operators to submit any additional information required by the commission's inventory form on an attachment to the federal form. (f) Establishing procedures for giving verbal notice of releases under section 3750.06 of the Revised Code and prescribing the information to be provided in such a notice and in the follow-up written notice required by that section; (g) Establishing standards for determining valid needs for the release of tier II information under division (B)(4) of section 3750.10 of the Revised Code; (h) Identifying the types or categories of information submitted or obtained under this chapter and rules adopted under it that constitute confidential business information; (i) Establishing criteria and procedures to protect trade secret and confidential business information from unauthorized disclosure; (j) Establishing other requirements or authorizations that the commission considers necessary or appropriate to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter. (2) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement and administer this chapter that may be more stringent than the "Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1729, 42 U.S.C.A. 11001, and regulations adopted under it. Rules adopted under division (B)(2) of this section shall not be inconsistent with that act or the regulations adopted under it. The rules shall: (a) Prescribe the information to be included in the chemical emergency response and preparedness plans prepared and submitted by local emergency planning committees under section 3750.04 of the Revised Code; (b) Establish criteria and procedures for reviewing the chemical emergency response and preparedness plans of local emergency planning committees required by section 3750.04 of the Revised Code and the annual exercise of those plans and for providing concurrence or requesting modifications in the plans and the exercise of those plans. The criteria shall include, without limitation, the requirement that each exercise of a committee's plan involve, in addition to local emergency response and medical personnel, either a facility that is subject to the plan or a transporter of materials that are identified or listed as hazardous materials by regulations adopted under the "Hazardous Materials Transportation Act," 88 Stat. 2156 (1975), 49 U.S.C.A. 1801, as amended. (c) Establish policies and procedures for maintaining information submitted to the commission and local emergency planning committees under this chapter, and for receiving and fulfilling requests from the public for access to review and to obtain copies of that information. The criteria and procedures shall include the following requirements and authorizations regarding that information and access to it: (i) Information that is protected as trade secret information or confidential business information under this chapter and rules adopted under it shall be kept in files that are separate from those containing information that is not so protected. (ii) The original copies of information submitted to the commission or committee shall not be removed from the custody and control of the commission or committee. (iii) A person who, either in person or by mail, requests to obtain a copy of a material safety data sheet submitted under this chapter by a facility owner or operator shall submit a separate application for each facility for which a material safety data sheet is being requested. (iv) A person who requests to receive by mail a copy of information submitted under this chapter by a facility owner or operator shall submit a separate application for each facility for which information is being requested and shall specify both the facility for which information is being requested and the particular types of documents requested. (v) Only employees of the commission or committee shall copy information in the files of the commission or committee. (vi) The commission or committee may require any person who requests to review or obtain a copy of information in its files to schedule an appointment for that purpose with the information coordinator of the commission or committee at least twenty-four hours before arriving at the office of the commission or committee for the review or copy. (vii) Any person who seeks access to information in the files of the commission or a local emergency planning committee shall submit a written application, either in person or by mail, to the information coordinator on a form provided by the commission or committee. The person also shall provide the person's name and current mailing address on the application and may be requested by the commission or committee to provide basic demographic information on the form to assist in the evaluation of the information access provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under it. Application forms may be obtained by mail or in person or by request by telephone at the office of the commission or committee during regular business hours. Upon receipt of a request for an application by telephone or mail, the information coordinator shall promptly mail an application to the person who requested it. (viii) The application form shall provide the applicant with a means of indicating that the applicant's name and address are to be kept confidential. If the applicant so indicates, that information is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be disclosed to any person who is not a member or employee of the commission or committee or an employee of the environmental protection agency. When a name and address are to be kept confidential, they also shall be deleted from the copy of the application required to be placed in the file of the facility under division (B)(2)(c)(xii) of this section and shall be withheld from any log of information requests kept by the commission or committee pursuant to that division. (ix) Neither the commission nor a local emergency planning committee shall charge any fee for access to review information in its files when no copies or computer searches of that information are requested. (x) An applicant shall be informed of the cost of copying, mailing, or conducting a computer search of information on file with the commission or committee before such a copy or search is made, and the commission or committee shall collect the appropriate fees as established under section 3750.13 of the Revised Code. Each applicant shall acknowledge on the application form that the applicant is aware that the applicant will be charged for copies and computer searches of that information the applicant requests and for the costs of mailing copies of the information to the applicant. (xi) The commission or committee may require a person requesting copies of information on file with it to take delivery of them in the office of the commission or committee whenever it considers the volume of the information to be large enough to make mailing or delivery by a parcel or package delivery service impractical. (xii) When the commission or committee receives a request for access to review or obtain copies of information in its files, it shall not routinely notify the owner or operator of the facility involved, but instead shall either keep a log or file of requests for the information or shall place a copy of each completed application form in the file for the facility to which the application pertains. Such a log or file shall be available for review by the public and by the owners and operators of facilities required to submit information to the commission or committee under this chapter and rules adopted under it. (d) Require that claims for the protection, as a trade secret, of information obtained under this chapter regarding extremely hazardous substances identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(a) of this section and hazardous chemicals identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(b) of this section be submitted to the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency for determination under section 322 of the the "Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1747, 42 U.S.C.A. 11042, and regulations adopted under that section; (e) Establish criteria and procedures for the issuance of variances under divisions (B) and (C) of section 3750.11 of the Revised Code. The rules shall require that, before approval of an application for a variance, the commission or committee find by a preponderance of the scientific evidence based upon generally accepted scientific principles or laboratory tests that the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances that would be subject to the reporting requirement pose a substantial risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment, or pose an extraordinary risk of injury to emergency management personnel responding to a release of the chemicals or substances, when the substances or chemicals are present at a facility in an amount equal to or exceeding the quantity for which reporting would be required under the reporting requirement for which the variance is sought. The rules shall also require that before approval of an application for a variance, the commission or committee find by a preponderance of the evidence that the development and implementation of a local emergency response plan for releases of the substances or chemicals covered by the reporting requirement will reduce the risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment, or will reduce the extraordinary risk of injury to responding emergency management personnel, in the event of a release of the substances or chemicals and find by a preponderance of the evidence that the reporting requirement is necessary for the development of such a local emergency response plan. The rules shall require that when determining whether the substances or chemicals that would be subject to the reporting requirement pose a substantial risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment, or pose an extraordinary risk of injury to emergency management personnel responding to a release of the substance or chemical, the commission or committee consider all of the following factors: (i) The specific characteristics and degree and nature of the hazards posed by a release of the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances; (ii) The proximity of the facilities that would be subject to the reporting requirement to residential areas, to areas where significantly large numbers of people are employed or otherwise congregate, and to environmental resources that are subject to injury; (iii) The quantities of the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances that are routinely present at facilities that would be subject to the reporting requirement; (iv) The frequency with which the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances are present at the facilities that would be subject to the reporting requirement in quantities for which reporting would be required thereunder. (f) Establish criteria and procedures for the issuance of orders under division (D) of section 3750.11 of the Revised Code requiring the placement of emergency response lock box units. The rules shall require that before approval of an application for issuance of such an order, the commission or committee find by a preponderance of the scientific evidence based upon generally accepted scientific principles or laboratory tests that the presence of the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances in the quantities in which they are routinely or intermittently present at the facility for which the order is sought pose a substantial risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment, or pose an extraordinary risk of injury to responding emergency management personnel, in the event of a release of any of those substances or chemicals from the facility. The rules shall require that before approval of an application for issuance of such an order, the commission or committee also find by a preponderance of the evidence that the placement of an emergency response lock box unit at the facility is necessary to protect against the substantial risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or the environment, or to protect against an extraordinary risk of injury to responding emergency management personnel, in the event of a release of any of the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances routinely or intermittently present at the facility. The rules shall require that when determining whether the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances present at the facility pose a substantial risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment, or pose an extraordinary risk of injury to responding emergency management personnel, in the event of a release of any of those substances or chemicals from the facility, the commission or committee consider all of the following factors: (i) The specific characteristics and the degree and nature of the hazards posed by a release of the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances present at the facility; (ii) The proximity of the facility to residential areas, to areas where significantly large numbers of people are employed or otherwise congregate, and to environmental resources that are subject to injury; (iii) The quantities of the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances that are routinely present at the facility; (iv) The frequency with which the extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, or hazardous substances are present at the facility. (g) Establish procedures to be followed by the commission and the executive committee of the commission for the issuance of orders under this chapter. (3) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code adopt rules establishing reportable quantities for releases of oil that are consistent with and equivalent in scope, content, and coverage to section 311 of the "Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972," 86 Stat. 862, 33 U.S.C.A. 1321, as amended, and applicable regulations adopted under it; (4) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing criteria and procedures for identifying or listing extremely hazardous substances in addition to those identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(a) of this section and for establishing threshold planning quantities and reportable quantities for the added extremely hazardous substances; for identifying or listing hazardous chemicals in addition to those identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and for establishing threshold quantities and categories of health and physical hazards for the added hazardous chemicals; and for identifying or listing hazardous substances in addition to those identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(c) of this section and for establishing reportable quantities for the added hazardous substances. The criteria for identifying or listing additional extremely hazardous substances and establishing threshold planning quantities and reportable quantities therefor and for identifying or listing additional hazardous chemicals and establishing threshold quantities and categories of health and physical hazards for the added hazardous chemicals shall be consistent with and equivalent to applicable criteria therefor under the "Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1729, 42 U.S.C.A. 11001, and regulations adopted under it. The criteria for identifying additional hazardous substances and for establishing reportable quantities of the added hazardous substances shall be consistent with and equivalent to the applicable criteria for identifying or listing hazardous substances and establishing reportable quantities therefor under the "Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 2779, 42 U.S.C.A. 9602, as amended, and regulations adopted under it. The rules shall require that, before identifying or listing any such additional extremely hazardous substance, hazardous chemical, or hazardous substance and establishing a threshold planning quantity, threshold quantity, or reportable quantity therefor, the commission find by a preponderance of the scientific evidence based on generally accepted scientific principles or laboratory tests that the substance or chemical poses a substantial risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment, or poses an extraordinary risk of injury to emergency management personnel responding to a release of the chemical or substance, when the chemical or substance is present at a facility in an amount equal to the proposed threshold planning quantity or threshold quantity or, in the instance of a proposed additional extremely hazardous substance or hazardous substance, poses a substantial risk of catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment if a release of the proposed reportable quantity of the substance occurs. The rules shall further require that, before so identifying or listing a substance or chemical, the commission find by a preponderance of the evidence that the development and implementation of state or local emergency response plans for releases of the substance or chemical will reduce the risk of a catastrophic injury to public health or safety or to the environment, or will reduce the extraordinary risk of injury to responding emergency response personnel, in the event of a release of the substance or chemical and find by a preponderance of the evidence that the identification or listing of the substance or chemical is necessary for the development of state or local emergency response plans for releases of the substance or chemical. The rules shall require that the commission consider the toxicity of the substance or chemical in terms of both the short-term and long-term health effects resulting from exposure to it and its reactivity, volatility, dispersibility, combustibility, and flammability when determining the risks posed by a release of the substance or chemical and, as appropriate, when establishing a threshold planning quantity, threshold quantity, reportable quantity, or category of health or physical hazard for it. (5) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing criteria and procedures for receiving and deciding claims for protection of information as a trade secret that are applicable only to extremely hazardous substances and hazardous chemicals identified or listed in rules adopted under division (C)(5) of this section. The rules shall be equivalent in scope, content, and coverage to section 322 of the "Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1747, 42 U.S.C.A. 11042, and regulations adopted under it. (6)(a) After consultation with the fire marshal, adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing standards for the construction, placement, and use of emergency response lock box units at facilities that are subject to this chapter. The rules shall establish all of the following: (i) Specific standards of construction for lock box units; (ii) The specific types of information that shall be placed in the lock box units required to be placed at a facility by an order issued under division (D) of section 3750.11 of the Revised Code, which shall include the location of on-site emergency fire-fighting and spill cleanup equipment; a diagram of the public and private water supply and sewage systems serving the facility that are known to the owner or operator of the facility; a copy of the emergency and hazardous chemical inventory form for the facility most recently required to be submitted under section 3750.08 of the Revised Code from which the owner or operator may withhold information claimed or determined to be trade secret information pursuant to rules adopted under division (B)(2)(d) of this section, or pursuant to division (B)(14) of this section and rules adopted under division (B)(5) of this section, and confidential business information identified in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(h) of this section; a copy of the local fire department's and facility's emergency management plans for the facility, if any; a current list of the names, positions, addresses, and telephone numbers of all key facility personnel knowledgeable in facility safety procedures and the locations at the facility where extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, and hazardous substances are produced, used, or stored. The rules shall stipulate that, in the instance of lock box units placed voluntarily at facilities by the owners or operators of the facilities, such information shall be maintained in them as is prescribed by agreement by the owner or operator and the fire department having jurisdiction over the facility. (iii) The conditions that shall be met in order to provide safe and expedient access to a lock box unit during a release or threatened release of an extremely hazardous substance, hazardous chemical, or hazardous substance. (b) Unless the owner or operator of a facility is issued an order under division (D) of section 3750.11 of the Revised Code requiring the owner or operator to place a lock box unit at the facility, the owner or operator may place a lock box unit at the facility at the owner's or operator's discretion. If the owner or operator chooses to place a lock box unit at the facility, the responsibility to deposit information in the lock box unit is in addition to any other obligations established in this chapter. (c) Any costs associated with the purchase, construction, or placement of a lock box unit shall be paid by the owner or operator of the facility. (7) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, adopt rules governing the application for and awarding of grants under division (C) of section 3750.14 and division (B) of section 3750.15 of the Revised Code; (8) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing reasonable maximum fees that may be charged by the commission and local emergency planning committees for copying information in the commission's or committee's files to fulfill requests from the public for that information; (9) Adopt internal management rules governing the operations of the commission. The internal management rules shall establish an executive committee of the commission consisting of the director of environmental protection or the director's designee, the director of public safety or the director's designee, the attorney general or the attorney general's designee, one of the appointed members of the commission representing industries subject to this chapter to be appointed by the commission, one of the appointed members of the commission representing the interests of environmental advocacy organizations to be appointed by the commission, and one other appointed member or member ex officio of the commission to be appointed by the commission. The executive committee has exclusive authority to issue enforcement orders under section 3750.18 of the Revised Code and to request the attorney general to bring a civil action, civil penalty action, or criminal action under section 3750.20 of the Revised Code in the name of the commission regarding violations of this chapter, rules adopted under it, or orders issued under it. The internal management rules may set forth the other specific powers and duties of the commission that the executive committee may exercise and carry out and the conditions under which the executive committee may do so. The internal management rules shall not authorize the executive committee to issue variances under division (B) or (C) of section 3750.11 of the Revised Code or orders under division (D) of that section. (10) Oversee and coordinate the implementation and enforcement of this chapter and make such recommendations to the director of environmental protection and the director of public safety as it considers necessary or appropriate to improve the implementation and enforcement of this chapter; (11) Make allocations of moneys under division (B) of section 3750.14 of the Revised Code and make grants under division (C) of section 3750.14 and division (B) of section 3750.15 of the Revised Code; (12) Designate an officer of the environmental protection agency to serve as the commission's information coordinator under this chapter; (13) Not later than December 14, 1989, develop and distribute a state emergency response plan that defines the emergency response roles and responsibilities of the state agencies that are represented on the commission and that provides appropriate coordination with the national contingency plan and the regional contingency plan required by section 105 of the "Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 2767, 42 U.S.C.A. 9601, as amended. The plan shall ensure a well-coordinated response by state agencies that may be involved in assisting local emergency responders during a major release of oil or a major sudden and accidental release of a hazardous substance or extremely hazardous substance. The plan may incorporate existing state emergency response plans by reference. At least annually, the commission and the state agencies that are represented on it shall jointly exercise the state plan in conjunction with the exercise of a local emergency response plan by a local emergency planning committee under section 3750.04 of the Revised Code. After any such exercise, the commission shall review the state plan and make such revisions in it as the commission considers necessary or appropriate. (14) Receive and decide claims for the protection of information as a trade secret that pertain only to extremely hazardous substances and hazardous chemicals identified or listed by rules adopted under division (C)(5) of this section. If the commission determines that the claim meets the criteria established in rules adopted under division (B)(5) of this section, it shall issue an order to that effect in accordance with section 3750.18 of the Revised Code. If the commission determines that the claim does not meet the criteria established in those rules, it shall issue an order to that effect in accordance with section 3750.18 of the Revised Code. (15) Annually compile, make available to the public, and submit to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives a summary report on the number of facilities estimated to be subject to regulation under sections 3750.05, 3750.07, and 3750.08 of the Revised Code, the number of facilities reporting to the commission, an estimate of the percentage of facilities in compliance with those sections, and recommendations regarding the types of activities the commission considers necessary to improve such compliance. The commission shall base its estimate of the number of facilities that are subject to regulation under those sections on the current estimates provided by the local emergency planning committees under division (D)(6) of section 3750.03 of the Revised Code. (C) The commission may: (1) Procure by contract the temporary or intermittent services of experts or consultants when those services are to be performed on a part-time or fee-for-service basis and do not involve the performance of administrative duties; (2) Enter into contracts or agreements with political subdivisions or emergency planning districts for the purposes of this chapter; (3) Accept on behalf of the state any gift, grant, or contribution from any governmental or private source for the purposes of this chapter; (4) Enter into contracts, agreements, or memoranda of understanding with any state department, agency, board, commission, or institution to obtain the services of personnel thereof or utilize resources thereof for the purposes of this chapter. Employees of a state department, agency, board, commission, or institution providing services to the commission under any such contract, agreement, or memorandum shall perform only those functions and provide only the services provided for in the contract, agreement, or memorandum. (5) Identify or list extremely hazardous substances in addition to those identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(a) of this section and establish threshold planning quantities and reportable quantities for the additional extremely hazardous substances, identify or list hazardous chemicals in addition to those identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(b) of this section and establish threshold quantities and categories or health and physical hazards for the added chemicals, and identify or list hazardous substances in addition to those identified or listed in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(c) of this section and establish reportable quantities for the added hazardous substances. The commission may establish threshold planning quantities for the additional extremely hazardous substances based upon classes of those substances or categories of facilities at which they are present and may establish threshold quantities for the additional hazardous chemicals based upon classes of those chemicals or categories of facilities where they are present. The commission shall identify or list such additional substances or chemicals and establish threshold planning quantities, threshold quantities, reportable quantities, and hazard categories therefor in accordance with the criteria and procedures established in rules adopted under division (B)(4) of this section and, after compliance with those criteria and procedures, by the adoption of rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The commission shall not adopt rules under division (C)(5) of this section modifying any threshold planning quantity established in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, any threshold quantity established in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(b) of this section, or any reportable quantity established in rules adopted under division (B)(1)(c) of this section. If, after the commission has adopted rules under division (C)(5) of this section identifying or listing an extremely hazardous substance, hazardous chemical, or hazardous substance, the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency identifies or lists the substance or chemical as an extremely hazardous substance or hazardous chemical under the "Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1729, 42 U.S.C.A. 11001, or identifies or lists a substance as a hazardous substance under the "Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 2779, 42 U.S.C.A. 9602, as amended, the commission shall rescind its rules adopted under division (C)(5) of this section pertaining to the substance or chemical and adopt the appropriate rules under division (B)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section. (6) From time to time, request the director of environmental protection and the executive director of the emergency management agency to review implementation, administration, and enforcement of the chemical emergency response planning and reporting programs created by this chapter and rules adopted under it regarding their effectiveness in preparing for response to releases of extremely hazardous substances, hazardous chemicals, and hazardous substances. After completion of any such review, the director of environmental protection and the director of public safety shall report their findings to the commission. Upon receipt of their findings, the commission may make such recommendations for legislative and administrative action as the commission finds necessary or appropriate to promote achievement of the purposes of this chapter. (D) Except as provided in section 3750.06 of the Revised Code, nothing in this chapter applies to the transportation, including the storage incident to transportation, of any substance or chemical subject to the requirements of this chapter, including the transportation and distribution of natural gas. (E) This chapter authorizes the state, through the emergency response commission, the department of public safety, and the environmental protection agency, to establish and maintain chemical emergency response planning and preparedness, community right-to-know, and hazardous substance and extremely hazardous substance release reporting programs that are consistent with and equivalent in scope, coverage, and content to the "Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 1729, 42 U.S.C.A. 11001, and regulations adopted under it, except as otherwise specifically required or authorized in this chapter. The commission, department, and agencies may do all things necessary, incidental, or appropriate to implement, administer, and enforce this chapter and to perform the duties and exercise the powers of the state emergency response commission under that act and regulations adopted under it and under this chapter. Sec. 3769.088. (A)(1) If any permit holder required by this chapter to pay the taxes levied by sections 3769.08, 3769.087, 3769.26, and 3769.28 of the Revised Code fails to pay the taxes as required, the tax commissioner may make an assessment against the permit holder based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. (2) If a permit holder required to remit taxes or file a report electronically in the manner prescribed under section 3769.103 of the Revised Code fails to do so, the tax commissioner may impose an additional penalty of fifty dollars or ten per cent of the tax due as shown on the report, whichever is greater. (3) A penalty of up to fifteen per cent may be added to the amount of every assessment made under this section. (4) The commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of penalties added to assessments made under this section. (5) The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the commissioner. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the place, track, or enclosure for which the permit was issued is located or the county in which the party assessed resides or has its principal place of business. If the party assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state horse racing tax," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issues the assessment until the day the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be treated as revenue arising from the taxes imposed by sections 3769.08, 3769.087, 3769.26, and 3769.28 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3770.071. (A) As used in this section, "lottery prize award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except that "lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (B) If the amount of the prize money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a lottery prize award meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amounts set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, or a subsequent analogous section of the Internal Revenue Code, the director of the state lottery commission or the director's designee shall consult the data match program established under section 3123.89 of the Revised Code to determine whether the person is subject to a final and enforceable determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. If so, the director or the director's designee shall withhold an amount from the prize award in accordance with section 3123.89 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3770.072. (A) As used in this section, "prize winner," and "transferee," and "transferor" have the same meanings as in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code. (B) The state lottery commission shall deduct amounts from lottery prize awards and file returns in accordance with sections section 5747.062 and 5747.064 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted by the tax commissioner pursuant to those sectionsthat section. This division also applies to lottery prize award payments the commission remits to transferees. (C)(1)(a) (C)(1) Each transferee shall deduct and withhold from each gross amount payable to each prize winner four per cent of the gross amount payable prior to making any other reduction required by this chapter. (b) Subject to division (C)(1)(c) of this section, each transferee, including any transferee that is a related member, as defined in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code, to the transferor, shall deduct and withhold from each amount payable to a transferor that is not a prize winner four per cent of the portion of the payment representing gain or income the transferor will recognize in connection with the payment. (c) For purposes of division (C)(1)(b) of this section, the portion of any payment representing gain or income recognized by the transferor shall be computed in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code. The transferor shall prepare a written statement setting forth that amount and sign the statement under penalty of perjury. Within five days before the date on which the payment is to be made, the transferor shall deliver the written statement to the transferee and deliver a copy of the written statement to the tax commissioner. If the transferee does not receive the written statement by the time the payment is made, the transferee shall withhold four per cent of the entire amount of the payment. If the tax commissioner notifies the transferee that the transferor has erroneously computed the amount of gain or income recognized, the transferee shall withhold four per cent of the entire amount of each payment to be made after the transferee receives the notice. (d) The tax commissioner may impose a penalty of up to one thousand dollars for any person failing to timely deliver to the tax commissioner the copy of the written statement as required by division (C)(1)(c) of this section. Proceeds from the imposition of the penalty shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax imposed under section 5733.06 or 5747.02 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (2) With respect to amounts deducted and withheld pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, each transferee shall comply with divisions (A)(2) to (4) of section 5747.062 of the Revised Code. (3) An employee of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust having control or supervision of or charged with the responsibility of filing the report and making the payment required by division (C) of this section and section 5747.062 of the Revised Code, or an officer, member, manager, or trustee of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust who is responsible for the execution of the corporation's, limited liability company's, or business trust's fiscal responsibilities, shall be personally liable for failure to file the report or pay the amount due as required by division (C) of this section and section 5747.062 of the Revised Code. The dissolution, termination, or bankruptcy of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust does not discharge a responsible officer's, member's, manager's, employee's, or trustee's liability for a failure of the corporation, limited liability company, or business trust to file returns or pay the amount due. (4)(a) The tax commissioner may make an assessment against any person listed in division (C)(1) or (3) of this section for any deficiency for any period. Section 5747.13 of the Revised Code shall apply with respect to issuing assessments, filing petitions for reassessments, conducting hearings, issuing final determinations, making the assessment final, and filing the entry that makes the assessment final. Section 5717.02 of the Revised Code shall apply to appeals of the commissioner's final decision in connection with assessments issued pursuant to division (C)(4) of this section. (b) An assessment issued against any person listed in division (C)(1) or (3) of this section shall not be considered an election of remedies or a bar to an assessment against any other person for the failure to comply with division (C)(1) of this section. No assessment shall be issued against any person who is so listed if the amount required to be withheld has been paid by another. (c) The assessment shall include interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code on liability from the time the payment is due until the date of assessment. Interest shall continue to accrue from the date of assessment until the date the assessment is paid in full. Any interest accruing subsequent to the date of the issuance of the assessment shall be considered to be an additional deficiency for which the tax commissioner may issue subsequent assessments. The initial assessment and any subsequent assessments may include a penalty in an amount not to exceed twice the applicable interest charged under this division. Sec. 3770.073. (A) As used in this section, "lottery prize award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except that "lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (B) The attorney general shall provide the state lottery commission or its designee with access to the real time data match program described in sections 3772.37 and 3775.16 of the Revised Code for the purpose of identifying prize winners who owe amounts to the state or a political subdivision. (C) If a person is entitled to a lottery prize award and is indebted to the state for the payment of any tax, workers' compensation premium, unemployment contribution, payment in lieu of unemployment contribution, or certified claim under section 131.02 or 131.021 of the Revised Code, or is indebted to a political subdivision that has a certified claim under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, owes lottery sales receipts held in trust on behalf of the state lottery commission as described in division (H)(4) of section 3770.05 of the Revised Code, or owes any charge, penalty, or interest arising from these any of those debts and if the amount of the prize money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a lottery prize award meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, the director of the state lottery commission, or the director's designee, shall do either of the following: (1) If the prize award will be paid in a lump sum, deduct from the prize award and pay to the attorney general an amount in satisfaction of the debt and pay any remainder to that person. If the amount of the prize award is less than the amount of the debt, the entire amount of the prize award shall be deducted and paid in partial satisfaction of the debt. (2) If the prize award will be paid in annual installments, on the date the initial installment payment is due, deduct from that installment and pay to the attorney general an amount in satisfaction of the debt and, if necessary to collect the full amount of the debt, do the same for any subsequent annual installments, at the time the installments become due and owing to the person, until the debt is fully satisfied. (B) (D) If a person entitled to a lottery prize award owes more than one debt, any debt owed to the state shall be satisfied first, subject to both section 5739.33 and division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code having first priority, and subject to division (C) (E) of this section. (C) (E) Any debt owed under section 3770.071 of the Revised Code shall be satisfied with first priority over debts owed under this section. (D) (F) Except as provided in section 131.021 of the Revised Code, this section applies only to debts that have become final. Sec. 3770.074. If the amount of a prize award from a video lottery terminal meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, the video lottery sales agent shall consult the data match program established under section 3123.89 of the Revised Code to determine whether the person is subject to a final and enforceable determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. If so, the video lottery sales agent shall withhold an amount from the prize award in accordance with section 3123.89 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3770.075. (A) The attorney general shall provide each video lottery sales agent with access to the real time data match program described in sections 3772.37 and 3775.16 of the Revised Code for the purpose of identifying prize winners who owe amounts to the state or a political subdivision. (B) If a person is entitled to a prize award from a video lottery terminal that meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041 and the person is indebted to the state for the payment of any tax, workers' compensation premium, unemployment contribution, payment in lieu of unemployment contribution, or certified claim under section 131.02 or 131.021 of the Revised Code, is indebted to a political subdivision that has a certified claim under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, owes lottery sales receipts held in trust on behalf of the state lottery commission as described in division (H)(4) of section 3770.05 of the Revised Code, or owes any charge, penalty, or interest arising from any of those debts, the video lottery sales agent shall deduct from the prize award and pay to the attorney general an amount in satisfaction of the debt and pay any remainder to that person. If the amount of the prize award is less than the amount of the debt, the entire amount of the prize award shall be deducted and paid in partial satisfaction of the debt. (C) If a person entitled to a prize award from a video lottery terminal owes more than one debt, any debt owed to the state shall be satisfied first, subject to both section 5739.33 and division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code having first priority, and subject to division (D) of this section. (D) Any debt owed under section 3770.074 of the Revised Code shall be satisfied with first priority over debts owed under this section. (E) Except as provided in section 131.021 of the Revised Code, this section applies only to debts that have become final. Sec. 3770.10. As used in sections 3770.07 to 3770.073 3770.075 and 3770.10 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code: (A) "Court of competent jurisdiction" means either the general division or the probate division of the court of common pleas of the county in which the prize winner or transferor resides, or, if the prize winner or transferor is not a resident of this state, either the general division or the probate division of the court of common pleas of Franklin county or a federal court having jurisdiction over the lottery prize award. (B) "Discounted present value" means the present value of the future payments of a lottery prize award that is determined by discounting those payments to the present, using the most recently published applicable federal rate for determining the present value of an annuity as issued by the United States internal revenue service and assuming daily compounding. (C) "Independent professional advice" means the advice of an attorney, a certified public accountant, an actuary, or any other a licensed professional adviser if all of the following apply: (1) The prize winner has engaged the services of the licensed professional adviser to render advice concerning the legal, financial, and other implications of a transfer of the lottery prize award. (2) The licensed professional adviser is not affiliated in any manner with or compensated in any manner by the transferee of the lottery prize award. (3) The compensation of the licensed professional adviser is not affected by whether or not a transfer of a lottery prize award occurs. (D) "Prize winner" means any person that holds the right to receive all or any part of a lottery prize award as a result of being any of the following: (1) A person who is a claimant under division (A) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code; (2) A person who is entitled to a prize award and who is under a legal disability as described in division (B) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code; (3) A person who was awarded a prize award to which another has claimed title by a federal bankruptcy court order or other court order referred to in division (D) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code; (4) A person who is receiving payments upon the death of a prize winner as provided in division (D) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code. (E) "Transfer" means any form of sale, assignment, or redirection of payment of all or any part the remainder of a lottery prize award for consideration. (F) "Transfer agreement" means an agreement that is complete and valid, and that provides for the transfer of all or any part the remainder of a lottery prize award from a transferor prize winner to a transferee. A transfer agreement is incomplete and invalid unless the agreement contains both of the following: (1) A statement, signed by the transferor prize winner under penalties of perjury, that the transferor prize winner irrevocably agrees that the transferor prize winner is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the transferor prize winner will recognize in connection with the transfer. If the transferor is a pass-through entity, as defined in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code, each investor in the pass-through entity shall also sign under penalties of perjury a statement that the investor irrevocably agrees that the investor is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the transferor and the investor will recognize in connection with the transfer. (2) A statement, signed by the transferee, that the transferee irrevocably agrees that the transferee is subject to the withholding requirements imposed by division (C) of section 3770.072 of the Revised Code and that the transferee is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the transferee will recognize in connection with a lottery prize awards award to be received as a result of the transfer. If the transferee is a pass-through entity, as defined in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code, each investor in the pass-through entity shall also sign under penalties of perjury a statement setting forth that the investor irrevocably agrees that the investor is subject to the withholding requirements imposed by division (C) of section 3770.072 of the Revised Code and is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the transferee and the investor will recognize in connection with a lottery prize awards award to be received as a result of the transfer. (G) "Transferee" means a party acquiring or proposing to acquire all or any part the remainder of a lottery prize award from a prize winner through a transfer. (H) "Transferor" means either a prize winner or a transferee in an earlier transfer whose interest is acquired by or is sought to be acquired by a transferee or a new transferee through a transfer."Licensed professional adviser" means any of the following: (1) An attorney; (2) A certified public accountant; (3) An actuary; (4) A financial planner who is accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation agency. (I) "Lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming, except as otherwise specified in the applicable section of the Revised Code. (J) "Video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (K) "Video lottery sales agent" means an agent of the state lottery authorized to operate video lottery terminals under section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3770.12. A court of competent jurisdiction shall approve a transfer of a lottery prize award only in a final order that is based on express findings of the court. The court shall approve the transfer if each of the following conditions that applies is met and is included in the court's express findings: (A) If the transferor is a prize winner, the The transferee has provided to the prize winner a disclosure statement that complies with section 3770.11 of the Revised Code, and the prize winner has confirmed the prize winner's receipt of the disclosure statement, as evidenced by the prize winner's notarized signature on a copy of the disclosure statement. (B) If the transferor is a The prize winner, the prize winner has received independent professional advice regarding the legal, financial, and other implications of the transfer, as evidenced by a statement signed under penalty of perjury by the prize winner and the licensed professional adviser. (C) The transferee has given written notice of the transferee's name, address, and taxpayer identification number to the state lottery commission and has filed a copy of that notice with the court in which the application for approval of the transfer was filed. (D) The transferee is a trust, limited partnership, general partnership, corporation, professional association, limited liability company, or other entity that is qualified to do business in this state and meets the registration requirements for that type of entity under Title XVII of the Revised Code. (E) The transfer complies with all applicable requirements of the Revised Code and does not contravene any applicable statute or court order. (F) The transfer does not include or cover the amounts of the lottery prize award that are required to be withheld or deducted pursuant to section 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, 3123.06, 3770.071, or 3770.072 of the Revised Code. (G) Any amounts described in division (F) of this section that are required to be withheld or deducted, as of the date of the court order, will be offset by the commission first against remaining payments due the transferor prize winner and then against payments due the transferee. (H) Except as provided in divisions (F) and (G) of this section, that the transferor's prize winner's interest in each and all of the future payments from a particular lottery prize award is to be paid to a single transferee, or, if the payments from the lottery prize award are to be directed from the state lottery commission to multiple transferees, the commission has promulgated rules under section 3770.03 of the Revised Code permitting transfers to multiple transferees, and the transfer is consistent with those rules. (I) If the lottery prize award has been transferred within twelve months immediately preceding the effective date of the proposed transfer, the state lottery commission has not objected to the proposed transfer. The court shall presume that the requirements of this division are met unless the commission notifies the court in writing before the hearing on the application for transfer, or through counsel at that hearing, that a transfer of the same lottery prize award has been made within that twelve-month period and that the commission objects to a subsequent transfer within that twelve-month period. The court shall find that the requirements of this division are not met if the commission provides notice of a prior transfer of the same lottery prize award within that twelve-month period and its objection to the proposed transfer, unless the transferor or transferee shows by clear and convincing evidence that no previous transfer of the same lottery prize award occurred within that twelve-month period. For purposes of this division, any of a series of transfers of a lottery prize award that occur simultaneously as part of a single transaction shall not be considered to be a prior transfer of the lottery prize award within the twelve-month period immediately preceding the effective date of the proposed transfer, provided that the condition set forth in division (C) of this section is met. If the court determines that all of the conditions in divisions (A) to (I) (H) of this section that apply are met, the transfer of the lottery prize award shall be presumed to be fair and reasonable and in the best interests of the prize winner. Sec. 3770.121. Any state lottery commission rules allowing lottery prize awards to be paid in installments also shall allow a prize winner who is being paid a prize award in that manner to transfer all or a portion of the remainder of the prize award, subject to each of the following conditions: (A) If each transfer is for less than one hundred per cent of the remainder of the prize award, the remainder of the prize award for each transfer must be five hundred thousand dollars or greater at the time of the transfer. If the lottery prize award is a lifetime prize, for each transfer the remainder of the minimum guaranteed prize to which the prize winner is entitled must be five hundred thousand dollars or greater at the time of the transfer. (B) Payments of the prize award transferred shall be subject to the withholding or deduction of any amounts that are required to be withheld or deducted under section 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, 3123.06, 3770.071, or 5747.062 of the Revised Code. (C) The maximum number of transfers (B) Only one transfer is permitted under this section with respect to any single prize award shall not exceed three unless a greater number of permitted transfers has been specified by the commission in the rules. Sec. 3770.13. (A) A transferee shall file an application under sections 3770.10 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code for the approval in advance of a transfer of a lottery prize award in a court of competent jurisdiction. (B) The following procedures shall apply to an application for the approval in advance by a court of a transfer of a lottery prize award under division (A) of this section: (1) Upon the filing of the application, the court shall set a date, time, and place for a hearing on the application and shall notify the transferee and transferor the prize winner of the date, time, and place of the hearing. (2) Not less than thirty days prior to the date set by the court for the hearing on an application filed pursuant to this section, the transferee shall file with the court and shall serve on the state lottery commission, in the manner prescribed in the Rules of Civil Procedure for the service of process, a notice of the proposed transfer and the application for its approval in advance. The notice shall include all of the following: (a) A copy of the application; (b) A copy of the transfer agreement or, if the transferor is not a prize winner, a redacted copy of the transfer agreement that discloses sufficient information to allow the commission and the court to determine the validity of the transfer agreement; (c) If the transferor is a prize winner, a A copy of the disclosure statement provided by the transferee pursuant to section 3770.11 of the Revised Code and signed by the prize winner pursuant to division (A) of section 3770.12 of the Revised Code; (d) A statement, signed under penalty of perjury by the prize winner and a licensed professional adviser, that the prize winner has received independent professional advice regarding the legal, financial, and other implications of the transfer; (e) The amounts and due dates of the lottery prize award payments that will be transferred under the transfer agreement; (e) (f) Notification of the date, time, and place of the hearing on the application; (f) (g) The complete name, address, and taxpayer identification number of the transferee. (3) The commission shall not be required to appear in or be named as a party to a hearing on the application, but may intervene as of right in the proceeding. (4) At the conclusion of the hearing on an application under this section, the court may grant or deny the approval of the transfer. The court shall enter its order accordingly. If the court grants the approval of the transfer, it shall include in its order all of the express findings specified in section 3770.12 of the Revised Code. If the court denies the approval of the transfer, it shall include in its order the reasons for the denial. (5) An order of the court made under division (B)(4) of this section is a final and appealable order. Sec. 3770.25. (A) The state lottery commission shall offer lottery sports gaming only at type C sports gaming hosts' facilities on self-service or clerk-operated terminals, and only to individuals who are at least twenty-one years of age and who are physically present on the premises of the facility. (B) All of the following apply concerning lottery sports gaming: (1) If a type C sports gaming proprietor intends to install more than two terminals in any type C sports gaming host's facility, the type C sports gaming proprietor shall notify the Ohio casino control commission of that fact not later than seven days before installing the additional terminals. The commission may disallow the installation of more than two terminals in the facility, in accordance with the commission's rules. (2) The self-service terminal or the clerk, as applicable, shall verify that the lottery sports gaming participant is at least twenty-one years of age. (3) A type C sports gaming proprietor may offer only the following types of wagers on sporting events, as approved by the Ohio casino control commission: (a) Spread wagers; (b) Over-under wagers; (c) Moneyline wagers; (d) Parlay wagers that are based on not more than four component wagers. (4) A self-service terminal or clerk shall accept wagers only by cash, credit card, debit card, or electronic payment account. As used in this section, "electronic payment account" means an account maintained with a third party for purposes of making electronic payments, such as paypal, google pay, or apple pay, that is intended for general use and not only for sports gaming purposes. (5) A self-service terminal or clerk shall not accept wagers aggregating more than seven hundred dollars in a calendar week from any one participant. (6) The rules of the Ohio casino control commission and the state lottery commission concerning lottery sports gaming shall apply identically in all applicable respects to lottery sports gaming offered on a self-service terminal and to lottery sports gaming offered on a clerk-operated terminal. (C)(1) A participant whose winnings from lottery sports gaming are of an amount that is not subject to withholding under section 718.031, 3770.071, 3770.072, or 3770.073 of the Revised Code does not meet or exceed the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041 may receive the participant's winnings by any of the following methods: (a) As a credit to the participant's credit card, debit card, or electronic payment account.; (b) In cash from any type C sports gaming host; (c) By any additional method permitted by the state lottery commission by rule. (2) A participant whose winnings from lottery sports gaming are of an amount that is subject to withholding under section 718.031, 3770.071, 3770.072, or 3770.073 of the Revised Code meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041 may receive the participant's winnings in the same manner as any other determined by the state lottery prize award of an amount that is subject to commission, subject to withholding by the sports gaming proprietor under those sections 718.031, 3123.90, 3775.16, and 5747.063 of the Revised Code or subject to withholding by the state lottery commission under sections 718.031, 3770.071, 3770.073, and 5747.062 of the Revised Code, as applicable. Sec. 3772.02. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio casino control commission described in Section 6(C)(4) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution. (B) The commission shall consist of seven members appointed within one month of September 10, 2010, by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor shall forward all appointments to the senate within twenty-four hours. (1) Each commission member is eligible for reappointment at the discretion of the governor. No commission member shall be appointed for more than three terms in total. (2) Each commission member shall be a resident of Ohio. (3) At least one commission member shall be experienced in law enforcement and criminal investigation. (4) At least one commission member shall be a certified public accountant experienced in accounting and auditing. (5) At least one commission member shall be an attorney admitted to the practice of law in Ohio. (6) At least one commission member shall be a resident of a county where one of the casino facilities is located. (7) Not more than four commission members shall be of the same political party. (8) No commission member shall have any affiliation with an Ohio casino operator or facility or with a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider licensed under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code. (C) Commission members shall serve four-year terms, except that when the governor makes initial appointments to the commission under this chapter, the governor shall appoint three members to serve four-year terms with not more than two such members from the same political party, two members to serve three-year terms with such members not being from the same political party, and two members to serve two-year terms with such members not being from the same political party. (D) Each commission member shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring before the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term. Any member shall continue in office after the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. A vacancy in the commission membership shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (E) The governor shall select one member to serve as chairperson and the commission members shall select one member from a different party than the chairperson to serve as vice-chairperson. The governor may remove and replace the chairperson at any time. No such member shall serve as chairperson for more than six successive years. The vice-chairperson shall assume the duties of the chairperson in the absence of the chairperson. The chairperson and vice-chairperson shall perform but shall not be limited to additional duties as are prescribed by commission rule. (F) A commission member is not required to devote the member's full time to membership on the commission. Beginning on September 29, 2015, each member of the commission shall receive compensation of fifty thousand dollars per year. Beginning July 1, 2016, each member of the commission shall receive compensation of forty thousand dollars per year. Beginning July 1, 2017, each member of the commission shall receive compensation of thirty thousand dollars per year. Each member shall receive the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of the member's official duties. (G) The governor shall not appoint an individual to the commission, and an individual shall not serve on the commission, if the individual is ineligible to be appointed or retained under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. A member who comes under indictment or bill of information of an offense that, if the member were convicted of the offense, would make the member ineligible to be appointed or retained under that section shall resign from the commission immediately upon indictment. (H) At least five commission members shall be present for the commission to meet. The concurrence of four members is necessary for the commission to take any action. All members shall vote on the adoption of rules, and the approval of, and the suspension or revocation of, the licenses of casino operators or management companies, unless a member has a written leave of absence filed with and approved by the chairperson. (I) A commission member may be removed or suspended from office in accordance with section 3.04 of the Revised Code. (J) Each commission member, before entering upon the discharge of the member's official duties, shall make an oath to uphold the Ohio Constitution and laws of the state of Ohio and shall give a bond, payable by the commission, to the treasurer of state, in the sum of ten thousand dollars with sufficient sureties to be approved by the treasurer of state, which bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. (K) The commission shall hold one regular meeting each month and shall convene other meetings at the request of the chairperson or a majority of the members. A member who fails to attend at least three-fifths of the regular and special meetings of the commission during any two-year period forfeits membership on the commission. All meetings of the commission shall be open meetings under section 121.22 of the Revised Code except as otherwise allowed by law. (L) Pursuant to divisions (A)(3) and (9) of section 101.82 of the Revised Code, the The commission is exempt from the requirements of sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3775.16. (A) Pursuant to section 131.02 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall develop and implement a real time data match program and make it available to each sports gaming proprietor to identify patrons who owe amounts to the state or a political subdivision. (B)(1) Before Subject to division (E) of this section, before disbursing any sports gaming winnings to a patron in an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, a sports gaming proprietor shall consult the data match program to determine whether the patron owes any amounts to the state or a political subdivision. If the data match program indicates that the patron owes any amounts to the state or a political subdivision, the sports gaming proprietor shall withhold from the patron's winnings an amount sufficient to satisfy those amounts, up to the amount of the winnings. (2) If the data match program described in section 3123.90 of the Revised Code indicates that the patron also is in default under a support order, the sports gaming proprietor shall transmit to the department of job and family services an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due support owed by the patron, up to the amount of the winnings, before transmitting any remaining amount to the attorney general under division (C) of this section. (C)(1) Not later than fourteen days after withholding an amount under division (B) of this section, the sports gaming proprietor shall transmit to the attorney general any amount withheld and not already disbursed to the department of job and family services under section 3123.90 of the Revised Code as payment on the amount owed. (2) If the patron owes more than one amount to the state or a political subdivision as identified by the data match program described in this section, the amount owed to the state shall be satisfied first, except that any amounts owed under section 5739.33 and division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code shall have first priority. (D) Except as otherwise provided in section 131.021 of the Revised Code, this section applies only to amounts owed that have become final. (E) A sports gaming proprietor that offers lottery sports gaming through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code shall not withhold amounts under this section from winnings from wagers placed through that terminal. The state lottery commission shall withhold amounts from those winnings under section 3770.073 of the Revised Code. (F) The attorney general, in consultation with the commission, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to implement this section. Sec. 3780.02. Authorization and purpose. (A) Controlled and regulated sales and use of adult use cannabis shall be permitted under this chapter for the following public purposes: (1) Reducing illegal marijuana sales and providing for a safer and regulated cannabis product; (2) Limiting the transportation of out-of-state cannabis into the state; (3) Providing key funding to support social equity, job creation, host communities that have adult use dispensaries, cannabis research, and proper oversight and regulation of the adult cannabis industry; and (4) Improving social equity issues to address the state's compelling interest to redress past and present effects of discrimination and economic disadvantage for individuals in the statefund the needs of the state. (B) Adult use cannabis shall only be sold to, or used by, an adult use consumer pursuant to this chapter unless otherwise authorized pursuant to the Revised Code. (C) Nothing in this chapter shall limit any sale, use, possession, or any other activity authorized by Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3780.03. Establishment and authority of division of cannabis control; adoption of rules. (A) There is hereby established a division of cannabis control within the department of commerce. (B) To ensure the proper oversight and control of the adult use cannabis industry, the division of cannabis control shall have the authority to license, regulate, investigate, and penalize adult use cannabis operators, adult use testing laboratories, and individuals required to be licensed under this chapter. (C) The division of cannabis control shall adopt, and as advisable and necessary shall amend or repeal, rules on the following: (1) Prevention of practices detrimental to the public interest consistent with this chapter, and also ways to educate the public about this chapter; (2) Establishing application, licensure, and renewal standards and procedures for license applicants or license holders related to adult use cannabis operators, adult use testing laboratories, and individuals required to be licensed, including any additional background check requirements, the disqualifying offenses under section 3780.01 of the Revised Code that prohibit licensure, and any exemption criteria from licensing requirements for institutional or private investors who do not have significant control or influence over a license applicant or license holder, and whose ownership in a license is for investment purposes only; (3) Establishing reasonable application, licensure, and renewal fees amounts to ensure license applicants and license holders under this chapter pay for the actual costs for administration and licensure for the division of cannabis control; (4) Establishing standards for provisional licenses for an individual who is required to be licensed and who has exigent circumstances. Such standards for provisional licenses must include submission of a complete application and compliance with a required background check. A provisional license shall be valid not longer than three months. A provisional license may be renewed, at the division of cannabis control's discretion, for an additional three months. In establishing standards with regard to instant background checks the division of cannabis control may use all available resources;. (5) Specifying the process and reasons for which a license holder may be fined, suspended either with or without a prior hearing, revoked, or not renewed or issued; (6) The process and requirements for division of cannabis control approval of any requested change in ownership or transfer of control of an adult use cannabis operator or adult use testing laboratory; (7) Establishing process processes and standards for expanding the size of the cultivation area for a cultivation facility; (8) Establishing standards and procedures for the testing of adult use cannabis by an adult use testing laboratory licensed under this chapter. When establishing standards and procedures for the testing of cannabis, the division of cannabis control shall do all of the following: (a) Specify when testing must be conducted; (b) Determine the minimum amount of adult use cannabis that must be tested; (c) Specify the manner in which testing is to be conducted in an effort to ensure uniformity of cannabis products processed for and dispensed; and (d) Specify the manner in which test results are provided. (9) The minimum amount of insurance or surety bond that must be maintained by an adult use cannabis operator and adult use testing laboratory; (10) Requiring the division of cannabis control to adopt reasonable standards for any adult use cannabis samples, and advertising as prescribed in section 3780.21 of the Revised Code; (11) Requiring that the records, including financial statements, of an adult use cannabis operator or adult use testing laboratory be maintained in the manner up to two years as prescribed by the division of cannabis control and which shall be made available for inspection upon demand by the division of cannabis control, but shall be subject to section 3780.31 of the Revised Code; (12) Prescribing technical standards and requirements consistent with industry standards that must be met for security and surveillance equipment necessary for the provision of security and surveillance of adult use cannabis operators and adult use testing laboratories; (13) Prescribing requirements for a license holder's provision of security services for an adult use cannabis operator and adult use testing laboratories which shall include the license holder's option to use armed or unarmed services including through agents of the license holder; (14) Prescribing standards according to which license holders shall keep accounts and standards according to which adult use cannabis operators and adult use testing laboratories accounts shall be audited, and establish guidance for assisting the department of taxation in levying and collecting the adult use tax levied under section 3780.22 of the Revised Code; (15) Determining penalties for violation of division of cannabis control rules or this chapter, and a process for imposing such penalties; (16) Training requirements for employees and agents of adult use cannabis operators and adult use laboratories; (17) Prescribing standards and procedures to allow for adult use cannabis delivery to adult use consumers, and online and mobile ordering procedures, which may only be conducted by an adult use dispensary or their agent; (18) Prescribing cannabis inventory requirements to be maintained in an electronic database consistent with section 3780.05 of the Revised Code; (19) Prescribing standards and procedures for product packaging and labeling of adult use cannabis products; (20) Prescribing standards and procedures in coordination with the department of development to administer and enforce the cannabis social equity and jobs program as prescribed under 3780.19 of the Revised Code; (21) Establishing a tetrahydrocannabinol content limit for adult use cannabis, which for plant material the content limit shall be no not less than thirty-five per cent and for extracts the content limit shall be no not less than ninety per cent, but that such content limits may be increased or eliminated by the division of cannabis control; and (22)(21) Prescribing duty to update requirements for license holders. (D) All rules adopted under this section and chapter shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (E) In addition to the rules described in division (C) of this section, the division of cannabis control may adopt any other rules it considers necessary for the administration, implementation, and enforcement of this chapter consistent with this chapter. (F) When adopting rules under this section, the division of cannabis control shall consider standards and procedures that have been found to be best practices relative to the use and regulation of adult use cannabis and shall harmonize any rules with the rules adopted pursuant to sections 3796.03 and 3796.04 of the Revised Code to minimize duplication of operational requirements and fees as much as possible. If there is a conflict with Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code and related rules, and chapter Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code and related rules, then chapter Chapter 3780. of the Revised Code and related rules shall govern. Sec. 3780.06. Information provided by the department of taxation. (A)(1) Notwithstanding section 149.43 of the Revised Code or any other public records law to the contrary or any law relating to the confidentiality of tax return information, upon the request of the division of cannabis control, the department of taxation shall provide to the division of cannabis control all of the following information: (a) Whether an applicant for license or licensee under this chapter follows the applicable tax laws of this state; (b) Any past or pending violation by the applicant or licensee of those tax laws, and any penalty imposed on the applicant or licensee for such a violation. (2) The division of cannabis control shall request the information only as it pertains to an application for license that the division of cannabis control is reviewing or a licensee operating under this chapter. (3) The department of taxation may charge the division of cannabis control a reasonable fee to cover the administrative cost of providing the information. (B) Information received under this section is confidential. Except as otherwise permitted by other state law or federal law, the division of cannabis control shall not make the information available to any person other than the applicant for licensure or the licensee to whom the information applies. Sec. 3780.10. Adult use cannabis operator and adult use testing laboratory licenses. (A) No person shall operate as an adult use cannabis operator or adult use testing laboratory without a license issued pursuant to this chapter. (B) The following licenses shall be issued by the division of cannabis control within nine months of the effective date of this section December 7, 2023, if the license applicant is in compliance with section 3780.11 of the Revised Code and this chapter, and the license applicant has, or the same owners of the license applicant, have, a certificate of operation or medical provisional license issued as of the effective date of this section December 7, 2023: (1) A dispensary issued a certificate of operation or medical provisional license shall be issued an adult use dispensary license under this chapter for the current location of the dispensary; (2) A level I cultivator issued a certificate of operation or medical provisional license shall be issued under this chapter three adult use dispensary licenses at locations designated in a license application, and one level I adult use cultivator license for the current location of the level I cultivation facility; (3) A level II cultivator issued a certificate of operation or medical provisional license shall be issued under this chapter one adult use dispensary license at a location designated in the license application, and one level II adult use cultivator license for the current location of the level II cultivation facility; (4) A dispensary issued a certificate of operation or medical provisional license shall be issued under this chapter one adult use dispensary license at a different location as designated in the license application if the dispensary does not have any common ownership or control with any level I adult use cultivator, level II adult use cultivator, or adult use processor license applicant or licensee; (5) A processor issued a certificate of operation or medical provisional license shall be issued under this chapter one adult use processor license for the current location of the processor; and (6) A testing laboratory issued a certificate of operation shall be issued under this chapter one adult use testing laboratory license for the current location of the testing laboratory. Notwithstanding anything in this section, a license shall not be issued pursuant to division (B) of this section to a license applicant holding only a related medical provisional license unless the medical provisional license holder is issued a certificate of operation within two years of the effective date of this section December 7, 2023. (C) The division of cannabis control shall issue up to forty level III adult use cultivator licenses consistent with this chapter with preference provided to applicants who have been certified as cannabis social equity and jobs program participants under the cannabis social equity and jobs program pursuant to 3780.19 of this chapter. No person may have any ownership or control in more than one level III adult use cultivator license under this chapter. No adult use cultivator or adult use processor may have any ownership or control in a level III adult use cultivator license. (D) The division of cannabis control shall issue up to fifty additional adult use dispensary licenses in conformity with this chapter with preference provided to applicants who have been certified as cannabis social equity and jobs program participants under the cannabis social equity and jobs program. (E) Following twenty-four months from the first date of issuance of an adult use operator license, the division of cannabis control shall review the number of adult use cannabis operator licenses on a biannual basis and may authorize additional licenses after considering: (1) The current and anticipated market growth and consumer demand, including the number of adult use consumers seeking adult use cannabis; (2) The current and projected supply of adult use cannabis produced by licensed adult use cultivators, level III adult use cultivators, and adult use processors; and (3) The geographic distribution of adult use dispensary sites in an effort to ensure adult use customer access to adult use cannabis. (F)(1) The division of cannabis control shall provide a report and recommendation within ninety days of the conclusion of the requirements in division (E) of this section to the director for consideration. (2) The division of cannabis control may adopt rules as necessary to implement this division. (3) The division of cannabis control shall adopt a rule regarding the number of licenses a license holder may hold for each type of license consistent with this chapter. As of the effective date of this section December 7, 2023, and notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no person shall be issued more than eight adult use dispensary licenses, and not more than one adult use cultivator license, and not more than one adult use processor license at any time, unless authorized by the division of cannabis control after an analysis supporting the licensing pursuant to rule. (G) The division of cannabis control may authorize additional adult use testing laboratory licenses at any time. Sec. 3780.22. (A) Terms used in this section have the same meanings as in section 5739.01 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "adult use marijuana" means marijuana that is cultivated, processed, dispensed, or tested for, or possessed or used by, an adult use consumer, in accordance with this chapter. (B) For the purpose of funding the needs of the state and providing funding for dispensary host communities, an excise tax is levied on the retail sale of adult use marijuana. The rate of the tax shall equal ten per cent of the price of adult use marijuana and is in addition to other taxes levied under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code. (C) The tax shall be paid by the consumer to the vendor at the time of the sale, and the vendor shall report and remit the tax to the state in the same manner and at the same time the vendor reports and remits the tax levied under section 5739.02 of the Revised Code. The return required under this division shall be filed on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner, which shall be separate from the return required to be filed under section 5739.12 of the Revised Code. A vendor with no sales of adult use marijuana for a reporting period is not required to file this separate return. For all purposes of the Revised Code, the tax levied under this section shall be considered a tax levied under section 5739.02 of the Revised Code. (D) For the same purpose as the tax levied under division (B) of this section, a tax is levied on a vendor that sells any marijuana other than adult use marijuana or medical marijuana to a consumer. That tax equals ten per cent of the price of such marijuana, and the consumer and vendor are liable for any amounts, including tax, interest, and penalties, imposed under this section and chapter in the same manner as a vendor subject to the tax imposed under division (B) of this section. (E) For the purpose of receiving and distributing, and accounting for, revenue received from the tax levied by this section, and any civil penalty paid under division (B)(4) of section 3780.26 of the Revised Code, the adult use tax fund and host community cannabis fund are created in the state treasury. All moneys collected from that tax and civil penalty shall be deposited into the adult use tax fund, which is created in the state treasury, to be distributed as follows: (1) The director of budget and management shall transfer thirty-six per cent of funds from the adult use tax fund to the host community cannabis fund for the benefit of municipal corporations or townships that have an adult use dispensary, and the municipal corporations or townships may use such funds for any approved purpose. Distributions to municipal corporations or townships shall be based on the percentage of adult use tax attributable to each municipal corporation or township. (2) All other revenue shall be credited to the general revenue fund. Sec. 3780.24. Tax administration and enforcement. The tax commissioner shall administer and enforce sections section 3780.22 through 3780.23 of this chapter the Revised Code. In addition to any other powers conferred upon the tax commissioner by law, the tax commissioner may: (A) Prescribe all forms that are required to be filed under sections section 3780.22 through 3780.23 of this chapter the Revised Code; (B) Adopt rules that are necessary and proper to carry out section 3780.22 through 3780.23 of this chapter the Revised Code; and (C) Appoint professional, technical, and clerical employees as are necessary to carry out the tax commissioner's duties under sections section 3780.22 through 3780.23 of this chapter the Revised Code. Sec. 3780.26. Enforcement authority of the division of cannabis control. (A) The division of cannabis control shall enforce, or cause to be enforced, all sections of this chapter and the rules adopted thereunder. If the division of cannabis control has information that any provision of this chapter or that any rule adopted thereunder has been violated, it may investigate the matter and take any reasonable action as it considers appropriate. (B) The division of cannabis control may do any of the following for any reason specified in rules adopted under section 3780.03 of the Revised Code: (1) Suspend, suspend without prior hearing upon finding clear and convincing evidence that continued distribution of adult use cannabis presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to others, revoke, restrict, or refuse to renew a license it issued under this chapter; (2) Refuse to issue a license unless a license is required in accordance with this chapter; (3) Inspect the premises of an adult use cannabis operator or an adult use testing laboratory without prior notice; or (4) Impose on a provisional license holder or license holder a civil penalty in an amount to be determined by the division of cannabis control through rule to be paid into the division of cannabis control and tax commissioner fundadult use tax fund created under section 3780.22 of the Revised Code. (C) If the division of cannabis control suspends, revokes, or refuses to renew any license issued under this chapter or determines that there is clear and convincing evidence of a danger of immediate and serious harm to any individual, the division of cannabis control may place under seal all adult use cannabis owned by or in the possession, custody, or control of the affected license holder. Except as provided in this section, the division of cannabis control shall not dispose of the adult use cannabis sealed under this section until the license holder exhausts all of the license holder's appeal rights under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The court involved in such an appeal may order the division of cannabis control, during the pendency of the appeal, to sell cannabis that is perishable. The division of cannabis control shall deposit the proceeds of the sale with the court. (D) The division of cannabis control's enforcement actions under this section shall be taken in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (E) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the division of cannabis control to enforce minor violations of this chapter if the division of cannabis control determines that the public interest is adequately served by a notice or warning to the alleged offender. Sec. 3780.30. Cannabis addiction services; toll-free telephone numbers. (A) The division of cannabis control shall enter into an agreement with the department of mental health and addiction services under which the department shall provide a program for cannabis addiction services to be implemented on behalf of the division of cannabis control, which includes best practices for education and treatment for individuals with addiction issues related to cannabis or other controlled substances, including opioids. (B) The department of mental health and addiction services shall establish, operate, and publicize an in-state, toll-free telephone number Ohio residents may call to obtain basic information about addiction services available to consumer consumers, and options for an addicted consumer to obtain help. The telephone number shall be staffed twenty-four hours per day, seven days a week in order to respond to inquiries and provide that information. The costs of establishing, operating, and publicizing the telephone number shall be paid for with money in the substance abuse and addiction fund. (C) The director of mental health and addiction services shall administer the substance abuse and addiction fund. The director shall use the money in the fund to support addiction services or other services that relate to addiction and substance abuse, and research that relates to addiction and substance abuse. Treatment and prevention services supported by money in the fund under this section shall be services that are certified by the department of mental health and addiction services. (D) The director mental health and addiction services shall prepare an annual report describing the use of the fund for these purposes. The director shall submit the report to the director of the department of commerce, the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives, the president and minority leader of the senate, and the governor. (E) License holders shall provide informational resources for patrons related to cannabis addiction issues and services. (F)(E) License holders shall provide training for their employees regarding the cannabis addiction services resources for patrons related to this section. Sec. 3780.37. (A) As used in this section, "nonprofit corporation" has the same meaning as in section 1702.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The division of cannabis control shall contract with a statewide nonprofit corporation for the development and implementation of cannabis and related drug misuse prevention, education, and public awareness initiatives driven by data, evaluation, and research. The contract must include a provision specifying a percentage of the total funding for the initiatives, not less than ten per cent, to be raised by the statewide nonprofit corporation through private contributions. (C) The initiatives may include all of the following: (1) Providing evidence-based information on the potential health effects of cannabis and related drug use among minors; (2) Disseminating educational resources regarding the risks associated with cannabis and related drug use during pregnancy; (3) Conducting campaigns to inform the public about the dangers and legal consequences of driving under the influence of cannabis and related drugs; (4) Collaborating with employers and industry groups to develop and distribute evidence-based resources to improve the health of Ohio's workforce and promote workplace safety and recovery initiatives focused on cannabis and related drug misuse. (D) The division shall oversee and evaluate the effectiveness of the initiatives undertaken pursuant to this section and shall ensure that those initiatives align with the public health and safety objectives of this state. (E) The division shall annually compile a report detailing activities, use of funds, and measurable outcomes resulting from the initiatives undertaken pursuant to this section. The division shall submit the report to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3781.10. (A)(1) The board of building standards shall formulate and adopt rules governing the erection, construction, repair, alteration, and maintenance of all buildings or classes of buildings specified in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code, including land area incidental to those buildings, the construction of industrialized units, the installation of equipment, and the standards or requirements for materials used in connection with those buildings. The board shall incorporate those rules into separate residential and nonresidential building codes. The standards shall relate to the conservation of energy and the safety and sanitation of those buildings. (2)(2)(a) The rules governing nonresidential buildings are the lawful minimum requirements specified for those buildings and industrialized units, except that no rule other than as provided in division (C) of section 3781.108 of the Revised Code that specifies a higher requirement than is imposed by any section of the Revised Code is enforceable. (b) The rules governing residential buildings are uniform requirements for residential buildings in any area with a building department certified to enforce the state residential building code in accordance with division (E) of this section, for both of the following: (i) The erection and construction of new residential buildings; (ii) The repair and alteration of existing residential buildings. (c) In no case shall any local code or regulation differ from the state residential building code for either the erection and construction of new residential buildings or for the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings unless that code or regulation addresses subject matter not addressed by the state residential building code or is adopted pursuant to section 3781.01 of the Revised Code. (3) The rules adopted pursuant to this section are complete, lawful alternatives to any requirements specified for buildings or industrialized units in any section of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in division (I) of this section, the board shall, on its own motion or on application made under sections 3781.12 and 3781.13 of the Revised Code, formulate, propose, adopt, modify, amend, or repeal the rules to the extent necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes of sections 3781.06 to 3781.18 of the Revised Code. (B) The board shall report to the general assembly proposals for amendments to existing statutes relating to the purposes declared in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code that public health and safety and the development of the arts require and shall recommend any additional legislation to assist in carrying out fully, in statutory form, the purposes declared in that section. The board shall prepare and submit to the general assembly a summary report of the number, nature, and disposition of the petitions filed under sections 3781.13 and 3781.14 of the Revised Code. (C) On its own motion or on application made under sections 3781.12 and 3781.13 of the Revised Code, and after thorough testing and evaluation, the board shall determine by rule that any particular fixture, device, material, process of manufacture, manufactured unit or component, method of manufacture, system, or method of construction complies with performance standards adopted pursuant to section 3781.11 of the Revised Code. The board shall make its determination with regard to adaptability for safe and sanitary erection, use, or construction, to that described in any section of the Revised Code, wherever the use of a fixture, device, material, method of manufacture, system, or method of construction described in that section of the Revised Code is permitted by law. The board shall amend or annul any rule or issue an authorization for the use of a new material or manufactured unit on any like application. No department, officer, board, or commission of the state other than the board of building standards or the board of building appeals shall permit the use of any fixture, device, material, method of manufacture, newly designed product, system, or method of construction at variance with what is described in any rule the board of building standards adopts or issues or that is authorized by any section of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring approval, by rule, of plans for an industrialized unit that conforms with the rules the board of building standards adopts pursuant to section 3781.11 of the Revised Code. (D) The board shall recommend rules, codes, and standards to help carry out the purposes of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code and to help secure uniformity of state administrative rulings and local legislation and administrative action to the bureau of workers' compensation, the director of commerce, any other department, officer, board, or commission of the state, and to legislative authorities and building departments of counties, townships, and municipal corporations, and shall recommend that they audit those recommended rules, codes, and standards by any appropriate action that they are allowed pursuant to law or the constitution. (E)(1) The board shall certify municipal, township, and county building departments, the personnel of those building departments, persons described in division (E)(7) of this section, and employees of individuals, firms, the state, or corporations described in division (E)(7) of this section to exercise enforcement authority, to accept and approve plans and specifications, and to make inspections, pursuant to sections 3781.03, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code. (2) The board shall certify departments, personnel, and persons to enforce the state residential building code for the erection and construction of new residential buildings, to enforce the nonresidential building code, or to enforce both the residential and the nonresidential building codes. A department certified to enforce the state residential building code for the erection and construction of new residential buildings may also enforce the state residential building code for the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings upon obtaining the appropriate certification from the board, in accordance with this section, for the department and its personnel. Any department, personnel, or person may enforce only the type of building code for which certified. (3) The board shall not require a building department, its personnel, or any persons that it employs to be certified for residential building code enforcement if that building department does not enforce the state residential building code. The board shall specify, in rules adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the requirements for certification for residential and nonresidential building code enforcement, which shall be consistent with this division. The requirements for residential and nonresidential certification may differ. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the requirements shall include, but are not limited to, the satisfactory completion of an initial examination and, to remain certified, the completion of a specified number of hours of continuing building code education within each three-year period following the date of certification which shall be not less than thirty hours. The rules shall provide that continuing education credits and certification issued by the council of American building officials, national model code organizations, and agencies or entities the board recognizes are acceptable for purposes of this division. The rules shall specify requirements that are consistent with the provisions of section 5903.12 of the Revised Code relating to active duty military service and are compatible, to the extent possible, with requirements the council of American building officials and national model code organizations establish. (4) The board shall establish and collect a certification and renewal fee for building department personnel, and persons and employees of persons, firms, or corporations as described in this section, who are certified pursuant to this division. (5) Any individual certified pursuant to this division shall complete the number of hours of continuing building code education that the board requires or, for failure to do so, forfeit certification. (6) This division does not require or authorize the board to certify personnel of municipal, township, and county building departments, and persons and employees of persons, firms, or corporations as described in this section, whose responsibilities do not include the exercise of enforcement authority, the approval of plans and specifications, or making inspections under the state residential and nonresidential building codes. (7) Enforcement authority for approval of plans and specifications and enforcement authority for inspections may be exercised, and plans and specifications may be approved and inspections may be made on behalf of a municipal corporation, township, or county, by any of the following who the board of building standards certifies: (a) Officers or employees of the municipal corporation, township, or county; (b) Persons, or employees of persons, firms, or corporations, pursuant to a contract to furnish architectural, engineering, or other services to the municipal corporation, township, or county; (c) Officers or employees of, and persons under contract with, a municipal corporation, township, county, health district, or other political subdivision, pursuant to a contract to furnish architectural, engineering, or other services; (d) Officers or employees of the division of industrial compliance in the department of commerce pursuant to a contract authorized by division (B) of section 121.083 of the Revised Code. (8) Municipal, township, and county building departments have jurisdiction within the meaning of sections 3781.03, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code, only with respect to the types of buildings and subject matters for which they are certified under this section. (9) A certified municipal, township, or county building department may exercise enforcement authority, accept and approve plans and specifications, and make inspections pursuant to sections 3781.03, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code for a park district created pursuant to Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code upon the approval, by resolution, of the board of park commissioners of the park district requesting the department to exercise that authority and conduct those activities, as applicable. (10) Certification shall be granted upon application by the municipal corporation, the board of township trustees, or the board of county commissioners and approval of that application by the board of building standards. The application shall set forth: (a) Whether the certification is requested for residential or nonresidential buildings, or both; (b) If the certification is requested for residential buildings, whether the requested certification is for only the erection and construction of new residential buildings or also the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings; (c) The number and qualifications of the staff composing the building department; (c)(d) The names, addresses, and qualifications of persons, firms, or corporations contracting to furnish work or services pursuant to division (E)(7)(b) of this section; (d)(e) The names of any other municipal corporation, township, county, health district, or political subdivision under contract to furnish work or services pursuant to division (E)(7) of this section; (e)(f) The proposed budget for the operation of the building department; (g) Whether the building department intends to accept plans examination and inspection reports from a third-party examiner or inspector in accordance with rules adopted by the board of building standards pursuant to division (E)(15) of this section. (11) The board of building standards shall adopt rules governing all of the following: (a) The certification of building department personnel and persons and employees of persons, firms, or corporations exercising authority pursuant to division (E)(7) of this section. The rules shall disqualify any employee of the department or person who contracts for services with the department from performing services for the department when that employee or person would have to pass upon, inspect, or otherwise exercise authority over any labor, material, or equipment the employee or person furnishes for the construction, alteration, or maintenance of a building or the preparation of working drawings or specifications for work within the jurisdictional area of the department. The department shall provide other similarly qualified personnel to enforce the residential and nonresidential building codes as they pertain to that work. (b) The minimum services to be provided by a certified building department. (12) The board of building standards may revoke or suspend certification to enforce the residential and nonresidential building codes, on petition to the board by any person affected by that enforcement or approval of plans, or by the board on its own motion. Hearings shall be held and appeals permitted on any proceedings for certification or revocation or suspension of certification in the same manner as provided in section 3781.101 of the Revised Code for other proceedings of the board of building standards. (13) Upon certification, and until that authority is revoked, any county or township building department shall enforce the residential and nonresidential building codes for which it is certified without regard to limitation upon the authority of boards of county commissioners under Chapter 307. of the Revised Code or boards of township trustees under Chapter 505. of the Revised Code. (14) The board shall certify a person to exercise enforcement authority, to accept and approve plans and specifications, or to make inspections in this state in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code if either of the following applies: (a) The person holds a license or certificate in another state. (b) The person has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter in the same profession, occupation, or occupational activity as the profession, occupation, or occupational activity for which the certificate is required in this state in a state that does not issue that license or certificate. (15)(a) In addition to the personnel and persons certified by the board of building standards pursuant to this section to enforce the state residential building code and nonresidential building code, the board may adopt rules authorizing certified municipal, township, and county building departments to accept plans examination and inspection reports from a third-party examiner or inspector. (b) The rules may require the third-party examiner or inspector be certified pursuant to sections 3781.10 and 3783.03 of the Revised Code and authorized to conduct such plans examination or inspection elsewhere in this state or to demonstrate equivalent competency as specified and determined by the board of building standards. (c) Fees charged by a third-party examiner or inspector are in addition to any fees prescribed by the political subdivision pursuant to section 3781.102 of the Revised Code and are the responsibility of the building owner. (d) The issuance of certificates of plan approval under section 3791.04 of the Revised Code and certificates of occupancy or completion remains the exclusive authority of the certified personnel employed by or under contract with a certified municipal, township, and county building department and shall not be issued by a third-party examiner or inspector. (F) In addition to hearings sections 3781.06 to 3781.18 and 3791.04 of the Revised Code require, the board of building standards shall make investigations and tests, and require from other state departments, officers, boards, and commissions information the board considers necessary or desirable to assist it in the discharge of any duty or the exercise of any power mentioned in this section or in sections 3781.06 to 3781.18, 3791.04, and 4104.43 of the Revised Code. (G) The board shall adopt rules and establish reasonable fees for the review of all applications submitted where the applicant applies for authority to use a new material, assembly, or product of a manufacturing process. The fee shall bear some reasonable relationship to the cost of the review or testing of the materials, assembly, or products and for the notification of approval or disapproval as provided in section 3781.12 of the Revised Code. (H) The residential construction advisory committee shall provide the board with a proposal for a state residential building code that the committee recommends pursuant to division (D)(1) of section 4740.14 of the Revised Code. Upon receiving a recommendation from the committee that is acceptable to the board, the board shall adopt rules establishing that code as the state residential building code. (I)(1) The committee may provide the board with proposed rules to update or amend the state residential building code that the committee recommends pursuant to division (E) of section 4740.14 of the Revised Code. (2) If the board receives a proposed rule to update or amend the state residential building code as provided in division (I)(1) of this section, the board either may accept or reject the proposed rule for incorporation into the residential building code. If the board does not act to either accept or reject the proposed rule within ninety days after receiving the proposed rule from the committee as described in division (I)(1) of this section, the proposed rule shall become part of the residential building code. (J) The board shall cooperate with the director of children and youth when the director promulgates rules pursuant to section 5104.05 of the Revised Code regarding safety and sanitation in type A family child care homes. (K) The board shall adopt rules to implement the requirements of section 3781.108 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3781.102. (A) Any county or municipal building department certified pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code as of September 14, 1970, and that, as of that date, was inspecting single-family, two-family, and three-family residences, and any township building department certified pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code, is hereby declared to be certified to inspect single-family, two-family, and three-family residences containing industrialized units, and shall inspect the buildings or classes of buildings subject to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code. (B) Each board of county commissioners may adopt, by resolution, rules establishing standards and providing for the licensing of electrical and heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractors who are not required to hold a valid and unexpired license pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code. Rules adopted by a board of county commissioners pursuant to this division may be enforced within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation where the legislative authority of the municipal corporation has contracted with the board for the enforcement of the county rules within the municipal corporation pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code. The rules shall not conflict with rules adopted by the board of building standards pursuant to section 3781.10 of the Revised Code or by the department of commerce pursuant to Chapter 3703. of the Revised Code. This division does not impair or restrict the power of municipal corporations under Section 3 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, to adopt rules concerning the erection, construction, repair, alteration, and maintenance of buildings and structures or of establishing standards and providing for the licensing of specialty contractors pursuant to section 715.27 of the Revised Code. A board of county commissioners, pursuant to this division, may require all electrical contractors and heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractors, other than those who hold a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code, to successfully complete an examination, test, or demonstration of technical skills, and may impose a fee and additional requirements for a license to engage in their respective occupations within the jurisdiction of the board's rules under this division. (C) No board of county commissioners shall require any specialty contractor who holds a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code to successfully complete an examination, test, or demonstration of technical skills in order to engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held, within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation whose legislative authority has contracted with the board for the enforcement of county regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code. (D) A board may impose a fee for registration of a specialty contractor who holds a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code before that specialty contractor may engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation whose legislative authority has contracted with the board for the enforcement of county regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code, provided that the fee is the same for all specialty contractors who wish to engage in that type of contracting. If a board imposes such a fee, the board immediately shall permit a specialty contractor who presents proof of holding a valid and unexpired license and pays the required fee to engage in the type of contracting for which the license is held within the unincorporated areas of the county and within any municipal corporation whose legislative authority has contracted with the board for the enforcement of county regulations within the municipal corporation, pursuant to section 307.15 of the Revised Code. (E) The political subdivision associated with each municipal, township, and county building department the board of building standards certifies pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code may prescribe fees to be paid by persons, political subdivisions, or any department, agency, board, commission, or institution of the state, for the acceptance and approval of plans and specifications, and for the making of inspections, pursuant to sections 3781.03 and 3791.04 of the Revised Code. (F) Each political subdivision that prescribes fees pursuant to division (E) of this section shall collect, on behalf of the board of building standards, fees equal to the following: (1) Three per cent of the fees the political subdivision collects in connection with nonresidential buildings; (2) One per cent of the fees the political subdivision collects in connection with the erection of and construction of new residential buildings and, if the political subdivision elects under division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code to enforce the state residential building code for the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings, one per cent of the fees the political subdivision collects in connection with the repair and alteration of existing residential buildings. (G)(1) The board shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, specifying the manner in which the fee assessed pursuant to division (F) of this section shall be collected and remitted monthly to the board. The board shall pay the fees into the state treasury to the credit of the industrial compliance operating fund created in section 121.084 of the Revised Code. (2) All money credited to the industrial compliance operating fund under this division shall be used exclusively for the following: (a) Operating costs of the board; (b) Providing services, including educational programs, for the building departments that are certified by the board pursuant to division (E) of section 3781.10 of the Revised Code; (c) Paying the expenses of the residential construction advisory committee, including the expenses of committee members as provided in section 4740.14 of the Revised Code. (H) A board of county commissioners that adopts rules providing for the licensing of electrical and heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractors, pursuant to division (B) of this section, may accept, for purposes of satisfying the requirements of rules adopted under that division, a valid and unexpired license issued pursuant to Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code that is held by an electrical or heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, for the construction, replacement, maintenance, or repair of one-family, two-family, or three-family dwelling houses or accessory structures incidental to those dwelling houses. (I) A board of county commissioners shall not register a specialty contractor who is required to hold a license under Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code but does not hold a valid license issued under that chapter. (J) If a board of county commissioners regulates a profession, occupation, or occupational activity under this section, the board shall comply with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code. (K) As used in this section, "specialty contractor" means a heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, refrigeration contractor, electrical contractor, plumbing contractor, or hydronics contractor, as those contractors are described in Chapter 4740. of the Revised Code. Sec. 3781.1011. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Alarm system" means a device or system that transmits a signal intended to summon law enforcement to a county, township, or municipal corporation in response to an alleged violation of an offense under Chapter 2911. of the Revised Code occurring in a nonresidential zone of the applicable county, township, or municipal corporation. The term includes an alarm that emits an audible signal on the exterior of a structure. The term does not include an alarm installed on a vehicle or an alarm designed to alert only the inhabitants within the premises. The term includes an alarm system for which a permit may be issued under any applicable section of the Revised Code or Ohio Constitution. (2) "Battery-charged fence" means a fence connected to system, including integrated components or equipment, that satisfies all of the following: (a) Functions with a battery-operated energizer that is intended to periodically to deliver voltage impulses to the fence, system with an impulse repetition rate that does not exceed one hertz and an impulse duration that does not exceed ten milliseconds; (b) Exclusively uses a battery charging device used exclusively to charge the battery, and any other ancillary components or equipment attached to such a system; (c) Interfaces with a monitored alarm system; (d) Has a battery-operated energizer that is powered by a commercial storage battery that is not more than twelve volts of direct current; (e) Is four to twelve inches behind a non-battery-charged perimeter fence, wall, or structure that is not less than five feet in height; (f) Is ten feet in height, or two feet higher than the height of the non-battery-charged perimeter fence, wall, or structure, whichever is higher; (g) Is marked with conspicuous warning signs that are located on the battery-charged fence at not more than thirty-foot intervals and that read: "WARNING—SHOCK HAZARD" or a similar warning message. (3) "Permit" means a certificate, license, permit, or other form of permission that authorizes a person to engage in an action. (B) A Subject to division (D) of this section, a person may install, operate, and use a battery-charged fence installed on private, nonresidential property within a county, township, or municipal corporation shall satisfy all of the following: (1) Interface with a monitored alarm system; (2) Have a battery-operated energizer that is powered by a commercial storage battery that is not more than twelve volts of direct current, and that meets the standards set forth by the international electrotechnical commission 60335-02-76 current edition; (3) Be completely surrounded by a nonelectric perimeter fence or wall that is not less than five feet in height; (4) Be not more than the higher of ten feet in height, or two feet higher than the height of the nonelectric perimeter fence or wall; and (5) Be marked with conspicuous warning signs that are located on the battery-charged fence at not more than forty-foot intervals and that read: "WARNING--ELECTRIC FENCE." (C) Division (B) of this section does not apply to any of the following fences, regardless of whether such fences are battery-charged fences under division (A)(2) of this section: (1) Fences that are required to be constructed by persons or corporations owning, controlling, or managing a railroad pursuant to Chapter 4959. of the Revised Code; (2) Partition fences constructed in accordance with Chapter 971. of the Revised Code; (3) Fences constructed or installed by the state or a political subdivision, or by the federal government; (4) Fences installed at a facility that is an accredited member of the association of zoos and aquariums or the zoological association of America and that is licensed by the United States department of agriculture under the federal animal welfare act; (5) Fences installed at a wildlife sanctuary; (6) Fences constructed and used for agricultural purposes, as agriculture is defined in either section 303.01 or 519.01 of the Revised Code. (D) Notwithstanding any other section of the Revised Code, a A county, township, or municipal corporation may adopt and enforce an ordinance, order, resolution, or regulation that does any of the following: (1) Imposes installation or , operational, or use requirements for battery-charged fences in nonresidential properties that are do not in conflict with the requirements and standards set forth in expressly, implicitly, or functionally prohibit the installation, operation, or use of such fences, as authorized under division (B) of this section; (2) Requires a permit or fee for the installation, operation, or use of a battery-charged fence to which this section applies in accordance with a permit or fee for an alarm system issued or charged by the county, township, or municipal corporation; (3) Prohibits Completely prohibits or imposes generally applicable requirements on the installation, operation, or use of a battery-charged fence non-battery-charged perimeter fence, wall, or structure or any system that does not constitute a battery-charged fence under division (A)(2) of this section in a nonresidential zone that does not meet the requirements and standards set forth in division (B) of this section. Sec. 3901.047. (A) Regarding individuals with end-stage renal disease in this state, the superintendent of insurance shall do all of the following: (1) Evaluate medicare application requirements and review state policies and procedures related to patients who are sixty-five years of age or younger that have end-stage renal disease; (2) Review and identify whether there exist medicare eligibility gaps for individuals with end-stage renal disease; (3) Take steps to address any eligibility gaps identified under division (A)(2) of this section to improve patient access to medicare benefits; (4) Develop a process to assist patients with end-stage renal disease apply for medicare benefits. (B) Not later than September 1, 2026, the department of insurance shall prepare and submit a report to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall detail the review conducted in accordance with division (A) of this section, including the feasibility of developing a process to assist patients with end-stage renal disease apply for medicare benefits. If the superintendent determines assisting patients to apply for medicare benefits is not feasible, the report shall include the results of the superintendent's finding and the steps the superintendent took to reach its conclusion. Sec. 3901.3815. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Health plan issuer" has the same meaning as in section 3922.01 of the Revised Code, except that the term also includes any vendor contracted by a health plan issuer, as defined in that section. (2) "Health care provider" has the same meaning as in section 3701.74 of the Revised Code. (3) "Credit card" means a single-use or virtual payment card provided in an electronic, digital, facsimile, physical, or paper format. (4) "Business day" has the same meaning as in section 3901.81 of the Revised Code. (B) A health plan issuer shall offer all reasonably available methods of payment to a health care provider, which shall include payment by check and electronic funds transfer. A health plan issuer shall not charge a health care provider a fee for delivering payment by check or electronic funds transfer, either directly or indirectly through an agent, affiliate, or third party contracted by the health plan issuer in connection with the method of payment. (C) A health plan issuer that offers payment by credit card shall provide a process by which a health care provider may opt out of that method of payment and select another method of payment. (D) If a health plan issuer or an agent, affiliate, or third party contracted by a health plan issuer in connection with one of the available payment methods, other than payment by check or electronic funds transfer, charges a fee, the health plan issuer shall, prior to initiating the first payment to a health care provider or upon changing the payment methods available to a health care provider, do both of the following: (1) Notify the provider about potential fees associated with a particular payment method, disclose any charges by the health plan issuer, and advise the provider to contact the provider's financial institution, credit card issuer, or payment processor for information about other fees that may apply; (2) Provide the health care provider with clear instructions as to how to select each payment method either on the health plan issuer's web site or through a means other than the contract offered to the health care provider. (E)(1) If a health care provider requests a change in the available payment method, the health plan issuer shall implement the change to the payment method selected by the health care provider within thirty-one business days. (2) The payment method selected by the health care provider shall remain in effect until either the health care provider requests a different payment method or the health plan issuer has not generated a payment to the provider for more than one year. (3) The health plan issuer shall not charge a fee for a change in payment method. Sec. 3901.90. The superintendent of insurance, in consultation with the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, shall develop consumer and payer education on mental health and addiction services insurance parity and establish and promote a consumer hotline to collect information and help consumers understand and access their insurance benefits. The department of insurance and the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall jointly report annually on the department's efforts, which shall include information on consumer and payer outreach activities and identification of trends and barriers to access and coverage in this state. The departments shall submit the report to the general assembly, the joint medicaid oversight committeelegislative service commission, and the governor, not later than the thirtieth day of January of each year. Sec. 3902.631. (A) A health benefit plan issued, amended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this section that provides coverage for a health service that a certified registered nurse anesthetist is authorized to perform pursuant to section 4723.43 of the Revised Code shall not differentiate in the reimbursement rate for such a service based on whether the service was provided by a certified registered nurse anesthetist or by a physician licensed under under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code. (B) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a health benefit plan from establishing variable reimbursement rates based on quality or performance measures. Sec. 3902.70. As used in this section and section 3902.71 of the Revised Code: (A) "340B covered entity" and "third-party administrator" have the same meanings as in section 5167.01 of the Revised Codemeans an entity described in section 340B(a)(4) of the "Public Health Service Act," 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4) and includes any pharmacy under contract with the entity to dispense drugs on behalf of the entity. (B) "Terminal distributor of dangerous drugs" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Third-party administrator" has the same meaning as in section 5167.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3905.426. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Contract holder" means the person who purchased a motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract, any authorized transferee or assignee of the purchaser, or any other person assuming the purchaser's rights under the motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract. (2) "Finance agreement" means a loan or retail installment contract secured by a motor vehicle or a lease contract for the use of a motor vehicle. (2) (3) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code and also includes utility vehicles and under-speed vehicles as defined in that section. (3)(a) (4)(a) "Motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract" means a contract or agreement that is effective for a specified duration and paid for by means other than the purchase of a motor vehicle, or its parts or equipment, to perform any one or more of the following services: (i) Repair or replacement of glass on a motor vehicle necessitated by wear and tear or damage caused by a road hazard; (ii) Removal of a dent, ding, or crease without affecting the existing paint finish using paintless dent removal techniques but which expressly excludes replacement of vehicle body panels, sanding, bonding, or painting; (iii) Repair to the interior components of a motor vehicle necessitated by wear and tear but which expressly excludes replacement of any part or component of a motor vehicle's interior; (iv) Repair or replacement of tires or wheels damaged because of a road hazard; (v) Replacement of a lost, stolen, or inoperable key or key fob; (vi) In conjunction with a motor vehicle leased for use, the repair, replacement, or maintenance of property, or indemnification for repair, replacement, or maintenance, due to excess wear and use, damage for items such as tires, paint cracks or chips, missing interior or exterior parts, or excess mileage that results in a lease-end charge, or any other charge for damage that is deemed as excess wear and use by a lessor under a motor vehicle lease, provided any such charge shall not exceed the purchase price of the vehicle at the end of the lease term; (vii) Provide a benefit under a vehicle value protection agreement. (b) A motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract may, but is not required to, provide for incidental payment of indemnity under limited circumstances, including, without limitation, towing, rental, and emergency road services. (c) "Motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract" does not include any of the following: (i) A motor vehicle service contract; (ii) A vehicle protection product warranty as defined in section 3905.421 of the Revised Code; (iii) A home service contract as defined in section 3905.422 of the Revised Code; (iv) A consumer goods service contract as defined in section 3905.423 of the Revised Code; (v) A contract for prepaid routine, scheduled maintenance only. (4) (5) "Motor vehicle service contract" means a contract or agreement to perform or pay for the repair, replacement, or maintenance of a motor vehicle due to defect in materials or workmanship, normal wear and tear, mechanical or electrical breakdown, or failure of parts or equipment of a motor vehicle, with or without additional provisions for incidental payment of indemnity under limited circumstances, including, without limitation, towing, rental, and emergency road services, that is effective for a specified duration and paid for by means other than the purchase of a motor vehicle. (5) (6) "Provider" means a person who is contractually obligated to a contract holder under the terms of a motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract. (6) (7) "Road hazard" means a condition that may cause damage or wear and tear to a tire or wheel on a public or private roadway, roadside, driveway, or parking lot or garage, including potholes, nails, glass, road debris, and curbs. "Road hazard" does not include fire, theft, vandalism or malicious mischief, or other perils normally covered by automobile physical damage insurance. (7) (8) "Reimbursement insurance policy" means a policy of insurance issued by an insurer authorized or eligible to do business in this state to a provider to pay, on behalf of the provider in the event of the provider's nonperformance, all covered contractual obligations incurred by the provider under the terms and conditions of the motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract. (8) (9) "Supplier" has the same meaning as in section 1345.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Vehicle value protection agreement" includes a contractual agreement that provides a benefit towards either the reduction of some or all of the contract holder's current finance agreement deficiency balance, or towards the purchase or lease of a replacement motor vehicle or motor vehicle services, upon the occurrence of an adverse event to the motor vehicle, including loss, theft, damage, obsolescence, diminished value, or depreciation. "Vehicle value protection agreement" includes trade-in-credit agreements, diminished value agreements, depreciation benefit agreements, or other similar agreements. "Vehicle value protection agreement" does not include a debt suspension or debt cancellation product. (B) All motor vehicle ancillary product protection contracts issued in this state shall be covered by a reimbursement insurance policy. (C) A motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract issued by a provider that is required to be covered by a reimbursement insurance policy under division (B) of this section shall conspicuously state all of the following: (1) "This contract is not insurance and is not subject to the insurance laws of this state." (2) That the obligations of the provider are guaranteed under a reimbursement insurance policy; (3) That if a provider fails to perform or make payment due under the terms of the contract within sixty days after the contract holder requests performance or payment pursuant to the terms of the contract, the contract holder may request performance or payment directly from the provider's reimbursement insurance policy insurer, including any obligation in the contract by which the provider must refund the contract holder upon cancellation of a contract; (4) The name, address, and telephone number of the provider's reimbursement insurance policy insurer. (D) A motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract that includes repair or replacement of glass on a motor vehicle as provided in division (A)(3)(a)(i) (A)(4)(a)(i) of this section, shall conspicuously state: "This contract may provide a duplication of coverage already provided by your automobile physical damage insurance policy." (E) A vehicle value protection agreement may be canceled by the contract holder within thirty days of the effective date of the agreement, and the contract holder shall be entitled to a full refund of the purchase price paid by the contract holder, if any, so long as no benefits have been provided under the contract. (F) A vehicle value protection agreement that, under the terms of the agreement, may be canceled by the contract holder more than thirty days after the effective date of the agreement must state the conditions under which it may be canceled, including the procedures for requesting any refund of the purchase price paid by the contract holder and the methodology for calculating any refund of the purchase price. (G) The contract provider of the vehicle value protection agreement shall mail a written notice to the contract holder at the last known address of the contract holder contained in the records of the contract provider at least five days prior to cancellation by the contract provider. Prior notice is not required if the reason for cancellation is nonpayment of the provider fee, a material misrepresentation by the contract holder to the contract provider or administrator, or a substantial breach of duties by the contract holder relating to the covered product or the use of the covered product. The notice shall state the effective date of the cancellation and the reason for the cancellation. If a vehicle value protection agreement is canceled by the contract provider for a reason other than nonpayment of the provider fee, the provider shall refund to the contract holder one hundred per cent of the unearned provider fee paid by the contract holder, if any. If coverage under the vehicle value protection agreement continues after a claim, then all claims paid may be deducted from any refund required by this division. A reasonable administrative fee of up to seventy-five dollars may be charged by the contract provider and deducted from any refund due under this division or division (F) of this section. (H) Any refund under divisions (E) and (F) of this section shall be paid to the seller or assignee of a retail installment contract or lease agreement unless otherwise agreed to by the contract holder and the seller or assignee. (I) A reimbursement insurance policy that is required to be issued under this section shall contain: (1) A statement that if a provider fails to perform or make payment due under the terms of the motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract within sixty days after the contract holder requests performance or payment pursuant to the terms of the contract, the contract holder may request performance or payment directly from the provider's reimbursement insurance policy insurer, including any obligation in the contract by which the provider must refund the contract holder upon cancellation of a contract. (2) A statement that in the event of cancellation of the provider's reimbursement insurance policy, insurance coverage will continue for all contract holders whose motor vehicle ancillary product protection contracts were issued by the provider and reported to the insurer for coverage during the term of the reimbursement insurance policy. (F) (J) The sale or issuance of a motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract is a consumer transaction for purposes of sections 1345.01 to 1345.13 of the Revised Code. The provider is the supplier and the contract holder is the consumer for purposes of those sections. (G) (K) Unless issued by an insurer authorized or eligible to do business in this state, a motor vehicle ancillary product protection contract does not constitute a contract substantially amounting to insurance, or the contract's issuance the business of insurance, under section 3905.42 of the Revised Code. (H) (L) Unless issued by an insurer authorized or eligible to do business in this state, a contract identified in division (A)(3)(c)(i) (A)(4)(c)(i) or (v) of this section does not constitute a contract substantially amounting to insurance, or the contract's issuance the business of insurance, under section 3905.42 of the Revised Code. (I) (M) The rights of a contract holder against a provider's reimbursement insurance policy insurer as provided in this section apply only in regard to a reimbursement insurance policy issued under this section. This section does not create any contractual rights in favor of a person that does not qualify as an insured under any other type of insurance policy described in Title XXXIX of the Revised Code. This section does not prohibit the insurer of a provider's reimbursement insurance policy from assuming liability for contracts issued prior to the effective date of the policy or July 1, 2009. (J) (N) A contract or agreement described in division (A)(3)(a)(iv)(A)(4)(a)(iv) of this section in which the provider is a tire manufacturer shall be exempt from the requirements of division (B) of this section if the contract or agreement conspicuously states all of the following: (1) That the contract or agreement is not an insurance contract; (2) That any covered obligations or claims under the contract or agreement are the responsibility of the provider; (3) The name, address, and telephone number of any administrator responsible for the administration of the contract or agreement, the provider obligated to perform under the contract or agreement, and the contract seller; (4) The procedure for making a claim under the contract or agreement, including a toll-free telephone number for claims service and a procedure for obtaining emergency repairs or replacements performed outside normal business hours. Sec. 3905.72. (A)(1) No person shall act as a managing general agent representing an insurer licensed in this state with respect to risks located in this state unless the person is licensed as a managing general agent pursuant to division (C) or (D) of this section. (2) No person shall act as a managing general agent representing an insurer organized under the laws of this state with respect to risks located outside this state unless the person is licensed as a managing general agent pursuant to division (C) of this section. (B) Every person that seeks to act as a managing general agent as described in division (A) of this section shall apply to the superintendent of insurance for a license. Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this section, the application shall be in writing on a form provided by the superintendent and shall be sworn or affirmed before a notary public or other person empowered to administer oaths. The application shall be kept on file by the superintendent and shall include all of the following: (1) The name and principal business address of the applicant; (2) If the applicant is an individual, the applicant's current occupation; (3) If the applicant is an individual, the applicant's occupation or occupations during the five-year period prior to applying for the license to act as a managing general agent; (4) A copy of the contract between the applicant and the insurer as required by, and in compliance with, section 3905.73 of the Revised Code; (5) A copy of a certified resolution of the board of directors of the insurer on whose behalf the applicant will act, appointing the applicant as a managing general agent and agent of the insurer, specifying the duties the applicant is expected to perform on behalf of the insurer and the lines of insurance the applicant will manage, and authorizing the insurer to enter into a contract with the applicant as required by section 3905.73 of the Revised Code; (6) A statement that the applicant submits to the jurisdiction of the superintendent and the courts of this state; (7) Any other information required by the superintendent. (C) The superintendent shall issue to a resident of this state or a business entity organized under the laws of this state a license to act as a managing general agent representing an insurer licensed to do business in this state with respect to risks located in this state or a license to act as a managing general agent representing an insurer organized under the laws of this state with respect to risks located outside this state, and shall renew such a license, if the superintendent is satisfied that all of the following conditions are met: (1) The applicant is a suitable person and intends to hold self out in good faith as a managing general agent. (2) The applicant understands the duties and obligations of a managing general agent. (3) The applicant has filed a completed application that complies with division (B) of this section. (4) The applicant has paid a fee in the amount of twenty dollars. (5) The applicant maintains a bond in the amount of not less than fifty thousand dollars for the protection of the insurer. (6) The applicant maintains an errors and omissions policy of insurance. (7) The applicant is not, and has never been, under an order of suspension or revocation under section 3905.77 of the Revised Code or under any other law of this state, or any other state, relating to insurance, and is otherwise in compliance with sections 3905.71 to 3905.79 of the Revised Code and all other laws of this state relating to insurance. (D) If the applicant is a resident of another state or a business entity organized under the laws of another state, the applicant shall submit a request for licensure, along with a fee of twenty dollars, to the superintendent. The superintendent shall issue a license to act as a managing general agent if the request for licensure includes proof that the applicant is licensed and in good standing as a managing general agent in the applicant's home state and either a copy of the application for licensure the applicant submitted to the applicant's home state or the application described in division (B) of this section. If the applicant's home state does not license managing general agents under provisions similar to those in sections 3905.71 to 3905.79 of the Revised Code, or if the applicant's home state does not grant licenses to residents of this state on the same reciprocal basis, the applicant shall comply with divisions (B) and (C) of this section. (E) Unless suspended or revoked by an order of the superintendent pursuant to section 3905.77 of the Revised Code and except as provided in division (F) of this section, any license issued or renewed pursuant to division (C) or (D) of this section shall expire on the last day of February next after its issuance or renewal. (F) If the appointment of a managing general agent is terminated by the insurer, the license of the managing general agent shall expire on the date of the termination. (G) A license shall be renewed in accordance with the standard renewal procedure specified in Chapter 4745. of the Revised Code. (H) All license fees collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the department of insurance operating fund. Sec. 3923.443. (A)(1) No agent shall sell, solicit, or negotiate long-term care insurance on or after September 1, 2008, without first completing an initial eight-hour partnership program training course as described in division (B) of this section. (2)(a) Any agent that sells, solicits, or negotiates any long-term care insurance shall complete at least four hours of continuing education in every twenty-four-month period commencing on the first day of January of the year immediately following the year of the issuance of the agent's licenselicense renewal period beginning with the first license renewal period following the agent's completion of the partnership training course described in division (A)(1) of this section. (b) No An agent shall fail who fails to complete the continuing education requirements in division (A)(2)(a) of this section in the twenty-four-month period described in that divisionbefore the end of a license renewal period shall not sell, solicit, or negotiate long-term care insurance until such requirements have been met. (B) The initial training course and continuing education required under division (A) of this section may be approved by the superintendent of insurance as continuing education courses under sections 3905.481 to 3905.486 of the Revised Code and shall consist of combined topics related to long-term care insurance, long-term care services, and state long-term care insurance partnership programs, including all of the following: (1) State and federal regulations and requirements and the relationship between state long-term care insurance partnership programs and other public and private coverage of long-term care services, including medicaid; (2) Available long-term care services and providers; (3) Changes or improvements in long-term care services or providers; (4) Alternatives to the purchase of private long-term care insurance; (5) The effect of inflation on benefits and the importance of inflation protection; (6) Consumer suitability standards and guidelines; (7) Any other topics required by the superintendent. (C) The initial training and continuing education required by division (A) of this section shall not include training that is specific to a particular insurer or company product or that includes any sales or marketing information, materials, or training other than those required by state or federal law. (D) A resident agent shall satisfy the initial training and continuing education required by division (A) of this section by completing long-term care courses that are approved by the superintendent. A nonresident agent may satisfy the training and continuing education required by division (A) of this section by completing the training requirements in any other state, provided that the course is approved for credit by the insurance department of that state prior to the agent taking the course. (E) Each insurer shall obtain records of the initial training and continuing education completed by agents of that insurer pursuant to division (A) of this section as well as the training completed by the insurer's agents concerning the distribution of the insurer's partnership program policies and shall make those records available to the superintendent upon request. (F) Each insurer shall maintain records with respect to the training of its agents concerning the distribution of the insurer's partnership program policies. Each insurer shall provide documentation to the superintendent that will allow the superintendent to provide assurance to the medicaid director that agents have received the training required by this section and that agents have demonstrated an understanding of the partnership program policies and their relationship to public and private coverage of long-term care in this state, including medicaid. The superintendent may audit each insurer's records annually to verify that the insurer is maintaining the records required by this division. The superintendent shall make the records provided to the superintendent pursuant to division (E) of this section available to the director. Sec. 3951.03. (A) Before any certificate of authority shall be issued by the superintendent of insurance there shall be filed in the superintendent's office a written application therefor. Such application shall be in the form or forms and supplements thereto prescribed by the superintendent and shall set forth: (1) The name and address of the applicant, and if the applicant be a firm, association, or partnership, the name and address of each member thereof, and if the applicant be a corporation, the name and address of each of its officers and directors; (2) Whether any license or certificate of authority as agent, broker, or public insurance adjuster has been issued previously by the superintendent of this state or by the insurance department of any state to the individual applicant, and, if the applicant be an individual, whether any such certificate has been issued previously to any firm, association, or partnership of which the individual was or is an officer or director, and, if the applicant be a firm, association, or partnership, whether any such certificate has been issued previously to any member thereof, and, if the applicant be a corporation, whether any such certificate has been issued previously to any officer or director of such corporation; (3) The business or employment in which the applicant has been engaged for the five years next preceding the date of the application, and the name and address of such business and the name or names and addresses of his employer or employers; (4) Such information as the superintendent may require of applicants in order to determine their trustworthiness and competency to transact the business of public insurance adjusters, in such manner as to safeguard the interest of the public; (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, the superintendent shall issue a public insurance adjuster agent certificate to a person, who is a bona fide employee of a public insurance adjuster without examination, provided said application is made by a person, partnership, association, or corporation engaged in the public insurance adjusting business. The fee to be paid by the applicant for such a license at the time the application is made, and annually thereafter for the renewal thereof according to the standard renewal procedure of sections 4745.01 to 4745.03, inclusive, of the Revised Code, shall be fifty dollars, and such applicant shall be bonded in the amount of one thousand dollars as provided for in division (D) of section 3951.06 of the Revised Code. (C) The superintendent shall issue a public insurance adjuster agent certificate in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license or certificate in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a public insurance adjuster agent in a state that does not issue that license or certificate. (D) An application for any certificate of authority shall be signed and verified under oath by the applicant and, if made by a firm, association, partnership, or corporation, by each member or officer and director thereof to be authorized thereby to act as a public insurance adjuster. Sec. 3959.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Administration fees" means any amount charged a covered person for services rendered. "Administration fees" includes commissions earned or paid by any person relative to services performed by an administrator. (B) "Administrator" means any person who adjusts or settles claims on, residents of this state in connection with life, dental, health, prescription drugs, or disability insurance or self-insurance programs. "Administrator" includes a pharmacy benefit manager. "Administrator" does not include any of the following: (1) An insurance agent or solicitor licensed in this state whose activities are limited exclusively to the sale of insurance and who does not provide any administrative services; (2) Any person who administers or operates the workers' compensation program of a self-insuring employer under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code; (3) Any person who administers pension plans for the benefit of the person's own members or employees or administers pension plans for the benefit of the members or employees of any other person; (4) Any person that administers an insured plan or a self-insured plan that provides life, dental, health, or disability benefits exclusively for the person's own members or employees; (5) Any health insuring corporation holding a certificate of authority under Chapter 1751. of the Revised Code or an insurance company that is authorized to write life or sickness and accident insurance in this state. (C) "Actual acquisition cost" means the amount that a drug wholesaler charges a pharmacy for a drug product as listed on the pharmacy's billing invoice. (D) "Aggregate excess insurance" means that type of coverage whereby the insurer agrees to reimburse the insured employer or trust for all benefits or claims paid during an agreement period on behalf of all covered persons under the plan or trust which exceed a stated deductible amount and subject to a stated maximum. (D) (E) "Contracted pharmacy" or "pharmacy" means a pharmacy located in this state participating in either the network of a pharmacy benefit manager or in a health care or pharmacy benefit plan through a direct contract or through a contract with a pharmacy services administration organization, group purchasing organization, or another contracting agent. (E) (F) "Contributions" means any amount collected from a covered person to fund the self-insured portion of any plan in accordance with the plan's provisions, summary plan descriptions, and contracts of insurance. (F) (G) "Drug product reimbursement" means the amount paid by a pharmacy benefit manager to a contracted pharmacy for the cost of the drug dispensed to a patient and does not include a dispensing or professional fee. (G) (H) "Drug wholesaler" means a wholesale drug distributor accredited by a nationally recognized nonprofit organization that represents the interests of state boards of pharmacy and to which the state board of pharmacy is a member. (I) "Fiduciary" has the meaning set forth in section 1002(21)(A) of the "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 829, 29 U.S.C. 1001, as amended. (H) (J) "Fiscal year" means the twelve-month accounting period commencing on the date the plan is established and ending twelve months following that date, and each corresponding twelve-month accounting period thereafter as provided for in the summary plan description. (I) (K) "Insurer" means an entity authorized to do the business of insurance in this state or, for the purposes of this section, a health insuring corporation authorized to issue health care plans in this state. (J) (L) "Managed care organization" means an entity that provides medical management and cost containment services and includes a medicaid managed care organization, as defined in section 5167.01 of the Revised Code. (K) (M) "Maximum allowable cost" means a maximum drug product reimbursement for an individual drug or for a group of therapeutically and pharmaceutically equivalent multiple source drugs that are listed in the United States food and drug administration's approved drug products with therapeutic equivalence evaluations, commonly referred to as the orange book. (L) (N) "Maximum allowable cost list" means a list of the drugs for which a pharmacy benefit manager imposes a maximum allowable cost, either directly or by setting forth a method for how the maximum allowable cost is calculated. (M) (O) "Multiple employer welfare arrangement" has the same meaning as in section 1739.01 of the Revised Code. (N) (P) "National drug code number" or "national drug code" means the number registered for a drug pursuant to the listing system established by the United States food and drug administration under the "Drug Listing Act of 1972," 21 U.S.C. 360. (Q) "Ohio pharmacy" means a pharmacy, including an independent pharmacy, that is incorporated or organized in this state under Title XVII of the Revised Code. (R) "Pharmacy benefit manager" means an entity that contracts with pharmacies on behalf of an employer, a multiple employer welfare arrangement, public employee benefit plan, state agency, insurer, managed care organization, or other third-party payer to provide pharmacy health benefit services or administration. "Pharmacy benefit manager" includes the state pharmacy benefit manager selected under section 5167.24 of the Revised Code. (O) (S) "Plan" means any arrangement in written form for the payment of life, dental, health, or disability benefits to covered persons defined by the summary plan description and includes a drug benefit plan administered by a pharmacy benefit manager. (P) (T) "Plan sponsor" means the person who establishes the plan. (Q) (U) "Self-insurance program" means a program whereby an employer provides a plan of benefits for its employees without involving an intermediate insurance carrier to assume risk or pay claims. "Self-insurance program" includes but is not limited to employer programs that pay claims up to a prearranged limit beyond which they purchase insurance coverage to protect against unpredictable or catastrophic losses. (R) (V) "Specific excess insurance" means that type of coverage whereby the insurer agrees to reimburse the insured employer or trust for all benefits or claims paid during an agreement period on behalf of a covered person in excess of a stated deductible amount and subject to a stated maximum. (S) (W) "Summary plan description" means the written document adopted by the plan sponsor which outlines the plan of benefits, conditions, limitations, exclusions, and other pertinent details relative to the benefits provided to covered persons thereunder. (T) (X) "Third-party payer" has the same meaning as in section 3901.38 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3959.111. (A)(1)(a) In each contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy, the pharmacy shall be given the right to obtain from the pharmacy benefit manager, within ten days after any request, a current list of the sources used to determine maximum allowable cost pricing. In each contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy, the pharmacy benefit manager shall be obligated to update and implement the pricing information at least every seven days and provide a means by which contracted pharmacies may promptly review maximum allowable cost pricing updates in an electronic format that is readily available, accessible, and secure and that can be easily searched. Subject to division (A)(1) of this section, a pharmacy benefit manager shall utilize the most up-to-date pricing data when calculating drug product reimbursements for all contracting pharmacies within one business day of any price update or modification. (b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall maintain a written procedure to eliminate products from the list of drugs subject to maximum allowable cost pricing in a timely manner. The written procedure, and any updates, shall promptly be made available to a pharmacy upon request. (2) In each contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy, a pharmacy benefit manager shall be obligated to ensure that all of the following conditions are met prior to placing a prescription drug on a maximum allowable cost list: (a) The drug is listed as "A" or "B" rated in the most recent version of the United States food and drug administration's approved drug products with therapeutic equivalence evaluations, or has an "NR" or "NA" rating or similar rating by nationally recognized reference. (b) The drug is generally available for purchase by pharmacies in this state from a national or regional wholesaler and is not obsolete. (3) Each contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy shall include an electronic process to appeal, investigate, and resolve disputes regarding maximum allowable cost pricing that includes all of the following: (a) A twenty-one-day limit on the right to appeal following the initial claim; (b) A requirement that the appeal be investigated and resolved within twenty-one days after the appeal; (c) A telephone number at which the pharmacy may contact the pharmacy benefit manager to speak to a person responsible for processing appeals; (d) A requirement that a pharmacy benefit manager provide a reason for any appeal denial, including the national drug code and the identity of the national or regional wholesalers from whom the drug was generally available for purchase at or below the benchmark price determined by the pharmacy benefit manager; (e) A requirement that if the appeal is upheld or granted, then the pharmacy benefit manager shall adjust the drug product reimbursement to the pharmacy's upheld appeal price; (f) A requirement that a pharmacy benefit manager make an adjustment not later than one day after the date of determination of the appeal. The adjustment shall be retroactive to the date the appeal was made and shall apply to all situated pharmacies as determined by the pharmacy benefit manager. This requirement does not prohibit a pharmacy benefit manager from retroactively adjusting a claim for the appealing pharmacy or for any other similarly situated pharmacies. (B)(1)(a) A pharmacy benefit manager shall disclose to the plan sponsor whether or not the pharmacy benefit manager uses the same maximum allowable cost list when billing a plan sponsor as it does when reimbursing a pharmacy. (b) If a pharmacy benefit manager uses multiple maximum allowable cost lists, the pharmacy benefit manager shall disclose in the aggregate to a plan sponsor any differences between the amount paid to a pharmacy and the amount charged to a plan sponsor. (2) The disclosures required under division (B)(1) of this section shall be made within ten days of a pharmacy benefit manager and a plan sponsor signing a contract or on a quarterly basis. (3)(a) Division (B) of this section does not apply to plans governed by the "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974," 29 U.S.C. 1001, et seq. or medicare part D. (b) As used in this division, "medicare part D" means the voluntary prescription drug benefit program established under Part D of Title XVIII of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1395w-101, et seq. (C) Except as otherwise provided in division (E) of this section, a pharmacy benefit manager shall reimburse an Ohio pharmacy for drug products dispensed on or after the ninety-first day following the effective date of this amendment not less than either of the following amounts: (1) The amount that the pharmacy benefit manager reimburses an affiliated pharmacy for providing the same drug product; (2) A drug product reimbursement not less than the Ohio pharmacy's actual acquisition cost for the drug dispensed. (D) An Ohio pharmacy may decline to provide a drug product to an individual or pharmacy benefit manager if the Ohio pharmacy would be paid less than the amount required by division (C) of this section. (E)(1) Divisions (C) and (D) of this section do not apply to the extent that those divisions conflict with a contract or agreement entered into before the effective date of this amendment except that, if such a contract or agreement is amended or renewed after the effective date of this amendment, the contract or agreement shall conform to the requirements of those divisions. Division (C) of this section does not prohibit a pharmacy benefit manager from paying drug product reimbursements in excess of the amounts required by that division. (2) Divisions (C) and (D) of this section do not apply with respect to the state pharmacy benefit manager selected pursuant to section 5167.24 of the Revised Code. (F) Notwithstanding division (B)(5) of section 3959.01 of the Revised Code, a health insuring corporation or a sickness and accident insurer shall comply with the requirements of this section and is subject to the penalties under section 3959.12 of the Revised Code if the corporation or insurer is a pharmacy benefit manager, as defined in section 3959.01 of the Revised Code. (D) (G) No pharmacy benefit manager shall retaliate against an Ohio pharmacy that reports an alleged violation of, or exercises a right or remedy under, this section by doing any of the following: (1) Terminating or refusing to renew a contract with the Ohio pharmacy without providing notice to the Ohio pharmacy at least ninety days in advance; (2) Subjecting the Ohio pharmacy to increased audits without providing notice to the Ohio pharmacy and a detailed description of the reason for the audit at least ninety days in advance; (3) Failing to promptly pay the Ohio pharmacy in accordance with sections 3901.381 to 3901.3814 of the Revised Code. (H) If an Ohio pharmacy believes that a pharmacy benefit manager has violated this section, in addition to any other remedies provided by law, the Ohio pharmacy may file a formal complaint and provide evidence related to the complaint to the superintendent of insurance. (I) The superintendent of insurance shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the requirements of this sectionin accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the purposes of implementing and administering this section. Sec. 3959.121. (A) The superintendent of insurance shall evaluate any complaint filed by an Ohio pharmacy pursuant to section 3959.111 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) If the superintendent determines, based on a complaint filed by an Ohio pharmacy or other information available to the superintendent, that a pharmacy benefit manager has violated section 3959.111 of the Revised Code, the superintendent shall do both of the following: (a) Issue a notice of violation to the pharmacy benefit manager that clearly explains the violation; (b) Impose an administrative penalty on the pharmacy benefit manager of one thousand dollars for each violation. (2) Each day that a violation continues after the pharmacy benefit manager receives notice of the violation under division (B)(1)(a) of this section is considered a separate violation for the purposes of the administrative penalty under division (B)(1)(b) of this section. (C) Before imposing an administrative penalty under this section, the superintendent shall afford the pharmacy benefit manager an opportunity for an adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. At the hearing, the pharmacy benefit manager may challenge the superintendent's determination that a violation occurred, the superintendent's imposition of an administrative penalty, or both. The pharmacy benefit manager may appeal the superintendent's determination and the imposition of the administrative penalty in accordance with section 119.12 of the Revised Code. (D) An administrative penalty collected under this section shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the department of insurance operating fund created by section 3901.021 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4112.055. (A)(1) Aggrieved persons may enforce the rights granted by division (H) of section 4112.02 of the Revised Code by filing a civil action in the court of common pleas of the county in which the alleged unlawful discriminatory practice occurred within one year after it allegedly occurred. Upon application by an aggrieved person, upon a proper showing, and under circumstances that it considers just, a court of common pleas may appoint an attorney for the aggrieved person and authorize the commencement of a civil action under this division without the payment of costs. Each party to a civil action under this division has the right to a jury trial of the action. To assert the right, a party shall demand a jury trial in the manner prescribed in the Rules of Civil Procedure. If a party demands a jury trial in that manner, the civil action shall be tried to a jury. (2)(a) If a complaint is issued by the commission under division (B)(5) of section 4112.05 of the Revised Code for one or more alleged unlawful discriminatory practices described in division (H) of section 4112.02 of the Revised Code, the complainant, any aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint is issued, or the respondent may elect, following receipt of the relevant notice described in division (B)(5) of section 4112.05 of the Revised Code, to proceed with the administrative hearing process under that section or to have the alleged unlawful discriminatory practices covered by the complaint addressed in a civil action commenced in accordance with divisions (A)(1) and (2)(b) of this section. An election to have the alleged unlawful discriminatory practices so addressed shall be made in a writing that is sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the commission, to the civil rights section of the office of the attorney general, and to the other parties to the pending administrative process within thirty days after the electing complainant, aggrieved person, or respondent received the relevant notice described in division (B)(5) of section 4112.05 of the Revised Code. (b) Upon receipt of Not more than thirty days after receiving a timely mailed election to have the alleged unlawful discriminatory practices addressed in a civil action, the commission shall authorize the office of the attorney general to commence and maintain the civil action in the court of common pleas of the county in which the alleged unlawful discriminatory practices occurred. Notwithstanding the period of limitations specified in division (A)(1) of this section, the office of the attorney general shall commence the civil action within thirty days after the receipt of the commission's authorization to commence the civil action. Notwithstanding the period of limitations specified in division (A)(1) of this section, if the commission fails to authorize the office of the attorney general to commence and maintain a civil action as required under this division, or the attorney general fails to commence a civil action as required under this division, the complainant or any aggrieved person may commence the action not less than thirty days, but not more than sixty days, after the date an election is mailed under division (A)(2)(a) of this section. (c) Upon commencement of the civil action in accordance with division (A)(2)(b) of this section, the commission shall prepare an order dismissing the complaint in the pending administrative matter and serve a copy of the order upon the complainant, each aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint was issued, and the respondent. (d) If an election to have the alleged unlawful discriminatory practices addressed in a civil action is not filed in accordance with division (A)(2)(a) of this section, the commission shall continue with the administrative hearing process described in section 4112.05 of the Revised Code. (e) With respect to the issues to be determined in a civil action commenced in accordance with division (A)(2)(b) of this section, any aggrieved person may intervene as a matter of right in that civil action. (B) If the court or the jury in a civil action under this section finds that a violation of division (H) of section 4112.02 of the Revised Code is about to occur, the court may order any affirmative action it considers appropriate, including a permanent or temporary injunction or temporary restraining order. (C) Any sale, encumbrance, or rental consummated prior to the issuance of any court order under the authority of this section and involving a bona fide purchaser, encumbrancer, or tenant without actual notice of the existence of a charge under division (H) of section 4112.02 of the Revised Code or a civil action under this section is not affected by the court order. (D) If the court or the jury in a civil action under this section finds that a violation of division (H) of section 4112.02 of the Revised Code has occurred, the court shall award to the plaintiff or to the complainant or aggrieved person on whose behalf the office of the attorney general commenced or maintained the civil action, whichever is applicable, actual damages, reasonable attorney's fees, court costs incurred in the prosecution of the action, expert witness fees, and other litigation expenses, and may grant other relief that it considers appropriate, including a permanent or temporary injunction, a temporary restraining order, or other order and punitive damages. (E) Any civil action brought under this section shall be heard and determined as expeditiously as possible. (F) The court in a civil action under this section shall notify the commission of any finding pertaining to discriminatory housing practices within fifteen days after the entry of the finding. Sec. 4113.31. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Employer," "mass layoff," and "plant closing" have the same meanings as in the WARN Act and 20 C.F.R. 639.3. (2) "WARN Act" means the "Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification (WARN) Act," 29 U.S.C. 2101, et seq. (B) An employer in this state shall comply with all requirements in the WARN Act and 20 C.F.R. 639.1 to 639.10. The requirements specified in this section do not establish a different standard than that established by federal statutes and regulations. (C) In accordance with 29 U.S.C 2101(a)(1)(B), an employer must provide the notice required by 29 U.S.C. 2102(a) if both of the following apply: (1) The employer employs one hundred or more employees who in the aggregate work at least four thousand hours a week. (2) The employer lays off fifty or more employees at a single site of employment during any thirty-day period. (D) An employer is not required to provide the notice described in 29 U.S.C. 2102(a) when a plant closing or mass layoff constitutes a strike or constitutes a lockout as described in 29 U.S.C. 2103 and 20 C.F.R. 639.5(d). (E) In accordance with 29 U.S.C 2102(a)(1), not less than sixty days before the date a plant closing or mass layoff begins, an employer shall provide written notice of the closing or layoff to affected employees' authorized representatives or, if there are no such representatives at the time, to each affected employee. (1) The employer shall include all of the following in a notice provided to affected employees' authorized representatives: (a) The location of the facility affected by the plant closing or mass layoff; (b) A detailed statement explaining the reason for the plant closing or mass layoff and whether it will be permanent or temporary; (c) The expected date when the plant closing or mass layoff will commence and the anticipated date on which the employees' employment will cease; (d) The total number of employees affected by the plant closing or mass layoff, including the employees' job titles or positions and any department or division impacted. (2) The employer shall include all of the following in a notice provided to affected employees' who do not have an authorized representative at the time the notice is sent: (a) A detailed statement explaining the reason for the plant closing or mass layoff and whether it will be permanent or temporary; (b) The expected date when the plant closing or mass layoff will commence and the anticipated date on which the employees' employment will cease; (c) An indication as to whether an affected employee has bumping rights or other reemployment rights under a collective bargaining agreement or a company policy, including any procedures for exercising those rights; (d) Information on how affected employees can access unemployment insurance benefits and other assistance programs; (e) The name, title, and contact information of an employer representative who can answer questions about the plant closing or mass layoff; (f) Information about any available services for an affected employee, including job placement assistance, retraining programs, or counseling services. (F) In accordance with 29 U.S.C 2102(a)(2), an employer shall provide written notice of a plant closing or mass layoff to the director of job and family services and to the chief elected official of the municipal corporation and the county where the plant closing or mass layoff is to occur. The written notice shall include the same information required under division (E) of this section and all of the following: (1) A description of any action taken or planned to mitigate the impact of the plant closing or mass layoff, including any efforts to secure alternative employment or training for affected employees; (2) The name of each employee organization representing affected employees, and the name and address of the chief elected officer of each organization; (3) A copy of the notice provided to affected employees or their representatives, as applicable. (G) The period within which an employer shall provide notice may be reduced or waived under the circumstances described in 29 U.S.C. 2102(b). (H) The director of job and family services may issue guidance and procedures for the submission and review of notices by employers. (I) When an employer fails to comply with the WARN Act, an affected employee may seek the remedies specified in 29 U.S.C. 2104. Sec. 4117.08. (A) All matters pertaining to wages, hours, or terms and other conditions of employment and the continuation, modification, or deletion of an existing provision of a collective bargaining agreement are subject to collective bargaining between the public employer and the exclusive representative, except as otherwise specified in this section and division (E) of section 4117.03 of the Revised Code. (B) Neither of the following are appropriate subjects for collective bargaining: (1) The conduct and grading of civil service examinations, the rating of candidates, the establishment of eligible lists from the examinations, and the original appointments from the eligible lists are not appropriate subjects for collective bargaining; (2) For collective bargaining agreements that are entered into on or after the effective date of this amendment, the ability of state employees to perform their duties at a location designated as a worksite under division (B)(2) of section 124.184 of the Revised Code or other location designated under division (D) of section 124.184 of the Revised Code. (C) Unless a public employer agrees otherwise in a collective bargaining agreement, nothing in Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code impairs the right and responsibility of each public employer to: (1) Determine matters of inherent managerial policy which include, but are not limited to, areas of discretion or policy such as the functions and programs of the public employer, standards of services, its overall budget, utilization of technology, and organizational structure; (2) Direct, supervise, evaluate, or hire employees; (3) Maintain and improve the efficiency and effectiveness of governmental operations; (4) Determine the overall methods, process, means, or personnel by which governmental operations are to be conducted; (5) Suspend, discipline, demote, or discharge for just cause, or lay off, transfer, assign, schedule, promote, or retain employees; (6) Determine the adequacy of the work force; (7) Determine the overall mission of the employer as a unit of government; (8) Effectively manage the work force; (9) Take actions to carry out the mission of the public employer as a governmental unit. The employer is not required to bargain on subjects reserved to the management and direction of the governmental unit except as affect wages, hours, terms and conditions of employment, and the continuation, modification, or deletion of an existing provision of a collective bargaining agreement. A public employee or exclusive representative may raise a legitimate complaint or file a grievance based on the collective bargaining agreement. Sec. 4117.10. (A) An agreement between a public employer and an exclusive representative entered into pursuant to this chapter governs the wages, hours, and terms and conditions of public employment covered by the agreement. If the agreement provides for a final and binding arbitration of grievances, public employers, employees, and employee organizations are subject solely to that grievance procedure and the state personnel board of review or civil service commissions have no jurisdiction to receive and determine any appeals relating to matters that were the subject of a final and binding grievance procedure. Where no agreement exists or where an agreement makes no specification about a matter, the public employer and public employees are subject to all applicable state or local laws or ordinances pertaining to the wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment for public employees. All of the following prevail over conflicting provisions of agreements between employee organizations and public employers: (1) Laws pertaining to any of the following subjects: (a) Civil rights; (b) Affirmative action; (c) Unemployment compensation; (d) Workers' compensation; (e) The retirement of public employees; (f) Residency requirements; (g) The minimum educational requirements contained in the Revised Code pertaining to public education including the requirement of a certificate by the fiscal officer of a school district pursuant to section 5705.41 of the Revised Code; (h) The provisions of division (A) of section 124.34 of the Revised Code governing the disciplining of officers and employees who have been convicted of a felony; (i) The minimum standards promulgated by the director of education and workforce pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. (2) The law pertaining to the leave of absence and compensation provided under section 5923.05 of the Revised Code, if the terms of the agreement contain benefits which are less than those contained in that section or the agreement contains no such terms and the public authority is the state or any agency, authority, commission, or board of the state or if the public authority is another entity listed in division (B) of section 4117.01 of the Revised Code that elects to provide leave of absence and compensation as provided in section 5923.05 of the Revised Code; (3) The law pertaining to the leave established under section 5906.02 of the Revised Code, if the terms of the agreement contain benefits that are less than those contained in section 5906.02 of the Revised Code; (4) The law pertaining to excess benefits prohibited under section 3345.311 of the Revised Code with respect to an agreement between an employee organization and a public employer entered into on or after September 29, 2015; (5) The law pertaining to state employee work location policies under section 124.184 of the Revised Code with respect to an agreement between an employee organization and a public employer entered into on or after the effective date of this amendment. Except for sections 306.08, 306.12, 306.35, and 4981.22 of the Revised Code and arrangements entered into thereunder, and section 4981.21 of the Revised Code as necessary to comply with section 13(c) of the "Urban Mass Transportation Act of 1964," 87 Stat. 295, 49 U.S.C.A. 1609(c), as amended, and arrangements entered into thereunder, this chapter prevails over any and all other conflicting laws, resolutions, provisions, present or future, except as otherwise specified in this chapter or as otherwise specified by the general assembly. Nothing in this section prohibits or shall be construed to invalidate the provisions of an agreement establishing supplemental workers' compensation or unemployment compensation benefits or exceeding minimum requirements contained in the Revised Code pertaining to public education or the minimum standards promulgated by the director of education and workforce pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. (B) The public employer shall submit a request for funds necessary to implement an agreement and for approval of any other matter requiring the approval of the appropriate legislative body to the legislative body within fourteen days of the date on which the parties finalize the agreement, unless otherwise specified, but if the appropriate legislative body is not in session at the time, then within fourteen days after it convenes. The legislative body must approve or reject the submission as a whole, and the submission is deemed approved if the legislative body fails to act within thirty days after the public employer submits the agreement. The parties may specify that those provisions of the agreement not requiring action by a legislative body are effective and operative in accordance with the terms of the agreement, provided there has been compliance with division (C) of this section. If the legislative body rejects the submission of the public employer, either party may reopen all or part of the entire agreement. As used in this section, "legislative body" includes the governing board of a municipal corporation, school district, college or university, village, township, or board of county commissioners or any other body that has authority to approve the budget of their public jurisdiction and, with regard to the state, "legislative body" means the controlling board. (C) The chief executive officer, or the chief executive officer's representative, of each municipal corporation, the designated representative of the board of education of each school district, college or university, or any other body that has authority to approve the budget of their public jurisdiction, the designated representative of the board of county commissioners and of each elected officeholder of the county whose employees are covered by the collective negotiations, and the designated representative of the village or the board of township trustees of each township is responsible for negotiations in the collective bargaining process; except that the legislative body may accept or reject a proposed collective bargaining agreement. When the matters about which there is agreement are reduced to writing and approved by the employee organization and the legislative body, the agreement is binding upon the legislative body, the employer, and the employee organization and employees covered by the agreement. (D) There is hereby established an office of collective bargaining in the department of administrative services for the purpose of negotiating with and entering into written agreements between state agencies, departments, boards, and commissions and the exclusive representative on matters of wages, hours, terms and other conditions of employment and the continuation, modification, or deletion of an existing provision of a collective bargaining agreement. Nothing in any provision of law to the contrary shall be interpreted as excluding the bureau of workers' compensation and the industrial commission from the preceding sentence. This office shall not negotiate on behalf of other statewide elected officials or boards of trustees of state institutions of higher education who shall be considered as separate public employers for the purposes of this chapter; however, the office may negotiate on behalf of these officials or trustees where authorized by the officials or trustees. The staff of the office of collective bargaining are in the unclassified service. The director of administrative services shall fix the compensation of the staff. The office of collective bargaining shall: (1) Assist the director in formulating management's philosophy for public collective bargaining as well as planning bargaining strategies; (2) Conduct negotiations with the exclusive representatives of each employee organization; (3) Coordinate the state's resources in all mediation, fact-finding, and arbitration cases as well as in all labor disputes; (4) Conduct systematic reviews of collective bargaining agreements for the purpose of contract negotiations; (5) Coordinate the systematic compilation of data by all agencies that is required for negotiating purposes; (6) Prepare and submit an annual report and other reports as requested to the governor and the general assembly on the implementation of this chapter and its impact upon state government. Sec. 4141.01. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: (A)(1) "Employer" means the any of the following, provided the individual or entity is subject to this chapter under section 4141.011 of the Revised Code: any state, its instrumentalities, its political subdivisions and their instrumentalities, Indian tribes, and any individual or type of organization including any partnership, limited liability company, association, trust, estate, joint-stock company, insurance company, or corporation, whether domestic or foreign, or the receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee, or the successor thereof, or the legal representative of a deceased person who subsequent to December 31, 1971, or in the case of political subdivisions or their instrumentalities, subsequent to December 31, 1973: (a) Had in employment at least one individual, or in the case of a nonprofit organization, subsequent to December 31, 1973, had not less than four individuals in employment for some portion of a day in each of twenty different calendar weeks, in either the current or the preceding calendar year whether or not the same individual was in employment in each such day; or (b) Except for a nonprofit organization, had paid for service in employment wages of fifteen hundred dollars or more in any calendar quarter in either the current or preceding calendar year; or (c) Had paid, subsequent to December 31, 1977, for employment in domestic service in a local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority, cash remuneration of one thousand dollars or more in any calendar quarter in the current calendar year or the preceding calendar year, or had paid subsequent to December 31, 1977, for employment in domestic service in a private home cash remuneration of one thousand dollars in any calendar quarter in the current calendar year or the preceding calendar year: (i) For the purposes of divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section, there shall not be taken into account any wages paid to, or employment of, an individual performing domestic service as described in this division. (ii) An employer under this division shall not be an employer with respect to wages paid for any services other than domestic service unless the employer is also found to be an employer under division (A)(1)(a), (b), or (d) of this section. (d) As a farm operator or a crew leader subsequent to December 31, 1977, had in employment individuals in agricultural labor; and (i) During any calendar quarter in the current calendar year or the preceding calendar year, paid cash remuneration of twenty thousand dollars or more for the agricultural labor; or (ii) Had at least ten individuals in employment in agricultural labor, not including agricultural workers who are aliens admitted to the United States to perform agricultural labor pursuant to sections 1184(c) and 1101(a)(15)(H) of the "Immigration and Nationality Act," 66 Stat. 163, 189, 8 U.S.C.A. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(a), 1184(c), for some portion of a day in each of the twenty different calendar weeks, in either the current or preceding calendar year whether or not the same individual was in employment in each day; or (e) Is not otherwise an employer as defined under division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section; and (i) For which, within either the current or preceding calendar year, service, except for domestic service in a private home not covered under division (A)(1)(c) of this section, is or was performed with respect to which such employer is liable for any federal tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund; (ii) Which, as a condition for approval of this chapter for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 84 Stat. 713, 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311, is required, pursuant to such act to be an employer under this chapter; or (iii) Who became an employer by election under division (A)(4) or (5) of this section and for the duration of such election; or (f) In the case of the state, its instrumentalities, its political subdivisions, and their instrumentalities, and Indian tribes, had in employment, as defined in divisions (B)(2)(a) and (B)(2)(l) of this section, at least one individual; (g) For the purposes of division (A)(1)(a) of this section, if any week includes both the thirty-first day of December and the first day of January, the days of that week before the first day of January shall be considered one calendar week and the days beginning the first day of January another week. (2) Each individual employed to perform or to assist in performing the work of any agent or employee of an employer is employed by such employer for all the purposes of this chapter, whether such individual was hired or paid directly by such employer or by such agent or employee, provided the employer had actual or constructive knowledge of the work. All individuals performing services for an employer of any person in this state who maintains two or more establishments within this state are employed by a single employer for the purposes of this chapter. (3) An employer subject to this chapter within any calendar year is subject to this chapter during the whole of such year and during the next succeeding calendar year. (4) An employer not otherwise subject to this chapter who files with the director of job and family services a written election to become an employer subject to this chapter for not less than two calendar years shall, with the written approval of such election by the director, become an employer subject to this chapter to the same extent as all other employers as of the date stated in such approval, and shall cease to be subject to this chapter as of the first day of January of any calendar year subsequent to such two calendar years only if at least thirty days prior to such first day of January the employer has filed with the director a written notice to that effect. (5) Any employer for whom services that do not constitute employment are performed may file with the director a written election that all such services performed by individuals in the employer's employ in one or more distinct establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute employment for all the purposes of this chapter, for not less than two calendar years. Upon written approval of the election by the director, such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to this chapter from and after the date stated in such approval. Such services shall cease to be employment subject to this chapter as of the first day of January of any calendar year subsequent to such two calendar years only if at least thirty days prior to such first day of January such employer has filed with the director a written notice to that effect. (6) "Employer" does not include a franchisor with respect to the franchisor's relationship with a franchisee or an employee of a franchisee, unless the franchisor agrees to assume that role in writing or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the franchisor exercises a type or degree of control over the franchisee or the franchisee's employees that is not customarily exercised by a franchisor for the purpose of protecting the franchisor's trademark, brand, or both. For purposes of this division, "franchisor" and "franchisee" have the same meanings as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1. (B)(1) "Employment" means service performed by an individual for remuneration under any contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied, including service performed in interstate commerce and service performed by an officer of a corporation, without regard to whether such service is executive, managerial, or manual in nature, and without regard to whether such officer is a stockholder or a member of the board of directors of the corporation, unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the director that such individual has been and will continue to be free from direction or control over the performance of such service, both under a contract of service and in fact. The director of job and family services shall adopt rules to define "direction or control." (2) "Employment" includes: (a) Service performed after December 31, 1977, by an individual in the employ of the state or any of its instrumentalities, or any political subdivision thereof or any of its instrumentalities or any instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing or any instrumentality of any of the foregoing and one or more other states or political subdivisions and without regard to divisions division (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code, provided that such service is excluded from employment as defined in the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 53 Stat. 183, 26 U.S.C.A. 3301, 3306(c)(7) and is not excluded under division (B)(3) of this section; or the services of employees covered by voluntary election, as provided under divisions (A)(4)(H) and (5)(I) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code; (b) Service performed after December 31, 1971, by an individual in the employ of a religious, charitable, educational, or other organization which is excluded from the term "employment" as defined in the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 84 Stat. 713, 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311, solely by reason of section 26 U.S.C.A. 3306(c)(8) of that act and is not excluded under division (B)(3) of this section; (c) Domestic service performed after December 31, 1977, for an employer, as provided in division (A)(1)(c)(C) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code; (d) Agricultural labor performed after December 31, 1977, for a farm operator or a crew leader, as provided in division (A)(1)(d)(D) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code; (e) Subject to division (B)(2)(m) of this section, service not covered under division (B)(1) of this section which is performed after December 31, 1971: (i) As an agent-driver or commission-driver engaged in distributing meat products, vegetable products, fruit products, bakery products, beverages other than milk, laundry, or dry-cleaning services, for the individual's employer or principal; (ii) As a traveling or city salesperson, other than as an agent-driver or commission-driver, engaged on a full-time basis in the solicitation on behalf of and in the transmission to the salesperson's employer or principal except for sideline sales activities on behalf of some other person of orders from wholesalers, retailers, contractors, or operators of hotels, restaurants, or other similar establishments for merchandise for resale, or supplies for use in their business operations, provided that for the purposes of division (B)(2)(e)(ii) of this section, the services shall be deemed employment if the contract of service contemplates that substantially all of the services are to be performed personally by the individual and that the individual does not have a substantial investment in facilities used in connection with the performance of the services other than in facilities for transportation, and the services are not in the nature of a single transaction that is not a part of a continuing relationship with the person for whom the services are performed. (f) An individual's entire service performed within or both within and without the state if: (i) The service is localized in this state. (ii) The service is not localized in any state, but some of the service is performed in this state and either the base of operations, or if there is no base of operations then the place from which such service is directed or controlled, is in this state or the base of operations or place from which such service is directed or controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is performed but the individual's residence is in this state. (g) Service not covered under division (B)(2)(f)(ii) of this section and performed entirely without this state, with respect to no part of which contributions are required and paid under an unemployment compensation law of any other state, the Virgin Islands, Canada, or of the United States, if the individual performing such service is a resident of this state and the director approves the election of the employer for whom such services are performed; or, if the individual is not a resident of this state but the place from which the service is directed or controlled is in this state, the entire services of such individual shall be deemed to be employment subject to this chapter, provided service is deemed to be localized within this state if the service is performed entirely within this state or if the service is performed both within and without this state but the service performed without this state is incidental to the individual's service within the state, for example, is temporary or transitory in nature or consists of isolated transactions; (h) Service of an individual who is a citizen of the United States, performed outside the United States except in Canada after December 31, 1971, or the Virgin Islands, after December 31, 1971, and before the first day of January of the year following that in which the United States secretary of labor approves the Virgin Islands law for the first time, in the employ of an American employer, other than service which is "employment" under divisions (B)(2)(f) and (g) of this section or similar provisions of another state's law, if: (i) The employer's principal place of business in the United States is located in this state; (ii) The employer has no place of business in the United States, but the employer is an individual who is a resident of this state; or the employer is a corporation which is organized under the laws of this state, or the employer is a partnership or a trust and the number of partners or trustees who are residents of this state is greater than the number who are residents of any other state; or (iii) None of the criteria of divisions (B)(2)(f)(i) and (ii) of this section is met but the employer has elected coverage in this state or the employer having failed to elect coverage in any state, the individual has filed a claim for benefits, based on such service, under this chapter. (i) For the purposes of division (B)(2)(h) of this section, the term "American employer" means an employer who is an individual who is a resident of the United States; or a partnership, if two-thirds or more of the partners are residents of the United States; or a trust, if all of the trustees are residents of the United States; or a corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of any state, provided the term "United States" includes the states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. (j) Notwithstanding any other provisions of divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, service, except for domestic service in a private home not covered under division (A)(1)(c)(C) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code, with respect to which a tax is required to be paid under any federal law imposing a tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund, or service, except for domestic service in a private home not covered under division (A)(1)(c)(C) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code, which, as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 84 Stat. 713, 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311, is required to be covered under this chapter. (k) Construction services performed by any individual under a construction contract, as defined in section 4141.39 of the Revised Code, if the director determines that the employer for whom services are performed has the right to direct or control the performance of the services and that the individuals who perform the services receive remuneration for the services performed. The director shall presume that the employer for whom services are performed has the right to direct or control the performance of the services if ten or more of the following criteria apply: (i) The employer directs or controls the manner or method by which instructions are given to the individual performing services; (ii) The employer requires particular training for the individual performing services; (iii) Services performed by the individual are integrated into the regular functioning of the employer; (iv) The employer requires that services be provided by a particular individual; (v) The employer hires, supervises, or pays the wages of the individual performing services; (vi) A continuing relationship between the employer and the individual performing services exists which contemplates continuing or recurring work, even if not full-time work; (vii) The employer requires the individual to perform services during established hours; (viii) The employer requires that the individual performing services be devoted on a full-time basis to the business of the employer; (ix) The employer requires the individual to perform services on the employer's premises; (x) The employer requires the individual performing services to follow the order of work established by the employer; (xi) The employer requires the individual performing services to make oral or written reports of progress; (xii) The employer makes payment to the individual for services on a regular basis, such as hourly, weekly, or monthly; (xiii) The employer pays expenses for the individual performing services; (xiv) The employer furnishes the tools and materials for use by the individual to perform services; (xv) The individual performing services has not invested in the facilities used to perform services; (xvi) The individual performing services does not realize a profit or suffer a loss as a result of the performance of the services; (xvii) The individual performing services is not performing services for more than two employers simultaneously; (xviii) The individual performing services does not make the services available to the general public; (xix) The employer has a right to discharge the individual performing services; (xx) The individual performing services has the right to end the individual's relationship with the employer without incurring liability pursuant to an employment contract or agreement. (l) Service performed by an individual in the employ of an Indian tribe as defined by section 4(e) of the "Indian Self-Determination and Education Assistance Act," 88 Stat. 2204 (1975), 25 U.S.C.A. 450b(e), including any subdivision, subsidiary, or business enterprise wholly owned by an Indian tribe provided that the service is excluded from employment as defined in the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 53 Stat. 183 (1939), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 and 3306(c)(7) and is not excluded under division (B)(3) of this section. (m) Service performed by an individual for or on behalf of a motor carrier transporting property as an operator of a vehicle or vessel, unless all of the following factors apply to the individual and the motor carrier has not elected to consider the individual's service as employment: (i) The individual owns the vehicle or vessel that is used in performing the services for or on behalf of the carrier, or the individual leases the vehicle or vessel under a bona fide lease agreement that is not a temporary replacement lease agreement. For purposes of this division, a bona fide lease agreement does not include an agreement between the individual and the motor carrier transporting property for which, or on whose behalf, the individual provides services. (ii) The individual is responsible for supplying the necessary personal services to operate the vehicle or vessel used to provide the service. (iii) The compensation paid to the individual is based on factors related to work performed, including on a mileage-based rate or a percentage of any schedule of rates, and not solely on the basis of the hours or time expended. (iv) The individual substantially controls the means and manner of performing the services, in conformance with regulatory requirements and specifications of the shipper. (v) The individual enters into a written contract with the carrier for whom the individual is performing the services that describes the relationship between the individual and the carrier to be that of an independent contractor and not that of an employee. (vi) The individual is responsible for substantially all of the principal operating costs of the vehicle or vessel and equipment used to provide the services, including maintenance, fuel, repairs, supplies, vehicle or vessel insurance, and personal expenses, except that the individual may be paid by the carrier the carrier's fuel surcharge and incidental costs, including tolls, permits, and lumper fees. (vii) The individual is responsible for any economic loss or economic gain from the arrangement with the carrier. (viii) The individual is not performing services described in 26 U.S.C. 3306(c)(7) or (8). (3) "Employment" does not include the following services if they are found not subject to the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 84 Stat. 713 (1970), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311, and if the services are not required to be included under division (B)(2)(j) of this section: (a) Service performed after December 31, 1977, in agricultural labor, except as provided in division (A)(1)(d)(D) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code; (b) Domestic service performed after December 31, 1977, in a private home, local college club, or local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority except as provided in division (A)(1)(c)(C) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code; (c) Service performed after December 31, 1977, for this state or a political subdivision as described in division (B)(2)(a) of this section when performed: (i) As a publicly elected official; (ii) As a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary; (iii) As a military member of the Ohio national guard; (iv) As an employee, not in the classified service as defined in section 124.11 of the Revised Code, serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood, or similar emergency; (v) In a position which, under or pursuant to law, is designated as a major nontenured policymaking or advisory position, not in the classified service of the state, or a policymaking or advisory position the performance of the duties of which ordinarily does not require more than eight hours per week. (d) In the employ of any governmental unit or instrumentality of the United States; (e) Service performed after December 31, 1971: (i) Service in the employ of an educational institution or institution of higher education, including those operated by the state or a political subdivision, if such service is performed by a student who is enrolled and is regularly attending classes at the educational institution or institution of higher education; or (ii) By an individual who is enrolled at a nonprofit or public educational institution which normally maintains a regular faculty and curriculum and normally has a regularly organized body of students in attendance at the place where its educational activities are carried on as a student in a full-time program, taken for credit at the institution, which combines academic instruction with work experience, if the service is an integral part of the program, and the institution has so certified to the employer, provided that this subdivision shall not apply to service performed in a program established for or on behalf of an employer or group of employers. (f) Service performed by an individual in the employ of the individual's son, daughter, or spouse and service performed by a child under the age of eighteen in the employ of the child's father or mother; (g) Service performed for one or more principals by an individual who is compensated on a commission basis, who in the performance of the work is master of the individual's own time and efforts, and whose remuneration is wholly dependent on the amount of effort the individual chooses to expend, and which service is not subject to the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 53 Stat. 183 (1939), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311. Service performed after December 31, 1971: (i) By an individual for an employer as an insurance agent or as an insurance solicitor, if all this service is performed for remuneration solely by way of commission; (ii) As a home worker performing work, according to specifications furnished by the employer for whom the services are performed, on materials or goods furnished by such employer which are required to be returned to the employer or to a person designated for that purpose. (h) Service performed after December 31, 1971: (i) In the employ of a church or convention or association of churches, or in an organization which is operated primarily for religious purposes and which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a church or convention or association of churches; (ii) By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in the exercise of the individual's ministry or by a member of a religious order in the exercise of duties required by such order; or (iii) In a facility conducted for the purpose of carrying out a program of rehabilitation for individuals whose earning capacity is impaired by age or physical or mental disability or injury, or providing remunerative work for individuals who because of their impaired physical or mental capacity cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market, by an individual receiving such rehabilitation or remunerative work. (i) Service performed after June 30, 1939, with respect to which unemployment compensation is payable under the "Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act," 52 Stat. 1094 (1938), 45 U.S.C. 351; (j) Service performed by an individual in the employ of any organization exempt from income tax under section 501 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1954," if the remuneration for such service does not exceed fifty dollars in any calendar quarter, or if such service is in connection with the collection of dues or premiums for a fraternal beneficial society, order, or association and is performed away from the home office or is ritualistic service in connection with any such society, order, or association; (k) Casual labor not in the course of an employer's trade or business; incidental service performed by an officer, appraiser, or member of a finance committee of a bank, building and loan association, savings and loan association, or savings association when the remuneration for such incidental service exclusive of the amount paid or allotted for directors' fees does not exceed sixty dollars per calendar quarter is casual labor; (l) Service performed in the employ of a voluntary employees' beneficial association providing for the payment of life, sickness, accident, or other benefits to the members of such association or their dependents or their designated beneficiaries, if admission to a membership in such association is limited to individuals who are officers or employees of a municipal or public corporation, of a political subdivision of the state, or of the United States and no part of the net earnings of such association inures, other than through such payments, to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual; (m) Service performed by an individual in the employ of a foreign government, including service as a consular or other officer or employee or of a nondiplomatic representative; (n) Service performed in the employ of an instrumentality wholly owned by a foreign government if the service is of a character similar to that performed in foreign countries by employees of the United States or of an instrumentality thereof and if the director finds that the secretary of state of the United States has certified to the secretary of the treasury of the United States that the foreign government, with respect to whose instrumentality exemption is claimed, grants an equivalent exemption with respect to similar service performed in the foreign country by employees of the United States and of instrumentalities thereof; (o) Service with respect to which unemployment compensation is payable under an unemployment compensation system established by an act of congress; (p) Service performed as a student nurse in the employ of a hospital or a nurses' training school by an individual who is enrolled and is regularly attending classes in a nurses' training school chartered or approved pursuant to state law, and service performed as an intern in the employ of a hospital by an individual who has completed a four years' course in a medical school chartered or approved pursuant to state law; (q) Service performed by an individual under the age of eighteen in the delivery or distribution of newspapers or shopping news, not including delivery or distribution to any point for subsequent delivery or distribution; (r) Service performed in the employ of the United States or an instrumentality of the United States immune under the Constitution of the United States from the contributions imposed by this chapter, except that to the extent that congress permits states to require any instrumentalities of the United States to make payments into an unemployment fund under a state unemployment compensation act, this chapter shall be applicable to such instrumentalities and to services performed for such instrumentalities in the same manner, to the same extent, and on the same terms as to all other employers, individuals, and services, provided that if this state is not certified for any year by the proper agency of the United States under section 3304 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1954," the payments required of such instrumentalities with respect to such year shall be refunded by the director from the fund in the same manner and within the same period as is provided in division (E) of section 4141.09 of the Revised Code with respect to contributions erroneously collected; (s) Service performed by an individual as a member of a band or orchestra, provided such service does not represent the principal occupation of such individual, and which service is not subject to or required to be covered for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 53 Stat. 183 (1939), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311. (t) Service performed in the employ of a day camp whose camping season does not exceed twelve weeks in any calendar year, and which service is not subject to the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 53 Stat. 183 (1939), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311. Service performed after December 31, 1971: (i) In the employ of a hospital, if the service is performed by a patient of the hospital, as defined in division (W) of this section; (ii) For a prison or other correctional institution by an inmate of the prison or correctional institution; (iii) Service performed after December 31, 1977, by an inmate of a custodial institution operated by the state, a political subdivision, or a nonprofit organization. (u) Service that is performed by a nonresident alien individual for the period the individual temporarily is present in the United States as a nonimmigrant under division (F), (J), (M), or (Q) of section 101(a)(15) of the "Immigration and Nationality Act," 66 Stat. 163, 8 U.S.C.A. 1101, as amended, that is excluded under section 3306(c)(19) of the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 53 Stat. 183 (1939), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311. (v) Notwithstanding any other provisions of division (B)(3) of this section, services that are excluded under divisions (B)(3)(g), (j), (k), and (l) of this section shall not be excluded from employment when performed for a nonprofit organization, as defined in division (X) of this section, or for this state or its instrumentalities, or for a political subdivision or its instrumentalities or for Indian tribes; (w) Service that is performed by an individual working as an election official or election worker if the amount of remuneration received by the individual during the calendar year for services as an election official or election worker is less than one thousand dollars; (x) Service performed for an elementary or secondary school that is operated primarily for religious purposes, that is described in subsection 501(c)(3) and exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C.A. 501; (y) Service performed by a person committed to a penal institution. (z) Service performed for an Indian tribe as described in division (B)(2)(l) of this section when performed in any of the following manners: (i) As a publicly elected official; (ii) As a member of an Indian tribal council; (iii) As a member of a legislative or judiciary body; (iv) In a position which, pursuant to Indian tribal law, is designated as a major nontenured policymaking or advisory position, or a policymaking or advisory position where the performance of the duties ordinarily does not require more than eight hours of time per week; (v) As an employee serving on a temporary basis in the case of a fire, storm, snow, earthquake, flood, or similar emergency. (aa) Service performed after December 31, 1971, for a nonprofit organization, this state or its instrumentalities, a political subdivision or its instrumentalities, or an Indian tribe as part of an unemployment work-relief or work-training program assisted or financed in whole or in part by any federal agency or an agency of a state or political subdivision, thereof, by an individual receiving the work-relief or work-training. (bb) Participation in a learn to earn program as defined in section 4141.293 of the Revised Code. (4) If the services performed during one half or more of any pay period by an employee for the person employing that employee constitute employment, all the services of such employee for such period shall be deemed to be employment; but if the services performed during more than one half of any such pay period by an employee for the person employing that employee do not constitute employment, then none of the services of such employee for such period shall be deemed to be employment. As used in division (B)(4) of this section, "pay period" means a period, of not more than thirty-one consecutive days, for which payment of remuneration is ordinarily made to the employee by the person employing that employee. Division (B)(4) of this section does not apply to services performed in a pay period by an employee for the person employing that employee, if any of such service is excepted by division (B)(3)(o) of this section. (C) "Benefits" means money payments payable to an individual who has established benefit rights, as provided in this chapter, for loss of remuneration due to the individual's unemployment. (D) "Benefit rights" means the weekly benefit amount and the maximum benefit amount that may become payable to an individual within the individual's benefit year as determined by the director. (E) "Claim for benefits" means a claim for waiting period or benefits for a designated week. (F) "Additional claim" means the first claim for benefits filed following any separation from employment during a benefit year; "continued claim" means any claim other than the first claim for benefits and other than an additional claim. (G) "Wages" means remuneration paid to an employee by each of the employee's employers with respect to employment; except that wages shall not include that part of remuneration paid during any calendar year to an individual by an employer or such employer's predecessor in interest in the same business or enterprise, which in any calendar year is in excess of nine thousand dollars on and after January 1, 1995; nine thousand five hundred dollars on and after January 1, 2018; and nine thousand dollars on and after January 1, 2020. Remuneration in excess of such amounts shall be deemed wages subject to contribution to the same extent that such remuneration is defined as wages under the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 84 Stat. 714 (1970), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311, as amended. The remuneration paid an employee by an employer with respect to employment in another state, upon which contributions were required and paid by such employer under the unemployment compensation act of such other state, shall be included as a part of remuneration in computing the amount specified in this division. (H)(1) "Remuneration" means all compensation for personal services, including commissions and bonuses and the cash value of all compensation in any medium other than cash, except that in the case of agricultural or domestic service, "remuneration" includes only cash remuneration. Gratuities customarily received by an individual in the course of the individual's employment from persons other than the individual's employer and which are accounted for by such individual to the individual's employer are taxable wages. The reasonable cash value of compensation paid in any medium other than cash shall be estimated and determined in accordance with rules prescribed by the director, provided that "remuneration" does not include: (a) Payments as provided in divisions (b)(2) to (b)(20) of section 3306 of the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 84 Stat. 713, 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311, as amended; (b) The payment by an employer, without deduction from the remuneration of the individual in the employer's employ, of the tax imposed upon an individual in the employer's employ under section 3101 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1954," with respect to services performed after October 1, 1941. (2) "Cash remuneration" means all remuneration paid in cash, including commissions and bonuses, but not including the cash value of all compensation in any medium other than cash. (I) "Interested party" means the director and any party to whom notice of a determination of an application for benefit rights or a claim for benefits is required to be given under section 4141.28 of the Revised Code. (J) "Annual payroll" means the total amount of wages subject to contributions during a twelve-month period ending with the last day of the second calendar quarter of any calendar year. (K) "Average annual payroll" means the average of the last three annual payrolls of an employer, provided that if, as of any computation date, the employer has had less than three annual payrolls in such three-year period, such average shall be based on the annual payrolls which the employer has had as of such date. (L)(1) "Contributions" means the money payments to the state unemployment compensation fund required of employers by section 4141.25 of the Revised Code and of the state and any of its political subdivisions electing to pay contributions under section 4141.242 of the Revised Code. Employers paying contributions shall be described as "contributory employers." (2) "Payments in lieu of contributions" means the money payments to the state unemployment compensation fund required of reimbursing employers under sections 4141.241 and 4141.242 of the Revised Code. (M) An individual is "totally unemployed" in any week during which the individual performs no services and with respect to such week no remuneration is payable to the individual. (N) An individual is "partially unemployed" in any week if, due to involuntary loss of work, the total remuneration payable to the individual for such week is less than the individual's weekly benefit amount. (O) "Week" means the calendar week ending at midnight Saturday unless an equivalent week of seven consecutive calendar days is prescribed by the director. (1) "Qualifying week" means any calendar week in an individual's base period with respect to which the individual earns or is paid remuneration in employment subject to this chapter. A calendar week with respect to which an individual earns remuneration but for which payment was not made within the base period, when necessary to qualify for benefit rights, may be considered to be a qualifying week. The number of qualifying weeks which may be established in a calendar quarter shall not exceed the number of calendar weeks in the quarter. (2) "Average weekly wage" means the amount obtained by dividing an individual's total remuneration for all qualifying weeks during the base period by the number of such qualifying weeks, provided that if the computation results in an amount that is not a multiple of one dollar, such amount shall be rounded to the next lower multiple of one dollar. (P) "Weekly benefit amount" means the amount of benefits an individual would be entitled to receive for one week of total unemployment. (Q)(1) "Base period" means the first four of the last five completed calendar quarters immediately preceding the first day of an individual's benefit year, except as provided in division (Q)(2) of this section. (2) If an individual does not have sufficient qualifying weeks and wages in the base period to qualify for benefit rights, the individual's base period shall be the four most recently completed calendar quarters preceding the first day of the individual's benefit year. Such base period shall be known as the "alternate base period." If information as to weeks and wages for the most recent quarter of the alternate base period is not available to the director from the regular quarterly reports of wage information, which are systematically accessible, the director may, consistent with the provisions of section 4141.28 of the Revised Code, base the determination of eligibility for benefits on the affidavit of the claimant with respect to weeks and wages for that calendar quarter. The claimant shall furnish payroll documentation, where available, in support of the affidavit. The determination based upon the alternate base period as it relates to the claimant's benefit rights, shall be amended when the quarterly report of wage information from the employer is timely received and that information causes a change in the determination. As provided in division (B) of section 4141.28 of the Revised Code, any benefits paid and charged to an employer's account, based upon a claimant's affidavit, shall be adjusted effective as of the beginning of the claimant's benefit year. No calendar quarter in a base period or alternate base period shall be used to establish a subsequent benefit year. (3) The "base period" of a combined wage claim, as described in division (H) of section 4141.43 of the Revised Code, shall be the base period prescribed by the law of the state in which the claim is allowed. (4) For purposes of determining the weeks that comprise a completed calendar quarter under this division, only those weeks ending at midnight Saturday within the calendar quarter shall be utilized. (R)(1) "Benefit year" with respect to an individual means the fifty-two week period beginning with the first day of that week with respect to which the individual first files a valid application for determination of benefit rights, and thereafter the fifty-two week period beginning with the first day of that week with respect to which the individual next files a valid application for determination of benefit rights after the termination of the individual's last preceding benefit year, except that the application shall not be considered valid unless the individual has had employment in six weeks that is subject to this chapter or the unemployment compensation act of another state, or the United States, and has, since the beginning of the individual's previous benefit year, in the employment earned three times the average weekly wage determined for the previous benefit year. The "benefit year" of a combined wage claim, as described in division (H) of section 4141.43 of the Revised Code, shall be the benefit year prescribed by the law of the state in which the claim is allowed. Any application for determination of benefit rights made in accordance with section 4141.28 of the Revised Code is valid if the individual filing such application is unemployed, has been employed by an employer or employers subject to this chapter in at least twenty qualifying weeks within the individual's base period, and has earned or been paid remuneration at an average weekly wage of not less than twenty-seven and one-half per cent of the statewide average weekly wage for such weeks. For purposes of determining whether an individual has had sufficient employment since the beginning of the individual's previous benefit year to file a valid application, "employment" means the performance of services for which remuneration is payable. (2) Effective for benefit years beginning on and after December 26, 2004, but before July 1, 2022, any application for determination of benefit rights made in accordance with section 4141.28 of the Revised Code is valid if the individual satisfies the criteria described in division (R)(1) of this section, and if the reason for the individual's separation from employment is not disqualifying pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4141.29 or section 4141.291 of the Revised Code. A disqualification imposed pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4141.29 or section 4141.291 of the Revised Code must be removed as provided in those sections as a requirement of establishing a valid application for benefit years beginning on and after December 26, 2004, but before July 1, 2022. Effective for benefit years beginning on and after July 1, 2022, any application for determination of benefit rights made in accordance with section 4141.28 of the Revised Code is valid if the individual satisfies the criteria described in division (R)(1) of this section. A disqualification imposed pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4141.29 or section 4141.291 of the Revised Code does not affect the validity of an application. (3) The statewide average weekly wage shall be calculated by the director once a year based on the twelve-month period ending the thirtieth day of June, as set forth in division (B)(3) of section 4141.30 of the Revised Code, rounded down to the nearest dollar. Increases or decreases in the amount of remuneration required to have been earned or paid in order for individuals to have filed valid applications shall become effective on Sunday of the calendar week in which the first day of January occurs that follows the twelve-month period ending the thirtieth day of June upon which the calculation of the statewide average weekly wage was based. (4) As used in this division, an individual is "unemployed" if, with respect to the calendar week in which such application is filed, the individual is "partially unemployed" or "totally unemployed" as defined in this section or if, prior to filing the application, the individual was separated from the individual's most recent work for any reason which terminated the individual's employee-employer relationship, or was laid off indefinitely or for a definite period of seven or more days. (S) "Calendar quarter" means the period of three consecutive calendar months ending on the thirty-first day of March, the thirtieth day of June, the thirtieth day of September, and the thirty-first day of December, or the equivalent thereof as the director prescribes by rule. (T) "Computation date" means the first day of the third calendar quarter of any calendar year. (U) "Contribution period" means the calendar year beginning on the first day of January of any year. (V) "Agricultural labor," for the purpose of this division, means any service performed prior to January 1, 1972, which was agricultural labor as defined in this division prior to that date, and service performed after December 31, 1971: (1) On a farm, in the employ of any person, in connection with cultivating the soil, or in connection with raising or harvesting any agricultural or horticultural commodity, including the raising, shearing, feeding, caring for, training, and management of livestock, bees, poultry, and fur-bearing animals and wildlife; (2) In the employ of the owner or tenant or other operator of a farm in connection with the operation, management, conservation, improvement, or maintenance of such farm and its tools and equipment, or in salvaging timber or clearing land of brush and other debris left by hurricane, if the major part of such service is performed on a farm; (3) In connection with the production or harvesting of any commodity defined as an agricultural commodity in section 15 (g) of the "Agricultural Marketing Act," 46 Stat. 1550 (1931), 12 U.S.C. 1141j, as amended, or in connection with the ginning of cotton, or in connection with the operation or maintenance of ditches, canals, reservoirs, or waterways, not owned or operated for profit, used exclusively for supplying and storing water for farming purposes; (4) In the employ of the operator of a farm in handling, planting, drying, packing, packaging, processing, freezing, grading, storing, or delivering to storage or to market or to a carrier for transportation to market, in its unmanufactured state, any agricultural or horticultural commodity, but only if the operator produced more than one half of the commodity with respect to which such service is performed; (5) In the employ of a group of operators of farms, or a cooperative organization of which the operators are members, in the performance of service described in division (V)(4) of this section, but only if the operators produced more than one-half of the commodity with respect to which the service is performed; (6) Divisions (V)(4) and (5) of this section shall not be deemed to be applicable with respect to service performed: (a) In connection with commercial canning or commercial freezing or in connection with any agricultural or horticultural commodity after its delivery to a terminal market for distribution for consumption; or (b) On a farm operated for profit if the service is not in the course of the employer's trade or business. As used in division (V) of this section, "farm" includes stock, dairy, poultry, fruit, fur-bearing animal, and truck farms, plantations, ranches, nurseries, ranges, greenhouses, or other similar structures used primarily for the raising of agricultural or horticultural commodities and orchards. (W) "Hospital" means an institution which has been registered or licensed by the Ohio department of health as a hospital. (X) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization, or group of organizations, described in section 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1954," and exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of that code. (Y) "Institution of higher education" means a public or nonprofit educational institution, including an educational institution operated by an Indian tribe, which: (1) Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of graduation from a high school, or the recognized equivalent; (2) Is legally authorized in this state or by the Indian tribe to provide a program of education beyond high school; and (3) Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's or higher degree, or provides a program which is acceptable for full credit toward such a degree, a program of post-graduate or post-doctoral studies, or a program of training to prepare students for gainful employment in a recognized occupation. For the purposes of this division, all colleges and universities in this state are institutions of higher education. (Z) For the purposes of this chapter, "states" includes the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. (AA) "Alien" means, for the purposes of division (A)(1)(d)(D) of this section 4141.011 of the Revised Code, an individual who is an alien admitted to the United States to perform service in agricultural labor pursuant to sections 214 (c) and 101 (a)(15)(H) of the "Immigration and Nationality Act," 66 Stat. 163, 8 U.S.C.A. 1101. (BB)(1) "Crew leader" means an individual who furnishes individuals to perform agricultural labor for any other employer or farm operator, and: (a) Pays, either on the individual's own behalf or on behalf of the other employer or farm operator, the individuals so furnished by the individual for the service in agricultural labor performed by them; (b) Has not entered into a written agreement with the other employer or farm operator under which the agricultural worker is designated as in the employ of the other employer or farm operator. (2) For the purposes of this chapter, any individual who is a member of a crew furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other employer or farm operator shall be treated as an employee of the crew leader if: (a) The crew leader holds a valid certificate of registration under the "Farm Labor Contractor Registration Act of 1963," 90 Stat. 2668, 7 U.S.C. 2041; or (b) Substantially all the members of the crew operate or maintain tractors, mechanized harvesting or crop-dusting equipment, or any other mechanized equipment, which is provided by the crew leader; and (c) If the individual is not in the employment of the other employer or farm operator within the meaning of division (B)(1) of this section. (3) For the purposes of this division, any individual who is furnished by a crew leader to perform service in agricultural labor for any other employer or farm operator and who is not treated as in the employment of the crew leader under division (BB)(2) of this section shall be treated as the employee of the other employer or farm operator and not of the crew leader. The other employer or farm operator shall be treated as having paid cash remuneration to the individual in an amount equal to the amount of cash remuneration paid to the individual by the crew leader, either on the crew leader's own behalf or on behalf of the other employer or farm operator, for the service in agricultural labor performed for the other employer or farm operator. (CC) "Educational institution" means an institution other than an institution of higher education as defined in division (Y) of this section, including an educational institution operated by an Indian tribe, which: (1) Offers participants, trainees, or students an organized course of study or training designed to transfer to them knowledge, skills, information, doctrines, attitudes, or abilities from, by, or under the guidance of an instructor or teacher; and (2) Is approved, chartered, or issued a permit to operate as a school by the director of education and workforce, other government agency, or Indian tribe that is authorized within the state to approve, charter, or issue a permit for the operation of a school. For the purposes of this division, the courses of study or training which the institution offers may be academic, technical, trade, or preparation for gainful employment in a recognized occupation. (DD) "Cost savings day" means any unpaid day off from work in which employees continue to accrue employee benefits which have a determinable value including, but not limited to, vacation, pension contribution, sick time, and life and health insurance. (EE) "Motor carrier" has the same meaning as in section 4923.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4141.011. (A)(1) Except as provided in this section, an employer is subject to this chapter if either of the following apply: (a) The employer had at least one individual in employment for some portion of a day in each of twenty different calendar weeks, in either the current or the preceding calendar year, whether or not the same individual was in employment in each such day; (b) The employer paid for service in employment wages of fifteen hundred dollars or more in any calendar quarter in either the current or preceding calendar year. (2) For purposes of division (A)(1)(a) of this section, if any week includes both the thirty-first day of December and the first day of January, the days of that week before the first day of January shall be considered one calendar week and the days to beginning the first day of January another week. (B) If an employer is a nonprofit organization, the employer is subject to this chapter if the employer had at least four individuals in employment for some portion of a day in each of twenty different calendar weeks, in either the current or the preceding calendar year, whether or not the same individual was in employment in each such day. (C)(1) An employer is subject to this chapter with respect to employment in domestic service in a local college club, local chapter of a college fraternity or sorority, or a private home if the employer paid cash remuneration for such employment of at least one thousand dollars in any calendar quarter in the current calendar year or the preceding calendar year. (2) Wages paid to, or employment of, an individual performing domestic service as described in division (C)(1) of this section do not apply to employment or wages for purposes of divisions (A) and (B) of this section. (3) An employer subject to this chapter under division (C)(1) of this section is not subject to this chapter with respect to wages paid for any services other than domestic service unless the employer is also found to be subject to this chapter under division (A), (B), or (D) of this section. (D) If an employer is a farm operator or a crew leader, the employer is subject to this chapter if the employer had individuals in employment in agricultural labor and either of the following apply: (1) The employer paid cash remuneration of twenty thousand dollars or more for the agricultural labor during any calendar quarter in the current calendar year or the preceding calendar year; (2) The employer had at least ten individuals in employment in agricultural labor, not including agricultural workers who are aliens admitted to the United States to perform agricultural labor pursuant to sections 1184(c) and 1101(a)(15)(H) of the "Immigration and Nationality Act," 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(15)(H)(ii)(a), 1184(c), for some portion of a day in each of the twenty different calendar weeks, in either the current or preceding calendar year whether or not the same individual was in employment in each day. (E) An employer who is not subject to this chapter under division (A) of this section is subject to this chapter if any of the following apply: (1) Service, except for domestic service in a private home not covered under division (C) of this section, is or was performed within either the current or preceding calendar year, and with respect to which such employer is liable for any federal tax against which credit may be taken for contributions required to be paid into a state unemployment fund; (2) As a condition for approval of this chapter for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 26 U.S.C. 3301 to 3311, is required, pursuant to such act to be an employer subject to this chapter; (3) The employer became subject to this chapter by election under division (H) or (I) of this section and for the duration of such election. (F) If an employer is any state, its instrumentalities, its political subdivisions, their instrumentalities, or an Indian tribe, the employer is subject to this chapter if the employer had at least one individual in employment, as defined in divisions (B)(2)(a) and (B)(2)(l) of section 4141.01 of the Revised Code. (G) An employer subject to this chapter within any calendar year is subject to this chapter during the whole of such year and during the next succeeding calendar year. (H) An employer not otherwise subject to this chapter who files with the director of job and family services a written election to become an employer subject to this chapter for not less than two calendar years shall, with the written approval of such election by the director, become an employer subject to this chapter to the same extent as all other employers as of the date stated in such approval, and shall cease to be subject to this chapter as of the first day of January of any calendar year subsequent to such two calendar years only if at least thirty days prior to such first day of January the employer has filed with the director a written notice to that effect. (I) Any employer for whom services that do not constitute employment are performed may file with the director a written election that all such services performed by individuals in the employer's employ in one or more distinct establishments or places of business shall be deemed to constitute employment for all the purposes of this chapter, for not less than two calendar years. Upon written approval of the election by the director, such services shall be deemed to constitute employment subject to this chapter from and after the date stated in such approval. Such services shall cease to be employment subject to this chapter as of the first day of January of any calendar year subsequent to such two calendar years only if at least thirty days prior to such first day of January such employer has filed with the director a written notice to that effect. (J) An employer who is a franchisor is not subject to this chapter with respect to the franchisor's relationship with a franchisee or an employee of a franchisee, unless the franchisor agrees to assume that role in writing or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the franchisor exercises a type or degree of control over the franchisee or the franchisee's employees that is not customarily exercised by a franchisor for the purpose of protecting the franchisor's trademark, brand, or both. For purposes of this division, "franchisor" and "franchisee" have the same meanings as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1. Sec. 4141.02. A nonprofit organization that does not meet the definition of employer for purposes of that is not subject to this chapter pursuant to division (A)(1)(a)(B) of section 4141.01 4141.011 of the Revised Code, and that does not elect to become an employer subject to this chapter pursuant to division (A)(4)(H) of section 4141.01 4141.011 of the Revised Code, shall notify the organization's employees upon hiring that the organization, and the employee's employment with the organization, are exempt from this chapter. Sec. 4141.08. (A) The unemployment compensation integrity board is created. The board may advise and consult the director of job and family services in the administration and enforcement of this chapter and rules adopted under it, including making recommendations to the director regarding proposed rules or public private partnerships. The board consists of the following members: (1) The director of job and family services, or the director's authorized representative; (2) One member of the house of representative appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (3) One member of the senate appointed by the president of the senate; (4) The following members to be appointed by the director: (a) A representative from the Ohio chamber of commerce or its successor organization; (b) A representative from the national federation of independent business or its successor organization; (c) A third-party administrator that is a third-party commercial consumer reporting agency, in accordance with the "Fair Credit Reporting Act," 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq.; (d) A representative from the Ohio federation of labor or its successor organization; (e) A representative from the affiliated construction trades of Ohio or its successor organization; (f) A representative from the Ohio conference of teamsters or its successor organization. (B) The director of job and family services, or the director's authorized representative, shall serve as chairperson of the board. (C) The board shall meet at least two times each calendar year. (D) Each member appointed by the director shall serve three year terms that expire on the thirty-first day of December. (E) Each member appointed by the director shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. A member appointed by the director to fill a vacancy occurring before the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the term. A member appointed by the director shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office or a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. A member appointed by the director shall continue in office for the entirety of the member's term unless removed for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance. (F) The members of the board who are appointed from the membership of the senate and the house of representatives shall serve during their terms as members of the general assembly and until their successors are appointed and qualified, notwithstanding the adjournment of the general assembly of which they are members or the expiration of their terms as members of such general assembly. (G) All meetings of the unemployment compensation integrity board shall comply with section 121.22 of the Revised Code. (H) All members of the unemployment compensation integrity board shall comply with Chapter 102. of the Revised Code, as applicable. Sec. 4141.162. (A) The director of job and family services shall establish an income and eligibility verification system that complies with section 1137 of the "Social Security Act." The programs included in the system are all of the following: (1) Unemployment compensation pursuant to section 3304 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1954"; (2) The state programs funded in part under part A of Title IV of the "Social Security Act" and administered under Chapters 5107. and 5108. of the Revised Code; (3) The medicaid program; (4) The supplemental nutrition assistance program pursuant to the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (7 U.S.C. 2011 et seq.); (5) Any Ohio program under a plan approved under Title I, X, XIV, or XVI of the "Social Security Act." (B) Wage information provided by employers to the director shall be furnished to the income and eligibility verification system. Such information shall be used by the director to determine eligibility of individuals for unemployment compensation benefits and the amount of those benefits and used by the agencies that administer the programs identified in divisions (A)(2) to (5) of this section to determine or verify eligibility for or the amount of benefits under those programs. (C) The director shall, on request, disclose wage and claim information to any state or local agency administering a program identified in division (A) of this section that has entered into a written data sharing agreement with the director that meets the standards specified in federal law, including the requirements in 20 C.F.R. 603.10. The director shall fully implement the use of wage information to determine eligibility for and the amount of unemployment compensation benefits by September 30, 1988. (D) Information furnished under the system shall also be made available to the appropriate state or local child support enforcement agency for the purposes of an approved plan under Title IV-D of the "Social Security Act" and to the appropriate federal agency for the purposes of Titles II and XVI of the "Social Security Act." (B) The director shall adopt rules as necessary under which the department of job and family services and other state agencies that the director determines must participate in order to ensure compliance with section 1137 of the "Social Security Act" exchange information with each other or authorized federal agencies about individuals who are applicants for or recipients of benefits under any of the programs enumerated in division (A) of this section. The rules shall extend to all of the following: (1) A requirement for standardized formats and procedures for a participating agency to request and receive information about an individual, which information shall include the individual's social security number; (2) A requirement that all applicants for and recipients of benefits under any program enumerated in division (A) of this section be notified at the time of application, and periodically thereafter, that information available through the system may be shared with agencies that administer other benefit programs and utilized in establishing or verifying eligibility or benefit amounts under the other programs enumerated in division (A) of this section; (3) A requirement that information is made available only to the extent necessary to assist in the valid administrative needs of the program receiving the information and is targeted for use in ways which are most likely to be productive in identifying and preventing ineligibility and incorrect payments; (4) A requirement that information is adequately protected against unauthorized disclosures for purposes other than to establish or verify eligibility or benefit amounts under the programs enumerated in division (A) of this section; (5) A requirement that a program providing information is reimbursed by the program using the information for the actual costs of furnishing the information and that the director be reimbursed by the participating programs for any actual costs incurred in operating the system; (6) Requirements for any other matters necessary to ensure the effective, efficient, and timely exchange of necessary information or that the director determines must be addressed in order to ensure compliance with the requirements of section 1137 of the "Social Security Act." (C) Each participating agency shall furnish to the income and eligibility verification system established in division (A) of this section that information, which the director, by rule, determines is necessary in order to comply with section 1137 of the "Social Security Act." (D) Notwithstanding the information disclosure requirements of this section and section 4141.21 and division (A) of section 4141.284 of the Revised Code, the director shall administer those provisions of law so as to comply with section 1137 of the "Social Security Act." (E) Requirements in section 4141.21 of the Revised Code with respect to confidentiality of information obtained in the administration of Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code and any sanctions imposed for improper disclosure of such information shall apply to the redisclosure of information disclosed under this section. (F) The director of job and family services shall consult with the medicaid director and the director of administrative services regarding the implementation of this section. Sec. 4141.23. (A) Contributions shall accrue and become payable by each employer for each calendar year or other period as prescribed by this chapter. Such contributions become due and shall be paid by each employer to the director of job and family services for the unemployment compensation fund in accordance with such regulations as the director prescribes, and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employer's employ. In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a dollar may be disregarded unless it amounts to fifty cents or more, in which case it may be increased to the next higher dollar. (B)(1) Any contribution or payment in lieu of contribution, due from an employer on or before December 31, 1992, shall, if not paid when due, bear interest at the rate of ten per cent per annum. In such computation any fraction of a month shall be considered as a full month. (2) Any contribution, payment in lieu of contribution, interest, forfeiture, or fine due from an employer on or after January 1, 1993before December 31, 2025, shall, if not paid when due, bear interest at the annual rate of fourteen per cent compounded monthly on the aggregate receivable balance due. In such computation any fraction of a month shall be considered as a full month. (2) Any contribution, payment in lieu of contribution, interest, forfeiture, or fine due from an employer on or after January 1, 2026, shall, if not paid when due, bear interest at the interest rate established by the state tax commissioner pursuant to section 5703.47 of the Revised Code, not exceeding fifteen per cent. In such computation any fraction of a month shall be considered as a full month. (C) The director may waive the interest assessed under division (B)(2)(B) of this section if the employer meets all of the following conditions within thirty days after the date the director mails or delivers the notice of assessment of interest: (1) Provides to the director a written request for a waiver of interest clearly demonstrating that the employer's failure to timely pay contributions, payments in lieu of contributions, interest, forfeiture, and fines was a result of circumstances beyond the control of the employer or the employer's agent, except that negligence on the part of the employer or the employer's agent shall not be considered beyond the control of the employer or the employer's agent; (2) Furnishes to the director all quarterly reports required under section 4141.20 of the Revised Code; (3) Pays in full all contributions, payments in lieu of contributions, interest, forfeiture, and fines for each quarter for which such payments are due. The director shall deny an employer's request for a waiver of interest after finding that the employer's failure to timely furnish reports or make payments as required under this chapter was due to an attempt to evade payment. (D) Any contribution, interest, forfeiture, or fine required to be paid under this chapter by any employer shall, if not paid when due, become a lien upon the real and personal property of such employer. Upon failure of such employer to pay the contributions, interest, forfeiture, or fine required to be paid under this chapter, the director shall file notice of such lien, for which there shall be no charge, in the office of the county recorder of the county in which it is ascertained that such employer owns real estate or personal property. The director shall notify the employer by mail of the lien. The absence of proof that the notice was sent does not affect the validity of the lien. Such lien shall not be valid as against the claim of any mortgagee, pledgee, purchaser, judgment creditor, or other lienholder of record at the time such notice is filed. If the employer acquires real or personal property after notice of lien is filed, such lien shall not be valid as against the claim of any mortgagee, pledgee, subsequent bona fide purchaser for value, judgment creditor, or other lienholder of record to such after-acquired property, unless the notice of lien is refiled after such property was acquired by the employer and before the competing lien attached to such after-acquired property or before the conveyance to such subsequent bona fide purchaser for value. Such a notice shall be recorded in the county recorder's official records and indexed in the direct and reverse indexes under the name of the employer. When such unpaid contributions, interest, forfeiture, or fines have been paid, the employer may record with the county recorder of the county in which such notice of lien has been filed and recorded, notice of such payment, and the notice of payment shall be recorded in the county recorder's official records and indexed in the direct and reverse indexes. For recording the notice of payment, the county recorder shall charge and receive from the employer a base fee of two dollars for services and a housing trust fund fee of two dollars pursuant to section 317.36 of the Revised Code. (E) Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the director may reduce, in whole or in part, the amount of interest, forfeiture, or fines required to be paid under this chapter if the director determines that the reduction is in the best interest of the unemployment compensation fund. (F) Assessment of contributions shall not be made after four years from the date on which such contributions became payable, and no action in court for the collection of contributions without assessment of such contributions shall be begun after the expiration of five years from the date such contributions became payable. In case of a false or fraudulent report or of a willful attempt in any manner to evade contributions, such contributions may be assessed or a proceeding in court for the collection of such contributions may be begun without assessment at any time. When the assessment of contributions has been made within such four-year period provided, action in court to collect such contributions may be begun within, but not later than, six years after such assessment. (G) In the event of a distribution of an employer's assets, pursuant to an order of any court under the law of this state, including any receivership, assignment for benefit of creditors, adjudicated insolvency, or similar proceedings, contributions, interest, forfeiture, or fine then or thereafter due have the same priority as provided by law for the payment of taxes due the state and shall be paid out of the trust fund in the same manner as provided for other claims for unpaid taxes due the state. (H) If the attorney general finds after investigation that any claim for delinquent contributions, interest, forfeitures, or fines owing to the director is uncollectible, in whole or in part, the attorney general shall recommend to the director the cancellation of such claim or any part thereof. The director may thereupon effect such cancellation. Sec. 4141.281. APPEALS (A) APPEAL FILED Any party notified of a determination of benefit rights or a claim for benefits determination may appeal within twenty-one calendar days after the written determination was sent to the party or within an extended period as provided under division (D)(9) of this section. (B) REDETERMINATION Within twenty-one days after receipt of the appeal, the director of job and family services shall issue a redetermination or transfer the appeal to the unemployment compensation review commission. A redetermination under this section is appealable in the same manner as an initial determination by the director. (C) REVIEW COMMISSION (1) JURISDICTION The commission shall provide an opportunity for a fair hearing to the interested parties of appeals over which the commission has jurisdiction. The commission has jurisdiction over an appeal on transfer or on direct appeal to the commission. If the commission concludes that a pending appeal does not warrant a hearing, the commission may remand the appeal to the director for redetermination. The commission retains jurisdiction until the appeal is remanded to the director or a final decision is issued and appealed to court, or the time to request a review or to appeal a decision of a hearing officer or the commission is expired. (2) CONDUCT OF HEARINGS Hearings before the commission are held at the hearing officer level and the review level. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, initial hearings involving claims for compensation and other unemployment compensation issues are conducted at the hearing officer level by hearing officers appointed by the commission. Hearings at the review level are conducted by hearing officers appointed by the commission, by members of the commission acting either individually or collectively, and by members of the commission and hearing officers acting jointly. In all hearings conducted at the review level, the commission shall designate the hearing officer or officers who are to conduct the hearing. When the term "hearing officer" is used in reference to hearings conducted at the review level, the term includes members of the commission. All decisions issued at the review level are issued by the commission. Provisions contained in the remainder of this paragraph apply to hearings at both the hearing officer level and the review level. The principles of due process in administrative hearings shall be applied to all hearings conducted under the authority of the commission. In conducting hearings, all hearing officers shall control the conduct of the hearing, exclude irrelevant or cumulative evidence, and give weight to the kind of evidence on which reasonably prudent persons are accustomed to rely in the conduct of serious affairs. Hearing officers have an affirmative duty to question parties and witnesses in order to ascertain the relevant facts and to fully and fairly develop the record. Hearing officers are not bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules of procedure. No person shall impose upon the claimant or the employer any burden of proof as is required in a court of law. The proceedings at hearings shall be recorded by mechanical means or otherwise as may be prescribed by the commission. In the absence of further proceedings, the record need not be transcribed. After considering all of the evidence, a hearing officer shall issue a written decision that sets forth the facts as the hearing officer finds them to be, cites the applicable law, and gives the reasoning for the decision. (3) HEARING OFFICER LEVEL When an appeal is transferred to the commission by the director, the commission shall notify all interested parties of the time and place of the hearing and assign the appeal for a hearing by a hearing officer. The hearings shall be de novo, except that the director's file pertaining to a case shall be included in the record to be considered. Following a hearing, the hearing officer shall affirm, modify, or reverse the determination of the director in the manner that appears just and proper. The hearing officer's written decision shall be sent to all interested parties. The decision shall state the right of an interested party to request a review by the commission. A request for review shall be filed within twenty-one days after the decision was sent to the party, or within an extended period as provided under division (D)(9) of this section. The hearing officer's decision shall become final unless a request for review is filed and allowed or the commission removes the appeal to itself within twenty-one days after the hearing officer's decision is sent. (4) REVIEW LEVEL At the review level, the commission may affirm, modify, or reverse previous determinations by the director or at the hearing officer level. At the review level, the commission may affirm, modify, or reverse a hearing officer's decision or remand the decision to the hearing officer level for further hearing. The commission shall consider an appeal at the review level under the following circumstances: when an appeal is required to be heard initially at the review level under this chapter; when the commission on its own motion removes an appeal to itself within twenty-one days after the hearing officer's decision is sent; when the assigned hearing officer refers an appeal to the commission before the hearing officer's decision is sent; or when an interested party files a request for review with the commission within twenty-one days after the hearing officer's decision is sent. (5) COMMISSION EXAMINATION The commission shall consider a request for review by an interested party, including the reasons for the request. The commission may adopt rules prescribing the methods for requesting a review. The commission may allow or disallow the request for review. The disallowance of a request for review constitutes a final decision by the commission. (6) REVIEW PROCEDURE If the commission allows a request for review, the commission shall notify all interested parties of that fact and provide a reasonable period of time, as the commission defines by rule, in which interested parties may file a response. After that period of time, the commission, based on the record before it, may do one of the following: affirm the decision of the hearing officer; provide for the appeal to be heard or reheard at the hearing officer or review level; provide for the appeal to be heard at the review level as a potential precedential decision; or provide for the decision to be rewritten without further hearing at the review level. When a further hearing is provided or the decision is rewritten, the commission may affirm, modify, or reverse the previous decision. If a member of the commission is unable or unavailable to consider an appeal allowed by the commission, the other members of the commission may appoint a hearing officer as a temporary commissioner to fulfill the unable or unavailable commissioner's duties with respect to the appeal. The members of the commission may not appoint the hearing officer who decided the appeal at the hearing officer level. (7) NOTICES The commission shall send written notice to all interested parties when it orders an appeal to be heard or reheard. The notice shall include the reasons for the hearing or rehearing. (8) PRECEDENTIAL An appeal the commission identifies as potentially precedential shall be heard at the review level. In the notice for that type of hearing, the commission shall notify the director, all interested parties, and any other parties, as the commission determines appropriate, that the appeal is designated as potentially precedential. After the hearing, parties shall be given the opportunity to submit briefs on the issue or issues involved. The commission may designate a decision as precedential after issuing the decision or at any point in the appeal process, even if the commission does not initially identify the appeal as potentially precedential. (9) MASS APPEALS When the commission determines that it has five appeals pending that have common facts or common issues, the commission may transfer the appeals to the review level on its own motion to be heard as a mass appeal, including appeals from claimants separated due to a labor dispute, on the condition that there are fewer than twenty-five claimants involved. To facilitate a mass hearing, the commission may allow an authorized agent to accept notice of hearing on behalf of claimants. An authorized agent may waive this notice of hearing and also the sending of decisions to individual claimants represented by the agent. (D) SPECIAL PROVISIONS (1) TIMELINESS OF APPEALS The date of the mailing provided by the director or the commission is sufficient evidence upon which to conclude that a determination, redetermination, or decision was sent to the party on that date. Appeals may be filed with the director, commission, with an employee of another state or federal agency charged with the duty of accepting claims, or with the unemployment insurance commission of Canada. Any timely written notice by an interested party indicating a desire to appeal shall be accepted. The director, commission, or authorized agent must receive the appeal within the specified appeal period in order for the appeal to be deemed timely filed, except that: if the United States postal service is used as the means of delivery, the enclosing envelope must have a postmark date or postal meter postmark that is on or before the last day of the specified appeal period; and where the postmark is illegible or missing, the appeal is timely filed if received not later than the end of the fifth calendar day following the last day of the specified appeal period. The director and the commission may adopt rules pertaining to alternate methods of filing appeals under this section. (2) WAIVER Interested parties may waive, in writing, a hearing at either the hearing officer or review level. If the parties waive a hearing, the hearing officer shall issue a decision based on the evidence of record. (3) TELEPHONE HEARINGS Hearing officers may conduct hearings at either the hearing officer or review level in person or by telephone or interactive video conference. The commission shall adopt rules that designate the circumstances under which hearing officers may conduct a hearing by telephone or interactive video conference or grant a party to the hearing the opportunity to object to a hearing by telephone or interactive video conference. An interested party whose hearing would be by telephone or interactive video conference may elect to have an in-person hearing, provided that the party agrees to have the hearing at the time and place the commission determines pursuant to rule. (4) EVENING HEARINGS Unless the commission grants a request for an evening telephone or interactive video conference hearing, hearing officers shall conduct hearings at the hearing officer and review level during normal business hours. An interested party who is regularly employed throughout those hours may request to have a hearing by telephone or interactive video conference during the evening. The commission shall grant or deny a request for an evening telephone or interactive video conference hearing. If a conflict concerning a request for an evening hearing and an in-person hearing arises, the commission shall schedule the hearing by telephone or interactive video conference during evening hours. (5) NO APPEARANCE -- APPELLANT For hearings at either the hearing officer or review level, if the appealing party fails to appear at the hearing, the hearing officer shall dismiss the appeal. The commission shall vacate the dismissal upon a showing that written notice of the hearing was not sent to that party's last known address, or good cause for the appellant's failure to appear is shown to the commission within fourteen days after the hearing date. If the commission finds that the appealing party's reason for failing to appear does not constitute good cause for failing to appear, the commission shall send written notice of that finding, and the appealing party may request a hearing to present testimony on the issue of good cause for failing to appear. The appealing party shall file a request for a hearing on the issue of good cause for failing to appear within ten days after the commission sends written notice indicating a finding of no good cause for failing to appear. (6) NO APPEARANCE -- APPELLEE For hearings at either the hearing officer or review level, if the appellee fails to appear at the hearing, the hearing officer shall proceed with the hearing and shall issue a decision based on the evidence of record. The commission shall vacate the decision upon a showing that written notice of the hearing was not sent to the appellee's last known address, or good cause for the appellee's failure to appear is shown to the commission within fourteen days after the hearing date. (7) AGENT Any appeal or request for review may be executed on behalf of any party or any group of claimants by an agent. (8) COLLATERAL ESTOPPEL No finding of fact or law, decision, or order of the director, hearing officer, the commission, or a reviewing court under this section or section 4141.28 of the Revised Code shall be given collateral estoppel or res judicata effect in any separate or subsequent judicial, administrative, or arbitration proceeding, other than a proceeding arising under this chapter. (9) EXTENSION OF APPEAL PERIODS The time for filing an appeal or a request for review under this section or a court appeal under section 4141.282 of the Revised Code shall be extended in the manner described in the following four sentences. When the last day of an appeal period is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the appeal period is extended to the next work day after the Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. When an interested party provides certified medical evidence stating that the interested party's physical condition or mental capacity prevented the interested party from filing an appeal or request for review under this section within the appropriate twenty-one-day period, the appeal period is extended to twenty-one days after the end of the physical or mental condition, and the appeal or request for review is considered timely filed if filed within that extended period. When an interested party provides evidence, which evidence may consist of testimony from the interested party, that is sufficient to establish that the party did not actually receive the determination or decision within the applicable appeal period under this section, and the director or the commission finds that the interested party did not actually receive the determination or decision within the applicable appeal period, then the appeal period is extended to twenty-one days after the interested party actually receives the determination or decision. When an interested party provides evidence, which evidence may consist of testimony from the interested party, that is sufficient to establish that the party did not actually receive a decision within the thirty-day appeal period provided in section 4141.282 of the Revised Code, and a court of common pleas finds that the interested party did not actually receive the decision within that thirty-day appeal period, then the appeal period is extended to thirty days after the interested party actually receives the decision. Sec. 4141.29. Each eligible individual shall receive benefits as compensation for loss of remuneration due to involuntary total or partial unemployment in the amounts and subject to the conditions stipulated in this chapter. (A) No individual is entitled to a waiting period or benefits for any week unless the individual: (1) Has filed a valid application for determination of benefit rights in accordance with section 4141.28 of the Revised Code; (2) Has made a claim for benefits in accordance with section 4141.28 of the Revised Code; (3)(a) Has registered for work and thereafter continues to report to an employment office or other registration place maintained or designated by the director of job and family services. Registration shall be made in accordance with the time limits, frequency, and manner prescribed by the director. (b) For purposes of division (A)(3) of this section, an individual has "registered" upon doing any of the following: (i) Filing an application for benefit rights; (ii) Making a weekly claim for benefits; (iii) Reopening an existing claim following a period of employment or nonreporting. (c) After an applicant is registered, that registration continues for a period of three calendar weeks, including the week during which the applicant registered. However, an individual is not registered for purposes of division (A)(3) of this section during any period in which the individual fails to report, as instructed by the director, or fails to reopen an existing claim following a period of employment. (d) The director may, for good cause, extend the period of registration. (e) For purposes of this section, "report" means contact by phone, access electronically, or be present for an in-person appointment, as designated by the director. (4)(a)(i) Is able to work and available for suitable work and, except as provided in division (A)(4)(a)(ii) or (iii) of this section, is actively seeking suitable work either in a locality in which the individual has earned wages subject to this chapter during the individual's base period, or if the individual leaves that locality, then in a locality where suitable work normally is performed. (ii) The director may waive the requirement that a claimant be actively seeking work when the director finds that the individual has been laid off and the employer who laid the individual off has notified the director within ten days after the layoff, that work is expected to be available for the individual within a specified number of days not to exceed forty-five calendar days following the last day the individual worked. In the event the individual is not recalled within the specified period, this waiver shall cease to be operative with respect to that layoff. (iii) The director may waive the requirement that a claimant be actively seeking work if the director determines that the individual has been laid off and the employer who laid the individual off has notified the director in accordance with division (C) of section 4141.28 of the Revised Code that the employer has closed the employer's entire plant or part of the employer's plant for a purpose other than inventory or vacation that will cause unemployment for a definite period not exceeding twenty-six weeks beginning on the date the employer notifies the director, for the period of the specific shutdown, if all of the following apply: (I) The employer and the individuals affected by the layoff who are claiming benefits under this chapter jointly request the exemption. (II) The employer provides that the affected individuals shall return to work for the employer within twenty-six weeks after the date the employer notifies the director. (III) The director determines that the waiver of the active search for work requirement will promote productivity and economic stability within the state. (iv) Division (A)(4)(a)(iii) of this section does not exempt an individual from meeting the other requirements specified in division (A)(4)(a)(i) of this section to be able to work and otherwise fully be available for work. An exemption granted under division (A)(4)(a)(iii) of this section may be granted only with respect to a specific plant closing. (b)(i) The individual shall be instructed as to the efforts that the individual must make in the search for suitable work, including that, within six months after October 11, 2013, the individual shall register with the OhioMeansJobs web site, except in any of the following circumstances: (I) The individual is an individual described in division (A)(4)(b)(iii) of this section; (II) Where the active search for work requirement has been waived under division (A)(4)(a) of this section; (III) Where the active search for work requirement is considered to be met under division (A)(4)(c), (d), or (e) of this section. (ii) An individual who is registered with the OhioMeansJobs web site shall receive a weekly listing of available jobs based on information provided by the individual at the time of registration. For each week that the individual claims benefits, the individual shall keep a record of the individual's work search efforts and shall produce that record in the manner and means prescribed by the director. (iii) No individual shall be required to register with the OhioMeansJobs web site if the individual is legally prohibited from using a computer, has a physical or visual impairment that makes the individual unable to use a computer, or has a limited ability to read, write, speak, or understand a language in which the OhioMeansJobs web site is available. (iv) As used in division (A)(4)(b) of this section: (I) "OhioMeansJobs web site" has the same meaning as in section 6301.01 of the Revised Code. (II) "Registration" includes the creation, electronic posting, and maintenance of an active, searchable resume. (c) An individual who is attending a training course approved by the director meets the requirement of this division, if attendance was recommended by the director and the individual is regularly attending the course and is making satisfactory progress. An individual also meets the requirements of this division if the individual is participating and advancing in a training program, as defined in division (P) of section 5709.61 of the Revised Code, and if an enterprise, defined in division (B) of section 5709.61 of the Revised Code, is paying all or part of the cost of the individual's participation in the training program with the intention of hiring the individual for employment as a new employee, as defined in division (L) of section 5709.61 of the Revised Code, for at least ninety days after the individual's completion of the training program. (d) An individual who becomes unemployed while attending a regularly established school and whose base period qualifying weeks were earned in whole or in part while attending that school, meets the availability and active search for work requirements of division (A)(4)(a) of this section if the individual regularly attends the school during weeks with respect to which the individual claims unemployment benefits and makes self available on any shift of hours for suitable employment with the individual's most recent employer or any other employer in the individual's base period, or for any other suitable employment to which the individual is directed, under this chapter. (e) An individual who is a member in good standing with a labor organization that refers individuals to jobs meets the active search for work requirement specified in division (A)(4)(a) of this section if the individual provides documentation that the individual is eligible for a referral or placement upon request and in a manner prescribed by the director. (f) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, no otherwise eligible individual shall be denied benefits for any week because the individual is in training approved under section 236(a)(1) of the "Trade Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 1978, 19 U.S.C.A. 2296, nor shall that individual be denied benefits by reason of leaving work to enter such training, provided the work left is not suitable employment, or because of the application to any week in training of provisions in this chapter, or any applicable federal unemployment compensation law, relating to availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work. For the purposes of division (A)(4)(f) of this section, "suitable employment" means with respect to an individual, work of a substantially equal or higher skill level than the individual's past adversely affected employment, as defined for the purposes of the "Trade Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 1978, 19 U.S.C.A. 2101, and wages for such work at not less than eighty per cent of the individual's average weekly wage as determined for the purposes of that federal act. (5) Is unable to obtain suitable work. An individual who is provided temporary work assignments by the individual's employer under agreed terms and conditions of employment, and who is required pursuant to those terms and conditions to inquire with the individual's employer for available work assignments upon the conclusion of each work assignment, is not considered unable to obtain suitable employment if suitable work assignments are available with the employer but the individual fails to contact the employer to inquire about work assignments. (6) Participates in reemployment services, such as job search assistance services, if the individual has been determined to be likely to exhaust benefits under this chapter, including compensation payable pursuant to 5 U.S.C.A. Chapter 85, other than extended compensation, and needs reemployment services pursuant to the profiling system established by the director under division (K) of this section, unless the director determines that: (a) The individual has completed such services; or (b) There is justifiable cause for the claimant's failure to participate in such services. Ineligibility for failure to participate in reemployment services as described in division (A)(6) of this section shall be for the week or weeks in which the claimant was scheduled and failed to participate without justifiable cause. (7) Participates in the reemployment and eligibility assessment program, or other reemployment services, as required by the director. As used in division (A)(7) of this section, "reemployment services" includes job search assistance activities, skills assessments, and the provision of labor market statistics or analysis. (a) For purposes of division (A)(7) of this section, participation is required unless the director determines that either of the following circumstances applies to the individual: (i) The individual has completed similar services. (ii) Justifiable cause exists for the failure of the individual to participate in those services. (b) Within six months after October 11, 2013, notwithstanding any earlier contact an individual may have had with a local OhioMeansJobs center, as defined in section 6301.01 of the Revised Code, beginning with the eighth week after the week during which an individual first files a valid application for determination of benefit rights in the individual's benefit year, the individual shall report to a local OhioMeansJobs center for reemployment services in the manner prescribed by the director. (c) An individual whose active search for work requirement has been waived under division (A)(4)(a) of this section or is considered to be satisfied under division (A)(4)(c), (d), or (e) of this section is exempt from the requirements of division (A)(7) of this section. (B) An individual suffering total or partial unemployment is eligible for benefits for unemployment occurring subsequent to a waiting period of one week and no benefits shall be payable during this required waiting period. Not more than one week of waiting period shall be required of any individual in any benefit year in order to establish the individual's eligibility for total or partial unemployment benefits. (C) The waiting period for total or partial unemployment shall commence on the first day of the first week with respect to which the individual first files a claim for benefits at an employment office or other place of registration maintained or designated by the director or on the first day of the first week with respect to which the individual has otherwise filed a claim for benefits in accordance with the rules of the department of job and family services, provided such claim is allowed by the director. (D) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, no individual may serve a waiting period or be paid benefits under the following conditions: (1) For any week with respect to which the director finds that: (a) The individual's unemployment was due to a labor dispute other than a lockout at any factory, establishment, or other premises located in this or any other state and owned or operated by the employer by which the individual is or was last employed; and for so long as the individual's unemployment is due to such labor dispute. No individual shall be disqualified under this provision if either of the following applies: (i) The individual's employment was with such employer at any factory, establishment, or premises located in this state, owned or operated by such employer, other than the factory, establishment, or premises at which the labor dispute exists, if it is shown that the individual is not financing, participating in, or directly interested in such labor dispute; (ii) The individual's employment was with an employer not involved in the labor dispute but whose place of business was located within the same premises as the employer engaged in the dispute, unless the individual's employer is a wholly owned subsidiary of the employer engaged in the dispute, or unless the individual actively participates in or voluntarily stops work because of such dispute. If it is established that the claimant was laid off for an indefinite period and not recalled to work prior to the dispute, or was separated by the employer prior to the dispute for reasons other than the labor dispute, or that the individual obtained a bona fide job with another employer while the dispute was still in progress, such labor dispute shall not render the employee ineligible for benefits. (b) The individual has been given a disciplinary layoff for misconduct in connection with the individual's work. (2) For the duration of the individual's unemployment if the director finds that: (a) The individual quit work without just cause or has been discharged for just cause in connection with the individual's work, provided division (D)(2) of this section does not apply to the separation of a person under any of the following circumstances: (i) Separation from employment for the purpose of entering the armed forces of the United States if the individual is inducted into the armed forces within one of the following periods: (I) Thirty days after separation; (II) One hundred eighty days after separation if the individual's date of induction is delayed solely at the discretion of the armed forces. (ii) Separation from employment pursuant to a labor-management contract or agreement, or pursuant to an established employer plan, program, or policy, which permits the employee, because of lack of work, to accept a separation from employment; (iii) The individual has left employment to accept a recall from a prior employer or, except as provided in division (D)(2)(a)(iv) of this section, to accept other employment as provided under section 4141.291 of the Revised Code, or left or was separated from employment that was concurrent employment at the time of the most recent separation or within six weeks prior to the most recent separation where the remuneration, hours, or other conditions of such concurrent employment were substantially less favorable than the individual's most recent employment and where such employment, if offered as new work, would be considered not suitable under the provisions of divisions (E) and (F) of this section. Any benefits that would otherwise be chargeable to the account of the employer from whom an individual has left employment or was separated from employment that was concurrent employment under conditions described in division (D)(2)(a)(iii) of this section, shall instead be charged to the mutualized account created by division (B) of section 4141.25 of the Revised Code, except that any benefits chargeable to the account of a reimbursing employer under division (D)(2)(a)(iii) of this section shall be charged to the account of the reimbursing employer and not to the mutualized account, except as provided in division (D)(2) of section 4141.24 of the Revised Code. (iv) When an individual has been issued a definite layoff date by the individual's employer and before the layoff date, the individual quits to accept other employment, the provisions of division (D)(2)(a)(iii) of this section apply and no disqualification shall be imposed under division (D) of this section. However, if the individual fails to meet the employment and earnings requirements of division (A)(2) of section 4141.291 of the Revised Code, then the individual, pursuant to division (A)(5) of this section, shall be ineligible for benefits for any week of unemployment that occurs prior to the layoff date. (v) The individual's spouse is a member of the armed forces of the United States who is on active duty or a member of the commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration or public health service, the spouse is the subject of a transfer, the individual left employment to accompany the individual's spouse to a location from which it is impractical to commute to the individual's place of employment, and upon arrival at the new place of residence, the individual is in all respects able and available for suitable work. For purpose purposes of division (D)(2)(a)(v) of this section, "active duty" and "armed forces" have the same meanings as in 10 U.S.C. 101. (b) The individual has refused without good cause to accept an offer of suitable work when made by an employer either in person or to the individual's last known address, or has refused or failed to investigate a referral to suitable work when directed to do so by a local employment office of this state or another state, provided that this division shall not cause a disqualification for a waiting week or benefits under the following circumstances: (i) When work is offered by the individual's employer and the individual is not required to accept the offer pursuant to the terms of the labor-management contract or agreement; or (ii) When the individual is attending a training course pursuant to division (A)(4) of this section except, in the event of a refusal to accept an offer of suitable work or a refusal or failure to investigate a referral, benefits thereafter paid to such individual shall not be charged to the account of any employer and, except as provided in division (B)(1)(b) of section 4141.241 of the Revised Code, shall be charged to the mutualized account as provided in division (B) of section 4141.25 of the Revised Code. (c) Such individual quit work to marry or because of marital, parental, filial, or other domestic obligations. (d) The individual became unemployed by reason of commitment to any correctional institution. (e) The individual became unemployed because of dishonesty in connection with the individual's most recent or any base period work. Remuneration earned in such work shall be excluded from the individual's total base period remuneration and qualifying weeks that otherwise would be credited to the individual for such work in the individual's base period shall not be credited for the purpose of determining the total benefits to which the individual is eligible and the weekly benefit amount to be paid under section 4141.30 of the Revised Code. Such excluded remuneration and noncredited qualifying weeks shall be excluded from the calculation of the maximum amount to be charged, under division (D) of section 4141.24 and section 4141.33 of the Revised Code, against the accounts of the individual's base period employers. In addition, no benefits shall thereafter be paid to the individual based upon such excluded remuneration or noncredited qualifying weeks. For purposes of division (D)(2)(e) of this section, "dishonesty" means the commission of substantive theft, fraud, or deceitful acts. (3) For purposes of division (D)(2)(a) of this section, an individual shall be considered to have quit work without just cause if all of the following apply: (a) The individual is provided temporary work assignments by the individual's employer under agreed terms and conditions of employment. (b) The individual is required pursuant to those terms and conditions to inquire with the individual's employer for available work assignments upon the conclusion of each work assignment. (c) Suitable work assignments are available with the employer, but the individual fails to contact the employer to inquire about work assignments. (E) No individual otherwise qualified to receive benefits shall lose the right to benefits by reason of a refusal to accept new work if: (1) As a condition of being so employed the individual would be required to join a company union, or to resign from or refrain from joining any bona fide labor organization, or would be denied the right to retain membership in and observe the lawful rules of any such organization. (2) The position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, lockout, or other labor dispute. (3) The work is at an unreasonable distance from the individual's residence, having regard to the character of the work the individual has been accustomed to do, and travel to the place of work involves expenses substantially greater than that required for the individual's former work, unless the expense is provided for. (4) The remuneration, hours, or other conditions of the work offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than those prevailing for similar work in the locality. (F) Subject to the special exceptions contained in division (A)(4)(f) of this section and section 4141.301 of the Revised Code, in determining whether any work is suitable for a claimant in the administration of this chapter, the director, in addition to the determination required under division (E) of this section, shall consider the degree of risk to the claimant's health, safety, and morals, the individual's physical fitness for the work, the individual's prior training and experience, the length of the individual's unemployment, the distance of the available work from the individual's residence, and the individual's prospects for obtaining local work. (G) The "duration of unemployment" as used in this section means the full period of unemployment next ensuing after a separation from any base period or subsequent work and until an individual has become reemployed in employment subject to this chapter, or the unemployment compensation act of another state, or of the United States, and until such individual has worked six weeks and for those weeks has earned or been paid remuneration equal to six times an average weekly wage of not less than: eighty-five dollars and ten cents per week beginning on June 26, 1990; and beginning on and after January 1, 1992, twenty-seven and one-half per cent of the statewide average weekly wage as computed each first day of January under division (B)(3) of section 4141.30 of the Revised Code, rounded down to the nearest dollar, except for purposes of division (D)(2)(c) of this section, such term means the full period of unemployment next ensuing after a separation from such work and until such individual has become reemployed subject to the terms set forth above, and has earned wages equal to one-half of the individual's average weekly wage or sixty dollars, whichever is less. (H) If a claimant is disqualified under division (D)(2)(a), (c), or (d) of this section or found to be qualified under the exceptions provided in division (D)(2)(a)(i), (iii), (iv), or (v) of this section or division (A)(2) of section 4141.291 of the Revised Code, then benefits that may become payable to such claimant, which are chargeable to the account of the employer from whom the individual was separated under such conditions, shall be charged to the mutualized account provided in section 4141.25 of the Revised Code, provided that no charge shall be made to the mutualized account for benefits chargeable to a reimbursing employer, except as provided in division (D)(2) of section 4141.24 of the Revised Code. In the case of a reimbursing employer, the director shall refund or credit to the account of the reimbursing employer any over-paid benefits that are recovered under division (B) of section 4141.35 of the Revised Code. Amounts chargeable to other states, the United States, or Canada that are subject to agreements and arrangements that are established pursuant to section 4141.43 of the Revised Code shall be credited or reimbursed according to the agreements and arrangements to which the chargeable amounts are subject. (I)(1) Benefits based on service in employment as provided in divisions (B)(2)(a) and (b) of section 4141.01 of the Revised Code shall be payable in the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of other service subject to this chapter; except that after December 31, 1977: (a) Benefits based on service in an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity in an institution of higher education, as defined in division (Y) of section 4141.01 of the Revised Code; or for an educational institution as defined in division (CC) of section 4141.01 of the Revised Code, shall not be paid to any individual for any week of unemployment that begins during the period between two successive academic years or terms, or during a similar period between two regular but not successive terms or during a period of paid sabbatical leave provided for in the individual's contract, if the individual performs such services in the first of those academic years or terms and has a contract or a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform services in any such capacity for any such institution in the second of those academic years or terms. (b) Benefits based on service for an educational institution or an institution of higher education in other than an instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity, shall not be paid to any individual for any week of unemployment which begins during the period between two successive academic years or terms of the employing educational institution or institution of higher education, provided the individual performed those services for the educational institution or institution of higher education during the first such academic year or term and, there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform those services for any educational institution or institution of higher education in the second of such academic years or terms. If compensation is denied to any individual for any week under division (I)(1)(b) of this section and the individual was not offered an opportunity to perform those services for an institution of higher education or for an educational institution for the second of such academic years or terms, the individual is entitled to a retroactive payment of compensation for each week for which the individual timely filed a claim for compensation and for which compensation was denied solely by reason of division (I)(1)(b) of this section. An application for retroactive benefits shall be timely filed if received by the director or the director's deputy within or prior to the end of the fourth full calendar week after the end of the period for which benefits were denied because of reasonable assurance of employment. The provision for the payment of retroactive benefits under division (I)(1)(b) of this section is applicable to weeks of unemployment beginning on and after November 18, 1983. The provisions under division (I)(1)(b) of this section shall be retroactive to September 5, 1982, only if, as a condition for full tax credit against the tax imposed by the "Federal Unemployment Tax Act," 53 Stat. 183 (1939), 26 U.S.C.A. 3301 to 3311, the United States secretary of labor determines that retroactivity is required by federal law. (c) With respect to weeks of unemployment beginning after December 31, 1977, benefits shall be denied to any individual for any week which commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday recess, if the individual performs any services described in divisions (I)(1)(a) and (b) of this section in the period immediately before the vacation period or holiday recess, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform any such services in the period immediately following the vacation period or holiday recess. (d) With respect to any services described in division (I)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section, benefits payable on the basis of services in any such capacity shall be denied as specified in division (I)(1)(a), (b), or (c) of this section to any individual who performs such services in an educational institution or institution of higher education while in the employ of an educational service agency. For this purpose, the term "educational service agency" means a governmental agency or governmental entity that is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing services to one or more educational institutions or one or more institutions of higher education. (e) Any individual employed by a county board of developmental disabilities shall be notified by the thirtieth day of April each year if the individual is not to be reemployed the following academic year. (f) Any individual employed by a school district, other than a municipal school district as defined in section 3311.71 of the Revised Code, shall be notified by the first day of June each year if the individual is not to be reemployed the following academic year. (2) No disqualification will be imposed, between academic years or terms or during a vacation period or holiday recess under this division, unless the director or the director's deputy has received a statement in writing from the educational institution or institution of higher education that the claimant has a contract for, or a reasonable assurance of, reemployment for the ensuing academic year or term. (3) If an individual has employment with an educational institution or an institution of higher education and employment with a noneducational employer, during the base period of the individual's benefit year, then the individual may become eligible for benefits during the between-term, or vacation or holiday recess, disqualification period, based on employment performed for the noneducational employer, provided that the employment is sufficient to qualify the individual for benefit rights separately from the benefit rights based on school employment. The weekly benefit amount and maximum benefits payable during a disqualification period shall be computed based solely on the nonschool employment. (J) Benefits shall not be paid on the basis of employment performed by an alien, unless the alien had been lawfully admitted to the United States for permanent residence at the time the services were performed, was lawfully present for purposes of performing the services, or was otherwise permanently residing in the United States under color of law at the time the services were performed, under section 212(d)(5) of the "Immigration and Nationality Act," 66 Stat. 163, 8 U.S.C.A. 1101: (1) Any data or information required of individuals applying for benefits to determine whether benefits are not payable to them because of their alien status shall be uniformly required from all applicants for benefits. (2) In the case of an individual whose application for benefits would otherwise be approved, no determination that benefits to the individual are not payable because of the individual's alien status shall be made except upon a preponderance of the evidence that the individual had not, in fact, been lawfully admitted to the United States. (K) The director shall establish and utilize a system of profiling all new claimants under this chapter that: (1) Identifies which claimants will be likely to exhaust regular compensation and will need job search assistance services to make a successful transition to new employment; (2) Refers claimants identified pursuant to division (K)(1) of this section to reemployment services, such as job search assistance services, available under any state or federal law; (3) Collects follow-up information relating to the services received by such claimants and the employment outcomes for such claimant's subsequent to receiving such services and utilizes such information in making identifications pursuant to division (K)(1) of this section; and (4) Meets such other requirements as the United States secretary of labor determines are appropriate. (L) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(6) of this section, ineligibility pursuant to division (A) of this section shall begin on the first day of the week in which the claimant becomes ineligible for benefits and shall end on the last day of the week preceding the week in which the claimant satisfies the eligibility requirements. (M) The director may adopt rules that the director considers necessary for the administration of division (A) of this section. Sec. 4141.33. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Reasonable assurance" means a written, verbal, or implied agreement that the individual will perform services in the same or similar capacity during the ensuing sports season or seasonal period. (2) "Seasonal employment" means employment of individuals hired primarily to perform services in an industry which because of climatic conditions or because of the seasonal nature of such industry it is customary to operate only during regularly recurring periods of forty weeks or less in any consecutive fifty-two weeks. (3) "Seasonal employer" means an employer determined by the director of job and family services to be an employer whose operations and business, with the exception of certain administrative and maintenance operations, are substantially all in a seasonal industry. (4) "Significantly" means forty per cent or more of an individual's base period consists of services performed in seasonal employment. (B) Any employer who claims to have seasonal employment in a seasonal industry may file with the director a written application for classification of such employment as seasonal. Whenever in any industry it is customary to operate because of climatic conditions or because of the seasonal nature of such industry only during regularly recurring periods of forty weeks or less duration, benefits shall be payable only during the longest seasonal periods which the best practice of such industry will reasonably permit. The director shall determine, after investigation, hearing, and due notice, whether the industry is seasonal and, if seasonal, establish seasonal periods for such seasonal employer. The director shall make the determination based on the application for classification filed under this section and any other relevant information available. Until such determination by the director, no industry or employment shall be deemed seasonal. (C) When the director has determined such seasonal periods, the director shall also establish the proportionate number of weeks of employment and earnings required to qualify for seasonal benefit rights in place of the weeks of employment and earnings requirement stipulated in division (R) of section 4141.01 and section 4141.30 of the Revised Code, and the proportionate number of weeks for which seasonal benefits may be paid. An individual whose base period employment consists of only seasonal employment for a single seasonal employer and who meets the employment and earnings requirements determined by the director pursuant to this division will have benefit rights determined in accordance with this division, except benefits shall not be paid for any week between two successive seasonal periods. Benefit charges for such seasonal employment shall be computed and charged in accordance with division (D) of section 4141.24 of the Revised Code. The director may adopt rules for implementation of this section. (D) An individual whose base period employment consists of either seasonal employment with two or more seasonal employers or both seasonal employment and nonseasonal employment with employers subject to this chapter, will have benefit rights determined in accordance with division (R) of section 4141.01 and section 4141.30 of the Revised Code. Benefit charges for both seasonal and nonseasonal employment shall be computed and charged in accordance with division (D) of section 4141.24 of the Revised Code. The total seasonal and nonseasonal benefits during a benefit year cannot exceed twenty-six times the weekly benefit amount. Effective October 30, 2011, an individual who performs services that significantly consist of services performed in seasonal employment shall not be paid benefits for those services for any week in the period between two successive seasonal periods if the individual performed those services in the first of the seasonal periods and there is reasonable assurance that the individual will perform those services in the later of the seasonal periods. The director shall adopt rules for the implementation of this division. (E) Benefits shall not be paid to any individual on the basis of any services, substantially all of which consist of participating in sports or athletic events or training or preparing to so participate, for any week which commences during the period between two successive sport seasons, or similar periods, if the individual performed services in the first of the seasons, or similar periods, and there is a reasonable assurance that the individual will perform services in the later of the seasons, or similar periods. (F) The director shall adopt rules concerning the eligibility for benefits of individuals under divisions (D) and (E) of this section. Sec. 4141.56. Beginning one year after the effective date of this section, and every year thereafter, the The director of job and family services annually shall prepare a report and submit a report it by the first day of August to the governor, the president and minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and the minority leader of the house of representatives that discusses . The report shall discuss the utilization of the SharedWork Ohio program created under section 4141.50 of the Revised Code. The director shall include in that report the number of employers and employees participating in the program, the amount of shared work compensation paid under the program during the immediately preceding year, and any other information the director considers to be relevant. Sec. 4141.60. (A) Beginning on the last day of February that occurs after the effective date of this section, and annually thereafter, the The director of job and family services annually shall prepare a report and submit a report it by the first day of August to the persons listed in division (B) of this section. The director shall include all of the following information in the report with respect to the calendar year preceding the date the report is submitted: (1) The number of calls received from applicants for and recipients of benefits under this chapter at all call centers operated by the director; (2) The total number of claims for benefits filed under this chapter; (3) The number of claims for benefits marked as potentially fraudulent; (4) The number of complaints submitted by applicants for and recipients of benefits under this chapter through the uniform process created by the director under section 4141.13 of the Revised Code; (5) A summary of updates or changes to the technology the director uses to administer this chapter that have occurred during the calendar year covered by the report. (B) The director shall submit the report required under division (A) of this section to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the governor, and the members of the unemployment compensation modernization and improvement council. Sec. 4301.12. (A) The division of liquor control shall provide for the custody, safekeeping, and deposit of all moneys, checks, and drafts received by it or any of its employees or agents prior to paying them to the treasurer of state as provided by section 113.08 of the Revised Code. (B) A sum equal to three dollars and thirty-eight cents for each gallon of spirituous liquor sold by the division, JobsOhio, or a designee of JobsOhio during the period covered by the payment shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund. All moneys Except as provided in division (G) of section 4301.30 of the Revised Code, all money received from permit fees, except B-2a, S-1, and S-2 permit fees from B-2a, S-1, and S-2 permit holders who do not also hold A-2 or A-2f permits, shall be paid to the credit of the undivided liquor permit fund established by section 4301.30 of the Revised Code. (C) Except as otherwise provided by law, the division shall deposit all moneys collected under Chapters 4301. and 4303. of the Revised Code into the state treasury to the credit of the state liquor regulatory fund created in section 4301.30 of the Revised Code. In addition, revenue resulting from any contracts with the department of commerce pertaining to the responsibilities and operations described in this chapter may be credited to the fund. (D) Whenever, in the judgment of the director of budget and management, the amount in the liquor control fund is in excess of that needed to meet the maturing obligations of the division, as working capital for its further operations, to pay the operating expenses of the commission, and for the alcohol testing program under section 3701.143 of the Revised Code, the director shall transfer the excess to the credit of the general revenue fund. If the director determines that the amount in the liquor control fund is insufficient, the director may transfer money from the general revenue fund to the liquor control fund. Sec. 4301.19. The division of liquor control shall sell spirituous liquor only, whether from a warehouse or from , a state liquor store or , an agency store, or an A-3a permit premises. All sales shall be in sealed containers and for resale as authorized by this chapter and Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code or for consumption off the premises only. Except as otherwise provided in this section, sale of containers holding one-half pint or less of spirituous liquor by the division shall be made at retail only, and not for the purpose of resale by any purchaser, by special order placed with a state liquor store or agency store and subject to rules established by the superintendent of liquor control. The division may sell at wholesale spirituous liquor in fifty milliliter sealed containers to any holder of a permit issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code that authorizes the sale of spirituous liquor for consumption on the premises where sold. A person appointed by the division to act as an agent for the sale of spirituous liquor pursuant to section 4301.17 of the Revised Code may provide and accept gift certificates and may accept credit cards and debit cards for the retail purchase of spirituous liquor. Deliveries shall be made in the manner the superintendent determines by rule. Subject to division (A)(3) of section 4301.10 and division (A) of section 4301.14 of the Revised Code, if any person desires to purchase any variety or brand of spirituous liquor which is not in stock at the state liquor store or agency store where the variety or brand is ordered, the division shall immediately procure the variety or brand. The purchaser shall be immediately notified upon the arrival of the spirituous liquor at the store at which it was ordered. Unless the purchaser pays for the variety or brand and accepts delivery within five days after the giving of the notice, the division may place the spirituous liquor in stock for general sale. Sec. 4301.30. (A) All Except as provided in division (G) of this section, all fees collected by the division of liquor control shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the undivided liquor permit fund, which is hereby created, at the time prescribed under section 4301.12 of the Revised Code. Each payment shall be accompanied by a statement showing separately the amount collected for each class of permits in each municipal corporation and in each township outside the limits of any municipal corporation in such township. (B)(1) An amount equal to forty-five per cent of the fund shall be paid from the fund into the state liquor regulatory fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The state liquor regulatory fund shall be used to pay the operating expenses of the division of liquor control in administering and enforcing Title XLIII of the Revised Code and the operating expenses of the liquor control commission. Investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. (2) Whenever, in the judgment of the director of budget and management, the amount of money that is in the state liquor regulatory fund is in excess of the amount that is needed to pay the operating expenses of the division in administering and enforcing Title XLIII of the Revised Code and the operating expenses of the commission, the director shall credit the excess amount to the general revenue fund. (C) Twenty per cent of the undivided liquor permit fund shall be paid into the statewide treatment and prevention fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. This amount shall be appropriated by the general assembly, together with an amount equal to one and one-half per cent of the gross profit of the division of liquor control derived under division (B)(4) of section 4301.10 of the Revised Code, to the department of mental health and addiction services. In planning for the allocation of and in allocating these amounts for the purposes of Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code, the department shall comply with the nondiscrimination provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, and any rules adopted under that act. (D) Thirty-five per cent of the undivided liquor permit fund shall be distributed by the superintendent of liquor control at quarterly calendar periods as follows: (1) To each municipal corporation, the aggregate amount shown by the statements to have been collected from permits in the municipal corporation, for the use of the general fund of the municipal corporation; (2) To each township, the aggregate amount shown by the statements to have been collected from permits in its territory, outside the limits of any municipal corporation located in the township, for the use of the general fund of the township, or for fire protection purposes, including buildings and equipment in the township or in an established fire district within the township, to the extent that the funds are derived from liquor permits within the territory comprising such fire district. (E) For the purpose of the distribution required by this section, E, H, and D permits covering boats or vessels are deemed to have been issued in the municipal corporation or township wherein the owner or operator of the vehicle, boat, vessel, or dining car equipment to which the permit relates has the owner's or operator's principal office or place of business within the state. (F) If the division determines that the police or other officers of any municipal corporation or township entitled to share in distributions under this section are refusing or culpably neglecting to enforce this chapter and Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code, or the penal laws of this state relating to the manufacture, importation, transportation, distribution, and sale of beer and intoxicating liquors, or if the prosecuting officer of a municipal corporation or a municipal court fails to comply with the request of the division authorized by division (A)(4) of section 4301.10 of the Revised Code, the division, by certified mail or by electronic means as determined by the superintendent to provide proper notice under the laws of this state, may notify the chief executive officer of the municipal corporation or the board of township trustees of the township of the failure and require the immediate cooperation of the responsible officers of the municipal corporation or township with the division in the enforcement of those chapters and penal laws. Within thirty days after the notice is served, the division shall determine whether the requirement has been complied with. If the division determines that the requirement has not been complied with, it may withhold the distributive share of the municipal corporation or township. This action of the division is reviewable within thirty days thereafter in the court of common pleas of Franklin county. (G) All fees collected by the division of liquor control from the issuance or renewal of B-2a, S-1, and S-2 permits, and paid by B-2a, S-1, and S-2 permit holders who do not also hold A-1 or A-1c permits or A-2 or A-2f permits,the following permits shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the state liquor regulatory fund: (1) B-2a, S-1, and S-2 permits paid by B-2a, S-1, and S-2 permit holders who do not also hold A-1 or A-1c permits or A-2 or A-2f permits; (2) H permits where the permit premises are located outside of this state. Once Once during each fiscal year, an amount equal to fifty per cent of the fees collected shall be paid from the state liquor regulatory fund into the general revenue fund. Sec. 4301.421. (A) For the purposes of section 307.696 of the Revised Code, to pay the expenses of administering the tax, and to pay any or all of the charge the board of elections makes against the county to hold the election on the question of levying the tax, or for those purposes and to provide revenues to the county for permanent improvements, the board of county commissioners may levy a tax on the sale of beer at a rate not to exceed sixteen cents per gallon, on the sale of cider at a rate not to exceed twenty-four cents per gallon, and on the sale of wine and mixed beverages at a rate not to exceed thirty-two cents per gallon. The tax shall be imposed on all beer, cider, wine, and mixed beverages sold for resale at retail in the county, and on all beer, cider, wine, and mixed beverages sold at retail in the county by the manufacturer, bottler, importer, or other person upon which the tax has not been paid. The tax shall not be levied on the sale of wine to be used for known sacramental purposes. The tax may be levied for any number of years not exceeding twenty. The tax shall be in addition to the taxes imposed by sections 4301.42, 4301.43, 4301.432, and 4305.01 of the Revised Code. The tax shall not be considered a cost in any computation required under rules of the liquor control commission regulating minimum prices or mark-ups. Only one sale of the same article shall be used in computing, reporting, and paying the amount of tax due. The tax shall be levied pursuant to a resolution of the county commissioners approved by a majority of the electors in the county voting on the question of levying the tax, which resolution shall specify the rate of the tax, the number of years the tax will be levied, and the purposes for which the tax is levied. The election may be held on the date of a general election or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. If approved by the electors, the tax shall take effect on the first day of the month specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. A copy of the resolution levying the tax and the certification of the board of elections shall be certified to the tax commissioner at least sixty days prior to the date on which the tax is to become effective. A resolution under this section may be joined on the ballot as a single question with a resolution adopted under section 307.697 or 5743.024 of the Revised Code to levy a tax for the same purposes and for the purpose of paying the expenses of administering the tax. The form of the ballot in an election held pursuant to this section shall be as prescribed in section 307.697 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of county commissioners of a county in which a tax is imposed under this section on the effective date of the amendment of this section by H.B. 59 of the 130th general assembly, September 29, 2013, may levy a tax for the purpose of section 307.673 of the Revised Code regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement authorized under that section has been entered into prior to the day the resolution adopted under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section is adopted, for the purpose of reimbursing a county for costs incurred in the construction of a sports facility pursuant to an agreement entered into by the county under section 307.696 of the Revised Code, or for the purpose of paying the costs of capital repairs of and improvements to a sports facility. The tax shall be levied and approved in one of the manners prescribed by division (B)(1) or (2) of this section. (1) The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners not later than September 2, 1995. A board of county commissioners approving a tax under division (B)(1) of this section may approve a tax under division (D)(1) of section 307.697 or division (C)(1) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code at the same time. Subject to the resolution being submitted to a referendum under sections 305.31 to 305.41 of the Revised Code, the resolution shall take effect immediately, but the tax levied pursuant to the resolution shall not be levied prior to the day following the last day that any tax previously levied pursuant to this division may be levied. (2) The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners not later than September 1, 2015, and approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately upon adopting a resolution under division (D)(2) of this section. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as prescribed by division (C) of section 307.697 of the Revised Code, except that the phrase "paying not more than one-half of the costs of providing a sports facility together with related redevelopment and economic development projects" shall be replaced by the phrase "paying the costs of constructing, renovating, improving, or repairing a sports facility and reimbursing a county for costs incurred by the county in the construction of a sports facility," and the phrase ", beginning __________ (here insert the earliest date the tax would take effect)" shall be appended after "years." A board of county commissioners submitting the question of a tax under division (B)(2) of this section may submit the question of a tax under division (D)(2) of section 307.697 or division (C)(2) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code as a single question, and the form of the ballot shall include each of the proposed taxes. If approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the tax shall take effect on the day specified on the ballot, which shall not be earlier than the day following the last day that any tax previously levied pursuant to this division may be levied. The rate of a tax levied pursuant to division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall not exceed the rate specified in division (A) of this section. A tax levied pursuant to division (B)(1) or (2) of this section may be levied for any number of years not exceeding twenty. A board of county commissioners adopting a resolution under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall certify a copy of the resolution to the tax commissioner immediately upon adoption of the resolution. (C) The board of county commissioners of a county whose population is greater than one million one hundred thousand but less than one million three hundred thousand may levy a tax under this division for the purpose of section 307.673 of the Revised Code regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement authorized under that section has been entered into prior to the day the resolution adopted under division (C) of this section is adopted, for the purpose of reimbursing a county for costs incurred in the construction of a sports facility pursuant to an agreement entered into by the county under section 307.696 of the Revised Code, or for the purpose of paying the costs of constructing, equipping, furnishing, maintaining, renovating, improving, or repairing a sports facility. The tax may be levied for any number of years or for a continuing period of time. The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of county commissioners and approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately upon adopting a resolution under division (C) of this section. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as follows or in any other form acceptable to the secretary of state: "For the purpose of ______ (state the purpose or purposes), shall an excise tax be levied by __________ county at the rate of ______ cents per gallon on the sale of beer at wholesale in the county, _____ cents per gallon on the sale of wine and mixed beverages at wholesale in the county, and ____ cents per gallon on the sale of cider at wholesale in the county for ____ (number of years or a continuing period of time), the tax beginning on __________ (the earliest date the tax would take effect)? Yes No " A board of county commissioners submitting the question of a tax under division (C) of this section may submit the question of a tax under section 5743.511, division (E) of section 307.697, or division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code, or all, as a single question, provided that each tax is for the same purpose and period of time and the form of the ballot states the rate of each of the proposed taxes. If approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the tax shall take effect on the date specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. The tax levied under division (C) of this section may be approved and take effect before the expiration of the tax levied under division (B) of this section. The tax levied under division (C) of this section shall supersede and replace any tax levied under division (B) of this section, and the tax levied under division (B) of this section shall no longer be levied once the tax levied under division (C) of this section takes effect. The rate of tax levied pursuant to division (C) of this section on the sale of beer shall not exceed thirty-two cents per gallon, on the sale of cider shall not exceed forty-eight cents per gallon, and on the sale of wine and mixed beverages shall not exceed sixty-four cents per gallon. The tax levied pursuant to division (C) of this section shall be imposed on all beer, cider, wine, and mixed beverages sold for resale at retail in the county, and on all beer, cider, wine, and mixed beverages sold at retail in the county by the bottler, importer, or other person upon which the tax has not been paid. The tax levied pursuant to division (C) of this section shall not be levied on the sale of wine to be used for known sacramental purposes. The tax levied pursuant to division (C) of this section shall be in addition to the taxes imposed by sections 4301.42, 4301.43, 4301.432, and 4305.01 of the Revised Code. The tax levied pursuant to division (C) of this section shall not be considered a cost in any computation required under rules of the liquor control commission regulating minimum prices or mark-ups. Only one sale of the same article shall be used in computing, reporting, and paying the amount of tax due. A board of county commissioners adopting a resolution under division (C) of this section shall certify a copy of the resolution to the tax commissioner immediately upon adoption of the resolution. (D) No tax shall be levied under division (A) of this section on or after September 23, 2008. This division does not apply to a tax levied under division (B) or (C) of this section, and does not prevent the collection of any tax levied under this section before September 23, 2008, so long as that tax remains effective. Sec. 4303.181. (A) Permit D-5a may be issued either to the owner or operator of a hotel or motel that is required to be licensed under section 3731.03 of the Revised Code, that contains at least fifty rooms for registered transient guests or is owned by a state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code or a private college or university, and that qualifies under the other requirements of this section, or to the owner or operator of a restaurant specified under this section, to sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold, and to registered guests in their rooms, which may be sold by means of a controlled access alcohol and beverage cabinet in accordance with division (B) of section 4301.21 of the Revised Code; and to sell the same products in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises as may be sold by holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. The premises of the hotel or motel shall include a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed pursuant to Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and that is affiliated with the hotel or motel and within or contiguous to the hotel or motel, and that serves food within the hotel or motel, but the principal business of the owner or operator of the hotel or motel shall be the accommodation of transient guests. In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5a permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. The owner or operator of a hotel, motel, or restaurant who qualified for and held a D-5a permit on August 4, 1976, may, if the owner or operator held another permit before holding a D-5a permit, either retain a D-5a permit or apply for the permit formerly held, and the division of liquor control shall issue the permit for which the owner or operator applies and formerly held, notwithstanding any quota. A D-5a permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restriction shall be placed on the number of D-5a permits that may be issued. The fee for this permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. (B) Permit D-5b may be issued to the owner, operator, tenant, lessee, or occupant of an enclosed shopping center to sell beer and intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold; and to sell the same products in the same manner and amount not for consumption on the premises as may be sold by holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5b permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as a holder of a D-5 permit. A D-5b permit shall not be transferred to another location. One D-5b permit may be issued at an enclosed shopping center containing at least two hundred twenty-five thousand, but less than four hundred thousand, square feet of floor area. Two D-5b permits may be issued at an enclosed shopping center containing at least four hundred thousand square feet of floor area. No more than one D-5b permit may be issued at an enclosed shopping center for each additional two hundred thousand square feet of floor area or fraction of that floor area, up to a maximum of five D-5b permits for each enclosed shopping center. The number of D-5b permits that may be issued at an enclosed shopping center shall be determined by subtracting the number of D-3 and D-5 permits issued in the enclosed shopping center from the number of D-5b permits that otherwise may be issued at the enclosed shopping center under the formulas provided in this division. Except as provided in this section, no quota shall be placed on the number of D-5b permits that may be issued. Notwithstanding any quota provided in this section, the holder of any D-5b permit first issued in accordance with this section is entitled to its renewal in accordance with section 4303.271 of the Revised Code. The holder of a D-5b permit issued before April 4, 1984, whose tenancy is terminated for a cause other than nonpayment of rent, may return the D-5b permit to the division of liquor control, and the division shall cancel that permit. Upon cancellation of that permit and upon the permit holder's payment of taxes, contributions, premiums, assessments, and other debts owing or accrued upon the date of cancellation to this state and its political subdivisions and a filing with the division of a certification of that payment, the division shall issue to that person either a D-5 permit, or a D-1, a D-2, and a D-3 permit, as that person requests. The division shall issue the D-5 permit, or the D-1, D-2, and D-3 permits, even if the number of D-1, D-2, D-3, or D-5 permits currently issued in the municipal corporation or in the unincorporated area of the township where that person's proposed premises is located equals or exceeds the maximum number of such permits that can be issued in that municipal corporation or in the unincorporated area of that township under the population quota restrictions contained in section 4303.29 of the Revised Code. Any D-1, D-2, D-3, or D-5 permit so issued shall not be transferred to another location. If a D-5b permit is canceled under the provisions of this paragraph, the number of D-5b permits that may be issued at the enclosed shopping center for which the D-5b permit was issued, under the formula provided in this division, shall be reduced by one if the enclosed shopping center was entitled to more than one D-5b permit under the formula. The fee for this permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. (C) Permit D-5c may be issued to the owner or operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed pursuant to Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and that qualifies under the other requirements of this section to sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold, and to sell the same products in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises as may be sold by holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5c permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. To qualify for a D-5c permit, the owner or operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed pursuant to Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter, shall have operated the restaurant at the proposed premises for not less than twenty-four consecutive months immediately preceding the filing of the application for the permit, have applied for a D-5 permit no later than December 31, 1988, and appear on the division's quota waiting list for not less than six months immediately preceding the filing of the application for the permit. In addition to these requirements, the proposed D-5c permit premises shall be located within a municipal corporation and further within an election precinct that, at the time of the application, has no more than twenty-five per cent of its total land area zoned for residential use. A D-5c permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restriction shall be placed on the number of such permits that may be issued. Any person who has held a D-5c permit for at least two years may apply for a D-5 permit, and the division of liquor control shall issue the D-5 permit notwithstanding the quota restrictions contained in section 4303.29 of the Revised Code or in any rule of the liquor control commission. The fee for this permit is one thousand five hundred sixty-three dollars. (D)(1) Permit D-5d may be issued to the owner or operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed pursuant to Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and that is located at an airport operated by a municipal corporation, at an airport operated by a board of county commissioners pursuant to section 307.20 of the Revised Code, at an airport operated by a port authority pursuant to Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code, or at an airport operated by a regional airport authority pursuant to Chapter 308. of the Revised Code. (2) The holder of a D-5d permit may sell either of the following: (a) Beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold. In addition, such consumption may occur in the area of the airport terminal that is restricted to persons taking flights to and from the airport, provided all of the following apply: (i) The airport's governing body authorizes the consumption of beer and intoxicating liquor in that area. (ii) The D-5d permit holder is located in that area. (iii) The airport is a public-use airport, as defined in section 4563.30 of the Revised Code, that has commercial flight activity and has one or more passenger or property screening checkpoints or restricted areas used as security measures. (iv) The beer or intoxicating liquor is served solely in plastic bottles or other plastic containers that clearly identify the D-5d permit holder. (b) The same products in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises where sold as may be sold by the holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. In addition to the privileges authorized in division (D) of this section, the holder of a D-5d permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. (3) A D-5d permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restrictions shall be placed on the number of such permits that may be issued. (4) The fee for the D-5d permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. (E) Permit D-5e may be issued to any nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 501(c)(3), as amended, or that is a charitable organization under any chapter of the Revised Code, and that owns or operates a riverboat that meets all of the following: (1) Is permanently docked at one location; (2) Is designated as an historical riverboat by the Ohio history connection; (3) Contains not less than fifteen hundred square feet of floor area; (4) Has a seating capacity of fifty or more persons. The holder of a D-5e permit may sell beer and intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold. A D-5e permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restriction shall be placed on the number of such permits that may be issued. The population quota restrictions contained in section 4303.29 of the Revised Code or in any rule of the liquor control commission shall not apply to this division, and the division shall issue a D-5e permit to any applicant who meets the requirements of this division. However, the division shall not issue a D-5e permit if the permit premises or proposed permit premises are located within an area in which the sale of spirituous liquor by the glass is prohibited. In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5e permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. The fee for this permit is one thousand two hundred nineteen dollars. (F) Permit D-5f may be issued to the owner or operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and that meets all of the following: (1) It contains not less than twenty-five hundred square feet of floor area. (2) It is located on or in, or immediately adjacent to, the shoreline of, a navigable river. (3) It provides docking space for twenty-five boats. (4) It provides entertainment and recreation, provided that not less than fifty per cent of the business on the permit premises shall be preparing and serving meals for a consideration. In addition, each application for a D-5f permit shall be accompanied by a certification from the local legislative authority that the issuance of the D-5f permit is not inconsistent with that political subdivision's comprehensive development plan or other economic development goal as officially established by the local legislative authority. The holder of a D-5f permit may sell beer and intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold. A D-5f permit shall not be transferred to another location. The division of liquor control shall not issue a D-5f permit if the permit premises or proposed permit premises are located within an area in which the sale of spirituous liquor by the glass is prohibited. In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5f permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. A fee for this permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. As used in this division, "navigable river" means a river that is also a "navigable water" as defined in the "Federal Power Act," 94 Stat. 770 (1980), 16 U.S.C. 796. (G) Permit D-5g may be issued to a nonprofit corporation that is either the owner or the operator of a national professional sports museum. The holder of a D-5g permit may sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold. The holder of a D-5g permit shall sell no beer or intoxicating liquor for consumption on the premises where sold after two-thirty a.m. A D-5g permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restrictions shall be placed on the number of D-5g permits that may be issued. In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5g permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. The fee for this permit is one thousand eight hundred seventy-five dollars. (H)(1) Permit D-5h may be issued to any nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 501(c)(3), as amended, that owns or operates any of the following: (a) A fine arts museum, provided that the nonprofit organization has no less than one thousand five hundred bona fide members possessing full membership privileges; (b) A community arts center. As used in division (H)(1)(b) of this section, "community arts center" means a facility that provides arts programming to the community in more than one arts discipline, including, but not limited to, exhibits of works of art and performances by both professional and amateur artists. (c) A community theater, provided that the nonprofit organization is a member of the Ohio arts council and the American community theatre association and has been in existence for not less than ten years. As used in division (H)(1)(c) of this section, "community theater" means a facility that contains at least one hundred fifty seats and has a primary function of presenting live theatrical performances and providing recreational opportunities to the community. (2) The holder of a D-5h permit may sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold. A D-5h permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restrictions shall be placed on the number of D-5h permits that may be issued. (3) In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5h permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. (4) The fee for a D-5h permit is one thousand eight hundred seventy-five dollars. (I) Permit D-5i may be issued to the owner or operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and that meets all of the following requirements: (1) It is located in a municipal corporation or a township with a population of one hundred thousand or less. (2) It has inside seating capacity for at least one hundred forty persons. (3) It has at least four thousand square feet of floor area. (4) It offers full-course meals, appetizers, and sandwiches. (5) Its receipts from beer and liquor sales, excluding wine sales, do not exceed twenty-five per cent of its total gross receipts. (6) It has at least one of the following characteristics: (a) The value of its real and personal property exceeds seven hundred twenty-five thousand dollars. (b) It is located on property that is owned or leased by the state or a state agency, and its owner or operator has authorization from the state or the state agency that owns or leases the property to obtain a D-5i permit. The holder of a D-5i permit may sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold, and may sell the same products in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises where sold as may be sold by the holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5i permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. A D-5i permit shall not be transferred to another location. The division of liquor control shall not renew a D-5i permit unless the retail food establishment or food service operation for which it is issued continues to meet the requirements described in divisions (I)(1) to (6) of this section. No quota restrictions shall be placed on the number of D-5i permits that may be issued. The fee for the D-5i permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. (J) Permit D-5j may be issued to the owner or the operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code to sell beer and intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold and to sell beer and intoxicating liquor in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises where sold as may be sold by the holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. The holder of a D-5j permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. The D-5j permit shall be issued only within a community entertainment district that is designated under section 4301.80 of the Revised Code. The permit shall not be issued to a community entertainment district that is designated under divisions (B) and (C) of section 4301.80 of the Revised Code if the district does not meet one of the following qualifications: (1) It is located in a municipal corporation with a population of at least one hundred thousand. (2) It is located in a municipal corporation with a population of at least twenty thousand, and either of the following applies: (a) It contains an amusement park the rides of which have been issued a permit by the department of agriculture under Chapter 1711. of the Revised Code. (b) Not less than fifty million dollars will be invested in development and construction in the community entertainment district's area located in the municipal corporation. (3) It is located in a township with a population of at least forty thousand. (4) It is located in a township with a population of at least twenty thousand, and not less than seventy million dollars will be invested in development and construction in the community entertainment district's area located in the township. (5) It is located in a municipal corporation with a population between seven thousand and twenty thousand, and both of the following apply: (a) The municipal corporation was incorporated as a village prior to calendar year 1880 and currently has a historic downtown business district. (b) The municipal corporation is located in the same county as another municipal corporation with at least one community entertainment district. (6) It is located in a municipal corporation with a population of at least ten thousand, and not less than seventy million dollars will be invested in development and construction in the community entertainment district's area located in the municipal corporation. (7) It is located in a municipal corporation with a population of at least three thousand, and not less than one hundred fifty million dollars will be invested in development and construction in the community entertainment district's area located in the municipal corporation. The location of a D-5j permit may be transferred only within the geographic boundaries of the community entertainment district in which it was issued and shall not be transferred outside the geographic boundaries of that district. Not more than one D-5j permit shall be issued within each community entertainment district for each five acres of land located within the district. Not more than fifteen D-5j permits may be issued within a single community entertainment district. Except as otherwise provided in division (J)(4) of this section, no quota restrictions shall be placed upon the number of D-5j permits that may be issued. The fee for a D-5j permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. (K)(1) Permit D-5k may be issued to any nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 501(c)(3), as amended, that is the owner or operator of a botanical garden recognized by the American association of botanical gardens and arboreta, and that has not less than twenty-five hundred bona fide members. (2) The holder of a D-5k permit may sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, on the premises where sold. (3) In addition to the privileges authorized in this division, the holder of a D-5k permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. (4) A D-5k permit shall not be transferred to another location. (5) No quota restrictions shall be placed on the number of D-5k permits that may be issued. (6) The fee for the D-5k permit is one thousand eight hundred seventy-five dollars. (L)(1) Permit D-5l may be issued to the owner or the operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code to sell beer and intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold and to sell beer and intoxicating liquor in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises where sold as may be sold by the holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. The holder of a D-5l permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. (2) The D-5l permit shall be issued only to a premises to which all of the following apply: (a) The premises has gross annual receipts from the sale of food and meals that constitute not less than seventy-five per cent of its total gross annual receipts. (b) The premises is located within a revitalization district that is designated under section 4301.81 of the Revised Code. (c) The premises is located in a municipal corporation or township in which the number of D-5 permits issued equals or exceeds the number of those permits that may be issued in that municipal corporation or township under section 4303.29 of the Revised Code. (d) The premises meets any of the following qualifications: (i) It is located in a county with a population of one hundred twenty-five thousand or less according to the population estimates certified by the department of development services agency for calendar year 2006. (ii) It is located in the municipal corporation that has the largest population in a county when the county has a population between two hundred fifteen thousand and two hundred twenty-five thousand according to the population estimates certified by the department of development services agency for calendar year 2006. Division (L)(2)(d)(ii) of this section applies only to a municipal corporation that is wholly located in a county. (iii) It is located in the municipal corporation that has the largest population in a county when the county has a population between one hundred forty thousand and one hundred forty-one thousand according to the population estimates certified by the department of development services agency for calendar year 2006. Division (L)(2)(d)(iii) of this section applies only to a municipal corporation that is wholly located in a county. (iv) It is located in a township with a population density of less than four hundred fifty people per square mile. For purposes of division (L)(2)(d)(iv) of this section, the population of a township is considered to be the population shown by the most recent regular federal decennial census. (v) It is located in a municipal corporation that is wholly located within the geographic boundaries of a township, provided that the municipal corporation and the unincorporated portion of the township have a combined population density of less than four hundred fifty people per square mile. For purposes of division (L)(2)(d)(v) of this section, the population of a municipal corporation and unincorporated portion of a township is the population shown by the most recent federal decennial census. (vi) It is located in a county with a population of not less than one hundred seventy-two thousand and not more than one hundred ninety-five thousand. For purposes of division (L)(2)(d)(vi) of this section, the population of a county is the population shown by the most recent decennial census. (vii) It is located in a municipal corporation with a population of less than ten thousand and the municipal corporation is located in a county with a population of more than one million. For purposes of division (L)(2)(d)(vii) of this section, the population of a municipal corporation and a county is the population shown by the most recent decennial census. (3) The location of a D-5l permit may be transferred only within the geographic boundaries of the revitalization district in which it was issued and shall not be transferred outside the geographic boundaries of that district. (4) Not more than one D-5l permit shall be issued within each revitalization district for each five acres of land located within the district. Not more than fifteen D-5l permits may be issued within a single revitalization district. Except as otherwise provided in division (L)(4) of this section, no quota restrictions shall be placed upon the number of D-5l permits that may be issued. (5) No D-5l permit shall be issued to an adult entertainment establishment as defined in section 2907.39 of the Revised Code. (6) The fee for a D-5l permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. (M) Permit D-5m may be issued to either the owner or the operator of a retail food establishment or food service operation licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and that is located in, or affiliated with, a center for the preservation of wild animals as defined in section 4301.404 of the Revised Code, to sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold, and to sell the same products in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises as may be sold by the holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. In addition to the privileges authorized by this division, the holder of a D-5m permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours of operation, as the holder of a D-5 permit. A D-5m permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restrictions shall be placed on the number of D-5m permits that may be issued. The fee for a permit D-5m is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. (N) Permit D-5n shall be issued to either a casino operator or a casino management company licensed under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code that operates a casino facility under that chapter, to sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold, and to sell the same products in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises as may be sold by the holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. In addition to the privileges authorized by this division, the holder of a D-5n permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours for beer and intoxicating liquor sales, as the holder of a D-5 permit. A D-5n permit shall not be transferred to another location. Only one D-5n permit may be issued per casino facility and not more than four D-5n permits shall be issued in this state. The fee for a permit D-5n shall be twenty thousand dollars. The holder of a D-5n permit may conduct casino gaming on the permit premises notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code or Administrative Code. (O) Permit D-5o may be issued to the owner or operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and that is located within a casino facility for which a D-5n permit has been issued. The holder of a D-5o permit may sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold, and may sell the same products in the same manner and amounts not for consumption on the premises where sold as may be sold by the holders of D-1 and D-2 permits. In addition to the privileges authorized by this division, the holder of a D-5o permit may exercise the same privileges, and shall observe the same hours for beer and intoxicating liquor sales, as the holder of a D-5 permit. A D-5o permit shall not be transferred to another location. No quota restrictions shall be placed on the number of such permits that may be issued. The fee for this permit is two thousand three hundred forty-four dollars. Sec. 4303.183. Permit D-7 may be issued to the holder of any D-2 permit issued by the division of liquor control, or if there is an insufficient number of D-2 permit holders to fill the resort quota, to the operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation required to be licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter and which qualifies under the other requirements of this section, to sell beer and any intoxicating liquor at retail, only by the individual drink in glass and from the container, for consumption on the premises where sold. Not less than fifty per cent of the business on the permit premises shall be preparing and serving meals for a consideration in order to qualify for and continue to hold such D-7 permit. The permit premises shall be located in a resort area. "Resort area" means a municipal corporation, township, county, or any combination thereof, which provides entertainment, recreation, and transient housing facilities specifically intended to provide leisure time activities for persons other than those whose permanent residence is within the "resort area" and who increase the population of the "resort area" on a seasonal basis, and which experiences seasonal peaks of employment and governmental services as a direct result of population increase generated by the transient, recreating public. A resort season shall begin on the first day of May and end on the last day of October. Notwithstanding section 4303.27 of the Revised Code, such permits may be issued for resort seasons without regard to the calendar year or permit year. Quota restrictions on the number of such permits shall take into consideration the transient population during the resort season, the custom and habits of visitors and tourists, and the promotion of the resort and tourist industry. The fee for this permit is four hundred sixty-nine dollars per monthtwo thousand eight hundred fourteen dollars. Any suspension of a D-7 permit shall be satisfied during the resort season in which such suspension becomes final. If such suspension becomes final during the off-season, or if the period of the suspension extends beyond the last day of October, the suspension or remainder thereof shall be satisfied during the next resort season. The ownership of a D-7 permit may be transferred from one permit holder to another. The holder of a D-7 permit may file an application to transfer such permit to a new location within the same resort area, provided that such permit holder shall be the owner or operator of a retail food establishment or a food service operation, required to be licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code, that operates as a restaurant for purposes of this chapter, at such new location. Sec. 4303.204. (A) The division of liquor control may issue an F-4 permit to an organization or corporation organized not-for-profit in this state to conduct an event that includes the introduction, showcasing, or promotion of Ohio wines, if the event has all of the following characteristics: (1) It is coordinated by that organization or corporation, and the organization or corporation is responsible for the activities at it. (2) It has as one of its purposes the intent to introduce, showcase, or promote Ohio wines to persons who attend it. (3) It includes the sale of food for consumption on the premises where sold. (4) It features any combination of at least three A-2 or A-2f permit holders who sell Ohio wine at it. (B) The holder of an F-4 permit may furnish, with or without charge, wine that it has obtained from the A-2 or A-2f permit holders that are participating in the event for which the F-4 permit is issued, in two-ounce samples for consumption on the premises where furnished and may sell such wine by the glass for consumption on the premises where sold. The holder of an A-2 or A-2f permit that is participating in the event for which the F-4 permit is issued may sell wine that it has manufactured, in sealed containers for consumption off the premises where sold. Wine may be furnished or sold on the premises of the event for which the F-4 permit is issued only where and when the sale of wine is otherwise permitted by law. (C) The premises of the event for which the F-4 permit is issued shall be clearly defined and sufficiently restricted to allow proper enforcement of the permit by state and local law enforcement officers. If an F-4 permit is issued for all or a portion of the same premises for which another class of permit is issued, that permit holder's privileges will be suspended in that portion of the premises in which the F-4 permit is in effect. (D) No F-4 permit shall be effective for more than seventy-two consecutive hours. No sales or furnishing of wine shall take place under an F-4 permit after one a.m. (E) The division shall not issue more than six F-4 permits to the same not-for-profit organization or corporation in any one calendar year. (F) An applicant for an F-4 permit shall apply for the permit not later than thirty days prior to the first day of the event for which the permit is sought. The application for the permit shall list all of the A-2 and A-2f permit holders that will participate in the event for which the F-4 permit is sought. The fee for the F-4 permit is sixty dollars per dayone hundred eighty dollars. The division shall prepare and make available an F-4 permit application form and may require applicants for and holders of the F-4 permit to provide information that is in addition to that required by this section and that is necessary for the administration of this section. (G)(1) The holder of an F-4 permit is responsible for, and is subject to penalties for, any violations of this chapter or Chapter 4301. of the Revised Code or the rules adopted under this and that chapter. (2) An F-4 permit holder shall not allow an A-2 or A-2f permit holder to participate in the event for which the F-4 permit is issued if the A-2 or A-2f or the A-1-A permit of that A-2 or A-2f permit holder is under suspension. (3) The division may refuse to issue an F-4 permit to an applicant who has violated any provision of this chapter or Chapter 4301. of the Revised Code during the applicant's previous operation under an F-4 permit, for a period of up to two years after the date of the violation. (H)(1) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 4301.22 of the Revised Code, an A-2 or A-2f permit holder that participates in an event for which an F-4 permit is issued may donate wine that it has manufactured to the holder of that F-4 permit. The holder of an F-4 permit may return unused and sealed containers of wine to the A-2 or A-2f permit holder that donated the wine at the conclusion of the event for which the F-4 permit was issued. (2) The participation by an A-2 or A-2f permit holder or its employees in an event for which an F-4 permit is issued does not violate section 4301.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4303.2011. (A) As used in this section, "nonprofit organization" means a corporation, association, group, institution, society, or other organization that: (1) Is exempt from federal income taxation; (2) Has a membership of two hundred fifty or more persons. (B) The division of liquor control may issue an F-11 permit to a nonprofit organization to conduct an event if the event has all of the following characteristics: (1) The event is coordinated by the nonprofit organization and the nonprofit organization is responsible for the activities at the event. (2) One of the event's purposes is the introduction, showcasing, or promotion of craft beers manufactured in this state. (3) The event includes the sale of food for consumption on the premises where sold. (4) The event features at least twenty A-1c permit holders, who are members of the nonprofit organization that has organized the event, as participants. The nonprofit organization may allow any number of A-1 permit holders to participate in the event. (C) An F-11 permit holder may sell, at the event, beer that it has purchased from the A-1 or A-1c permit holders that are participating in the event or from the participating A-1 or A-1c permit holder's assigned B-1 permit holder. The F-11 permit holder may sell the beer in four-ounce samples or in containers not exceeding sixteen ounces for consumption on the premises where sold. The F-11 permit holder may sell beer on the F-11 permit premises only where and when the sale of beer is otherwise permitted by law. (D) The F-11 permit holder shall clearly define and sufficiently restrict the premises of the event to allow proper enforcement of the permit by state and local law enforcement officers. If an F-11 permit is issued for all or a portion of the same premises for which another class of permit is issued, that permit holder's privileges are suspended in that portion of the premises in which the F-11 permit is in effect. (E)(1) No F-11 permit is effective for more than seventy-two consecutive hours. However, for purposes of an exposition at the state fairgrounds, an F-11 permit is effective for the duration of the exposition. (2) No sales of beer shall take place under an F-11 permit after one a.m. (F) The division shall not issue more than six F-11 permits to the same nonprofit organization in any one calendar year. (G) An applicant for an F-11 permit shall apply for the permit not later than thirty days prior to the first day of the event for which the permit is sought. In the application, the applicant shall list all of the A-1 and A-1c permit holders that will participate in the event. The fee for the F-11 permit is sixty dollars for each day of the eventone hundred eighty dollars. The division shall prepare and make available an F-11 permit application form and may require applicants for and holders of the F-11 permit to provide information that is in addition to that required by this section and that is necessary for the administration of this section. (H)(1) An F-11 permit holder is responsible, and is subject to penalties, for any violations of this chapter or Chapter 4301. of the Revised Code that occur during the event. (2) An F-11 permit holder shall not allow an A-1 or A-1c permit holder to participate in the event if the A-1 or A-1c permit or, if applicable, the A-1-A permit of that A-1 or A-1c permit holder is under suspension. (3) The division may refuse to issue an F-11 permit to an applicant if both of the following apply: (a) The applicant has pleaded guilty to or has been convicted of violating this chapter or Chapter 4301. of the Revised Code while operating under a previously issued F-11 permit. (b) The violation occurred within the two years preceding the filing of the new F-11 permit application. (I) Notwithstanding any provision of section 4301.24 of the Revised Code or any rule adopted by the liquor control commission to the contrary, employees of an A-1 or A-1c permit holder or B-1 permit holder, or employees or agents of a B-1 permit holder may assist an F-11 permit holder in serving beer at an event for which an F-11 permit is issued. Sec. 4303.233. (A) As used in this section, "personal consumer" means an individual who is at least twenty-one years of age, is a resident of this state, does not hold a permit issued under this chapter, and intends to use wine purchased in accordance with this section for personal consumption only and not for resale or other commercial purposes. (B)(1) The division of liquor control may issue an S-2 permit to a person that manufactures two hundred fifty thousand gallons or more of wine per year. If the person resides outside this state, the person shall comply with the requirements governing the issuance of licenses or permits that authorize the sale of beer or intoxicating liquor by the appropriate authority of the state in which the person resides and by the alcohol and tobacco tax and trade bureau of the United States department of the treasury. (2) An S-2 permit holder may sell wine to a personal consumer by receiving and filling orders that the personal consumer submits to the permit holder. The permit holder shall sell only wine that the permit holder has manufactured to a personal consumer. An S-2 permit holder may use a fulfillment warehouse registered under section 4303.234 of the Revised Code to send a shipment of wine to a personal consumer. A fulfillment warehouse is an agent of an S-2 permit holder and an S-2 permit holder is liable for violations of this chapter and Chapter 4301. of the Revised Code that are committed by the fulfillment warehouse regarding wine shipped on behalf of the S-2 permit holder. (C) An S-2 permit holder shall collect and pay the taxes relating to the delivery of wine to a personal consumer that are levied under sections 4301.421, 4301.43, and 4301.432 and Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code. (D)(1) An S-2 permit holder shall send a shipment of wine that has been paid for by a personal consumer to that personal consumer via an H permit holder. Prior to sending a shipment of wine to a personal consumer, the S-2 permit holder, or an employee of the permit holder, shall make a bona fide effort to ensure that the personal consumer is at least twenty-one years of age. The shipment of wine shall be shipped in a package that clearly states that it contains alcohol. No person shall fail to comply with division (D)(1) of this section. (2) Upon delivering a shipment of wine to a personal consumer, an H permit holder, or an employee of the permit holder, shall verify that the personal consumer is at least twenty-one years of age by checking the personal consumer's driver's or commercial driver's license or identification card issued under sections 4507.50 to 4507.52 of the Revised Code. (3) An S-2 permit holder shall keep a record of each shipment of wine that the permit holder sends to a personal consumer. The records shall be used for all of the following: (a) To provide a copy of each wine shipment invoice to the tax commissioner in a manner prescribed by the commissioner. The invoice shall include the name of each personal consumer that purchased wine from the S-2 permit holder in accordance with this section and any other information required by the tax commissioner. (b) To provide annually in electronic format by electronic means a report to the division. The report shall include the name and address of each personal consumer that purchased wine from the S-2 permit holder in accordance with this section, the quantity of wine purchased by each personal consumer, and any other information requested by the division. If the S-2 permit holder uses a fulfillment warehouse registered under section 4303.234 of the Revised Code to send a shipment of wine on behalf of the S-2 permit holder, the S-2 permit holder need not include the personal consumer information for that shipment in the report. The division shall prescribe and provide an electronic form for the report and shall determine the specific electronic means that the S-2 permit holder must use to submit the report. (c) To notify a personal consumer of any health or welfare recalls of the wine that has been purchased by the personal consumer. (E) An S-2 permit holder shall comply with this chapter, Chapter 4301. of the Revised Code, and any rules adopted by the liquor control commission under section 4301.03 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) An S-2 permit holder shall renew the permit in accordance with section 4303.271 of the Revised Code, except that the renewal shall not be subject to the notice and hearing requirements established in division (B) of that section. (2) The division may refuse to renew an S-2 permit for any of the reasons specified in section 4303.292 of the Revised Code or if the permit holder fails to do any of the following: (a) Collect and pay all applicable taxes specified in division (C) of this section; (b) Pay the permit fee; (c) Comply with this section or any rules adopted by the liquor control commission under section 4301.03 of the Revised Code. (G) The initial fee for the S-2 permit is two hundred fifty dollars. The renewal fee for the S-2 permit is one hundred dollars. Sec. 4305.131. (A) If any permit holder fails to pay the taxes levied by section 4301.42, 4301.43, 4301.432, or 4305.01 of the Revised Code in the manner prescribed by section 4303.33 of the Revised Code, or by section 4301.421 or 4301.424 of the Revised Code in the manner prescribed in section 4301.422 of the Revised Code, and by the rules of the tax commissioner, the commissioner may make an assessment against the permit holder based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. No assessment shall be made against any permit holder for any taxes imposed by section 4301.42, 4301.421, 4301.424, 4301.43, 4301.432, or 4305.01 of the Revised Code more than three years after the last day of the calendar month in which the sale was made or more than three years after the return for that period is filed, whichever is later. This section does not bar an assessment against any permit holder or registrant as provided in section 4303.331 of the Revised Code who fails to file a return as required by section 4301.422 or 4303.33 of the Revised Code, or who files a fraudulent return. A penalty of up to thirty per cent may be added to the amount of every assessment made under this section. The commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of penalties added to assessments made under this section. The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment, signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the permit holder's place of business is located or the county in which the party assessed resides. If the party assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state beer and liquor sales taxes," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment, except as otherwise provided in this chapter and Chapters 4301. and 4307. of the Revised Code. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected under this section shall be considered as revenue arising from the taxes imposed by sections 4301.42, 4301.421, 4301.424, 4301.43, 4301.432, and 4305.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4501.027. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the registrar of motor vehicles may conduct, or authorize a deputy registrar to conduct, any service or transaction authorized or required by law in an electronic or online format rather than in person. The registrar or deputy registrar also may accept electronically any documents required to accompany such service or transaction or any documents approved by the registrar for electronic or online submission and acceptance. (B) The registrar or deputy registrar shall charge the same amount for the electronic or online service or transaction as the registrar or deputy registrar charges for the associated in-person transaction. The registrar or deputy registrar may accept payment for any such service or transaction by a financial transaction device. The registrar or deputy registrar may charge a person who tenders payment for an online service or transaction by means of a financial transaction device any costs the registrar or deputy registrar incurs from accepting payment by the financial transaction device. Sec. 4501.21. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the license plate contribution fund. The fund shall consist of all contributions for specialty license plates paid by motor vehicle registrants and collected by the registrar of motor vehicles pursuant to the Revised Code sections referenced in division (B) of this section. (B) The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar collects in the fund as follows: The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.491 of the Revised Code to the breast cancer fund of Ohio, which shall use that money only to pay for programs that provide assistance and education to Ohio breast cancer patients and that improve access for such patients to quality health care and clinical trials and shall not use any of the money for abortion information, counseling, services, or other abortion-related activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.492 of the Revised Code to the organization cancer support community central Ohio, which shall deposit the money into the Sheryl L. Kraner Fund of that organization. Cancer support community central Ohio shall expend the money it receives pursuant to this division only in the same manner and for the same purposes as that organization expends other money in that fund. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.493 of the Revised Code to the autism society of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for programs and autism awareness efforts throughout the state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.494 of the Revised Code to the national multiple sclerosis society for distribution in equal amounts to the northwestern Ohio, Ohio buckeye, and Ohio valley chapters of the national multiple sclerosis society. These chapters shall use the money they receive under this section to assist in paying the expenses they incur in providing services directly to their clients. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.495 of the Revised Code to the national pancreatic cancer foundation, which shall use the money it receives under this section to assist those who have pancreatic cancer and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.496 of the Revised Code to the Ohio sickle cell and health association, which shall use the contributions to help support educational, clinical, and social support services for adults who have sickle cell disease. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.497 of the Revised Code to the St. Baldrick's foundation, which shall use the contributions for its research and other programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.498 of the Revised Code to special olympics Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions for its programs, charitable efforts, and other activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.499 of the Revised Code to the children's glioma cancer foundation, which shall use the contributions for its research and other programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.4910 of the Revised Code to the KylerStrong foundation, which shall use the contributions to raise awareness of brain cancer caused by diffuse intrinsic pontine glioma and to fund research for the cure of such cancer. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.4911 of the Revised Code to the research institution for childhood cancer at nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the contributions to fund research for the cure of childhood cancers. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.4912 of the Revised Code to the Ben Morrison memorial fund, which shall use the contributions for scholarships and other programs that support mental health. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.50 of the Revised Code to the future farmers of America foundation, which shall deposit the contributions into its general account to be used for educational and scholarship purposes of the future farmers of America foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.501 of the Revised Code to the 4-H youth development program of the Ohio state university extension program, which shall use those contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in conducting its educational activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.502 of the Revised Code to the Ohio cattlemen's foundation, which shall use those contributions for scholarships and other educational activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.505 of the Revised Code to the organization Ohio region phi theta kappa, which shall use those contributions for scholarships for students who are members of that organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.506 of the Revised Code to Ohio demolay, which shall use the contributions for scholarships, educational programs, and any other programs or events the organization holds or sponsors in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.507 of the Revised Code to the Ohio aerospace institute, which shall use those contributions to facilitate student internships in aerospace and educational programming. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.508 of the Revised Code to the organization bottoms up diaper drive to provide funding for that organization for collecting and delivering diapers to parents in need. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.509 of the Revised Code to a kid again, incorporated for distribution in equal amounts to the Ohio chapters of a kid again. The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.51 of the Revised Code to the university or college whose name or marking or design appears on collegiate license plates that are issued to a person under that section. A university or college that receives contributions from the fund shall deposit the contributions into its general scholarship fund. The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.512 of the Revised Code to the Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega chapter in Ohio. The Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega chapter shall use the contributions for the development and perpetuation of scholarship, leadership, citizenship, fidelity, and brotherhood among men and youth in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.514 of the Revised Code to the university of Notre Dame in South Bend, Indiana, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the university of Notre Dame to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.516 of the Revised Code to Marshall university in Huntington, West Virginia, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with Marshall university to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.517 of the Revised Code to the university of Alabama in Tuscaloosa, Alabama, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the university of Alabama to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.518 of the Revised Code to the Nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the contributions for the "On Our Sleeves" campaign. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.519 of the Revised Code equally to NAMI Ohio (national alliance on mental illness of Ohio), Ohio peer recovery organizations, and OCAAR (Ohio citizen advocates for addiction recovery). The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.520 of the Revised Code to Purdue university in West Lafayette, Indiana, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with Purdue university to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.521 of the Revised Code to the Ohio bicycle federation to assist that organization in paying for the educational programs it sponsors in support of Ohio cyclists of all ages. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.522 of the Revised Code to the "friends of Perry's victory and international peace memorial, incorporated," a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state, to assist that organization in paying the expenses it incurs in sponsoring or holding charitable, educational, and cultural events at the monument. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.523 of the Revised Code to the fairport lights foundation, which shall use the money to pay for the restoration, maintenance, and preservation of the lighthouses of fairport harbor. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.524 of the Revised Code to the Massillon tiger football booster club, which shall use the contributions only to promote and support the football team of Washington high school of the Massillon city school district. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.525 of the Revised Code to the United States power squadron district seven which shall annually distribute the contributions in equal amounts to all United States power squadrons located in the state. Each power squadron district shall use the money it receives under this section to pay for the educational boating programs each district holds or sponsors within this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.526 of the Revised Code to the Ohio district Kiwanis foundation of the Ohio district of Kiwanis international, which shall use the money it receives under this section to pay the costs of its educational and humanitarian activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.528 of the Revised Code to the Ohio children's alliance, which shall use the money it receives under this section to pay the expenses it incurs in advancing its mission of sustainably improving the provision of services to children, young adults, and families in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.529 of the Revised Code to the Ohio nurses foundation. The foundation shall use the money it receives under this section to provide educational scholarships to assist individuals who aspire to join the nursing profession, to assist nurses in the nursing profession who seek to advance their education, and to support persons conducting nursing research concerning the evidence-based practice of nursing and the improvement of patient outcomes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.53 of the Revised Code to the Indiana Kentucky Ohio regional council of carpenters. The council shall use the money it receives to assist its members who are experiencing financial hardship. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.531 of the Revised Code to the thank you foundation, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state, to assist that organization in paying for the charitable activities and programs it sponsors in support of United States military personnel, veterans, and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.532 of the Revised Code to the Ohio history connection, which shall use the contributions for the benefit of the Paul Laurence Dunbar house. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.533 of the Revised Code to the nonprofit organization Ohio conference of teamsters and industry health and welfare fund, which shall use the contributions to further the nonprofit's mission. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.534 of the Revised Code to the disabled American veterans department of Ohio, to be used for programs that serve disabled American veterans and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.536 of the Revised Code to save a warrior, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to prevent suicide by active members of the armed forces of the United States, veterans of those armed forces, and first responders. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.542 of the Revised Code to the Ohio craft brewers association. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.541 of the Revised Code to Dolly Parton's imagination library of Ohio. The library shall use the money it receives under this section for operational costs, including the distribution of books. The registrar shall pay the contributions that are paid to the registrar pursuant to section 4503.545 of the Revised Code to the national rifle association foundation, which shall use the money to pay the costs of the educational activities and programs the foundation holds or sponsors in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.55 of the Revised Code to the pro football hall of fame, which shall deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it establishes and which shall be separate and distinct from any other account the pro football hall of fame maintains, to be used exclusively for the purpose of promoting the pro football hall of fame as a travel destination. The registrar shall pay to the Ohio pet fund the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.551 of the Revised Code and any other money from any other source, including donations, gifts, and grants, that is designated by the source to be paid to the Ohio pet fund. The Ohio pet fund shall use the moneys it receives under this section to support programs for the sterilization of dogs and cats and for educational programs concerning the proper veterinary care of those animals, and for expenses of the Ohio pet fund that are reasonably necessary for it to obtain and maintain its tax-exempt status and to perform its duties. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.552 of the Revised Code to the rock and roll hall of fame and museum, incorporated. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.553 of the Revised Code to the Ohio coalition for animals, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the coalition shall distribute the money to its members, and the members shall use the money only to pay for educational, charitable, and other programs of each coalition member that provide care for unwanted, abused, and neglected horses. The Ohio coalition for animals may use a portion of the money to pay for reasonable marketing costs incurred in the design and promotion of the license plate and for administrative costs incurred in the disbursement and management of funds received under this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.554 of the Revised Code to the Ohio state council of the knights of Columbus, which shall use the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.555 of the Revised Code to the western reserve historical society, which shall use the contributions to fund the Crawford auto aviation museum. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.556 of the Revised Code to the Erica J. Holloman foundation, inc., for the awareness of triple negative breast cancer. The foundation shall use the contributions for charitable and educational purposes. The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.557 of the Revised Code to the central Ohio chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities, which shall distribute the contribution to the chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities in whose geographic territory the person who paid the contribution resides. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.559 of the Revised Code to playhouse square, located in Cleveland, Ohio, which shall use the contributions to further its mission of presenting and producing a wide variety of quality performing arts, advancing arts education, and creating a superior destination for entertainment, business, and residential living. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.561 of the Revised Code to the state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., which shall deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it establishes. The special bank account shall be separate and distinct from any other account the state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., maintains and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, restoring, and managing wetlands and conserving wildlife habitat. The state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., annually shall notify the registrar in writing of the name, address, and account to which such payments are to be made. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.562 of the Revised Code to the Mahoning river consortium, which shall use the money to pay the expenses it incurs in restoring and maintaining the Mahoning river watershed. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.564 of the Revised Code to the Glen Helen association to pay expenses related to the Glen Helen nature preserve. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.565 of the Revised Code to the conservancy for Cuyahoga valley national park, which shall use the money in support of the park. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.566 of the Revised Code to the Ottawa national wildlife refuge, which shall use the contributions for wildlife preservation purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.567 of the Revised Code to the girls on the run of Franklin county, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.569 of the Revised Code to the Ohio bird sanctuary, located in Mansfield, Ohio, which shall use the contributions for purposes of its operations, bird care and rehabilitation, and educational programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.576 of the Revised Code to the Ohio state beekeepers association, which shall use those contributions to promote beekeeping, provide educational information about beekeeping, and to support other state and local beekeeping programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.577 of the Revised Code to the national aviation hall of fame, which shall use the contributions to fulfill its mission of honoring aerospace legends to inspire future leaders. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.578 of the Revised Code to keep Ohio beautiful, incorporated, which shall use the contributions towards its mission of empowering Ohio communities to take greater responsibility for improving the local environment through litter prevention, beautification, community greening, waste reduction, and recycling. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.579 of the Revised Code to the national Ohio state coalition-national council of negro women, incorporated, which shall use the contributions for educational purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.581 of the Revised Code to the Ohio past detachment commander's club, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.582 of the Revised Code to the progressive animal welfare society adoption center, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the center. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.583 of the Revised Code to the American legion, department of Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.584 of the Revised Code to the Ohio natural energy foundation to fund scholarships for students pursuing careers in the oil and natural gas industry. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.585 of the Revised Code to the Terrace Park recreation committee, inc. to offer scholarships to young athletes of, and maintain athletic facilities in, the municipal corporation of Terrace Park. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.586 of the Revised Code to the Ohio mountain bike alliance. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.588 of the Revised Code to the Ohio grange patrons of husbandry foundation, which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay to a sports commission created pursuant to section 4503.591 of the Revised Code each contribution the registrar receives under that section that an applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a professional sports team located in the county of that sports commission and that is participating in the license plate program pursuant to division (E) of that section, irrespective of the county of residence of an applicant. The registrar shall pay to a community charity each contribution the registrar receives under section 4503.591 of the Revised Code that an applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a professional sports team that is participating in the license plate program pursuant to division (G) of that section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.592 of the Revised Code to pollinator partnership's monarch wings across Ohio program, which shall use the contributions for the protection and preservation of the monarch butterfly and pollinator corridor in Ohio and for educational programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.594 of the Revised Code to pelotonia, which shall use the contributions for the purpose of supporting cancer research. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.595 of the Revised Code to the Stan Hywet hall and gardens. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.596 of the Revised Code to the Cuyahoga valley scenic railroad. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.597 of the Revised Code to the Circleville pumpkin show, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to promote good will surrounding the Circleville pumpkin show as a nonprofit annual event. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.598 of the Revised Code equally to the Jackson local schools foundation and the Jackson high school alumni association. The foundation and alumni association shall use the contributions for the foundation's and alumni association's purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.67 of the Revised Code to the Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.68 of the Revised Code to the girl scouts of Ohio's heartland. The girl scouts of Ohio's heartland shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner throughout the state to regional councils of the girl scouts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.69 of the Revised Code to the Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.70 of the Revised Code to the charitable foundation of the grand lodge of Ohio, f. & a. m., which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.701 of the Revised Code to the Prince Hall grand lodge of free and accepted masons of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.702 of the Revised Code to the Ohio Association of the Improved Benevolent and Protective Order of the Elks of the World, which shall use the funds for charitable purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.703 of the Revised Code to the Ohio state moose association. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.704 of the Revised Code to the Antioch shrine foundation located in the municipal corporation of Dayton. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.71 of the Revised Code to the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall deposit the fees into its general account to be used for purposes of the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.711 of the Revised Code to the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall deposit the contributions into an account that it creates to be used for the purpose of advancing and protecting the law enforcement profession, promoting improved law enforcement methods, and teaching respect for law and order. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.712 of the Revised Code to Ohio concerns of police survivors, which shall use those contributions to provide whatever assistance may be appropriate to the families of Ohio law enforcement officers who are killed in the line of duty. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.713 of the Revised Code to the greater Cleveland peace officers memorial society, which shall use those contributions to honor law enforcement officers who have died in the line of duty and support its charitable purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.714 of the Revised Code to the Ohio association of chiefs of police. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.715 of the Revised Code to the community foundation of Ohio's electric cooperatives, which shall use the contributions to recognize and memorialize fallen or injured lineworkers and support their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.716 of the Revised Code to the fallen timbers battlefield preservation commission, which shall use the contributions to further the mission of the commission. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.72 of the Revised Code to the organization known on March 31, 2003, as the Ohio CASA/GAL association, a private, nonprofit corporation organized under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code. The Ohio CASA/GAL association shall use these contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in administering a program to secure the proper representation in the courts of this state of abused, neglected, and dependent children, and for the training and supervision of persons participating in that program. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.722 of the Revised Code to the Down Syndrome Association of Central Ohio, which shall use the contributions for advocacy purposes throughout the state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.724 of the Revised Code to the Ohio Chapter of the American Foundation for Suicide Prevention, which shall use the contributions for programs, education, and advocacy purposes throughout the state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.726 of the Revised Code to the Ohio suicide prevention foundation, which shall use the contributions for suicide prevention programs, education, and advocacy. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.725 of the Revised Code to the ALS united Ohio, incorporated, which shall split the contributions between that organization and the ALS association in accordance with any agreement between the two organizations. The contributions shall be used to discover treatments and a cure for ALS, and to serve, advocate for, and empower people affected by ALS to live their lives to the fullest. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.73 of the Revised Code to Wright B. Flyer, incorporated, which shall deposit the contributions into its general account to be used for purposes of Wright B. Flyer, incorporated. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.732 of the Revised Code to the Siegel Shuster society, a nonprofit organization dedicated to commemorating and celebrating the creation of Superman in Cleveland, Ohio. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.733 of the Revised Code to the central Ohio chapter of the juvenile diabetes research foundation, which shall distribute the contributions to the chapters of the juvenile diabetes research foundation in whose geographic territory the person who paid the contribution resides. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.734 of the Revised Code to the Ohio highway patrol auxiliary foundation, which shall use the contributions to fulfill the foundation's mission of supporting law enforcement education and assistance. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.735 of the Revised Code to the heart4seniors/healthcare evolution alert response technology foundation, inc., which shall use the contributions for purposes of the foundation's mission. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.74 of the Revised Code to the Columbus zoological park association, which shall disburse the moneys to Ohio's major metropolitan zoos, as defined in section 4503.74 of the Revised Code, in accordance with a written agreement entered into by the major metropolitan zoos. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.741 of the Revised Code to the Ohio house rabbit rescue, which shall use the contributions for its rescue, adoption, and educational programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.75 of the Revised Code to the rotary foundation, located on March 31, 2003, in Evanston, Illinois, to be placed in a fund known as the permanent fund and used to endow educational and humanitarian programs of the rotary foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.751 of the Revised Code to the Ohio association of realtors, which shall deposit the contributions into a property disaster relief fund maintained under the Ohio realtors charitable and education foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.752 of the Revised Code to buckeye corvettes, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.754 of the Revised Code to the municipal corporation of Twinsburg. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.755 of the Revised Code to the little brown jug society to assist the society in maintaining, promulgating, and operating the little brown jug as part of Ohio's rich harness racing history. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.763 of the Revised Code to the Ohio history connection to be used solely to build, support, and maintain the Ohio battleflag collection within the Ohio history connection. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.764 of the Revised Code to the Medina county historical society, which shall use those contributions to distribute between the various historical societies and museums in Medina county. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.765 of the Revised Code to the Amaranth grand chapter foundation, which shall use the contributions for communal outreach, charitable service, and scholarship purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.766 of the Revised Code to the Ohio society daughters of the American revolution, which shall deposit the contributions into its general account to be used for continuing the organization's endeavors in service, historic preservation, education, and patriotism. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.767 of the Revised Code to folds of honor of central Ohio, which shall use the contributions to provide scholarships to spouses and children either of disabled veterans or of members of any branch of the armed forces who died during their service. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.85 of the Revised Code to the Ohio sea grant college program to be used for Lake Erie area research projects. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.851 of the Revised Code to West Virginia university in Morgantown, West Virginia for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with West Virginia university to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.86 of the Revised Code to the Ohio Lincoln highway historic byway, which shall use those contributions solely to promote and support the historical preservation and advertisement of the Lincoln highway in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.87 of the Revised Code to the Grove City little league dream field fund, which shall use those contributions solely to build, maintain, and improve youth baseball fields within the municipal corporation of Grove City. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.871 of the Revised Code to the Solon city school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.872 of the Revised Code to the Canton city school district. The district may use the contributions for student welfare, but shall not use the contributions for any political purpose or to pay salaries of district employees. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.873 of the Revised Code to Padua Franciscan high school located in the municipal corporation of Parma. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.874 of the Revised Code to St. Edward high school located in the municipal corporation of Lakewood. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.875 of the Revised Code to Walsh Jesuit high school located in the municipal corporation of Cuyahoga Falls. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.876 of the Revised Code to the North Royalton city school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.877 of the Revised Code to the Independence local school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.878 of the Revised Code to the Cuyahoga Heights local school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors, shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.879 of the Revised Code to the west technical high school alumni association, which shall use the contributions for activities sponsored by the association. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.88 of the Revised Code to the Kenston local school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services that assist in developing or maintaining a culture of environmental responsibility and an innovative science, technology, engineering, art, and math (S.T.E.A.M.) curriculum to the school district's students. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.881 of the Revised Code to La Salle high school in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.882 of the Revised Code to St. John's Jesuit high school and academy located in the municipal corporation of Toledo. The school shall use the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance for students attending the school. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.883 of the Revised Code to St. Charles preparatory school located in the municipal corporation of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.884 of the Revised Code to Archbishop Moeller high school located in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.885 of the Revised Code to the Revere schools foundation. The foundation shall use the contributions to promote its mission, including awarding scholarships to honor young people who are meaningfully engaged in their school or community. The foundation shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.886 of the Revised Code to Stephen T. Badin high school in the municipal corporation of Hamilton. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.887 of the Revised Code to Bishop Hartley high school located in the municipal corporation of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.888 of the Revised Code to St. Vincent-St. Mary high school located in the municipal corporation of Akron. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.89 of the Revised Code to the American red cross of greater Columbus on behalf of the Ohio chapters of the American red cross, which shall use the contributions for disaster readiness, preparedness, and response programs on a statewide basis. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.891 of the Revised Code to the Ohio lions foundation. The foundation shall use the contributions for charitable and educational purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.892 of the Revised Code to the Hudson city school district. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.893 of the Revised Code to the Harrison Central jr./sr. high school located in the municipal corporation of Cadiz. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.894 of the Revised Code to the Blanchester schools foundation for funding student scholarships and for funding activities and programs for at-risk students. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.895 of the Revised Code to the Lakeside Chautauqua foundation. The foundation shall use the contributions it receives for conservation and preservation of Lake Erie and the surrounding ecosystem. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.896 of the Revised Code to the American legion auxiliary department of Ohio. The auxiliary department shall use the contributions it receives to support the American legion, current and former military members, and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.899 of the Revised Code to the Cleveland clinic foundation, which shall use the contributions to support Cleveland clinic children's education, research, and patient services. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.90 of the Revised Code to the nationwide children's hospital foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.901 of the Revised Code to the Ohio association for pupil transportation, which shall use the money to support transportation programs, provide training to school transportation professionals, and support other initiatives for school transportation safety. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.902 of the Revised Code to St. Ignatius high school located in the municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.903 of the Revised Code to the Brecksville-Broadview Heights city school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.904 of the Revised Code to the Chagrin Falls exempted village school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.905 of the Revised Code to the Cuyahoga valley career center. The career center shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the career center's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The career center's superintendent or in the career center's superintendent's discretion, the school board or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the career center hires to provide those services. The career center also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the career center to receive training in providing such services to the students of the career center. The career center shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the career center is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The career center shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.906 of the Revised Code to the Stow-Munroe Falls city school district. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.907 of the Revised Code to the Twinsburg city school district. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.908 of the Revised Code to St. Xavier high school located in Springfield township in Hamilton county. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.909 of the Revised Code to the Grandview Heights city school district, which shall use the contributions for its gifted programs and special education and related services. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.92 of the Revised Code to support our troops, incorporated, a national nonprofit corporation, which shall use those contributions in accordance with its articles of incorporation and for the benefit of servicemembers of the armed forces of the United States and their families when they are in financial need. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.931 of the Revised Code to healthy New Albany, which shall use the contributions for its community programs, events, and other activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.932 of the Revised Code to habitat for humanity of Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions for its projects related to building affordable houses. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.933 of the Revised Code to Ohio citizens for the arts foundation, which shall use the contributions for advocacy, education, and professional development programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.934 of the Revised Code to Ohio society for respiratory care of the American association for respiratory care, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to benefit the Ohio society for respiratory care student scholarship fund. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.935 of the Revised Code to Jesup W. Scott high school's principal activities fund. The high school shall use the contributions to enhance learning opportunities for the high school's students. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.936 of the Revised Code to the Hilliard Davidson baseball club, which shall use the contributions to support the team. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.94 of the Revised Code to the Michelle's leading star foundation, which shall use the money solely to fund the rental, lease, or purchase of the simulated driving curriculum of the Michelle's leading star foundation by boards of education of city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school districts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.941 of the Revised Code to the Ohio chapter international society of arboriculture, which shall use the money to increase consumer awareness on the importance of proper tree care and to raise funds for the chapter's educational efforts. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.942 of the Revised Code to zero, the end of prostate cancer, incorporated, a nonprofit organization, which shall use those contributions to raise awareness of prostate cancer, to support research to end prostate cancer, and to support prostate cancer patients and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.943 of the Revised Code to the nonprofit organization weirdo cat lovers of Cleveland, which shall use the contributions to further its mission of assisting pet parents with emergency veterinary bills for their feline companions, providing food and litter to those in economic need, and controlling feral cat populations through the process of trap-neuter-return to the community. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.944 of the Revised Code to the eastern European congress of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for charitable and educational purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.945 of the Revised Code to the Summit metro parks foundation, which shall use the money in support of the Summit county metro parks. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.946 of the Revised Code to the Ohio society, sons of the American revolution, which shall use the contributions for special projects related to historical education. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.951 of the Revised Code to the Cincinnati city school district. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.952 of the Revised Code to Hawken school located in northeast Ohio. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.953 of the Revised Code to Gilmour academy located in the municipal corporation of Gates Mills. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.954 of the Revised Code to University school located in the suburban area near the municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.955 of the Revised Code to Saint Albert the Great school located in North Royalton. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.956 of the Revised Code to the Liberty Center local school district, which shall use the contributions for its gifted programs and special education and related services. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.957 of the Revised Code to John F. Kennedy Catholic school located in Warren. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.958 of the Revised Code to Elder high school located in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students, twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit arts and enrichment at the school, and twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit athletics at the school. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.959 of the Revised Code to the Dublin food pantry, which shall use the contributions to provide food, hygiene products, and other resources to individuals and families experiencing food insecurity. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.961 of the Revised Code to Fairfield senior high school located in the municipal corporation of Fairfield. The high school shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.962 of the Revised Code to Hamilton high school located in the municipal corporation of Hamilton. The high school shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.963 of the Revised Code to Ross high school located in Ross township in Butler county. The high school shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.964 of the Revised Code to Chardon hilltopper gridiron club. The club shall use contributions to fund college and career technical training scholarships for students. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.965 of the Revised Code to the Norton music boosters association. The association shall use the contributions to provide financial assistance to the Norton high school music boosters for equipment, travel, and programming expenses. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.97 of the Revised Code to the friends of united Hatzalah of Israel, which shall use the money to support united Hatzalah of Israel, which provides free emergency medical first response throughout Israel. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.98 of the Revised Code to the Westerville parks foundation to support the programs and activities of the foundation and its mission of pursuing the city of Westerville's vision of becoming "A City Within A Park." (C) All investment earnings of the license plate contribution fund shall be credited to the fund. Not later than the first day of May of every year, the registrar shall distribute to each entity described in division (B) of this section the investment income the fund earned the previous calendar year. The amount of such a distribution paid to an entity shall be proportionate to the amount of money the entity received from the fund during the previous calendar year. Sec. 4501.29. The department of administrative services shall collect user fees from participants in the multi-agency radio communications system (MARCS). The director of administrative services, with the advice of the MARCS steering committee and the consent of the director of budget and management, shall determine the amount of the user fees and the manner by which the fees shall be collected. All moneys from user fees shall be deposited in the MARCS administration fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. All investment earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 4501.30. As used in sections 4501.30 to 4501.303 of the Revised Code: "MARCS" means the multi-agency radio communications system. "P25 standards" means standards for digital radio communications for use by federal, state, provincial, and local public safety agencies in North America to enable communications with other agencies and mutual aid response teams in emergencies. "P25 standards" are the standards produced through the joint efforts of the association of public-safety communications officials, the national association of state technology directors, selected federal agencies, and the national communications system. "P25 system" means a communications system that meets P25 standards and fosters interoperability in mission critical communications as certified by the MARCS steering committee. Sec. 4501.302. (A) The multi-agency radio communications system (MARCS) steering committee is established consisting of the following members: (1) The directors, or designees thereof, of administrative services, public safety, natural resources, transportation, rehabilitation and correction, and budget and management, and the state fire marshal or the state fire marshal's designee; (2) The following members appointed by the governor: (a) One representative of the Ohio chapter of the association of public safety communications officials or its successor organization; (b) One representative of the buckeye state sheriff's association or its successor organization; (c) One representative of the Ohio association of chiefs of police or its successor organization; (d) One representative of the Ohio fire chiefs' association or its successor organization. (3) Two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, one from the majority party and one from the minority party; (4) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party. (B) The director of administrative services or the director's designee shall chair the committee. (C) The committee shall provide assistance to the director of administrative services for effective and efficient implementation of MARCS as well as develop policies for the ongoing management of the system. Upon dates prescribed by the directors of administrative services and budget and management, the MARCS steering committee shall report to the directors on the progress of MARCS implementation and the development of policies related to the system. (D) The committee shall establish a subcommittee to represent MARCS users on the local government level. The chairperson of the subcommittee shall serve as a member of the MARCS steering committee. (E) Divisions (A) to (D) of this section represent the codification of the existing MARCS steering committee and subcommittee. Upon the effective date of this amendment, members of the MARCS steering committee and the subcommittee may continue service on these committees, their terms unaffected by the codification. (F) The MARCS steering committee shall certify that the P25 system complies with P25 standards based on business planning documents it approves. The planning documents shall outline the various end user costs for monthly access to the system depending on the number of MARCS users and including adequate funding for future repairs, maintenance, and upgrades of MARCS statewide. Sec. 4503.038. (A) Not later than ninety days after July 3, 2019, the The registrar of motor vehicles shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing establish a service fee that applies for purposes of sections 4503.03, 4503.036, 4503.042, 4503.10, 4503.102, 4503.12, 4503.182, 4503.24, 4503.44, 4503.65, 4505.061, 4506.08, 4507.24, 4507.50, 4507.52, 4509.05, 4519.03, 4519.05, 4519.10, 4519.56, and 4519.69 of the Revised Code. The service fee shall be five eight dollars. (B) Not later than ninety days after July 3, 2019, the The registrar shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing establish prorated service fees that apply for purposes of multi-year registrations authorized under section 4503.103 of the Revised Code. (C) When a service fee is collected by the registrar, the following portion of the service fee that is not allocated to a deputy registrar but instead is deposited into the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code shall be used exclusively for the state highway patrol for the enforcement of the motor vehicle and traffic laws of Ohio: (1) The three-dollar increase in the service fee under division (A) of this section that is effective on and after the date of this amendment; (2) Any increase in the service fee under division (B) of this section that is effective on and after the effective date of this amendment. Sec. 4503.06. (A) The owner of each manufactured or mobile home that has acquired situs in this state shall pay either a real property tax pursuant to Title LVII of the Revised Code or a manufactured home tax pursuant to division (C) of this section. (B) The owner of a manufactured or mobile home shall pay real property taxes if either of the following applies: (1) The manufactured or mobile home acquired situs in the state or ownership in the home was transferred on or after January 1, 2000, and all of the following apply: (a) The home is affixed to a permanent foundation as defined in division (C)(5) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (b) The home is located on land that is owned by the owner of the home. (c) The certificate of title has been inactivated by the clerk of the court of common pleas that issued it, pursuant to division (H) of section 4505.11 of the Revised Code. (2) The manufactured or mobile home acquired situs in the state or ownership in the home was transferred before January 1, 2000, and all of the following apply: (a) The home is affixed to a permanent foundation as defined in division (C)(5) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (b) The home is located on land that is owned by the owner of the home. (c) The owner of the home has elected to have the home taxed as real property and, pursuant to section 4505.11 of the Revised Code, has surrendered the certificate of title to the auditor of the county containing the taxing district in which the home has its situs, together with proof that all taxes have been paid. (d) The county auditor has placed the home on the real property tax list and delivered the certificate of title to the clerk of the court of common pleas that issued it and the clerk has inactivated the certificate. (C)(1) Any mobile or manufactured home that is not taxed as real property as provided in division (B) of this section is subject to an annual manufactured home tax, payable by the owner, for locating the home in this state. The tax as levied in this section is for the purpose of supplementing the general revenue funds of the local subdivisions in which the home has its situs pursuant to this section. (2) The year for which the manufactured home tax is levied commences on the first day of January and ends on the following thirty-first day of December. The state shall have the first lien on any manufactured or mobile home on the list for the amount of taxes, penalties, and interest charged against the owner of the home under this section. The lien of the state for the tax for a year shall attach on the first day of January to a home that has acquired situs on that date. The lien for a home that has not acquired situs on the first day of January, but that acquires situs during the year, shall attach on the next first day of January. The lien shall continue until the tax, including any penalty or interest, is paid. (3)(a) The situs of a manufactured or mobile home located in this state on the first day of January is the local taxing district in which the home is located on that date. (b) The situs of a manufactured or mobile home not located in this state on the first day of January, but located in this state subsequent to that date, is the local taxing district in which the home is located thirty days after it is acquired or first enters this state. (4) The tax is collected by and paid to the county treasurer of the county containing the taxing district in which the home has its situs. (D) The manufactured home tax shall be computed and assessed by the county auditor of the county containing the taxing district in which the home has its situs as follows: (1) On a home that acquired situs in this state prior to January 1, 2000: (a) By multiplying the assessable value of the home by the tax rate of the taxing district in which the home has its situs, and deducting from the product thus obtained any reduction authorized under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code. The tax levied under this formula shall not be less than thirty-six dollars, unless the home qualifies for a reduction in assessable value under section 4503.065 of the Revised Code, in which case there shall be no minimum tax and the tax shall be the amount calculated under this division. (b) The assessable value of the home shall be forty per cent of the amount arrived at by the following computation: (i) If the cost to the owner, or market value at time of purchase, whichever is greater, of the home includes the furnishings and equipment, such cost or market value shall be multiplied according to the following schedule: 1 2 3 A For the first calendar year in which the home is owned by the current owner x 80% B 2nd calendar year x 75% C 3rd " x 70% D 4th " x 65% E 5th " x 60% F 6th " x 55% G 7th " x 50% H 8th " x 45% I 9th " x 40% J 10th and each year thereafter x 35% The first calendar year means any period between the first day of January and the thirty-first day of December of the first year. (ii) If the cost to the owner, or market value at the time of purchase, whichever is greater, of the home does not include the furnishings and equipment, such cost or market value shall be multiplied according to the following schedule: 1 2 3 A For the first calendar year in which the home is owned by the current owner x 95% B 2nd calendar year x 90% C 3rd " x 85% D 4th " x 80% E 5th " x 75% F 6th " x 70% G 7th " x 65% H 8th " x 60% I 9th " x 55% J 10th and each year thereafter x 50% The first calendar year means any period between the first day of January and the thirty-first day of December of the first year. (2) On a home in which ownership was transferred or that first acquired situs in this state on or after January 1, 2000: (a) By multiplying the assessable value of the home by the effective tax rate, as defined in section 323.08 of the Revised Code, for residential real property of the taxing district in which the home has its situs, and deducting from the product thus obtained the reductions required or authorized under section 319.302, 319.304, or 4503.065 or division (B) of section 323.152, or section 4503.065 of the Revised Code. (b) The assessable value of the home shall be thirty-five per cent of its true value as determined under division (L) of this section. (3) On or before the fifteenth day of January each year, the county auditor shall record the assessable value and the amount of tax on the manufactured or mobile home on the tax list and deliver a duplicate of the list to the county treasurer. In the case of an emergency as defined in section 323.17 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner, by journal entry, may extend the times for delivery of the duplicate for an additional fifteen days upon receiving a written application from the county auditor regarding an extension for the delivery of the duplicate, or from the county treasurer regarding an extension of the time for the billing and collection of taxes. The application shall contain a statement describing the emergency that will cause the unavoidable delay and must be received by the tax commissioner on or before the last day of the month preceding the day delivery of the duplicate is otherwise required. When an extension is granted for delivery of the duplicate, the time period for payment of taxes shall be extended for a like period of time. When a delay in the closing of a tax collection period becomes unavoidable, the tax commissioner, upon application by the county auditor and county treasurer, may order the time for payment of taxes to be extended if the tax commissioner determines that penalties have accrued or would otherwise accrue for reasons beyond the control of the taxpayers of the county. The order shall prescribe the final extended date for payment of taxes for that collection period. (4) After January 1, 1999, the owner of a manufactured or mobile home taxed pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section may elect to have the home taxed pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section by filing a written request with the county auditor of the taxing district in which the home is located on or before the first day of December of any year. Upon the filing of the request, the county auditor shall determine whether all taxes levied under division (D)(1) of this section have been paid, and if those taxes have been paid, the county auditor shall tax the manufactured or mobile home pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section commencing in the next tax year. (5) A manufactured or mobile home that acquired situs in this state prior to January 1, 2000, shall be taxed pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section if no manufactured home tax had been paid for the home and the home was not exempted from taxation pursuant to division (E) of this section for the year for which the taxes were not paid. (6)(a) Immediately upon receipt of any manufactured home tax duplicate from the county auditor, but not less than twenty days prior to the last date on which the first one-half taxes may be paid without penalty as prescribed in division (F) of this section, the county treasurer shall cause to be prepared and mailed or delivered to each person charged on that duplicate with taxes, or to an agent designated by such person, the tax bill prescribed by the tax commissioner under division (D)(7) of this section. When taxes are paid by installments, the county treasurer shall mail or deliver to each person charged on such duplicate or the agent designated by that person a second tax bill showing the amount due at the time of the second tax collection. The second half tax bill shall be mailed or delivered at least twenty days prior to the close of the second half tax collection period. A change in the mailing address, electronic mail address, or telephone number of any tax bill shall be made in writing to the county treasurer. Failure to receive a bill required by this section does not excuse failure or delay to pay any taxes shown on the bill or, except as provided in division (B)(1) of section 5715.39 of the Revised Code, avoid any penalty, interest, or charge for such delay. A policy adopted by a county treasurer under division (A)(2) of section 323.13 of the Revised Code shall also allow any person required to receive a tax bill under division (D)(6)(a) of this section to request electronic delivery of that tax bill in the same manner. A person may rescind such a request in the same manner as a request made under division (A)(2) of section 323.13 of the Revised Code. The request shall terminate upon a change in the name of the person charged with the taxes pursuant to section 4503.061 of the Revised Code. (b) After delivery of the copy of the delinquent manufactured home tax list under division (H) of this section, the county treasurer may prepare and mail to each person in whose name a home is listed an additional tax bill showing the total amount of delinquent taxes charged against the home as shown on the list. The tax bill shall include a notice that the interest charge prescribed by division (G) of this section has begun to accrue. (7) Each tax bill prepared and mailed or delivered under division (D)(6) of this section shall be in the form and contain the information required by the tax commissioner. The commissioner may prescribe different forms for each county and may authorize the county auditor to make up tax bills and tax receipts to be used by the county treasurer. The tax bill shall not contain or be mailed or delivered with any information or material that is not required by this section or that is not authorized by section 321.45 of the Revised Code or by the tax commissioner. In addition to the information required by the commissioner, each tax bill shall contain the following information: (a) The taxes levied and the taxes charged and payable against the manufactured or mobile home; (b) The following notice: "Notice: If the taxes are not paid within sixty days after the county auditor delivers the delinquent manufactured home tax list to the county treasurer, you and your home may be subject to collection proceedings for tax delinquency." Failure to provide such notice has no effect upon the validity of any tax judgment to which a home may be subjected. (c) In the case of manufactured or mobile homes taxed under division (D)(2) of this section, the following additional information: (i) The effective tax rate. The words "effective tax rate" shall appear in boldface type. (ii) The following notice: "Notice: If the taxes charged against this home have been reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax reduction for residences occupied by the owner but the home is not a residence occupied by the owner, the owner must notify the county auditor's office not later than March 31 of the year for which the taxes are due. Failure to do so may result in the owner being convicted of a fourth degree misdemeanor, which is punishable by imprisonment up to 30 days, a fine up to $250, or both, and in the owner having to repay the amount by which the taxes were erroneously or illegally reduced, plus any interest that may apply. If the taxes charged against this home have not been reduced by the 2-1/2 per cent tax reduction and the home is a residence occupied by the owner, the home may qualify for the tax reduction. To obtain an application for the tax reduction or further information, the owner may contact the county auditor's office at __________ (insert the address and telephone number of the county auditor's office)." (d) For a manufactured or mobile home, the tax liability of which has been reduced under section 5705.316 of the Revised Code for the current tax year, the following notice: "Notice: The school district taxes shown due on this bill are reduced only for the current year due to the school district's excess carry-over balance." (E)(1) A manufactured or mobile home is not subject to this section when any of the following applies: (a) It is taxable as personal property pursuant to section 5709.01 of the Revised Code. Any manufactured or mobile home that is used as a residence shall be subject to this section and shall not be taxable as personal property pursuant to section 5709.01 of the Revised Code. (b) It bears a license plate issued by any state other than this state unless the home is in this state in excess of an accumulative period of thirty days in any calendar year. (c) The annual tax has been paid on the home in this state for the current year. (d) The tax commissioner has determined, pursuant to section 5715.27 of the Revised Code, that the property is exempt from taxation, or would be exempt from taxation under Chapter 5709. of the Revised Code if it were classified as real property. (2) A travel trailer or park trailer, as these terms are defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, is not subject to this section if it is unused or unoccupied and stored at the owner's normal place of residence or at a recognized storage facility. (3) A travel trailer or park trailer, as these terms are defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, is subject to this section and shall be taxed as a manufactured or mobile home if it has a situs longer than thirty days in one location and is connected to existing utilities, unless either of the following applies: (a) The situs is in a state facility or a camping or park area as defined in division (C), (Q), (S), or (V) of section 3729.01 of the Revised Code. (b) The situs is in a camping or park area that is a tract of land that has been limited to recreational use by deed or zoning restrictions and subdivided for sale of five or more individual lots for the express or implied purpose of occupancy by either self-contained recreational vehicles as defined in division (T) of section 3729.01 of the Revised Code or by dependent recreational vehicles as defined in division (D) of section 3729.01 of the Revised Code. (F) Except as provided in division (D)(3) of this section, the manufactured home tax is due and payable as follows: (1) When a manufactured or mobile home has a situs in this state, as provided in this section, on the first day of January, one-half of the amount of the tax is due and payable on or before the first day of March and the balance is due and payable on or before the thirty-first day of July. At the option of the owner of the home, the tax for the entire year may be paid in full on the first day of March. (2) When a manufactured or mobile home first acquires a situs in this state after the first day of January, no tax is due and payable for that year. (G)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1)(b) of this section, if one-half of the current taxes charged under this section against a manufactured or mobile home, together with the full amount of any delinquent taxes, are not paid on or before the first day of March in that year, or on or before the last day for such payment as extended pursuant to section 4503.063 of the Revised Code, a penalty of ten per cent shall be charged against the unpaid balance of such half of the current taxes. If the total amount of all such taxes is not paid on or before the thirty-first day of July, next thereafter, or on or before the last day for payment as extended pursuant to section 4503.063 of the Revised Code, a like penalty shall be charged on the balance of the total amount of the unpaid current taxes. (b) After a valid delinquent tax contract that includes unpaid current taxes from a first-half collection period described in division (F) of this section has been entered into under section 323.31 of the Revised Code, no ten per cent penalty shall be charged against such taxes after the second-half collection period while the delinquent tax contract remains in effect. On the day a delinquent tax contract becomes void, the ten per cent penalty shall be charged against such taxes and shall equal the amount of penalty that would have been charged against unpaid current taxes outstanding on the date on which the second-half penalty would have been charged thereon under division (G)(1)(a) of this section if the contract had not been in effect. (2)(a) On the first day of the month following the last day the second installment of taxes may be paid without penalty beginning in 2000, interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent taxes other than the current taxes that became delinquent taxes at the close of the last day such second installment could be paid without penalty. The charge shall be for interest that accrued during the period that began on the preceding first day of December and ended on the last day of the month that included the last date such second installment could be paid without penalty. The interest shall be computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the delinquent manufactured home tax list compiled under division (H) of this section. (b) On the first day of December beginning in 2000, the interest shall be charged against and computed on all delinquent taxes. The charge shall be for interest that accrued during the period that began on the first day of the month following the last date prescribed for the payment of the second installment of taxes in the current year and ended on the immediately preceding last day of November. The interest shall be computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code and shall be entered as a separate item on the delinquent manufactured home tax list. (c) After a valid undertaking has been entered into for the payment of any delinquent taxes, no interest shall be charged against such delinquent taxes while the undertaking remains in effect in compliance with section 323.31 of the Revised Code. If a valid undertaking becomes void, interest shall be charged against the delinquent taxes for the periods that interest was not permitted to be charged while the undertaking was in effect. The interest shall be charged on the day the undertaking becomes void and shall equal the amount of interest that would have been charged against the unpaid delinquent taxes outstanding on the dates on which interest would have been charged thereon under divisions (G)(1) and (2) of this section had the undertaking not been in effect. (3) If the full amount of the taxes due at either of the times prescribed by division (F) of this section is paid within ten days after such time, the county treasurer shall waive the collection of and the county auditor shall remit one-half of the penalty provided for in this division for failure to make that payment by the prescribed time. (4) The treasurer shall compile and deliver to the county auditor a list of all tax payments the treasurer has received as provided in division (G)(3) of this section. The list shall include any information required by the auditor for the remission of the penalties waived by the treasurer. The taxes so collected shall be included in the settlement next succeeding the settlement then in process. (H)(1) The county auditor shall compile annually a "delinquent manufactured home tax list" consisting of homes the county treasurer's records indicate have taxes that were not paid within the time prescribed by divisions (D)(3) and (F) of this section, have taxes that remain unpaid from prior years, or have unpaid tax penalties or interest that have been assessed. (2) Within thirty days after the settlement under division (H)(2) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall deliver a copy of the delinquent manufactured home tax list to the county treasurer. The auditor shall update and publish the delinquent manufactured home tax list annually in the same manner as delinquent real property tax lists are published. The county auditor may apportion the cost of publishing the list among taxing districts in proportion to the amount of delinquent manufactured home taxes so published that each taxing district is entitled to receive upon collection of those taxes, or the county auditor may charge the owner of a home on the list a flat fee established under section 319.54 of the Revised Code for the cost of publishing the list and, if the fee is not paid, may place the fee upon the delinquent manufactured home tax list as a lien on the listed home, to be collected as other manufactured home taxes. (3) When taxes, penalties, or interest are charged against a person on the delinquent manufactured home tax list and are not paid within sixty days after the list is delivered to the county treasurer, the county treasurer shall, in addition to any other remedy provided by law for the collection of taxes, penalties, and interest, enforce collection of such taxes, penalties, and interest by civil action in the name of the treasurer against the owner for the recovery of the unpaid taxes following the procedures for the recovery of delinquent real property taxes in sections 323.25 to 323.28 of the Revised Code. The action may be brought in municipal or county court, provided the amount charged does not exceed the monetary limitations for original jurisdiction for civil actions in those courts. It is sufficient, having made proper parties to the suit, for the county treasurer to allege in the treasurer's bill of particulars or petition that the taxes stand chargeable on the books of the county treasurer against such person, that they are due and unpaid, and that such person is indebted in the amount of taxes appearing to be due the county. The treasurer need not set forth any other matter relating thereto. If it is found on the trial of the action that the person is indebted to the state, judgment shall be rendered in favor of the county treasurer prosecuting the action. The judgment debtor is not entitled to the benefit of any law for stay of execution or exemption of property from levy or sale on execution in the enforcement of the judgment. Upon the filing of an entry of confirmation of sale or an order of forfeiture in a proceeding brought under this division, title to the manufactured or mobile home shall be in the purchaser. The clerk of courts shall issue a certificate of title to the purchaser upon presentation of proof of filing of the entry of confirmation or order and, in the case of a forfeiture, presentation of the county auditor's certificate of sale. (I) The total amount of taxes collected shall be distributed in the following manner: four per cent shall be allowed as compensation to the county auditor for the county auditor's service in assessing the taxes; two per cent shall be allowed as compensation to the county treasurer for the services the county treasurer renders as a result of the tax levied by this section. Such amounts shall be paid into the county treasury, to the credit of the county general revenue fund, on the warrant of the county auditor. Fees to be paid to the credit of the real estate assessment fund shall be collected pursuant to division (C) of section 319.54 of the Revised Code and paid into the county treasury, on the warrant of the county auditor. The balance of the taxes collected shall be distributed among the taxing subdivisions of the county in which the taxes are collected and paid in the same proportions that the amount of manufactured home tax levied by each taxing subdivision of the county in the current tax year bears to the amount of such tax levied by all such subdivisions in the county in the current tax year. The taxes levied and revenues collected under this section shall be in lieu of any general property tax and any tax levied with respect to the privilege of using or occupying a manufactured or mobile home in this state except as provided in sections 4503.04 and 5741.02 of the Revised Code. (J) An agreement to purchase or a bill of sale for a manufactured home shall show whether or not the furnishings and equipment are included in the purchase price. (K) If the county treasurer and the county prosecuting attorney agree that an item charged on the delinquent manufactured home tax list is uncollectible, they shall certify that determination and the reasons to the county board of revision. If the board determines the amount is uncollectible, it shall certify its determination to the county auditor, who shall strike the item from the list. (L)(1) The county auditor shall appraise at its true value any manufactured or mobile home in which ownership is transferred or which first acquires situs in this state on or after January 1, 2000, and any manufactured or mobile home the owner of which has elected, under division (D)(4) of this section, to have the home taxed under division (D)(2) of this section. The true value shall include the value of the home, any additions, and any fixtures, but not any furnishings in the home. In determining the true value of a manufactured or mobile home, the auditor shall consider all facts and circumstances relating to the value of the home, including its age, its capacity to function as a residence, any obsolete characteristics, and other factors that may tend to prove its true value. (2)(a) If a manufactured or mobile home has been the subject of an arm's length sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer within a reasonable length of time prior to the determination of true value, the county auditor shall consider the sale price of the home to be the true value for taxation purposes. (b) The sale price in an arm's length transaction between a willing seller and a willing buyer shall not be considered the true value of the home if either of the following occurred after the sale: (i) The home has lost value due to a casualty. (ii) An addition or fixture has been added to the home. (3) The county auditor shall have each home viewed and appraised at least once in each six-year period in the same year in which real property in the county is appraised pursuant to Chapter 5713. of the Revised Code, and shall update the appraised values in the third calendar year following the appraisal. The person viewing or appraising a home may enter the home to determine by actual view any additions or fixtures that have been added since the last appraisal. In conducting the appraisals and establishing the true value, the auditor shall follow the procedures set forth for appraising real property in sections 5713.01 and 5713.03 of the Revised Code. (4) The county auditor shall place the true value of each home on the manufactured home tax list upon completion of an appraisal. (5)(a) If the county auditor changes the true value of a home, the auditor shall notify the owner of the home in writing, delivered by mail or in person. The notice shall be given at least thirty days prior to the issuance of any tax bill that reflects the change. Failure to receive the notice does not invalidate any proceeding under this section. (b) Any owner of a home or any other person or party that would be authorized to file a complaint under division (A) of section 5715.19 of the Revised Code if the home was real property may file a complaint against the true value of the home as appraised under this section. The complaint shall be filed with the county auditor on or before the thirty-first day of March of the current tax year or the date of closing of the collection for the first half of manufactured home taxes for the current tax year, whichever is later. The auditor shall present to the county board of revision all complaints filed with the auditor under this section. The board shall hear and investigate the complaint and may take action on it as provided under sections 5715.11 to 5715.19 of the Revised Code. (c) If the county board of revision determines, pursuant to a complaint against the valuation of a manufactured or mobile home filed under this section, that the amount of taxes, assessments, or other charges paid was in excess of the amount due based on the valuation as finally determined, then the overpayment shall be refunded in the manner prescribed in section 5715.22 of the Revised Code. (d) Payment of all or part of a tax under this section for any year for which a complaint is pending before the county board of revision does not abate the complaint or in any way affect the hearing and determination thereof. (M) If the county auditor determines that any tax or other charge or any part thereof has been erroneously charged as a result of a clerical error as defined in section 319.35 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall call the attention of the county board of revision to the erroneous charges. If the board finds that the taxes or other charges have been erroneously charged or collected, it shall certify the finding to the auditor. Upon receipt of the certification, the auditor shall remove the erroneous charges on the manufactured home tax list or delinquent manufactured home tax list in the same manner as is prescribed in section 319.35 of the Revised Code for erroneous charges against real property, and refund any erroneous charges that have been collected, with interest, in the same manner as is prescribed in section 319.36 of the Revised Code for erroneous charges against real property. (N) As used in this section and section 4503.061 of the Revised Code: (1) "Manufactured home taxes" includes taxes, penalties, and interest charged under division (C) or (G) of this section and any penalties charged under division (G) or (H)(5) of section 4503.061 of the Revised Code. (2) "Current taxes" means all manufactured home taxes charged against a manufactured or mobile home that have not appeared on the manufactured home tax list for any prior year. Current taxes become delinquent taxes if they remain unpaid after the last day prescribed for payment of the second installment of current taxes without penalty, whether or not they have been certified delinquent. (3) "Delinquent taxes" means: (a) Any manufactured home taxes that were charged against a manufactured or mobile home for a prior year, including any penalties or interest charged for a prior year and the costs of publication under division (H)(2) of this section, and that remain unpaid; (b) Any current manufactured home taxes charged against a manufactured or mobile home that remain unpaid after the last day prescribed for payment of the second installment of current taxes without penalty, whether or not they have been certified delinquent, including any penalties or interest and the costs of publication under division (H)(2) of this section. Sec. 4503.0610. (A) If a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution granting a partial real property tax exemption under section 323.158 of the Revised Code, it also shall adopt a resolution under this section granting a partial manufactured home tax exemption. The partial exemption shall take the form of a reduction each year in the manufactured home tax charged against each manufactured home in the county under section 4503.06 of the Revised Code, by the same percentage by which real property taxes were reduced for the preceding year in the resolution adopted under section 323.158 of the Revised Code. Upon adopting the resolution under this section, the board shall certify copies of it to the county auditor and the tax commissioner. (B) After complying with sections 319.304, 4503.06, and 4503.065 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall reduce the remaining sum to be levied against a manufactured home by the percentage called for in the resolution adopted under division (A) of this section. The auditor shall certify the amount of tax remaining after the reduction to the county treasurer for collection as the manufactured home tax charged and payable on the manufactured home. (C) For each tax year, the county auditor shall certify to the board of county commissioners the total amount by which manufactured home taxes are reduced under this section. At the time of each semi-annual distribution of manufactured home taxes in the county, the board shall pay to the auditor one-half of that total amount. Upon receipt of the payment, the auditor shall distribute it among the various taxing districts in the county as though it had been levied and collected as manufactured home taxes. The board shall make the payment from the county general fund or from any other county revenue that may be used for that purpose. (D) If a board of county commissioners repeals a resolution adopted under section 323.158 of the Revised Code, it also shall repeal the resolution adopted under this section. Sec. 4503.0611. Whenever it is made to appear to the county auditor, based on inspection by the county auditor or based on notice provided to the county auditor, on a form prescribed by the department of taxation, by an owner of the manufactured home or two disinterested persons who are residents of the township or municipal corporation in which the manufactured home is or was situated, that the home is subject to taxation for the current year under section 4503.06 of the Revised Code and has been destroyed or injured after the first day of January of the current year, the county auditor shall investigate the matter, and shall refund or waive the payment of the current year's taxes on such home as prescribed by divisions (A) and (B) of this section. Such notice may also be provided by the manufactured home park operator, as defined in section 4781.01 of the Revised Code, if applicable, provided the notice is accompanied by photographic evidence. If a form has not been filed with the county auditor by either an owner, manufactured home park operator, or two disinterested persons but it appears to the county auditor, based on an inspection and investigation, that the owner's manufactured home is subject to taxation for the current year under section 4503.06 of the Revised Code and has been destroyed or injured after the first day of January of the current year, the auditor may complete the form on behalf of an owner. To obtain a deduction under this section, an owner, manufactured home park operator, or two disinterested persons shall file the form with the county auditor, or the county auditor shall complete the form on behalf of an owner, not later than the thirty-first day of January of the year after the year in which the manufactured home was injured or destroyed. (A) If the auditor determines the injury or destruction occurred during the first half of the calendar year, the auditor shall deduct from the taxes payable on the manufactured home for the current year an amount that, in the county auditor's judgment, bears the same ratio to those taxes as the extent of the injury or destruction bears to the cost or market value of the manufactured home. The auditor shall draw a warrant on the county treasurer to refund that amount. If the taxes have not been paid at the time of the auditor's determination, the auditor may waive the payment of the portion of the tax that would otherwise be refunded under this division. (B) If the auditor determines the injury or destruction occurred during the second half of the calendar year, the auditor shall deduct from the taxes payable on the manufactured home for the current year one-half of the amount that, in the county auditor's judgment, bears the same ratio to those taxes as the extent of the injury or destruction bears to the cost or market value of the manufactured home. The auditor shall draw a warrant on the county treasurer to refund that amount. If the taxes have not been paid at the time of the auditor's determination, the auditor may waive the payment of the portion of the tax that would otherwise be refunded under this division. (C) Taxes refunded under this section shall be paid from the county undivided general property tax fund. Sec. 4503.10. (A) The owner of every snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, and all-purpose vehicle required to be registered under section 4519.02 of the Revised Code shall file an application for registration under section 4519.03 of the Revised Code. The owner of a motor vehicle, other than a snowmobile, off-highway motorcycle, or all-purpose vehicle, that is not designed and constructed by the manufacturer for operation on a street or highway may not register it under this chapter except upon certification of inspection pursuant to section 4513.02 of the Revised Code by the sheriff, or the chief of police of the municipal corporation or township, with jurisdiction over the political subdivision in which the owner of the motor vehicle resides. Except as provided in sections 4503.103 and 4503.107 of the Revised Code, every owner of every other motor vehicle not previously described in this section and every person mentioned as owner in the last certificate of title of a motor vehicle that is operated or driven upon the public roads or highways shall cause to be filed each year, by mail or otherwise, in the office of the registrar of motor vehicles or a deputy registrar, a written or electronic application or a preprinted registration renewal notice issued under section 4503.102 of the Revised Code, the form of which shall be prescribed by the registrar, for registration for the following registration year, which shall begin on the first day of January of every calendar year and end on the thirty-first day of December in the same year. Applications for registration and registration renewal notices shall be filed at the times established by the registrar pursuant to section 4503.101 of the Revised Code. A motor vehicle owner also may elect to apply for or renew a motor vehicle registration by electronic means using electronic signature in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar. Except as provided in division (J) of this section, applications for registration shall be made on blanks furnished by the registrar for that purpose, containing the following information: (1) A brief description of the motor vehicle to be registered, including the year, make, model, and vehicle identification number, and, in the case of commercial cars, the gross weight of the vehicle fully equipped computed in the manner prescribed in section 4503.08 of the Revised Code; (2) The name and residence address of the owner, and the township and municipal corporation in which the owner resides; (3) The district of registration, which shall be determined as follows: (a) In case the motor vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in connection with any established business or branch business, conducted at a particular place, the district of registration is the municipal corporation in which that place is located or, if not located in any municipal corporation, the county and township in which that place is located. (b) In case the vehicle is not so used, the district of registration is the municipal corporation or county in which the owner resides at the time of making the application. (4) Whether the motor vehicle is a new or used motor vehicle; (5) The date of purchase of the motor vehicle; (6) Whether the fees required to be paid for the registration or transfer of the motor vehicle, during the preceding registration year and during the preceding period of the current registration year, have been paid. Each application for registration shall be signed by the owner, either manually or by electronic signature, or pursuant to obtaining a limited power of attorney authorized by the registrar for registration, or other document authorizing such signature. If the owner elects to apply for or renew the motor vehicle registration with the registrar by electronic means, the owner's manual signature is not required. (7) The owner's social security number, driver's license number, or state identification number, or, where a motor vehicle to be registered is used for hire or principally in connection with any established business, the owner's federal taxpayer identification number. The bureau of motor vehicles shall retain in its records all social security numbers provided under this section, but the bureau shall not place social security numbers on motor vehicle certificates of registration. (8) Whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to make an anatomical gift if an applicant has not so certified under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code. The applicant's response shall not be considered in the decision of whether to approve the application for registration. (B)(1) When an applicant first registers a motor vehicle in the applicant's name, the applicant shall provide proof of ownership of that motor vehicle. Proof of ownership may include any of the following: (a) The applicant may present for inspection a physical certificate of title or memorandum certificate showing title to the motor vehicle to be registered in the name of the applicant. (b) The applicant may present for inspection an electronic certificate of title for the applicant's motor vehicle in a manner prescribed by rules adopted by the registrar. (c) The registrar or deputy registrar may electronically confirm the applicant's ownership of the motor vehicle. An applicant is not required to present a certificate of title to an electronic motor vehicle dealer acting as a limited authority deputy registrar in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar. (2) When a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it, each application for registration for a vehicle required to be inspected under that section and those rules shall be accompanied by an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle issued in accordance with that section. (3) An application for registration shall be refused if any of the following applies: (a) The application is not in proper form. (b) The application is prohibited from being accepted by division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code. (c) Proof of ownership is required but is not presented or confirmed in accordance with division (B)(1) of this section. (d) All registration and transfer fees for the motor vehicle, for the preceding year or the preceding period of the current registration year, have not been paid. (e) The owner or lessee does not have an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, and rules adopted under it, if that section is applicable. (4) This section does not require the payment of license or registration taxes on a motor vehicle for any preceding year, or for any preceding period of a year, if the motor vehicle was not taxable for that preceding year or period under sections 4503.02, 4503.04, 4503.11, 4503.12, and 4503.16 or Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code. (5) When a certificate of registration is issued upon the first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the owner, the official issuing the certificate shall indicate the issuance with a stamp on the certificate of title or memorandum certificate or, in the case of an electronic certificate of title or electronic verification of ownership, an electronic stamp or other notation as specified in rules adopted by the registrar, and with a stamp on the inspection certificate for the motor vehicle, if any. (6) The official also shall indicate, by a stamp or by other means the registrar prescribes, on the registration certificate issued upon the first registration of a motor vehicle by or on behalf of the owner the odometer reading of the motor vehicle as shown in the odometer statement included in or attached to the certificate of title. Upon each subsequent registration of the motor vehicle by or on behalf of the same owner, the official also shall so indicate the odometer reading of the motor vehicle as shown on the immediately preceding certificate of registration. (7) The registrar shall include in the permanent registration record of any vehicle required to be inspected under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code the inspection certificate number from the inspection certificate or the alternative emissions certificate number from the alternative emissions certificate that is presented at the time of registration of the vehicle as required under this division. (C)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1) of this section, the The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect an the following additional fee of eleven dollars fees for each application for registration and registration renewal received.: (a) Except as provided in division (C)(1)(b) of this section, a fee of eleven dollars on or before December 31, 2025, and a fee of sixteen dollars on and after January 1, 2026; (b) For vehicles specified in divisions (A)(1) to (21) of section 4503.042 of the Revised Code, the registrar and deputy registrar shall collect an additional a fee of thirty dollars for each application for registration and registration renewal receivedon or before December 31, 2025, and a fee of thirty-five dollars on and after January 1, 2026. No additional fee shall be charged for vehicles registered under section 4503.65 of the Revised Code. The Each additional fee is for the purpose of defraying the department of public safety's costs associated with the administration and enforcement of the motor vehicle and traffic laws of Ohio. Each deputy registrar shall transmit the fees collected under divisions (C)(1) and (3) of this section in the time and manner provided in this section. The registrar shall deposit all moneys received under division (C)(1) of this section into the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition, a charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each reflectorized safety license plate issued, and a single charge of twenty-five cents shall be made for each county identification sticker or each set of county identification stickers issued, as the case may be, to cover the cost of producing the license plates and stickers, including material, manufacturing, and administrative costs. Those fees shall be in addition to the license tax. If the total cost of producing the plates is less than twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of producing the stickers is less than twenty-five cents per sticker or per set issued, any excess moneys accruing from the fees shall be distributed in the same manner as provided by section 4501.04 of the Revised Code for the distribution of license tax moneys. If the total cost of producing the plates exceeds twenty-five cents per plate, or if the total cost of producing the stickers exceeds twenty-five cents per sticker or per set issued, the difference shall be paid from the license tax moneys collected pursuant to section 4503.02 of the Revised Code. (3) The registrar and each deputy registrar shall collect the following additional fee, as applicable, for each application for registration or registration renewal received for any hybrid motor vehicle, plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle, or battery electric motor vehicle: (a) One hundred dollars for a hybrid motor vehicle; (b) One hundred fifty dollars for a plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle; (c) Two hundred dollars for a battery electric motor vehicle. Each fee imposed under this division shall be prorated based on the number of months for which the vehicle is registered. The registrar shall transmit all money arising from each fee to the treasurer of state for distribution in accordance with division (E) of section 5735.051 of the Revised Code, subject to division (D) of section 5735.05 of the Revised Code. (D) Each deputy registrar shall be allowed a fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for each application for registration and registration renewal notice the deputy registrar receives, which shall be for the purpose of compensating the deputy registrar for the deputy registrar's services, and such office and rental expenses, as may be necessary for the proper discharge of the deputy registrar's duties in the receiving of applications and renewal notices and the issuing of registrations. (E) Upon the certification of the registrar, the county sheriff or local police officials shall recover license plates erroneously or fraudulently issued. (F) Each deputy registrar, upon receipt of any application for registration or registration renewal notice, together with the license fee and any local motor vehicle license tax levied pursuant to Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, shall transmit that fee and tax, if any, in the manner provided in this section, together with the original and duplicate copy of the application, to the registrar. The registrar, subject to the approval of the director of public safety, may deposit the funds collected by those deputies in a local bank or depository to the credit of the "state of Ohio, bureau of motor vehicles." Where a local bank or depository has been designated by the registrar, each deputy registrar shall deposit all moneys collected by the deputy registrar into that bank or depository not more than one business day after their collection and shall make reports to the registrar of the amounts so deposited, together with any other information, some of which may be prescribed by the treasurer of state, as the registrar may require and as prescribed by the registrar by rule. The registrar, within three days after receipt of notification of the deposit of funds by a deputy registrar in a local bank or depository, shall draw on that account in favor of the treasurer of state. The registrar, subject to the approval of the director and the treasurer of state, may make reasonable rules necessary for the prompt transmittal of fees and for safeguarding the interests of the state and of counties, townships, municipal corporations, and transportation improvement districts levying local motor vehicle license taxes. The registrar may pay service charges usually collected by banks and depositories for such service. If deputy registrars are located in communities where banking facilities are not available, they shall transmit the fees forthwith, by money order or otherwise, as the registrar, by rule approved by the director and the treasurer of state, may prescribe. The registrar may pay the usual and customary fees for such service. (G) This section does not prevent any person from making an application for a motor vehicle license directly to the registrar by mail, by electronic means, or in person at any of the registrar's offices, upon payment of a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code for each application. (H) No person shall make a false statement as to the district of registration in an application required by division (A) of this section. Violation of this division is falsification under section 2921.13 of the Revised Code and punishable as specified in that section. (I)(1) Where applicable, the requirements of division (B) of this section relating to the presentation of an inspection certificate issued under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it for a motor vehicle, the refusal of a license for failure to present an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate, and the stamping of the inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate by the official issuing the certificate of registration apply to the registration of and issuance of license plates for a motor vehicle under sections 4503.102, 4503.12, 4503.14, 4503.15, 4503.16, 4503.171, 4503.172, 4503.19, 4503.40, 4503.41, 4503.42, 4503.43, 4503.44, 4503.46, 4503.47, and 4503.51 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) The registrar shall adopt rules ensuring that each owner registering a motor vehicle in a county where a motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program is in effect under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it receives information about the requirements established in that section and those rules and about the need in those counties to present an inspection certificate or an alternative emissions certificate with an application for registration or preregistration. (b) Upon request, the registrar shall provide the director of environmental protection, or any person that has been awarded a contract under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, an on-line computer data link to registration information for all passenger cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars that are subject to that section. The registrar also shall provide to the director of environmental protection a magnetic data tape containing registration information regarding passenger cars, noncommercial motor vehicles, and commercial cars for which a multi-year registration is in effect under section 4503.103 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under it, including, without limitation, the date of issuance of the multi-year registration, the registration deadline established under rules adopted under section 4503.101 of the Revised Code that was applicable in the year in which the multi-year registration was issued, and the registration deadline for renewal of the multi-year registration. (J) Subject to division (K) of this section, application for registration under the international registration plan, as set forth in sections 4503.60 to 4503.66 of the Revised Code, shall be made to the registrar on forms furnished by the registrar. In accordance with international registration plan guidelines and pursuant to rules adopted by the registrar, the forms shall include the following: (1) A uniform mileage schedule; (2) The gross vehicle weight of the vehicle or combined gross vehicle weight of the combination vehicle as declared by the registrant; (3) Any other information the registrar requires by rule. (K) The registrar shall determine the feasibility of implementing an electronic commercial fleet licensing and management program that will enable the owners of commercial tractors, commercial trailers, and commercial semitrailers to conduct electronic transactions by July 1, 2010, or sooner. If the registrar determines that implementing such a program is feasible, the registrar shall adopt new rules under this division or amend existing rules adopted under this division as necessary in order to respond to advances in technology. If international registration plan guidelines and provisions allow member jurisdictions to permit applications for registrations under the international registration plan to be made via the internet, the rules the registrar adopts under this division shall permit such action. Sec. 4503.102. (A)(A)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles shall may adopt rules to establish a centralized system of motor vehicle registration for initial registration, registration renewal, and transfer of registration, by mail or by electronic means. Any (2) Any person applying electronically for initial registration or for transfer of registration may submit all associated documents electronically through the centralized system of motor vehicle registration established under this section. The registrar or a deputy registrar shall verify and authenticate such documents. (3) Any person owning a motor vehicle that was registered in the person's name during the preceding registration year shall renew the registration of the motor vehicle not more than ninety days prior to the expiration date of the registration either by through one of the following: (a) By mail or by electronic means through the centralized system of registration established under this section, or in ; (b) In person at any office of the registrar or at a deputy registrar's office. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, no less than forty-five days prior to the expiration date of any motor vehicle registration, the registrar shall mail a renewal notice to the person in whose name the motor vehicle is registered. The renewal notice shall clearly state that the registration of the motor vehicle may be renewed by mail or electronic means through the centralized system of registration or in person at any office of the registrar or at a deputy registrar's office and shall be preprinted with information including, but not limited to, the owner's name and residence address as shown in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles, a brief description of the motor vehicle to be registered, notice of the license taxes and fees due on the motor vehicle, the toll-free telephone number of the registrar as required under division (D)(1) of section 4503.031 of the Revised Code, a statement that payment for a renewal may be made by financial transaction device using the toll-free telephone number, and any additional information the registrar may require by rule. The renewal notice shall not include the social security number of either the owner of the motor vehicle or the person in whose name the motor vehicle is registered. The renewal notice shall be sent by regular mail to the owner's last known address as shown in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles. (2) The registrar is not required to mail a renewal notice if either of the following applies: (a) The owner of the vehicle has consented to receiving the renewal notice by electronic means only. (b) The application for renewal of the registration of a motor vehicle is prohibited from being accepted by the registrar or a deputy registrar by division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code. (3) If the owner of a motor vehicle has consented to receiving a renewal notice by electronic means only, the registrar shall send an electronic renewal notice to the owner that contains the information specified in division (B)(1) of this section at the time specified under that division. (C) The owner of the motor vehicle shall verify the information contained in the notice, sign it either manually or by electronic means, and return it, either by mail or electronic means, or the owner may take it in person to any office of the registrar or of a deputy registrar. The owner shall include with the notice a financial transaction device number when renewing in person or by electronic means but not by mail, check, or money order in the amount of the registration taxes and fees payable on the motor vehicle and a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code, plus postage as indicated on the notice if the registration is renewed or fulfilled by mail, and an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code. For purposes of the centralized system of motor vehicle registration, the registrar shall accept payments via the toll-free telephone number established under division (D)(1) of section 4503.031 of the Revised Code for renewals made by mail. If the motor vehicle owner chooses to renew the motor vehicle registration by electronic means, the owner shall proceed in accordance with the rules the registrar adopts. (D) If all registration and transfer fees for the motor vehicle for the preceding year or the preceding period of the current registration year have not been paid, if division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code prohibits acceptance of the renewal notice, or if the owner or lessee does not have an inspection certificate or alternative emissions certificate for the motor vehicle as provided in section 3704.14 of the Revised Code, if that section is applicable, the license shall be refused, and the registrar or deputy registrar shall so notify the owner. This section does not require the payment of license or registration taxes on a motor vehicle for any preceding year, or for any preceding period of a year, if the motor vehicle was not taxable for that preceding year or period under section 4503.02, 4503.04, 4503.11, 4503.12, or 4503.16 or Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Failure to receive a renewal notice does not relieve a motor vehicle owner from the responsibility to renew the registration for the motor vehicle. Any person who has a motor vehicle registered in this state and who does not receive a renewal notice as provided in division (B) of this section prior to the expiration date of the registration shall request an application for registration from the registrar or a deputy registrar and sign the application manually or by electronic means and submit the application and pay any applicable license taxes and fees to the registrar or deputy registrar. (2) If the owner of a motor vehicle submits an application for registration and the registrar is prohibited by division (D) of section 2935.27, division (A) of section 4503.13, division (B) of section 4510.22, division (D) of section 4503.234, division (B)(1) of section 4521.10, or division (B) of section 5537.041 of the Revised Code from accepting the application, the registrar shall return the application and the payment to the owner. If the owner of a motor vehicle submits a registration renewal application to the registrar by electronic means and the registrar is prohibited from accepting the application as provided in this division, the registrar shall notify the owner of this fact and deny the application and return the payment or give a credit on the financial transaction device account of the owner in the manner the registrar prescribes by rule adopted pursuant to division (A) of this section. (F) Every deputy registrar shall post in a prominent place at the deputy's office a notice informing the public of the mail registration system required by this section and also shall post a notice that every owner of a motor vehicle and every chauffeur holding a certificate of registration is required to notify the registrar in writing of any change of residence within ten days after the change occurs. The notice shall be in such form as the registrar prescribes by rule. (G)(G)(1) The service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code that is collected from a person who renews a motor vehicle registration by electronic means or by mail, plus postage collected by the registrar and any financial transaction device surcharge collected by the registrar, shall be paid to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund established by section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (2) A person who submits an initial registration or a transfer of registration by electronic means under this section shall pay a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code, any necessary postage costs, and any financial transaction device surcharge, as applicable. The service fee collected shall be paid either to the registrar or to the deputy registrar that verifies and authenticates the submitted documents in accordance with division (A)(2) of this section. If the registrar authorizes a deputy registrar to mail the certificate of registration and any associated license plate to the applicant, the postage costs shall be paid to that deputy registrar. (H)(1) Pursuant to section 113.40 of the Revised Code, the registrar shall implement a program permitting payment of motor vehicle registration taxes and fees, driver's license and commercial driver's license fees, and any other taxes, fees, penalties, or charges imposed or levied by the state by means of a financial transaction device for transactions occurring online, at any office of the registrar, and at all deputy registrar locations. The program shall take effect not later than July 1, 2016. The registrar shall adopt rules as necessary for this purpose, but all such rules are subject to any action, policy, or procedure of the board of deposit or treasurer of state taken or adopted under section 113.40 of the Revised Code. (2) The rules adopted under division (H)(1) of this section shall require a deputy registrar to accept payments by means of a financial transaction device beginning on the effective date of the rules unless the deputy registrar contract entered into by the deputy registrar prohibits the acceptance of such payments by financial transaction device. However, commencing with deputy registrar contract awards that have a start date of July 1, 2016, and for all contract awards thereafter, the registrar shall require that the proposer accept payment by means of a financial transaction device, including credit cards and debit cards, for all department of public safety transactions conducted at that deputy registrar location. The bureau and deputy registrars are not required to pay any costs that result from accepting payment by means of a financial transaction device. A deputy registrar may charge a person who tenders payment for a department transaction by means of a financial transaction device any cost the deputy registrar incurs from accepting payment by the financial transaction device, but the deputy registrar shall not require the person to pay any additional fee of any kind in connection with the use by the person of the financial transaction device. (3) In accordance with division (H)(1) of this section and rules adopted by the registrar under that division, a county auditor or clerk of a court of common pleas that is designated a deputy registrar shall accept payment by means of a financial transaction device, including credit cards and debit cards, for all department transactions conducted at the office of the county auditor or clerk in the county auditor's or clerk's capacity as deputy registrar. The bureau is not required to pay any costs incurred by a county auditor or clerk that result from accepting payment by means of a financial transaction device for any department transaction. (I) For persons who reside in counties where tailpipe emissions inspections are required under the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program, the notice required by division (B) of this section shall also include the toll-free telephone number maintained by the Ohio environmental protection agency to provide information concerning the locations of emissions testing centers. The registrar also shall include a statement in the notice that a battery electric motor vehicle is not required to undergo emissions inspection under the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program established under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.29. (A) The director of veterans services in conjunction with the registrar of motor vehicles shall develop and maintain a program to establish and issue specialty license plates recognizing military service and military honors pertaining to valor and service. (B) The director and the registrar shall jointly adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for purposes of establishing the program under this section. The director and registrar shall adopt the rules as soon as possible after June 29, 2018, but not later than nine months after June 29, 2018. The rules shall do all of the following: (1) Establish specialty license plates recognizing military service; (2) Establish specialty license plates recognizing military honors pertaining to valor and service; (3) Establish eligibility criteria that apply to each specialty license plate issued under this section; (4) Establish requirements governing any necessary documentary evidence required to be presented by an applicant for a specialty license plate issued under this section. The rules shall allow an applicant to present a veterans identification card issued in accordance with section 317.241 of the Revised Code in lieu of a copy of the applicant's DD-214 or an equivalent document. An applicant may be required to present additional evidence if the veterans identification card does not show all of the information needed for issuance of the specific nonstandard license plate requested by the applicant. (5) Establish guidelines for the designs, markings, and inscriptions on a specialty license plate established under this section; (6) Establish procedures for altering the designs, markings, or inscriptions on a specialty license plate established under this section; (7) Prohibit specialty license plates established under this section from recognizing achievement awards or unit awards; (8) Establish any other procedures or requirements that are necessary for the implementation and administration of this section. (C) The rules adopted under division (B) of this section shall provide for the establishment of the military specialty license plates created prior to June 29, 2018, that are no longer codified in the Revised Code. (D)(1) Any person who meets the applicable qualifications for the issuance of a specialty license plate established by rule adopted under division (B) of this section may apply to the registrar of motor vehicles for the registration of any passenger car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other vehicle the person owns or leases of a class approved by the registrar. The application may be combined with a request for a special reserved license plate under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (D)(2)(b) of this section, upon receipt of an application for registration of a motor vehicle under this section and the required taxes and fees, compliance with all applicable laws relating to the registration of a motor vehicle, and, if necessary, upon presentation of the required documentary evidence, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate motor vehicle registration and a set of license plates and a validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. (b) Any disabled veteran who qualifies to apply to the registrar for the registration of a motor vehicle under section 4503.41 of the Revised Code without the payment of any registration taxes or fees, may apply instead for registration of the motor vehicle under this section. The disabled veteran applying for registration under this section is not required to pay any registration taxes or fees as required by sections 4503.038, 4503.04, 4503.10, 4503.102, and 4503.103 of the Revised Code, any local motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, or any fee charged under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code for up to two motor vehicles, including any motor vehicle registered under section 4503.41 of the Revised Code, or any fees associated with transferring a registration under section 4503.12 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of an application for registration of the motor vehicle and presentation of any documentation the registrar may require by rule, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate motor vehicle registration and a set of license plates authorized under this section and a validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. (3) The license plates shall display county identification stickers that identify the county of registration as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.41. (A) Any disabled veteran who, because of a service-connected disability, has been or is awarded funds for the purchase of a motor vehicle under the "Disabled Veterans' and Servicemen's Automobile Assistance Act of 1970," 84 Stat. 1998, 38 U.S.C. 1901, and amendments thereto, and any disabled veteran having a service-connected disability either rated or compensated at one hundred per cent by the veterans' administration, may apply to the registrar for the registration of the disabled veteran's personal motor vehicle. Except as provided in division (C) of this section, a disabled veteran is not required to pay any registration fee and service fee as required by sections 4503.038, 4503.04, 4503.10, 4503.102, and 4503.103 of the Revised Code, any local motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, or any fee charged under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code, or any fees associated with transferring a registration under section 4503.12 of the Revised Code. The application for registration shall be accompanied by such documentary evidence of disability as the registrar may require by rule. (B) Upon the receipt of an application for registration of a motor vehicle under this section, and presentation of satisfactory evidence of disability, the registrar or deputy registrar shall issue to the applicant a set of license plates, which shall be red, white, and blue in color and shall, in addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed thereon, be inscribed with the word "veteran" and imprinted with the international wheelchair symbol. (C) A disabled veteran who is eligible to register a motor vehicle under this section may register as many vehicles as are titled and registered in that disabled veteran's name. For each additional registration after the first registration, the registrar or deputy registrar shall collect any applicable fee imposed in sections 4503.038, 4503.04, 4503.10, 4503.102, 4503.103, and 4503.19 of the Revised Code, and any local motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.579. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle and issuance of "National Council of Negro Women" license plates. The application may be combined with a request for a special reserved license plate under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of the completed application and compliance by the applicant with divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle registration and a set of "National Council of Negro Women" license plates and a validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed on the license plates, "National Council of Negro Women" license plates shall display an appropriate logo and words selected by representatives of the national Ohio state coalition-national council of negro women, incorporated, and that are approved by the registrar. "National Council of Negro Women" license plates shall display county identification stickers that identify the county of registration as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. (B) "National Council of Negro Women" license plates and a validation sticker, or validation sticker alone, shall be issued upon receipt of an application for registration of a motor vehicle under this section; payment of the regular license tax as prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any applicable motor vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, an additional administrative fee of ten dollars, and a contribution as provided in division (C)(1) of this section; and compliance with all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor vehicles. (C)(1) For each application for registration and registration renewal notice the registrar receives under this section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of twenty-five dollars. The registrar shall deposit this contribution into the state treasury to the credit of the license plate contribution fund created in section 4501.21 of the Revised Code. (2) The registrar shall deposit the administrative fee of ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau of motor vehicles for additional services required in the issuing of "National Council of Negro Women" license plates, into the state treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4503.91. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle and issuance of "choose life" license plates. The application for "choose life" license plates may be combined with a request for a special reserved license plate under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of the completed application and compliance with divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle registration and a set of "choose life" license plates with a validation sticker or a validation sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed on license plates, "choose life" license plates shall be inscribed with the words "choose life" and a marking designed by "choose life, inc.," a private, nonprofit corporation incorporated in the state of Florida. The registrar shall review the design and approve it if the design is feasible. If the design is not feasible, the registrar shall notify "choose life, inc." and the organization may resubmit designs until a feasible one is approved. "Choose life" license plates shall bear county identification stickers that identify the county of registration as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. (B) "Choose life" license plates and a validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone, shall be issued upon receipt of a contribution as provided in division (C) of this section and upon payment of the regular license tax prescribed in section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any applicable motor vehicle tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, a fee of ten dollars for the purpose of compensating the bureau of motor vehicles for additional services required in the issuing of "choose life" license plates, and compliance with all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor vehicles. (C)(1) For each application for registration and registration renewal received under this section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of twenty dollars. The registrar shall transmit this contribution to the treasurer of state for deposit in the "choose life" fund created in section 3701.65 5180.72 of the Revised Code. (2) The registrar shall deposit the additional fee of ten dollars specified in division (B) of this section for the purpose of compensating the bureau for the additional services required in issuing "choose life" license plates in the public safety - highway purposes fund created in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4505.07. (A) A physical certificate of title shall be printed upon a special paper with a secure printing process or other secure process, for the printing of motor vehicle titles, as required by section 2 of the "Truth in Mileage Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 3309, 15 U.S.C.A. 1901 et seq. An electronic certificate of title is an electronic record stored in the automated title processing system that established ownership of a motor vehicle, as well as any security interests that exist in that motor vehicle. (B) Every certificate of title shall bear the distinguishing number assigned to the title, and shall contain, on the front of the certificate, the following information: (1) An indication that the certificate is issued in this state; (2) The county in which the certificate is issued; (3) An indication that the certificate is an original, memorandum, duplicate, or salvage certificate; (4) The date of issuance of the certificate; (5) The name and address of the owner, in full; (6) The name and address of the previous owner, in full; (7) The previous certificate of title number; (8) The state in which the vehicle previously was titled; (9) The make, body type, year, model, and vehicle identification number of the vehicle; (10) First and second lien notation information, including the name and address of the lienholder in full and the date of the lien notation; (11) For discharging and canceling the lien notation, a notice that states: "lien discharge," a space for the signature of the lienholder, the discharge date, a space for the signature of the clerk of the court of common pleas, the cancellation date, and a space for the notation of the deputy clerk; (12) The purchase price of the motor vehicle and the amount of Ohio sales or use tax paid; (13) The mileage registered on the odometer and the status of the odometer of the vehicle at the time the previous title was assigned; (14) A space for the seal of the clerk; (15) The signature of the clerk; (16) A space for the notation of the deputy clerk; (17) A space for other pertinent information as may be required by the registrar of motor vehicles; (18) A consecutive number for control purposes; (19) In the case of a vehicle last previously registered in another state, a space to be used for recording any notation applicable to the vehicle and the abbreviation of the state in which the vehicle was last registered, as required by divisions (B)(1) and (2) of section 4505.08 of the Revised Code; (20) In the case of a vehicle last previously registered in this state, a space to be used for recording any information applicable to the vehicle as required by division (C) of section 4505.08 of the Revised Code or by rule of the registrar of motor vehicles adopted under that division. (C) If the certificate of title is a duplicate certificate, that fact and the original title number must be stated on the front of the duplicate certificate. (D) If the certificate of title is a memorandum certificate, that fact and the original title number must be stated on the front of the memorandum certificate. (E) If the certificate of title is a salvage certificate, that fact and the original title number must be stated on the front of the salvage certificate. (F) The following information shall appear on the reverse side of each certificate of title: (1) A notice in bold lettering that states: "ERASURES AND ALTERATIONS VOID THIS TITLE ASSIGNMENT. (Type or print in ink.)"; (2) The total consideration of the vehicle; (3) A disclosure that states: "I (we) certify the vehicle described in this title was transferred for the price of $__________ to:" and the printed name and address of the buyer in full; (4) An odometer certification statement that states: "Federal and state laws require that you state the mileage in connection with transfer of ownership. Failure to complete or providing false information may result in fines and imprisonment." The odometer certification language as required by federal law and division (C) of section 4505.06 of the Revised Code. (5) A disclosure that states: "I (we) warrant the title to be free of all liens." (6) A space for the signature of the transferor and the transferor's printed name and address in full; (7) A space for the seal of the clerk or a notary; (8) The acknowledgment statement of the clerk, the deputy clerk, or a notary; (9) A space for the signature of the clerk, the deputy clerk, or a notary; (10) The buyer's odometer acknowledgment statement, with a space for the buyer's printed name and address; (11) A notice in bold lettering that states: "WARNING TO TRANSFEROR AND TRANSFEREE (SELLER AND BUYER): You are required by law to state the true selling price. A false statement is in violation of section 2921.13 of the Revised Code and is punishable by six months' imprisonment or a fine of up to one thousand dollars, or both. All transfers are audited by the department of taxation. The seller and buyer must provide any information requested by the department of taxation. The buyer may be assessed any additional tax found to be due." (12) An application for a certificate of title, memorandum certificate of title, or salvage certificate of title, as prescribed by the registrar, which shall include all of the following: (a) A disclosure that states: "Application for certificate of title (type or print in ink)"; (b) A disclosure that states: "Fee of $5.00 for failure to apply for title within 30 days of assignment."; (c) A space for the applicant's printed name and address:; (d) A space for the applicant's social security number or employer's identification number;. The last four digits of the applicant's social security number is sufficient if the application for title is for a salvage certificate of title for an owner-retained vehicle or if the application is accompanied by an application to transfer title to an insurance company or a nonprofit corporation. (e) A space for the purchase price, tax paid, or tax exemption reason, or dealer's permit number, and vendor's number, and condition of the vehicle; (f) A disclosure statement that states: "Lien information: If no lien state "none." If more than one lien, attach statement of all additional liens."; (g) A space for the lienholder's name and address; (h) A disclosure statement that states: "I (we) state that all information contained in this application is true and correct."; (i) A space for the applicant's signature; (j) A space for the acknowledgment statement of the clerk, the deputy clerk, or a notary; (k) A space for the seal of the clerk or a notary; (l) A space for the signature of the clerk, the deputy clerk, or a notary; (m) Any other pertinent information as may be required by the registrar. Sec. 4505.09. (A)(1) The clerk of a court of common pleas shall charge and retain fees as follows: (a) Five dollars for each certificate of title that is not applied for within thirty days after the later of the assignment or delivery of the motor vehicle described in it. The entire fee shall be retained by the clerk. (b) Fifteen Eighteen dollars, or twenty-three dollars if a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution authorizing the increased fee for that county, for each certificate of title or duplicate certificate of title including the issuance of a memorandum certificate of title, or authorization to print a non-negotiable evidence of ownership described in division (G) of section 4505.08 of the Revised Code, non-negotiable evidence of ownership printed by the clerk under division (H) of that section, and notation of any lien on a certificate of title that is applied for at the same time as the certificate of title. The clerk shall retain eleven dollars and fifty cents of that fee for each certificate of title when there is a notation of a lien or security interest on the certificate of title, twelve dollars and twenty-five cents when there is no lien or security interest noted on the certificate of title, and eleven dollars and fifty cents for each duplicate certificate of title. If a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution authorizing a twenty-three-dollar fee, the clerk shall retain the additional five dollars of that fee. (c) Four dollars and fifty cents for each certificate of title with no security interest noted that is issued to a licensed motor vehicle dealer for resale purposes and, in addition, a separate fee of fifty cents. The clerk shall retain two dollars and twenty-five cents of that fee. (d) Five dollars for each memorandum certificate of title or non-negotiable evidence of ownership that is applied for separately. The clerk shall retain that entire fee. (2) The fees that are not retained by the clerk shall be paid to the registrar of motor vehicles by monthly returns, which shall be forwarded to the registrar not later than the fifth day of the month next succeeding that in which the certificate is issued or that in which the registrar is notified of a lien or cancellation of a lien. (B)(1) The registrar shall pay twenty-five cents of the amount received for each certificate of title issued to a motor vehicle dealer for resale, one dollar for certificates of title issued with a lien or security interest noted on the certificate of title, and twenty-five cents for each certificate of title with no lien or security interest noted on the certificate of title into the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (2) Fifty cents of the amount received for each certificate of title shall be paid by the registrar as follows: (a) Four cents shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the motor vehicle dealers board fund, which is hereby created. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in the motor vehicle dealers board fund shall be used by the motor vehicle dealers board created under section 4517.30 of the Revised Code, together with other moneys appropriated to it, in the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code, except that the director of budget and management may transfer excess money from the motor vehicle dealers board fund to the public safety - highway purposes fund if the registrar determines that the amount of money in the motor vehicle dealers board fund, together with other moneys appropriated to the board, exceeds the amount required for the exercise of its powers and the performance of its duties under Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code and requests the director to make the transfer. (b) Thirty-one cents shall be paid into the highway operating fund created by section 5735.051 of the Revised Code. (c) Fifteen cents shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the motor vehicle sales audit fund, which is hereby created. The moneys in the fund shall be used by the tax commissioner together with other funds available to the commissioner to conduct a continuing investigation of sales and use tax returns filed for motor vehicles in order to determine if sales and use tax liability has been satisfied. The commissioner shall refer cases of apparent violations of section 2921.13 of the Revised Code made in connection with the titling or sale of a motor vehicle and cases of any other apparent violations of the sales or use tax law to the appropriate county prosecutor whenever the commissioner considers it advisable. (3) Two dollars of the amount received by the registrar under divisions (A)(1)(a), (b), and (d) of this section and one dollar and fifty cents of the amount received by the registrar under division (A)(1)(c) of this section for each certificate of title shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the automated title processing fund, which is hereby created and which shall consist of moneys collected under division (B)(3) of this section and under sections 1548.10 and 4519.59 of the Revised Code. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in the fund shall be used as follows: (a) Except for moneys collected under section 1548.10 of the Revised Code, moneys collected under division (B)(3) of this section shall be used to implement and maintain an automated title processing system for the issuance of motor vehicle, off-highway motorcycle, and all-purpose vehicle certificates of title in the offices of the clerks of the courts of common pleas. Those moneys also shall be used to pay expenses that arise as a result of enabling electronic motor vehicle dealers to directly transfer applications for certificates of title under division (A)(3) of section 4505.06 of the Revised Code. (b) Moneys collected under section 1548.10 of the Revised Code shall be used to issue marine certificates of title in the offices of the clerks of the courts of common pleas as provided in Chapter 1548. of the Revised Code. (4) The registrar shall pay the fifty-cent separate fee collected from a licensed motor vehicle dealer under division (A)(1)(c) of this section into the title defect recision fund created by section 1345.52 of the Revised Code. (5) Three dollars of the amount received by the registrar under division (A)(1)(b) of this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the security, investigations, and policing fund created by section 4501.11 of the Revised Code to be used for the purposes specified in division (B)(1) of that section. (C)(1) The automated title processing board is hereby created consisting of the registrar or the registrar's representative, a person selected by the registrar, the president of the Ohio clerks of court association or the president's representative, the president of the Ohio automobile dealers association or the president's representative, and two three clerks of courts of common pleas appointed by the governor. The director of budget and management or the director's designee, the chief of the division of parks and watercraft in the department of natural resources or the chief's designee, and the tax commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall be nonvoting members of the board. The purpose of the board is to facilitate the operation and maintenance of an automated title processing system and approve the procurement of automated title processing system equipment and ribbons, cartridges, or other devices necessary for the operation of that equipment. Voting members of the board, excluding the registrar or the registrar's representative, shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for travel and other necessary expenses incurred in the conduct of their official duties. The registrar or the registrar's representative shall receive neither compensation nor reimbursement as a board member. (2) The automated title processing board shall determine each of the following: (a) The automated title processing equipment and certificates of title requirements for each county; (b) The payment of expenses that may be incurred by the counties in implementing an automated title processing system; (c) The repayment to the counties for existing title processing equipment; (d) With the approval of the director of public safety, the award of grants from the automated title processing fund to the clerk of courts of any county who employs a person who assists with the design of, updates to, tests of, installation of, or any other activity related to, an automated title processing system. Any grant awarded under division (C)(2)(d) of this section shall be deposited into the appropriate county certificate of title administration fund created under section 325.33 of the Revised Code and shall not be used to supplant any other funds. (3) The registrar shall purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire any automated title processing equipment and certificates of title that the board determines are necessary from moneys in the automated title processing fund established by division (B)(3) of this section. (D) All counties shall conform to the requirements of the registrar regarding the operation of their automated title processing system for motor vehicle titles, certificates of title for off-highway motorcycles and all-purpose vehicles, and certificates of title for watercraft and outboard motors. Sec. 4506.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Alcohol concentration" means the concentration of alcohol in a person's blood, breath, or urine. When expressed as a percentage, it means grams of alcohol per the following: (1) One hundred milliliters of whole blood, blood serum, or blood plasma; (2) Two hundred ten liters of breath; (3) One hundred milliliters of urine. (B) "Commercial driver's license" means a license issued in accordance with this chapter that authorizes an individual to drive a commercial motor vehicle. (C) "Commercial driver's license information system" means the information system established pursuant to the requirements of the "Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 3207-171, 49 U.S.C.A. App. 2701. (D) Except when used in section 4506.25 of the Revised Code, "commercial motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle designed or used to transport persons or property that meets any of the following qualifications: (1) Any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight or combined gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more, provided the gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle or vehicles being towed is in excess of ten thousand pounds; (2) Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one pounds or more; (3) Any single vehicle or combination of vehicles that is not a class A or class B vehicle, but is designed to transport sixteen or more passengers including the driver; (4) Any school bus with a gross vehicle weight or gross vehicle weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand one pounds that is designed to transport fewer than sixteen passengers including the driver; (5) Is transporting hazardous materials for which placarding is required under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. part 172, as amended; (6) Any single vehicle or combination of vehicles that is designed to be operated and to travel on a public street or highway and is considered by the federal motor carrier safety administration to be a commercial motor vehicle, including, but not limited to, a motorized crane, a vehicle whose function is to pump cement, a rig for drilling wells, and a portable crane. (E) "Controlled substance" means all of the following: (1) Any substance classified as a controlled substance under the "Controlled Substances Act," 80 Stat. 1242 (1970), 21 U.S.C.A. 802(6), as amended; (2) Any substance included in schedules I through V of 21 C.F.R. part 1308, as amended; (3) Any drug of abuse. (F) "Conviction" means an unvacated adjudication of guilt or a determination that a person has violated or failed to comply with the law in a court of original jurisdiction or an authorized administrative tribunal, an unvacated forfeiture of bail or collateral deposited to secure the person's appearance in court, a plea of guilty or nolo contendere accepted by the court, the payment of a fine or court cost, or violation of a condition of release without bail, regardless of whether or not the penalty is rebated, suspended, or probated. (G) "Disqualification" means any of the following: (1) The suspension, revocation, or cancellation of a person's privileges to operate a commercial motor vehicle; (2) Any withdrawal of a person's privileges to operate a commercial motor vehicle as the result of a violation of state or local law relating to motor vehicle traffic control other than parking, vehicle weight, or vehicle defect violations; (3) A determination by the federal motor carrier safety administration that a person is not qualified to operate a commercial motor vehicle under 49 C.F.R. 391. (H) "Domiciled" means having a true, fixed, principal, and permanent residence to which an individual intends to return. (I) "Downgrade" means any of the following, as applicable: (1) A change in the commercial driver's license, or commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit, holder's self-certified status as described in division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code; (2) A change to a lesser class of vehicle; (3) Removal of commercial driver's license privileges from the individual's driver's license; (4) A change in the commercial driver's license, or commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit, holder's privileges as described in division (F)(1) of section 4506.13 of the Revised Code. (J) "Drive" means to drive, operate, or be in physical control of a motor vehicle. (K) "Driver" means any person who drives, operates, or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle or is required to have a commercial driver's license. (L) "Driver's license" means a license issued by the bureau of motor vehicles that authorizes an individual to drive. (M) "Drug of abuse" means any controlled substance, dangerous drug as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code, harmful intoxicant as defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code, or over-the-counter medication that, when taken in quantities exceeding the recommended dosage, can result in impairment of judgment or reflexes. (N) "Electronic device" includes a cellular telephone, a personal digital assistant, a pager, a computer, and any other device used to input, write, send, receive, or read text. (O) "Eligible unit of local government" means a village, township, or county that has a population of not more than three thousand persons according to the most recent federal census. (P) "Employer" means any person, including the federal government, any state, and a political subdivision of any state, that owns or leases a commercial motor vehicle or assigns a person to drive such a motor vehicle. (Q) "Endorsement" means an authorization on a person's commercial driver's license that is required to permit the person to operate a specified type of commercial motor vehicle. (R) "Farm truck" means a truck controlled and operated by a farmer for use in the transportation to or from a farm, for a distance of not more than one hundred fifty miles, of products of the farm, including livestock and its products, poultry and its products, floricultural and horticultural products, and in the transportation to the farm, from a distance of not more than one hundred fifty miles, of supplies for the farm, including tile, fence, and every other thing or commodity used in agricultural, floricultural, horticultural, livestock, and poultry production, and livestock, poultry, and other animals and things used for breeding, feeding, or other purposes connected with the operation of the farm, when the truck is operated in accordance with this division and is not used in the operations of a motor carrier, as defined in section 4923.01 of the Revised Code. (S) "Fatality" means the death of a person as the result of a motor vehicle accident occurring not more than three hundred sixty-five days prior to the date of death. (T) "Felony" means any offense under federal or state law that is punishable by death or specifically classified as a felony under the law of this state, regardless of the penalty that may be imposed. (U) "Foreign jurisdiction" means any jurisdiction other than a state. (V) "Gross vehicle weight rating" means the value specified by the manufacturer as the maximum loaded weight of a single or a combination vehicle. The gross vehicle weight rating of a combination vehicle is the gross vehicle weight rating of the power unit plus the gross vehicle weight rating of each towed unit. (W) "Hazardous materials" means any material that has been designated as hazardous under 49 U.S.C. 5103 and is required to be placarded under subpart F of 49 C.F.R. part 172 or any quantity of a material listed as a select agent or toxin in 42 C.F.R. part 73, as amended. (X) "Imminent hazard" means the existence of a condition that presents a substantial likelihood that death, serious illness, severe personal injury, or a substantial endangerment to health, property, or the environment may occur before the reasonably foreseeable completion date of a formal proceeding begun to lessen the risk of that death, illness, injury, or endangerment. (Y) "Medical variance" means one of the following received by a driver from the federal motor carrier safety administration that allows the driver to be issued a medical certificate: (1) An exemption letter permitting operation of a commercial motor vehicle under 49 C.F.R. 381, subpart C or 49 C.F.R. 391.64; (2) A skill performance evaluation certificate permitting operation of a commercial motor vehicle pursuant to 49 C.F.R. 391.49. (Z) "Mobile telephone" means a mobile communication device that falls under or uses any commercial mobile radio service as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20, except that mobile telephone does not include two-way or citizens band radio services. (AA) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power used on highways, except that such term does not include a vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer operated exclusively on a rail. (BB) "Out-of-service order" means a declaration by an authorized enforcement officer of a federal, state, local, Canadian, or Mexican jurisdiction declaring that a driver, commercial motor vehicle, or commercial motor carrier operation is out of service as defined in 49 C.F.R. 390.5. (CC) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (DD) "Portable tank" means a liquid or gaseous packaging designed primarily to be loaded onto or temporarily attached to a vehicle and equipped with skids, mountings, or accessories to facilitate handling of the tank by mechanical means. (EE) "Public safety vehicle" has the same meaning as in divisions (E)(1) and (3) of section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (FF) "Recreational vehicle" includes every vehicle that is defined as a recreational vehicle in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code and is used exclusively for purposes other than engaging in business for profit. (GG) "Residence" means any person's residence determined in accordance with standards prescribed in rules adopted by the registrar. (HH) "School bus" has the same meaning as in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (II) "Serious traffic violation" means any of the following: (1) A conviction arising from a single charge of operating a commercial motor vehicle in violation of any provision of section 4506.03 of the Revised Code; (2)(a) Except as provided in division (II)(2)(b) of this section, a violation while operating a commercial motor vehicle of a law of this state, or any municipal ordinance or county or township resolution, or any other substantially similar law of another state or political subdivision of another state prohibiting either of the following: (i) Texting while driving; (ii) Using a handheld mobile telephone. (b) It is not a serious traffic violation if the person was texting or using a handheld mobile telephone to contact law enforcement or other emergency services. (3) A conviction arising from the operation of any motor vehicle that involves any of the following: (a) A single charge of any speed in excess of the posted speed limit by fifteen miles per hour or more; (b) Violation of section 4511.20 or 4511.201 of the Revised Code or any similar ordinance or resolution, or of any similar law of another state or political subdivision of another state; (c) Violation of a law of this state or an ordinance or resolution relating to traffic control, other than a parking violation, or of any similar law of another state or political subdivision of another state, that results in a fatal accident; (d) Violation of section 4506.03 of the Revised Code or a substantially similar municipal ordinance or county or township resolution, or of any similar law of another state or political subdivision of another state, that involves the operation of a commercial motor vehicle without a valid commercial driver's license with the proper class or endorsement for the specific vehicle group being operated or for the passengers or type of cargo being transported; (e) Violation of section 4506.03 of the Revised Code or a substantially similar municipal ordinance or county or township resolution, or of any similar law of another state or political subdivision of another state, that involves the operation of a commercial motor vehicle without a valid commercial driver's license being in the person's possession; (f) Violation of section 4511.33 or 4511.34 of the Revised Code, or any municipal ordinance or county or township resolution substantially similar to either of those sections, or any substantially similar law of another state or political subdivision of another state; (g) Violation of any other law of this state, any law of another state, or any ordinance or resolution of a political subdivision of this state or another state that meets both of the following requirements: (i) It relates to traffic control, other than a parking violation; (ii) It is determined to be a serious traffic violation by the United States secretary of transportation and is designated by the director as such by rule. (JJ) "State" means a state of the United States and includes the District of Columbia. (KK) "Tank vehicle" means any commercial motor vehicle that is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous materials within a tank or tanks that are either permanently or temporarily attached to the vehicle or its chassis and have an individual rated capacity of more than one hundred nineteen gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of one thousand gallons or more. "Tank vehicle" does not include a commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty storage container tank that is not designed for transportation, has a rated capacity of one thousand gallons or more, and is temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer. (LL) "Tester" means a person or entity acting pursuant to a valid agreement entered into pursuant to division (B) of section 4506.09 of the Revised Code. (MM) "Texting" means manually entering alphanumeric text into, or reading text from, an electronic device. Texting includes short message service, e-mail, instant messaging, a command or request to access a world wide web page, pressing more than a single button to initiate or terminate a voice communication using a mobile telephone, or engaging in any other form of electronic text retrieval or entry, for present or future communication. Texting does not include the following: (1) Using voice commands to initiate, receive, or terminate a voice communication using a mobile telephone; (2) Inputting, selecting, or reading information on a global positioning system or navigation system; (3) Pressing a single button to initiate or terminate a voice communication using a mobile telephone; or (4) Using, for a purpose that is not otherwise prohibited by law, a device capable of performing multiple functions, such as a fleet management system, a dispatching device, a mobile telephone, a citizens band radio, or a music player. (NN) "Texting while driving" means texting while operating a commercial motor vehicle, with the motor running, including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic control device, or other momentary delays. Texting while driving does not include operating a commercial motor vehicle with or without the motor running when the driver has moved the vehicle to the side of, or off, a highway and is stopped in a location where the vehicle can safely remain stationary. (OO) "United States" means the fifty states and the District of Columbia. (PP) "Upgrade" means a change in the class of vehicles, endorsements, or self-certified status as described in division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code, that expands the ability of a current commercial driver's license holder to operate commercial motor vehicles under this chapter;. (QQ) "Use of a handheld mobile telephone" means: (1) Using at least one hand to hold a mobile telephone to conduct a voice communication; (2) Dialing or answering a mobile telephone by pressing more than a single button; or (3) Reaching for a mobile telephone in a manner that requires a driver to maneuver so that the driver is no longer in a seated driving position, or restrained by a seat belt that is installed in accordance with 49 C.F.R. 393.93 and adjusted in accordance with the vehicle manufacturer's instructions. (RR) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4506.05. (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway in this state if all of the following conditions are met: (1) The person has a valid commercial driver's license or commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit issued by any state or jurisdiction in accordance with the minimum standards adopted by the federal motor carrier safety administration under the "Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986," 100 Stat. 3207-171, 49 U.S.C.A. App. for issuance of commercial driver's licenses; (2) The person's commercial driver's license or temporary instruction permit is not suspended, revoked, or canceled, and the person has the appropriate endorsements for the vehicle that is being driven; (3) The person is not disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle; (4) The person is not subject to an out-of-service order; (5) The person is medically certified as physically qualified to operate a commercial motor vehicle in accordance with this chapter. (a) A person who submitted a medical examiner's certificate to the registrar in accordance with division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code and whose medical certification information is maintained in the commercial driver's license information system is not required to have the medical examiner's certificate in the person's possession when on duty. (b) A person whose medical certification information is not maintained in the commercial driver's license information system shall have in the person's possession when on duty the original or a copy of the current medical examiner's certificate that was submitted to the registrar. However, the person may operate a commercial motor vehicle with such proof of medical certification for not more than fifteen days after the date the current medical examiner's certificate was issued to the person. (c) A person who has a medical variance shall have in the person's possession the original or copy of the medical variance documentation at all times while on duty. (6) The person is not prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle because the person violated 49 C.F.R. 382, subpart B. (B) No person shall drive a commercial motor vehicle on a highway in this state if the person does not meet the conditions specified in division (A) of this section. (C) Except as set forth in 49 C.F.R. 390.3(f), 391.2, 391.62, 391.67, and 391.68, no person holding a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or a commercial driver's license issued under this chapter may drive a commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce until the person is at least twenty-one years of age. (D)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) The offenses established under this section are strict liability offenses and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of these offenses as strict liability offenses shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. Sec. 4506.07. (A) An applicant for a commercial driver's license, restricted commercial driver's license, or a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit, or a duplicate of such a license or permit, shall submit an application upon a form approved and furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles. Except as provided in section 4506.24 of the Revised Code in regard to a restricted commercial driver's license, the applicant shall sign the application which shall contain the following information: (1) The applicant's name, date of birth, social security account number, sex, general description including height, weight, and color of hair and eyes, current residence, duration of residence in this state, state of domicile, country of citizenship, and occupation; (2) Whether the applicant previously has been licensed to operate a commercial motor vehicle or any other type of motor vehicle in another state or a foreign jurisdiction and, if so, when, by what state, and whether the license or driving privileges currently are suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, or the applicant otherwise has been disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle, or is subject to an out-of-service order issued under this chapter or any similar law of another state or a foreign jurisdiction and, if so, the date of, locations involved, and reason for the suspension, revocation, disqualification, or out-of-service order; (3) Whether the applicant has any physical or mental disability or disease that prevents the applicant from exercising reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle while operating it upon a highway or is or has been subject to any condition resulting in episodic impairment of consciousness or loss of muscular control and, if so, the nature and extent of the disability, disease, or condition, and the names and addresses of the physicians, certified nurse-midwives if authorized as described in section 4723.438 of the Revised Code, clinical nurse specialists, or certified nurse practitioners attending the applicant; (4) Whether the applicant has obtained a medical examiner's certificate as required by this chapter and, beginning January 30, 2012, the applicant, prior to or at the time of applying, has self-certified to the registrar the applicable status of the applicant under division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code; (5) Whether the applicant has pending a citation for violation of any motor vehicle law or ordinance except a parking violation and, if so, a description of the citation, the court having jurisdiction of the offense, and the date when the offense occurred; (6) If an applicant has not certified the applicant's willingness to make an anatomical gift under section 2108.05 of the Revised Code, whether the applicant wishes to certify willingness to make such an anatomical gift, which shall be given no consideration in the issuance of a license; (7) Whether the applicant has executed a valid durable power of attorney for health care pursuant to sections 1337.11 to 1337.17 of the Revised Code or has executed a declaration governing the use or continuation, or the withholding or withdrawal, of life-sustaining treatment pursuant to sections 2133.01 to 2133.15 of the Revised Code and, if the applicant has executed either type of instrument, whether the applicant wishes the license issued to indicate that the applicant has executed the instrument; (8) Whether the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States and, if the applicant is such, whether the applicant wishes the license issued to indicate that the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States by a military designation on the license; (9) Whether the applicant currently is prohibited by the federal motor carrier safety administration from operating a commercial motor vehicle because the applicant violated 49 C.F.R. 382, subpart B. (B) Every applicant shall certify, on a form approved and furnished by the registrar, all of the following: (1) That the motor vehicle in which the applicant intends to take the driving skills test is representative of the type of motor vehicle that the applicant expects to operate as a driver; (2) That the applicant is not subject to any disqualification or out-of-service order, or license suspension, revocation, or cancellation, under the laws of this state, of another state, or of a foreign jurisdiction and does not have more than one driver's license issued by this or another state or a foreign jurisdiction; (3) Any additional information, certification, or evidence that the registrar requires by rule in order to ensure that the issuance of a commercial driver's license or commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit to the applicant is in compliance with the law of this state and with federal law. (C) Every applicant shall execute a form, approved and furnished by the registrar, under which the applicant consents to the release by the registrar of information from the applicant's driving record. (D) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall register as an elector any applicant for a commercial driver's license or for a renewal or duplicate of such a license under this chapter, if the applicant is eligible and wishes to be registered as an elector. The decision of an applicant whether to register as an elector shall be given no consideration in the decision of whether to issue the applicant a license or a renewal or duplicate. (E) The registrar or a deputy registrar, in accordance with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code, shall offer the opportunity of completing a notice of change of residence or change of name to any applicant for a commercial driver's license or for a renewal or duplicate of such a license who is a resident of this state, if the applicant is a registered elector who has changed the applicant's residence or name and has not filed such a notice. (F) In considering any application submitted pursuant to this section, the bureau of motor vehicles may conduct any inquiries necessary to ensure that issuance or renewal of a commercial driver's license would not violate any provision of the Revised Code or federal law. (G) In addition to any other information it contains, the form approved and furnished by the registrar of motor vehicles for an application for a commercial driver's license, restricted commercial driver's license, or a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or an application for a duplicate of such a license or permit shall inform applicants that the applicant must present a copy of the applicant's DD-214 or an equivalent document in order to qualify to have the license, or permit, or duplicate indicate that the applicant is a veteran, active duty, or reservist of the armed forces of the United States based on a request made pursuant to division (A)(8) of this section. Sec. 4506.13. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles may authorize the highway patrol or any other employee of the department of public safety to issue an examiner's commercial examinations passed form to an applicant who has passed the required examinations. The examiner's commercial examinations passed form shall be used to indicate the examinations taken and passed by the commercial driver's license applicant. (B)(1) Before issuing, renewing, transferring, or upgrading a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or a commercial driver's license, the registrar of motor vehicles shall obtain information about the applicant's driving record, whether the applicant was previously issued a commercial driver's license in another state, or whether the applicant is disqualified or prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle through the commercial driver's license information system, the drug and alcohol clearinghouse, the applicant's state of licensure, and when available, the national driver register. In addition, before initially issuing a class A or class B commercial driver's license, a passenger endorsement, a school bus endorsement, or a hazardous materials endorsement, the registrar shall verify that the applicant completed the training required under 49 C.F.R. 380, subpart F, through the federal motor carrier safety administration's training provider registry. The registrar also shall check the applicant's driver record to ensure that an applicant who self-certified under division (A)(1)(a)(i) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code that the applicant's operation of a commercial motor vehicle is non-excepted interstate, is medically certified. (2) The registrar shall not issue, renew, upgrade, or transfer the applicant's commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license if any of the following apply: (a) The registrar obtains adverse information regarding the applicant's driving record. (b) There is no information regarding the driver's self-certification type as required by division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code. (c) The applicant's medical status is not certified, when required to be certified under division (A)(1)(a)(i) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code. (d) The applicant is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle because the applicant violated the drug and alcohol use and testing provisions of 49 C.F.R. 382, subpart B; (e) If required, the applicant did not successfully complete the training required by 49 C.F.R. 380, subpart F, as documented in the federal motor carrier safety administration's training provider registry. (3) If the record check reveals information that the applicant claims is outdated, contested, or invalid, the registrar shall deny the application until the applicant can resolve the conflict. (C) The registrar shall do all of the following: (1) Within ten days after issuing a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license, notify the commercial driver's license information system, when available, of that fact and provide all information required to ensure identification of the licensee. If the registrar is notified that driver has been issued a medical variance, the registrar shall indicate the existence of the medical variance on the commercial driver's license holder's commercial driver's license information system driver record. (2) For those drivers self-certifying under division (A)(1)(a)(i) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code as non-excepted interstate, post the applicant's medical status as certified or non-certified on the applicant's commercial driver's license information system driver record upon receiving a valid original or copy of the medical examiner's certificate; (3) Post the driver's self-certification type as set forth in division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code; (4) Post information from the medical examiner's certificate, if applicable, on the commercial driver's license holder's commercial driver's license information system driver record within ten calendar days of receipt of the medical examiner's certificate; (5) Retain the original or a copy of the commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder's medical certificate for a minimum of three years after the date the certificate was issued; (6) Post and maintain as part of the commercial driver's license information system driver record all convictions, disqualifications, and other licensing actions for violations of any state or municipal ordinances related to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations for all persons who hold a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license or operate a motor vehicle for which a commercial driver's license is required; (7) Post an applicant's status of medically non-certified on the applicant's commercial driver's license information system driver record and downgrade the applicant's commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license in accordance with division (D) of this section if either of the following applies: (a) The commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder fails to provide the driver's self-certification type as required by division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code. (b) The commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder self-certifying under division (A)(1)(a)(i) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code as non-excepted interstate fails to provide the registrar with a current medical examiner's certificate. (8) Mark the commercial driver's license information system driver record as non-certified for any commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder who has not self-certified under division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code by January 30, 2014 and initiate the commercial driver's license commercial driver's license downgrade procedures described in division (D) of this section; (9) Within ten days after a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder's medical certification status expires or a medical variance expires or is rescinded, update the person's medical certification status to non-certified; (10) Within ten calendar days after receiving information from the federal motor carrier safety administration regarding issuance or renewal of a medical variance for a driver, update the driver's commercial driver's license information system driver record to include the medical variance information provided by the federal motor carrier safety administration; (11) Within ten calendar days after receiving information from the federal motor carrier safety administration that a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle because of a violation of the drug and alcohol use and testing provisions of 49 C.F.R. 382, subpart B, initiate the commercial driver's license downgrade procedures described in division (F)(1) of this section; (12) Within ten calendar days after receiving information from the federal motor carrier safety administration that a commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder is no longer prohibited or was erroneously identified as prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle because of a violation of the drug and alcohol use and testing provisions of 49 C.F.R. 382, subpart B, initiate the reinstatement procedures described in division (F)(2) of this section. (D) If a driver's medical certification or medical variance expires or the federal motor carrier safety administration notifies the registrar that a medical variance was removed or rescinded, the registrar shall do the following: (1) Send notice to the commercial driver's license holder of the holder's medically not certified status. The notice shall inform the driver that the driver's commercial driver's license privileges will be removed unless the driver resolves the medical certification or medical variance defect by submitting a current medical certificate or medical variance, as applicable, or changing the driver's self-certification under division (A)(1) of section 4506.10 of the Revised Code to driving only in excepted interstate or excepted intrastate commerce within sixty days. (2) Sixty days after the change to a medically not certified status, if the commercial driver's license holder has not resolved the medical certification or medical variance defect as described in division (D)(1) of this section, the registrar shall change the person's commercial driver's license status to reflect no commercial driver's license privileges and shall send the person a second notice informing the person that the commercial driver's license privilege has been removed from the driver's license. (E) To the extent permitted by federal and state law, the registrar shall provide records from the commercial driver's license information system regarding a commercial driver's license holder or commercial motor vehicle operator to the following individuals and entities or their authorized agents within ten days of the receipt of conviction or disqualification information concerning the holder or operator from another state or within ten days of the date of conviction or disqualification of the holder or operator if it occurred in this state, as applicable: (1) Other states; (2) The secretary of the United States department of transportation; (3) The commercial driver's license holder or commercial motor vehicle operator referenced in the records; (4) A motor carrier that is a current or prospective employer of the commercial driver's license holder or commercial motor vehicle operator referenced in the records. (F)(1) If the registrar receives information in accordance with division (C)(11) of this section, the registrar shall notify the subject commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license holder. The notice shall inform the driver that the driver's commercial driver's license privileges will be downgraded unless the driver resolves the prohibition in accordance with the federal requirements within thirty days. If the driver does not resolve the prohibition within the thirty days, the registrar shall do all of the following: (a) Downgrade the driver's commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit or commercial driver's license to prohibit the driver from operating a commercial motor vehicle; (b) Send a second notice to the driver specifying that the driver's license has been downgraded and that the driver is prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle until the driver takes the steps necessary to reinstate commercial driver's license privileges; (c) Record the downgrade on the driver's commercial driver's license information system driver record not later than sixty days after the original notification to the registrar from the federal motor carrier safety administration. (2) If the registrar receives information in accordance with division (C)(12) of this section, the registrar shall do one of the following, as applicable: (a) If the registrar receives the information before the registrar has downgraded a driver's commercial driver's license privileges in accordance with division (F)(1) of this section, the registrar shall terminate the downgrade process and notify the applicable driver of the termination; (b) If the registrar receives the information after the registrar has downgraded a driver's commercial driver's license privileges in accordance with division (F)(1) of this section, the registrar shall reinstate the driver's commercial driver's license, provided that the driver is otherwise eligible for reinstatement and such commercial driving privileges. (3) If the registrar receives information in accordance with division (C)(12) of this section that the driver was erroneously identified as prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle, in addition to the reinstatement procedures under division (F)(2) of this section, the registrar shall remove any record of the downgrade from the driver's commercial driver's license information system driver record and motor vehicle driving record. Sec. 4506.131. (A)(A)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles shall not issue, renew, upgrade, or transfer a hazardous materials endorsement for a commercial driver's license to any individual authorizing that individual to operate a commercial motor vehicle transporting a hazardous material in commerce unless the registrar has received from the transportation security administration a determination indicating that the individual does not pose a security risk warranting denial of the endorsement. (2) The registrar may issue, renew, upgrade, or transfer a hazardous materials endorsement for a commercial driver's license to an individual who is under twenty-one years of age if both of the following apply: (a) The individual uses the endorsement for purposes of intrastate commerce of hazardous materials only; (b) The individual meets all other federal and state requirements for issuance of the endorsement. (B)(1) Immediately upon receiving a determination from the transportation security administration that an individual poses a security risk warranting denial of a hazardous materials endorsement, the registrar shall revoke any existing hazardous materials endorsement and shall refuse to issue a hazardous materials endorsement for the individual named as a security risk. (2) Within fifteen days of receiving any determination from the transportation security administration indicating the status of an individual's security risk, the registrar shall notify the commercial driver license information system of the results of the security assessment. (C) The registrar shall order any revocation under division (B) of this section without a hearing. Any person adversely affected by the order may request an administrative hearing before the registrar. The scope of the hearing shall be limited to whether the bureau of motor vehicles properly revoked the hazardous material endorsement after receiving notification from the transportation security administration and shall not include consideration of whether the transportation security administration acted properly in sending the notification. Sec. 4506.14. (A) Commercial driver's licenses shall expire as follows: (1) Except as provided in division (A)(3) or (4) of this section, each such license issued to replace an operator's or chauffeur's license shall expire on the original expiration date of the operator's or chauffeur's license and, upon renewal, shall expire on the licensee's birthday in the fourth or eighth year after the date of issuance, based on the period of renewal requested by the applicant. A person who is sixty-five years of age or older may only apply for a commercial driver's license that expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it is issued. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(3) or (4) of this section, each such license issued as an original license to a person whose residence is in this state shall expire on the licensee's birthday in the fourth or eighth year after the date of issuance, based on the period of renewal requested by the applicant. A person who is sixty-five years of age or older may only apply for a commercial driver's license that expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it is issued. (b) Each such license issued to a person whose temporary residence is in this state shall expire in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar of motor vehicles. A license issued to a person with a temporary residence in this state is nonrenewable, but may be replaced with a new license within ninety days prior to its expiration upon the applicant's compliance with all applicable requirementsa limited term license and may be renewed in accordance with division (C) of this section. (3) The registrar or a deputy registrar may issue a license that expires on a date earlier than the licensee's birthday in the fourth year after the date of issuance if the licensee has undergone a security threat assessment required by federal law to obtain a hazardous materials endorsement and the assessment will expire before that date. No commercial driver's license shall be issued under division (A)(3) of this section for a period longer than four years and one hundred eighty days. (4) Each such license issued to replace the operator's or chauffeur's license of a person who is less than twenty-one years of age, and each such license issued as an original license to a person who is less than twenty-one years of age, shall expire on the licensee's twenty-first birthday. (B) No commercial driver's license shall be issued for a period longer than eight years. Except as provided in section 4507.12 of the Revised Code, the registrar may waive the examination of any person applying for the renewal of a commercial driver's license issued under this chapter, provided that the applicant presents either an unexpired commercial driver's license or a commercial driver's license that has expired not more than six months prior to the date of application. (C)(C)(1) Subject to the requirements of this chapter and except as provided in division (A)(2)(C)(2) of this section in regard to a person whose temporary residence is in this state, every commercial driver's license shall be renewable one hundred eighty days before its expiration upon payment of the fees required by section 4506.08 of the Revised Code. Each person applying for renewal or transfer of a commercial driver's license shall complete the application form prescribed by section 4506.07 of the Revised Code and shall provide all certifications required. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (C)(2)(b) of this section, a limited term commercial driver's license shall not be issued to a temporary resident for a period longer than the expiration date of the temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, or for four years from the date of issuance, whichever date is earliest. (b) If there is no expiration date for a temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, a limited term commercial driver's license shall not be issued to the temporary resident for a period longer than one year from the date of issuance. (c) A limited term commercial driver's license may be renewed within one hundred eighty days prior to its expiration upon the applicant's presentation of documentation verifying the applicant's legal presence or continued temporary lawful status in the United States. (3) Prior to applying for renewal of a commercial driver's license, each applicant shall submit a new copy or original medical examiner's certificate required by section 4506.10 of the Revised Code; if the person's medical status has changed, the registrar shall take the appropriate action to address the change in medical status. If the person wishes to retain an endorsement authorizing the person to transport hazardous materials, the person shall take and successfully complete the written test for the endorsement and shall submit to any background check required by federal law. (D) Each person licensed as a driver under this chapter shall notify the registrar of any change in the person's address within ten days following that change. The notification shall be in writing on a form provided by the registrar and shall include the full name, date of birth, license number, county of residence, social security number, and new address of the person. (E) Whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. Sec. 4507.061. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles may authorize the online renewal of a driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card issued by the bureau of motor vehicles for eligible applicants. An applicant is eligible for online renewal if all of the following apply: (1) The applicant's current driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card was processed in person at a deputy registrar office. (2) The applicant has a photo on file with the bureau of motor vehicles from the applicant's current driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card. (3) The applicant's current driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it was issued. (4) The applicant is applying for a driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card that expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it is issued. (5) The applicant's current driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card is unexpired or expired not more than six months prior to the date of the application. (6) The applicant is a citizen or a permanent resident of the United States and a permanent resident of this state. (7) The applicant's current driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card was issued when the applicant was twenty-one years of age or older. (8) If the applicant is renewing a driver's license or commercial driver's license, the applicant is less than sixty-five years of age. (9) The applicant's current driver's license, commercial driver's license, or driving privileges are not suspended, canceled, revoked, or restricted, and the applicant is not otherwise prohibited by law from obtaining a driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card. (10) The applicant has no changes to the applicant's name or personal information, other than a change of address. (11) The applicant has no medical restrictions that would require the applicant to apply for a driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card in person at a deputy registrar office. The registrar shall determine the medical restrictions that require in person applications. (12) For a commercial driver's license, the applicant complies with all the requirements of Chapter 4506. of the Revised Code, including self-certification and medical certificate requirements. (13) For a commercial driver's license, the applicant is not under any restriction specified by any federal regulation. (B) An applicant may not submit an application online for any of the following: (1) A temporary instruction permit; (2) A commercial driver's license temporary instruction permit; (3) An initial issuance of an Ohio driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card; (4) An initial issuance of a federally compliant driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card; (5) An ignition interlock license; (6) A limited term driver's license or nonrenewable limited term commercial driver's license issued to a temporary resident. (C) The registrar may require an applicant to provide a digital copy of any identification documents and supporting documents as required by statute or administrative rule to comply with current state and federal requirements. (D) Except as otherwise provided, an applicant shall comply with all other applicable laws related to the issuance of a driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card in order to renew a driver's license, commercial driver's license, or identification card under this section. (E) The registrar may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement and administer this section. Sec. 4507.08. (A) No probationary license shall be issued to any person under the age of eighteen who has been adjudicated an unruly or delinquent child or a juvenile traffic offender for having committed any act that if committed by an adult would be a drug abuse offense, as defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (B) of section 2917.11, or a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, unless the person has been required by the court to attend a drug abuse or alcohol abuse education, intervention, or treatment program specified by the court and has satisfactorily completed the program. (B) No temporary instruction permit or driver's license shall be issued to any person whose license has been suspended, during the period for which the license was suspended, nor to any person whose license has been canceled, under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code. (C) No temporary instruction permit or driver's license shall be issued to any person whose commercial driver's license is suspended under Chapter 4510. or any other provision of the Revised Code during the period of the suspension. No temporary instruction permit or driver's license shall be issued to any person when issuance is prohibited by division (A) of section 4507.091 of the Revised Code. (D) No temporary instruction permit or driver's license shall be issued to, or retained by, any of the following persons: (1) Any person who has alcoholism, or is addicted to the use of controlled substances to the extent that the use constitutes an impairment to the person's ability to operate a motor vehicle with the required degree of safety; (2) Any person who is under the age of eighteen and has been adjudicated an unruly or delinquent child or a juvenile traffic offender for having committed any act that if committed by an adult would be a drug abuse offense, as defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code, a violation of division (B) of section 2917.11, or a violation of division (A) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, unless the person has been required by the court to attend a drug abuse or alcohol abuse education, intervention, or treatment program specified by the court and has satisfactorily completed the program; (3) Any person who, in the opinion of the registrar, has a physical or mental disability or disease that prevents the person from exercising reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle while operating the vehicle upon the highways, except that a restricted license effective for six months may be issued to any person otherwise qualified who is or has been subject to any condition resulting in episodic impairment of consciousness or loss of muscular control and whose condition, in the opinion of the registrar, is dormant or is sufficiently under medical control that the person is capable of exercising reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle. A restricted license effective for six months shall be issued to any person who otherwise is qualified and who is subject to any condition that causes episodic impairment of consciousness or a loss of muscular control if the person presents a statement from a licensed physician, certified nurse-midwife if authorized as described in section 4723.438 of the Revised Code, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner that the person's condition is under effective medical control and the period of time for which the control has been continuously maintained, unless, thereafter, a medical examination is ordered and, pursuant thereto, cause for denial is found. A person to whom a six-month restricted license has been issued shall give notice of the person's medical condition to the registrar on forms provided by the registrar and signed by the licensee's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner at intervals required by the registrar. The notice shall be sent to the registrar six months after the issuance of the license. Subsequent restricted licenses issued to the same individual shall be effective for six monthsdetermine the validity period of the restricted license. (4) Any person who is unable to understand highway warnings or traffic signs or directions given in the English language; (5) Any person making an application whose driver's license or driving privileges are under cancellation, revocation, or suspension in the jurisdiction where issued or any other jurisdiction, until the expiration of one year after the license was canceled or revoked or until the period of suspension ends. Any person whose application is denied under this division may file a petition in the municipal court or county court in whose jurisdiction the person resides agreeing to pay the cost of the proceedings and alleging that the conduct involved in the offense that resulted in suspension, cancellation, or revocation in the foreign jurisdiction would not have resulted in a suspension, cancellation, or revocation had the offense occurred in this state. If the petition is granted, the petitioner shall notify the registrar by a certified copy of the court's findings and a license shall not be denied under this division. (6) Any person who is under a class one or two suspension imposed for a violation of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.04, 2903.06, 2903.08, 2903.11, 2921.331, or 2923.02 of the Revised Code or whose driver's or commercial driver's license or permit was permanently revoked prior to January 1, 2004, for a substantially equivalent violation pursuant to section 4507.16 of the Revised Code; (7) Any person who is not a resident or temporary resident of this state. (E) No person whose driver's license or permit has been suspended under Chapter 4510. of the Revised Code or any other provision of the Revised Code shall have driving privileges reinstated if the registrar determines that a warrant has been issued in this state or any other state for the person's arrest and that warrant is an active warrant. Sec. 4507.09. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, every driver's license issued to a resident of this state expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth or eighth year after the date it is issued, based on the period of renewal requested by the applicant. A resident who is sixty-five years of age or older may only apply for a driver's license that expires on the birthday of the applicant in the fourth year after the date it is issued. In no event shall any license be issued for a period longer than eight years and ninety days. Subject to the requirements of section 4507.12 of the Revised Code, every driver's license issued to a resident is renewable at any time prior to its expiration. (2) A driver's license issued to a temporary resident shall expire in accordance with rules adopted by the registrar of motor vehicles. A driver's license issued to a temporary resident is a limited term license, but may be renewed within ninety days prior to its expiration in accordance with division (E) of this section. (3) No refund shall be made or credit given for the unexpired portion of the driver's license that is renewed. The registrar shall notify each person whose driver's license has expired within forty-five days after the date of expiration. Notification shall be made by regular mail sent to the person's last known address as shown in the records of the bureau of motor vehicles. Failure to provide such notification shall not be construed as a renewal or extension of any license. (4) For the purposes of this section, the date of birth of any applicant born on the twenty-ninth day of February shall be deemed to be the first day of March in any year in which there is no twenty-ninth day of February. (B) Every driver's license or renewal of a driver's license issued to a resident applicant who is sixteen years of age or older, but less than twenty-one years of age, expires on the twenty-first birthday of the applicant, except that an applicant who applies no more than thirty days before the applicant's twenty-first birthday shall be issued a license in accordance with division (A) of this section. (C) Each person licensed as a driver under this chapter shall notify the registrar of any change in the person's address within ten days following that change. The notification shall be in writing on a form provided by the registrar and shall include the full name, date of birth, license number, county of residence, social security number, and new address of the person. The registrar shall offer the person the opportunity to submit a notice of change of address for voter registration purposes by electronic means in conjunction with the person's transaction with the registrar, in accordance with section 3503.11 of the Revised Code. (D) No driver's license shall be renewed when renewal is prohibited by division (A) of section 4507.091 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) Except as provided in division (E)(2) of this section, a limited term license shall not be issued to a temporary resident for a period longer than the expiration date of the temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, or for four years from the date of issuance, whichever date is earliest. (2) If there is no expiration date for a temporary resident's authorized stay in the United States, a limited term license shall not be issued to the temporary resident for a period longer than one year from the date of issuance. (3) A limited term license may be renewed within ninety days prior to its expiration upon the applicant's presentation of documentation verifying the applicant's legal presence or continued temporary lawful status in the United States. (3) A limited term license is not transferable, and the applicant may not rely on it to obtain a driver's license in another state. (4) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the registrar shall adopt rules governing limited term licenses for temporary residents. Sec. 4507.21. (A) Except as provided in section 4507.061 of the Revised Code, each applicant for a driver's license shall file an application in the office of the registrar of motor vehicles or of a deputy registrar. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, each person under eighteen twenty-one years of age applying for a driver's license issued in this state and each person eighteen twenty-one years of age or older applying for an initial limited term license in this state shall present satisfactory evidence of having successfully completed one of the following: (a) A driver training course approved by the director of public safety. (b) A driver training course comparable to a driver training course described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section and administered by a branch of the armed forces of the United States and completed by the applicant while residing outside this state for the purpose of being with or near any person serving in the armed forces of the United States. (2) Each person under eighteen twenty-one years of age applying for a driver's license also shall present, on a form prescribed by the registrar, an affidavit signed by an eligible adult attesting that the person has acquired at least fifty hours of actual driving experience, with at least ten of those hours being at night. (3) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, each person eighteen twenty-one years of age or older applying for an initial limited term license in this state also shall present, on a form prescribed by the registrar, an affidavit signed by an adult who holds a current valid driver's or commercial driver's license issued by this state that the applicant has acquired at least fifty hours of actual driving experience, with at least ten of those hours being at night, accompanied by the signing adult. (4) Both of the following individuals are exempt from the requirements specified in divisions (B)(1) and (3) of this section: (a) A person who receives a waiver of the examination by the registrar in accordance with section 4507.10 of the Revised Code; (b) An initial limited term license applicant eighteen twenty-one years of age or older who is from a country with which the registrar has a reciprocal arrangement in accordance with section 4507.101 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) An applicant for an initial driver's license shall present satisfactory evidence of successful completion of the abbreviated driver training course for adults, approved by the director of public safety under section 4508.02 of the Revised Code, if all of the following apply: (a) The applicant is eighteen twenty-one years of age or older. (b) The applicant failed the road or maneuverability test required under division (A)(2) of section 4507.11 of the Revised Code. (c) In the twelve months immediately preceding the date of application, the applicant has not successfully completed a driver training course. (2) An applicant shall present satisfactory evidence as required under division (C)(1) of this section prior to attempting the test a second or subsequent time. (D) If the registrar or deputy registrar determines that the applicant is entitled to the driver's license, it shall be issued. If the application shows that the applicant's license has been previously canceled or suspended, the deputy registrar shall forward the application to the registrar, who shall determine whether the license shall be granted. (E) An applicant shall file an application under this section in duplicate, and the deputy registrar issuing the license shall immediately forward to the office of the registrar the original copy of the application, together with the duplicate copy of any certificate of completion if issued for purposes of division (B) of this section. The registrar shall prescribe rules as to the manner in which the deputy registrar files and maintains the applications and other records. The registrar shall file every application for a driver's or commercial driver's license and index them by name and number, and shall maintain a suitable record of all licenses issued, all convictions and bond forfeitures, all applications for licenses denied, and all licenses that have been suspended or canceled. (F) For purposes of section 2313.06 of the Revised Code, the registrar shall maintain accurate and current lists of the residents of each county who are eighteen years of age or older, have been issued, on and after January 1, 1984, driver's or commercial driver's licenses that are valid and current, and would be electors if they were registered to vote, regardless of whether they actually are registered to vote. The lists shall contain the names, addresses, dates of birth, duration of residence in this state, citizenship status, and social security numbers, if the numbers are available, of the licensees, and may contain any other information that the registrar considers suitable. (G) Each person under eighteen years of age applying for a motorcycle operator's endorsement or a restricted license enabling the applicant to operate a motorcycle shall present satisfactory evidence of having completed the courses of instruction in the motorcycle safety and education program described in section 4508.08 of the Revised Code or a comparable course of instruction administered by a branch of the armed forces of the United States and completed by the applicant while residing outside this state for the purpose of being with or near any person serving in the armed forces of the United States. If the registrar or deputy registrar then determines that the applicant is entitled to the endorsement or restricted license, it shall be issued. (H) No person shall knowingly make a false statement in an affidavit presented in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section. (I) As used in this section, "eligible adult" means any of the following persons: (1) A parent, guardian, or custodian of the applicant; (2) A person over the age of twenty-one who acts in loco parentis of the applicant and who maintains proof of financial responsibility with respect to the operation of a motor vehicle owned by the applicant or with respect to the applicant's operation of any motor vehicle. (J) Whoever violates division (H) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor and shall be fined one hundred dollars. Sec. 4507.40. (A) As used in this section, "Ohio credential" means a temporary instruction permit identification card, driver's license, commercial driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, motorized bicycle license, or identification card issued by the Ohio bureau of motor vehicles. (B) Any valid holder of an Ohio credential issued after July 2, 2018, may apply online to obtain an exact reprint of that Ohio credential. Not more than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section April 12, 2021, the registrar of motor vehicles shall make the reprint application process available through electronic means on the bureau of motor vehicle's web site. A reprint of an Ohio credential shall be available only through the online process. (C) An applicant may obtain not more than one reprint two reprints between the initial issuance and renewal of an Ohio credential or between renewals of an Ohio credential. A reprint shall be an exact copy of the last-issued Ohio credential that it replaces. A reprint expires on the same date as the Ohio credential it replaces. (D) The applicant shall do all of the following in the application: (1) Certify that the current Ohio credential is lost, destroyed, or mutilated; (2) Provide identifying information, as required by the registrar, in order to confirm the applicant's identity; (3) Include with the application a financial transaction device number to pay the applicable fees for the reprint of the Ohio credential, and a service fee equal to the amount established under section 4503.038 of the Revised Code. (E) Upon receipt of a completed application, the registrar shall issue a reprint Ohio credential to the applicant, if the applicant is eligible for the reprint. If the applicant does not qualify for a reprint, the registrar shall notify the applicant why the application was denied. (F) The fees that are collected from a person who applies for a reprint of an Ohio credential shall be paid to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund established by section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4507.53. Digitalized photographic records of the department of public safety may be released only to the following: (A) State, local, or federal governmental agencies for criminal justice purposes; (B) Any court; (C) The American association of motor vehicle administrators to allow state department of motor vehicles participating in the association's state-to-state verification services and digital image access and exchange program to use the photographic records for identity verification purposes; (D) The department of job and family services or the unemployment compensation review commission for the purpose of carrying out the department's or commission's functions under Chapter 4141. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4508.02. (A)(1) The director of public safety, subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt and prescribe such rules concerning the administration and enforcement of this chapter as are necessary to protect the public. The rules shall require an assessment of the holder of a probationary instructor license. The director shall inspect the school facilities and equipment of applicants and licensees and examine applicants for instructor's licenses. (2) The director shall adopt rules governing online driver education courses that may be completed via the internet to satisfy the classroom instruction under division (C) of this section. The rules shall do all of the following: (a) Establish standards that an online driver training enterprise must satisfy to be licensed to offer an online driver education course via the internet, including, at a minimum, proven expertise in providing driver education and an acceptable infrastructure capable of providing secure online driver education in accord with advances in internet technology. The rules shall allow an online driver training enterprise to be affiliated with a licensed driver training school offering in-person classroom instruction, but shall not require such an affiliation. (b) Establish content requirements that an online driver education course must satisfy to be approved as equivalent to twenty-four hours of in-person classroom instruction; (c) Establish attendance standards, including a maximum number of course hours that may be completed in a twenty-four-hour period; (d) Allow an enrolled applicant to begin the required eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction upon completing all twenty-four hours of course instruction; (e) Establish any other requirements necessary to regulate online driver education. (B) The director shall administer and enforce this chapter. (C) The rules shall require twenty-four hours of completed in-person classroom instruction or the completion of an approved, equivalent online driver education course offered via the internet by a licensed online driver training enterprise, followed by eight hours of actual behind-the-wheel instruction conducted on public streets and highways of this state for all beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles who are required to complete the training under section 4507.21 of the Revised Code. The rules shall allow beginning drivers of noncommercial motor vehicles to complete the driver education course at any point while holding a valid temporary instruction permit. The rules also shall require the classroom instruction or online driver education course for such drivers to include instruction on both of the following: (1) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while distracted, including while using an electronic wireless communications device, or engaging in any other activity that distracts a driver from the safe and effective operation of a motor vehicle; (2) The dangers of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of a controlled substance, prescription medication, or alcohol. (D) The rules shall state the minimum hours for classroom and behind-the-wheel instruction required for beginning drivers of commercial trucks, commercial cars, buses, and commercial tractors, trailers, and semitrailers. (E)(1) The department of public safety may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise in an amount sufficient to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in the regulation of online driver education courses. (2) The department shall supply to each licensed online driver training enterprise certificates to be used for certifying an applicant's enrollment in an approved online driver education course and a separate certificate to be issued upon successful completion of an approved online driver education course. The certificates shall be numbered serially. The department may charge a fee to each online driver training enterprise per certificate supplied to pay the actual expenses the department incurs in supplying the certificates. (F) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing an abbreviated driver training course for adults. Sec. 4509.06. (A) The driver of any motor vehicle which Any person who is in any manner involved in a motor vehicle accident within six months of the accident , including as the driver of a motor vehicle, the owner of property, or any person sustaining bodily injury or property damage, may, within six months after the accident, forward a written report of the accident to the registrar of motor vehicles on a form prescribed by the registrar alleging that a driver or owner of any other vehicle involved in the accident was uninsured at the time of the accident. (B) Upon receipt of the accident report, the registrar shall send a notice by regular mail to the driver and owner alleged to be uninsured requiring the person to give evidence that the person had proof of financial responsibility in effect at the time of the accident. (C) Within thirty days after the mailing of the notice by the registrar, the driver of the vehicle alleged to be uninsured shall forward a report together with acceptable proof of financial responsibility to the registrar in a form prescribed by the registrar. The forwarding of the report by the owner of the motor vehicle involved in the accident is deemed compliance with this section by the driver. This section does not change or modify the duties of the driver or operator of a motor vehicle as set forth in section 4549.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4509.07. The report prescribed by the registrar of motor vehicles shall request only information sufficient to enable the registrar to administer and enforce the provisions of sections 4509.01 to 4509.78, inclusive, of the Revised Code. The driver or owner of a motor vehicle person involved in an accident who submits or is the subject of a report submitted in accordance with section 4509.06 of the Revised Code shall furnish such additional relevant information as the registrar requires. Sec. 4509.101. (A)(1) No person shall operate, or permit the operation of, a motor vehicle in this state, unless proof of financial responsibility is maintained continuously throughout the registration period with respect to that vehicle, or, in the case of a driver who is not the owner, with respect to that driver's operation of that vehicle. (2) Whoever violates division (A)(1) of this section shall be subject to the following civil penalties: (a) Subject to divisions (A)(2)(b) and (c) of this section, a class (F) suspension of the person's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege for the period of time specified in division (B)(6) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code and impoundment of the person's license. The court may grant limited driving privileges to the person, but only if the person presents proof of financial responsibility and is enrolled in a reinstatement fee payment plan pursuant to section 4510.10 of the Revised Code. (b) If, within one year of the violation, the person's operating privileges are again suspended and the person's license again is impounded for a violation of division (A)(1) of this section, a class C suspension of the person's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege for the period of time specified in division (B)(3) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. The court may grant limited driving privileges to the person only if the person presents proof of financial responsibility and has complied with division (A)(5) of this section, and no court may grant limited driving privileges for the first fifteen days of the suspension. (c) If, within one year of the violation, the person's operating privileges are suspended and the person's license is impounded two or more times for a violation of division (A)(1) of this section, a class B suspension of the person's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege for the period of time specified in division (B)(2) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. The court may grant limited driving privileges to the person only if the person presents proof of financial responsibility and has complied with division (A)(5) of this section, except that no court may grant limited driving privileges for the first thirty days of the suspension. The clerk of court shall waive the cost of filing a petition for limited driving privileges if, pursuant to section 2323.311 of the Revised Code, the petitioner applies to be qualified as an indigent litigant and the court approves the application. (3) A person to whom this state has issued a certificate of registration for a motor vehicle or a license to operate a motor vehicle or who is determined to have operated any motor vehicle or permitted the operation in this state of a motor vehicle owned by the person shall be required to verify the existence of proof of financial responsibility covering the operation of the motor vehicle or the person's operation of the motor vehicle under either of the following circumstances: (a) The person or a motor vehicle owned by the person is involved in a traffic accident that requires the filing of an accident report under section 4509.06 of the Revised Code. (b) The person receives a traffic ticket indicating that proof of the maintenance of financial responsibility was not produced upon the request of a peace officer or state highway patrol trooper made in accordance with division (D)(2) of this section. (4) An order of the registrar that suspends a license shall state the date on or before which the person is required to surrender the person's license. The person is deemed to have surrendered the license, in compliance with the order, if the person does either of the following: (a) On or before the date specified in the order, delivers the license to the registrar; (b) Mails the license to the registrar in an envelope or container bearing a postmark showing a date no later than the date specified in the order. (5) Except as provided in division (L) of this section, the registrar shall not restore any operating privileges suspended under this section, return any license surrendered under this section, or reissue a license under section 4510.52 of the Revised Code, if the registrar destroyed the suspended license under that section, unless the rights are not subject to suspension or revocation under any other law and unless the person, in addition to complying with all other conditions required by law for reinstatement of the operating privileges, complies with all of the following: (a) Pays to the registrar or an eligible deputy registrar a financial responsibility reinstatement fee of forty dollars for the first violation of division (A)(1) of this section, three hundred dollars for a second violation of that division, and six hundred dollars for a third or subsequent violation of that division; (b) Files and continuously maintains proof of financial responsibility in accordance with sections 4509.44 to 4509.65 of the Revised Code; (c) Pays a deputy registrar a service fee of ten dollars to compensate the deputy registrar for services performed under this section. The deputy registrar shall retain eight dollars of the service fee and shall transmit the reinstatement fee and two dollars of the service fee to the registrar in the manner the registrar shall determine. (B)(1) Every party required to file an accident report under section 4509.06 of the Revised Code also shall include with the report a document described in division (G)(1)(a) of this section or shall present proof of financial responsibility through use of an electronic wireless communications device as permitted by division (G)(1)(b) of this section. If the registrar determines, within forty-five days after the report is filed, that an operator or owner has violated division (A)(1) of this section, the registrar shall do all of the following: (a) Order the suspension required under division (A)(2)(a), (b), or (c) of this section of the license of any operator or owner who has violated division (A)(1) of this section; (b) Record the name and address of the person whose license has been suspended or is under an order of suspension, the serial number of the person's license, and the person's social security account number, if assigned, or, where the motor vehicle that is the subject of the violation is used for hire or principally in connection with any established business, the person's federal taxpayer identification number. The information shall be recorded in such a manner that it becomes a part of the person's permanent record, and assists the registrar in monitoring compliance with the orders of suspension. (c) Send written notification to every person to whom the order pertains, at the person's last known address as shown on the records of the bureau. The person, within ten days after the date of the mailing of the notification, shall surrender to the registrar, in a manner set forth in division (A)(4) of this section, any license under an order of suspension. (2) The registrar shall issue any order under division (B)(1) of this section without a hearing. Any person adversely affected by the order, within ten fifteen days after the issuance of the order, may request an administrative hearing before the registrar, who shall provide the person with an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with this paragraph. A request for a hearing does not operate as a suspension of the order. The scope of the hearing shall be limited to whether the person in fact demonstrated to the registrar proof of financial responsibility in accordance with this section. The registrar shall determine the date, time, and place of any hearing, provided that the hearing shall be held, and an order issued or findings made, within thirty days after the registrar receives a request for a hearing. If requested by the person in writing, the registrar may designate as the place of hearing the county seat of the county in which the person resides or a place within fifty miles of the person's residence. The person shall pay the cost of the hearing before the registrar, if the registrar's order of suspension is upheld. (C) Any order of suspension issued under this section or division (B) of section 4509.37 of the Revised Code may be terminated at any time if the registrar determines upon a showing of proof of financial responsibility that the operator or owner of the motor vehicle was in compliance with division (A)(1) of this section at the time of the traffic offense, motor vehicle inspection, or accident that resulted in the order against the person. A determination may be made without a hearing. This division does not apply unless the person shows good cause for the person's failure to present satisfactory proof of financial responsibility to the registrar prior to the issuance of the order. (D)(1)(a) For the purpose of enforcing this section, every peace officer is deemed an agent of the registrar. (b) Any peace officer who, in the performance of the peace officer's duties as authorized by law, becomes aware of a person whose license is under an order of suspension, pursuant to this section, may confiscate the license and return it to the registrar. (2) A peace officer shall request the owner or operator of a motor vehicle to produce proof of financial responsibility in a manner described in division (G) of this section at the time the peace officer acts to enforce the traffic laws of this state and during motor vehicle inspections conducted pursuant to section 4513.02 of the Revised Code. (3) A peace officer shall indicate on every traffic ticket whether the person receiving the traffic ticket produced proof of the maintenance of financial responsibility in response to the officer's request under division (D)(2) of this section. The peace officer shall inform every person who receives a traffic ticket and who has failed to produce proof of the maintenance of financial responsibility that the person must submit proof to the traffic violations bureau with any payment of a fine and costs for the ticketed violation or, if the person is to appear in court for the violation, the person must submit proof to the court. (4)(a) If a person who has failed to produce proof of the maintenance of financial responsibility appears in court for a ticketed violation, the court may permit the defendant to present evidence of proof of financial responsibility to the court at such time and in such manner as the court determines to be necessary or appropriate. In a manner prescribed by the registrar, the clerk of courts shall provide the registrar with the identity of any person who fails to submit proof of the maintenance of financial responsibility pursuant to division (D)(3) of this section. (b) If a person who has failed to produce proof of the maintenance of financial responsibility also fails to submit that proof to the traffic violations bureau with payment of a fine and costs for the ticketed violation, the traffic violations bureau, in a manner prescribed by the registrar, shall notify the registrar of the identity of that person. (5)(a) Upon receiving notice from a clerk of courts or traffic violations bureau pursuant to division (D)(4) of this section, the registrar shall order the suspension of the license of the person required under division (A)(2)(a), (b), or (c) of this section, effective forty-five days after the date of the mailing of notification. The registrar also shall notify the person that the person must present the registrar with proof of financial responsibility in accordance with this section, surrender to the registrar the person's license, or submit a statement subject to section 2921.13 of the Revised Code that the person did not operate or permit the operation of the motor vehicle at the time of the offense. Notification shall be in writing and shall be sent to the person at the person's last known address as shown on the records of the bureau of motor vehicles. The person, within forty-five days after the date of the mailing of notification, shall present proof of financial responsibility, surrender the license to the registrar in a manner set forth in division (A)(4) of this section, or submit the statement required under this section together with other information the person considers appropriate. If the registrar does not receive proof or the person does not surrender the license, in accordance with this division, the registrar shall permit the order for the suspension of the license of the person to take effect. (b) In the case of a person who presents, within the forty-five-day period, proof of financial responsibility, the registrar shall terminate the order of suspension and shall send written notification to the person, at the person's last known address as shown on the records of the bureau. (c) Any person adversely affected by the order of the registrar under division (D)(5)(a) or (b) of this section, within ten fifteen days after the issuance of the order, may request an administrative hearing before the registrar, who shall provide the person with an opportunity for a hearing in accordance with this paragraph. A request for a hearing does not operate as a suspension of the order. The scope of the hearing shall be limited to whether, at the time of the hearing, the person presents proof of financial responsibility covering the vehicle and whether the person is eligible for an exemption in accordance with this section or any rule adopted under it. The registrar shall determine the date, time, and place of any hearing; provided, that the hearing shall be held, and an order issued or findings made, within thirty days after the registrar receives a request for a hearing. If requested by the person, the hearing may be held remotely by electronic means. If requested by the person in writing, the registrar may designate as the place of hearing the county seat of the county in which the person resides or a place within fifty miles of the person's residence. Such person shall pay the cost of the hearing before the registrar, if the registrar's order of suspension under division (D)(5)(a) or (b) of this section is upheld. (6) Any forms used by law enforcement agencies in administering this section shall be prescribed, supplied, and paid for by the registrar. (7) No peace officer, law enforcement agency employing a peace officer, or political subdivision or governmental agency that employs a peace officer shall be liable in a civil action for damages or loss to persons arising out of the performance of any duty required or authorized by this section. (8) As used in this section, "peace officer" has the meaning set forth in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (E) All fees, except court costs, fees paid to a deputy registrar, and those portions of the financial responsibility reinstatement fees as otherwise specified in this division, collected under this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code and used to cover costs incurred by the bureau in the administration of this section and sections 4503.20, 4507.212, and 4509.81 of the Revised Code, and by any law enforcement agency employing any peace officer who returns any license to the registrar pursuant to division (C) of this section. Of each financial responsibility reinstatement fee the registrar collects pursuant to division (A)(5)(a) of this section or receives from a deputy registrar under division (A)(5)(c) of this section, the registrar shall deposit ten dollars of each forty-dollar reinstatement fee, fifty dollars of each three-hundred-dollar reinstatement fee, and one hundred dollars of each six-hundred-dollar reinstatement fee into the state treasury to the credit of the indigent defense support fund created by section 120.08 of the Revised Code. (F) Chapter 119. of the Revised Code applies to this section only to the extent that any provision in that chapter is not clearly inconsistent with this section. (G)(1)(a) The registrar, court, traffic violations bureau, or peace officer may require proof of financial responsibility to be demonstrated by use of a standard form prescribed by the registrar. If the use of a standard form is not required, a person may demonstrate proof of financial responsibility under this section by presenting to the traffic violations bureau, court, registrar, or peace officer any of the following documents or a copy of the documents: (i) A financial responsibility identification card as provided in section 4509.103 of the Revised Code; (ii) A certificate of proof of financial responsibility on a form provided and approved by the registrar for the filing of an accident report required to be filed under section 4509.06 of the Revised Code; (iii) A policy of liability insurance, a declaration page of a policy of liability insurance, or liability bond, if the policy or bond complies with section 4509.20 or sections 4509.49 to 4509.61 of the Revised Code; (iv) A bond or certification of the issuance of a bond as provided in section 4509.59 of the Revised Code; (v) A certificate of deposit of money or securities as provided in section 4509.62 of the Revised Code; (vi) A certificate of self-insurance as provided in section 4509.72 of the Revised Code. (b) A person also may present proof of financial responsibility under this section to the traffic violations bureau, court, registrar, or peace officer through use of an electronic wireless communications device as specified under section 4509.103 of the Revised Code. (2) If a person fails to demonstrate proof of financial responsibility in a manner described in division (G)(1) of this section, the person may demonstrate proof of financial responsibility under this section by any other method that the court or the bureau, by reason of circumstances in a particular case, may consider appropriate. (3) A motor carrier certificated by the interstate commerce commission or by the public utilities commission may demonstrate proof of financial responsibility by providing a statement designating the motor carrier's operating authority and averring that the insurance coverage required by the certificating authority is in full force and effect. (4)(a) A finding by the registrar or court that a person is covered by proof of financial responsibility in the form of an insurance policy or surety bond is not binding upon the named insurer or surety or any of its officers, employees, agents, or representatives and has no legal effect except for the purpose of administering this section. (b) The preparation and delivery of a financial responsibility identification card or any other document authorized to be used as proof of financial responsibility and the generation and delivery of proof of financial responsibility to an electronic wireless communications device that is displayed on the device as text or images does not do any of the following: (i) Create any liability or estoppel against an insurer or surety, or any of its officers, employees, agents, or representatives; (ii) Constitute an admission of the existence of, or of any liability or coverage under, any policy or bond; (iii) Waive any defenses or counterclaims available to an insurer, surety, agent, employee, or representative in an action commenced by an insured or third-party claimant upon a cause of action alleged to have arisen under an insurance policy or surety bond or by reason of the preparation and delivery of a document for use as proof of financial responsibility or the generation and delivery of proof of financial responsibility to an electronic wireless communications device. (c) Whenever it is determined by a final judgment in a judicial proceeding that an insurer or surety, which has been named on a document or displayed on an electronic wireless communications device accepted by a court or the registrar as proof of financial responsibility covering the operation of a motor vehicle at the time of an accident or offense, is not liable to pay a judgment for injuries or damages resulting from such operation, the registrar, notwithstanding any previous contrary finding, shall forthwith suspend the operating privileges and registration rights of the person against whom the judgment was rendered as provided in division (A)(2) of this section. (H) In order for any document or display of text or images on an electronic wireless communications device described in division (G)(1) of this section to be used for the demonstration of proof of financial responsibility under this section, the document or words or images shall state the name of the insured or obligor, the name of the insurer or surety company, and the effective and expiration dates of the financial responsibility, and designate by explicit description or by appropriate reference all motor vehicles covered which may include a reference to fleet insurance coverage. (I) For purposes of this section, "owner" does not include a licensed motor vehicle leasing dealer as defined in section 4517.01 of the Revised Code, but does include a motor vehicle renting dealer as defined in section 4549.65 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section or in section 4509.51 of the Revised Code shall be construed to prohibit a motor vehicle renting dealer from entering into a contractual agreement with a person whereby the person renting the motor vehicle agrees to be solely responsible for maintaining proof of financial responsibility, in accordance with this section, with respect to the operation, maintenance, or use of the motor vehicle during the period of the motor vehicle's rental. (J) The purpose of this section is to require the maintenance of proof of financial responsibility with respect to the operation of motor vehicles on the highways of this state, so as to minimize those situations in which persons are not compensated for injuries and damages sustained in motor vehicle accidents. The general assembly finds that this section contains reasonable civil penalties and procedures for achieving this purpose. (K) Nothing in this section shall be construed to be subject to section 4509.78 of the Revised Code. (L)(1) The registrar may terminate any suspension imposed under this section and not require the owner to comply with division (A)(5) of this section if the registrar with or without a hearing determines that the owner of the vehicle has established by clear and convincing evidence that all of the following apply: (a) The owner customarily maintains proof of financial responsibility. (b) Proof of financial responsibility was not in effect for the vehicle on the date in question for one of the following reasons: (i) The vehicle was inoperable. (ii) The vehicle is operated only seasonally, and the date in question was outside the season of operation. (iii) A person other than the vehicle owner or driver was at fault for the lapse of proof of financial responsibility through no fault of the owner or driver. (iv) The lapse of proof of financial responsibility was caused by excusable neglect under circumstances that are not likely to recur and do not suggest a purpose to evade the requirements of this chapter. (2) The registrar may grant an owner or driver relief for a reason specified in division (L)(1)(b)(iii) or (iv) of this section only if the owner or driver has not previously been granted relief under division (L)(1)(b)(iii) or (iv) of this section. (M) The registrar shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are necessary to administer and enforce this section. The rules shall include provisions relating to acceptable forms of proof of financial responsibility, the use of an electronic wireless communications device to present proof of financial responsibility, and verification of the existence of financial responsibility during the period of registration. (N)(1) When a person utilizes an electronic wireless communications device to present proof of financial responsibility, only the evidence of financial responsibility displayed on the device shall be viewed by the registrar, peace officer, employee or official of the traffic violations bureau, or the court. No other content of the device shall be viewed for purposes of obtaining proof of financial responsibility. (2) When a person provides an electronic wireless communications device to the registrar, a peace officer, an employee or official of a traffic violations bureau, or the court, the person assumes the risk of any resulting damage to the device unless the registrar, peace officer, employee, or official, or court personnel purposely, knowingly, or recklessly commits an action that results in damage to the device. Sec. 4509.70. (A) After consultation with the insurance companies authorized to issue automobile liability or physical damage policies, or both, in this state, the superintendent of insurance shall approve a reasonable plan, fair and equitable to the insurers and to their policyholders, for the apportionment among such companies of applicants for such policies and for motor-vehicle liability policies who are in good faith entitled to but are unable to procure such policies through ordinary methods. When any such plan has been approved by the superintendent, all such insurance companies shall subscribe and participate. Any applicant for such policy, any person insured under such plan of operation, and any insurance company affected, may appeal to the superintendent of insurance from any ruling or decision of the manager or committee designated in the plan to operate the assigned risk insurance plan. Any order or act of the superintendent under this section is subject to review as provided in sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code, at the instance of any party in interest. (B) The plan described in division (A) of this section may permit the assigned risk insurance plan to directly issue and process claims arising from such policies described in division (A) of this section to applicants of automobile insurance policies who are in good faith entitled to but are unable to procure such policies through ordinary methods. (C) Every form of a policy, endorsement, rider, manual of classifications, rules, and rates, every rating plan, and every modification of any of them proposed to be used by the assigned risk insurance plan shall be filed, or the plan may satisfy its obligation to make such filings, as described in section 3937.03 of the Revised Code. (D) Any automobile insurance policy issued by the assigned risk insurance plan under division (B) of this section: (1) Shall be recognized as if issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state; (2) Shall meet all requirements of proof of financial responsibility as described in division (K) of section 4509.01 of the Revised Code. (E) Proof of financial responsibility provided by the assigned risk insurance plan to an automobile insurance policyholder that meets the requirements described in division (G)(1)(a) or (b) of section 4509.101 of the Revised Code shall be recognized as if issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state to demonstrate proof of financial responsibility under section 4509.101 of the Revised Code. (F) The assigned risk insurance plan designated in division (A) of this section shall do both of the following: (1) Make annual audited financial reports available to the superintendent of insurance promptly upon the completion of such audit; (2) Upon reasonable notice, make available to the superintendent of insurance all books and records relating to the insurance transactions of the assigned risk insurance plan. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, records created, held by, or pertaining to the assigned risk insurance plan are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, are confidential, and are not subject to inspection or disclosure. (2) Division (G)(1) of this section does not apply to the plan of operation and other information required to be filed under this section with the superintendent unless otherwise prohibited from release by law. (H)(1) For the purposes of division (H) of this section, "insurance agent" has the same meaning as in section 3905.01 of the Revised Code. (2) Provided that the assigned risk insurance plan establishes registration procedures for insurance agents under division (H)(3) of this section, the plan shall not accept an application for an automobile insurance policy issued under division (B) of this section unless that application is submitted through an insurance agent registered in accordance with those procedures. (3) The plan may do all of the following: (a) Establish procedures to register insurance agents; (b) Establish separate registrations for commercial and personal insurance agents, or one registration for both; (c) Empower the manager of the plan to make determinations on registration status, including by revoking an insurance agent's registration. (4) If an insurance agent is denied registration with the plan, or the insurance agent's registration is revoked, the plan may notify the superintendent of the plan's decision. The plan and manager are immune from civil liability for any decision to deny or revoke registration and from any decision to report denials or revocations to the superintendent. (5) All insurance agents submitting applications to the plan for automobile insurance coverage have an affirmative duty to ensure that all information included in the application and any supporting materials is true and accurate. (6)(a) An insurance agent shall not submit an application to the plan for automobile insurance coverage unless the agent exercises due diligence in confirming that the person seeking insurance is unable to obtain coverage through an insurer authorized to do business in this state. (b) For the purposes of this section, due diligence requires an insurance agent to contact at least five of the authorized insurers the agent represents or, if the agent does not represent five authorized insurers that customarily write automobile insurance coverage, as many of such insurers as the agent represents. (c) An insurance agent may assume that insurance coverage cannot be procured for the applicant through ordinary methods after each insurer contacted under division (H)(6)(b) of this section declines to provide coverage. (d) An insurance agent may assume that an authorized insurer declines to provide coverage to the applicant seeking insurance upon either of the following: (i) Receiving notice from the insurer declining coverage; (ii) Receiving no response from the insurer within ten days after the date the insurance agent initially makes contact with the insurer. (e) The determination of whether an insurance agent has adequately complied with the due diligence requirements is at the discretion of the manager of the plan. (f) An agent shall not submit an application on behalf of an applicant to the plan for any automobile insurance policy if any insurer admitted, authorized, or otherwise eligible to do business in this state has in any way communicated a willingness to insure the applicant, even if coverage provided by the plan costs less than other insurers. (g) The manager of the plan may revoke the registration of an insurance agent who fails to comply with division (H)(6) of this section. Sec. 4511.01. As used in this chapter and in Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code: (A) "Vehicle" means every device, including a bicycle, motorized bicycle, and an electric bicycle, in, upon, or by which any person or property may be transported or drawn upon a highway. "Vehicle" does not include any motorized wheelchair, any electric personal assistive mobility device, any low-speed micromobility device, any personal delivery device as defined in section 4511.513 of the Revised Code, any device that is moved by power collected from overhead electric trolley wires or that is used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or any device that is moved by human power. (B) "Motor vehicle" means every vehicle propelled or drawn by power other than muscular power or power collected from overhead electric trolley wires, except motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, road rollers, traction engines, power shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used in construction work and not designed for or employed in general highway transportation, hole-digging machinery, well-drilling machinery, ditch-digging machinery, farm machinery, and trailers designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a distance of no more than ten miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. (C) "Motorcycle" means every motor vehicle, other than a tractor, having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator and designed to travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, including, but not limited to, motor vehicles known as "motor-driven cycle," "motor scooter," "autocycle," "cab-enclosed motorcycle," or "motorcycle" without regard to weight or brake horsepower. (D) "Emergency vehicle" means emergency vehicles of municipal, township, or county departments or public utility corporations when identified as such as required by law, the director of public safety, or local authorities, and motor vehicles when commandeered by a police officer. (E) "Public safety vehicle" means any of the following: (1) Ambulances, including private ambulance companies under contract to a municipal corporation, township, or county, and private ambulances and nontransport vehicles bearing license plates issued under section 4503.49 of the Revised Code; (2) Motor vehicles used by public law enforcement officers or other persons sworn to enforce the criminal and traffic laws of the state; (3) Any motor vehicle when properly identified as required by the director of public safety, when used in response to fire emergency calls or to provide emergency medical service to ill or injured persons, and when operated by a duly qualified person who is a member of a volunteer rescue service or a volunteer fire department, and who is on duty pursuant to the rules or directives of that service. The state fire marshal shall be designated by the director of public safety as the certifying agency for all public safety vehicles described in division (E)(3) of this section. (4) Vehicles used by fire departments, including motor vehicles when used by volunteer fire fighters responding to emergency calls in the fire department service when identified as required by the director of public safety. Any vehicle used to transport or provide emergency medical service to an ill or injured person, when certified as a public safety vehicle, shall be considered a public safety vehicle when transporting an ill or injured person to a hospital regardless of whether such vehicle has already passed a hospital. (5) Vehicles used by the motor carrier enforcement unit for the enforcement of orders and rules of the public utilities commission as specified in section 5503.34 of the Revised Code. (F) "School bus" means every bus designed for carrying more than nine passengers that is owned by a public, private, or governmental agency or institution of learning and operated for the transportation of children to or from a school session or a school function, or owned by a private person and operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from a school session or a school function. "School bus" does not include any of the following: (1) A bus operated by a municipally owned transportation system, a mass transit company operating exclusively within the territorial limits of a municipal corporation, or within such limits and the territorial limits of municipal corporations immediately contiguous to such municipal corporation, nor a common passenger carrier certified by the public utilities commission unless such bus is devoted exclusively to the transportation of children to and from a school session or a school function; (2) A van or bus used by a licensed child care center or type A family child care home to transport children from the child care center or type A family child care home to a school if the van or bus does not have more than fifteen children in the van or bus at any time; (3) An alternative vehicle as defined in section 4511.76 of the Revised Code. (G) "Bicycle" means a pedal-powered vehicle upon which a human operator sits, including an electric bicycle. (H) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle having either two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and two wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is equipped with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than one brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed of not greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an electric bicycle. (I) "Commercial tractor" means every motor vehicle having motive power designed or used for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry any load thereon, or designed or used for drawing other vehicles while carrying a portion of such other vehicles, or load thereon, or both. (J) "Agricultural tractor" and "traction engine" mean every self-propelling vehicle designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery but having no provision for carrying loads independently of such other vehicles, and used principally for agricultural purposes. (K) "Truck" means every motor vehicle, except trailers and semitrailers, designed and used to carry property. (L) "Bus" means every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than nine passengers and used for the transportation of persons other than in a ridesharing arrangement, and every motor vehicle, automobile for hire, or funeral car, other than a taxicab or motor vehicle used in a ridesharing arrangement, designed and used for the transportation of persons for compensation. (M) "Trailer" means every vehicle designed or used for carrying persons or property wholly on its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, including any such vehicle when formed by or operated as a combination of a "semitrailer" and a vehicle of the dolly type, such as that commonly known as a "trailer dolly," a vehicle used to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production materials between a local place of storage or supply and the farm when drawn or towed on a street or highway at a speed greater than twenty-five miles per hour, and a vehicle designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on a street or highway for a distance of more than ten miles or at a speed of more than twenty-five miles per hour. (N) "Semitrailer" means every vehicle designed or used for carrying persons or property with another and separate motor vehicle so that in operation a part of its own weight or that of its load, or both, rests upon and is carried by another vehicle. (O) "Pole trailer" means every trailer or semitrailer attached to the towing vehicle by means of a reach, pole, or by being boomed or otherwise secured to the towing vehicle, and ordinarily used for transporting long or irregular shaped loads such as poles, pipes, or structural members capable, generally, of sustaining themselves as beams between the supporting connections. (P) "Railroad" means a carrier of persons or property operating upon rails or tracks placed principally on a private right-of-way. (Q) "Train" means one or more locomotives coupled, with or without cars, that operates on rails or tracks and to which all other traffic is required by law to yield the right-of-way at highway-rail grade crossings. (R) "Streetcar" means a car, other than a train, for transporting persons or property, operated upon rails principally within a street or highway. (S) "Trackless trolley" means every car that collects its power from overhead electric trolley wires and that is not operated upon rails or tracks. (T) "Explosives" means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is intended for the purpose of producing an explosion that contains any oxidizing and combustible units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities, or packing that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by a detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects, or of destroying life or limb. Manufactured articles shall not be held to be explosives when the individual units contain explosives in such limited quantities, of such nature, or in such packing, that it is impossible to procure a simultaneous or a destructive explosion of such units, to the injury of life, limb, or property by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by a detonator, such as fixed ammunition for small arms, firecrackers, or safety fuse matches. (U) "Flammable liquid" means any liquid that has a flash point of seventy degrees fahrenheit, or less, as determined by a tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device. (V) "Gross weight" means the weight of a vehicle plus the weight of any load thereon. (W) "Person" means every natural person, firm, co-partnership, association, or corporation. (X) "Pedestrian" means any person on foot, in a motorized or non-motorized wheelchair, or using another equivalent device, such as skates or a skateboard. "Pedestrian" includes a personal delivery device as defined in section 4511.513 of the Revised Code unless the context clearly suggests otherwise. (Y) "Driver or operator" means every person who drives or is in actual physical control of a vehicle, trackless trolley, or streetcar. (Z) "Police officer" means every officer authorized to direct or regulate traffic, or to make arrests for violations of traffic regulations. (AA) "Local authorities" means every county, municipal, and other local board or body having authority to adopt police regulations under the constitution and laws of this state. (BB) "Street" or "highway" means a general term for denoting a public way for purposes of travel by vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and vulnerable road users, including the entire area within the right-of-way. (CC) "Controlled-access highway" means every street or highway in respect to which owners or occupants of abutting lands and other persons have no legal right of access to or from the same except at such points only and in such manner as may be determined by the public authority having jurisdiction over such street or highway. (DD) "Private road" means every way or place in private ownership used for vehicular travel by the owner and those having express or implied permission from the owner but not by other persons. (EE) "Roadway" means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel and parking lanes, not including the berm, sidewalk, or shoulder, even if the berm, sidewalk, or shoulder is used by a person operating a bicycle or other human-powered vehicle. If a highway includes two or more separate roadways the term "roadway" means any such roadway separately but not all such roadways collectively. (FF) "Sidewalk" means that portion of a street between the curb lines, or the lateral lines of a roadway, and the adjacent property lines or easements of private property, that is paved or improved, and is intended for the use of pedestrians. (GG) "Laned highway" means a highway the roadway of which is divided into two or more clearly marked lanes for vehicular traffic. (HH) "Through highway" means every street or highway as provided in section 4511.65 of the Revised Code. (II) "State highway" means a highway under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation, outside the limits of municipal corporations, provided that the authority conferred upon the director of transportation in section 5511.01 of the Revised Code to erect state highway route markers and signs directing traffic shall not be modified by sections 4511.01 to 4511.79 and 4511.99 of the Revised Code. (JJ) "State route" means every highway that is designated with an official state route number and so marked. (KK) "Intersection" means: (1) The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two highways that join one another at, or approximately at, right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways that join at any other angle might come into conflict. The junction of an alley, driveway, or site roadway open to public travel with a public roadway or highway does not constitute an intersection, unless the public roadway or highway at the junction is controlled by a traffic control device. (2) If a highway includes two roadways separated by a median, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway constitutes a separate intersection if the opposing left-turn paths cross and there is sufficient interior storage for the design vehicle. As used in this division, "design vehicle" means the longest vehicle authorized under section 5577.05 of the Revised Code to operate on that roadway without a permit. (3) At a location controlled by a highway traffic signal, regardless of the distance between the separate intersections as described in division (KK)(2) of this section: (a) If a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk has not been designated on the roadway within the median between the separate intersections, the two intersections and the roadway and median constitute one intersection. (b) Where a stop line, yield line, or crosswalk is designated on the roadway on the intersection approach, the area within the crosswalk and any area beyond the designated stop line or yield line constitute part of the intersection. (c) Where a crosswalk is designated on a roadway on the departure from the intersection, the intersection includes the area that extends to the far side of the crosswalk. (LL) "Crosswalk" means: (1) That part of a roadway at an intersection included within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs, or, in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway, and in the absence of a sidewalk on one side of the roadway, the part of a roadway included within the extension of the lateral lines of the sidewalk at right angles to the center line; (2) Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere, distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface, which might be supplemented by contrasting pavement texture, style, or color; (3) Notwithstanding divisions (LL)(1) and (2) of this section, "crosswalk" does not include an area where local authorities have placed signs indicating no crossing. (MM) "Safety zone" means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and protected or marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times. (NN) "Business district" means the territory fronting upon a street or highway, including the street or highway, between successive intersections within municipal corporations where fifty per cent or more of the frontage between such successive intersections is occupied by buildings in use for business, or within or outside municipal corporations where fifty per cent or more of the frontage for a distance of three hundred feet or more is occupied by buildings in use for business, and the character of such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. (OO) "Residence district" means the territory, not comprising a business district, fronting on a street or highway, including the street or highway, where, for a distance of three hundred feet or more, the frontage is improved with residences or residences and buildings in use for business. (PP) "Urban district" means the territory contiguous to and including any street or highway which is built up with structures devoted to business, industry, or dwelling houses situated at intervals of less than one hundred feet for a distance of a quarter of a mile or more, and the character of such territory is indicated by official traffic control devices. (QQ) "Traffic control device" means a flagger, sign, signal, marking, channelization device, or other device that uses colors, shapes, symbols, words, sounds, or tactile information for the primary purpose of communicating a regulatory, warning, or guidance message to road users on a street, highway, site roadway open to public travel, pedestrian facility, bikeway, or pathway. (RR) "Traffic control signal" means a highway traffic signal placed at an intersection, movable bridge, fire station, midblock crosswalk, alternating one-way sections of a single lane road, private driveway, or other location that requires conflicting traffic to be directed to stop and permitted to proceed in an orderly manner. "Traffic control signal" includes a vehicular signal indication, a pedestrian signal indication, and a bicycle symbol signal indication. "Traffic control signal" does not include an emergency-vehicle hybrid beacon or a pedestrian hybrid beacon. (SS) "Railroad sign or signal" means any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a train. (TT) "Traffic" means pedestrians, ridden or herded animals, vehicles, streetcars, trackless trolleys, and other devices, either singly or together, while using for purposes of travel any highway or site roadway open to public travel. (UU) "Right-of-way" means either of the following, as the context requires: (1) The right of a vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or pedestrian to proceed uninterruptedly in a lawful manner in the direction in which it or the individual is moving in preference to another vehicle, streetcar, trackless trolley, or pedestrian approaching from a different direction into its or the individual's path; (2) A general term denoting land, property, or the interest therein, usually in the configuration of a strip, acquired for or devoted to transportation purposes. When used in this context, right-of-way includes the roadway, shoulders or berm, ditch, and slopes extending to the right-of-way limits under the control of the state or local authority. (VV) "Rural mail delivery vehicle" means every vehicle used to deliver United States mail on a rural mail delivery route. (WW) "Funeral escort vehicle" means any motor vehicle, including a funeral hearse, while used to facilitate the movement of a funeral procession. (XX) "Alley" means a street or highway intended to provide access to the rear or side of lots or buildings in urban districts and not intended for the purpose of through vehicular traffic, and includes any street or highway that has been declared an "alley" by the legislative authority of the municipal corporation in which such street or highway is located. (YY) "Freeway" means a divided multi-lane highway for through traffic with all crossroads separated in grade and with full control of access. (ZZ) "Expressway" means a divided arterial street or highway for through traffic with full or partial control of access with an excess of fifty per cent of all crossroads separated in grade. (AAA) "Thruway" means a through highway whose entire roadway is reserved for through traffic and on which roadway parking is prohibited. (BBB) "Stop intersection" means any intersection at one or more entrances of which stop signs are erected. (CCC) "Arterial street or highway" means a street or highway primarily used by through traffic, usually on a continuous route or a street or highway designated as part of an arterial system. (DDD) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where such transportation is incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools. (EEE) "Motorized wheelchair" means any self-propelled vehicle designed for, and used by, a person with a disability and that is incapable of a speed in excess of eight miles per hour. (FFF) "Child care center" and "type A family child care home" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (GGG) "Multi-wheel agricultural tractor" means a type of agricultural tractor that has two or more wheels or tires on each side of one axle at the rear of the tractor, is designed or used for drawing other vehicles or wheeled machinery, has no provision for carrying loads independently of the drawn vehicles or machinery, and is used principally for agricultural purposes. (HHH) "Operate" means to cause or have caused movement of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley. (III) "Predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense" means any of the following: (1) A violation of section 4511.03, 4511.051, 4511.12, 4511.132, 4511.16, 4511.20, 4511.201, 4511.21, 4511.211, 4511.213, 4511.22, 4511.23, 4511.25, 4511.26, 4511.27, 4511.28, 4511.29, 4511.30, 4511.31, 4511.32, 4511.33, 4511.34, 4511.35, 4511.36, 4511.37, 4511.38, 4511.39, 4511.40, 4511.41, 4511.42, 4511.43, 4511.431, 4511.432, 4511.44, 4511.441, 4511.451, 4511.452, 4511.46, 4511.47, 4511.48, 4511.481, 4511.49, 4511.50, 4511.511, 4511.522, 4511.53, 4511.54, 4511.55, 4511.56, 4511.57, 4511.58, 4511.59, 4511.60, 4511.61, 4511.64, 4511.66, 4511.661, 4511.68, 4511.70, 4511.701, 4511.71, 4511.711, 4511.712, 4511.713, 4511.72, 4511.73, 4511.763, 4511.771, 4511.78, or 4511.84 of the Revised Code; (2) A violation of division (A)(2) of section 4511.17, divisions (A) to (D) of section 4511.51, or division (A) of section 4511.74 of the Revised Code; (3) A violation of any provision of sections 4511.01 to 4511.76 of the Revised Code for which no penalty otherwise is provided in the section that contains the provision violated; (4) A violation of section 4511.214 of the Revised Code; (5) A violation of a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any section or provision set forth or described in division (III)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section. (JJJ) "Road service vehicle" means wreckers, utility repair vehicles, and state, county, and municipal service vehicles equipped with visual signals by means of flashing, rotating, or oscillating lights. (KKK) "Beacon" means a highway traffic signal with one or more signal sections that operate in a flashing mode. (LLL) "Hybrid beacon" means a special type of beacon that is intentionally placed in a dark mode where no indications are displayed between periods of operation and, when operated, displays both steady and flashing highway traffic signal indications. "Hybrid beacon" includes both of the following: (1) An emergency-vehicle hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an otherwise unsignalized location to assist authorized emergency vehicles in entering or crossing a street or highway; (2) A pedestrian hybrid beacon used to warn and control traffic at an otherwise unsignalized location to assist pedestrians in crossing a street or highway at a marked crosswalk. (MMM) "Highway traffic signal" means a power-operated traffic control device by which traffic is warned or directed to take some specific action. "Highway traffic signal" includes a beacon, an in-road warning light, a lane-use control signal, and a traffic control signal. "Highway traffic signal" does not include a power-operated sign, steadily illuminated pavement marker, gate, flashing light signal, warning light, or steady burning electric lamp. (NNN) "Median" means the portion of a highway separating opposing directions of the traveled way or the area between two roadways of a divided highway, measured from edge of traveled way to edge of traveled way. The median excludes turn lanes. The width of a median may be different between intersections, interchanges, and at opposite approaches of the same intersection. (OOO) "Site roadway open to public travel" means a roadway or bikeway on site of a shopping center, office park, airport, school, university, sports arena, recreational park, or other similar business, government, or recreation facility that is publicly or privately owned but where the public is allowed to travel without full-time access restrictions. "Site roadway open to public travel" does not include a roadway where access is restricted at all times by gates or guards to residents, employees, or other specifically authorized persons, a parking area, a driving aisle within a parking area, or a private highway-rail grade crossing. (PPP) "Shared-use path" means a bikeway outside the traveled way and physically separated from motorized vehicular traffic by an open space or barrier and either within the highway right-of-way or within an independent alignment. A shared-use path also may be used by pedestrians, including skaters, joggers, users of manual and motorized wheelchairs, and other authorized motorized and non-motorized users. A shared-use path does not include any trail that is intended to be used primarily for mountain biking, hiking, equestrian use, or other similar uses, or any other single track or natural surface trail that has historically been reserved for nonmotorized use. (QQQ) "Highway maintenance vehicle" means a vehicle used in snow and ice removal or road surface maintenance, including a snow plow, traffic line striper, road sweeper, mowing machine, asphalt distributing vehicle, or other such vehicle designed for use in specific highway maintenance activities. (RRR) "Waste collection vehicle" means a vehicle used in the collection of garbage, refuse, trash, or recyclable materials. (SSS) "Electric bicycle" means a "class 1 electric bicycle," a "class 2 electric bicycle," or a "class 3 electric bicycle" as defined in this section. (TTT) "Class 1 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (UUU) "Class 2 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that may provide assistance regardless of whether the rider is pedaling and is not capable of providing assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty miles per hour. (VVV) "Class 3 electric bicycle" means a bicycle that is equipped with fully operable pedals and an electric motor of less than seven hundred fifty watts that provides assistance only when the rider is pedaling and ceases to provide assistance when the bicycle reaches the speed of twenty-eight miles per hour. (WWW) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. (XXX) "Natural resources officer" means an officer appointed pursuant to section 1501.24 of the Revised Code. (YYY) "Wildlife officer" means an officer designated pursuant to section 1531.13 of the Revised Code. (ZZZ) "In-road warning light" means a special type of highway traffic signal that is installed in the roadway surface to warn road users that they are approaching a condition on or adjacent to the roadway that might not be readily apparent and might require the road users to reduce speed or come to a complete stop. (AAAA) "Lane-use control signal" means a signal face or comparable display on a full-matrix changeable message sign that displays indications to permit or prohibit the use of specific lanes of a roadway or a shoulder where driving is sometimes authorized or to indicate the impending prohibition of such use. (BBBB) "Bicycle box" means a designated area on the approach to a signalized intersection, between an advance motorist stop line and the crosswalk or intersection, that is intended to provide bicyclists a visible location to wait in front of stopped motorists during the red signal phase. (CCCC) "Two-stage bicycle turn box" means a designated area at an intersection that is intended to provide bicyclists a place to wait for traffic to clear before proceeding in a different direction of travel. (DDDD) "Bicycle lane" means a portion of a roadway that has been designated for preferential or exclusive use by bicyclists and is often delineated from the adjacent general-purpose lanes by longitudinal pavement markings and either a bicycle lane symbol, words, or signs. "Bicycle lane" includes all of the following: (1) A buffer-separated bicycle lane, which is separated from the adjacent general-purpose lanes by a pattern of standard longitudinal pavement markings that are wider than a normal or wide-lane pavement marking; (2) A counter-flow bicycle lane, which is a one-directional bicycle lane that provides a lawful path of travel for bicycles in the opposite direction from the general traffic on a roadway that otherwise requires the general traffic to travel in only one direction. A counter-flow bicycle lane is designated by the traffic control devices used for other bicycle lanes; (3) A separated bicycle lane, which is an exclusive facility for bicyclists that is located within or directly adjacent to the roadway and is physically separated from the motor vehicle traffic with a vertical element. (EEEE) "Bicycle signal face" means a signal face that displays only bicycle symbol signal indications in accordance with section 4511.15 of the Revised Code, that exclusively controls a bicyclist's movement from a designated bicycle lane or from a separate facility, and that displays signal indications that are applicable only to a bicyclist's movement. (FFFF) "Bicycle signal sign" means a sign meant to inform road users that the signal indications in the bicycle signal face are intended only for bicyclists, and to inform bicyclists which bicyclist movements are controlled by that bicycle signal face. (GGGG) "Bikeway" means any road, street, path, or way that in some manner is specifically designated for bicycle travel, regardless of whether the facility is designated for the exclusive use of bicycles or if it is shared with other modes of transportation. (HHHH) "Busway" means a traveled way that is used exclusively by buses. (IIII) "Driveway" means an access from a roadway to a building, site, or abutting property. (JJJJ) "Roundabout" means a circular intersection with a yield control at each entry, which permits a vehicle on the circulatory roadway to proceed, with deflection of the approaching vehicles counter-clockwise around a central island. (KKKK) "Shoulder" means a longitudinal area contiguous with the traveled way that is used for accommodating vehicles that are stopped for an emergency and for lateral support of base and surface courses; graded for emergency stopping; either paved or unpaved; and when paved, may be open for part-time travel by some or all vehicles or may also be available for use by pedestrians or bicycles in the absence of other pedestrian or bicycle facilities. (LLLL) "Autocycle," "cab-enclosed motorcycle," "electronic," "farm machinery," "motor-driven cycle or motor scooter," "limited driving privileges," and "state" have the same meanings as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (MMMM) "Multifunction school activity bus" means a school bus whose purposes do not include transporting children to and from home or school bus stops. Sec. 4511.75. (A) The driver of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley upon meeting or overtaking from either direction any school bus stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging any school child, person attending programs offered by community boards of mental health and county boards of developmental disabilities, or child attending a program offered by a head start agency, shall stop at least ten feet from the front or rear of the school bus and shall not proceed until such school bus resumes motion, or until signaled by the school bus driver to proceed. It is no defense to a charge under this division that the school bus involved failed to display or be equipped with an automatically extended stop warning sign as required by division (B) of this section. (B) Every school bus shall be equipped with amber and red visual signals meeting the requirements of section 4511.771 of the Revised Code, and an automatically extended stop warning sign of a type approved by the department of education and workforce, which shall be actuated by the driver of the bus whenever but only whenever the bus is stopped or stopping on the roadway for the purpose of receiving or discharging school children, persons attending programs offered by community boards of mental health and county boards of developmental disabilities, or children attending programs offered by head start agencies. A school bus driver shall not actuate the visual signals or the stop warning sign in designated school bus loading areas where the bus is entirely off the roadway or at school buildings when children or persons attending programs offered by community boards of mental health and county boards of developmental disabilities are loading or unloading at curbside or at buildings when children attending programs offered by head start agencies are loading or unloading at curbside. The visual signals and stop warning sign shall be synchronized or otherwise operated as required by rule of the board. (C) Where a highway has been divided into four or more traffic lanes, a driver of a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley need not stop for a school bus approaching from the opposite direction which has stopped for the purpose of receiving or discharging any school child, persons attending programs offered by community boards of mental health and county boards of developmental disabilities, or children attending programs offered by head start agencies. The driver of any vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley overtaking the school bus shall comply with division (A) of this section. (D) School buses operating on divided highways or on highways with four or more traffic lanes shall receive and discharge all school children, persons attending programs offered by community boards of mental health and county boards of developmental disabilities, and children attending programs offered by head start agencies on their residence side of the highway. (E) No school bus driver shall start the driver's bus until after any child, person attending programs offered by community boards of mental health and county boards of developmental disabilities, or child attending a program offered by a head start agency who may have alighted therefrom has reached a place of safety on the child's or person's residence side of the road. (F)(1) Whoever violates division (A) of this section may be fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars. A person who is issued a citation for a violation of division (A) of this section is not permitted to enter a written plea of guilty and waive the person's right to contest the citation in a trial but instead must appear in person in the proper court to answer the charge. (2) In addition to and independent of any other penalty provided by law, the court or mayor may impose upon an offender who violates this section a class seven suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(7) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. When a license is suspended under this section, the court or mayor shall cause the offender to deliver the license to the court, and the court or clerk of the court immediately shall forward the license to the registrar of motor vehicles, together with notice of the court's action. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Head start agency" has the same meaning as in section 3301.32 of the Revised Code. (2) "School bus," as used in relation to children who attend a program offered by a head start agency, means a bus that is owned and operated by a head start agency, is equipped with an automatically extended stop warning sign of a type approved by the department, is painted the color and displays the markings described in section 4511.77 of the Revised Code, and is equipped with amber and red visual signals meeting the requirements of section 4511.771 of the Revised Code, irrespective of whether or not the bus has fifteen or more children aboard at any time. "School bus" does not include a van owned and operated by a head start agency, irrespective of its color, lights, or markings, or a multifunction school activity bus. Sec. 4511.76. (A) The department of public safety, by and with the advice of the department of education and workforce, shall adopt and enforce rules relating to the construction, design, and equipment, including lighting equipment required by section 4511.771 of the Revised Code, of all school buses both publicly and privately owned and operated in this state. (B) The department of education and workforce, by and with the advice of the director of public safety, shall adopt and enforce rules relating to the operation of all vehicles used for pupil transportation. (C) No person shall operate a vehicle used for pupil transportation within this state in violation of the rules of the department of education and workforce or the department of public safety. No person, being the owner thereof or having the supervisory responsibility therefor, shall permit the operation of a vehicle used for pupil transportation within this state in violation of the rules of the department of education and workforce or the department of public safety. (D) The department of public safety shall adopt and enforce rules relating to the issuance of a license under section 4511.763 of the Revised Code. The rules may relate to the condition of the equipment to be operated; the liability and property damage insurance carried by the applicant; the posting of satisfactory and sufficient bond; and such other rules as the director of public safety determines reasonably necessary for the safety of the pupils to be transported. (E) A chartered nonpublic school or a community school may own and operate, or contract with a vendor that supplies, alternative vehicles to transport students to and from regularly scheduled school sessions, school-related activities, and school-sanctioned events when one of the following applies: (1) A student's school district of residence has declared the transportation of the student impractical pursuant to section 3327.02 of the Revised Code; (2) A student does not live within thirty minutes of the chartered nonpublic school or the community school, as applicable, and the student's school district is not required to transport the student under section 3327.01 of the Revised Code; (3) The governing authority of the chartered nonpublic school or the community school has offered to provide the transportation for its students in lieu of the students being transported by their school district of residence. (F) A school district may own and operate, or contract with a vendor that supplies, alternative vehicles to transport students to and from regularly scheduled school sessions, school-related activities, and school-sanctioned events. (G) A school district or the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school or community school that uses an alternative vehicle in accordance with division (E) or (F) of this section, shall ensure that all of the following apply to the operation of that vehicle: (1) A qualified mechanic inspects the vehicle not fewer than two times each year and determines that it is safe for pupil transportation; (2) The driver of the vehicle does not stop on the roadway to load or unload passengers; (3) The driver of the vehicle meets the requirements specified for a driver of a school bus or motor van under section 3327.10 of the Revised Code and any corresponding rules adopted by the department of education and workforce. Notwithstanding that section or any department rules to the contrary, the driver is not required to have a commercial driver's license but shall have a current, valid driver's license, and shall be accustomed to operating the vehicle used to transport the students;. (4) The driver and all passengers in the vehicle comply with the requirements of sections 4511.81 and 4513.263 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (H)(H)(1) A school district, a chartered nonpublic school, or a community school may own and operate, or contract with a vendor that supplies, a multifunction school activity bus to transport students between school and school functions or activities. (2) A multifunction school activity bus shall not be used to transport students between school and home or between school and designated school bus stops. (I) As used in this section: (1) "Alternative vehicle" means a motor vehicle originally manufactured and designed for not more than twelve passengers, not including the driver. (2) "Vehicle used for pupil transportation" means any vehicle that is identified as such by the department of education and workforce by rule and that is subject to Chapter 3301-83 of the Administrative Code. (I)(J) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more violations of this section or section 4511.63, 4511.761, 4511.762, 4511.764, 4511.77, or 4511.79 of the Revised Code or a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any of those sections, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. Sec. 4511.77. (A) No person shall operate, nor shall any person being the owner thereof or having supervisory responsibility therefor permit the operation of, a school bus within this state unless it is painted national school bus yellow and is marked on both front and rear with the words "school bus" in black lettering not less than eight inches in height and on the rear of the bus with the word "stop" in black lettering not less than ten inches in height. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more violations of this section or section 4511.63, 4511.76, 4511.761, 4511.762, 4511.764, or 4511.79 of the Revised Code or a municipal ordinance that is substantially similar to any of those sections, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (C) Whenever a person is found guilty in a court of record of a violation of this section, the trial judge, in addition to or independent of all other penalties provided by law, may suspend for any period of time not exceeding three years, or cancel the license of any person, partnership, association, or corporation, issued under section 4511.763 of the Revised Code. (D) This section does not apply to a multifunction school activity bus. Sec. 4511.771. (A) Every school bus shall, in addition to any other equipment and distinctive markings required pursuant to sections 4511.76, 4511.761, 4511.764, and 4511.77 of the Revised Code, be equipped with signal lamps mounted as high as practicable, which shall display to the front two alternately flashing red lights and two alternately flashing amber lights located at the same level and to the rear two alternately flashing red lights and two alternately flashing amber lights located at the same level, and these lights shall be visible at five hundred feet in normal sunlight. The alternately flashing red lights shall be spaced as widely as practicable, and the alternately flashing amber lights shall be located next to them. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. (C) This section does not apply to a multifunction school activity bus. Sec. 4511.78. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Mass transit system" means any county transit system, regional transit authority, regional transit commission, municipally owned transportation system, mass transit company operating exclusively within the territorial limits of a municipal corporation, or within such limits and the territorial limits of municipal corporations immediately contiguous to such municipal corporation, and any common passenger carrier, that provides transportation for children to or from a school session or a school function. (2) "Bus" means every motor vehicle designed for carrying more than nine passengers and used for the transportation of persons, but does not mean any school bus or a multifunction school activity bus as defined in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Whenever a mass transit system transports children to or from a school session or school function, the mass transit system shall provide for: (1) Periodic safety inspections of all buses used to provide transportation service. The inspections shall be based on rules adopted by the public utilities commission under Chapters 4921. and 4923. of the Revised Code to ensure the safety of operation of motor carriers. (2) The safety training of all drivers operating buses used to provide transportation service; (3) The equipping of every bus with outside rear-view mirrors meeting the motor carrier regulations for bus equipment adopted by the federal highway administration. No exclusions from this requirement granted under the federal regulations shall be considered exclusions for the purposes of this division. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one predicate motor vehicle or traffic offense, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of two or more predicate motor vehicle or traffic offenses, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. Sec. 4517.01. As used in sections 4517.01 to 4517.65 of the Revised Code: (A) "Persons" includes individuals, partnerships, associations, joint stock companies, corporations, sole proprietorships, limited liability companies, limited liability partnerships, business trusts, and any other legally recognized business entities or any combinations of individuals. (B) "Motor vehicle" means motor vehicle as defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code and also includes "all-purpose vehicle" and "off-highway motorcycle" as those terms are defined in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code. "Motor vehicle" does not include a snowmobile as defined in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code or manufactured and mobile homes. "Motor vehicle" includes a "fifth wheel trailer," "park trailer," "travel trailer," "tent-type fold-out camping trailer," and a "semitrailer" but does not otherwise include trailers as defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "New motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, the legal title to which has never been transferred by a manufacturer, remanufacturer, distributor, or dealer to an ultimate purchaser. (D) "Ultimate purchaser" means, with respect to any new motor vehicle, the first person, other than a dealer purchasing in the capacity of a dealer, who in good faith purchases such new motor vehicle for purposes other than resale. (E) "Business" includes any activities engaged in by any person for the object of gain, benefit, or advantage either direct or indirect, including activities conducted through the internet or another computer network. (F) "Engaging in business" means commencing, conducting, or continuing in business, or liquidating a business when the liquidator thereof holds self out to be conducting such business; making a casual sale or otherwise making transfers in the ordinary course of business when the transfers are made in connection with the disposition of all or substantially all of the transferor's assets is not engaging in business. (G) "Retail sale" or "selling at retail" means the act or attempted act of selling, bartering, exchanging, or otherwise disposing of a motor vehicle, including through use of the internet or another computer network, to an ultimate purchaser. (H) "Retail installment contract" includes any contract in the form of a note, chattel mortgage, conditional sales contract, lease, agreement, or other instrument payable in one or more installments over a period of time and arising out of the retail sale of a motor vehicle. (I) "Farm machinery" means all machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products. (J) "Dealer" or "motor vehicle dealer" means any new motor vehicle dealer, any motor vehicle leasing dealer, any adaptive mobility dealer, and any used motor vehicle dealer. (K) "New motor vehicle dealer" means any person engaged in the business of selling at retail, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in new motor vehicles pursuant to a contract or agreement entered into with the manufacturer, remanufacturer, or distributor of the motor vehicles. (L) "Used motor vehicle dealer" means any person engaged in the business of selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in used motor vehicles, at retail or wholesale, but does not mean any new motor vehicle dealer selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in used motor vehicles incidentally to engaging in the business of selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in new motor vehicles, any person engaged in the business of dismantling, salvaging, or rebuilding motor vehicles by means of using used parts, or any public officer performing official duties. (M) "Motor vehicle leasing dealer" means any person engaged in the business of regularly making available, offering to make available, or arranging for another person to use a motor vehicle pursuant to a bailment, lease, sublease, or other contractual arrangement under which a charge is made for its use at a periodic rate for a term of thirty days or more, and title to the motor vehicle is in and remains in the motor vehicle leasing dealer who originally leases it, irrespective of whether or not the motor vehicle is the subject of a later sublease, and not in the user, including any financial institution acting as a lessor for a lease or sublease. "Motor vehicle leasing dealer" does not include a new motor vehicle dealer that is not the lessor and that only assists in arranging a lease on the lessor's behalf or a manufacturer or its affiliate leasing to its employees or to dealers. (N) "Salesperson" means any person employed by a dealer to sell, display, and offer for sale, or deal in motor vehicles for a commission, compensation, or other valuable consideration, but does not mean any public officer performing official duties. (O) "Casual sale" means any transfer of a motor vehicle by a person other than a new motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, adaptive mobility dealer, motor vehicle salvage dealer, as defined in division (A) of section 4738.01 of the Revised Code, salesperson, motor vehicle auction owner, manufacturer, or distributor acting in the capacity of a dealer, salesperson, auction owner, manufacturer, or distributor, to a person who purchases the motor vehicle for use as a consumer. (P) "Motor vehicle auction owner" means any person who is engaged wholly or in part in the business of auctioning motor vehicles, but does not mean a construction equipment auctioneer or a construction equipment auction licensee. (Q) "Manufacturer" means a person who manufactures, assembles, or imports motor vehicles, including motor homes, but does not mean a person who only assembles or installs a body, special equipment unit, finishing trim, or accessories on a motor vehicle chassis supplied by a manufacturer or distributor. (R) "Tent-type fold-out camping trailer" means any vehicle intended to be used, when stationary, as a temporary shelter with living and sleeping facilities, and that is subject to the following properties and limitations: (1) A minimum of twenty-five per cent of the fold-out portion of the top and sidewalls combined must be constructed of canvas, vinyl, or other fabric, and form an integral part of the shelter. (2) When folded, the unit must not exceed: (a) Fifteen feet in length, exclusive of bumper and tongue; (b) Sixty inches in height from the point of contact with the ground; (c) Eight feet in width; (d) One ton gross weight at time of sale. (S) "Distributor" means any person authorized by a motor vehicle manufacturer to distribute new motor vehicles to licensed new motor vehicle dealers, but does not mean a person who only assembles or installs a body, special equipment unit, finishing trim, or accessories on a motor vehicle chassis supplied by a manufacturer or distributor. (T) "Flea market" means a market place, other than a dealer's location licensed under this chapter, where a space or location is provided for a fee or compensation to a seller to exhibit and offer for sale or trade, motor vehicles to the general public. (U) "Franchise" means any written agreement, contract, or understanding between any motor vehicle manufacturer or remanufacturer engaged in commerce and any new motor vehicle dealer that purports to fix the legal rights and liabilities of the parties to such agreement, contract, or understanding. (V) "Franchisee" means a person who receives new motor vehicles from the franchisor under a franchise agreement and who offers, sells, and provides service for such new motor vehicles to the general public. (W) "Franchisor" means a new motor vehicle manufacturer, remanufacturer, or distributor who supplies new motor vehicles under a franchise agreement to a franchisee. (X) "Dealer organization" means a state or local trade association the membership of which is comprised predominantly of new motor vehicle dealers. (Y) "Factory representative" means a representative employed by a manufacturer, remanufacturer, or by a factory branch primarily for the purpose of promoting the sale of its motor vehicles, parts, or accessories to dealers or for supervising or contacting its dealers or prospective dealers. (Z) "Administrative or executive management" means those individuals who are not subject to federal wage and hour laws. (AA) "Good faith" means honesty in the conduct or transaction concerned and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing in the trade as is defined in section 1301.201 of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, the duty to act in a fair and equitable manner so as to guarantee freedom from coercion, intimidation, or threats of coercion or intimidation; provided however, that recommendation, endorsement, exposition, persuasion, urging, or argument shall not be considered to constitute a lack of good faith. (BB) "Coerce" means to compel or attempt to compel by failing to act in good faith or by threat of economic harm, breach of contract, or other adverse consequences. Coerce does not mean to argue, urge, recommend, or persuade. (CC) "Relevant market area" means any area within a radius of ten miles from the site of a potential new dealership, except that for manufactured home or recreational vehicle dealerships the radius shall be twenty-five miles. The ten-mile radius shall be measured from the dealer's established place of business that is used exclusively for the purpose of selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor vehicles. (DD) "Wholesale" or "at wholesale" means the act or attempted act of selling, bartering, exchanging, or otherwise disposing of a motor vehicle to a transferee for the purpose of resale and not for ultimate consumption by that transferee. (EE) "Motor vehicle wholesaler" means any person licensed as a dealer under the laws of another state and engaged in the business of selling, displaying, or offering for sale used motor vehicles, at wholesale, but does not mean any motor vehicle dealer as defined in this section. (FF)(1) "Remanufacturer" means a person who assembles or installs passenger seating, walls, a roof elevation, or a body extension on a conversion van with the motor vehicle chassis supplied by a manufacturer or distributor, a person who modifies a truck chassis supplied by a manufacturer or distributor for use as a public safety or public service vehicle, a person who modifies a motor vehicle chassis supplied by a manufacturer or distributor for use as a limousine or hearse, or a person who modifies an incomplete motor vehicle cab and chassis supplied by a new motor vehicle dealer or distributor for use as a tow truck, but does not mean either of the following: (a) A person who assembles or installs passenger seating, a roof elevation, or a body extension on a recreational vehicle as defined in division (Q) and referred to in division (B) of section 4501.01 of the Revised Code; (b) An adaptive mobility dealer. (2) For the purposes of division (FF)(1) of this section, "public safety vehicle or public service vehicle" means a fire truck, ambulance, school bus, street sweeper, garbage packing truck, or cement mixer, or a mobile self-contained facility vehicle. (3) For the purposes of division (FF)(1) of this section, "limousine" means a motor vehicle, designed only for the purpose of carrying nine or fewer passengers, that a person modifies by cutting the original chassis, lengthening the wheelbase by forty inches or more, and reinforcing the chassis in such a way that all modifications comply with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards. No person shall qualify as or be deemed to be a remanufacturer who produces limousines unless the person has a written agreement with the manufacturer of the chassis the person utilizes to produce the limousines to complete properly the remanufacture of the chassis into limousines. (4) For the purposes of division (FF)(1) of this section, "hearse" means a motor vehicle, designed only for the purpose of transporting a single casket, that is equipped with a compartment designed specifically to carry a single casket that a person modifies by cutting the original chassis, lengthening the wheelbase by ten inches or more, and reinforcing the chassis in such a way that all modifications comply with all applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards. No person shall qualify as or be deemed to be a remanufacturer who produces hearses unless the person has a written agreement with the manufacturer of the chassis the person utilizes to produce the hearses to complete properly the remanufacture of the chassis into hearses. (5) For the purposes of division (FF)(1) of this section, "mobile self-contained facility vehicle" means a mobile classroom vehicle, mobile laboratory vehicle, bookmobile, bloodmobile, testing laboratory, and mobile display vehicle, each of which is designed for purposes other than for passenger transportation and other than the transportation or displacement of cargo, freight, materials, or merchandise. A vehicle is remanufactured into a mobile self-contained facility vehicle in part by the addition of insulation to the body shell, and installation of all of the following: a generator, electrical wiring, plumbing, holding tanks, doors, windows, cabinets, shelving, and heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems. (6) For the purposes of division (FF)(1) of this section, "tow truck" means both of the following: (a) An incomplete cab and chassis that are purchased by a remanufacturer from a new motor vehicle dealer or distributor of the cab and chassis and on which the remanufacturer then installs in a permanent manner a wrecker body it purchases from a manufacturer or distributor of wrecker bodies, installs an emergency flashing light pylon and emergency lights upon the mast of the wrecker body or rooftop, and installs such other related accessories and equipment, including push bumpers, front grille guards with pads and other custom-ordered items such as painting, special lettering, and safety striping so as to create a complete motor vehicle capable of lifting and towing another motor vehicle. (b) An incomplete cab and chassis that are purchased by a remanufacturer from a new motor vehicle dealer or distributor of the cab and chassis and on which the remanufacturer then installs in a permanent manner a car carrier body it purchases from a manufacturer or distributor of car carrier bodies, installs an emergency flashing light pylon and emergency lights upon the rooftop, and installs such other related accessories and equipment, including push bumpers, front grille guards with pads and other custom-ordered items such as painting, special lettering, and safety striping. As used in division (FF)(6)(b) of this section, "car carrier body" means a mechanical or hydraulic apparatus capable of lifting and holding a motor vehicle on a flat level surface so that one or more motor vehicles can be transported, once the car carrier is permanently installed upon an incomplete cab and chassis. (GG) "Operate as a new motor vehicle dealership" means engaging in activities such as displaying, offering for sale, and selling new motor vehicles at retail, operating a service facility to perform repairs and maintenance on motor vehicles, offering for sale and selling motor vehicle parts at retail, and conducting all other acts that are usual and customary to the operation of a new motor vehicle dealership. For the purposes of this chapter only, possession of either a valid new motor vehicle dealer franchise agreement or a new motor vehicle dealers license, or both of these items, is not evidence that a person is operating as a new motor vehicle dealership. (HH) "Outdoor power equipment" means garden and small utility tractors, walk-behind and riding mowers, chainsaws, and tillers. (II) "Remote service facility" means premises that are separate from a licensed new motor vehicle dealer's sales facility by not more than one mile and that are used by the dealer to perform repairs, warranty work, recall work, and maintenance on motor vehicles pursuant to a franchise agreement entered into with a manufacturer of motor vehicles. A remote service facility shall be deemed to be part of the franchise agreement and is subject to all the rights, duties, obligations, and requirements of Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code that relate to the performance of motor vehicle repairs, warranty work, recall work, and maintenance work by new motor vehicle dealers. (JJ) "Recreational vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Construction equipment auctioneer" means a person who holds both a valid auction firm license issued under Chapter 4707. of the Revised Code and a valid construction equipment auction license issued under this chapter. (LL) "Large construction or transportation equipment" means vehicles having a gross vehicle weight rating of more than ten thousand pounds and includes road rollers, traction engines, power shovels, power cranes, commercial cars and trucks, or farm trucks, and other similar vehicles obtained primarily from the construction, mining, transportation or farming industries. (MM) "Local market conditions" includes, but is not limited to: (1) Demographics in the franchisee's area; (2) Geographical and market characteristics in the franchisee's area; (3) Local economic circumstances; (4) The proximity of other motor vehicle dealers of the same line-make; (5) The proximity of motor vehicle manufacturing facilities; (6) The buying patterns of motor vehicle purchasers; (7) Customer drive time and drive distance. (NN) "Established place of business" means a permanent, enclosed building or structure that meets all of the following requirements: (1) It is either owned, leased, or rented by the motor vehicle dealer. (2) It meets local zoning or municipal requirements. (3) It is regularly occupied by at least one person. (4) It is easily accessible to the public. (5) The records and files necessary to conduct the business are generally kept and maintained at the location or are readily accessible and available for reasonable inspection from the location. "Established place of business" does not mean a residence, tent, temporary stand, storage shed, lot, or any temporary quarters, unless authorized by the registrar of motor vehicles. (OO) "Adaptive mobility dealer" means any person engaged in the business of all of the following: (1) Selling at retail, displaying, offering for sale, delivering, and dealing in adaptive mobility vehicles; (2) Selling and installing adaptive mobility equipment, related accessories, and other goods and services to meet the automotive adaptive mobility needs of drivers and passengers with disabilities; (3) Providing maintenance and repair services for adaptive mobility vehicles and adaptive mobility equipment. (PP) "Adaptive mobility equipment" means the mechanical or electronic devices or parts that are designed to facilitate the use of a motor vehicle by a person who is aging or a person with disabilities, in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 571, and that are permanently attached to or incorporated into the motor vehicle. Sec. 4517.52. (A) Each franchisor shall fulfill warranty and recall obligations of diagnosing, repairing, and servicing motor vehicles, including all parts and components manufactured for installation in any motor vehicle. (B) Each franchisor shall compensate each of its franchisees for labor and parts used to fulfill warranty and recall obligations of diagnostic, repair and , servicing, updates to vehicle accessories or functions, and initialization or repair of vehicle parts, systems, accessories, or functions at rates not less than the rates charged by the franchisee to its retail customers for warranty-like diagnosis, labor, and parts for nonwarranty work. A Diagnostic work includes the time spent by a technician, who meets the franchisor's qualifications and requirements for the repair work, communicating with the franchisor's technical assistance or external franchisor source in order to complete a warranty repair. A franchisee, other than a franchisee that deals in recreational vehicles, may establish rates of compensation for labor performed and parts used by the franchisee for purposes of this section if all of the following apply: (1) The franchisee submits to the franchisor either of the following: (a) One hundred sequential nonwarranty service repair orders for warranty-like repairs that have been paid by a customer and closed by the time of submission; (b) All service repair orders for warranty-like repairs, that have been paid by a customer and closed by the time of submission, for a period of ninety consecutive days. A franchisee either may submit a set of repair orders for purposes of calculating both its retail labor rate and its retail parts markup percentage, or may submit separate sets of repair orders for purposes of calculating its retail labor rate and its retail parts markup percentage separately. The repair orders submitted under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section must be from a period occurring not more than one hundred eighty days before the submission. Subject to division (C)(3) of this section, if a franchisor determines from any set of repair orders submitted under this section that the retail labor rate or parts markup percentage calculated under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section is substantially higher or lower than the rate currently on record with the franchisor for labor or parts, the franchisor may request additional documentation for a period of either ninety sixty days prior to or ninety sixty days subsequent to the time period for which the repair orders were submitted for purposes of an alteration. (2) The franchisee calculates its retail labor rate by determining the franchisee's total labor sales from the service repair orders submitted under division (B)(1) of this section and dividing that amount by the total number of labor hours that generated those sales. (3) The franchisee calculates its retail parts markup percentage by determining the franchisee's total parts sales from the service repair orders submitted under division (B)(1) of this section and dividing that amount by the franchisee's total cost for the purchase of those parts, subtracting one from that amount, and then multiplying the amount by one hundred. (4) In calculating the retail labor rate in division (B)(2) of this section and the retail parts markup percentage in division (B)(3) of this section, the franchisee omits charges for any of the following from the calculation: (a) Manufacturer or distributor special events, specials, or promotional discounts for retail customer repairs; (b) Parts sold, or repairs performed, at wholesale; (c) Routine maintenance that is not covered under a retail customer warranty, including the replacement of fluids, filters, and belts that are not provided in the course of other repairs; (d) Items that do not have individual part numbers, such as nuts, bolts, and fasteners; (e) Vehicle reconditioning; (f) Accessories; (g) Repairs of damage caused by a collision, a road hazard, the force of the elements, vandalism, theft, or operator negligence; (h) Parts sold or repairs performed for insurance carriers; (i) Vehicle emission or safety inspections required by law; (j) Goodwill or policy repairs or replacements; (k) Repairs for which volume discounts have been negotiated with government agencies or insurance carriers; (l) Repairs performed on vehicles from a different line-make; (m) Replacement of tires or related elements. (5) The franchisee provides notice of its retail labor rate and retail parts markup percentage calculated in accordance with this section to the franchisor. (C)(1) A franchisor may contest the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage that was calculated by the franchisee under division (B) of this section within thirty days after receiving notice from the franchisee. If the franchisor seeks to contest the retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage, the franchisor shall notify the franchisee that the franchisor believes the rate or markup percentage is materially inaccurate or substantially different than that of other similarly situated, same line-make new motor vehicle dealers in the vicinity, provide a full explanation of the reasons the franchisor disagrees with the rate or markup percentage, provide evidence substantiating the franchisor's position, and propose an adjustment of the contested rate or markup percentage. The franchisor shall not modify its notice to the franchisee or its grounds for contesting the rate or markup percentage after submitting a notice to the franchisee under division (C)(1) of this section. (2) If the franchisor does not contest the rate or markup percentage that was calculated by the franchisee under division (B) of this section within thirty days after receiving notice of the rate or markup percentage from the franchisee, the uncontested rate or markup percentage takes effect. The franchisor then shall use the rate and markup percentage to determine compensation for any warranty and recall work and service performed by the franchisee until the rate or markup percentage is modified. (3) If the franchisor contests a rate or markup percentage established by the franchisee under division (B) of this section, the franchisor and franchisee shall resolve the disagreement through the franchisor's internal dispute resolution process. However, the franchisee may appeal a determination made as part of the dispute resolution process to a court of competent jurisdiction. Any rate or markup percentage established either through an internal dispute resolution process or by a court as part of an appeal under this section shall be applied retroactively to govern reimbursement for labor or parts, as applicable, beginning thirty days after the date the franchisee submitted the disputed rate or markup percentage under division (B) of this section. (4) A franchisee shall not establish or modify a retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage more frequently than once per calendar year. (D) When calculating the compensation that must be provided to a franchisee for labor and parts used to fulfill warranty and recall obligations under this section, all of the following apply: (1) The franchisor shall use time allowances for the diagnosis and performance of the warranty and recall work and service that are reasonable and adequate for the work or services to be performed by a qualified technician. (2) The franchisor shall use any retail labor rate and any retail parts markup percentage established in accordance with this section in calculating the compensation. (3) If the franchisor provided a part or component to the franchisee at a reduced cost or no cost to use in performing repairs under a recall, campaign service action, or warranty repair, the franchisor shall provide to the franchisee an amount equal to the retail parts markup for that part or component, which shall be calculated by multiplying the dealer cost for the part or component as listed in the franchisor's price schedule by the retail parts markup percentage. (4) A franchisor shall not assess penalties, surcharges, or similar costs to a franchisee, transfer or shift any costs to a franchisee, limit allocation of vehicles or parts to a franchisee, or otherwise take retaliatory action against a franchisee based on any franchisee's exercise of its rights under this section. It is the burden of the franchisee to prove any claims under division (D)(4) of this section by a preponderance of the evidence. Nothing in this section prohibits a franchisor from increasing the price of a vehicle or part in the normal course of business. (5) A franchisor shall fully reimburse a franchisee for the cost of any rental vehicle provided to a customer when the rental is required, offered, advertised as available, or otherwise agreed to by the franchisor. The franchisor shall not deny or reduce the reimbursement to the franchisee because the franchisee is unable to provide a specific type of vehicle, including a particular line-make, size, or category of vehicle. (E) A franchisor shall not require a franchisee to establish a retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage using any method that is unduly burdensome or time consuming, or require the use of information that is unduly burdensome or time consuming to obtain, including part-by-part or transaction-by-transaction calculations or utilization of the franchisee's financial statement. Further, no franchisor shall unilaterally calculate a retail labor rate or retail parts markup percentage for a franchisee. Divisions (A), (C), (D), and (E) of this section do not apply to franchisors or franchisees who deal in recreational vehicles. Division (B) of this section as it pertains to diagnostic work does not apply to franchisors or franchisees who deal in recreational vehicles. Sec. 4517.521. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Stop-sale or do-not-drive order" means a notification issued by a motor vehicle manufacturer to its franchised motor vehicle dealers stating that certain used motor vehicles in inventory shall not be sold, either at retail or wholesale, leased, or driven due to a federal safety recall or a federal or state emissions recall. (2) "Average trade-in value" means the approximate monetary value for a used motor vehicle that is indicated in an independent third-party guide, based on the year, make, and model of a vehicle. (B)(1) Pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section, a franchisor shall compensate a franchisee of not less than one and twenty-five hundredths per cent of the average trade-in value for a used motor vehicle that is the subject of a stop-sale or do-not-drive order if both of the following apply: (a) The franchisee is authorized to sell or perform recall repairs on motor vehicles that are the same line-make as the subject motor vehicle; (b) The parts or remedy that are necessary to perform the recall service or repair on the subject motor vehicle are not reasonably available to perform that service or repair within thirty days of the franchisor issuing the recall notice and associated stop-sale or do-not-drive order. (2) The compensation described in division (B)(1) of this section shall be paid per month, or prorated for a portion of the month. The compensation shall commence on the thirtieth day after the recall notice and stop-sale or do-not-drive order was issued. The compensation shall end on the earlier of the following dates: (a) The date that the remedy or repair parts that are necessary to resolve the recall notice and stop-sale or do-not-drive order are available to the franchisee for the subject motor vehicle; (b) The franchisee sells, trades, or otherwise disposes of the subject motor vehicle. (3) A franchisor is not required to compensate a franchisee for more than the total average trade-in value of the subject motor vehicle. (C) Division (B) of this section does not apply to motor vehicles purchased by a franchisee after the date the recall notice or stop-sale or do-not-drive order was issued or to motor vehicles that were purchased outside of the ordinary course of business. (D) A franchisor may compensate a franchisee under a national recall compensation program if the compensation under that program equals or exceeds the compensation specified in division (B) of this section or per any agreement between the franchisor and franchisee. (E) A franchisor shall not attempt to recover all or any other portion of its costs for compensating a franchisee in accordance with this section either through a reduction in the amount due to a franchisee or through a separate charge, surcharge, or other imposition related to the costs of recalled vehicles, parts, diagnostic work, or other services. Nothing in division (E) of this section prohibits a franchisor from changing its prices in the ordinary course of business or prohibits a franchisor from charging back a franchisee for an unnecessary or improperly performed repair. (F) A franchisor may determine the manner and method in which a franchisee demonstrates the inventory status of a motor vehicle that is eligible for compensation in accordance with this section. The manner, method, and type of information required shall not be unduly burdensome for the franchisee. (G) Any remedy provided to a franchisee in accordance with this section shall be the exclusive remedy provided to that franchisee for compensation related to a used motor vehicle that is the subject of a stop-sale or do-not-drive order. A remedy provided in accordance with this section shall not be combined with any other state or federal recall compensation remedy for used motor vehicles subject to a stop-sale or do-not-drive order. (H) This section does not apply to franchisors or franchisees who deal in recreational vehicles. Sec. 4517.60. Notwithstanding the terms, conditions, or provisions of any franchise, or the date such franchise was executed, each franchisor shall indemnify and hold harmless its franchisees against any losses, including, but not limited to, court costs and attorney fees reasonably incurred, or damages arising out of complaints, claims, or suits, whether or not meritorious, relating in whole or in part to claims under section 1345.72 of the Revised Code, or to the manufacture, assembly, or design of motor vehicles, parts, or accessories, to damage corrected by the franchisor prior to receipt of a motor vehicle by the franchisee, or relating to other functions of the franchisor beyond the control of the franchisee, including, but not limited to, the selection by the franchisor of parts or components for the motor vehicle, the franchisor's designation of features or equipment as optional, and any damage to merchandise occurring in transit to the franchisee where the carrier is designated by the franchisor. The franchisee shall give notice to the franchisor within twenty-eight days of service of summons on the franchisee of pending suits in which allegations are made that come within this section and shall cooperate with the franchisor in the defense of such suits. Sec. 4519.59. (A)(1) The clerk of a court of common pleas shall charge and retain fees as follows: (a) Fifteen Eighteen dollars, or twenty-three dollars if a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution authorizing the increased fee for that county, for each certificate of title or duplicate certificate of title including the issuance of a memorandum certificate of title, authorization to print a non-negotiable evidence of ownership described in division (D) of section 4519.58 of the Revised Code, non-negotiable evidence of ownership printed by the clerk under division (E) of that section, and notation of any lien on a certificate of title that is applied for at the same time as the certificate of title. The clerk shall retain eleven dollars and fifty cents of that fee for each certificate of title when there is a notation of a lien or security interest on the certificate of title, twelve dollars and twenty-five cents when there is no lien or security interest noted on the certificate of title, and eleven dollars and fifty cents for each duplicate certificate of title. If a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution authorizing a twenty-three-dollar fee, the clerk shall retain the additional five dollars of that fee. (b) Five dollars for each certificate of title with no security interest noted that is issued to a licensed motor vehicle dealer for resale purposes. The clerk shall retain two dollars and twenty-five cents of that fee. (c) Five dollars for each memorandum certificate of title or non-negotiable evidence of ownership that is applied for separately. The clerk shall retain that entire fee. (2) The fees that are not retained by the clerk shall be paid to the registrar of motor vehicles by monthly returns, which shall be forwarded to the registrar not later than the fifth day of the month next succeeding that in which the certificate is forwarded or that in which the registrar is notified of a lien or cancellation of a lien. (B)(1) The registrar shall pay twenty-five cents of the amount received for each certificate of title that is issued to a motor vehicle dealer for resale, one dollar for certificates of title issued with a lien or security interest noted on the certificate of title, and twenty-five cents for each certificate of title with no lien or security interest noted on the certificate of title into the public safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. (2) Fifty cents of the amount received for each certificate of title shall be paid by the registrar as follows: (a) Four cents shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the motor vehicle dealers board fund created in section 4505.09 of the Revised Code, for use as described in division (B)(2)(a) of that section. (b) Twenty-one cents shall be paid into the highway operating fund. (c) Twenty-five cents shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the motor vehicle sales audit fund created in section 4505.09 of the Revised Code, for use as described in division (B)(2)(c) of that section. (3) Two dollars of the amount received by the registrar for each certificate of title shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the automated title processing fund created in section 4505.09 of the Revised Code, for use as described in divisions (B)(3)(a) and (c) of that section. (4) Three dollars of the amount received by the registrar under division (A)(1)(a) of this section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the security, investigations, and policing fund created by section 4501.11 of the Revised Code to be used for the purposes specified in division (B)(1) of that section. Sec. 4561.03. (A) The Ohio airport improvement program fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money appropriated to it by the general assembly. (B) The fund shall be used by the office of aviation to support the Ohio airport improvement program. The program provides financial support to publicly owned, public-use airports in Ohio. (C) Investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Sec. 4582.024. After a port authority has been created, any municipal corporation, township, or county, acting by ordinance, resolution of the township trustees, or resolution of the county commissioners, respectively, which is contiguous to such port authority, or to any municipal corporation, township, or county which proposes to join such port authority at the same time and is contiguous to such port authority, or any county within which such port authority is situated, may join such port authority and thereupon the jurisdiction and territory of such port authority shall include such municipal corporation, county, or township. If more than one such political subdivision is to be joined to the port authority at the same time, then each such ordinance or resolution shall designate the political subdivisions which are to be so joined. Any territory or municipal corporation not included in a port authority and which is annexed to a municipal corporation included within the jurisdiction and territory of a port authority shall, on such annexation and without further proceedings, be annexed to and be included in the jurisdiction and territory of such port authority. Before such political subdivision or subdivisions are joined to a port authority, other than by annexation to a municipality, the political subdivision or subdivisions theretofore comprising such port authority shall agree upon the terms and conditions pursuant to which such political subdivision or subdivisions are to be joined. For all purposes of sections 4582.01 to 4582.20, inclusive, of the Revised Code, such political subdivision or subdivisions shall be considered to have participated in the creation of such port authority, except that the initial term of any director of the port authority appointed by such a political subdivision shall be four years. After each ordinance or resolution proposing joinder to the port authority has become effective and the terms and conditions of joinder have been agreed to, the board of directors of the port authority shall by resolution either accept or reject such joinder. Such joinder shall be effective on adoption of the resolution accepting such joinder, unless the port authority to which a political subdivision or subdivisions including a county within which such port authority is located, are to be joined has authority under section 4582.14 of the Revised Code to levy a tax on property within its jurisdiction, then such joinder shall not be effective until approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the electors voting on the question of such joinder. If more than one political subdivision is to be joined to the port authority, then the electors of such subdivision shall vote as a district and the majority affirmative vote shall be determined by the vote cast in such district as a whole. If a tax on property is to be levied, the board of directors of the port authority and the county auditor shall proceed in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the additional subdivision or subdivisions have joined the port authority. The election shall be called by the board of directors of the port authority and shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.191 of the Revised Code except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall ________________________________________________________ (name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) be joined to ____________________ (name) port authority and the existing tax levy (levies) of such port authority, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _________ mill(s) for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be authorized to be levied against properties within ______________________________________________________________" (name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) If the question is approved such joinder shall be immediately effective and the port authority shall be authorized to extend the levy of such tax against all the taxable property within the political subdivision or political subdivisions which have been joined. If such question is approved at a general election then the port authority may amend its budget and resolution adopted pursuant to section 5705.34 of the Revised Code and such levy shall be placed on the current tax list and duplicate and collected as other taxes are collected from all taxable property within the port authority including the political subdivision or political subdivisions joined as a result of such election. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4582.26. After a port authority has been created, any municipal corporation, township, county, or other political subdivision, acting by ordinance or resolution, which is contiguous to any municipal corporation, township, county, or other political subdivision which participated in the creation of such port authority or to any municipal corporation, township, county, or other political subdivision which proposes to join the port authority at the same time and is contiguous to any municipal corporation, township, county, or other political subdivision which participated in the creation of such port authority, may join such port authority, and thereupon the jurisdiction and territory of the port authority includes the municipal corporation, county, township, or other political subdivision so joining. If more than one such political subdivision is to be joined to the port authority at the same time, then each such ordinance or resolution shall designate the political subdivisions which are to be so joined. Any territory or municipal corporation not included in a port authority and which is annexed to a municipal corporation included within the jurisdiction and territory of a port authority shall, on such annexation and without further proceedings, be annexed to and be included in the jurisdiction and territory of the port authority. Before such political subdivision or subdivisions are joined to a port authority, other than by annexation to a municipal corporation, the political subdivision or subdivisions theretofore comprising such port authority shall agree upon the terms and conditions pursuant to which such political subdivision or subdivisions are to be joined. For all purposes of sections 4582.21 to 4582.59 of the Revised Code, such political subdivision or subdivisions shall be considered to have participated in the creation of such port authority, except that the initial term of any director of the port authority appointed by such a political subdivision shall be four years. After each ordinance or resolution proposing joinder to the port authority has become effective and the terms and conditions of joinder have been agreed to, the board of directors of the port authority shall by resolution either accept or reject such joinder. Such joinder shall be effective upon adoption of the resolution accepting such joinder, unless the port authority to which a political subdivision or subdivisions, including a county within which such port authority is located, are to be joined, has authority under section 4582.40 of the Revised Code to levy a tax on property within its jurisdiction, then such joinder shall not be effective until approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the electors voting on the question of the joinder. If more than one political subdivision is to be joined to the port authority, then the electors of such subdivisions shall vote as a district and the majority affirmative vote shall be determined by the vote cast in such district as a whole. If a tax on property is to be levied, the board of directors of the port authority and the county auditor shall proceed in the manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, except that the levy's annual collections shall be estimated assuming that the additional subdivision or subdivisions have joined the port authority. The election shall be called by the board of directors of the port authority and shall be held, canvassed, and certified in the manner provided for the submission of tax levies under section 5705.191 of the Revised Code except that the question appearing on the ballot shall read: "Shall _________________________________________________ (Name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) ________________________________________________________________ be joined to _____________________________ (Name) port authority and the existing tax levy (levies) of such port authority, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _______________ mill(s) for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be authorized to be levied against properties within ____________________________________________________________?" (Name or names of political subdivisions to be joined) If the question is approved the joinder becomes immediately effective and the port authority is authorized to extend the levy of such tax against all the taxable property within the political subdivision or political subdivisions which have been joined. If such question is approved at a general election, then the port authority may amend its budget and resolution adopted pursuant to section 5705.34 of the Revised Code and such levy shall be placed on the current tax list and duplicate and collected as other taxes are collected from all taxable property within the port authority including the political subdivision or political subdivisions joined as a result of the election. As used in this section, "the county auditor's appraised market value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4582.72. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no port authority created under section 4582.02 or 4582.22 of the Revised Code shall enter an agreement providing for the construction or renovation of improvements to real property located outside of the port authority's jurisdiction to which all of the following applies without first obtaining approval from the board of county commissioners in the county where the property is located or, if the property is located in more than one county, from the board of county commissioners of each county in which the property is located: (A) The agreement is with a non-public entity. (B) The majority of the floor space of the improvements that are the subject of the agreement will not be occupied by the port authority upon completion of the construction or renovation. (C) Building materials purchased for the renovation or construction will qualify for the exemption authorized by division (B)(13) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4582.73. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Credit enhancement facilities" has the same meaning as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Common bond fund program" means any program authorized by a port authority for the purpose of financing port authority facilities and enhancing the credit of port authority obligations using credit enhancement facilities, cash reserves, or other moneys available for such purpose. (3) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, or other forms or evidences of obligation constituting revenue bonds as that term is used in division (A)(4) of section 4582.06 of the Revised Code, or port authority revenue bonds as that term is used in section 4582.48 and division (A)(8) of section 4582.31 of the Revised Code, issued by a port authority. (4) "Port authority" means a body corporate and politic created pursuant to the authority of this chapter. (5) "Port authority facilities" and "port authority facility" have the same meaning as in division (D) of section 4582.01 or in division (E) of section 4582.21 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (B) A port authority may, by one or more resolutions of its board of directors, establish and maintain a common bond fund program. A port authority that has established a common bond fund program may operate and manage such program, authorize agreements and other documents for such program, and appropriate funds of the port authority for the support of such program. A port authority, as part of a common bond fund program, may authorize the use of one or more credit enhancement facilities and cash reserves or other money available for the purpose of financing port authority facilities, all as authorized in the bond proceedings associated with the obligations issued as part of the common bond fund program. Any obligations issued by a port authority and secured by a trust agreement between the port authority and a corporate trustee under division (A)(4) of section 4582.06 or section 4582.50 may, in the discretion of the port authority, be issued as part of a common bond fund program. Any trust agreement used in a common bond fund program, and the establishment, deposit, investment and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of money, shall be governed by the bond proceedings associated with the obligations and by this chapter. More than one obligation may be secured by a trust agreement used in a common bond fund program. (C) All terms, provisions, and authorizations in this chapter as applicable to a port authority, and the terms, provisions, and authorizations of sections 9.96, 9.98, 9.981, 9.982, and 9.983 of the Revised Code, apply to obligations issued as part of a common bond fund program and the associated bond proceedings, except as otherwise provided in this section, or except as otherwise provided in those obligations and associated bond proceedings. (D) This section shall be liberally construed to effect the purpose of authorizing common bond fund programs. The powers and authorizations granted in this section may be exercised jointly or separately by one or more port authorities and are in addition to and supplemental to the powers and authorizations otherwise granted to port authorities under the applicable provisions of this chapter and shall not be construed as a limitation on any such powers or authorizations. (E) This section provides additional optional authority for the establishment of a common bond fund program. Nothing in this section shall impair or affect any common bond fund program created prior to the effective date of this section. This section does not apply to any common bond fund program created prior to the effective date of this section unless the port authority elects to apply this section to its common bond fund program by one or more resolutions of its board of directors. Sec. 4701.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Practice of public accounting" means performing or offering to perform any engagement that will result in the issuance of an attest report and, with respect to a person who holds a CPA certificate, PA registration, foreign certificate, or firm registration, any other services involving the use of accounting or auditing skills as established by rules adopted by the accountancy board. (B) "Public accounting firm" means a sole proprietorship, a partnership, a limited liability company, a professional association, a corporation-for-profit, or any other business organization that is engaged in the practice of public accounting in this state. (C) "Opinion report" means any opinion on a financial statement that is expressed in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards as to the fairness of presentation of information and that is used for guidance in financial transactions, for accounting, or for assessing the status or performance of commercial and noncommercial enterprises, whether public, private, or governmental. (D) "Peer review" means a study, appraisal, or review of one or more aspects of the professional work of a public accounting firm that meets the standards and requirements set forth by the accountancy board. (E) "Review report" means either of the following: (1) Any review report on a financial statement that is issued with respect to any of the following: (a) Interim financial information in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards; (b) The financial information of a nonpublic entity in accordance with statements on standards for accounting and review services; (c) The reliability of another party's written assertion in accordance with statements on standards for attestation engagements. (2) Any other review report on a financial statement that is not described in division (E)(1) of this section and that is issued in accordance with standards promulgated by the American institute of certified public accountants. (F) "Compilation report" means any compilation report on a financial statement that is issued with respect to financial information of a nonpublic entity in accordance with statements on standards for accounting and review services as promulgated by the American institute of certified public accountants. (G) "Examination report" means any examination report on a financial statement that is issued with respect to another party's written assertion in accordance with statements on standards for attestation engagements as promulgated by the American institute of certified public accountants. (H) "Agreed-upon procedures report" means any report that is on a financial statement and that is based on agreed-upon procedures issued with respect to another party's written assertion in accordance with statements on standards for attestation engagements as promulgated by the American institute of certified public accountants. (I) "Qualified firm" means a sole proprietorship, partnership, professional association, corporation-for-profit, limited liability company, or other business organization in which the individuals who own a majority of the business organization interests in the business organization and control the business organization hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate. (J) "Own" means any direct or indirect ownership of an equity interest or shares in a public accounting firm or qualified firm. (K) "Control" or "controlled" means the right to exercise the majority of the voting equity interests or shares in a public accounting firm or qualified firm with respect to any matter. (L) "Equity interest" means any capital interest or profit interest in a sole proprietorship, partnership, professional association, corporation-for-profit, limited liability company, or other business organization. (M) "Ohio permit" means a permit to practice public accounting issued under division (A) of section 4701.10 of the Revised Code that is not revoked or suspended. (N) "Ohio registration" means the registration under division (B) of section 4701.10 of the Revised Code of a holder of a CPA certificate or PA registration who is not in the practice of public accounting in this state. (O) "Firm registration" or "registered firm" means registration as a public accounting firm under section 4701.04 of the Revised Code. (P) "PA registration" means registration as a public accountant under section 4701.07 of the Revised Code that is not revoked or suspended. (Q) "CPA certificate" means a certificate issued under section 4701.06 or 4701.061 of the Revised Code that is not revoked or suspended. (R) "Foreign certificate" means a license, permit, certificate, or registration issued to a certified public accountant under the laws of another state that authorizes the holder to practice public accounting in that state, is valid, is in good standing, and has not expired. (S) "Attest report" means an opinion report, review report, compilation report, examination report, agreed-upon procedures report, or any similar report prepared in accordance with standards established by the American institute of certified public accountants with respect to a financial statement or other financial information. (T) "Person" means any individual, corporation-for-profit, business trust, estate, partnership, limited liability company, professional association, or other business organization. (U) Technical terms that define specific public accounting engagements have the same meanings as in the professional standards promulgated by the American institute of certified public accountants. Sec. 4701.04. (A) No public accounting firm located in this state shall engage in the practice of public accounting in this state unless it registers with the accountancy board and pays a registration fee set by the board. (B) Public accounting firms shall apply for initial registration within ninety days after formation or within ninety days after the commencement of practicing public accounting in this state. All public accounting firms shall renew their registration triennially. All public accounting firms shall submit with their initial and renewal registration applications all of the following: (1) A list of the names, addresses, and certificate or registration numbers of all individuals who hold an Ohio permit and who own an equity interest or shares in the public accounting firm or are employed by the public accounting firm; (2) A list of the names and addresses of each person who does not hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate and who owns an equity interest or shares in the public accounting firm if the person's principal place of business is located in this state; (3) A statement that the public accounting firm and each person who owns an equity interest or shares in the public accounting firm or is employed by the public accounting firm and who does not hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate is in compliance with divisions (C) and (D) of this section. (C) A public accounting firm shall satisfy all of the following requirements in order to register: (1) Except as provided in division (C)(5)(C)(7) of this section, each partner, shareholder, member, or other person who owns an more than fifty per cent of the total equity interest or shares in the public accounting firm shall be owned by individuals who hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate. (2) If a public accounting firm has a board of directors, more than fifty per cent of the directors shall hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate. (3) If a public accounting firm has an employee stock ownership plan, more than fifty per cent of the trustees of the employee stock ownership plan shall hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate. (4) The public accounting firm shall designate an individual who holds an Ohio permit who shall be responsible for the proper registration of the firm. The public accounting firm shall identify this individual to the board. (3)(5) Each individual in a public accounting firm who signs any attest report issued from an office of the public accounting firm located in this state shall hold an Ohio permit. (4)(6) An individual who owns an equity interest or shares in the public accounting firm or is employed by the public accounting firm and who holds an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate, or a qualified firm that owns an equity interest or shares in the public accounting firm, shall assume ultimate responsibility for any attest report issued from an office of the public accounting firm located in this state. (5)(7) Any person who does not hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate and who holds an equity interest or shares in the public accounting firm shall satisfy the conditions set forth in division (D) of this section. (6)(8) The public accounting firm shall provide for the transfer of the equity interest or shares owned by persons who do not hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate to either the public accounting firm or to another person who owns an equity interest or shares in the firm if a person who does not hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate withdraws from or ceases to be employed by the public accounting firm. The public accounting firm may make payments in connection with the person's withdrawal from the firm to that person or, if that person is deceased or dissolved, to the person's estate or successor in interest. (D) A person who does not hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate may own an equity interest or shares in a public accounting firm if all of the following conditions are met: (1) All of the individuals who hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate and who own equity interests or shares in the public accounting firm, and qualified firms that own equity interests or shares in the public accounting firm, own, in the aggregate, a majority of the equity interests or shares in the public accounting firm and control the public accounting firm. (2) The person does not assume or use any titles or designations specified in division (A) of section 4701.14 of the Revised Code. The person may designate or refer to the person as a shareholder, partner, member, principal, owner, or officer of the public accounting firm and also may use any other title that the board authorizes by rule. (3) The person is not in violation of any standard regarding the character or conduct of that person that the board establishes by rule. (4) The person's participation in the business of the public accounting firm is the person's principal occupation and consists of providing services to or on behalf of the public accounting firm, and the person is not functioning solely or predominately as a passive investor in the public accounting firm. (5) The person meets or exceeds the continuing education requirements that the board establishes by rule. (6) A person who holds a professional license, registration, or certification issued by this state or another state complies with the requirements of that license, registration, or certification. (7) The person abides by the code of conduct of the American institute of certified public accountants or a comparable code of professional conduct that the board adopts by rule. (8) The person complies with all applicable provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted by the board. (E) A person who owns a voting equity interest or shares in a public accounting firm may not delegate, by proxy or otherwise, the duty to exercise any voting rights to a person that does not hold an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate or to a person that is not a qualified firm. (F) As a condition for initial or renewal registration of a public accounting firm on and after January 1, 1993, the board, by rule, shall require that each public accounting firm undergo a peer review to determine the public accounting firm's degree of compliance in the practice of public accounting with generally accepted accounting principles, generally accepted auditing standards, and other generally accepted technical standards as defined by the board in rule, unless the public accounting firm meets one of the exceptions in division (J) of this section. (G) The board shall adopt rules establishing guidelines for peer reviews, and may authorize an agent to administer all or part of the board's peer review program and to assess a reasonable fee to firms to cover the costs incurred by the agent for program administration. The rules shall do all of the following: (1) Designate a peer review committee consisting of accounting professionals to serve as advisors to the board and to ensure that the board's guidelines are followed. (2) Require that the peer review be conducted by a reviewer that is both independent of the public accounting firm reviewed and qualified pursuant to board rules; (3) Require that the standards and practices applied by the reviewer be at least as stringent as those applied by the American institute of certified public accountants; (4) Prohibit the use or disclosure of information obtained by members of the board or a committee of peer reviewers during or in connection with the peer review process for purposes other than those related to determining the degree of compliance by the public accounting firm with generally accepted accounting principles, generally accepted auditing standards, and other generally accepted technical standards as defined by the board in rule. Division (G)(4) of this section does not apply to the use or disclosure of information that is described in division (K)(3) of this section or that is necessary to comply with any provision of law. (H)(1) If a peer review report indicates that a public accounting firm does not comply with standards and practices set forth in the rules adopted by the board, the board, in its discretion, may review the results of the peer review report. If the board, or its authorized peer review program administrator, determines that the public accounting firm does not comply with the standards and practices, it may require both of the following: (a) Remedial action, which may include any of the following: (i) Requiring employees of the public accounting firm to complete general or specific continuing professional education courses; (ii) Requiring the public accounting firm to undergo peer review more frequently than triennially and peer review that is conducted in whole or part under the direct supervision of the board or its designee; (iii) Any other remedial action specified by the board. (b) An affidavit and supporting documentation from the public accounting firm submitted within the time specified by the board indicating completion of required remedial actions. (2) If the board, or its authorized peer review program administrator, determines that a public accounting firm has not complied with any requirement ordered under division (H) of this section, or if the board determines, after the review of a peer review report, that the public accounting firm has a history of noncompliance with standards and practices set forth in board rules, the board may hold a hearing to determine the extent of the firm's noncompliance. If the board, after conducting the hearing, determines that the public accounting firm does not comply with appropriate standards and practices, the board may issue an order that imposes any disciplinary measure set forth in division (B) of section 4701.16 of the Revised Code. (3) Notwithstanding divisions (K)(1) and (2) of this section, all matters relating to the procedures for determining compliance with the standards and practices under division (H)(2) of this section are subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, including the notice and conduct of any hearing and the issuance and appeal of any order. Remedial orders made under division (H)(1) of this section are not subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (I) The public accounting firm reviewed shall pay for any peer review performed. (J) The board may exempt a public accounting firm from the requirement to undergo a peer review if the public accounting firm submits to the board a written and notarized statement that the public accounting firm meets at least one of the following grounds for exemption identified in the statement: (1) Within three years of the date of application for initial or renewal registration, the public accounting firm has completed a peer review acceptable to the board and conducted pursuant to standards not less stringent than the peer review standards promulgated by the American institute of certified public accountants. A peer review that does not comply with standards and practices set forth in the rules adopted by the board and that may subject a public accounting firm to remedial or disciplinary action pursuant to division (H) of this section, does not qualify as an acceptable peer review. The public accounting firm shall submit to the board a copy of the results of the peer review and any additional documentation required by the board. The board shall not require submittal of the working papers related to the peer review process. (2) Within three years of the date of application for initial or renewal registration, the public accounting firm has completed a peer review acceptable to the board that was conducted in another state or foreign country. The public accounting firm shall submit to the board a copy of the results of the peer review and any additional documentation required by the board, including a detailed report of the procedures and standards applied by the reviewer. (3) The public accounting firm has never practiced public accounting in this state or any other state or foreign country, will complete a peer review acceptable to the board within eighteen months of initial registration, and will review its registration with the board two years after initial registration as specified in rules the board adopts. (4) The public accounting firm, on a schedule as required by rule adopted by the board, submits a report to the board that states all of the following: (a) The public accounting firm does not undertake any engagement that will result in the issuance of an attest report or other engagement that is subject to peer review in accordance with division (F) of this section. (b) The public accounting firm agrees to notify the board within ninety days after accepting any engagement that will result in the issuance of any attest report or other engagement that is subject to peer review in accordance with division (F) of this section and will complete a peer review acceptable to the board within one year after the acceptance of an engagement of that nature. (5) Subject to the board's approval and for good cause as defined in rules the board adopts, the public accounting firm is entitled to an exemption. (K) In any civil action, arbitration, or administrative proceeding involving a public accounting firm, all of the following shall apply: (1) The proceedings, records, and work papers of any reviewer, including board members and review committee members, involved in the peer review process are privileged and not subject to discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal process and may not be introduced into evidence. (2) No reviewer, including board members and review committee members, involved in the peer review process shall be permitted or required to testify as to any matters produced, presented, disclosed, or discussed during or in connection with the peer review process or shall be required to testify to any finding, recommendation, evaluation, opinion, or other actions of those committees or their members. (3) No privilege exists under this section for either of the following: (a) Information presented or considered in the peer review process that was otherwise available to the public; (b) Materials prepared in connection with a particular engagement merely because they subsequently are presented or considered as part of the peer review process. (L)(1) If a peer review report indicates that a public accounting firm complies with standards and practices set forth in rules adopted by the board, the board shall destroy all documents and reports related to the peer review within thirty days after the board completes its review of the report. (2) If a peer review report indicates that a public accounting firm does not comply with those standards and practices set forth in rules adopted by the board, the board shall retain all documents and reports related to the peer review until completion of the next peer review that complies with standards and practices set forth in rules adopted by the board pursuant to division (G) of this section. The board also may use these documents to determine a history of noncompliance with standards and practices in any proceeding held under division (H)(2) of this section. Sec. 4701.16. (A) After notice and hearing as provided in Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the accountancy board may discipline as described in division (B) of this section a person holding an Ohio permit, an Ohio registration, a firm registration, a CPA certificate, or a PA registration or any other person whose activities are regulated by the board for any one or any combination of the following causes: (1) Fraud or deceit in obtaining a firm registration or in obtaining a CPA certificate, a PA registration, an Ohio permit, or an Ohio registration; (2) Dishonesty, fraud, or gross negligence in the practice of public accounting; (3) Violation of any of the provisions of section 4701.14 of the Revised Code; (4) Violation of a rule of professional conduct promulgated by the board under the authority granted by this chapter; (5) Conviction of a felony under the laws of any state or of the United States; (6) Conviction of any crime, an element of which is dishonesty or fraud, under the laws of any state or of the United States; (7) Cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew authority to practice as a certified public accountant, a public accountant, or a public accounting firm by any other state, for any cause other than failure to pay registration fees in that other state; (8) Suspension or revocation of the right to practice before any state or federal agency; (9) Failure of a holder of a CPA certificate or PA registration to obtain an Ohio permit or an Ohio registration, or the failure of a public accounting firm to obtain a firm registration; (10) Conduct discreditable to the public accounting profession or to the holder of an Ohio permit, Ohio registration, or foreign certificate; (11) Failure of a public accounting firm to comply with section 4701.04 of the Revised Code. (B) For any of the reasons specified in division (A) of this section, the board may do any of the following: (1) Revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any CPA certificate or PA registration or any Ohio permit, Ohio registration, or firm registration; (2) Disqualify a person who is not a holder of an Ohio permit or a foreign certificate from owning an equity interest or shares in a public accounting firm or qualified firm; (3) Publicly censure a registered firm or a holder of a CPA certificate, a PA registration, an Ohio permit, or an Ohio registration; (4) Levy against a registered firm or a holder of a CPA certificate, a PA registration, an Ohio permit, or an Ohio registration a penalty or fine not to exceed five thousand dollars for each offense. Any fine shall be reasonable and in relation to the severity of the offense. (5) In the case of violations of division (A)(2) or (4) of this section, require completion of remedial continuing education programs prescribed by the board in addition to those required by section 4701.11 of the Revised Code; (6) In the case of violations of division (A)(2) or (4) of this section, require the holder of a CPA certificate, PA registration, or firm registration to submit to a peer review by a professional committee designated by the board, which committee shall report to the board concerning that holder's compliance with generally accepted accounting principles, generally accepted auditing standards, or other generally accepted technical standards; (7) Revoke or suspend the privileges to offer or render attest services in this state or to use a CPA title or designation in this state of an individual who holds a foreign certificate. (C) If the board levies a fine against or suspends the certificate of a person or registration of a person or firm for a violation of division (A)(2) or (4) of this section, it may waive all or any portion of the fine or suspension if the holder of the CPA certificate, PA registration, or firm registration complies fully with division (B)(5) or (6) of this section. (D) A person engaged in the practice of public accounting shall not be subject to discipline by the accountancy board solely because the person provided professional accounting services to the holder of a license under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4707.024. (A) Not later than seventy-two hours after the end of an auction, a person licensed under this chapter shall deposit in one or more trust or escrow accounts all money received from the sale of an owner's or consignee's personal property at auction unless the licensee pays the money to the owner or consignee immediately after the end of the auction. (B) For purposes of this section, a person licensed under this chapter shall designate a trust or escrow account that contains an owner's or consignee's money as "client trust account" or with words of similar meaning. In addition, a trust or escrow account only shall contain money received from the sale of personal property at auction that has not been disbursed and money for expenses regarding the auction, including commission and advertisement fees, that are specifically delineated in the auction contract. (C)(C)(1) Except for the payment of money to the owner or consignee immediately after the end of the auction, a person licensed under this chapter shall pay the owner or consignee with money from the client's trust or escrow account. In addition, the licensee may pay expenses, including commission and advertisement fees, that are specifically delineated in the auction contract with money from the trust or escrow account. Money in the trust or escrow account shall not be disbursed for any purpose that is inconsistent with this section. In addition, except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the money shall not be commingled with the licensee's personal or business money. In administering the trust or escrow account, the licensee shall keep detailed records that show deposits, withdrawals, and interest accrued, if applicable. Unless otherwise agreed to by the parties in the auction contract or by the direction of a court of law or as otherwise provided in division (C)(2) of this section, all money deposited into a trust or escrow account shall be disbursed to the seller not later than fifteen days after the auction. (2) Notwithstanding division (C)(1) of this section, a licensee may deposit money into a trust or escrow account, and retain that money in the account, to pay expenses related to bank charges necessary to maintain the account. A licensee shall not utilize any of the owner's or consignee's money to pay such expenses. (D) Money from the sale of personal property at auction may be deposited in an interest bearing account if the parties to the auction contract specifically agree to such a deposit. Interest earned in the account shall be credited to the seller unless otherwise agreed to by the parties in the auction listing contract. The interest credited to the account may remain in the account for a period of sixty days after the seller receives the money from the account. The interest money then shall be disbursed according to the terms of the auction contract. (E) All money received in connection with the sale of real property at auction shall be deposited in a broker's special or trust bank account in a depository located in this state that is described in division (A)(26) of section 4735.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4723.28. (A) The board of nursing, by a vote of a quorum, may impose one or more of the following sanctions if it finds that a person committed fraud in passing an examination required to obtain a license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board or to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing any nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board: deny, revoke, suspend, or place restrictions on any nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board; reprimand or otherwise discipline a holder of a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate; or impose a fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation. (B) Except as provided in section 4723.092 of the Revised Code, the board of nursing, by a vote of a quorum, may impose one or more of the following sanctions: deny, revoke, suspend, or place restrictions on any nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued by the board; reprimand or otherwise discipline a holder of a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate; or impose a fine of not more than five hundred dollars per violation. The sanctions may be imposed for any of the following: (1) Denial, revocation, suspension, or restriction of authority to engage in a licensed profession or practice a health care occupation, including nursing or practice as a dialysis technician, for any reason other than a failure to renew, in Ohio or another state or jurisdiction; (2) Engaging in the practice of nursing or engaging in practice as a dialysis technician, having failed to renew a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued under this chapter, or while a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate is under suspension; (3) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (4) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, any felony or of any crime involving gross immorality or moral turpitude; (5) Selling, giving away, or administering drugs or therapeutic devices for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes; or conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, violating any municipal, state, county, or federal drug law; (6) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, an act in another jurisdiction that would constitute a felony or a crime of moral turpitude in Ohio; (7) Conviction of, a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, a judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest to, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion or similar program or for intervention in lieu of conviction for, an act in the course of practice in another jurisdiction that would constitute a misdemeanor in Ohio; (8) Self-administering or otherwise taking into the body any dangerous drug, as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code, in any way that is not in accordance with a legal, valid prescription issued for that individual, or self-administering or otherwise taking into the body any drug that is a schedule I controlled substance; (9) Habitual or excessive use of controlled substances, other habit-forming drugs, or alcohol or other chemical substances to an extent that impairs the individual's ability to provide safe nursing care or safe dialysis care; (10) Impairment of the ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of safe nursing care or safe dialysis care because of the use of drugs, alcohol, or other chemical substances; (11) Impairment of the ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of safe nursing care or safe dialysis care because of a physical or mental disability; (12) Assaulting or causing harm to a patient or depriving a patient of the means to summon assistance; (13) Misappropriation or attempted misappropriation of money or anything of value in the course of practice; (14) Adjudication by a probate court of being mentally ill or mentally incompetent. The board may reinstate the person's nursing license or dialysis technician certificate upon adjudication by a probate court of the person's restoration to competency or upon submission to the board of other proof of competency. (15) The suspension or termination of employment by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs for any act that violates or would violate this chapter; (16) Violation of this chapter or any rules adopted under it; (17) Violation of any restrictions placed by the board on a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate; (18) Failure to use universal and standard precautions established by rules adopted under section 4723.07 of the Revised Code; (19) Failure to practice in accordance with acceptable and prevailing standards of safe nursing care or safe dialysis care; (20) In the case of a registered nurse, engaging in activities that exceed the practice of nursing as a registered nurse; (21) In the case of a licensed practical nurse, engaging in activities that exceed the practice of nursing as a licensed practical nurse; (22) In the case of a dialysis technician, engaging in activities that exceed those permitted under section 4723.72 of the Revised Code; (23) Aiding and abetting a person in that person's practice of nursing without a license or practice as a dialysis technician without a certificate issued under this chapter; (24) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse, except as provided in division (M) of this section, either of the following: (a) Waiving the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers such nursing services, would otherwise be required to pay if the waiver is used as an enticement to a patient or group of patients to receive health care services from that provider; (b) Advertising that the nurse will waive the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers such nursing services, would otherwise be required to pay. (25) Failure to comply with the terms and conditions of participation in the safe haven program conducted under sections 4723.35 and 4723.351 of the Revised Code; (26) Failure to comply with the terms and conditions required under the practice intervention and improvement program established under section 4723.282 of the Revised Code; (27) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse: (a) Engaging in activities that exceed those permitted for the nurse's nursing specialty under section 4723.43 of the Revised Code; (b) Failure to meet the quality assurance standards established under section 4723.07 of the Revised Code. (28) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse other than a certified registered nurse anesthetist, failure to maintain a standard care arrangement in accordance with section 4723.431 of the Revised Code or to practice in accordance with the standard care arrangement; (29) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse who is designated as a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner, failure to prescribe drugs and therapeutic devices in accordance with section 4723.481 of the Revised Code; (30) Prescribing any drug or device to perform or induce an abortion, or otherwise performing or inducing an abortion; (31) Failure to establish and maintain professional boundaries with a patient, as specified in rules adopted under section 4723.07 of the Revised Code; (32) Regardless of whether the contact or verbal behavior is consensual, engaging with a patient other than the spouse of the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician in any of the following: (a) Sexual contact, as defined in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code; (b) Verbal behavior that is sexually demeaning to the patient or may be reasonably interpreted by the patient as sexually demeaning. (33) Assisting suicide, as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code; (34) Failure to comply with the requirements in section 3719.061 of the Revised Code before issuing for a minor a prescription for an opioid analgesic, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; (35) Failure to comply with section 4723.487 of the Revised Code, unless the state board of pharmacy no longer maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code; (36) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of clinical privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs or the termination or suspension of a certificate of registration to prescribe drugs by the drug enforcement administration of the United States department of justice; (37) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse who is designated as a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner, failure to comply with the terms of a consult agreement entered into with a pharmacist pursuant to section 4729.39 of the Revised Code; (38) Violation of section 4723.93 of the Revised Code; (39) Failure to cooperate with an investigation conducted by the board under this chapter, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board in an investigative interview, in an investigative office conference, at a deposition, or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation does not constitute grounds for discipline if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold testimony or evidence at issue. (C) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of a hearing, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an individual to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by a vote of a quorum, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the agreement shall be of no effect. (D) The hearings of the board shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board may appoint a hearing examiner, as provided in section 119.09 of the Revised Code, to conduct any hearing the board is authorized to hold under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. In any instance in which the board is required under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of an opportunity for a hearing and the applicant, licensee, or certificate holder does not make a timely request for a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by a vote of a quorum, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions listed in division (A) or (B) of this section. (E) If a criminal action is brought against a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician for an act or crime described in divisions (B)(3) to (7) of this section and the action is dismissed by the trial court other than on the merits, the board shall conduct an adjudication to determine whether the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed the act on which the action was based. If the board determines on the basis of the adjudication that the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed the act, or if the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician fails to participate in the adjudication, the board may take action as though the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician had been convicted of the act. If the board takes action on the basis of a conviction, plea, or a judicial finding as described in divisions (B)(3) to (7) of this section that is overturned on appeal, the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician may, on exhaustion of the appeal process, petition the board for reconsideration of its action. On receipt of the petition and supporting court documents, the board shall temporarily rescind its action. If the board determines that the decision on appeal was a decision on the merits, it shall permanently rescind its action. If the board determines that the decision on appeal was not a decision on the merits, it shall conduct an adjudication to determine whether the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed the act on which the original conviction, plea, or judicial finding was based. If the board determines on the basis of the adjudication that the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician committed such act, or if the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician does not request an adjudication, the board shall reinstate its action; otherwise, the board shall permanently rescind its action. Notwithstanding the provision of division (D)(2) of section 2953.32 or division (F)(1) of section 2953.39 of the Revised Code specifying that if records pertaining to a criminal case are sealed or expunged under that section the proceedings in the case shall be deemed not to have occurred, sealing or expungement of the following records on which the board has based an action under this section shall have no effect on the board's action or any sanction imposed by the board under this section: records of any conviction, guilty plea, judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion program or intervention in lieu of conviction. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (F) The board may investigate an individual's criminal background in performing its duties under this section. As part of such investigation, the board may order the individual to submit, at the individual's expense, a request to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation for a criminal records check and check of federal bureau of investigation records in accordance with the procedure described in section 4723.091 of the Revised Code. (G) During the course of an investigation conducted under this section, the board may compel any registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician or applicant under this chapter to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both, as required by the board and at the expense of the individual, if the board finds reason to believe that the individual under investigation may have a physical or mental impairment that may affect the individual's ability to provide safe nursing care. The board shall not compel an individual who has been referred to the safe haven program as described in sections 4723.35 and 4723.351 of the Revised Code to submit to a mental or physical examination. Failure of any individual to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed constitutes an admission of the allegations, unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds that an individual is impaired, the board shall require the individual to submit to care, counseling, or treatment approved or designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed authority to practice. The individual shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board that the individual can begin or resume the individual's occupation in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care under the provisions of the individual's authority to practice. For purposes of this division, any registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician or applicant under this chapter shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (H) The board shall investigate evidence that appears to show that any person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule of the board. Any person may report to the board any information the person may have that appears to show a violation of any provision of this chapter or rule of the board. In the absence of bad faith, any person who reports such information or who testifies before the board in any adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of the report or testimony. (I) All of the following apply under this chapter with respect to the confidentiality of information: (1) Information received by the board pursuant to a complaint or an investigation is confidential and not subject to discovery in any civil action, except that the board may disclose information to law enforcement officers and government entities for purposes of an investigation of either a licensed health care professional, including a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, or dialysis technician, or a person who may have engaged in the unauthorized practice of nursing or dialysis care. No law enforcement officer or government entity with knowledge of any information disclosed by the board pursuant to this division shall divulge the information to any other person or government entity except for the purpose of a government investigation, a prosecution, or an adjudication by a court or government entity. (2) If an investigation requires a review of patient records, the investigation and proceeding shall be conducted in such a manner as to protect patient confidentiality. (3) All adjudications and investigations of the board shall be considered civil actions for the purposes of section 2305.252 of the Revised Code. (4) Any board activity that involves continued monitoring of an individual as part of or following any disciplinary action taken under this section shall be conducted in a manner that maintains the individual's confidentiality. Information received or maintained by the board with respect to the board's monitoring activities is not subject to discovery in any civil action and is confidential, except that the board may disclose information to law enforcement officers and government entities for purposes of an investigation of a licensee or certificate holder. (J) Any action taken by the board under this section resulting in a suspension from practice shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the person may be reinstated to practice. (K) When the board refuses to grant a license or certificate to an applicant, revokes a license or certificate, or refuses to reinstate a license or certificate, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to permanent action taken by the board is forever ineligible to hold a license or certificate of the type that was refused or revoked and the board shall not accept from the individual an application for reinstatement of the license or certificate or for a new license or certificate. (L) No unilateral surrender of a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued under this chapter shall be effective unless accepted by majority vote of the board. No application for a nursing license or dialysis technician certificate issued under this chapter may be withdrawn without a majority vote of the board. The board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section is not removed or limited when an individual has a license or certificate classified as inactive or fails to renew a license or certificate. (M) Sanctions shall not be imposed under division (B)(24) of this section against any licensee who waives deductibles and copayments as follows: (1) In compliance with the health benefit plan that expressly allows such a practice. Waiver of the deductibles or copayments shall be made only with the full knowledge and consent of the plan purchaser, payer, and third-party administrator. Documentation of the consent shall be made available to the board upon request. (2) For professional services rendered to any other person licensed pursuant to this chapter to the extent allowed by this chapter and the rules of the board. Sec. 4723.483. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the board of nursing, a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner who holds a certificate to prescribe issued under section 4723.48 of the Revised Code may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom epinephrine may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code. (2) An epinephrine autoinjector personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A nurse who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which an epinephrine autoinjector is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4723.4811. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the board of nursing, a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom glucagon may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, and 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, and 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code. (2) Injectable or nasally administered glucagon personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A nurse who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which injectable or nasally administered glucagon is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4725.48. (A) Any person who desires to engage in optical dispensing shall file a properly completed application for an examination with the state vision professionals board or with the testing service the board has contracted with pursuant to section 4725.49 of the Revised Code. The application for examination shall be made using a form provided by the board and shall be accompanied by an examination fee the board shall establish by rule. (B) Any person who desires to engage in optical dispensing shall file a properly completed application for a license with the board with. The application for licensure shall be accompanied by a licensure application fee of one hundred ninety-five dollars. No person shall be eligible to apply for a license under this division, unless the person is at least eighteen years of age, is free of contagious or infectious disease, has received a passing score, as determined by the board, on the examination administered under division (A) of this section, is a graduate of an accredited high school of any state, or has received an equivalent education and has successfully completed one of the following: (1) For a spectacle dispensing optician license, one thousand hours of supervised experience under a licensed dispensing optician, optometrist, or physician engaged in the practice of ophthalmology; (2) For a spectacle-contact lens dispensing optician license, one thousand five hundred hours of supervised experience under a licensed dispensing optician, optometrist, or physician engaged in the practice of ophthalmology; (3) A two-year college level program in optical dispensing that has been approved by the board and that includes, but is not limited to, courses of study in mathematics, science, English, anatomy and physiology of the eye, applied optics, ophthalmic optics, measurement and inspection of lenses, lens grinding and edging, ophthalmic lens design, keratometry, and the fitting and adjusting of spectacle lenses and frames and contact lenses, including methods of fitting contact lenses and post-fitting care. (C) The board shall issue a license to practice as an ocularist in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as an ocularist in a state that does not issue that license. (D)(1)(C)(1) Subject to divisions (D)(3)(C)(3) and (4) of this section, the board shall not adopt, maintain, renew, or enforce any rule that precludes an individual from renewing a license as a dispensing optician issued under sections 4725.40 to 4725.59 of the Revised Code due to any past criminal activity or interpretation of moral character, unless the individual has committed a crime of moral turpitude or a disqualifying offense as those terms are defined in section 4776.10 of the Revised Code. If the board denies an individual a license or license renewal, the reasons for such denial shall be put in writing. (2) The board may refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a conviction of or plea of guilty to an offense if the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (3) In considering a renewal of an individual's license, the board shall not consider any conviction or plea of guilty prior to the initial licensing. However, the board may consider a conviction or plea of guilty if it occurred after the individual was initially licensed, or after the most recent license renewal. (4) The board may grant an individual a conditional license that lasts for one year. After the one-year period has expired, the license is no longer considered conditional, and the individual shall be considered fully licensed. (E)(D) The board, subject to the approval of the controlling board, may establish examination fees in excess of the amount established by rule pursuant to this section, provided that such fees do not exceed those amounts established in rule by more than fifty per cent. Sec. 4729.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Pharmacy," except when used in a context that refers to the practice of pharmacy, means any area, room, rooms, place of business, department, or portion of any of the foregoing where the practice of pharmacy is conducted. (B) "Practice of pharmacy" means providing pharmacist care requiring specialized knowledge, judgment, and skill derived from the principles of biological, chemical, behavioral, social, pharmaceutical, and clinical sciences. As used in this division, "pharmacist care" includes the following: (1) Interpreting prescriptions; (2) Dispensing drugs and drug therapy related devices; (3) Compounding drugs; (4) Counseling individuals with regard to their drug therapy, recommending drug therapy related devices, and assisting in the selection of drugs and appliances for treatment of common diseases and injuries and providing instruction in the proper use of the drugs and appliances; (5) Performing drug regimen reviews with individuals by discussing all of the drugs that the individual is taking and explaining the interactions of the drugs; (6) Performing drug utilization reviews with licensed health professionals authorized to prescribe drugs when the pharmacist determines that an individual with a prescription has a drug regimen that warrants additional discussion with the prescriber; (7) Advising an individual and the health care professionals treating an individual with regard to the individual's drug therapy; (8) Acting pursuant to a consult agreement, if an agreement has been established; (9) Engaging in the administration of immunizations to the extent authorized by section 4729.41 of the Revised Code; (10) Engaging in the administration of drugs to the extent authorized by section 4729.45 of the Revised Code. (C) "Compounding" means the preparation, mixing, assembling, packaging, and labeling of one or more drugs in any of the following circumstances: (1) Pursuant to a prescription issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) Pursuant to the modification of a prescription made in accordance with a consult agreement; (3) As an incident to research, teaching activities, or chemical analysis; (4) In anticipation of orders for drugs pursuant to prescriptions, based on routine, regularly observed dispensing patterns; (5) Pursuant to a request made by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs for a drug that is to be used by the professional for the purpose of direct administration to patients in the course of the professional's practice, if all of the following apply: (a) At the time the request is made, the drug is not commercially available regardless of the reason that the drug is not available, including the absence of a manufacturer for the drug or the lack of a readily available supply of the drug from a manufacturer. (b) A limited quantity of the drug is compounded and provided to the professional. (c) The drug is compounded and provided to the professional as an occasional exception to the normal practice of dispensing drugs pursuant to patient-specific prescriptions. (D) "Consult agreement" means an agreement that has been entered into under section 4729.39 of the Revised Code. (E) "Drug" means: (1) Any article recognized in the United States pharmacopoeia and national formulary, or any supplement to them, intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals; (2) Any other article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or animals; (3) Any article, other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of humans or animals; (4) Any article intended for use as a component of any article specified in division (E)(1), (2), or (3) of this section; but does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories. "Drug" does not include "hemp" or a "hemp product" as those terms are defined in section 928.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Dangerous drug" means any of the following: (1) Any drug to which either of the following applies: (a) Under the "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, the drug is required to bear a label containing the legend "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription" or "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian" or any similar restrictive statement, or the drug may be dispensed only upon a prescription; (b) Under Chapter 3715. or 3719. of the Revised Code, the drug may be dispensed only upon a prescription. (2) Any drug that contains a schedule V controlled substance and that is exempt from Chapter 3719. of the Revised Code or to which that chapter does not apply; (3) Any drug intended for administration by injection into the human body other than through a natural orifice of the human body; (4) Any drug that is a biological product, as defined in section 3715.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Federal drug abuse control laws" has the same meaning as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (H) "Prescription" means all of the following: (1) A written, electronic, or oral order for drugs or combinations or mixtures of drugs to be used by a particular individual or for treating a particular animal, issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) For purposes of sections 4723.4810, 4729.282, 4730.432, and 4731.93 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for a drug to treat chlamydia, gonorrhea, or trichomoniasis issued to and in the name of a patient who is not the intended user of the drug but is the sexual partner of the intended user; (3) For purposes of sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 4723.483, 4729.88, 4730.433, 4731.96, and 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for an epinephrine autoinjector issued to and in the name of a school, school district, or camp; (4) For purposes of Chapter 3728. and sections 4723.483, 4729.88, 4730.433, and 4731.96 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for an epinephrine autoinjector issued to and in the name of a qualified entity, as defined in section 3728.01 of the Revised Code; (5) For purposes of sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, 4723.4811, 4730.437, 4731.92, and 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code, a written, electronic, or oral order for injectable or nasally administered glucagon in the name of a school, school district, or camp. (I) "Licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs" or "prescriber" means an individual who is authorized by law to prescribe drugs or dangerous drugs or drug therapy related devices in the course of the individual's professional practice, including only the following: (1) A dentist licensed under Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code; (2) A clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse; (3) A certified registered nurse anesthetist who holds a current, valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code to practice nursing as an advanced practice registered nurse, but only to the extent of the nurse's authority under sections 4723.43 and 4723.434 of the Revised Code; (4) An optometrist licensed under Chapter 4725. of the Revised Code to practice optometry; (5) A physician authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery; (6) A physician assistant who holds a license to practice as a physician assistant issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code, holds a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board, and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority; (7) A veterinarian licensed under Chapter 4741. of the Revised Code; (8) A certified mental health assistant licensed under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code who has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority by the physician supervising the certified mental health assistant. (J) "Sale" or "sell" includes any transaction made by any person, whether as principal proprietor, agent, or employee, to do or offer to do any of the following: deliver, distribute, broker, exchange, gift or otherwise give away, or transfer, whether the transfer is by passage of title, physical movement, or both. (K) "Wholesale sale" and "sale at wholesale" mean any sale in which the purpose of the purchaser is to resell the article purchased or received by the purchaser. (L) "Retail sale" and "sale at retail" mean any sale other than a wholesale sale or sale at wholesale. (M) "Retail seller" means any person that sells any dangerous drug to consumers without assuming control over and responsibility for its administration. Mere advice or instructions regarding administration do not constitute control or establish responsibility. (N) "Price information" means the price charged for a prescription for a particular drug product and, in an easily understandable manner, all of the following: (1) The proprietary name of the drug product; (2) The established (generic) name of the drug product; (3) The strength of the drug product if the product contains a single active ingredient or if the drug product contains more than one active ingredient and a relevant strength can be associated with the product without indicating each active ingredient. The established name and quantity of each active ingredient are required if such a relevant strength cannot be so associated with a drug product containing more than one ingredient. (4) The dosage form; (5) The price charged for a specific quantity of the drug product. The stated price shall include all charges to the consumer, including, but not limited to, the cost of the drug product, professional fees, handling fees, if any, and a statement identifying professional services routinely furnished by the pharmacy. Any mailing fees and delivery fees may be stated separately without repetition. The information shall not be false or misleading. (O) "Wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs" or "wholesale distributor" means a person engaged in the sale of dangerous drugs at wholesale and includes any agent or employee of such a person authorized by the person to engage in the sale of dangerous drugs at wholesale. (P) "Manufacturer of dangerous drugs" or "manufacturer" means a person, other than a pharmacist or prescriber, who manufactures dangerous drugs and who is engaged in the sale of those dangerous drugs. (Q) "Terminal distributor of dangerous drugs" or "terminal distributor" means a person who is engaged in the sale of dangerous drugs at retail, or any person, other than a manufacturer, repackager, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, wholesale distributor, or pharmacist, who has possession, custody, or control of dangerous drugs for any purpose other than for that person's own use and consumption. "Terminal distributor" includes pharmacies, hospitals, nursing homes, and laboratories and all other persons who procure dangerous drugs for sale or other distribution by or under the supervision of a pharmacist, licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, or other person authorized by the state board of pharmacy. (R) "Promote to the public" means disseminating a representation to the public in any manner or by any means, other than by labeling, for the purpose of inducing, or that is likely to induce, directly or indirectly, the purchase of a dangerous drug at retail. (S) "Person" includes any individual, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation, the state, any political subdivision of the state, and any district, department, or agency of the state or its political subdivisions. (T)(1) "Animal shelter" means a facility operated by a humane society or any society organized under Chapter 1717. of the Revised Code or a dog pound operated pursuant to Chapter 955. of the Revised Code. (2) "County dog warden" means a dog warden or deputy dog warden appointed or employed under section 955.12 of the Revised Code. (U) "Food" has the same meaning as in section 3715.01 of the Revised Code. (V) "Pain management clinic" has the same meaning as in section 4731.054 of the Revised Code. (W) "Investigational drug or product" means a drug or product that has successfully completed phase one of the United States food and drug administration clinical trials and remains under clinical trial, but has not been approved for general use by the United States food and drug administration. "Investigational drug or product" does not include controlled substances in schedule I, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (X) "Product," when used in reference to an investigational drug or product, means a biological product, other than a drug, that is made from a natural human, animal, or microorganism source and is intended to treat a disease or medical condition. (Y) "Third-party logistics provider" means a person that provides or coordinates warehousing or other logistics services pertaining to dangerous drugs including distribution, on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale distributor, or terminal distributor of dangerous drugs, but does not take ownership of the drugs or have responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of the drugs. (Z) "Repackager of dangerous drugs" or "repackager" means a person that repacks and relabels dangerous drugs for sale or distribution. (AA) "Outsourcing facility" means a facility that is engaged in the compounding and sale of sterile drugs and is registered as an outsourcing facility with the United States food and drug administration. (BB) "Laboratory" means a laboratory licensed under this chapter as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs and entrusted to have custody of any of the following drugs and to use the drugs for scientific and clinical purposes and for purposes of instruction: dangerous drugs that are not controlled substances, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; dangerous drugs that are controlled substances, as defined in that section; and controlled substances in schedule I, as defined in that section. (CC) "Overdose reversal drug" means both of the following: (1) Naloxone; (2) Any other drug that the state board of pharmacy, through rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, designates as a drug that is approved by the federal food and drug administration for the reversal of a known or suspected opioid-related overdose. Sec. 4729.261. (A) For purposes of division (D)(4)(b) of section 2925.14 of the Revised Code, and subject to division (B) of this section, the state board of pharmacy shall adopt rules establishing standards and procedures for its approval of types of instruments that are not to be considered drug paraphernalia because they demonstrate efficacy in reducing drug poisoning by determining the presence of a specific compound or group of compounds. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B) Under this section, the board shall not approve any type of instrument to the extent that the instrument is intended to measure the purity of a mixture. Sec. 4729.49. (A) As used in this section,: (1) "340B covered entity," "medicaid has the same meaning as in section 3902.70 of the Revised Code. (2) "Medicaid managed care organization," and "third-party administrator" have the same meanings as in section 5167.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A contract between a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs and a 340B covered entity shall require the terminal distributor to comply with division (C) of this section. (C) When paying a 340B covered entity for a dangerous drug dispensed to a patient, a terminal distributor shall pay to the 340B covered entity the full reimbursement amount the terminal distributor receives from the patient and the patient's health insurer, including a third-party administrator or medicaid managed care organization, except that the terminal distributor may deduct from the full reimbursement amount a fee agreed on in writing by the terminal distributor and the 340B covered entity. Sec. 4729.52. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Category II" means any dangerous drug that is not included in category III. (2) "Category III" means any controlled substance that is contained in schedule I, II, III, IV, or V. (3) "Schedule I,""schedule II,""schedule III,""schedule IV," and "schedule V" have the same meanings as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (B)(1)(a) The state board of pharmacy shall license persons seeking to operate as any of the following persons, whether located within or outside this state: (i) Wholesale distributors of dangerous drugs; (ii) Manufacturers of dangerous drugs; (iii) Outsourcing facilities; (iv) Third-party logistics providers; (v) Repackagers of dangerous drugs. (b) There shall be two categories for the licenses When the board issues a license to a person identified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section. The, the license shall be issued according to one of the following categories are as follows, as the case may be for the person's business operations: (i) Category II license. A category II license applies to a person whose business operations are located within this state. A person who obtains this license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute, only the dangerous drugs described in category II. (ii) Category III license. A category III license applies to a person whose business operations are located within this state. A person who obtains this license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute, the dangerous drugs described in category II and the controlled substances described in category III. (iii) Nonresident license. A nonresident license applies to a person whose business operations are located outside this state. One of the following subcategories shall be designated by the board on the license, based on the license holder's business operations: wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs, manufacturer of dangerous drugs, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, or repackager of dangerous drugs. A person who obtains a nonresident license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute the dangerous drugs described in category II and the controlled substances described in category III. (c) The board may adopt rules under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code to create classification types of any license issued pursuant to this section. Persons who meet the definitions of the classification types shall comply with all requirements for the specific license classification specified in rule. (C) A person seeking a license identified in division (B)(1)(a) of issued under this section shall file with the executive director of the board a verified application containing such information as the board requires of the applicant relative to the licensure qualifications set forth in section 4729.53 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that section. (D)(1) The board shall license as issue a category II or category III license, designated for a manufacturer, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, repackager, or wholesale distributor as the case may be, to each applicant who has paid whose business operations are located within this state, if the applicant pays the required license fee, if and the board determines that the applicant meets the licensure qualifications set forth in section 4729.53 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that section. (D)(2) The board may shall issue a nonresident license with the appropriate subcategory designation to a person who does not reside in an applicant whose business operations are located outside this state a license identified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, if the person applicant pays the required licensure license fee and meets the board determines either of the following: (1) Possesses (a) That the applicant possesses a current and valid manufacturer, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, repackager, or wholesale distributor license, or its equivalent, issued by another state in which that person is person's business operations are physically located, but only if that state has qualifications for licensure comparable to the licensure requirements in this state; (2) Meets (b) That the applicant meets the requirements set forth by the board for issuance of a nonresident license identified in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, as verified by a state, federal, or other entity recognized by the board to perform such verification. (E) All licenses issued or renewed pursuant to this section are effective for a period specified by the board in rules adopted under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. The effective period for an initial or renewed license shall not exceed twenty-four months unless the board extends the period in rules to adjust license renewal schedules. A license shall be renewed by the board pursuant to this section, the standard renewal procedure of Chapter 4745. of the Revised Code, and rules adopted by the board under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. A person seeking to renew a license shall submit an application for renewal and pay the required renewal fee before the date specified in the rules adopted by the board. (F) Each license issued under this section shall describe not more than one establishment or place where the license holder may engage in the activities authorized by the license. No license shall authorize or permit the person named therein to engage in the sale or distribution of drugs at wholesale or to maintain possession, custody, or control of dangerous drugs for any purpose other than for the licensee's own use and consumption at any establishment or place other than that described in the license. (G)(1)(a)(G)(1) The category II license fee is one thousand nine hundred dollars and shall accompany each application for licensure. The license renewal fee is one thousand nine hundred dollars and shall accompany each renewal application. (b)(2) The category III license fee is two thousand dollars and shall accompany each application for licensure. The license renewal fee is two thousand dollars and shall accompany each renewal application. (c)(i)(3) The nonresident license fee is two thousand dollars and shall accompany each application for licensure. The license renewal fee is two thousand dollars and shall accompany each renewal application. (H)(1) Subject to division (G)(1)(c)(ii) (H)(2) of this section, a license issued pursuant to this section that has not been renewed by the date specified in rules adopted by the board may be reinstated upon payment of the renewal fee and a penalty of three hundred dollars. (ii)(2) If a complete application for renewal has not been submitted by the sixty-first day after the renewal date specified in rules adopted by the board, the license is considered void and cannot be renewed, but the license holder may reapply for licensure. (2)(I) Renewal fees and penalties assessed under division (G)(1) (G) or (H) of this section shall not be returned if the applicant fails to qualify for renewal. (3)(J) A person licensed pursuant to this section that fails to renew licensure in accordance with this section and rules adopted by the board is prohibited from engaging in manufacturing, repackaging, or compounding drugs, or distributing drugs as a third-party logistics provider or wholesale distributor, until a valid license is issued by the board. (H)(K) Holding a license issued pursuant to this section subjects the holder and the holder's agents and employees to the jurisdiction of the board and to the laws of this state for the purpose of the enforcement of this chapter and the rules of the board. However, the filing of an application for licensure under this section by or on behalf of any person, or the issuance of a license pursuant to this section to or on behalf of any person, shall not of itself constitute evidence that the person is doing business within this state. (I)(L) A person holding a license issued under this section shall designate, and shall have available at all times, a person to serve for the licensed location in a position to be known as "responsible person." A person may be designated and serve as a responsible person only if the person meets the requirements established in rules the board shall adopt under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. Along with the license holder, a responsible person shall accept responsibility for the operation of the licensed location in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws and rules. A license holder shall notify the board of the person who is designated to serve as the responsible person and, thereafter, shall notify the board each time a change is made in the designation. Notice to the board shall be provided in accordance with procedures established in rules that the board shall adopt under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. For any change of responsible person, the board shall assess a fee of fifteen dollars. (M) The board may enter into agreements with other states, federal agencies, and other entities to exchange information concerning licensing and inspection of any manufacturer, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, repackager, or wholesale distributor located within or outside this state and to investigate alleged violations of the laws and rules governing distribution of drugs by such persons. Any information received pursuant to such an agreement is subject to the same confidentiality requirements applicable to the agency or entity from which it was received and shall not be released without prior authorization from that agency or entity. Any information received is also subject to section 4729.23 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4729.53. (A) The state board of pharmacy shall not license any person as a manufacturer of dangerous drugs, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, repackager of dangerous drugs, or wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs unless the applicant for licensure furnishes satisfactory proof to the board that all of the following conditions are met: (1) If the applicant has committed acts that the board finds violate any federal, state, or local law, regulation, or rule relating to drug samples, manufacturing, compounding, repackaging, wholesale or retail drug distribution, or distribution of dangerous drugs, including controlled substances, or if the applicant has committed acts that the board finds constitute a felony, or if a federal, state, or local governmental entity has suspended or revoked any current or prior license of the applicant for the manufacture, compounding, repackaging, distribution, or sale of any dangerous drugs, including controlled substances, the applicant, to the satisfaction of the board, assures that the applicant has in place adequate safeguards to prevent the recurrence of any such violations, felonies, or license suspensions or revocations. (2) The applicant's past experience in the manufacture, compounding, repackaging, or distribution of dangerous drugs, including controlled substances, is acceptable to the board. (3) The applicant is properly equipped as to land, buildings, equipment, and personnel to properly carry on its business, including providing adequate security for and proper storage conditions and handling for dangerous drugs, and is complying with the requirements under this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant thereto for maintaining and making available records to properly identified board officials and federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies. (4) Personnel employed by the applicant have the appropriate education or experience, as determined by the board, to assume responsibility for positions related to compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant thereto. (5) The applicant has designated the name and address of a person to whom communications from the board may be directed and upon whom the notices and citations provided for in section 4729.56 of the Revised Code may be served. (6) Adequate safeguards are assured to prevent the sale of dangerous drugs other than in accordance with section 4729.51 of the Revised Code. (7) With respect to criminal records checks, the applicant has done both of the following, and the board has decided that the results of the criminal records checks do not make the applicant ineligible for a license issued pursuant to section 4729.52 of the Revised Code: (a) Complied The applicant has complied with sections 4776.01 to 4776.04 of the Revised Code;. (b) Required any The applicant has required each of the following to submit to a criminal records check in accordance with section 4776.02 of the Revised Code and send the results of the criminal records check directly to the board: (i) Any person who is seeking to serve as the responsible person on the license, as required by section 4729.52 of the Revised Code; (2) Any person who has an ownership interest, or who is a corporate officer, as set forth in rules adopted under division (C) of this section, to submit to a criminal records check in accordance with section 4776.02 of the Revised Code and send the results of the criminal records check directly to the board. (8) The applicant meets any other requirement or qualification the board, by rule adopted under division (C) of this section, considers relevant to and consistent with the public safety and health. (B) In addition to the causes described in section 4729.56 of the Revised Code for refusing to grant or renew a license, the board may refuse to grant or renew a license if the board determines that the granting of the license or its renewal is not in the public interest. (C) The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that do all of the following: (1) For purposes of division (A)(7)(b) of this section, define "responsible person" and specify the persons with ownership interests and the corporate officers who are required to submit to criminal records checks; (2) For purposes of division (A)(8) of this section, specify other requirements or qualifications, if any, that an applicant must meet to receive a license; (3) Address any other matter the board considers appropriate to implement this section. Sec. 4729.54. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Category II" means any dangerous drug that is not included in category III. (2) "Category III" means any controlled substance that is contained in schedule I, II, III, IV, or V. (3) "Emergency medical service organization" has the same meaning as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Emergency medical service organization satellite" means a location where dangerous drugs are stored that is separate from, but associated with, the headquarters of an emergency medical service organization. "Emergency medical service organization satellite" does not include the units under the control of the emergency medical service organization. (5) "Person" includes an emergency medical service organization or an emergency medical service organization satellite. (6) "Schedule I," "schedule II," "schedule III," "schedule IV," and "schedule V" have the same meanings as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The state board of pharmacy shall license persons seeking to operate as terminal distributors of dangerous drugs, whether located within or outside this state. A person seeking to be licensed as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs shall file with the executive director of the state board of pharmacy a verified application. After it is filed, the application may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (2) An application shall contain all the following that apply in the applicant's case: (a) Information that the board requires relative to the qualifications of a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs set forth in section 4729.55 of the Revised Code; (b) A statement as to whether the category of licensure, identified under division (E) of this section, that the person is seeking to be licensed as a category II, category III, limited category II, or limited category III terminal distributor of dangerous drugs; (c) If the person is seeking to be licensed as a limited category II or limited category III terminal distributor of dangerous drugs, a list of the dangerous drugs described in category II or the controlled substances described in category III that the person is seeking to possess, have custody or control of, and distribute, which list shall also specify the purpose for which those drugs will be used and their source; (d) If the person is an emergency medical service organization, the information that is specified in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section, and if the person is an emergency medical service organization satellite, the information required under division (D) of this section; (e) Except with respect to the units under the control of an emergency medical service organization, the identity of the one establishment or place at which the person intends to engage in the sale or other distribution of dangerous drugs at retail, and maintain possession, custody, or control of dangerous drugs for purposes other than the person's own use or consumption; (f) If the application pertains to a pain management clinic, information that demonstrates, to the satisfaction of the board, compliance with division (A) of section 4729.552 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) Each emergency medical service organization that applies for a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs license shall submit with its application all of the following: (a) A copy of its standing orders or protocol, which orders or protocol shall be signed by a physician; (b) A list of the dangerous drugs that the units under its control may carry, expressed in standard dose units, which shall be signed by a physician; (c) A list of the personnel employed or used by the organization to provide emergency medical services in accordance with Chapter 4765. of the Revised Code. In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall adopt rules specifying when an emergency medical service organization that is licensed as a terminal distributor must notify the board of any changes in its documentation submitted pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section. (2) An emergency medical service organization seeking to be licensed as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs shall list in its application for licensure the following additional information: (a) The units under its control that the organization determines will possess dangerous drugs for the purpose of administering emergency medical services in accordance with Chapter 4765. of the Revised Code; (b) With respect to each such unit, whether the dangerous drugs that the organization determines the unit will possess are in category II or III. (3) An emergency medical service organization that is licensed as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs shall file a new application for such licensure if there is any change in the number or location of any of its units or if there is any change in the category of the dangerous drugs that any unit will possess. (4) A unit listed in an application for licensure pursuant to division (C)(2) of this section may obtain the dangerous drugs it is authorized to possess from its emergency medical service organization or, on a replacement basis, from a hospital pharmacy. If units will obtain dangerous drugs from a hospital pharmacy, the organization shall file, and maintain in current form, the following items with the pharmacist who is responsible for the hospital's terminal distributor of dangerous drugs license: (a) A copy of its standing orders or protocol; (b) A list of the personnel employed or used by the organization to provide emergency medical services in accordance with Chapter 4765. of the Revised Code, who are authorized to possess the drugs, which list also shall indicate the personnel who are authorized to administer the drugs. (D) Each emergency medical service organization satellite that applies for a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs license shall submit with its application all of the information that the board requires to be submitted with the application, as specified in rules the board shall adopt in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (E) There shall be four categories of terminal distributor of dangerous drugs licenses. TheWhen the board issues a license to a person seeking to operate as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs, the board shall issue the license according to one of the following categories are as follows, as the case may be for the person's business operations: (1) Category II license. A category II license applies to a person whose business operations are located within this state. A person who obtains this license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute only the dangerous drugs described in category II. (2) Limited category II license. A limited category II license applies to a person whose business operations are located within this state. A person who obtains this license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute only the dangerous drugs described in category II that were listed in the application for licensure. (3) Category III license, which may include a pain management clinic classification issued under section 4729.552 of the Revised Code. A category III license applies to a person whose business operations are located within this state. A person who obtains this license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute the dangerous drugs described in category II and category III. If the license includes a pain management clinic classification, the person may operate a pain management clinic. (4) Limited category III license. A limited category III license applies to a person whose business operations are located within this state. A person who obtains this license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute only the dangerous drugs described in category II or the controlled substances described in category III that were listed in the application for licensure. (5) Nonresident license. A nonresident license applies to a person whose business operations are located outside this state. A person who obtains a nonresident license may possess, have custody or control of, and distribute the dangerous drugs described in category II and the controlled substances described in category III. (F) Except for an application made by a county dog warden or on behalf of an animal shelter, if an applicant for a limited category II license or limited category III license intends to administer dangerous drugs to a person or animal, the applicant shall submit, with the application, a copy of its protocol or standing orders. The protocol or orders shall be signed by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, specify the dangerous drugs to be administered, and list personnel who are authorized to administer the dangerous drugs in accordance with federal law or the law of this state. An application made by a county dog warden or on behalf of an animal shelter shall include a list of the dangerous drugs to be administered to animals and the personnel who are authorized to administer the drugs to animals in accordance with section 4729.532 of the Revised Code. In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall adopt rules specifying when a licensee must notify the board of any changes in its documentation submitted pursuant to this division. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(3) of this section, each applicant for licensure as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs shall submit, with the application, a license fee in the amount that applies to the category of licensure being sought. The amount assessed shall not be returned to the applicant if the applicant fails to qualify for the license. (2) The following fees apply under division (G)(1) of this section: (a) Except as provided in division (G)(2)(b) of this section: (i) Three hundred twenty sixty dollars for a category II or limited category II license; (ii) Four hundred forty sixty dollars for a category III license, including a license with a pain management clinic classification issued under section 4729.552 of the Revised Code, or a limited category III license; (iii) Five hundred dollars for a nonresident license. (b) One hundred twenty sixty dollars for all of the following whose business operations are located within this state: (i) A person who is required to hold a license as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs pursuant to division (C) of section 4729.541 of the Revised Code; (ii) A professional association, corporation, partnership, or limited liability company organized for the purpose of practicing veterinary medicine that is not included in division (G)(2)(b)(i) of this section; (iii) An emergency medical service organization satellite. (3) No fee applies for a license issued to a charitable pharmacy, as defined in section 3719.811 of the Revised Code, if the charitable pharmacy is participating in the drug repository program established under section 3715.87 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) The board shall issue a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs license, in the appropriate category, to each person who submits an application for such licensure in accordance with this section, pays the required license fee, is determined by the board to meet the requirements set forth in section 4729.55 of the Revised Code, and satisfies any other applicable requirements of this section. (2) Except for the license of a county dog warden, the license shall describe the one establishment or place at which the licensee may engage in the sale or other distribution of dangerous drugs at retail and maintain possession, custody, or control of dangerous drugs for purposes other than the licensee's own use or consumption. The one establishment or place shall be that which is identified in the application for licensure. No such license shall authorize or permit the terminal distributor of dangerous drugs named in it to engage in the sale or other distribution of dangerous drugs at retail or to maintain possession, custody, or control of dangerous drugs for any purpose other than the distributor's own use or consumption, at any establishment or place other than that described in the license, except that an agent or employee of an animal shelter or county dog warden may possess and use dangerous drugs in the course of business as provided in section 4729.532 of the Revised Code. (3) The license of an emergency medical service organization shall cover the organization's headquarters and, in addition, shall cover and describe all the units of the organization listed in its application for licensure. (I)(1) All licenses issued or renewed pursuant to this section shall be effective for a period specified by the board in rules adopted under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. The effective period for an initial or renewed license shall not exceed twenty-four months unless the board extends the period in rules to adjust license renewal schedules. A license shall be renewed by the board according to the provisions of this section, the standard renewal procedure of Chapter 4745. of the Revised Code, and rules adopted by the board under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. A person seeking to renew a license shall submit an application for renewal and pay the required fee on or before the date specified in the rules adopted by the board. The fee required for the renewal of a license shall be the same as the license fee that applies under division (G)(2) of this section. (2)(a) Subject to division (I)(2)(b) of this section, a license that has not been renewed by the date specified in rules adopted by the board may be reinstated only upon payment of the required renewal fee and a penalty fee of one hundred ten dollars. (b) If an application for renewal has not been submitted by the sixty-first day after the renewal date specified in rules adopted by the board, the license is considered void and cannot be renewed, but the license holder may reapply for licensure. (3) A terminal distributor of dangerous drugs that fails to renew licensure in accordance with this section and rules adopted by the board is prohibited from engaging in the retail sale, possession, or distribution of dangerous drugs until a valid license is issued by the board. (J)(1) No emergency medical service organization that is licensed as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs shall fail to comply with division (C)(1), (3), or (4) of this section. (2) No licensed terminal distributor of dangerous drugs shall possess, have custody or control of, or distribute dangerous drugs that the terminal distributor is not entitled to possess, have custody or control of, or distribute by virtue of its category of licensure. (3) No licensee that is required by division (F) of this section to notify the board of changes in its protocol or standing orders, or in personnel, shall fail to comply with that division. (K) A person holding a license issued under this section shall designate, and shall have available at all times, a person to serve for the licensed location in a position to be known as "responsible person." A person may be designated and serve as a responsible person only if the person meets the requirements established in rules that the board shall adopt under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. Along with the license holder, a responsible person shall accept responsibility for the operation of the licensed location in accordance with all applicable state and federal laws and rules. A license holder shall notify the board of the person who is designated to serve as the responsible person and, thereafter, shall notify the board each time a change is made in the designation. Notice to the board shall be provided in accordance with procedures established in rules that the board shall adopt under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. For any change of responsible person, the board shall assess a fee of fifteen dollars. (L) The board may enter into agreements with other states, federal agencies, and other entities to exchange information concerning licensing and inspection of terminal distributors of dangerous drugs located within or outside this state and to investigate alleged violations of the laws and rules governing distribution of drugs by terminal distributors. Any information received pursuant to such an agreement is subject to the same confidentiality requirements applicable to the agency or entity from which it was received and shall not be released without prior authorization from that agency or entity. Any information received is also subject to section 4729.23 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4729.541. (A) Except as provided in divisions (B) and (C) of this section, all of the following are exempt from licensure as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs: (1) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs; (2) A business entity that is a corporation formed under division (B) of section 1701.03 of the Revised Code, a limited liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, or Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, or a professional association formed under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code if the entity has a sole shareholder who is a prescriber and is authorized to provide the professional services being offered by the entity; (3) A business entity that is a corporation formed under division (B) of section 1701.03 of the Revised Code, a limited liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, or Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, a partnership or a limited liability partnership formed under Chapter 1775. of the Revised Code, or a professional association formed under Chapter 1785. of the Revised Code, if, to be a shareholder, member, or partner, an individual is required to be licensed, certified, or otherwise legally authorized under Title XLVII of the Revised Code to perform the professional service provided by the entity and each such individual is a prescriber; (4) An individual who holds a current license, certificate, or registration issued under Title XLVII of the Revised Code and has been certified to conduct diabetes education by a national certifying body specified in rules adopted by the state board of pharmacy under section 4729.68 of the Revised Code, but only with respect to insulin that will be used for the purpose of diabetes education and only if diabetes education is within the individual's scope of practice under statutes and rules regulating the individual's profession; (5) An individual who holds a valid certificate issued by a nationally recognized S.C.U.B.A. diving certifying organization approved by the state board of pharmacy under rules adopted by the board, but only with respect to medical oxygen that will be used for the purpose of emergency care or treatment at the scene of a diving emergency; (6) With respect to epinephrine autoinjectors that may be possessed under section 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, or 3328.29 of the Revised Code, any of the following: the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (7) With respect to epinephrine autoinjectors that may be possessed under section 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code, any of the following: a residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (8) With respect to epinephrine autoinjectors that may be possessed under Chapter 3728. of the Revised Code, a qualified entity, as defined in section 3728.01 of the Revised Code; (9) With respect to inhalers that may be possessed under section 3313.7113, 3313.7114, 3314.144, 3326.30, or 3328.30 of the Revised Code, any of the following: the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (10) With respect to inhalers that may be possessed under section 5101.77 5180.261 of the Revised Code, any of the following: a residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (11) With respect to overdose reversal drugs that may be possessed for the purposes described in section 3715.50 of the Revised Code, any person or government entity exercising the authority conferred by that section; (12) With respect to overdose reversal drugs that may be possessed for use in personally furnishing supplies of the drug pursuant to a protocol established under section 3715.503 of the Revised Code, any individual exercising the authority conferred by that section; (13) With respect to injectable or nasally administered glucagon that may be possessed under sections 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, and 3328.38 of the Revised Code, any of the following: the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school; a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; or a college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (14) With respect to injectable or nasally administered glucagon that may be possessed under section 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code, any of the following: a residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code; (15) A person who possesses nitrous oxide for use as a direct ingredient in food pursuant to 21 C.F.R. 184.1545 or for testing or maintaining a plumbing or heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system; (16) A person who possesses medical oxygen, sterile water, or sterile saline for direct administration to patients or for the purpose of installation or maintenance of home medical equipment, as defined in section 4752.01 of the Revised Code; (17) A facility that is owned and operated by the United States department of defense, the United States department of veterans affairs, or any other federal agency. (B) If a person described in division (A) of this section is a pain management clinic or is operating a pain management clinic, the person shall hold a license as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs with a pain management clinic classification issued under section 4729.552 of the Revised Code. (C) Any of the persons described in divisions (A)(1) to (16) of this section shall hold a license as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs in order to possess, have custody or control of, and distribute any of the following: (1) Dangerous drugs that are compounded or used for the purpose of compounding; (2) A schedule I, II, III, IV, or V controlled substance, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4729.56. (A)(1) The state board of pharmacy, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may impose any one or more of the following sanctions on a person licensed under division (B)(1)(a) of section 4729.52 of the Revised Code for any of the causes set forth in division (A)(2) of this section: (a) Suspend, revoke, restrict, limit, or refuse to grant or renew a license; (b) Reprimand or place the license holder on probation; (c) Impose a monetary penalty or forfeiture not to exceed in severity any fine designated under the Revised Code for a similar offense or two thousand five hundred dollars if the acts committed are not classified as an offense by the Revised Code; (2) The board may impose the sanctions set forth in division (A)(1) of this section for any of the following: (a) Making any false material statements in an application for licensure under section 4729.52 of the Revised Code; (b) Violating any federal, state, or local drug law; any provision of this chapter or Chapter 2925., 3715., or 3719. of the Revised Code; or any rule of the board; (c) A conviction of a felony; (d) Failing to satisfy the qualifications for licensure under section 4729.53 of the Revised Code or the rules of the board or ceasing to satisfy the qualifications after the registration is granted or renewed; (e) Falsely or fraudulently promoting to the public a drug that is a controlled substance included in schedule I, II, III, IV, or V, except that nothing in this division prohibits a manufacturer, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, repackager, or wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs from furnishing information concerning a controlled substance to a health care provider or licensed terminal distributor; (f) Violating any provision of the "Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C. 301, or Chapter 3715. of the Revised Code; (g) Any other cause for which the board may impose sanctions as set forth in rules adopted under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon the suspension or revocation of any license identified in division (B)(1)(a) of issued under section 4729.52 of the Revised Code, the licensee shall immediately surrender the license to the board. (C) If the board suspends, revokes, or refuses to renew any license identified in division (B)(1)(a) of issued under section 4729.52 of the Revised Code and determines that there is clear and convincing evidence of a danger of immediate and serious harm to any person, the board may place under seal all dangerous drugs owned by or in the possession, custody, or control of the affected licensee. Except as provided in this division, the board shall not dispose of the dangerous drugs sealed under this division until the licensee exhausts all of the licensee's appeal rights under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The court involved in such an appeal may order the board, during the pendency of the appeal, to sell sealed dangerous drugs that are perishable. The board shall deposit the proceeds of the sale with the court. (D) If the board is required under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of an opportunity for a hearing and the license holder does not make a timely request for a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may impose any of the sanctions listed in division (A) of this section. (E) Notwithstanding division (D)(2) of section 2953.32 or division (F)(1) of section 2953.39 of the Revised Code specifying that if records pertaining to a criminal case are sealed or expunged under that section the proceedings in the case must be deemed not to have occurred, sealing or expungement of the following records on which the board has based an action under this section shall have no effect on the board's action or any sanction imposed by the board under this section: records of any conviction, guilty plea, judicial finding of guilt resulting from a plea of no contest, or a judicial finding of eligibility for a pretrial diversion program or intervention in lieu of conviction. The board is not required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. Sec. 4729.561. If the state board of pharmacy determines that there is clear and convincing evidence that the method used by a licensed manufacturer of dangerous drugs, outsourcing facility, third-party logistics provider, repackager of dangerous drugs, or wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs to possess or distribute dangerous drugs by a person licensed under section 4729.52 of the Revised Code presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to others, the board may suspend without a hearing the person's license issued pursuant to that section 4729.52 of the Revised Code. The board shall follow the procedure for suspension without a prior hearing in section 119.07 of the Revised Code. The suspension shall remain in effect, unless removed by the board, until the board's final adjudication order becomes effective, except that if the board does not issue its final adjudication order within one hundred twenty days after the suspension, the suspension shall be void on the one hundred twenty-first day after the suspension. Sec. 4729.60. (A)(1) Before a licensee identified in division (B)(1)(a) of person licensed under section 4729.52 of the Revised Code may sell or distribute dangerous drugs at wholesale to any person, except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the licensee shall query the roster established pursuant to section 4729.59 of the Revised Code to determine whether the purchaser is a licensed terminal distributor of dangerous drugs. If no documented query is conducted before a sale is made, it shall be presumed that the sale of dangerous drugs by the licensee is in violation of division (B) of section 4729.51 of the Revised Code and the purchase of dangerous drugs by the purchaser is in violation of division (E) of section 4729.51 of the Revised Code. If a licensee conducts a documented query and relies on the results of the query in selling or distributing dangerous drugs at wholesale to the terminal distributor of dangerous drugs, the licensee shall be deemed not to have violated division (B) of section 4729.51 of the Revised Code in making the sale. (2) Division (A)(1) of this section does not apply when a licensee identified in division (B)(1)(a) of person licensed under section 4729.52 of the Revised Code sells or distributes dangerous drugs at wholesale to any of the following: (a) A person specified in division (B)(4) of section 4729.51 of the Revised Code; (b) A person exempt from licensure as a terminal distributor of dangerous drugs under section 4729.541 of the Revised Code. (B) Before a licensed terminal distributor of dangerous drugs may purchase dangerous drugs at wholesale, the terminal distributor shall query the roster established pursuant to section 4729.59 of the Revised Code to confirm the seller is licensed to engage in the sale or distribution of dangerous drugs at wholesale. If no documented query is conducted before a purchase is made, it shall be presumed that the purchase of dangerous drugs by the terminal distributor is in violation of division (F) of section 4729.51 of the Revised Code and the sale of dangerous drugs by the seller is in violation of division (A) of section 4729.51 of the Revised Code. If a licensed terminal distributor of dangerous drugs conducts a documented query at least annually and relies on the results of the query in purchasing dangerous drugs at wholesale, the terminal distributor shall be deemed not to have violated division (F) of section 4729.51 of the Revised Code in making the purchase. Sec. 4729.80. (A) If the state board of pharmacy establishes and maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code, the board is authorized or required to provide information from the database only as follows: (1) On receipt of a request from a designated representative of a government entity responsible for the licensure, regulation, or discipline of health care professionals with authority to prescribe, administer, or dispense drugs, the board may provide to the representative information from the database relating to the professional who is the subject of an active investigation being conducted by the government entity or relating to a professional who is acting as an expert witness for the government entity in such an investigation. (2) On receipt of a request from a federal officer, or a state or local officer of this or any other state, whose duties include enforcing laws relating to drugs, the board shall provide to the officer information from the database relating to the person who is the subject of an active investigation of a drug abuse offense, as defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code, being conducted by the officer's employing government entity. (3) Pursuant to a subpoena issued by a grand jury, the board shall provide to the grand jury information from the database relating to the person who is the subject of an investigation being conducted by the grand jury. (4) Pursuant to a subpoena, search warrant, or court order in connection with the investigation or prosecution of a possible or alleged criminal offense, the board shall provide information from the database as necessary to comply with the subpoena, search warrant, or court order. (5) On receipt of a request from a prescriber or the prescriber's delegate approved by the board, the board shall provide to the prescriber a report of information from the database relating to a patient who is either a current patient of the prescriber or a potential patient of the prescriber based on a referral of the patient to the prescriber, if all of the following conditions are met: (a) The prescriber certifies in a form specified by the board that it is for the purpose of providing medical treatment to the patient who is the subject of the request; (b) The prescriber has not been denied access to the database by the board. (6) On receipt of a request from a pharmacist or the pharmacist's delegate approved by the board, the board shall provide to the pharmacist information from the database relating to a current patient of the pharmacist, if the pharmacist certifies in a form specified by the board that it is for the purpose of the pharmacist's practice of pharmacy involving the patient who is the subject of the request and the pharmacist has not been denied access to the database by the board. (7) On receipt of a request from an individual seeking the individual's own database information in accordance with the procedure established in rules adopted under section 4729.84 of the Revised Code, the board may provide to the individual the individual's own prescription history. (8) On receipt of a request from a medical director or a pharmacy director of a managed care organization that has entered into a contract with the department of medicaid under section 5167.10 of the Revised Code and a data security agreement with the board required by section 5167.14 of the Revised Code, the board shall provide to the medical director or the pharmacy director information from the database relating to a medicaid recipient enrolled in the managed care organization, including information in the database related to prescriptions for the recipient that were not covered or reimbursed under a program administered by the department of medicaid. (9) On receipt of a request from the medicaid director, the board shall provide to the director information from the database relating to a recipient of a program administered by the department of medicaid, including information in the database related to prescriptions for the recipient that were not covered or paid by a program administered by the department. (10) On receipt of a request from a medical director of a managed care organization that has entered into a contract with the administrator of workers' compensation under division (B)(4) of section 4121.44 of the Revised Code and a data security agreement with the board required by section 4121.447 of the Revised Code, the board shall provide to the medical director information from the database relating to a claimant under Chapter 4121., 4123., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code assigned to the managed care organization, including information in the database related to prescriptions for the claimant that were not covered or reimbursed under Chapter 4121., 4123., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code, if the administrator of workers' compensation confirms, upon request from the board, that the claimant is assigned to the managed care organization. (11) On receipt of a request from the administrator of workers' compensation, the board shall provide to the administrator information from the database relating to a claimant under Chapter 4121., 4123., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code, including information in the database related to prescriptions for the claimant that were not covered or reimbursed under Chapter 4121., 4123., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code. (12) On receipt of a request from a prescriber or the prescriber's delegate approved by the board, the board shall provide to the prescriber information from the database relating to a patient's mother, if the prescriber certifies in a form specified by the board that it is for the purpose of providing medical treatment to a newborn or infant patient diagnosed as opioid dependent and the prescriber has not been denied access to the database by the board. (13) On receipt of a request from the director of health, the board shall provide to the director information from the database relating to the duties of the director or the department of health in implementing the Ohio violent death reporting system established under section 3701.93 of the Revised Code. (14) On receipt of a request from a requestor described in division (A)(1), (2), (5), or (6) of this section who is from or participating with another state's prescription monitoring program, the board may provide to the requestor information from the database, but only if there is a written agreement under which the information is to be used and disseminated according to the laws of this state. (15) On receipt of a request from a delegate of a retail dispensary licensed under Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code who is approved by the board to serve as the dispensary's delegate, the board shall provide to the delegate a report of information from the database pertaining only to a patient's use of medical marijuana, if both of the following conditions are met: (a) The delegate certifies in a form specified by the board that it is for the purpose of dispensing medical marijuana for use in accordance with Chapter 3796. of the Revised Code. (b) The retail dispensary or delegate has not been denied access to the database by the board. (16) On receipt of a request from a judge of a program certified by the Ohio supreme court as a specialized docket program for drugs, the board shall provide to the judge, or an employee of the program who is designated by the judge to receive the information, information from the database that relates specifically to a current or prospective program participant. (17) On receipt of a request from a coroner, deputy coroner, or coroner's delegate approved by the board, the board shall provide to the requestor information from the database relating to a deceased person about whom the coroner is conducting or has conducted an autopsy or investigation. (18) On receipt of a request from a prescriber, the board may provide to the prescriber a summary of the prescriber's prescribing record if such a record is created by the board. Information in the summary is subject to the confidentiality requirements of this chapter. (19)(a)(19) On receipt of a request from a pharmacy's responsible person designated under section 4729.54 of the Revised Code, the board may provide to the responsible person a summary of the pharmacy's dispensing record if such a record is created by the board. Information in the summary is subject to the confidentiality requirements of this chapter. (b) As used in division (A)(19)(a) of this section, "responsible person" has the same meaning as in rules adopted by the board under section 4729.26 of the Revised Code. (20) The board may provide information from the database without request to a prescriber or pharmacist who is authorized to use the database pursuant to this chapter. (21)(a) On receipt of a request from a prescriber or pharmacist, or the prescriber's or pharmacist's delegate, who is a designated representative of a peer review committee, the board shall provide to the committee information from the database relating to a prescriber who is subject to the committee's evaluation, supervision, or discipline if the information is to be used for one of those purposes. The board shall provide only information that it determines, in accordance with rules adopted under section 4729.84 of the Revised Code, is appropriate to be provided to the committee. (b) As used in division (A)(21)(a) of this section, "peer review committee" has the same meaning as in section 2305.25 of the Revised Code, except that it includes only a peer review committee of a hospital or a peer review committee of a nonprofit health care corporation that is a member of the hospital or of which the hospital is a member. (22) On receipt of a request from a requestor described in division (A)(5) or (6) of this section who is from or participating with a prescription monitoring program that is operated by a federal agency and approved by the board, the board may provide to the requestor information from the database, but only if there is a written agreement under which the information is to be used and disseminated according to the laws of this state. (23) Any personal health information submitted to the board pursuant to section 4729.772 of the Revised Code may be provided by the board only as authorized by the submitter of the information and in accordance with rules adopted under section 4729.84 of the Revised Code. (24) On receipt of a request from a person described in division (A)(5), (6), or (17) of this section who is participating in a drug overdose fatality review committee described in section 307.631 of the Revised Code, the board may provide to the requestor information from the database, but only if there is a written agreement under which the information is to be used and disseminated according to the laws of this state. (25) On receipt of a request from a person described in division (A)(5), (6), or (17) of this section who is participating in a suicide fatality review committee described in section 307.641 of the Revised Code, the board may provide to the requestor information from the database, but only if there is a written agreement under which the information is to be used and disseminated according to the laws of this state. (26) On receipt of a request from a designated representative of the division of marijuana control in the department of commerce, the board shall provide to the representative information from the database relating to an individual who, or entity that, is the subject of an active investigation being conducted by the division. (B) The state board of pharmacy shall maintain a record of each individual or entity that requests information from the database pursuant to this section. In accordance with rules adopted under section 4729.84 of the Revised Code, the board may use the records to document and report statistics and law enforcement outcomes. The board may provide records of an individual's requests for database information only to the following: (1) A designated representative of a government entity that is responsible for the licensure, regulation, or discipline of health care professionals with authority to prescribe, administer, or dispense drugs who is involved in an active criminal or disciplinary investigation being conducted by the government entity of the individual who submitted the requests for database information; (2) A federal officer, or a state or local officer of this or any other state, whose duties include enforcing laws relating to drugs and who is involved in an active investigation being conducted by the officer's employing government entity of the individual who submitted the requests for database information; (3) A designated representative of the department of medicaid regarding a prescriber who is treating or has treated a recipient of a program administered by the department and who submitted the requests for database information. (C) Information contained in the database and any information obtained from it is confidential and is not a public record. Information contained in the records of requests for information from the database is confidential and is not a public record. Information contained in the database that does not identify a person, including any licensee or registrant of the board or other entity, may be released in summary, statistical, or aggregate form. (D) A pharmacist or prescriber shall not be held liable in damages to any person in any civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property on the basis that the pharmacist or prescriber did or did not seek or obtain information from the database. Sec. 4729.901. (A) An applicant for registration under section 4729.90 of the Revised Code shall file with the state board of pharmacy an application in the form and manner prescribed in rules adopted under section 4729.94 of the Revised Code. The application shall be accompanied by an application fee of fifty sixty-five dollars, which shall not be returned if the applicant fails to qualify for registration. (B) If the board is satisfied that the applicant meets the requirements of section 4729.90 of the Revised Code and any additional requirements established by the board and determines that the results of a criminal records check do not make the applicant ineligible, the board shall register the applicant as a registered pharmacy technician or certified pharmacy technician, as applicable. (C) The board shall register as a registered pharmacy technician or certified pharmacy technician, as applicable, in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code an applicant if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant holds a license or is registered in another state. (2) The applicant has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a pharmacy technician in a state that does not issue that license or registration. (D) Registration under division (B) or (C) of this section as a registered pharmacy technician or certified pharmacy technician is valid for the a two-year period, unless a different period is specified by the board in rules adopted under section 4729.94 of the Revised Code. The period shall not exceed twenty-four months unless the board extends the period in the rules to account for initial registration, adjust license registration renewal schedules, or to accommodate other matters the board considers appropriate. Sec. 4729.902. (A) A registered pharmacy technician or certified pharmacy technician shall file an application for biennial registration renewal in the form and manner prescribed by the state board of pharmacy in rules adopted under section 4729.94 of the Revised Code. Registrations shall be renewed in accordance with the rules and the standard renewal procedure set forth in Chapter 4745. of the Revised Code. The biennial renewal fee is twenty-five sixty-five dollars per year. (B)(1) A registered pharmacy technician or certified pharmacy technician who fails to renew registration in accordance with division (A) of this section is prohibited from engaging in the activities authorized by section 4729.91 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) A registration that is not renewed by a date determined under division (A) of this section but has not lapsed for more than ninety days may be reinstated if the applicant does both of the following: (i) Submits a renewal application in a form prescribed by the board in rules adopted under section 4729.94 of the Revised Code; (ii) Pays the renewal fee and a late fee of fifty dollars. (b) A registration that has lapsed for more than ninety days cannot be renewed, but the registration holder may reapply for registration. Sec. 4729.921. (A) An applicant for registration as a pharmacy technician trainee shall file with the state board of pharmacy an application in the form and manner prescribed in rules adopted under section 4729.94 of the Revised Code. The application shall by accompanied by an application fee of twenty-five forty dollars, which shall not be returned if the applicant fails to qualify for registration. If the board is satisfied that an applicant meets the requirements of section 4729.92 of the Revised Code and any additional requirements established by the board and determines that the results of a criminal records check do not make the applicant ineligible, the board shall register the applicant as a pharmacy technician trainee. (B)(1) The board shall register as a pharmacy technician trainee in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code an applicant who either holds a license or is registered in another state or has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a pharmacy technician trainee in a state that does not issue that license or registration. (2) The board may register as a pharmacy technician trainee an applicant who is seventeen years of age if either of the following apply: (a) The applicant possesses a high school diploma or certificate of high school equivalence; (b) The applicant does not possess a high school diploma or certificate of high school equivalence but is enrolled in a career-technical school program that is approved by the board and conducted by a city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district. (C) The board shall not refuse to register an applicant as a pharmacy technician trainee because of a conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (D) Registration is valid for one year eighteen months from the date of registration, except that the board may extend the time period for which registration is valid. Registration is not renewable, but an individual may reapply for registration if the individual's previous registration has lapsed for more than five years or the board grants its approval. Sec. 4730.25. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may refuse to grant a license to practice as a physician assistant to, or may revoke the license held by, an individual found by the board to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) Except as provided in division (N) of this section, the board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice as a physician assistant or prescriber number, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Failure to practice in accordance with the supervising physician's supervision agreement with the physician assistant, including, if applicable, the policies of the health care facility in which the supervising physician and physician assistant are practicing; (2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or any rules adopted by the board; (3) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or the rules adopted by the board; (4) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (5) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (6) Administering drugs for purposes other than those authorized under this chapter; (7) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in soliciting or advertising for employment as a physician assistant; in connection with any solicitation or advertisement for patients; in relation to the practice of medicine as it pertains to physician assistants; or in securing or attempting to secure a license to practice as a physician assistant. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) Representing, with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage personally or for any other person, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured; (10) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or anything of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (11) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (12) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (14) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (15) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (17) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for violating any state or federal law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug, including trafficking in drugs; (18) Any of the following actions taken by the state agency responsible for regulating the practice of physician assistants in another state, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (19) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar physician assistants under the same or similar circumstances, regardless of whether actual injury to a patient is established; (20) Violation of the conditions placed by the board on a license to practice as a physician assistant; (21) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (22) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under section 4730.26 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board at a deposition or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (23) Assisting suicide, as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code; (24) Prescribing any drug or device to perform or induce an abortion, or otherwise performing or inducing an abortion; (25) Failure to comply with section 4730.53 of the Revised Code, unless the board no longer maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code; (26) Failure to comply with the requirements in section 3719.061 of the Revised Code before issuing for a minor a prescription for an opioid analgesic, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; (27) Having certification by the national commission on certification of physician assistants or a successor organization expire, lapse, or be suspended or revoked; (28) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of clinical privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs or the termination or suspension of a certificate of registration to prescribe drugs by the drug enforcement administration of the United States department of justice; (29) Failure to comply with terms of a consult agreement entered into with a pharmacist pursuant to section 4729.39 of the Revised Code; (30) Violation of section 4730.57 of the Revised Code. (C) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with a physician assistant or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. (D) For purposes of divisions (B)(12), (15), and (16) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board shall have no jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board shall have jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court issues an order of dismissal upon technical or procedural grounds. (E) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect upon a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or upon the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (F) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license issued under this chapter, or applies for a license issued under this chapter, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(4) of this section, the board, upon a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who holds, or has applied for, a license issued under this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental examination, physical examination, including an HIV test, or both a mental and physical examination. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds a physician assistant unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(4) of this section, the board shall require the physician assistant to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license. An individual affected under this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(5) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license issued under this chapter or any applicant for a license suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the physician assistant shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice or prescribing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired physician assistant resumes practice or prescribing, the board shall require continued monitoring of the physician assistant. The monitoring shall include compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, upon termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the physician assistant has maintained sobriety. (G)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend the individual's license without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine that there is clear and convincing evidence that a physician assistant has violated division (B) of this section and that the individual's continued practice or prescribing presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court with a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, upon review of those allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the physician assistant requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the physician assistant requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the license holder. (3) A summary suspension imposed under this division (G)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (H) If the board takes action under division (B)(11), (13), or (14) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. Upon receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the individual's license. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions identified under division (B) of this section. (I) The license to practice issued to a physician assistant and the physician assistant's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the physician assistant pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another state for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall notify the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license to practice. (J) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In that final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (K) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the physician assistant's license may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (L) When the board refuses to grant or issue to an applicant a license to practice as a physician assistant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold the license and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (M) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license issued under this chapter is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license in accordance with section 4730.14 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4730.141 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. (N) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a conviction, plea of guilty, judicial finding of guilt, judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, or the commission of an act that constitutes a criminal offense, unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4730.433. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician assistant who holds a license issued under this chapter and a valid prescriber number issued by the state medical board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom epinephrine may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code. (2) An epinephrine autoinjector personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A physician assistant who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which an epinephrine autoinjector is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4730.437. (A)(1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician assistant who holds a valid prescriber number issued by the board and has been granted physician-delegated prescriptive authority may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom glucagon may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for injectable or nasally administered glucagon in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code. (2) Injectable or nasally administered glucagon personally furnished or prescribed under division (A)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (B) A physician assistant who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which injectable or nasally administered glucagon is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4730.99. (A) Whoever violates section 4730.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1), (C)(1), (C)(2), (D), or (E) of section 4730.32 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense; on each subsequent offense the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree, except that an individual guilty of a subsequent offense shall not be subject to imprisonment, but to a fine alone of up to one thousand dollars for each offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C)(3) of section 4730.32 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C) Whoever violates division (F) of section 4730.26 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4731.22. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, may limit, revoke, or suspend a license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend, refuse to grant a license or certificate, refuse to renew a license or certificate, refuse to reinstate a license or certificate, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license or certificate if the individual applying for or holding the license or certificate is found by the board to have committed fraud during the administration of the examination for a license or certificate to practice or to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for, renewing, or securing any license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend issued by the board. (B) Except as provided in division (P) of this section, the board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend a license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend, refuse to issue a license or certificate, refuse to renew a license or certificate, refuse to reinstate a license or certificate, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license or certificate for one or more of the following reasons: (1) Permitting one's name or one's license or certificate to practice to be used by a person, group, or corporation when the individual concerned is not actually directing the treatment given; (2) Failure to maintain minimal standards applicable to the selection or administration of drugs, or failure to employ acceptable scientific methods in the selection of drugs or other modalities for treatment of disease; (3) Except as provided in section 4731.97 of the Revised Code, selling, giving away, personally furnishing, prescribing, or administering drugs for other than legal and legitimate therapeutic purposes or a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction of, a violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug; (4) Willfully betraying a professional confidence. For purposes of this division, "willfully betraying a professional confidence" does not include providing any information, documents, or reports under sections 307.621 to 307.629 of the Revised Code to a child fatality review board; does not include providing any information, documents, or reports under sections 307.631 to 307.6410 of the Revised Code to a drug overdose fatality review committee, a suicide fatality review committee, or hybrid drug overdose fatality and suicide fatality review committee; does not include providing any information, documents, or reports under sections 307.651 to 307.659 of the Revised Code to a domestic violence fatality review board; does not include providing any information, documents, or reports to the director of health pursuant to guidelines established under section 3701.70 of the Revised Code; does not include written notice to a mental health professional under section 4731.62 of the Revised Code; does not include making a report as described in division (F) of section 2921.22 and section 4731.224 of the Revised Code; and does not include the making of a report of an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or a report of a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee as described in division (B) of section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division affects the immunity from civil liability conferred by section 2305.33 or 4731.62 of the Revised Code upon a physician who makes a report in accordance with section 2305.33 or notifies a mental health professional in accordance with section 4731.62 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. (5) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in the solicitation of or advertising for patients; in relation to the practice of medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, podiatric medicine and surgery, or a limited branch of medicine; or in securing or attempting to secure any license or certificate to practice issued by the board. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (6) A departure from, or the failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances, whether or not actual injury to a patient is established; (7) Representing, with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage as personal gain or for any other person, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured; (8) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or anything of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (9) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (10) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (11) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (12) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (14) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (15) Violation of the conditions of limitation placed by the board upon a license or certificate to practice; (16) Failure to pay license renewal fees specified in this chapter; (17) Except as authorized in section 4731.31 of the Revised Code, engaging in the division of fees for referral of patients, or the receiving of a thing of value in return for a specific referral of a patient to utilize a particular service or business; (18) Subject to section 4731.226 of the Revised Code, violation of any provision of a code of ethics of the American medical association, the American osteopathic association, the American podiatric medical association, or any other national professional organizations that the board specifies by rule. The state medical board shall obtain and keep on file current copies of the codes of ethics of the various national professional organizations. The individual whose license or certificate is being suspended or revoked shall not be found to have violated any provision of a code of ethics of an organization not appropriate to the individual's profession. For purposes of this division, a "provision of a code of ethics of a national professional organization" does not include any provision that would preclude the making of a report by a physician of an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or of a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee as described in division (B) of section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division affects the immunity from civil liability conferred by that section upon a physician who makes either type of report in accordance with division (B) of that section. As used in this division, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. (19) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including, but not limited to, physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills. In enforcing this division, the board, upon a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who is authorized to practice by this chapter or who has submitted an application pursuant to this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental examination, physical examination, including an HIV test, or both a mental and a physical examination. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds an individual unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in this division, the board shall require the individual to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed authority to practice. An individual affected under this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the provisions of the individual's license or certificate. For the purpose of this division, any individual who applies for or receives a license or certificate to practice under this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state and, by so doing, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (20) Except as provided in division (F)(1)(b) of section 4731.282 of the Revised Code or when civil penalties are imposed under section 4731.225 of the Revised Code, and subject to section 4731.226 of the Revised Code, violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provisions of this chapter or any rule promulgated by the board. This division does not apply to a violation or attempted violation of, assisting in or abetting the violation of, or a conspiracy to violate, any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted by the board that would preclude the making of a report by a physician of an employee's use of a drug of abuse, or of a condition of an employee other than one involving the use of a drug of abuse, to the employer of the employee as described in division (B) of section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division affects the immunity from civil liability conferred by that section upon a physician who makes either type of report in accordance with division (B) of that section. As used in this division, "employee," "employer," and "physician" have the same meanings as in section 2305.33 of the Revised Code. (21) The violation of section 3701.79 of the Revised Code or of any abortion rule adopted by the director of health pursuant to section 3701.341 of the Revised Code; (22) Any of the following actions taken by an agency responsible for authorizing, certifying, or regulating an individual to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services in this state or another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (23) The violation of section 2919.12 of the Revised Code or the performance or inducement of an abortion upon a pregnant woman with actual knowledge that the conditions specified in division (B) of section 2317.56 of the Revised Code have not been satisfied or with a heedless indifference as to whether those conditions have been satisfied, unless an affirmative defense as specified in division (H)(2) of that section would apply in a civil action authorized by division (H)(1) of that section; (24) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of clinical privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs or the termination or suspension of a certificate of registration to prescribe drugs by the drug enforcement administration of the United States department of justice; (25) Termination or suspension from participation in the medicare or medicaid programs by the department of health and human services or other responsible agency; (26) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice. For the purposes of this division, any individual authorized to practice by this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state subject to supervision by the board. By filing an application for or holding a license or certificate to practice under this chapter, an individual shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when ordered to do so by the board in writing, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute privileged communications. If it has reason to believe that any individual authorized to practice by this chapter or any applicant for licensure or certification to practice suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician who is qualified to conduct the examination and who is approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or certificate or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed licensure or certification to practice, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license or certificate suspended under this division, the impaired practitioner shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care under the provisions of the practitioner's license or certificate. The demonstration shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making the assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license or certificate suspended under this division after that demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired practitioner resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the individual. The monitoring shall include, but not be limited to, compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, upon termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of perjury stating whether the individual has maintained sobriety. (27) A second or subsequent violation of section 4731.66 or 4731.69 of the Revised Code; (28) Except as provided in division (N) of this section: (a) Waiving the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers the individual's services, otherwise would be required to pay if the waiver is used as an enticement to a patient or group of patients to receive health care services from that individual; (b) Advertising that the individual will waive the payment of all or any part of a deductible or copayment that a patient, pursuant to a health insurance or health care policy, contract, or plan that covers the individual's services, otherwise would be required to pay. (29) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (30) Failure to provide notice to, and receive acknowledgment of the notice from, a patient when required by section 4731.143 of the Revised Code prior to providing nonemergency professional services, or failure to maintain that notice in the patient's medical record; (31) Failure of a physician supervising a physician assistant to maintain supervision in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that chapter; (32) Failure of a physician or podiatrist to enter into a standard care arrangement with a clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse-midwife, or certified nurse practitioner with whom the physician or podiatrist is in collaboration pursuant to section 4731.27 of the Revised Code or failure to fulfill the responsibilities of collaboration after entering into a standard care arrangement; (33) Failure to comply with the terms of a consult agreement entered into with a pharmacist pursuant to section 4729.39 of the Revised Code; (34) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under division (F) of this section, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board in an investigative interview, an investigative office conference, at a deposition, or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (35) Failure to supervise an anesthesiologist assistant in accordance with Chapter 4760. of the Revised Code and the board's rules for supervision of an anesthesiologist assistant; (36) Assisting suicide, as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code; (37) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 2317.561 of the Revised Code; (38) Failure to supervise a radiologist assistant in accordance with Chapter 4774. of the Revised Code and the board's rules for supervision of radiologist assistants; (39) Performing or inducing an abortion at an office or facility with knowledge that the office or facility fails to post the notice required under section 3701.791 of the Revised Code; (40) Failure to comply with the standards and procedures established in rules under section 4731.054 of the Revised Code for the operation of or the provision of care at a pain management clinic; (41) Failure to comply with the standards and procedures established in rules under section 4731.054 of the Revised Code for providing supervision, direction, and control of individuals at a pain management clinic; (42) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 4729.79 or 4731.055 of the Revised Code, unless the state board of pharmacy no longer maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code; (43) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 2919.171, 2919.202, or 2919.203 of the Revised Code or failure to submit to the department of health in accordance with a court order a complete report as described in section 2919.171 or 2919.202 of the Revised Code; (44) Practicing at a facility that is subject to licensure as a category III terminal distributor of dangerous drugs with a pain management clinic classification unless the person operating the facility has obtained and maintains the license with the classification; (45) Owning a facility that is subject to licensure as a category III terminal distributor of dangerous drugs with a pain management clinic classification unless the facility is licensed with the classification; (46) Failure to comply with any of the requirements regarding making or maintaining medical records or documents described in division (A) of section 2919.192, division (C) of section 2919.193, division (B) of section 2919.195, or division (A) of section 2919.196 of the Revised Code; (47) Failure to comply with the requirements in section 3719.061 of the Revised Code before issuing for a minor a prescription for an opioid analgesic, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code; (48) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 4731.30 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under section 4731.301 of the Revised Code when recommending treatment with medical marijuana; (49) A pattern of continuous or repeated violations of division (E)(2) or (3) of section 3963.02 of the Revised Code; (50) Failure to fulfill the responsibilities of a collaboration agreement entered into with an athletic trainer as described in section 4755.621 of the Revised Code; (51) Failure to take the steps specified in section 4731.911 of the Revised Code following an abortion or attempted abortion in an ambulatory surgical facility or other location that is not a hospital when a child is born alive; (52) Violation of section 4731.77 of the Revised Code; (53) Failure of a physician supervising a certified mental health assistant to maintain supervision in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that chapter; (54) Failure to comply with the requirements of section 3705.16 of the Revised Code when certifying a decedent's cause of death and completing and signing the medical certificate of death. (C) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an individual to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. A telephone conference call may be utilized for ratification of a consent agreement that revokes or suspends an individual's license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. If the board takes disciplinary action against an individual under division (B) of this section for a second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of section 2919.123 or 2919.124 of the Revised Code, the disciplinary action shall consist of a suspension of the individual's license or certificate to practice for a period of at least one year or, if determined appropriate by the board, a more serious sanction involving the individual's license or certificate to practice. Any consent agreement entered into under this division with an individual that pertains to a second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of that section shall provide for a suspension of the individual's license or certificate to practice for a period of at least one year or, if determined appropriate by the board, a more serious sanction involving the individual's license or certificate to practice. (D) For purposes of divisions (B)(10), (12), and (14) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the individual committed the act. The board does not have jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court renders a final judgment in the individual's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board has jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court issues an order of dismissal upon technical or procedural grounds. (E) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect upon a prior board order entered under this section or upon the board's jurisdiction to take action under this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, expunge, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing of conviction records. (F)(1) The board shall investigate evidence that appears to show that a person has violated any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. Any person may report to the board in a signed writing any information that the person may have that appears to show a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. In the absence of bad faith, any person who reports information of that nature or who testifies before the board in any adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall not be liable in damages in a civil action as a result of the report or testimony. Each complaint or allegation of a violation received by the board shall be assigned a case number and shall be recorded by the board. (2) Investigations of alleged violations of this chapter or any rule adopted under it shall be supervised by the supervising member elected by the board in accordance with section 4731.02 of the Revised Code and by the secretary as provided in section 4731.39 of the Revised Code. The president may designate another member of the board to supervise the investigation in place of the supervising member. Upon a vote of the majority of the board to authorize the addition of a consumer member in the supervision of any part of any investigation, the president shall designate a consumer member for supervision of investigations as determined by the president. The authorization of consumer member participation in investigation supervision may be rescinded by a majority vote of the board. No member of the board who supervises the investigation of a case shall participate in further adjudication of the case. (3) In investigating a possible violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, or in conducting an inspection under division (E) of section 4731.054 of the Revised Code, the board may question witnesses, conduct interviews, administer oaths, order the taking of depositions, inspect and copy any books, accounts, papers, records, or documents, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents, and testimony, except that a subpoena for patient record information shall not be issued without consultation with the attorney general's office and approval of the secretary of the board. (a) Before issuance of a subpoena for patient record information, the secretary shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the complaint filed alleges a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it and that the records sought are relevant to the alleged violation and material to the investigation. The subpoena may apply only to records that cover a reasonable period of time surrounding the alleged violation. (b) On failure to comply with any subpoena issued by the board and after reasonable notice to the person being subpoenaed, the board may move for an order compelling the production of persons or records pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure. (c) A subpoena issued by the board may be served by a sheriff, the sheriff's deputy, or a board employee or agent designated by the board. Service of a subpoena issued by the board may be made by delivering a copy of the subpoena to the person named therein, reading it to the person, or leaving it at the person's usual place of residence, usual place of business, or address on file with the board. When serving a subpoena to an applicant for or the holder of a license or certificate issued under this chapter, service of the subpoena may be made by certified mail, return receipt requested, and the subpoena shall be deemed served on the date delivery is made or the date the person refuses to accept delivery. If the person being served refuses to accept the subpoena or is not located, service may be made to an attorney who notifies the board that the attorney is representing the person. (d) A sheriff's deputy who serves a subpoena shall receive the same fees as a sheriff. Each witness who appears before the board in obedience to a subpoena shall receive the fees and mileage provided for under section 119.094 of the Revised Code. (4) All hearings, investigations, and inspections of the board shall be considered civil actions for the purposes of section 2305.252 of the Revised Code. (5) A report required to be submitted to the board under this chapter, a complaint, or information received by the board pursuant to an investigation or pursuant to an inspection under division (E) of section 4731.054 of the Revised Code is confidential and not subject to discovery in any civil action. The board shall conduct all investigations or inspections and proceedings in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and persons who file complaints with the board. The board shall not make public the names or any other identifying information about patients or complainants unless proper consent is given or, in the case of a patient, a waiver of the patient privilege exists under division (B) of section 2317.02 of the Revised Code, except that consent or a waiver of that nature is not required if the board possesses reliable and substantial evidence that no bona fide physician-patient relationship exists. The board may share any information it receives pursuant to an investigation or inspection, including patient records and patient record information, with law enforcement agencies, other licensing boards, and other governmental agencies that are prosecuting, adjudicating, or investigating alleged violations of statutes or administrative rules. An agency or board that receives the information shall comply with the same requirements regarding confidentiality as those with which the state medical board must comply, notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code or procedure of the agency or board that applies when it is dealing with other information in its possession. In a judicial proceeding, the information may be admitted into evidence only in accordance with the Rules of Evidence, but the court shall require that appropriate measures are taken to ensure that confidentiality is maintained with respect to any part of the information that contains names or other identifying information about patients or complainants whose confidentiality was protected by the state medical board when the information was in the board's possession. Measures to ensure confidentiality that may be taken by the court include sealing its records or deleting specific information from its records. No person shall knowingly access, use, or disclose confidential investigatory information in a manner prohibited by law. (6) On a quarterly basis, the board shall prepare a report that documents the disposition of all cases during the preceding three months. The report shall contain the following information for each case with which the board has completed its activities: (a) The case number assigned to the complaint or alleged violation; (b) The type of license or certificate to practice, if any, held by the individual against whom the complaint is directed; (c) A description of the allegations contained in the complaint; (d) Whether witnesses were interviewed; (e) Whether the individual against whom the complaint is directed is the subject of any pending complaints; (f) The disposition of the case. The report shall state how many cases are still pending and shall be prepared in a manner that protects the identity of each person involved in each case. The report shall be a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (7) The board may provide a status update regarding an investigation to a complainant on request if the board verifies the complainant's identity. (G)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend an individual's license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that an individual has violated division (B) of this section; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court with a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (G)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, upon review of those allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license or certificate without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the individual subject to the summary suspension requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the individual requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the individual. (3) Any summary suspension imposed under this division (G)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. A failure to issue the order within seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (H) If the board takes action under division (B)(9), (11), or (13) of this section and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. Upon receipt of a petition of that nature and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the individual's license or certificate to practice. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of an opportunity for a hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act or if no hearing is requested, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (B) of this section. (I) The license or certificate to practice issued to an individual under this chapter and the individual's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date of the individual's second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of section 2919.123 or 2919.124 of the Revised Code. In addition, the license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend issued to an individual under this chapter and the individual's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the individual pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after suspension shall be considered practicing without a license or certificate. The board shall notify the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license or certificate is automatically suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall do whichever of the following is applicable: (1) If the automatic suspension under this division is for a second or subsequent plea of guilty to, or judicial finding of guilt of, a violation of section 2919.123 or 2919.124 of the Revised Code, the board shall enter an order suspending the individual's license or certificate to practice for a period of at least one year or, if determined appropriate by the board, imposing a more serious sanction involving the individual's license or certificate to practice. (2) In all circumstances in which division (I)(1) of this section does not apply, enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license or certificate to practice. (J) If the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of an opportunity for a hearing and if the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In that final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (K) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension from practice shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the individual's license or certificate to practice may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license or certificate suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (L) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license or certificate to practice to an applicant, revokes an individual's license or certificate to practice, refuses to renew an individual's license or certificate to practice, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license or certificate to practice, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license or certificate to practice and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or certificate or for issuance of a new license or certificate. (M) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license or certificate issued under this chapter shall not be effective unless or until accepted by the board. A telephone conference call may be utilized for acceptance of the surrender of an individual's license or certificate to practice. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. Reinstatement of a license or certificate surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application for a license or certificate made under the provisions of this chapter may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license or certificate to practice in accordance with this chapter or a certificate to recommend in accordance with rules adopted under section 4731.301 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4731.283 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. (5) At the request of the board, a license or certificate holder shall immediately surrender to the board a license or certificate that the board has suspended, revoked, or permanently revoked. (N) Sanctions shall not be imposed under division (B)(28) of this section against any person who waives deductibles and copayments as follows: (1) In compliance with the health benefit plan that expressly allows such a practice. Waiver of the deductibles or copayments shall be made only with the full knowledge and consent of the plan purchaser, payer, and third-party administrator. Documentation of the consent shall be made available to the board upon request. (2) For professional services rendered to any other person authorized to practice pursuant to this chapter, to the extent allowed by this chapter and rules adopted by the board. (O) Under the board's investigative duties described in this section and subject to division (F) of this section, the board shall develop and implement a quality intervention program designed to improve through remedial education the clinical and communication skills of individuals authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, and podiatric medicine and surgery. In developing and implementing the quality intervention program, the board may do all of the following: (1) Offer in appropriate cases as determined by the board an educational and assessment program pursuant to an investigation the board conducts under this section; (2) Select providers of educational and assessment services, including a quality intervention program panel of case reviewers; (3) Make referrals to educational and assessment service providers and approve individual educational programs recommended by those providers. The board shall monitor the progress of each individual undertaking a recommended individual educational program. (4) Determine what constitutes successful completion of an individual educational program and require further monitoring of the individual who completed the program or other action that the board determines to be appropriate; (5) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to further implement the quality intervention program. An individual who participates in an individual educational program pursuant to this division shall pay the financial obligations arising from that educational program. (P) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a conviction, plea of guilty, judicial finding of guilt, judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, or the commission of an act that constitutes a criminal offense, unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (Q) A license or certificate to practice or certificate to recommend issued to an individual under this chapter and an individual's practice under this chapter in this state are automatically suspended if the individual's license or certificate to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services is suspended, revoked, or surrendered or relinquished in lieu of discipline by an agency responsible for authorizing, certifying, or regulating an individual to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services in this state or another jurisdiction. The automatic suspension begins immediately upon entry of the order by the agency and lasts for ninety days to permit the board to investigate the basis for the action under this chapter. Continued practice during the automatic suspension shall be considered practicing without a license or certificate. The board shall notify the individual subject to the automatic suspension by certified mail or in person in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual subject to an automatic suspension under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In that final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. Sec. 4731.2210. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Key third party" means an individual closely involved in a patient's decision-making regarding health care services, including a patient's spouse or partner, parents, children, siblings, or guardians. An individual's status as a key third party ceases upon termination of a practitioner-patient relationship or termination of the relationship between a patient and the individual. (2) "Practitioner" means any of the following: (a) An individual authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, podiatric medicine and surgery, or a limited branch of medicine; (b) An individual licensed under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code to practice as a physician assistant; (c) An individual authorized under Chapter 4759. of the Revised Code to practice as a dietitian; (d) An individual authorized under Chapter 4760. of the Revised Code to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant; (e) An individual authorized under Chapter 4761. of the Revised Code to practice respiratory care; (f) An individual authorized under Chapter 4762. of the Revised Code to practice as an acupuncturist or oriental medicine practitioner; (g) An individual authorized under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code to practice as a certified mental health assistant; (h) An individual authorized under Chapter 4774. of the Revised Code to practice as a radiologist assistant; (h)(i) An individual licensed under Chapter 4778. of the Revised Code to practice as a genetic counselor. (3) "Sexual misconduct" has the same meaning as in section 4731.224 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the state medical board may require a practitioner that is subject to a probationary order of the board that is made on or after the effective date of this section, and that involves a circumstance described in division (C) of this section, to provide to each patient, or to the patient's guardian or a key third party, a written disclosure signed by the practitioner that includes all of the following: (1) The practitioner's probation status; (2) The total length of the probation; (3) The probation end date; (4) Practice restrictions placed on the practitioner by the board; (5) The board's telephone number; (6) An explanation of how the patient can find additional information regarding the probation on the practitioner's profile page on the board's internet web site. The written disclosure, if required by the board, shall be provided before the patient's first visit following the probationary order of the board. The practitioner shall obtain a copy of the disclosure signed by the patient, or the patient's guardian or a key third party, and maintain the signed copy in the patient's medical record. The signed copy shall be made available to the board immediately upon request. (C) The written disclosure described in division (B) of this section applies in both of the following circumstances: (1) Issuance by the board of a final order, final adjudicative order under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, or a consent agreement that is ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board establishing any of the following: (a) Commission of any act of sexual misconduct with a patient or key third party; (b) Drug or alcohol abuse directly resulting in patient harm, or that impairs the ability of the practitioner to practice safely; (c) Criminal conviction directly resulting in harm to patient health; (d) Inappropriate prescribing directly resulting in patient harm. (2) A statement of issues alleged that the practitioner committed any of the acts described in divisions (C)(1)(a) through (d) and, notwithstanding a lack of admission of guilt, a consent agreement ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board includes express acknowledgement that the disclosure requirements of this section would serve to protect the public interest. (D) Written disclosure as described in this section is not required in the following circumstances: (1) The patient is unconscious or otherwise unable to comprehend the disclosure and sign it, and a guardian or a key third party is unavailable to comprehend and sign it; (2) The direct patient interaction occurs in an emergency department or otherwise occurs as an immediate result of a medical emergency; (3) The practitioner does not have a direct treatment relationship with the patient and does not have direct contact or direct communication with the patient. (E) The board shall provide the following information regarding practitioners on probation and those practicing under probationary status, in plain view on a practitioner's profile page on the board's internet web site: (1) Formal action documents detailing the citation, reports and recommendations, board order, and consent agreement; (2) The length of the probation and the end date; (3) Practice restrictions placed on the practitioner by the board. (F) The board shall provide a sample probation disclosure letter on its internet web site to be used by practitioners to comply with this section. Sec. 4731.256. (A) In addition to all other powers and duties conferred on the monitoring organization under contract with the state medical board pursuant to section 4731.25 of the Revised Code, the board shall require the monitoring organization to implement this section as a condition of entering into and maintaining the contract. (B) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section, the monitoring organization, in collaboration with the Ohio state medical association and Ohio hospital association, shall create a foundation to be operated for the sole purpose of supporting programs approved under the criteria established by sections 4731.25 to 4731.254 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted under section 4731.255 of the Revised Code. Once the foundation is created, the monitoring organization shall notify the treasurer of state. As part of organizing the foundation's operations, the monitoring organization, in collaboration with the other creating entities, shall establish a three-member governing board. The members shall consist of one individual appointed by the chief executive officer of the monitoring organization, one individual appointed by the chief executive officer of Ohio state medical association, and one individual appointed by the chief executive officer of the Ohio hospital association. Any vacancy in the membership shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. The foundation's governing board shall hold at least one meeting each year to approve an annual plan for the disbursement of funds held by the foundation. In determining the amount to be disbursed, the governing board shall consider factors related to the cost of providing monitoring services, the revenue generated from participants who receive services from the monitoring organization, and the extent to which the monitoring organization's services are being used, particularly by individuals who are applicants and practitioners, as those terms are defined in section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The determination of the amount to be disbursed under this section is solely a power and duty of the foundation's governing board. Sec. 4731.92. (A) As used in this section, "physician" means an individual authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom glucagon may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in accordance with section 3313.7115, 3313.7116, 3314.147, 3326.60, 3328.38, or 5101.78 5180.262 of the Revised Code. (2) Injectable or nasally administered glucagon personally furnished or prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (C) A physician who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which injectable or nasally administered glucagon is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4731.96. (A) As used in this section and section 4731.961 of the Revised Code, "physician" means an individual authorized under this chapter to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or podiatric medicine and surgery. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, and notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule adopted by the state medical board, a physician may do either of the following without having examined an individual to whom epinephrine may be administered: (a) Personally furnish a supply of epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code; (b) Issue a prescription for epinephrine autoinjectors for use in accordance with sections 3313.7110, 3313.7111, 3314.143, 3326.28, 3328.29, 3728.03 to 3728.05, and 5101.76 5180.26 of the Revised Code. (2) An epinephrine autoinjector personally furnished or prescribed under division (B)(1) of this section must be furnished or prescribed in such a manner that it may be administered only in a manufactured dosage form. (C) A physician who acts in good faith in accordance with this section is not liable for or subject to any of the following for any action or omission of an entity to which an epinephrine autoinjector is furnished or a prescription is issued: damages in any civil action, prosecution in any criminal proceeding, or professional disciplinary action. Sec. 4731.99. (A) Whoever violates section 4731.41, 4731.43, or 4731.60 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (B) Whoever violates section 4731.49, 4731.50, or 4731.81 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (C) Whoever violates section 4731.46 or 4731.47 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. (D) Whoever violates section 4731.48 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (E)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1), (C)(1), (C)(2), (D), or (E) of section 4731.224 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense, except that an individual guilty of a subsequent offense shall not be subject to imprisonment, but to a fine alone of up to one thousand dollars for each offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C)(3) of section 4731.224 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report is on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. (F) Whoever violates section 4731.481 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (G) Whoever violates division (F)(5) of section 4731.22 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4735.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Real estate broker" includes any person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation, foreign or domestic, who for another, whether pursuant to a power of attorney or otherwise, and who for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, or with the intention, or in the expectation, or upon the promise of receiving or collecting a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration does any of the following: (1) Sells, exchanges, purchases, rents, or leases, or negotiates the sale, exchange, purchase, rental, or leasing of any real estate; (2) Offers, attempts, or agrees to negotiate the sale, exchange, purchase, rental, or leasing of any real estate; (3) Lists, or offers, attempts, or agrees to list, or auctions, or offers, attempts, or agrees to auction, any real estate; (4) Buys or offers to buy, sells or offers to sell, or otherwise deals in options on real estate; (5) Operates, manages, or rents, or offers or attempts to operate, manage, or rent, other than as custodian, caretaker, or janitor, any building or portions of buildings to the public as tenants; (6) Advertises or holds self out as engaged in the business of selling, exchanging, purchasing, renting, or leasing real estate; (7) Directs or assists in the procuring of prospects or the negotiation of any transaction, other than mortgage financing, which does or is calculated to result in the sale, exchange, leasing, or renting of any real estate; (8) Is engaged in the business of charging an advance fee or contracting for collection of a fee in connection with any contract whereby the broker undertakes primarily to promote the sale, exchange, purchase, rental, or leasing of real estate through its listing in a publication issued primarily for such purpose, or for referral of information concerning such real estate to brokers, or both, except that this division does not apply to a publisher of listings or compilations of sales of real estate by their owners; (9) Collects rental information for purposes of referring prospective tenants to rental units or locations of such units and charges the prospective tenants a fee. (B) "Real estate" includes leaseholds as well as any and every interest or estate in land situated in this state, whether corporeal or incorporeal, whether freehold or nonfreehold, and the improvements on the land, but does not include cemetery interment rights. (C) "Real estate salesperson" means any person associated with a licensed real estate broker to do or to deal in any acts or transactions set out or comprehended by the definition of a real estate broker, for compensation or otherwise. (D) "Institution of higher education" includes all of the following: (1) A state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (2) A nonprofit institution issued a certificate of authorization under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code; (3) A private institution exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code, as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code. (4) An institution with a certificate of registration from the state board of career colleges and schools under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code that is approved to offer degree or certificate programs in accordance with section 3332.05 of the Revised Code. (E) "Foreign real estate" means real estate not situated in this state and any interest in real estate not situated in this state. (F) "Foreign real estate dealer" includes any person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation, foreign or domestic, who for another, whether pursuant to a power of attorney or otherwise, and who for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, or with the intention, or in the expectation, or upon the promise of receiving or collecting a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, does or deals in any act or transaction specified or comprehended in division (A) of this section with respect to foreign real estate. (G) "Foreign real estate salesperson" means any person associated with a licensed foreign real estate dealer to do or deal in any act or transaction specified or comprehended in division (A) of this section with respect to foreign real estate, for compensation or otherwise. (H) Any person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation, who, for another, in consideration of compensation, by fee, commission, salary, or otherwise, or with the intention, in the expectation, or upon the promise of receiving or collecting a fee, does, or offers, attempts, or agrees to engage in, any single act or transaction contained in the definition of a real estate broker, whether an act is an incidental part of a transaction, or the entire transaction, shall be constituted a real estate broker or real estate salesperson under this chapter. (I)(1) The terms "real estate broker," "real estate salesperson," "foreign real estate dealer," and "foreign real estate salesperson" do not include a person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation, or the regular employees thereof, who perform any of the acts or transactions specified or comprehended in division (A) of this section, whether or not for, or with the intention, in expectation, or upon the promise of receiving or collecting a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration: (a) With reference to real estate situated in this state owned by such person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation, or acquired on its own account in the regular course of, or as an incident to the management of the property and the investment in it; (b) As receiver or trustee in bankruptcy, as guardian, executor, administrator, trustee, assignee, commissioner, or any person doing the things mentioned in this section, under authority or appointment of, or incident to a proceeding in, any court, or as a bona fide public officer, or as executor, trustee, or other bona fide fiduciary under any trust agreement, deed of trust, will, or other instrument that has been executed in good faith creating a like bona fide fiduciary obligation; (c) As a public officer while performing the officer's official duties; (d) As an attorney at law in the performance of the attorney's duties; (e) As a person who engages in the brokering of the sale of business assets, not including the sale, lease, exchange, or assignment of any interest in real estate; (f) As a person who engages in the sale of manufactured homes as defined in division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code, or of mobile homes as defined in division (O) of section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, provided the sale does not include the negotiation, sale, lease, exchange, or assignment of any interest in real estate; (g) As a person who engages in the sale of commercial real estate pursuant to the requirements of section 4735.022 of the Revised Code; (h) As an oil and gas land professional in the performance of the oil and gas land professional's duties, provided the oil and gas land professional is not engaged in the purchase or sale of a fee simple absolute interest in oil and gas or other real estate and the oil and gas land professional complies with division (A) of section 4735.023 of the Revised Code; (i) As an oil and gas land professional employed by the person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation for which the oil and gas land professional is performing the oil and gas land professional's duties. (2) A person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation exempt under division (I)(1)(a) of this section shall be limited by the legal interest in the real estate held by that person or entity to performing any of the acts or transactions specified in or comprehended by division (A) of this section. (J) "Disabled licensee" means a person licensed pursuant to this chapter who is under a severe disability which is of such a nature as to prevent the person from being able to attend any instruction lasting at least three hours in duration. (K) "Division of real estate" may be used interchangeably with, and for all purposes has the same meaning as, "division of real estate and professional licensing." (L) "Superintendent" or "superintendent of real estate" means the superintendent of the division of real estate and professional licensing of this state. Whenever the division or superintendent of real estate is referred to or designated in any statute, rule, contract, or other document, the reference or designation shall be deemed to refer to the division or superintendent of real estate and professional licensing, as the case may be. (M) "Inactive license" means the license status in which a salesperson's license is in the possession of the division, renewed as required under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, and not associated with a real estate broker. (N) "Broker's license on deposit" means the license status in which a broker's license is in the possession of the division of real estate and professional licensing and renewed as required under this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. (O) "Suspended license" means the license status that prohibits a licensee from providing services that require a license under this chapter for a specified interval of time. (P) "Reactivate" means the process prescribed by the superintendent of real estate and professional licensing to remove a license from an inactive, suspended, or broker's license on deposit status to allow a licensee to provide services that require a license under this chapter. (Q) "Revoked" means the license status in which the license is void and not eligible for reactivation. (R) "Commercial real estate" means any parcel of real estate in this state other than real estate containing one to four residential units. "Commercial real estate" does not include single-family residential units such as condominiums, townhouses, manufactured homes, or homes in a subdivision when sold, leased, or otherwise conveyed on a unit-by-unit basis, even when those units are a part of a larger building or parcel of real estate containing more than four residential units. (S) "Out-of-state commercial broker" includes any person, partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation that is licensed to do business as a real estate broker in a jurisdiction other than Ohio. (T) "Out-of-state commercial salesperson" includes any person affiliated with an out-of-state commercial broker who is not licensed as a real estate salesperson in Ohio. (U) "Exclusive right to sell or lease listing agreement" means an agency agreement between a seller and broker that meets the requirements of section 4735.55 of the Revised Code and does both of the following: (1) Grants the broker the exclusive right to represent the seller in the sale or lease of the seller's property; (2) Provides the broker will be compensated if the broker, the seller, or any other person or entity produces a purchaser or tenant in accordance with the terms specified in the listing agreement or if the property is sold or leased during the term of the listing agreement to anyone other than to specifically exempted persons or entities. (V) "Exclusive agency agreement" means an agency agreement between a seller and broker that meets the requirements of section 4735.55 of the Revised Code and does both of the following: (1) Grants the broker the exclusive right to represent the seller in the sale or lease of the seller's property; (2) Provides the broker will be compensated if the broker or any other person or entity produces a purchaser or tenant in accordance with the terms specified in the listing agreement or if the property is sold or leased during the term of the listing agreement, unless the property is sold or leased solely through the efforts of the seller or to the specifically exempted persons or entities. (W) "Exclusive purchaser agency agreement" means an agency agreement between a purchaser or tenant and a broker that meets the requirements of section 4735.55 of the Revised Code and does both of the following: (1) Grants the broker the exclusive right to represent the purchaser or tenant in the purchase or lease of property; (2) Provides the broker will be compensated in accordance with the terms specified in the exclusive agency agreement or if a property is purchased or leased by the purchaser or tenant during the term of the agency agreement unless the property is specifically exempted in the agency agreement. The agreement may authorize the broker to receive compensation from the seller or the seller's agent and may provide that the purchaser or tenant is not obligated to compensate the broker if the property is purchased or leased solely through the efforts of the purchaser or tenant. (X) "Seller" means a party in a real estate transaction who is the potential transferor of property. "Seller" includes an owner of property who is seeking to sell the property and a landlord who is seeking to rent or lease property to another person. (Y) "Resigned" means the license status in which a license has been voluntarily and permanently surrendered to or is otherwise in the possession of the division of real estate and professional licensing, may not be renewed or reactivated in accordance with the requirements specified in this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to it, and is not associated with a real estate broker. (Z) "Bona fide" means made in good faith or without purpose of circumventing license law. (AA) "Associate broker" means an individual licensed as a real estate broker under this chapter who does not function as the principal broker or a management level licensee. (BB) "Brokerage" means a corporation, partnership, limited partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or sole proprietorship, foreign or domestic, that has been issued a broker's license. "Brokerage" includes the affiliated licensees who have been assigned management duties that include supervision of licensees whose duties may conflict with those of other affiliated licensees. (CC) Except as provided in section 4735.011 of the Revised Code, "eligible course" means a credit or noncredit course offered by an institution of higher education that may be applied toward the requirements for a degree or certificate at the institution. (DD) "Distance education" means courses required by divisions (B)(6) and (G) of section 4735.07, divisions (F)(6) and (J) of section 4735.09, and division (A) of section 4735.141 of the Revised Code in which instruction is accomplished through use of interactive, electronic media and where the teacher and student are separated by distance or time, or both. (EE) "Licensee" means any individual licensed as a real estate broker or salesperson by the Ohio real estate commission pursuant to this chapter. (FF) "Management level licensee" means a licensee who is employed by or affiliated with a real estate broker and who has supervisory responsibility over other licensees employed by or affiliated with that real estate broker. (GG) "Oil and gas land professional" means a person regularly engaged in the preparation and negotiation of agreements for the purpose of exploring for, transporting, producing, or developing oil and gas mineral interests, including, but not limited to, oil and gas leases and pipeline easements. (HH) "Principal broker" means an individual licensed as a real estate broker under this chapter who oversees and directs the operations of the brokerage. (II) "Right-to-list home sale agreement" means an agreement whereby the owner of residential real estate agrees to provide another person with exclusive rights to list the real estate for sale at a future date in exchange for monetary consideration, or an equivalent to monetary consideration, and that meets one or both of the following: (1) The agreement states that it runs with the land or otherwise purports to bind future owners of the residential real estate; (2) The agreement purports to be a lien, encumbrance, or other real property security interest. (JJ) "Nonexclusive agency agreement" means an agency agreement between a purchaser, tenant, or seller and a broker that meets the requirements of section 4735.55 of the Revised Code and does both of the following: (1) Grants the broker the nonexclusive right to represent the purchaser, tenant, or seller in the purchase, sale, or lease of property; (2) Provides the broker will be compensated in accordance with the terms specified in the nonexclusive agency agreement, and the purchaser, tenant, or seller may obtain services from other brokers or brokerage firms, subject to the terms of the nonexclusive agency agreement. Sec. 4735.06. (A)(A)(1) Application for a license as a real estate broker shall be made to the superintendent of real estate on forms furnished by the superintendent and filed with the superintendent and shall be signed by the applicant or its members or officers. (2) Each application shall state the name of the person applying and the location of the place of business for which the license is desired, and give such other information as the superintendent requires in the form of application prescribed by the superintendent. (3) Each application shall include the address of the applicant's current residence or, if the applicant is not an individual, the address of the current residence of each of the applicant's members or officers. (4) The superintendent shall retain residential addresses submitted under division (A)(3) of this section as separate records that do not constitute public records for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) If the applicant is a partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or association, the names of all the members also shall be stated, and, if the applicant is a corporation, the names of its president and of each of its officers also shall be stated. The superintendent has the right to reject the application of any partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation if the name proposed to be used by such partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation is likely to mislead the public or if the name is not such as to distinguish it from the name of any existing partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation licensed under this chapter, unless there is filed with the application the written consent of such existing partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation, executed by a duly authorized representative of it, permitting the use of the name of such existing partnership, association, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, or corporation. (2) The superintendent shall approve the use of a trade name by a brokerage, if the name meets both of the following criteria: (a) The proposed name is not the same as or is clearly distinguishable from a name registered with the division of real estate and professional licensing by another existing brokerage. If the superintendent determines that the proposed name is not clearly distinguishable from any other existing brokerage, the superintendent may approve the use of the trade name if there is filed with the superintendent the written consent of the existing brokerage with the same or similar name. (b) The name is not misleading or likely to mislead the public. (3) The superintendent may approve the use of more than one trade name for a brokerage. (4) When a brokerage has received the approval of the superintendent to conduct business under one or more trade names, those trade names shall be the only identifying names used by the brokerage in all advertising. (C) A fee of one hundred thirty-five dollars shall accompany the application for a real estate broker's license. The initial licensing period commences at the time the license is issued and ends on the applicant's first birthday thereafter. However, if the applicant was an inactive or active salesperson immediately preceding application for a broker's license, then the initial licensing period shall commence at the time the broker's license is issued and ends on the date the licensee's continuing education is due as set when the applicant was a salesperson. The application fee shall be nonrefundable. A fee of one hundred thirty-five dollars shall be charged by the superintendent for each successive application made by an applicant. In the case of issuance of a three-year license, upon passing the examination, or upon waiver of the examination requirement, if the superintendent determines it is necessary, the applicant shall submit an additional fee determined by the superintendent based upon the number of years remaining in a real estate salesperson's licensing period. (D) The Ohio real estate commission may use the division of real estate operating fund created under section 4735.211 of the Revised Code in discharging the duties prescribed in divisions (E), (F), (G), and (H) of section 4735.03 of the Revised Code and may use it in the advancement of education and research in real estate at any institution of higher education in the state, or in contracting with any such institution or a trade organization for a particular research or educational project in the field of real estate, or in advancing loans, not exceeding two thousand dollars, to applicants for salesperson licenses, to defray the costs of satisfying the educational requirements of division (F) of section 4735.09 of the Revised Code. Such loans shall be made according to rules established by the commission under the procedures of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, and they shall be repaid to the fund within three years of the time they are made. No more than twenty-five thousand dollars shall be lent from the fund in any one fiscal year. The governor may appoint a representative from the executive branch to be a member ex officio of the commission for the purpose of advising on research requests or educational projects. The commission shall report to the general assembly on the third Tuesday after the third Monday in January of each year setting forth the total amount contained in the fund and the amount of each research grant that it has authorized and the amount of each research grant requested. A copy of all research reports shall be submitted to the state library of Ohio and the library of the legislative service commission. (E) If the superintendent, with the consent of the commission, enters into an agreement with a national testing service to administer the real estate broker's examination, pursuant to division (A) of section 4735.07 of the Revised Code, the superintendent may require an applicant to pay the testing service's examination fee directly to the testing service. If the superintendent requires the payment of the examination fee directly to the testing service, each applicant shall submit to the superintendent a processing fee in an amount determined by the Ohio real estate commission pursuant to division (A)(2) of section 4735.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4735.09. (A) Application for a license as a real estate salesperson shall be made to the superintendent of real estate on forms furnished by the superintendent and signed by the applicant. The application shall be in the form prescribed by the superintendent and shall contain such information as is required by this chapter and the rules of the Ohio real estate commission. The application shall include the address of the applicant's current residence. The superintendent shall retain the applicant's current residence address in a separate record that does not constitute a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. The application shall be accompanied by the recommendation of the real estate broker with whom the applicant is associated or with whom the applicant intends to be associated, certifying that the applicant is honest and truthful, and has not been finally adjudged by a court to have violated any municipal, state, or federal civil rights laws relevant to the protection of purchasers or sellers of real estate, which conviction or adjudication the applicant has not disclosed to the superintendent, and recommending that the applicant be admitted to the real estate salesperson examination. (B) A fee of eighty-one dollars shall accompany the application, which fee includes the fee for the initial year of the licensing period, if a license is issued. The initial year of the licensing period commences at the time the license is issued and ends on the applicant's first birthday thereafter. The application fee shall be nonrefundable. A fee of eighty-one dollars shall be charged by the superintendent for each successive application made by the applicant. (C) There shall be no limit placed on the number of times an applicant may retake the examination. (D) The superintendent, with the consent of the commission, may enter into an agreement with a recognized national testing service to administer the real estate salesperson's examination under the superintendent's supervision and control, consistent with the requirements of this chapter as to the contents of the examination. If the superintendent, with the consent of the commission, enters into an agreement with a national testing service to administer the real estate salesperson's examination, the superintendent may require an applicant to pay the testing service's examination fee directly to the testing service. If the superintendent requires the payment of the examination fee directly to the testing service, each applicant shall submit to the superintendent a processing fee in an amount determined by the Ohio real estate commission pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 4735.10 of the Revised Code. (E) The superintendent shall issue a real estate salesperson's license when satisfied that the applicant has received a passing score on each portion of the salesperson's examination as determined by rule by the real estate commission. (F) No applicant for a salesperson's license shall take the salesperson's examination who has not established to the satisfaction of the superintendent that the applicant: (1) Is honest and truthful; (2)(a) Has not been convicted of a disqualifying offense as determined in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code; (b) Has not been finally adjudged by a court to have violated any municipal, state, or federal civil rights laws relevant to the protection of purchasers or sellers of real estate or, if the applicant has been so adjudged, at least two years have passed since the court decision and the superintendent has disregarded the adjudication because the applicant has proven, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the applicant is honest and truthful, and there is no basis in fact for believing that the applicant again will violate the laws involved. (3) Has not, during any period in which the applicant was licensed under this chapter, violated any provision of, or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, or, if the applicant has violated such provision or rule, has established to the satisfaction of the superintendent that the applicant will not again violate such provision or rule; (4) Is at least eighteen years of age; (5) If born after the year 1950, has a high school diploma or a certificate of high school equivalence issued under section 3301.80 of the Revised Code; (6) Has successfully completed at an institution of higher education all of the following eligible courses by either classroom instruction or distance education: (a) Forty hours of instruction in real estate practice; (b) Forty hours of instruction that includes the subjects of Ohio real estate law, municipal, state, and federal civil rights law, new case law on housing discrimination, desegregation issues, and methods of eliminating the effects of prior discrimination. If feasible, the instruction in Ohio real estate law shall be taught by a member of the faculty of an accredited law school. If feasible, the instruction in municipal, state, and federal civil rights law, new case law on housing discrimination, desegregation issues, and methods of eliminating the effects of prior discrimination shall be taught by a staff member of the Ohio civil rights commission who is knowledgeable with respect to those subjects. The requirements of this division do not apply to an applicant who is admitted to practice before the supreme court. (c) Ten hours of instruction in real estate appraisal; (d) Ten hours of instruction in real estate finance. (G)(1) Successful completion of the instruction required by division (F)(6) of this section shall be determined by the law in effect on the date the instruction was completed. (2) Division (F)(6)(c) of this section does not apply to any new applicant who holds a valid Ohio real estate appraiser license or certificate issued prior to the date of application for a real estate salesperson's license. (H) Only for noncredit course offerings, an institution of higher education shall obtain approval from the appropriate state authorizing entity prior to offering a real estate course that is designed and marketed as satisfying the salesperson license education requirements of division (F)(6) of this section. The state authorizing entity may consult with the superintendent in reviewing the course for compliance with this section. (I) Any person who has not been licensed as a real estate salesperson or broker within a four-year period immediately preceding the person's current application for the salesperson's examination shall have successfully completed the prelicensure instruction required by division (F)(6) of this section within a ten-year period immediately preceding the person's current application for the salesperson's examination. (J) Not earlier than the date of issue of a real estate salesperson's license to a licensee, but not later than twelve months after the date of issue of a real estate salesperson license to a licensee, the licensee shall submit proof satisfactory to the superintendent, on forms made available by the superintendent, of the completion of twenty hours of instruction that shall be completed in schools, seminars, and educational institutions approved by the commission. The instruction shall include, but is not limited to, current practices relating to commercial real estate, property management, short sales, and land contracts; contract law; federal and state programs; economic conditions; and fiduciary responsibility. Approval of the curriculum and providers shall be granted according to rules adopted pursuant to section 4735.10 of the Revised Code and may be taken through classroom instruction or distance education. If proof of completion of the required instruction is not submitted within twelve months of the date a license is issued under this section, the licensee's license is suspended automatically without the taking of any action by the superintendent. The superintendent immediately shall notify the broker with whom such salesperson is associated of the suspension of the salesperson's license. A salesperson whose license has been suspended under this division shall have twelve months after the date of the suspension of the salesperson's license to submit proof of successful completion of the instruction required under this division. No such license shall be reactivated by the superintendent until it is established, to the satisfaction of the superintendent, that the requirements of this division have been met and that the licensee is in compliance with this chapter. A licensee's license is revoked automatically without the taking of any action by the superintendent when the licensee fails to submit the required proof of completion of the education requirements under division (I) of this section within twelve months of the date the license is suspended. (K) Examinations shall be administered with reasonable accommodations in accordance with the requirements of the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 104 Stat. 327, 42 U.S.C. 12189. The contents of an examination shall be consistent with the classroom instructional requirements of division (F)(6) of this section. An applicant who has completed the classroom instructional requirements of division (F)(6) of this section at the time of application shall be examined no later than twelve months after the applicant is notified of the applicant's admission to the examination. (L) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to the contrary, the superintendent shall issue a real estate salesperson's license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an applicant if both of the following apply: (1) The applicant satisfies the requirements specified in section 4796.03, 4796.04, or 4796.05 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (2) The applicant passes an examination on Ohio real estate law. Sec. 4735.55. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Residential real property" has the same meaning as in section 5302.30 of the Revised Code. (2) "Residential premises" and "tenant" has have the same meaning meanings as in section 5321.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Prior to marketing A licensee shall enter into a written agency agreement before doing any of the following: (1) Advertising or showing a seller's residential real property, making on behalf of a seller; (2) Making an offer to purchase residential real property on behalf of a purchaser, or making ; (3) Making an offer to lease a residential premises on behalf of a purchaser tenant for a term exceeding eighteen months, a licensee shall enter into a written agency agreement that contains . (C) The written agency agreement shall contain all of the following: (1) An expiration date; (2) A statement that it is illegal, pursuant to the Ohio fair housing law, division (H) of section 4112.02 of the Revised Code, and the federal fair housing law, 42 U.S.C.A. 3601, as amended, to refuse to sell, transfer, assign, rent, lease, sublease, or finance housing accommodations, refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of housing accommodations, or otherwise deny or make unavailable housing accommodations because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, ancestry, military status as defined in that section, disability as defined in that section, or national origin or to so discriminate in advertising the sale or rental of housing, in the financing of housing, or in the provision of real estate brokerage services; (3) A statement defining the practice known as "blockbusting" and stating that it is illegal; (4) A copy of the United States department of housing and urban development equal housing opportunity logotype, as set forth in 24 C.F.R. 109.30, as amended; (5) A statement that the licensee is appointed as an agent of the client, and an indication of whether the agency relationship is exclusive or nonexclusive; (6) The terms by which the real estate broker is to be compensated; (7) A conspicuous statement that broker fees and commissions are not set by law, are fully negotiable, and may be paid by the seller, the buyer, the landlord, the tenant, or a third party, or by sharing or splitting the fees and commissions between brokers. (C)(D) Each written agency agreement shall contain a place for the licensee and the client to sign and date the agreement. (D)(E) A licensee shall furnish a copy of any written agency agreement to a client in a timely manner after the licensee and the client have signed and dated it. Sec. 4735.56. (A) Each brokerage shall develop a written brokerage policy on agency to be given to prospective sellers, tenants, and purchasers in accordance with divisions (C) and (D) of this section. (B) The brokerage policy on agency described in division (A) of this section shall include all of the following information: (1) An explanation of the permissible agency relationships available under section 4735.53 of the Revised Code and the duties that the agent owes the agent's client; (2) The brokerage's policy on representation of purchasers or sellers; (3) Whether at some time during the agency relationship the brokerage and its licensee may act as a dual agent, and the options and consequences for the client if a dual agency situation arises including the right of the client to terminate the agency relationship and seek representation from another source; (4) Whether at some time during the agency relationship, another licensee affiliated with the same brokerage as the licensee may become the exclusive agent for the other party in the transaction and whether each licensee will represent only the interests of that licensee's client; (5) The brokerage's policy on cooperation with other brokerages, including whether the brokerage offers compensation to other brokerages or will seek compensation from other brokerages; (6) That a brokerage that has a purchaser as a client represents the purchaser's interests even though the seller's agent or the seller may compensate that purchaser's brokerage; (7) That the signature of the purchaser or the seller indicates acknowledgement of receipt of the brokerage policy on agency. (C) A licensee working directly with a seller in a real estate transaction shall provide the seller with the brokerage policy on agency described in this section at the time the licensee and seller enter into an agency agreement, if required by section 4735.55 of the Revised Code or, if an agency agreement is not required by that section, prior to marketing advertising or showing the seller's real estate, and shall obtain a signature from the seller acknowledging receipt unless the seller refuses to provide a signature. If the seller refuses to provide a signature, the licensee shall note this on the policy. (D) A licensee working directly with a purchaser in a real estate transaction, whether as the purchaser's agent, the seller's agent, or the seller's subagent, shall provide the purchaser with the brokerage policy on agency described in this section and obtain a signature from the purchaser acknowledging receipt of the policy unless the purchaser refuses to provide a signature. If the purchaser refuses to provide a signature, the licensee shall note this on the policy. Except as provided in division (E) of this section, the licensee shall provide the brokerage policy on agency to a purchaser prior to the earliest of the following actions of the licensee: (1) Initiating a prequalification evaluation to determine whether the purchaser has the financial ability to purchase or lease a particular real estate property; (2) Requesting specific financial information from the purchaser to determine the purchaser's ability to purchase or finance real estate in a particular price range; (3) Showing the real estate to the purchaser other than at an open house; (4) Discussing, with the purchaser, the making of an offer to purchase or lease real estate; (5) Submitting an offer to purchase or lease real estate on behalf of the purchaser; (6) Entering into an agency agreement with the purchaser under section 4735.55 of the Revised Code. (E) If the earliest event described in division (D) of this section is by telephone or electronic mail, the licensee shall disclose by that same medium the nature of the agency relationship that the licensee has with both the seller and the purchaser. The licensee shall provide the purchaser with the brokerage policy on agency described in this section at the first meeting with the purchaser following this disclosure of the agency relationship. (F) A licensee acting as a seller's agent is not required to provide a purchaser with the brokerage policy on agency described in this section except in the case of an event described in division (D) of this section. (G) The requirements of this section regarding provision of a brokerage policy on agency apply only in the following situations: (1) The sale or lease of vacant land; (2) The sale of a parcel of real estate containing one to four residential units; (3) The leasing of residential premises as defined in section 5321.01 of the Revised Code, if the rental or lease agreement is for a term of more than eighteen months. Sec. 4735.80. (A) The superintendent of real estate shall, within one year after the effective date of this sectionApril 3, 2025, adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that require a licensee, prior to listing residential real estate for sale, exchange, or purchase, to provide to the seller a disclosure form, developed and maintained by the division of real estate, that outlines both of the following: (1) The federal and state laws that relate to anti-discrimination in the home-buying process with which a seller of residential real estate shall comply, including the laws listed in divisions (B)(2)(C)(2) and (3) of section 4735.55 of the Revised Code; (2) The penalties associated with violating any of the laws specified pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section. (B) No licensee shall market or show a seller's residential real estate before providing the seller with the disclosure required by this section and receiving a copy of that disclosure that is signed and dated by the seller. The licensee shall retain the signed and dated copy of the disclosure for not less than three years following the closing date on the seller's residential real estate. (C) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4740.06. (A) Any individual who applies for a license shall file a written application with the appropriate specialty section of the Ohio construction industry licensing board, accompanied with the application fee as determined pursuant to section 4740.09 of the Revised Code. The application shall be on the form the section prescribes and verified by the applicant's oath. The applicant shall provide information satisfactory to the section showing that the applicant meets the requirements of division (B), (C), or (D) of this section. (B) To qualify to take an examination, an individual shall: (1) Be at least eighteen years of age; (2) Be a United States citizen or legal alien who produces valid documentation to demonstrate the individual is a legal resident of the United States; (3) Either have been a tradesperson in the type of licensed trade for which the application is filed for not less than five years immediately prior to the date the application is filed, be a currently registered engineer in this state with three years of business experience in the construction industry in the trade for which the engineer is applying to take an examination, or have other experience acceptable to the appropriate specialty section of the board; (4) Maintain contractor's liability insurance in an amount the appropriate specialty section of the board determines and only in one contracting company name; (5) Not have done any of the following: (a) Violated this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to it; (b) Obtained or renewed a license issued pursuant to this chapter, or any order, ruling, or authorization of the board or a section of the board by fraud, misrepresentation, or deception; (c) Engaged in fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in the conduct of business. (C) For an individual who holds an out-of-state occupational license, as defined in section 4796.01 of the Revised Code, that is substantially similar to the license for which the individual is applying under this chapter, to qualify to take an examination, an individual shall: (1) Provide proof that the individual was issued at least five authorizations for construction, erection, equipment, alteration, or addition of any building by an authority with responsibility for enforcing building regulations in the jurisdiction where the individual holds the out-of-state occupational license; (2) Provide at least one tax return that reflects income earned for services provided under the individual's out-of-state occupational license; (3) Provide proof that the contracting company with whom the individual is employed in the jurisdiction where the individual holds the out-of-state occupational license is either of the following: (a) Licensed as a foreign corporation under section 1703.04 of the Revised Code and has designated an agent in this state in accordance with section 1703.041 of the Revised Code; (b) Registered as a foreign limited liability company under section 1706.511 of the Revised Code and has designated an agent in this state in accordance with section 1706.09 of the Revised Code. (4) Meet the requirements described in divisions (B)(1), (2), (4), and (5) of this section. (D)(1) For an individual who has been actively engaged in activities in the service of the uniformed services, as defined in section 4796.01 of the Revised Code, that are substantially similar to the activities for which the license the individual is applying under this chapter is required, to qualify to take an examination, an individual shall: (a) Provide proof that the individual was actively engaged in the activities in the service of the uniformed services for at least three of the five years immediately preceding the date the application is submitted; (b) Meet the requirements described in divisions (B)(1), (2), (4), and (5) of this section. (2) Each specialty section of the board may adopt a rule in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to waive the requirement that an applicant under division (D)(1)(a) of this section has been actively engaged in the activity for three of the five years immediately preceding the date the application is submitted. (E) The board secretary, or the secretary's designee, shall approve an application for examination submitted under division (C) or (D) of this section within thirty days after receiving a complete application that meets the requirements of that division. (F) When an applicant for licensure as a contractor in a licensed trade meets the qualifications set forth in division (B), (C), or (D) of this section and passes the required examination, the appropriate specialty section of the board, within ninety days after the application was filed, shall authorize the administrative section of the board to license the applicant for the type of contractor's license for which the applicant qualifies. A specialty section of the board may withdraw its authorization to the administrative section for issuance of a license for good cause shown, on the condition that notice of that withdrawal is given prior to the administrative section's issuance of the license. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, if an applicant does not pass the required examination, the applicant may retake the examination not less than sixty days after the applicant's most recent examination. (2) An applicant who does not pass the required examination after taking the examination five times under this section shall reapply for a license under division (A) of this section before retaking the required examination any subsequent time. (H) All licenses a contractor holds pursuant to this chapter shall expire annually on the same date, which shall be the expiration date of the original license the contractor holds. An individual holding a valid, unexpired license may renew the license, without reexamination, by submitting an application to the appropriate specialty section of the board not more than ninety calendar days before the expiration of the license, along with the renewal fee the specialty section requires and proof of compliance with the applicable continuing education requirements. The applicant shall provide information in the renewal application satisfactory to demonstrate to the appropriate specialty section that the applicant continues to meet the requirements of divisions (B)(2), (4), and (5) of this section. Upon application and within one calendar year after a license has expired, a section may waive any of the requirements for renewal of a license upon finding that an applicant substantially meets the renewal requirements or that failure to timely apply for renewal is due to excusable neglect. A section that waives requirements for renewal of a license may impose conditions upon the licensee and assess a late filing fee of not more than double the usual renewal fee. An applicant shall satisfy any condition the section imposes before a license is reissued. (I) An individual holding a valid license may request the section of the board that authorized that license to place the license in inactive status under conditions, and for a period of time, as that section determines. (J) Except for the ninety-day extension provided for a license assigned to a contracting company under division (D) of section 4740.07 of the Revised Code, a license held by an individual immediately terminates upon the death of the individual. (K) Nothing in any license issued by the Ohio construction industry licensing board shall be construed to limit or eliminate any requirement of or any license issued by the Ohio fire marshal. (L)(1) Subject to division (L)(3) of this section, no specialty section of the board shall adopt, maintain, renew, or enforce any rule, or otherwise preclude in any way, an individual from renewing a license under this chapter due to any past criminal activity or interpretation of moral character. If the specialty section denies an individual a license renewal, the reasons for such denial shall be put in writing. (2) The section may refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a conviction of or plea of guilty to an offense if the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (3) In considering a renewal of an individual's license, the section shall not consider any conviction or plea of guilty prior to the initial licensing. However, the board may consider a conviction or plea of guilty if it occurred after the individual was initially licensed, or after the most recent license renewal. (4) The section may grant an individual a conditional license that lasts for one year. After the one-year period has expired, the license is no longer considered conditional, and the individual shall be considered fully licensed. (M) Notwithstanding divisions (H) and (L) of this section and sections 4740.04 and 4740.05 of the Revised Code, the board may establish rules that amend the continuing education requirements and license renewal schedule for licensees as provided in or adopted pursuant to those sections for the purpose of establishing a compliance incentive program. These rules may include provisions for the creation of the program and the qualifications, continuing education requirements, and renewal schedule for the program. Sec. 4741.04. A veterinary-client-patient relationship serves as the basis for interaction between veterinarians, their clients, and their patients. A veterinary-client-patient relationship exists when all of the following conditions have been met: (A) A veterinarian assumes responsibility for making clinical judgments regarding the health of a patient and the need for medical treatment, medical services, or both for the patient, and the client has agreed to follow the veterinarian's instructions regarding the patient. (B) The veterinarian has sufficient knowledge of the patient to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the medical condition of the patient. In order to demonstrate that the veterinarian has sufficient knowledge, the veterinarian shall have seen the patient recently and also shall be acquainted personally with the keeping and care of the patient either by examining doing any of the following: (1) Examining the patient or by making in person; (2) Examining the patient in real time via telehealth services in accordance with section 4741.041 of the Revised Code; (3) Making medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the patient is kept. (C) The veterinarian is readily available for a follow-up evaluation, or has arranged for emergency coverage, in the event the patient suffers adverse reactions to the treatment regimen or the treatment regimen fails. Sec. 4741.041. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Human food product" means livestock raised for human consumption or livestock whose products are used for human consumption. (2) "Livestock" means porcine animals, bovine animals, caprine animals, ovine animals, and poultry. (3) "Tele-advice" means the provision of any health information, opinion, or guidance by a veterinary professional that is not intended to diagnose, treat, issue certificates of veterinary inspection, or issue prognoses of the physical or behavioral illness or injury of an animal or issue. A veterinarian-client-patient relationship as required under section 4741.04 of the Revised Code is not required to provide tele-advice. (B) A licensed veterinarian may conduct the practice of veterinary medicine via telehealth services if all of the following apply: (1) The veterinarian obtains the informed consent from the client, including an acknowledgement that the standards of care prescribed by this chapter equally apply to in-person and telehealth visits. The veterinarian shall maintain documentation of the consent for at least three years after receiving the informed consent. (2) The veterinarian provides the client with the veterinarian's name and contact information and secures an alternate means of contacting the client if the telehealth visit is interrupted. Following the telehealth visit, the veterinarian shall make available to the client an electronic or written record of the visit. The electronic or written record shall include the veterinarian's license number. (3) Before conducting an evaluation of a patient via a telehealth visit, the veterinarian advises the client of all of the following: (a) The veterinarian may ultimately recommend an in-person visit with the veterinarian or another licensed veterinarian; (b) The veterinarian is prohibited under federal law from prescribing certain drugs or medications based only on a telehealth visit; (c) The appointment for a telehealth visit may be terminated at any time. (C) A licensed veterinarian may prescribe drugs or medications after establishing a veterinary-client-patient relationship via telehealth services, except that all of the following apply: (1) The veterinarian may issue an initial prescription for not more than fourteen days. The veterinarian may issue one refill for not more than fourteen days if the veterinarian sees the patient for another telehealth visit. For additional refills, the patient shall visit the veterinarian in person. (2) The veterinarian shall notify the client that certain prescription drugs or medications may be available at a pharmacy and, if requested, the veterinarian will submit a prescription to a pharmacy of the client's choosing; (3) The veterinarian shall not order, prescribe, or make available a controlled substance, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code, unless the veterinarian has performed an in-person physical examination of the patient. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, a licensed veterinarian whose client is engaged in the raising of livestock for human food products may not use telehealth services for those livestock unless the veterinarian has established a veterinary-client-patient relationship in person with respect to those livestock prior to the use of telehealth services. (2) A licensed veterinarian whose client is engaged in the raising of livestock for human food products may conduct tele-advice services for those livestock prior to the veterinarian establishing a veterinary-client-patient relationship in person with the client. (E) Division (D) of this section applies to the extent permitted under federal law. (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to invalidate or overrule the provisions of Chapter 956. of the Revised Code. (G) For purposes of this section, the practice of veterinary medicine occurs in the state in which the patient is located. Sec. 4743.05. (A) Except as otherwise provided in sections 4701.20, 4723.062, 4723.082, 4729.65, 4781.121, and 4781.28 of the Revised Code, all money collected under Chapters 3773., 4701., 4703., 4709., 4713., 4715., 4717., 4723., 4725., 4729., 4732., 4733., 4734., 4741., 4744., 4747., 4753., 4755., 4757., 4758., 4771., 4775., 4779., and 4781. of the Revised Code and all license, certificate, and permit fees received by the state board of education, including the fees established under section 3319.51 of the Revised Code, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the occupational licensing and regulatory fund, which is hereby created for use in administering such chapters and in paying the operating expenses of the state board of education. (B) At the end of each quarter, the director of budget and management shall transfer from the occupational licensing and regulatory fund to the nurse education assistance fund created in section 3333.28 of the Revised Code the amount certified to the director under division (B) of section 4723.08 of the Revised Code. (C) At the end of each quarter, the director shall transfer from the occupational licensing and regulatory fund to the certified public accountant education assistance fund created in section 4701.26 of the Revised Code the amount certified to the director under division (H)(2) of section 4701.10 of the Revised Code. (D) On August 30, 2021, and every two years thereafter, the director shall transfer from the occupational licensing and regulatory fund to the veterinary student debt assistance fund created in section 4741.56 of the Revised Code the amount certified to the director under section 4741.57 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4743.10. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Health care service" means medical care provided to any patient at any time over the entire course of the patient's treatment and may include one or more of the following: testing; diagnosis; referral; dispensing or administering a drug, medication, or device; psychological therapy or counseling; research; prognosis; therapy; record making procedures and notes related to treatment; preparation for or performance of a surgery or procedure; or any other care or services performed or provided by any medical practitioner. (2) "Medical practitioner" means any person who facilitates or participates in the provision of health care services, including nursing, physician services, counseling and social work, psychological and psychiatric services, research services, surgical services, laboratory services, and the provision of pharmaceuticals and may include any of the following: any student or faculty at a medical, nursing, mental health, or counseling institution of higher education or an allied health professional, paraprofessional, or employee or contractor of a health care institution. (3) "Participation in a health care service" means to provide, perform, assist with, facilitate, refer for, counsel for, advise with regard to, admit for the purposes of providing, or take part in any way in providing, any health care service. (B) Notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, a medical practitioner, health care institution, or health care payer has the freedom to decline to perform, participate in, or pay for any health care service which violates the practitioner's, institution's, or payer's conscience as informed by the moral, ethical, or religious beliefs or principles held by the practitioner, institution, or payer, including when the procedure is ordered by a court. Exercise of the right of conscience is limited to conscience-based objections to a particular health care service. (C) Whenever a situation arises in which a requested course of treatment includes a particular health care service that conflicts with the moral, ethical, or religious beliefs or convictions of a medical practitioner, the medical practitioner shall be excused from participating in the particular health care service to which the practitioner has a conflict. When a medical practitioner becomes aware of the conflict, the medical practitioner shall notify the practitioner's supervisor, if applicable, and request to be excused from participating in the particular health care service that conflicts with the practitioner's beliefs or convictions. When possible and when the medical practitioner is willing, the medical practitioner shall seek to transfer the patient to a colleague who will provide the requested health care service. If participation in a transfer of care for a particular health care service violates the medical practitioner's beliefs or convictions or no willing colleague is identified, the patient shall be notified and provided the opportunity to seek an alternate medical practitioner. Upon patient request, the patient's medical records shall be promptly released to the patient. The medical practitioner is responsible for providing all appropriate health care services, other than the particular health care service that conflicts with the medical practitioner's beliefs or convictions, until another medical practitioner or facility is available. (D) A medical practitioner, health care institution, or health care payer shall not be civilly, criminally, or administratively liable for exercising the practitioner's, institution's, or payer's right of conscience by declining to participate in or pay for a particular health care service. A health care institution shall not be civilly, criminally, or administratively liable for the exercise of conscience rights not to participate in a particular health care service by a medical practitioner who is employed by, under contract with, or granted admitting privileges by the health care institution. A medical practitioner, health care institution, or health care payer shall not be discriminated against or suffer any other adverse action as a result of declining to participate in or pay for a particular health care service on the basis of conscience. (E) Unless specifically prohibited by law, a medical practitioner shall not be discriminated against or suffer any adverse action for disclosing any information that the medical practitioner reasonably believes evinces any violation of this section or any other law, rule, or regulation; any violation of any standard of care or other ethical guidelines for the provision of any health care service; or gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of authority, or a substantial and specific danger to public health or safety. (F) A civil action for damages, injunctive relief, or any other appropriate relief may be brought by any medical practitioner, health care institution, or health care payer for any violation of any provision of this section. Upon a finding of a violation of the rights of conscience in this section, a court shall award threefold the actual damages sustained and reasonable costs and attorney's fees. A court considering such civil action may also award injunctive relief, which may include reinstatement of a medical practitioner to the practitioner's previous position, reinstatement of board certification, and relicensure of a health care institution or health care payer. (G) This section shall not be construed to override the requirement to provide emergency medical treatment to all patients as set forth in 42 U.S.C. § 1395dd. (H) With respect to the right of a health care payer to decline to pay for a health care service as established in division (B) of this section, the payer's right to decline applies only to payments and health care services for which a contract has been entered into between the payer and policyholder on or after the effective date of this section September 30, 2021. Sec. 4749.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Private investigator" means any person who engages in the business of private investigation. (B) "Business of private investigation" means, except when performed by one excluded under division (H) of this section, the conducting, for hire, in person or through a partner or employees, of any investigation relevant to any crime or wrong done or threatened, or to obtain information on the identity, habits, conduct, movements, whereabouts, affiliations, transactions, reputation, credibility, or character of any person, or to locate and recover lost or stolen property, or to determine the cause of or responsibility for any libel or slander, or any fire, accident, or damage to property, or to secure evidence for use in any legislative, administrative, or judicial investigation or proceeding. (C) "Security guard provider" means any person who engages in the business of security services. (D) "Business of security services" means either of the following: (1) Furnishing, for hire, watchpersons, guards, private patrol officers, or other persons whose primary duties are to protect persons or property; (2) Furnishing, for hire, guard dogs, or armored motor vehicle security services, in connection with the protection of persons or property. (E) "Class A license" means a license issued under section 4749.03 of the Revised Code that qualifies the person issued the license to engage in the business of private investigation and the business of security services. (F) "Class B license" means a license issued under section 4749.03 of the Revised Code that qualifies the person issued the license to engage only in the business of private investigation. (G) "Class C license" means a license issued under section 4749.03 of the Revised Code that qualifies the person issued the license to engage only in the business of security services. (H) "Private investigator," "business of private investigation," "security guard provider," and "business of security services" do not include: (1) Public officers and employees whose official duties require them to engage in investigatory activities; (2) Attorneys at law or any expert hired by an attorney at law for consultation or litigation purposes; (3) A consumer reporting agency, as defined in the "Fair Credit Reporting Act," 84 Stat. 1128, 15 U.S.C.A. 1681a, as amended, provided that the consumer reporting agency is in compliance with the requirements of that act and that the agency's activities are confined to any of the following: (a) The issuance of consumer credit reports; (b) The conducting of limited background investigations that pertain only to a client's prospective tenant and that are engaged in with the prior written consent of the prospective tenant; (c) The business of pre-employment background investigation. As used in division (H)(3)(c) of this section, "business of pre-employment background investigation" means, and is limited to, furnishing for hire, in person or through a partner or employees, the conducting of limited background investigations, in-person interviews, telephone interviews, or written inquiries that pertain only to a client's prospective employee and the employee's employment and that are engaged in with the prior written consent of the prospective employee. (4) Certified public insurance adjusters that hold a certificate of authority issued pursuant to sections 3951.01 to 3951.09 of the Revised Code, while the adjuster is investigating the cause of or responsibility for a fire, accident, or other damage to property with respect to a claim or claims for loss or damage under a policy of insurance covering real or personal property; (5) Personnel placement services and persons who act as employees of such entities engaged in investigating matters related to personnel placement activities; (6) An employee in the regular course of the employee's employment, engaged in investigating matters pertinent to the business of the employee's employer or protecting property in the possession of the employee's employer, provided the employer is deducting all applicable state and federal employment taxes on behalf of the employee and neither the employer nor the employee is employed by, associated with, or acting for or on behalf of any private investigator or security guard provider; (7) Any better business bureau or similar organization or any of its employees while engaged in the maintenance of the quality of business activities relating to consumer sales and services; (8) An accountant who is registered or certified under Chapter 4701. of the Revised Code or any of the accountant's employees while engaged in activities for which the accountant is certified or registered; (9) Any person who, for hire or otherwise, conducts genealogical research in this state. As used in division (H)(9) of this section, "genealogical research" means the determination of the origins and descent of families, including the identification of individuals, their family relationships, and the biographical details of their lives. "Genealogical research" does not include furnishing for hire services for locating missing persons or natural or birth parents or children. (10) Any person residing in this state who conducts research for the purpose of locating the last known owner of unclaimed funds, provided that the person is in compliance with Chapter 169. of the Revised Code and rules adopted thereunder. The exemption set forth in division (H)(10) of this section applies only to the extent that the person is conducting research for the purpose of locating the last known owner of unclaimed funds. As used in division (H)(10) of this section, "owner" and "unclaimed funds" have the same meanings as in section 169.01 of the Revised Code. (11) A professional engineer who is registered under Chapter 4733. of the Revised Code or any of his the engineer's employees. As used in division (H)(11) of this section and notwithstanding division (I) of this section, "employee" has the same meaning as in section 4101.01 of the Revised Code. (12) Any person residing in this state who, for hire or otherwise, conducts research for the purpose of locating persons to whom the state of Ohio owes money in the form of warrants, as defined in section 131.01 of the Revised Code, that the state voided but subsequently reissues. (13) An independent insurance adjuster who, as an individual, an independent contractor, an employee of an independent contractor, adjustment bureau association, corporation, insurer, partnership, local recording agent, managing general agent, or self-insurer, engages in the business of independent insurance adjustment, or any person who supervises the handling of claims except while acting as an employee of an insurer licensed in this state while handling claims pertaining to specific policies written by that insurer. As used in division (H)(13) of this section, "independent insurance adjustment" means conducting investigations to determine the cause of or circumstances concerning a fire, accident, bodily injury, or damage to real or personal property; determining the extent of damage of that fire, accident, injury, or property damage; securing evidence for use in a legislative, administrative, or judicial investigation or proceeding, adjusting losses; and adjusting or settling claims, including the investigation, adjustment, denial, establishment of damages, negotiation, settlement, or payment of claims in connection with insurance contractors, self-insured programs, or other similar insurance programs. "Independent adjuster" does not include either of the following: (a) An attorney who adjusts insurance losses incidental to the practice of law and who does not advertise or represent that the attorney is an independent insurance adjuster; (b) A licensed agent or general agent of an insurer licensed in this state who processes undisputed or uncontested losses for insurers under policies issued by that agent or general agent. (14) Except for a commissioned peace officer who engages in the business of private investigation or compensates others who engage in the business of private investigation or the business of security services or both, any commissioned peace officer as defined in division (B) of section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (15) Security personnel and contractors for a security organization under an approved physical protection program at a commercial nuclear power plant licensed by the United States nuclear regulatory commission, or its successor agency, while performing duties related to protecting the plant and nuclear material from threats, thefts, and sabotage. (I) "Employee" means every person who may be required or directed by any employer, in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit, to engage in any employment, or to go, or work, or be at any time in any place of employment, provided that the employer of the employee deducts all applicable state and federal employment taxes on behalf of the employee. Sec. 4751.20. (A) Except as provided in section 4751.201 of the Revised Code, and subject to section 4751.32 of the Revised Code, the board of executives of long-term services and supports shall issue a nursing home administrator license to an individual under this section if all of the following requirements are satisfied: (1) The individual has submitted to the board a completed application for the license in accordance with rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code and paid an application fee of two hundred fifty dollars. (2) If the individual is required by rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code to serve as a nursing home administrator in trainingresident, the individual has paid to the board the administrator in training application fee of two hundred fifty dollars. (3) The individual is at least twenty-one years of age. (4) The individual has successfully completed educational requirements and work experience specified in rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code, including, if so required by the rules, experience obtained as a nursing home administrator in trainingresident. (5) The individual has complied with section 4776.02 of the Revised Code regarding a criminal records check. (6) The board, in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code, has determined that the results of the criminal records check do not make the individual ineligible for the license. (7) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the individual has passed the licensing examination administered under section 4751.15 of the Revised Code. (8) The individual has paid to the board three hundred fifty dollars for a temporary license issued under division (B) of this section. (9) The individual has paid to the board a license fee of two eight hundred fifty dollars. (9) (10) The individual has satisfied any additional requirements as may be prescribed in rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code. (B) Beginning January 1, 2025, the operator of a nursing home may request that the board issue a nursing home administrator license to an individual who meets the requirements specified in division (A) of this section but has not passed the licensing examination administered under section 4751.15 of the Revised Code, in order to fill a vacancy in the position of nursing home administrator at the nursing home resulting from a death, illness, or other unexpected cause. An individual issued a license under division (B) of this section shall submit to the board, not later than one hundred eighty days after a license is issued, satisfactory evidence that the individual has passed the licensing examination administered under section 4751.15 of the Revised Code. (C) A nursing home administrator license shall certify that the individual to whom it was issued has met the applicable requirements of this chapter and any applicable rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code and is authorized to practice nursing home administration while the license is valid. Sec. 4751.24. (A) Subject to section 4751.32 of the Revised Code, a nursing home administrator license is valid for two years and may be renewed and reinstated in accordance with this section. (B) If a licensed nursing home administrator intends to continue to practice nursing home administration without interruption after the administrator's license expires, the administrator shall apply to the board of executives of long-term services and supports for a renewed nursing home administrator license. Subject to section 4751.32 of the Revised Code, the board shall renew the license if the administrator does all of the following before the license expires: (1) Submits to the board a completed application for license renewal in accordance with rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code; (2) Pays to the board the license renewal fee of six eight hundred dollars; (3) Submits to the board satisfactory evidence of having attended such continuing education programs or courses of study as may be prescribed in rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code; (4) Satisfies any other requirements as may be prescribed in rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code. (C) If a nursing home administrator license issued under section 4751.20 or 4751.201 of the Revised Code is not renewed before it expires, the individual who held the license may apply to the board for the license's reinstatement. Subject to section 4751.32 of the Revised Code, the board shall reinstate the license if the individual does all of the following not later than one year after the date the license expired: (1) Submits to the board the completed application for license reinstatement in accordance with rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code; (2) Pays to the board the license reinstatement fee equal to the sum of the following: (a) Three Eight hundred dollars; (b) Fifty dollars for each calendar quarter that occurs during the period beginning on the date the license expires and ending on the last day of the calendar quarter during which the individual applies for license reinstatement, up to a maximum of two hundred dollars. (3) Submits to the board satisfactory evidence of having attended such continuing education programs or courses of study as may be prescribed in rules adopted by the board under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code; (4) Satisfies any other requirements as may be prescribed in rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code. (D) A licensed nursing home administrator who determines to temporarily abandon the practice of nursing home administration shall notify the board in writing immediately. The former administrator may thereafter resume the practice of nursing home administration within the state upon complying with the requirements of this section regarding biennial license renewal or license reinstatement, whichever is applicable. Sec. 4751.25. (A) Subject to section 4751.32 of the Revised Code, a health services executive license is valid for one year and may be renewed and reinstated in accordance with this section. (B) A licensed health services executive may apply to the board of executives of long-term services and supports for a renewed license. Subject to section 4751.32 of the Revised Code, the board shall renew the license if the licensed health services executive does all of the following before the license expires: (1) Submits to the board the completed application for license renewal in accordance with rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code; (2) Pays to the board the license renewal fee of fifty one hundred dollars; (3) Submits to the board satisfactory evidence of having attended such continuing education programs or courses of study as may be prescribed in rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) If a health services executive license is not renewed before it expires, the individual who held the license may apply to the board for the license's reinstatement. Subject to section 4751.32 of the Revised Code, the board shall reinstate the license if the individual does all of the following not later than one year after the date the license expired: (a) Submits to the board the completed application for license reinstatement in accordance with rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code; (b) Pays to the board the license reinstatement fee specified in division (C)(2) of this section; (c) Submits to the board satisfactory evidence of having attended such continuing education programs or courses of study as may be prescribed in rules adopted under section 4751.04 of the Revised Code. (2) The fee to reinstate a health services executive license under division (C)(1) of this section is the following: (a) If the individual applying for reinstatement has, at the same time, applied for reinstatement of a nursing home administrator license under division (C) of section 4751.24 of the Revised Code and paid the reinstatement fee required by division (C)(2) of that section, one hundred dollars; (b) If division (C)(2)(a) of this section does not apply to the individual, the sum of the following: (i) One hundred dollars; (ii) Twenty-five dollars for each calendar quarter that occurs during the period beginning on the date the license expired and ending on the last day of the calendar quarter during which the individual applies for license reinstatement, up to a maximum of one hundred dollars. Sec. 4758.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Accredited educational institution" means an educational institution accredited by an accrediting agency accepted by the Ohio board department of regentshigher education. (B)(1) "Alcohol and other drug clinical counseling principles, methods, or procedures" means an approach to chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling that emphasizes the chemical dependency counselor's role in systematically assisting clients through all of the following: (a) Analyzing background and current information; (b) Exploring possible solutions; (c) Developing and providing a treatment plan; (d) In the case of an independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor, independent chemical dependency counselor, or chemical dependency counselor III only, diagnosing chemical dependency conditions. (2) "Alcohol and other drug clinical counseling principles, methods, or procedures" includes counseling, assessing, consulting, and referral as they relate to chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions. (C) "Chemical dependency conditions" means those conditions relating to the abuse of or dependency on alcohol or other drugs that are classified in accepted nosologies, including the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders and the international classification of diseases, and in editions of those nosologies published after December 23, 2002. (D) "Chemical dependency counseling" means rendering or offering to render to individuals, groups, or the public a counseling service involving the application of alcohol and other drug clinical counseling principles, methods, or procedures to assist individuals who are abusing or dependent on alcohol or other drugs. (E) "Gambling disorder" means a persistent and recurring maladaptive gambling behavior that is classified in accepted nosologies, including the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders and the international classification of diseases, and in editions of those nosologies published after September 15, 2014. (F)(D) "Prevention services" means a comprehensive, multi-system set of individual and environmental approaches that maximizes physical health, promotes safety, and precludes the onset of behavioral health disorders. (G)(E) Unless the context provides otherwise, "scope of practice" means the services, methods, and techniques in which and the areas for which a person who holds a license, certificate, or endorsement under this chapter is trained and qualified. (H)(F) "Substance abuse professional" has the same meaning as in 49 C.F.R. 40.3. (G) "Substance use disorder conditions" means those conditions relating to the abuse of or dependency on alcohol or other drugs that are classified in accepted nosologies, including the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders and the international classification of diseases, and in editions of those nosologies published after December 23, 2002. (H) "Substance use disorder counseling" means rendering or offering to render to individuals, groups, or the public a counseling service involving the application of alcohol and other drug clinical counseling principles, methods, or procedures to assist individuals who are abusing or dependent on alcohol or other drugs. (I) "U.S.United States department of transportation drug and alcohol testing program" means a transportation workplace drug and alcohol testing program governed by 49 C.F.R. part 40. Sec. 4758.02. (A) Except as provided in section 4758.03 of the Revised Code, no person shall do any of the following: (1)(A) Engage in or represent to the public that the person engages in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling for a fee, salary, or other consideration unless the person holds a valid independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor license, independent chemical dependency counselor license, chemical dependency counselor III license, chemical dependency counselor II license, or chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate issued under this chapter; (2)(B) Use the title "licensed independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor," "LICDC-CS," "licensed independent chemical dependency counselor," "LICDC," "licensed chemical dependency counselor III," "LCDC III," "licensed chemical dependency counselor II," "LCDC II," "chemical dependency counselor assistant," "CDCA," or any other title or description incorporating the word words "chemical dependency counselor" or any other initials used to identify persons acting in those capacities unless currently authorized under this chapter to act in the capacity indicated by the title or initials; (3)(C) Represent to the public that the person holds a gambling disorder endorsement unless the person holds a valid gambling disorder endorsement issued under this chapter; (4)(D) Represent to the public that the person is a registered applicant unless the person holds a valid registered applicant certificate issued under this chapter; (5)(E) Use the title "certified prevention consultant," "CPC," "certified prevention specialist," "CPS," "certified prevention specialist assistant," "CPSA," "registered applicant," "RA," or any other title, description, or initials used to identify persons acting in those capacities unless currently authorized under this chapter to act in the capacity indicated by the title or initials. (B) No person shall engage in or represent to the public that the person engages in chemical dependency counseling as a chemical dependency counselor I. Sec. 4758.03. Division (A) of section Section 4758.02 of the Revised Code does not apply to any of the following: (A) An individual who holds a valid license, registration, certificate, or credentials issued under another chapter of the Revised Code while performing services within the recognized scope, standards, and ethics of the individual's profession; (B) An individual who is a rabbi, priest, Christian Science practitioner, clergy, or member of a religious order and other individuals participating with them in pastoral counseling when the chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling activities are within the scope of the performance of their regular or specialized ministerial duties and are performed under the auspices or sponsorship of an established and legally cognizable church, denomination, or sect or an integrated auxiliary of a church as defined in paragraph (h) of 26 Code of Federal Regulations 1.6033-2 (2000) as amended, and the individual rendering the service remains accountable to the established authority of that church, denomination, sect, or integrated auxiliary; (C) A student in an accredited educational institution while carrying out activities that are part of the student's prescribed course of study if the activities are supervised as required by the educational institution and the student is not represented as an individual who holds a license or certificate issued under this chapter. Sec. 4758.10. (A) There is hereby created the chemical dependency professionals board. (B) The governor shall appoint all of the following voting members of the board with the advice and consent of the senate: (1) Four individuals who hold a valid independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor license or independent chemical dependency counselor license issued under this chapter, including at least two of whom have received at least a master's degree in a field related to chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling from an accredited educational institution; (2) Two individuals who hold a valid chemical dependency counselor III license issued under this chapter; (3) One individual who holds a valid chemical dependency counselor II license issued under this chapter; (4) Two individuals who hold a valid prevention consultant certificate or prevention specialist certificate issued under this chapter; (5) One individual who is authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery and has experience practicing in a field related to chemical dependency counseling; (6) Two individuals who represent the public and have not practiced chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling or prevention services and have not been involved in the delivery of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling services or prevention services. At least one of these individuals shall be at least fifty years of age. During their terms, the public members shall not practice chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling or prevention services or be involved in the delivery of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling services or prevention services. (C) Not later than ninety days after December 23, 2002, the The director of mental health and addiction services shall appoint an individual who represents the department of mental health and addiction services to serve as an ex officio member of the chemical dependency professionals board. (D) Not more than one-half of the voting members of the board may be of the same gender or members of the same political party. At least two voting members of the board shall be of African, Native American, Hispanic, or Asian descent. Sec. 4758.13. The chemical dependency professionals board shall meet to discuss matters relating to the administration and operation of the board and the regulation of the practices of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling and prevention services. The board shall hold at least one regular meeting every three months. Additional meetings may be held at such times as the board determines, on the call of the chairperson, or on the written request to the executive director of three or more voting board members. If three or more voting members request a meeting, the executive director shall call a meeting, which shall be held not later than seven days after the request is received. Seven voting members of the board constitute a quorum to conduct business. Except as provided in section 4758.32 of the Revised Code, no action shall be taken without the concurrence of at least a quorum. At its first meeting each year, the board shall elect a chairperson from among its voting members. No member shall serve more than two consecutive terms as chairperson. The board shall keep any records and minutes necessary to fulfill the duties established by this chapter and rules adopted under it. Sec. 4758.20. (A) The chemical dependency professionals board shall adopt rules to establish, specify, or provide for all of the following: (1) Fees for the purposes authorized by section 4758.21 of the Revised Code; (2) If the board, pursuant to section 4758.221 of the Revised Code, elects to administer examinations for individuals seeking to act as substance abuse professionals in a U.S.United States department of transportation drug and alcohol testing program, the board's administration of the examinations; (3) For the purpose of section 4758.23 of the Revised Code, codes of ethical practice and professional conduct for individuals who hold a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter; (4) For the purpose of section 4758.24 of the Revised Code, all of the following: (a) The documents that an individual seeking such a license, certificate, or endorsement must submit to the board; (b) Requirements to obtain the license, certificate, or endorsement that are in addition to the requirements established under sections 4758.39, 4758.40, 4758.41, 4758.42, 4758.43, 4758.44, 4758.45, 4758.46, 4758.47, and 4758.48 of the Revised Code. The additional requirements may include preceptorshipsinternships and practicums. (c) The period of time that an individual whose registered applicant certificate has expired must wait before applying for a new registered applicant certificate. (5) For the purpose of section 4758.28 of the Revised Code, requirements for approval of continuing education courses of study for individuals who hold a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter; (6) For the purpose of section 4758.30 of the Revised Code, both of the following: (a) The intervention for and treatment of an individual holding a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter whose abilities to practice are impaired due to abuse of or dependency on alcohol or other drugs or other physical or mental condition; (7)(b) Requirements governing reinstatement of a suspended or revoked license, certificate, or endorsement under division (C) of section 4758.30 of the Revised Code, including requirements for determining the amount of time an individual must wait to apply for reinstatement; (8). (7) For the purpose of section 4758.31 of the Revised Code, methods of ensuring that all records the board holds pertaining to an investigation remain confidential during the investigation; (9)(8) Criteria for employees of the board to follow when performing their duties under division (B) of section 4758.35 of the Revised Code; (10)(9) For the purpose of division (A)(1)(A) of section 4758.39 and, division (A)(1)(A) of section 4758.40, and division (A) of section 4758.41 of the Revised Code, course requirements for a degree in a behavioral science or nursing that may include specific content areas and minimum hours for course requirements; (11)(10) For the purpose of division (A)(2)(B) of section 4758.39 of the Revised Code, the number of hours of compensated work or supervised internship experience that an individual must have and the number of those hours that must be in clinical supervisory experience; (12)(11) For the purpose of division (A)(3)(C) of section 4758.39, division (A)(3)(C) of section 4758.40, division (A)(3) (C) of section 4758.41, and divisions division (A)(3) and (D)(3) of section 4758.42 of the Revised Code, both of the following: (a) The number of hours of training in chemical dependency substance use disorders an individual must have; (b) Training requirements for chemical dependency substance use disorders that shall, at a minimum, include qualifications for the individuals who provide the training and the content areas covered in the training. (13)(12) For the purpose of division (A)(2)(B) of section 4758.40, division (A)(2)(B) of section 4758.41, and division (A)(2) of section 4758.42 of the Revised Code, the number of hours of compensated work or supervised internship experience that an individual must have; (14) For the purpose of division (B)(2)(b) of section 4758.40 and division (B)(2) of section 4758.41 of the Revised Code, requirements for the forty clock hours of training on the version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders that is current at the time of the training, including the number of the clock hours that must be on substance-related disorders, the number of the clock hours that must be on chemical dependency conditions, and the number of the clock hours that must be on awareness of other mental and emotional disorders; (15)(13) For the purpose of division (A)(1) (A) of section 4758.41 of the Revised Code, course requirements for a degree in a behavioral science or nursing; (16)(14) For the purpose of division (C)(2) of section 4758.42 of the Revised Code, education both of the following: (a) Education requirements for chemical dependencysubstance use disorders; (17) For the purpose of division (C)(3) of section 4758.42 of the Revised Code, requirements (b) Requirements for programs that provide practicum experience in chemical dependency; (18)substance use disorders. (15) For the purpose of division (A) of section 4758.43 of the Revised Code, both of the following: (a) The number of hours of training in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling that an individual must have; (b) Training requirements for chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling that shall, at a minimum, include qualifications for the individuals who provide the training and the content areas covered in the training. (19)(16) For the purpose of division (A)(1) of section 4758.44 of the Revised Code, the both of the following: (a) The number of hours of compensated work experience in prevention services that an individual must have and the number of those hours that must be in administering or supervising the services; (20) For the purpose of division (A)(2) of section 4758.44 of the Revised Code, the (b) The field of study in which an individual must obtain at least a bachelor's degree; (21). (17) For the purpose of division (A)(3)(C) of section 4758.44, division (A)(3)(C) of section 4758.45, and division (D) of section 4758.46 of the Revised Code, both of the following: (a) The number of hours of prevention-related education that an individual must have; (b) Requirements for prevention-related education. (22) (18) For the purpose of division (A)(4)(D) of section 4758.44 of the Revised Code, the number of hours of administrative or supervisory education that an individual must have; (23)(19) For the purpose of division (A)(1) of section 4758.45 of the Revised Code, the both of the following: (a) The number of hours of compensated or volunteer work, field placement, intern, or practicum experience in prevention services that an individual must have and the number of those hours that must be in planning or delivering the services; (24) For the purpose of division (A)(2) of section 4758.45 of the Revised Code, the (b) The field of study in which an individual must obtain at least an associate's degree; (25) . (20) For the purpose of division (C) of section 4758.46 of the Revised Code, the number of hours of compensated or volunteer work, field placement, intern, or practicum experience in prevention services that an individual must have; (26)(21) Standards for the one hundred hours of compensated work or supervised internship in gambling disorder direct clinical experience required by division (B)(2) of section 4758.48 of the Revised Code; (27)(22) For the purpose of section 4758.51 of the Revised Code, continuing both of the following: (a) Continuing education requirements for individuals who hold a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter; (28) For the purpose of section 4758.51 of the Revised Code, the (b) The number of hours of continuing education that an individual must complete to have an expired license, certificate, or endorsement restored under section 4758.26 of the Revised Code; (29) . (23) For the purpose of divisions (A) and (B) of section 4758.52 of the Revised Code, training requirements for chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling; (30)(24) The duties, which may differ, of all of the following: (a) An independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor licensed under this chapter who supervises a chemical dependency counselor III under section 4758.56 of the Revised Code; (b) An independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor, independent chemical dependency counselor, or chemical dependency counselor III licensed under this chapter who supervises a chemical dependency counselor assistant under section 4758.59 of the Revised Code; (c) A prevention consultant or prevention specialist certified under this chapter who supervises a prevention specialist assistant or registered applicant under section 4758.61 of the Revised Code. (31)(25) The duties of an independent chemical dependency counselor licensed under this chapter who holds the gambling disorder endorsement who supervises a chemical dependency counselor III with the gambling disorder endorsement under section 4758.62 of the Revised Code. (32)(26) Anything else the board considers necessary to administer this chapter. (B) All rules adopted under this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and any applicable federal laws and regulations. (C) When it adopts rules under this section, the board may consider standards established by any national association or other organization representing the interests of those involved in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling or prevention services. Sec. 4758.22. The chemical dependency professionals board shall prepare, cause to be prepared, or procure the use of, and grade, cause to be graded, or procure the grading of, examinations to determine the competence of individuals seeking an independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor license, independent chemical dependency counselor license, chemical dependency counselor III license, chemical dependency counselor II license, prevention consultant certificate, or prevention specialist certificate. The board may develop the examinations or use examinations prepared by state or national organizations that represent the interests of those involved in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling or prevention services. The board shall conduct examinations at least twice each year and shall determine the level of competence necessary for a passing score. An individual may not sit for an examination administered pursuant to this section unless the individual meets the requirements to obtain the license or certificate the individual seeks, other than the requirement to have passed the examination, and pays the fee established under section 4758.21 of the Revised Code. An individual who is denied admission to the examination may appeal the denial in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4758.221. In accordance with rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code, the chemical dependency professionals board may administer examinations for individuals seeking to act as substance abuse professionals in a U.S.United States department of transportation drug and alcohol testing program. If it elects to administer the examinations, the board shall use examinations that comprehensively cover all the elements of substance abuse professional qualification training listed in 49 C.F.R. 40.281(c)(1) and are prepared by a nationally recognized professional or training organization that represents the interests of those involved in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling services. Sec. 4758.23. (A) In rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code, the chemical dependency professionals board shall establish codes of ethical practice and professional conduct for the following: (1) Individuals who hold a valid independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor license, independent chemical dependency counselor license, chemical dependency counselor III license, chemical dependency counselor II license, or chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate issued under this chapter; (2) Individuals who hold a valid prevention consultant certificate, prevention specialist certificate, prevention specialist assistant certificate, or registered applicant certificate issued under this chapter; (3) Individuals who hold a valid gambling disorder endorsement. (B) The codes for individuals identified under division (A)(1)(A) of this section shall define unprofessional conduct, which shall include engaging in a dual relationship multiple relationships with a client, former client, consumer, or former consumer; committing an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or exploitation of a client, former client, consumer, or former consumer; and, except as permitted by law, violating client or consumer confidentiality. (C) The codes for individuals identified under division (A)(1)divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section may be based on any codes of ethical practice and professional conduct developed by national associations or other organizations representing the interests of those involved in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling or prevention services. The codes for individuals identified under division (A)(2) of this section may be based on any codes of ethical practice and professional conduct developed by national associations or other organizations representing the interests of those involved in prevention services. The board may establish standards in the codes that are more stringent than those established by the national associations or other organizations. Sec. 4758.24. (A) The chemical dependency professionals board shall issue a license, certificate, or endorsement under this chapter to an individual who meets all of the following requirements: (1) Except as provided in section 4758.241 of the Revised Code, submits Submits a properly completed application and all other documentation specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (2) Except as provided in section 4758.241 of the Revised Code, pays Pays the fee established under section 4758.21 of the Revised Code for the license, certificate, or endorsement that the individual seeks; (3) Meets the requirements to obtain the license, certificate, or endorsement that the individual seeks as specified in section 4758.39, 4758.40, 4758.41, 4758.42, 4758.43, 4758.44, 4758.45, 4758.46, 4758.47, or 4758.48 of the Revised Code; (4) Meets any additional requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code to obtain the license, certificate, or endorsement that the individual seeks. (B) The board shall not do either of the following: (1) Issue a certificate to practice as a chemical dependency counselor I; (2) Issue issue a new registered applicant certificate to an individual whose previous registered applicant certificate has been expired for less than the period of time specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4758.27. The chemical dependency professionals board shall not renew or restore under section 4758.26 of the Revised Code either of the following: (A) A certificate to practice as a chemical dependency counselor I; (B) A a registered applicant certificate. Sec. 4758.30. (A) The chemical dependency professionals board, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may, except as provided in division (B) of this section, refuse to issue a license, certificate, or endorsement applied for under this chapter; refuse to renew or restore a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter; suspend, revoke, or otherwise restrict a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter; or reprimand an individual holding a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter. These actions may be taken by the board regarding the applicant for a license, certificate, or endorsement or the individual holding a license, certificate, or endorsement for one or more of the following reasons: (1) Violation of any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under it; (2) Knowingly making a false statement on an application for a license, certificate, or endorsement or for renewal, restoration, or reinstatement of a license, certificate, or endorsement; (3) Acceptance of a commission or rebate for referring an individual to a person who holds a license or certificate issued by, or who is registered with, an entity of state government, including persons practicing chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, prevention services, gambling disorder counseling, or fields related to chemical dependency counseling, prevention services, or gambling disorder counselingany of the foregoing; (4) Conviction in this state or any other state jurisdiction of any crime that is a felony in this state; (5) Conviction in this state or any other state jurisdiction of a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice as an independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor, independent chemical dependency counselor, chemical dependency counselor III, chemical dependency counselor II, chemical dependency counselor assistant, prevention consultant, gambling disorder endorsee, prevention specialist, prevention specialist assistant, or registered applicant; (6) Inability to practice as an independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor, independent chemical dependency counselor, chemical dependency counselor III, chemical dependency counselor II, chemical dependency counselor assistant, gambling disorder endorsee, prevention consultant, prevention specialist, prevention specialist assistant, or registered applicant due to abuse of or dependency on alcohol or other drugs or other physical or by reason of mental conditionillness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (7) Practicing outside the individual's scope of practice; (8) Practicing without complying with the supervision requirements specified under section 4758.56, 4758.59, 4758.61, or 4758.62 of the Revised Code; (9) Violation of the code of ethical practice and professional conduct for chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, prevention services, or gambling disorder counseling adopted by the board pursuant to section 4758.23 of the Revised Code; (10) Revocation of a license, certificate, or endorsement or voluntary surrender of a license, certificate, or endorsement in another state or jurisdiction for an offense that would be a violation of this chapter. (B) The board shall not refuse to issue a license, certificate, or endorsement to an applicant because of a criminal conviction unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (C) An individual whose license, certificate, or endorsement has been suspended or revoked under this section may apply to the board for reinstatement after an amount of time the board shall determine in accordance with rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code. The board may accept or refuse an application for reinstatement. The board may require an examination for reinstatement of a license, certificate, or endorsement that has been suspended or revoked. Sec. 4758.31. The chemical dependency professionals board shall investigate alleged violations of this chapter or the rules adopted under it and alleged irregularities in the delivery of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling services, prevention services, or gambling disorder counseling services by individuals who hold a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter. As part of an investigation, the board may issue subpoenas, examine witnesses, and administer oaths. The board may receive any information necessary to conduct an investigation under this section that has been obtained in accordance with federal laws and regulations. If the board is investigating the provision of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling services or gambling disorder counseling services to a couple or group, it is not necessary for both members of the couple or all members of the group to consent to the release of information relevant to the investigation. The board shall ensure, in accordance with rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code, that all records it holds pertaining to an investigation remain confidential during the investigation. After the investigation, the records are public records except as otherwise provided by federal or state law. Sec. 4758.35. (A) An individual seeking a license, certificate, or endorsement issued under this chapter shall file with submit an application to the chemical dependency professionals board a written application on a form prescribed by in a manner that the board shall prescribe. Each form application shall state that a false statement made on the form application is the crime of falsification under section 2921.13 of the Revised Code. (B) The board shall require an individual or individuals employed by the board under section 4758.15 of the Revised Code to do both of the following in accordance with criteria established by rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code: (1) Receive and review all applications submitted to the board; (2) Submit to the board all applications the individual or individuals recommend the board review based on the criteria established in the rules. (C) The board shall review all applications submitted to the board pursuant to division (B)(2) of this section. Sec. 4758.36. As part of the review process under division (C) of section 4758.35 of the Revised Code of an application submitted by an applicant whose education or experience in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, prevention services, or gambling disorder counseling was obtained outside the United States, or whose education and experience both were obtained outside the United States, the chemical dependency professionals board shall determine whether the applicant's command of the English language and education or experience meet the standards required by this chapter and rules adopted under it. Sec. 4758.39. An individual seeking an independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor license shall meet the requirements of division (A) or (B) of this section. (A) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1)(A) Hold from an accredited educational institution at least a master's degree in either a behavioral science or nursing that meets the course requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (2)(B) Have not less than the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of compensated work or supervised internship experience, including at least the number of hours specified in those rules of clinical supervisory experience, in any of the following, not less than twenty per cent of which are in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling: (a) Chemical dependency services, substance abuse services, or both types of (1) Substance use disorder services; (b)(2) The practice of psychology, as defined in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code; (c)(3) The practice of professional counseling, the practice of social work, or the practice of marriage and family therapy, all as defined in section 4757.01 of the Revised Code. (3)(C) Have a minimum of the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of training in chemical dependency substance use disorders that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (4)(D) Unless the individual holds a valid license, registration, certificate, or credentials issued under another chapter of the Revised Code that authorizes the individual to engage in a profession whose scope of practice includes the clinical supervision of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, and diagnosing and treating chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions, pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as an independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor. (B) To meet the requirement of this division, an individual must hold, on March 22, 2013, a valid independent chemical dependency counselor license. Sec. 4758.40. An individual seeking an independent chemical dependency counselor license shall meet the requirements of division (A) or (B) of this section. (A) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1)(A) Hold from an accredited educational institution at least a master's degree in a behavioral science or nursing that meets the course requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (2)(B) Have not less than the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of compensated work or supervised internship experience in any of the following, not less than twenty per cent of which are in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling: (a) Chemical dependency services, substance abuse services, or both types of (1) Substance use disorder services; (b)(2) The practice of psychology, as defined in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code; (c)(3) The practice of professional counseling, the practice of social work, or the practice of marriage and family therapy, all as defined in section 4757.01 of the Revised Code. (3)(C) Have a minimum of the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of training in chemical dependency substance use disorders that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (4)(D) Unless the individual holds a valid license, registration, certificate, or credentials issued under another chapter of the Revised Code that authorizes the individual to engage in a profession whose scope of practice includes chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling and diagnosing and treating chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions, pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as an independent chemical dependency counselor. (B) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet both of the following requirements: (1) Hold, on December 23, 2002, a certificate or credentials that were accepted under former section 3793.07 of the Revised Code as authority to practice as a certified chemical dependency counselor III or certified chemical dependency counselor III-E; (2) Meet one of the following requirements: (a) Hold the degree described in division (A)(1) of this section; (b) Have held a chemical dependency counselor III, II, or I certificate for at least eight consecutive years and have not less than forty clock hours of training on the version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders that is current at the time of the training. The training must meet the requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code. An individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, a psychologist licensed under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code, or a licensed professional clinical counselor or independent social worker licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code may provide any portion of the training. An independent chemical dependency counselor licensed under this chapter who holds the degree described in division (A)(1) of this section may provide the portion of the training on chemical dependency conditions. Sec. 4758.41. An individual seeking a chemical dependency counselor III license shall meet the requirements of division (A), (B), or (C) of this section. (A) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1)(A) Hold from an accredited educational institution at least a bachelor's degree in a behavioral science or nursing that meets the course requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (2)(B) Have not less than the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of compensated work or supervised internship experience in any of the following, not less than twenty per cent of which are in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling: (a) Chemical dependency services, substance abuse services, or both types of (1) Substance use disorder services; (b)(2) The practice of psychology, as defined in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code; (c)(3) The practice of professional counseling, the practice of social work, or the practice of marriage and family therapy, all as defined in section 4757.01 of the Revised Code. (3)(C) Have a minimum of the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of training in chemical dependency substance use disorders that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (4)(D) Unless the individual holds a valid license, registration, certificate, or credentials issued under another chapter of the Revised Code that authorizes the individual to engage in a profession whose scope of practice includes chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling and diagnosing and treating chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions, pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as a chemical dependency counselor III. (B) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet both of the following requirements: (1) Hold, on December 23, 2002, a certificate or credentials that were accepted under former section 3793.07 of the Revised Code as authority to practice as a certified chemical dependency counselor III or certified chemical dependency counselor III-E; (2) Have not less than forty clock hours of training on the version of the diagnostic and statistical manual of mental disorders that is current at the time of the training. The training must meet the requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code. An individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery, a psychologist licensed under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code, or a licensed professional clinical counselor or independent social worker licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code may provide any portion of the training. An independent chemical dependency counselor licensed under this chapter who holds the degree described in division (A)(1) of section 4758.40 of the Revised Code may provide the portion of the training on chemical dependency conditions. (C) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1) Hold, on December 23, 2002, a certificate or credentials that were accepted under former section 3793.07 of the Revised Code as authority to practice as a certified chemical dependency counselor II; (2) Meet the requirement of division (B)(2) of this section; (3) Hold a bachelor's degree in a behavioral science. Sec. 4758.42. An individual seeking a chemical dependency counselor II license shall meet the requirements of division (A), or (B), or (C) of this section or, until three years after the effective date of this amendment, division (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this section. (A) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1) Hold from an accredited educational institution an associate's degree in a behavioral science or nursing or a bachelor's degree in any field; (2) Have not less than the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of compensated work or supervised internship experience in any of the following, not less than twenty per cent of which are in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling: (a) Chemical dependency services, substance abuse services, or both types of Substance use disorder services; (b) The practice of psychology, as defined in section 4732.01 of the Revised Code; (c) The practice of professional counseling, the practice of social work, or the practice of marriage and family therapy, all as defined in section 4757.01 of the Revised Code. (3) Have a minimum of the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of training in chemical dependency substance use disorders that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (4) Pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as a chemical dependency counselor II. (B) To meet the requirement of this division, an individual must hold, on December 23, 2002, a certificate or credentials that were accepted under former section 3793.07 of the Revised Code as authority to practice as a certified chemical dependency counselor II. (C) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1) Hold from an accredited educational institution an associate's or bachelor's degree in either of the following with a specialization in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling: (a) A behavioral science; (b) Nursing. (2) Have a minimum of one hundred eighty hours of education in chemical dependency substance use disorders that meets the requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (3) While holding a valid chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate, have successfully completed, over the course of not more than any two semesters, at least two hundred forty hours of supervised practicum experience in chemical dependency substance use disorder treatment through a program that meets all of the following requirements: (a) The program includes at least two hours per week of supervised practicum experience; (b) The program provides intensive outpatient treatment or a higher level of care, or another level of care if specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (c) The program meets other requirements specified in rules adopted under that section. (4) Have at least one thousand hours of compensated work experience as a chemical dependency counselor assistant; (5) Provide to the chemical dependency professionals board a written recommendation from an individual who supervised the individual's practice of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling as a chemical dependency counselor assistant as required by division (B) of section 4758.59 of the Revised Code; (6) Pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as a chemical dependency counselor II. (D) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1) Since at least December 31, 2008, continuously have done both of the following: (a) Held a valid chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate; (b) Practiced chemical dependency counseling while under supervision as required by division (B) of section 4758.59 of the Revised Code. (2) Provide to the board a written recommendation from an individual who supervised the individual's practice of chemical dependency counseling as a chemical dependency counselor assistant; (3) Have a minimum of the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of training in chemical dependency that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (4) Pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as a chemical dependency counselor II. Sec. 4758.43. An individual seeking a chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate shall meet either of the following requirements: (A) Have have at least the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of training in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (B) Hold, on December 23, 2002, a certificate or credentials that were accepted under former section 3793.07 of the Revised Code as authority to practice as a registered candidate. Sec. 4758.44. An individual seeking a prevention consultant certificate shall meet the requirements of division (A) or (B) of this section. (A) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1)(A) Have at least the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of compensated work experience in prevention services, including at least the number of hours specified in those rules of administering or supervising the services; (2)(B) Hold from an accredited educational institution at least a bachelor's degree in a field of study specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (3)(C) Have at least the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of prevention-related education that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (4)(D) Have at least the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of administrative or supervisory education; (5)(E) Pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as a prevention consultant. (B) To meet the requirement of this division, an individual must hold, on December 23, 2002, a certificate or credentials that were accepted under former section 3793.07 of the Revised Code as authority to practice as a certified prevention specialist II. Sec. 4758.45. An individual seeking a prevention specialist certificate shall meet the requirements of division (A) or (B) of this section. (A) To meet the requirements of this division, an individual must meet all of the following requirements: (1)(A) Have at least the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of compensated or volunteer work, field placement, intern, or practicum experience in prevention services, including at least the number of hours specified in those rules of planning or delivering the services; (2)(B) Hold from an accredited educational institution at least an associate's degree in a field of study specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code; (3)(C) Have at least the number of hours specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code of prevention-related education that meets the requirements specified in those rules; (4)(D) Pass one or more examinations administered pursuant to section 4758.22 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining competence to practice as a prevention specialist. (B) To meet the requirement of this division, an individual must hold, on December 23, 2002, a certificate or credentials that were accepted under former section 3793.07 of the Revised Code as authority to practice as a certified prevention specialist I. Sec. 4758.52. (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, each individual who holds an initial chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate shall complete, during the first twelve months that the initial certificate is in effect, at least thirty additional hours of training in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling that meets the requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code as a condition of having the initial certificate renewed. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, an individual whose initial chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate has expired shall complete at least thirty additional hours of training in chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling that meets the requirements specified in rules adopted under section 4758.20 of the Revised Code as a condition of receiving a restored chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate. (C) The chemical dependency professionals board may waive the additional training requirement established under this section for individuals who are unable to fulfill the requirement because of military service, illness, residence outside the United States, or any other reason the board considers acceptable. Sec. 4758.54. In addition to practicing chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, an individual holding a valid independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor license may do all of the following: (A) Diagnose and treat chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions; (B) Perform treatment planning, assessment, crisis intervention, individual and group counseling, case management, and education services as they relate to abuse of and dependency on alcohol and other drugs; (C) Provide clinical supervision of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling; (D) Refer individuals with nonchemical dependency non-substance use disorder conditions to appropriate sources of help. Sec. 4758.55. In addition to practicing chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, an individual holding a valid independent chemical dependency counselor license may do all of the following: (A) Diagnose and treat chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions; (B) Perform treatment planning, assessment, crisis intervention, individual and group counseling, case management, and education services as they relate to abuse of and dependency on alcohol and other drugs; (C) Provide clinical supervision of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling under the supervision of any of the following: (1) An independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor licensed under this chapter; (2) An individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (3) A psychologist licensed under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (4) A registered nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code or licensed professional clinical counselor, independent social worker, or independent marriage and family therapist licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code if such supervision is consistent with the scope of practice of the registered nurse, licensed professional clinical counselor, independent social worker, or independent marriage and family therapist; (5) An individual authorized to practice as a certified nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (D) Refer individuals with nonchemical dependency non-substance use disorder conditions to appropriate sources of help. Sec. 4758.56. (A) In addition to practicing chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, an individual holding a valid chemical dependency counselor III license may do all of the following: (1) Diagnose chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions under the supervision of any of the professionals listed in section 4758.561 of the Revised Code; (2) Treat chemical dependency substance use disorder conditions; (3) Perform treatment planning, assessment, crisis intervention, individual and group counseling, case management, and education services as they relate to abuse of and dependency on alcohol and other drugs; (4) Provide clinical supervision of chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling under the supervision of any of the professionals listed in section 4758.561 of the Revised Code; (5) Refer individuals with nonchemical dependencynon-substance use disorder conditions to appropriate sources of help. (B) A chemical dependency counselor III may not practice as an individual practitioner. Sec. 4758.57. (A) In addition to practicing chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling, an individual holding a valid chemical dependency counselor II license may do both of the following: (1) Perform treatment planning, assessment, crisis intervention, individual and group counseling, case management, and education services as they relate to abuse of and dependency on alcohol and other drugs; (2) Refer individuals with nonchemical dependency non-substance use disorder conditions to appropriate sources of help. (B) A chemical dependency counselor II may not practice as an individual practitioner. Sec. 4758.59. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, an individual holding a valid chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate may do both of the following in addition to practicing chemical dependency counseling: (1) Perform treatment planning, assessment, crisis intervention, individual and group counseling, case management, and education services as they relate to abuse of or dependency on alcohol and other drugs; (2) Refer individuals with nonchemical dependency non-substance use disorder conditions to appropriate sources of help. (B) An individual holding a valid chemical dependency counselor assistant certificate may practice chemical dependency substance use disorder counseling and perform the tasks specified in division (A) of this section only while under the supervision of any of the following: (1) An independent chemical dependency counselor-clinical supervisor, independent chemical dependency counselor, or chemical dependency counselor III licensed under this chapter; (2) An individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery; (3) A psychologist licensed under Chapter 4732. of the Revised Code; (4) A registered nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code or licensed professional clinical counselor, independent social worker, or independent marriage and family therapist licensed under Chapter 4757. of the Revised Code if such supervision is consistent with the scope of practice of the registered nurse, licensed professional clinical counselor, independent social worker, or independent marriage and family therapist; (5) An individual authorized to practice as a certified nurse practitioner or clinical nurse specialist under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (C) A chemical dependency counselor assistant may not practice as an individual practitioner. Sec. 4758.99. Whoever violates division (A) or (B) of section 4758.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. Sec. 4759.07. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, except as provided in division (B) of this section, and to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license or limited permit, refuse to issue a license or limited permit to an individual, refuse to renew a license or limited permit, refuse to reinstate a license or limited permit, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license or limited permit for one or more of the following reasons: (1) Except when civil penalties are imposed under section 4759.071 of the Revised Code, violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter or the rules adopted by the board; (2) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in the solicitation of or advertising for patients; in relation to the practice of dietetics; or in securing or attempting to secure any license or permit issued by the board under this chapter. As used in division (A)(2) of this section, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (3) Committing fraud during the administration of the examination for a license to practice or committing fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for, renewing, or securing any license or permit issued by the board; (4) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (5) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (6) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (7) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (8) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (9) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (10) A record of engaging in incompetent or negligent conduct in the practice of dietetics; (11) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances, whether or not actual injury to a patient is established; (12) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or anything of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (13) Violation of the conditions of limitation placed by the board on a license or permit; (14) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including, physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (15) Any of the following actions taken by an agency responsible for authorizing, certifying, or regulating an individual to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services in this state or another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (16) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of practice privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs; (17) Termination or suspension from participation in the medicare or medicaid programs by the department of health and human services or other responsible agency for any act or acts that also would constitute a violation of division (A)(11), (12), or (14) of this section; (18) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (19) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under division (B) of section 4759.05 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board in an investigative interview, an investigative office conference, at a deposition, or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (20) Representing with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage as personal gain or for any other person, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured. (B) The board shall not refuse to issue a license or limited permit to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (C) Any action taken by the board under division (A) of this section resulting in a suspension from practice shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the individual's license or permit may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license or permit suspended pursuant to division (A) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (D) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license or permit to an applicant, revokes an individual's license or permit, refuses to renew an individual's license or permit, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license or permit, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license or permit and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or permit or for issuance of a new license or permit. (E) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under division (A) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an individual to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. A telephone conference call may be utilized for ratification of a consent agreement that revokes or suspends an individual's license or permit. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. (F) In enforcing division (A)(14) of this section, the board, upon a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual authorized to practice by this chapter or who has submitted an application pursuant to this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental examination, physical examination, including an HIV test, or both a mental and a physical examination. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds an individual unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (A)(14) of this section, the board shall require the individual to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed authority to practice. An individual affected under this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the provisions of the individual's license or permit. For the purpose of division (A)(14) of this section, any individual who applies for or receives a license or permit under this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state and, by so doing, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (G) For the purposes of division (A)(18) of this section, any individual authorized to practice by this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state subject to supervision by the board. By filing an application for or holding a license or permit under this chapter, an individual shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when ordered to do so by the board in writing, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute privileged communications. If it has reason to believe that any individual authorized to practice by this chapter or any applicant for a license or permit suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician who is qualified to conduct the examination and who is approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or permit or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license or permit, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license or permit suspended under this division, the impaired practitioner shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care under the provisions of the practitioner's license or permit. The demonstration shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (1) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (2) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (3) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making the assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license or permit suspended under this division after that demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired practitioner resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the individual. The monitoring shall include, but not be limited to, compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, upon termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of perjury stating whether the individual has maintained sobriety. (H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend an individual's license or permit without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that an individual has violated division (A) of this section; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court for a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (A) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, upon review of those allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license or permit without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the individual subject to the summary suspension requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the individual requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the individual. (3) Any summary suspension imposed under this division (H)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. A failure to issue the order within seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) If the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of an opportunity for a hearing and if the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) of this section. (J) For purposes of divisions (A)(5), (7), and (9) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the individual committed the act. The board does not have jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court renders a final judgment in the individual's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board has jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court issues an order of dismissal upon technical or procedural grounds. (K) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect upon a prior board order entered under this section or upon the board's jurisdiction to take action under this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (L) If the board takes action under division (A)(4), (6), or (8) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. Upon receipt of a petition for reconsideration and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the individual's license or permit. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of an opportunity for a hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act or if no hearing is requested, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) of this section. (M) The license or permit issued to an individual under this chapter and the individual's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the individual pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after suspension shall be considered practicing without a license or permit. The board shall serve the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license or permit is automatically suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license or permit. (N) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license or permit issued under this chapter shall not be effective unless or until accepted by the board. A telephone conference call may be utilized for acceptance of the surrender of an individual's license or permit. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. Reinstatement of a license or permit surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application for a license or permit made under the provisions of this chapter may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license or permit in accordance with this chapter does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4759.064 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. (5) At the request of the board, a license or permit holder shall immediately surrender to the board a license or permit that the board has suspended, revoked, or permanently revoked. Sec. 4759.99. Whoever violates section 4759.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. If the offender has been previously convicted once of a violation of the section 4759.02 of the Revised Code, then the violation offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has been previously convicted more than once of a violation of the section 4759.02 of the Revised Code, then the violation offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Whoever violates division (B)(1) or (2) of section 4759.14 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Whoever violates division (B) of section 4759.05 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4760.13. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may refuse to grant a license to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant to, or may revoke the license held by, an individual found by the board to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) The board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, except as provided in division (C) of this section, and to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Permitting the holder's name or license to be used by another person; (2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or any rules adopted by the board; (3) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or the rules adopted by the board; (4) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances whether or not actual injury to the patient is established; (5) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (6) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (7) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in securing or attempting to secure a license to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or a thing of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (10) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (11) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (12) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (14) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (15) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for violating any state or federal law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug, including trafficking in drugs; (17) Any of the following actions taken by the state agency responsible for regulating the practice of anesthesiologist assistants in another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (18) Violation of the conditions placed by the board on a license to practice; (19) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (20) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under section 4760.14 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board at a deposition or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (21) Failure to comply with any code of ethics established by the national commission for the certification of anesthesiologist assistants; (22) Failure to notify the state medical board of the revocation or failure to maintain certification from the national commission for certification of anesthesiologist assistants. (C) The board shall not refuse to issue a certificate to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (D) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an anesthesiologist assistant or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. (E) For purposes of divisions (B)(11), (14), and (15) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board shall have no jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board shall have jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court issues an order of dismissal on technical or procedural grounds. (F) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect on a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or on the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (G) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license to practice issued under this chapter, or applies for a license to practice, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(5) of this section, the board, on a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who holds, or has applied for, a license issued under this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to this chapter to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. A physical examination may include an HIV test. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds an anesthesiologist assistant unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(5) of this section, the board shall require the anesthesiologist assistant to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license to practice. An individual affected by this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(6) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license to practice issued under this chapter or any applicant for a license to practice suffers such impairment, the board shall report the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license to practice, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the anesthesiologist assistant shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired anesthesiologist assistant resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the anesthesiologist assistant. The monitoring shall include monitoring of compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, on termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the anesthesiologist assistant has maintained sobriety. (H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend the individual's license without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine that there is clear and convincing evidence that an anesthesiologist assistant has violated division (B) of this section and that the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court for a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, on review of the allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the anesthesiologist assistant requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the anesthesiologist assistant requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the license holder. (3) A summary suspension imposed under this division (H)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within sixty seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within sixty seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) If the board takes action under division (B)(11), (13), or (14) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, on exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. On receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the license to practice. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions specified in division (B) of this section. (J) The license to practice of an anesthesiologist assistant and the assistant's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the anesthesiologist assistant pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall serve the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license to practice. (K) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (L) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the anesthesiologist assistant's license may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (M) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant to an applicant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license to practice as an anesthesiologist assistant and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (N) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license to practice issued under this chapter is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license to practice may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license to practice in accordance with section 4760.06 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4760.062 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. Sec. 4760.99. (A) Whoever violates section 4760.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1), (C)(1), (C)(2), (D), or (E) of section 4760.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense; on each subsequent offense the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree, except that an individual guilty of a subsequent offense shall not be subject to imprisonment, but to a fine alone of up to one thousand dollars for each offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C)(3) of section 4760.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C) Whoever violates division (E) of section 4760.14 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4761.09. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, except as provided in division (B) of this section, and to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license or limited permit, refuse to issue a license or limited permit to an individual, refuse to renew a license or limited permit, refuse to reinstate a license or limited permit, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license or limited permit for one or more of the following reasons: (1) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (2) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (3) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (4) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (5) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (6) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (7) Except when civil penalties are imposed under section 4761.091 of the Revised Code, violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter or the rules adopted by the board; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in the solicitation of or advertising for patients; in relation to the practice of respiratory care; or in securing or attempting to secure any license or permit issued by the board under this chapter. As used in division (A)(8) of this section, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) Committing fraud during the administration of the examination for a license to practice or committing fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for, renewing, or securing any license or permit issued by the board; (10) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances, whether or not actual injury to a patient is established; (11) Violating the standards of ethical conduct adopted by the board, in the practice of respiratory care; (12) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or anything of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (13) Violation of the conditions of limitation placed by the board upon a license or permit; (14) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (15) Any of the following actions taken by an agency responsible for authorizing, certifying, or regulating an individual to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services in this state or another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (16) The revocation, suspension, restriction, reduction, or termination of practice privileges by the United States department of defense or department of veterans affairs; (17) Termination or suspension from participation in the medicare or medicaid programs by the department of health and human services or other responsible agency for any act or acts that also would constitute a violation of division (A)(10), (12), or (14) of this section; (18) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (19) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under division (E) of section 4761.03 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board in an investigative interview, an investigative office conference, at a deposition, or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (20) Practicing in an area of respiratory care for which the person is clearly untrained or incompetent or practicing in a manner that conflicts with section 4761.17 of the Revised Code; (21) Employing, directing, or supervising a person who is not authorized to practice respiratory care under this chapter in the performance of respiratory care procedures; (22) Misrepresenting educational attainments or authorized functions for the purpose of obtaining some benefit related to the practice of respiratory care; (23) Assisting suicide as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code; (24) Representing, with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage as personal gain or for any other person, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured. Disciplinary actions taken by the board under division (A) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an individual to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no effect. A telephone conference call may be utilized for ratification of a consent agreement that revokes or suspends an individual's license or permit. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. (B) The board shall not refuse to issue a license or limited permit to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (C) Any action taken by the board under division (A) of this section resulting in a suspension from practice shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the individual's license or permit may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license or permit suspended pursuant to division (A) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (D) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license or permit to an applicant, revokes an individual's license or permit, refuses to renew an individual's license or permit, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license or permit, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license or permit and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or permit or for issuance of a new license or permit. (E) If the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of an opportunity for a hearing and if the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) of this section. (F) In enforcing division (A)(14) of this section, the board, upon a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual authorized to practice by this chapter or who has submitted an application pursuant to this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental examination, physical examination, including an HIV test, or both a mental and a physical examination. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds an individual unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (A)(14) of this section, the board shall require the individual to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed authority to practice. An individual affected under this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards under the provisions of the individual's license or permit. For the purpose of division (A)(14) of this section, any individual who applies for or receives a license or permit to practice under this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state and, by so doing, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (G) For the purposes of division (A)(18) of this section, any individual authorized to practice by this chapter accepts the privilege of practicing in this state subject to supervision by the board. By filing an application for or holding a license or permit under this chapter, an individual shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when ordered to do so by the board in writing, and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute privileged communications. If it has reason to believe that any individual authorized to practice by this chapter or any applicant for a license or permit suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician who is qualified to conduct the examination and who is approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or permit or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license or permit, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license or permit suspended under this division, the impaired practitioner shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care under the provisions of the practitioner's license or permit. The demonstration shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: (1) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (2) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (3) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making the assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license or permit suspended under this division after that demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired practitioner resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the individual. The monitoring shall include, but not be limited to, compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, upon termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of perjury stating whether the individual has maintained sobriety. (H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend an individual's license or permit without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that an individual has violated division (A) of this section; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court for a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (A) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, upon review of those allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license or permit without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the individual subject to the summary suspension requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the individual requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the individual. (3) Any summary suspension imposed under this division (H)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. A failure to issue the order within seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) For purposes of divisions (A)(2), (4), and (6) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the individual committed the act. The board does not have jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court renders a final judgment in the individual's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board has jurisdiction under those divisions if the trial court issues an order of dismissal upon technical or procedural grounds. (J) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect upon a prior board order entered under this section or upon the board's jurisdiction to take action under this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (K) If the board takes action under division (A)(1), (3), or (5) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. Upon receipt of a petition for reconsideration and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the individual's license or permit. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of an opportunity for a hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act or if no hearing is requested, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) of this section. (L) The license or permit issued to an individual under this chapter and the individual's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the individual pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after suspension shall be considered practicing without a license or permit. The board shall serve the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license or permit is automatically suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license or permit. (M) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license or permit issued under this chapter shall not be effective unless or until accepted by the board. A telephone conference call may be utilized for acceptance of the surrender of an individual's license or permit. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. Reinstatement of a license or permit surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application for a license or permit made under the provisions of this chapter may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license or permit in accordance with this chapter does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4761.062 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. (5) At the request of the board, a license or permit holder shall immediately surrender to the board a license or permit that the board has suspended, revoked, or permanently revoked. Sec. 4761.99. Whoever violates division (A) of section 4761.10 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense. On a second offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. On each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C) of section 4761.14 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Whoever violates division (E)(5) of section 4761.03 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4762.13. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may refuse to grant a license to practice as an oriental medicine practitioner or license to practice as an acupuncturist to, or may revoke the license held by, an individual found by the board to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) The board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, except as provided in division (C) of this section, and to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Permitting the holder's name or license to be used by another person; (2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or any rules adopted by the board; (3) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or the rules adopted by the board; (4) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances whether or not actual injury to the patient is established; (5) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (6) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (7) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in soliciting or advertising for patients or in securing or attempting to secure a license to practice as an oriental medicine practitioner or license to practice as an acupuncturist. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) Representing, with the purpose of obtaining compensation or other advantage personally or for any other person, that an incurable disease or injury, or other incurable condition, can be permanently cured; (10) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or a thing of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (11) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (12) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (14) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (15) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (17) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for violating any state or federal law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug, including trafficking in drugs; (18) Any of the following actions taken by the state agency responsible for regulating the practice of oriental medicine or acupuncture in another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (19) Violation of the conditions placed by the board on a license to practice as an oriental medicine practitioner or license to practice as an acupuncturist; (20) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (21) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under section 4762.14 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board at a deposition or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (22) Failure to comply with the standards of the national certification commission for acupuncture and oriental medicine regarding professional ethics, commitment to patients, commitment to the profession, and commitment to the public; (23) Failure to have adequate professional liability insurance coverage in accordance with section 4762.22 of the Revised Code; (24) Failure to maintain a current and active designation as a diplomate in oriental medicine, diplomate of acupuncture and Chinese herbology, or diplomate in acupuncture, as applicable, from the national certification commission for acupuncture and oriental medicine, including revocation by the commission of the individual's designation, failure by the individual to meet the commission's requirements for redesignation, or failure to notify the board that the appropriate designation has not been maintained. (C) The board shall not refuse to issue a certificate to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (D) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with an oriental medicine practitioner or acupuncturist or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. (E) For purposes of divisions (B)(12), (15), and (16) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board shall have no jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board shall have jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court issues an order of dismissal upon technical or procedural grounds. (F) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect upon a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or upon the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing or entered into a consent agreement prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (G) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license to practice issued under this chapter, or applies for a license to practice, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(5) of this section, the board, upon a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who holds, or has applied for, a license under this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental examination, physical examination, including an HIV test, or both a mental and physical examination. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds an oriental medicine practitioner or acupuncturist unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(5) of this section, the board shall require the individual to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license to practice. An individual affected by this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(6) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license to practice issued under this chapter or any applicant for a license suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the oriental medicine practitioner or acupuncturist shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired individual resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the individual. The monitoring shall include monitoring of compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, upon termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the individual has maintained sobriety. (H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend an individual's license to practice without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that an oriental medicine practitioner or acupuncturist has violated division (B) of this section; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court for a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, upon review of the allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the oriental medicine practitioner or acupuncturist requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the hearing is requested, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the license holder. (3) A summary suspension imposed under this division (H)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within sixty seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within sixty seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) If the board takes action under division (B)(11), (13), or (14) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, upon exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. Upon receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the license. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions specified in division (B) of this section. (J) The license to practice of an oriental medicine practitioner or acupuncturist and the practitioner's or acupuncturist's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the practitioner or acupuncturist pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall serve the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license. (K) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (L) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the license may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (M) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license to an applicant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license to practice as an oriental medicine practitioner or license to practice as an acupuncturist and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (N) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license to practice as an oriental medicine practitioner or license to practice as an acupuncturist issued under this chapter is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license in accordance with section 4762.06 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4762.062 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. Sec. 4762.99. (A) Whoever violates section 4762.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1), (C)(1), (C)(2), (D), or (E) of section 4762.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense; on each subsequent offense the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree, except that an individual guilty of a subsequent offense shall not be subject to imprisonment, but to a fine alone of up to one thousand dollars for each offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C)(3) of section 4762.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C) Whoever violates division (E) of section 4762.14 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4765.11. (A) The state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services shall adopt, and may amend and rescind, rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and divisions (C) and (D) of this section that establish all of the following: (1) Procedures for its governance and the control of its actions and business affairs; (2) Standards for the performance of emergency medical services by first responders, emergency medical technicians-basic, emergency medical technicians-intermediate, and emergency medical technicians-paramedic; (3) Application fees for certificates of accreditation, certificates of approval, certificates to teach, and certificates to practice, which shall be deposited into the trauma and emergency medical services fund created in section 4513.263 of the Revised Code; (4) Criteria for determining when the application or renewal fee for a certificate to practice may be waived because an applicant cannot afford to pay the fee; (5) Procedures for issuance and renewal of certificates of accreditation, certificates of approval, certificates to teach, and certificates to practice, including any measures necessary to implement section 9.79 of the Revised Code and any procedures necessary to ensure that adequate notice of renewal is provided in accordance with division (E) of section 4765.30 of the Revised Code; (6) Procedures for suspending or revoking certificates of accreditation, certificates of approval, certificates to teach, and certificates to practice; (7) Grounds for suspension or revocation of a certificate to practice issued under section 4765.30 of the Revised Code and for taking any other disciplinary action against a first responder, EMT-basic, EMT-I, or paramedic; (8) Procedures for taking disciplinary action against a first responder, EMT-basic, EMT-I, or paramedic; (9) Standards for certificates of accreditation and certificates of approval; (10) Qualifications for certificates to teach; (11) Requirements for a certificate to practice; (12) The curricula, number of hours of instruction and training, and instructional materials to be used in adult and pediatric emergency medical services training programs and adult and pediatric emergency medical services continuing education programs; (13) Procedures for conducting courses in recognizing symptoms of life-threatening allergic reactions and in calculating proper dosage levels and administering injections of epinephrine to adult and pediatric patients who suffer life-threatening allergic reactions; (14) Examinations for certificates to practice; (15) Procedures for administering examinations for certificates to practice; (16) Procedures for approving examinations that demonstrate competence to have a certificate to practice renewed without completing an emergency medical services continuing education program; (17) Procedures for granting extensions and exemptions of emergency medical services continuing education requirements; (18) Specifications of the emergency medical services that first responders are authorized to perform under section 4765.35 of the Revised Code, that EMTs-basic are authorized to perform under section 4765.37 of the Revised Code, that EMTs-I are authorized to perform under section 4765.38 of the Revised Code, and that paramedics are authorized to perform under section 4765.39 of the Revised Code; (19) Standards and procedures for implementing the requirements of section 4765.06 of the Revised Code, including designations of the persons who are required to report information to the board and the types of information to be reported; (20) Procedures for administering the emergency medical services grant program established under section 4765.07 of the Revised Code; (21) Procedures consistent with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for appealing decisions of the board; (22) Minimum qualifications and peer review and quality improvement requirements for persons who provide medical direction to emergency medical service personnel, including, subject to division (B) of section 4765.42 of the Revised Code, qualifications for a physician to be eligible to serve as the medical director of an emergency medical service organization or a member of its cooperating physician advisory board; (23) The manner in which a patient, or a patient's parent, guardian, or custodian, may consent to the board releasing identifying information about the patient under division (D) of section 4765.102 of the Revised Code; (24) Circumstances under which a training program or continuing education program, or portion of either type of program, may be taught by a person who does not hold a certificate to teach issued under section 4765.23 of the Revised Code; (25) Certification cycles for certificates issued under sections 4765.23 and 4765.30 of the Revised Code and certificates issued by the executive director of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services under section 4765.55 of the Revised Code that establish a common expiration date for all certificates; (26) Procedures by which the holder of a certificate to practice who intends to retire may request the emergency medical service organization for which the holder performs services to direct the board to designate the holder as "retired" in the board's records when the holder retires. (B) The board may adopt, and may amend and rescind, rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and divisions (C) and (D) of this section that establish any of the following: (1) Specifications of information that may be collected under the trauma system registry and incidence reporting system created under section 4765.06 of the Revised Code; (2) Standards and procedures for implementing any of the recommendations made by any committees of the board or under section 4765.04 of the Revised Code; (3) Procedures and requirements for conducting background checks on applicants for the issuance and renewal of certificates of accreditation, certificates of approval, certificates to teach, and certificates to practice in accordance with section 109.578 of the Revised Code; (4) Any other rules necessary to implement this chapter. (C) In developing and administering rules adopted under this chapter, the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services shall consult with regional directors and regional advisory boards appointed under section 4765.05 of the Revised Code and emphasize the special needs of pediatric and geriatric patients. (D) On and after April 6, 2023, the executive director shall not issue to any new applicant a certificate to practice as an emergency medical services assistant instructor. Any emergency medical services assistant instructor certificate that was issued in accordance with rules adopted under division (A) of this section prior to April 6, 2023, remains valid, subject to any conditions or responsibilities of retaining the validity of that certificate, until the holder of the certificate allows it to expire or lapse. The certificate may be renewed by the holder of that certificate. The board shall adopt, amend, or rescind rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code in order to effectuate this division. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, before adopting, amending, or rescinding any rule under this chapter, the board shall submit the proposed rule to the director of public safety for review. The director may review the proposed rule for not more than sixty days after the date it is submitted. If, within this sixty-day period, the director approves the proposed rule or does not notify the board that the rule is disapproved, the board may adopt, amend, or rescind the rule as proposed. If, within this sixty-day period, the director notifies the board that the proposed rule is disapproved, the board shall not adopt, amend, or rescind the rule as proposed unless at least twelve members of the board vote to adopt, amend, or rescind it. This division does not apply to an emergency rule adopted in accordance with section 119.03 of the Revised Code. (F) Notwithstanding any requirement for a certificate issued in accordance with rules adopted by the board under this section, the board, in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code, shall issue a certificate that is a license as defined in section 4796.01 of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (1) The individual holds a license or certificate in another state. (2) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a first responder, emergency medical technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, or emergency medical technician-paramedic in a state that does not issue that license or certificate. Sec. 4765.55. (A) The executive director of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services, with the advice and counsel of the firefighter and fire safety inspector training committee of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services, shall assist in the establishment and maintenance by any state agency, or any county, township, city, village, school district, or educational service center of a fire service training program for the training of all persons in positions of any fire training certification level approved by the executive director, including full-time paid firefighters, part-time paid firefighters, volunteer firefighters, and fire safety inspectors in this state. The executive director, with the advice and counsel of the committee, shall adopt rules to regulate those firefighter and fire safety inspector training programs, and other training programs approved by the executive director. The rules may include, but need not be limited to, training curriculum, certification examinations, training schedules, minimum hours of instruction, attendance requirements, required equipment and facilities, basic physical requirements, and methods of training for all persons in positions of any fire training certification level approved by the executive director, including full-time paid firefighters, part-time paid firefighters, volunteer firefighters, and fire safety inspectors. The rules adopted to regulate training programs for volunteer firefighters shall not require more than thirty-six hours of training. The executive director, with the advice and counsel of the committee, shall provide for the classification and chartering of fire service training programs in accordance with rules adopted under division (B) of this section, and may take action against any chartered training program or applicant, in accordance with rules adopted under divisions (B)(4) and (5) of this section, for failure to meet standards set by the adopted rules. (B) The executive director, with the advice and counsel of the firefighter and fire safety inspector training committee of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services, shall adopt, and may amend or rescind, rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish all of the following: (1) Requirements for, and procedures for chartering, the training programs regulated by this section; (2) Requirements for, and requirements and procedures for obtaining and renewing, an instructor certificate to teach the training programs and continuing education classes regulated by this section; (3) Requirements for, and requirements and procedures for obtaining and renewing, any of the fire training certificates regulated by this section; (4) Grounds and procedures for suspending, revoking, restricting, or refusing to issue or renew any of the certificates or charters regulated by this section, which grounds shall be limited to one of the following: (a) Failure to satisfy the education or training requirements of this section; (b) Conviction of a felony offense; (c) Conviction of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (d) Conviction of a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (e) In the case of a chartered training program or applicant, failure to meet standards set by the rules adopted under this division. (5) Grounds and procedures for imposing and collecting fines, not to exceed one thousand dollars, in relation to actions taken under division (B)(4) of this section against persons holding certificates and charters regulated by this section, the fines to be deposited into the trauma and emergency medical services fund established under section 4513.263 of the Revised Code; (6) Continuing education requirements for certificate holders, including a requirement that credit shall be granted for in-service training programs conducted by local entities. The continuing education requirements shall not require more than thirty-six hours of continuing education every three-year certification cycle. Local entities may require additional continuing education, provided that completion of such additional continuing education is not required for renewal of certification. (7) Procedures for considering the granting of an extension or exemption of fire service continuing education requirements; (8) Certification cycles for which the certificates and charters regulated by this section are valid; (9) If determined necessary by the executive director, procedures and requirements for conducting background checks on applicants for the issuance and renewal of certification as a fire safety inspector in accordance with section 109.578 of the Revised Code; (10) Procedures by which a firefighter or fire safety inspector who intends to retire may request the department for which the firefighter or inspector performs services to direct the executive director of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services to designate the firefighter or inspector as "retired" in the board's records when the firefighter or inspector retires. (C)(1) The executive director, with the advice and counsel of the firefighter and fire safety inspector training committee of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services, shall issue or renew an instructor certificate to teach the training programs and continuing education classes regulated by this section to any applicant that the executive director determines meets the qualifications established in rules adopted under division (B) of this section, and may take disciplinary action against an instructor certificate holder or applicant in accordance with rules adopted under division (B) of this section. (2) On and after April 6, 2023, the executive director shall not issue to any new applicant a certificate to practice as an assistant fire instructor. Any assistant fire instructor certificate that was issued in accordance with rules adopted under division (B) of this section prior to April 6, 2023, remains valid, subject to any conditions or responsibilities of retaining the validity of that certificate, until the holder of the certificate allows it to expire or lapse. The certificate may be renewed by the holder of that certificate. The executive director shall adopt, amend, or rescind rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code in order to effectuate division (C)(2) of this section. (3) The executive director, with the advice and counsel of the committee, shall charter or renew the charter of any training program that the executive director determines meets the qualifications established in rules adopted under division (B) of this section, and may take disciplinary action against the holder of a charter in accordance with rules adopted under division (B) of this section. (D) The executive director shall issue or renew a fire training certificate for a firefighter, a fire safety inspector, or another position of any fire training certification level approved by the executive director, to any applicant that the executive director determines meets the qualifications established in rules adopted under division (B) of this section and may take disciplinary actions against a certificate holder or applicant in accordance with rules adopted under division (B) of this section. (E) Certificates issued under this section shall be on a form prescribed by the executive director, with the advice and counsel of the firefighter and fire safety inspector training committee of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services. (F)(1) The executive director, with the advice and counsel of the firefighter and fire safety inspector training committee of the state board of emergency medical, fire, and transportation services, shall establish criteria for evaluating the standards maintained by the branches of the United States military for firefighter, fire safety inspector, and fire instructor training programs, and other training programs recognized by the executive director, to determine whether the standards are equivalent to those established under this section and shall establish requirements and procedures for issuing a certificate to each person who presents proof to the executive director of having satisfactorily completed a training program that meets those standards. (2) The executive director, with the committee's advice and counsel, shall adopt rules establishing requirements and procedures for issuing a fire training certificate in lieu of completing a chartered training program. (G) Notwithstanding any requirement for a certificate issued under this section, the executive director shall issue a certificate in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (1) The individual holds a license or certificate in another state. (2) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a firefighter or fire safety inspector in a state that does not issue that license or certificate. (H) Nothing in this section invalidates any other section of the Revised Code relating to the fire training academy. Section 4765.11 of the Revised Code does not affect any powers and duties granted to the executive director under this section. (I) Notwithstanding any provision of division (B)(4) of this section to the contrary, the executive director shall not adopt rules for refusing to issue any of the certificates or charters regulated by this section to an applicant because of a criminal conviction unless the rules establishing grounds and procedures for refusal are in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4767.10. (A) The division of real estate in the department of commerce shall use one dollar six dollars of each burial permit fee collected pursuant to section 3705.17 of the Revised Code and paid into the state treasury to the credit of the cemetery registration fund created under section 4767.03 of the Revised Code to advance grants to cemeteries registered with the division to defray the costs of exceptional cemetery maintenance or training cemetery personnel in the maintenance and operation of cemeteries. The division may not provide a grant to a corporation or association that operates a cemetery for profit. Grants provided under this section shall not exceed five thousand dollars. An operator of five or more cemeteries registered with the division may apply for and receive one grant per year. All other operators of cemeteries registered with the division may apply for and receive one grant every other year. The division shall advance grants from the cemetery registration fund in accordance with rules adopted by the Ohio cemetery dispute resolution commission under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B) The director of commerce may increase, by rule adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the amount of total grants the division may advance in a fiscal year if the director determines the total amount of funds generated exceeds the amount of funds the division needs to carry out its powers and duties under this section. If the director determines the increased amount depletes the amount of funds the division needs to carry out its powers and duties under this section, the director may decrease the amount not below the amount specified in division (A) of this section. Sec. 4772.20. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may revoke or may refuse to grant a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant to an individual found by the board to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) The board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, except as provided in division (C) of this section, and to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice as a certified mental health assistant, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Permitting the holder's name or license to be used by another person; (2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or any rules adopted by the board; (3) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or the rules adopted by the board; (4) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances whether or not actual injury to the patient is established; (5) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (6) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of habitual or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that impair ability to practice; (7) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in securing or attempting to secure a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or a thing of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (10) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (11) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (12) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (14) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (15) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for violating any state or federal law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug, including trafficking in drugs; (17) Any of the following actions taken by the state agency responsible for regulating the practice of certified mental health assistants in another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (18) Violation of the conditions placed by the board on a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant; (19) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (20) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under section 4772.21 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board at a deposition or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (21) Failure to practice in accordance with the supervising physician's supervision agreement with the certified mental health assistant; (22) Administering drugs for purposes other than those authorized under this chapter; (23) Failure to comply with section 4772.13 of the Revised Code, unless the board no longer maintains a drug database pursuant to section 4729.75 of the Revised Code; (24) Assisting suicide, as defined in section 3795.01 of the Revised Code. (C) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (D) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with a certified mental health assistant or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. (E) For purposes of divisions (B)(11), (14), and (15) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board shall have no jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board shall have jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court issues an order of dismissal on technical or procedural grounds. (F) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect on a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or on the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (G) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant issued under this chapter, or applies for a license, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(5) of this section, the board, on a showing of a possible violation, may compel any individual who holds a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant issued under this chapter or who has applied for a license to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. A physical examination may include an HIV test. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds a certified mental health assistant unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(5) of this section, the board shall require the certified mental health assistant to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license. An individual affected by this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(6) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant issued under this chapter or any applicant for a license suffers such impairment, the board may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and chosen by the board. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license to practice, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the certified mental health assistant shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired certified mental health assistant resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the certified mental health assistant. The monitoring shall include monitoring of compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, on termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the certified mental health assistant has maintained sobriety. (H)(H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member determine that may recommend that the board suspend the individual's license without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that a certified mental health assistant has violated division (B) of this section and that; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public, they may recommend that the board suspend the individual's license to practice without a prior hearing. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court with a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. Written (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, on review of the allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall issue a written order of suspension by certified mail or in person in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the certified mental health assistant requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the certified mental health assistant requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the license holder. (3) A summary suspension imposed under this division is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within sixty seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within sixty seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) If the board takes action under division (B)(10), (12), or (13) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, on exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. On receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the license to practice as a certified mental health assistant. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions specified in division (B) of this section. (J) The license to practice of a certified mental health assistant and the assistant's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the certified mental health assistant pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment of intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall notify the individual subject to the suspension by certified mail or in person in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license. (K) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (L) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the certified mental health assistant's license may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (M) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant to an applicant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (N) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license to practice as a certified mental health assistant issued under this chapter is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license to practice may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license to practice in accordance with section 4772.08 of the Revised Code shall not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. Sec. 4772.21. (A) The state medical board shall investigate evidence that appears to show that any person has violated this chapter or the rules adopted under it. Any person may report to the board in a signed writing any information the person has that appears to show a violation of any provision of this chapter or the rules adopted under it. In the absence of bad faith, a person who reports such information or testifies before the board in an adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of reporting the information or providing testimony. Each complaint or allegation of a violation received by the board shall be assigned a case number and be recorded by the board. (B) Investigations of alleged violations of this chapter or rules adopted under it shall be supervised by the supervising member elected by the board in accordance with section 4731.02 of the Revised Code and by the secretary as provided in section 4772.24 of the Revised Code. The board's president may designate another member of the board to supervise the investigation in place of the supervising member. Upon a vote of the majority of the board to authorize the addition of a consumer member in the supervision of any part of any investigation, the president shall designate a consumer member for supervision of investigations as determined by the president. The authorization of consumer member participation in investigation supervision may be rescinded by a majority vote of the board. A member of the board who supervises the investigation of a case shall not participate in further adjudication of the case. (C) In investigating a possible violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under it, the board may administer oaths, order the taking of depositions, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, accounts, papers, records, documents, and testimony, except that a subpoena for patient record information shall not be issued without consultation with the attorney general's office and approval of the secretary and supervising member of the board. Before issuance of a subpoena for patient record information, the secretary and supervising member shall determine whether there is probable cause to believe that the complaint filed alleges a violation of this chapter or the rules adopted under it and that the records sought are relevant to the alleged violation and material to the investigation. The subpoena may apply only to records that cover a reasonable period of time surrounding the alleged violation. On failure to comply with any subpoena issued by the board and after reasonable notice to the person being subpoenaed, the board may move for an order compelling the production of persons or records pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure. A subpoena issued by the board may be served by a sheriff, the sheriff's deputy, or a board employee designated by the board. Service of a subpoena issued by the board may be made by delivering a copy of the subpoena to the person named therein, reading it to the person, or leaving it at the person's usual place of residence. When the person being served is a certified mental health assistant, service of the subpoena may be made by certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested, and the subpoena shall be deemed served on the date delivery is made or the date the person refuses to accept delivery. A sheriff's deputy who serves a subpoena shall receive the same fees as a sheriff. Each witness who appears before the board in obedience to a subpoena shall receive the fees and mileage provided for witnesses in civil cases in the courts of common pleas. (D) All hearings and investigations of the board shall be considered civil actions for the purposes of section 2305.252 of the Revised Code. (E) Information received by the board pursuant to an investigation is confidential and not subject to discovery in any civil action. The board shall conduct all investigations and proceedings in a manner that protects the confidentiality of patients and persons who file complaints with the board. The board shall not make public the names or any other identifying information about patients or complainants unless proper consent is given. The board may share any information it receives pursuant to an investigation, including patient records and patient record information, with law enforcement agencies, other licensing boards, and other governmental agencies that are prosecuting, adjudicating, or investigating alleged violations of statutes or administrative rules. An agency or board that receives the information shall comply with the same requirements regarding confidentiality as those with which the state medical board must comply, notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code or procedure of the agency or board that applies when it is dealing with other information in its possession. In a judicial proceeding, the information may be admitted into evidence only in accordance with the Rules of Evidence, but the court shall require that appropriate measures are taken to ensure that confidentiality is maintained with respect to any part of the information that contains names or other identifying information about patients or complainants whose confidentiality was protected by the state medical board when the information was in the board's possession. Measures to ensure confidentiality that may be taken by the court include sealing its records or deleting specific information from its records. No person shall knowingly access, use, or disclose confidential investigatory information in a manner prohibited by law. (F) On a quarterly basis, the board shall prepare a report that documents the disposition of all cases during the preceding three months. The report shall contain the following information for each case with which the board has completed its activities: (1) The case number assigned to the complaint or alleged violation; (2) The type of license, if any, held by the individual against whom the complaint is directed; (3) A description of the allegations contained in the complaint; (4) Whether witnesses were interviewed; (5) Whether the individual against whom the complaint is directed is the subject of any pending complaints; (6) The disposition of the case. The report shall state how many cases are still pending, and shall be prepared in a manner that protects the identity of each person involved in each case. The report is a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (G) The board may provide a status update regarding an investigation to a complainant on request if the board verifies the complainant's identity. Sec. 4772.23. (A) As used in this section, "criminal conduct" and "sexual misconduct" have the same meanings as in section 4731.224 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Within sixty thirty days after the imposition of any formal disciplinary action taken by any health care facility, including a hospital, health care facility operated by a health insuring corporation, ambulatory surgical facility, or similar facility, against any individual holding a valid license to practice as a certified mental health assistant, the chief administrator or executive officer of the facility shall report to the state medical board the name of the individual, the action taken by the facility, and a summary of the underlying facts leading to the action taken. On request, the board shall be provided certified copies of the patient records that were the basis for the facility's action. Prior to release to the board, the summary shall be approved by the peer review committee that reviewed the case or by the governing board of the facility. The filing of a report with the board or decision not to file a report, investigation by the board, or any disciplinary action taken by the board, does not preclude a health care facility from taking disciplinary action against a certified mental health assistant. In the absence of fraud or bad faith, no individual or entity that provides patient records to the board shall be liable in damages to any person as a result of providing the records. (2) Within thirty days after commencing an investigation regarding criminal conduct or sexual misconduct against any individual holding a valid license to practice issued pursuant to this chapter, a health care facility, including a hospital, health care facility operated by a health insuring corporation, ambulatory surgical center, or similar facility, shall report to the board the name of the individual and a summary of the underlying facts related to the investigation being commenced. (B)(1)(C)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2)(C)(2) of this section and subject to division (C)(3) of this section, a certified mental health assistant, professional association or society of certified mental health assistants, physician, or professional association or society of physicians that believes a violation of any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or rule of the board has occurred shall report to the board the information on which the belief is based. (2) A certified mental health assistant, professional association or society of certified mental health assistants, physician, or professional association or society of physicians that believes a violation of division (B)(6) of section 4772.20 of the Revised Code has occurred shall report the information upon which the belief is based to the monitoring organization conducting the program established by the board under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. If any such report is made to the board, it shall be referred to the monitoring organization unless the board is aware that the individual who is the subject of the report does not meet the program eligibility requirements of section 4731.252 of the Revised Code. (C)(3) If any individual authorized to practice under this chapter or any professional association or society of such individuals knows or has reasonable cause to suspect based on facts that would cause a reasonable person in a similar position to suspect that an individual authorized to practice under this chapter has committed or participated in criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, the information upon which the belief is based shall be reported to the board within thirty days. This division does not apply to a professional association or society whose staff interacts with members of the association or society only in advocacy, governance, or educational capacities and whose staff does not regularly interact with members in practice settings. (4) In addition to the self-reporting of criminal offenses that is required for license renewal, an individual authorized to practice under this chapter shall report to the board criminal charges regarding criminal conduct, sexual misconduct, or any conduct involving the use of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, including offenses that are equivalent offenses under division (A) of section 4511.181 of the Revised Code, violations of division (D) of section 4511.194 of the Revised Code, and violations of division (C) of section 4511.79 of the Revised Code. Reports under this division shall be made within thirty days of the criminal charge being filed. (D) Any professional association or society composed primarily of certified mental health assistants that suspends or revokes an individual's membership for violations of professional ethics, or for reasons of professional incompetence or professional malpractice, within sixty thirty days after a final decision, shall report to the board, on forms prescribed and provided by the board, the name of the individual, the action taken by the professional organization, and a summary of the underlying facts leading to the action taken. The filing of a report with the board or decision not to file a report, investigation by the board, or any disciplinary action taken by the board, does not preclude a professional organization from taking disciplinary action against a certified mental health assistant. (D)(E) Any insurer providing professional liability insurance to any person holding a valid license to practice as a certified mental health assistant or any other entity that seeks to indemnify the professional liability of a certified mental health assistant shall notify the board within thirty days after the final disposition of any written claim for damages where such disposition results in a payment exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars. The notice shall contain the following information: (1) The name and address of the person submitting the notification; (2) The name and address of the insured who is the subject of the claim; (3) The name of the person filing the written claim; (4) The date of final disposition; (5) If applicable, the identity of the court in which the final disposition of the claim took place. (E)(F) The board may investigate possible violations of this chapter or the rules adopted under it that are brought to its attention as a result of the reporting requirements of this section, except that the board shall conduct an investigation if a possible violation involves repeated malpractice. As used in this division, "repeated malpractice" means three or more claims for malpractice within the previous five-year period, each resulting in a judgment or settlement in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars in favor of the claimant, and each involving negligent conduct by the certified mental health assistant. (F)(G) All summaries, reports, and records received and maintained by the board pursuant to this section shall be held in confidence and shall not be subject to discovery or introduction in evidence in any federal or state civil action involving a certified mental health assistant, supervising physician, or health care facility arising out of matters that are the subject of the reporting required by this section. The board may use the information obtained only as the basis for an investigation, as evidence in a disciplinary hearing against a certified mental health assistant or supervising physician, or in any subsequent trial or appeal of a board action or order. The board may disclose the summaries and reports it receives under this section only to health care facility committees within or outside this state that are involved in credentialing or recredentialing a certified mental health assistant or supervising physician, if applicable, or reviewing their privilege to practice within a particular facility. The board shall indicate whether or not the information has been verified. Information transmitted by the board shall be subject to the same confidentiality provisions as when maintained by the boardconfidential pursuant to division (E) of section 4772.21 of the Revised Code. (G)(H) Except for reports filed by an individual pursuant to division (B)(B)(2) or (C) of this section, the board shall send a copy of any reports or summaries it receives pursuant to this section to the certified mental health assistant. The certified mental health assistant shall have the right to file a statement with the board concerning the correctness or relevance of the information. The statement shall at all times accompany that part of the record in contention. (H)(I) An individual or entity that reports to the board, reports to the monitoring organization described in section 4731.251 of the Revised Code, or refers an impaired certified mental health assistant to a treatment provider approved by the board under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code shall not be subject to suit for civil damages as a result of the report, referral, or provision of the information. (I)(J) In the absence of fraud or bad faith, a professional association or society of certified mental health assistants that sponsors a committee or program to provide peer assistance to a certified mental health assistant with substance abuse problems, a representative or agent of such a committee or program, a representative or agent of the monitoring organization described in section 4731.251 of the Revised Code, and a member of the state medical board shall not be held liable in damages to any person by reason of actions taken to refer a certified mental health assistant to a treatment provider approved under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code for examination or treatment. Sec. 4772.99. (A) Whoever violates section 4772.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (B)(B)(1) Whoever violates division (A), (B)(B)(1), (C)(C)(1), or (C)(2), (D), or (E) of section 4772.23 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense; on each subsequent offense the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree, except that an individual guilty of a subsequent offense shall not be subject to imprisonment, but to a fine alone of up to one thousand dollars for each offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C)(3) of section 4772.23 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C) Whoever violates division (E) of section 4772.21 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4774.13. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may refuse to grant a license to practice as a radiologist assistant to, or may revoke the license held by, an individual found by the board to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) The board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, except as provided in division (C) of this section, and to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice as a radiologist assistant, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Permitting the holder's name or license to be used by another person; (2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or any rules adopted by the board; (3) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or the rules adopted by the board; (4) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances whether or not actual injury to the patient is established; (5) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (6) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (7) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in securing or attempting to secure a license to practice as a radiologist assistant. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or a thing of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (10) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (11) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (12) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (14) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (15) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for violating any state or federal law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug, including trafficking in drugs; (17) Any of the following actions taken by the state agency responsible for regulating the practice of radiologist assistants in another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (18) Violation of the conditions placed by the board on a license to practice as a radiologist assistant; (19) Failure to use universal blood and body fluid precautions established by rules adopted under section 4731.051 of the Revised Code; (20) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under section 4774.14 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board at a deposition or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (21) Failure to maintain a license as a radiographer under Chapter 4773. of the Revised Code; (22) Failure to maintain certification as a registered radiologist assistant from the American registry of radiologic technologists, including revocation by the registry of the assistant's certification or failure by the assistant to meet the registry's requirements for annual registration, or failure to notify the board that the certification as a registered radiologist assistant has not been maintained; (23) Failure to comply with any of the rules of ethics included in the standards of ethics established by the American registry of radiologic technologists, as those rules apply to an individual who holds the registry's certification as a registered radiologist assistant. (C) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (D) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with a radiologist assistant or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. (E) For purposes of divisions (B)(11), (14), and (15) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board shall have no jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board shall have jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court issues an order of dismissal on technical or procedural grounds. (F) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect on a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or on the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (G) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license to practice as a radiologist assistant issued under this chapter, or applies for a license, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(5) of this section, the board, on a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who holds, or has applied for, a license to practice as a radiologist assistant issued under this chapter to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. A physical examination may include an HIV test. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds a radiologist assistant unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(5) of this section, the board shall require the radiologist assistant to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license. An individual affected by this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(6) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license to practice as a radiologist assistant issued under this chapter or any applicant for a license suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license to practice, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the radiologist assistant shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired radiologist assistant resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the radiologist assistant. The monitoring shall include monitoring of compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, on termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the radiologist assistant has maintained sobriety. (H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend the individual's license to practice without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine that there is clear and convincing evidence that a radiologist assistant has violated division (B) of this section and that the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court for a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, on review of the allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the radiologist assistant requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the radiologist assistant requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the license holder. (3) A summary suspension imposed under this division (H)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within sixty seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within sixty seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) If the board takes action under division (B)(10), (12), or (13) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, on exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. On receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the license to practice as a radiologist assistant. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions specified in division (B) of this section. (J) The license to practice of a radiologist assistant and the assistant's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the radiologist assistant pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall serve the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license. (K) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (L) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the radiologist assistant's license may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (M) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license to practice as a radiologist assistant to an applicant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license to practice as a radiologist assistant and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (N) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license to practice as a radiologist assistant issued under this chapter is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license to practice may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license to practice in accordance with section 4774.06 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4774.062 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. Sec. 4774.99. (A) Whoever violates division (A)(1) or (2) of section 4774.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. (B)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1), (C)(1), (C)(2), (D), or (E) of section 4774.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense; on each subsequent offense the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree, except that an individual guilty of a subsequent offense shall not be subject to imprisonment, but to a fine alone of up to one thousand dollars for each offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or (C)(3) of section 4774.16 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report on a first offense; on each subsequent offense, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (C) Whoever violates division (E) of section 4774.14 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4778.14. (A) The state medical board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, may refuse to grant a license to practice as a genetic counselor to, or may revoke the license held by, an individual found by the board to have committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying for or securing the license. (B) The board, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members, shall, except as provided in division (C) of this section, and to the extent permitted by law, limit, revoke, or suspend an individual's license to practice as a genetic counselor, refuse to issue a license to an applicant, refuse to renew a license, refuse to reinstate a license, or reprimand or place on probation the holder of a license for any of the following reasons: (1) Permitting the holder's name or license to be used by another person; (2) Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or any rules adopted by the board; (3) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, any provision of this chapter, Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code, or the rules adopted by the board; (4) A departure from, or failure to conform to, minimal standards of care of similar practitioners under the same or similar circumstances whether or not actual injury to the patient is established; (5) Inability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care by reason of mental illness or physical illness, including physical deterioration that adversely affects cognitive, motor, or perceptive skills; (6) Impairment of ability to practice according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care because of substance use disorder or excessive use or abuse of drugs, alcohol, or other substances that may impair ability to practice; (7) Willfully betraying a professional confidence; (8) Making a false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement in securing or attempting to secure a license to practice as a genetic counselor. As used in this division, "false, fraudulent, deceptive, or misleading statement" means a statement that includes a misrepresentation of fact, is likely to mislead or deceive because of a failure to disclose material facts, is intended or is likely to create false or unjustified expectations of favorable results, or includes representations or implications that in reasonable probability will cause an ordinarily prudent person to misunderstand or be deceived. (9) The obtaining of, or attempting to obtain, money or a thing of value by fraudulent misrepresentations in the course of practice; (10) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a felony; (11) Commission of an act that constitutes a felony in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (12) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor committed in the course of practice; (13) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for, a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude; (14) Commission of an act in the course of practice that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (15) Commission of an act involving moral turpitude that constitutes a misdemeanor in this state, regardless of the jurisdiction in which the act was committed; (16) A plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for violating any state or federal law regulating the possession, distribution, or use of any drug, including trafficking in drugs; (17) Any of the following actions taken by an agency responsible for authorizing, certifying, or regulating an individual to practice a health care occupation or provide health care services in this state or in another jurisdiction, for any reason other than the nonpayment of fees: the limitation, revocation, or suspension of an individual's license to practice; acceptance of an individual's license surrender; denial of a license; refusal to renew or reinstate a license; imposition of probation; or issuance of an order of censure or other reprimand; (18) Violation of the conditions placed by the board on a license to practice as a genetic counselor; (19) Failure to cooperate in an investigation conducted by the board under section 4778.18 of the Revised Code, including failure to comply with a subpoena or order issued by the board or failure to answer truthfully a question presented by the board at a deposition or in written interrogatories, except that failure to cooperate with an investigation shall not constitute grounds for discipline under this section if a court of competent jurisdiction has issued an order that either quashes a subpoena or permits the individual to withhold the testimony or evidence in issue; (20) Failure to maintain the individual's status as a certified genetic counselor; (21) Failure to comply with the code of ethics established by the national society of genetic counselors. (C) The board shall not refuse to issue a license to an applicant because of a plea of guilty to, a judicial finding of guilt of, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction for an offense unless the refusal is in accordance with section 9.79 of the Revised Code. (D) Disciplinary actions taken by the board under divisions (A) and (B) of this section shall be taken pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that in lieu of an adjudication, the board may enter into a consent agreement with a genetic counselor or applicant to resolve an allegation of a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted under it. A consent agreement, when ratified by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board, shall constitute the findings and order of the board with respect to the matter addressed in the agreement. If the board refuses to ratify a consent agreement, the admissions and findings contained in the consent agreement shall be of no force or effect. A telephone conference call may be utilized for ratification of a consent agreement that revokes or suspends an individual's license. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. (E) For purposes of divisions (B)(11), (14), and (15) of this section, the commission of the act may be established by a finding by the board, pursuant to an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that the applicant or license holder committed the act in question. The board shall have no jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court renders a final judgment in the license holder's favor and that judgment is based upon an adjudication on the merits. The board shall have jurisdiction under these divisions in cases where the trial court issues an order of dismissal on technical or procedural grounds. (F) The sealing or expungement of conviction records by any court shall have no effect on a prior board order entered under the provisions of this section or on the board's jurisdiction to take action under the provisions of this section if, based upon a plea of guilty, a judicial finding of guilt, or a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction, the board issued a notice of opportunity for a hearing or took other formal action under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prior to the court's order to seal or expunge the records. The board shall not be required to seal, destroy, redact, or otherwise modify its records to reflect the court's sealing or expungement of conviction records. (G) For purposes of this division, any individual who holds a license to practice as a genetic counselor, or applies for a license, shall be deemed to have given consent to submit to a mental or physical examination when directed to do so in writing by the board and to have waived all objections to the admissibility of testimony or examination reports that constitute a privileged communication. (1) In enforcing division (B)(5) of this section, the board, on a showing of a possible violation, shall refer any individual who holds, or has applied for, a license to practice as a genetic counselor to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. A physical examination may include an HIV test. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination or consent to an HIV test ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board finds a genetic counselor unable to practice because of the reasons set forth in division (B)(5) of this section, the board shall require the genetic counselor to submit to care, counseling, or treatment by physicians approved or designated by the board, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license to practice. An individual affected by this division shall be afforded an opportunity to demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practicing in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. (2) For purposes of division (B)(6) of this section, if the board has reason to believe that any individual who holds a license to practice as a genetic counselor or any applicant for a license suffers such impairment, the board shall refer the individual to the monitoring organization that conducts the confidential monitoring program established under section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. The board also may compel the individual to submit to a mental or physical examination, or both. The expense of the examination is the responsibility of the individual compelled to be examined. Any mental or physical examination required under this division shall be undertaken by a treatment provider or physician qualified to conduct such examination and approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code. Failure to submit to a mental or physical examination ordered by the board constitutes an admission of the allegations against the individual unless the failure is due to circumstances beyond the individual's control, and a default and final order may be entered without the taking of testimony or presentation of evidence. If the board determines that the individual's ability to practice is impaired, the board shall suspend the individual's license or deny the individual's application and shall require the individual, as a condition for an initial, continued, reinstated, or renewed license, to submit to treatment. Before being eligible to apply for reinstatement of a license suspended under this division, the genetic counselor shall demonstrate to the board the ability to resume practice in compliance with acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The demonstration shall include the following: (a) Certification from a treatment provider approved under section 4731.251 of the Revised Code that the individual has successfully completed any required inpatient treatment; (b) Evidence of continuing full compliance with an aftercare contract or consent agreement; (c) Two written reports indicating that the individual's ability to practice has been assessed and that the individual has been found capable of practicing according to acceptable and prevailing standards of care. The reports shall be made by individuals or providers approved by the board for making such assessments and shall describe the basis for their determination. The board may reinstate a license suspended under this division after such demonstration and after the individual has entered into a written consent agreement. When the impaired genetic counselor resumes practice, the board shall require continued monitoring of the genetic counselor. The monitoring shall include monitoring of compliance with the written consent agreement entered into before reinstatement or with conditions imposed by board order after a hearing, and, on termination of the consent agreement, submission to the board for at least two years of annual written progress reports made under penalty of falsification stating whether the genetic counselor has maintained sobriety. (H)(1) If either of the following circumstances occur, the secretary and supervising member may recommend that the board suspend an individual's license to practice without a prior hearing: (a) The secretary and supervising member determine both of the following: (i) That there is clear and convincing evidence that a genetic counselor has violated division (B) of this section; (ii) That the individual's continued practice presents a danger of immediate and serious harm to the public. (b) The board receives verifiable information that a licensee has been charged in any state or federal court for a crime classified as a felony under the charging court's law and the conduct charged constitutes a violation of division (B) of this section. (2) If a recommendation is made to suspend without a prior hearing pursuant to division (H)(1) of this section, written allegations shall be prepared for consideration by the board. The board, on review of the allegations and by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, excluding the secretary and supervising member, may suspend a license without a prior hearing. A telephone conference call may be utilized for reviewing the allegations and taking the vote on the summary suspension. The board shall serve a written order of suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. The order shall not be subject to suspension by the court during pendency of any appeal filed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. If the genetic counselor requests an adjudicatory hearing by the board, the date set for the hearing shall be within fifteen days, but not earlier than seven days, after the genetic counselor requests the hearing, unless otherwise agreed to by both the board and the genetic counselor. (3) A summary suspension imposed under this division (H)(2) of this section is not a final appealable order and is not an adjudication that may be appealed under section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The summary suspension shall remain in effect, unless reversed on appeal, until a final adjudicative order issued by the board pursuant to this section and Chapter 119. of the Revised Code becomes effective. Once a final adjudicative order has been issued by the board, any party adversely affected by it may file an appeal in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The The board shall issue its final adjudicative order within sixty seventy-five days after completion of its hearing. Failure to issue the order within sixty seventy-five days shall result in dissolution of the summary suspension order, but shall not invalidate any subsequent, final adjudicative order. (I) If the board takes action under division (B)(10), (12), or (13) of this section, and the judicial finding of guilt, guilty plea, or judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction is overturned on appeal, on exhaustion of the criminal appeal, a petition for reconsideration of the order may be filed with the board along with appropriate court documents. On receipt of a petition and supporting court documents, the board shall reinstate the license to practice as a genetic counselor. The board may then hold an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to determine whether the individual committed the act in question. Notice of opportunity for hearing shall be given in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the board finds, pursuant to an adjudication held under this division, that the individual committed the act, or if no hearing is requested, it may order any of the sanctions specified in division (B) of this section. (J) The license to practice as a genetic counselor and the counselor's practice in this state are automatically suspended as of the date the genetic counselor pleads guilty to, is found by a judge or jury to be guilty of, or is subject to a judicial finding of eligibility for intervention in lieu of conviction in this state or treatment or intervention in lieu of conviction in another jurisdiction for any of the following criminal offenses in this state or a substantially equivalent criminal offense in another jurisdiction: aggravated murder, murder, voluntary manslaughter, felonious assault, trafficking in persons, kidnapping, rape, sexual battery, gross sexual imposition, aggravated arson, aggravated robbery, or aggravated burglary. Continued practice after the suspension shall be considered practicing without a license. The board shall serve the individual subject to the suspension in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. If an individual whose license is suspended under this division fails to make a timely request for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the board shall enter a final order permanently revoking the individual's license to practice. (K) In any instance in which the board is required by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to give notice of opportunity for hearing and the individual subject to the notice does not timely request a hearing in accordance with section 119.07 of the Revised Code, the board is not required to hold a hearing, but may adopt, by an affirmative vote of not fewer than six of its members, a final order that contains the board's findings. In the final order, the board may order any of the sanctions identified under division (A) or (B) of this section. (L) Any action taken by the board under division (B) of this section resulting in a suspension shall be accompanied by a written statement of the conditions under which the license of the genetic counselor may be reinstated. The board shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing conditions to be imposed for reinstatement. Reinstatement of a license suspended pursuant to division (B) of this section requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (M) When the board refuses to grant or issue a license to practice as a genetic counselor to an applicant, revokes an individual's license, refuses to renew an individual's license, or refuses to reinstate an individual's license, the board may specify that its action is permanent. An individual subject to a permanent action taken by the board is forever thereafter ineligible to hold a license to practice as a genetic counselor and the board shall not accept an application for reinstatement of the license or for issuance of a new license. (N) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code, all of the following apply: (1) The surrender of a license to practice as a genetic counselor is not effective unless or until accepted by the board. A telephone conference call may be utilized for acceptance of the surrender of an individual's license. The telephone conference call shall be considered a special meeting under division (F) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. Reinstatement of a license surrendered to the board requires an affirmative vote of not fewer than six members of the board. (2) An application made under this chapter for a license to practice may not be withdrawn without approval of the board. (3) Failure by an individual to renew a license in accordance with section 4778.06 of the Revised Code does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take disciplinary action under this section against the individual. (4) The placement of an individual's license on retired status, as described in section 4778.072 of the Revised Code, does not remove or limit the board's jurisdiction to take any disciplinary action against the individual with regard to the license as it existed before being placed on retired status. Sec. 4778.99. Whoever violates section 4778.02 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and felony of the fifth degree on each subsequent offense. Whoever violates division (B)(1) or (2) of section 4778.171 of the Revised Code is guilty of failure to report criminal conduct or sexual misconduct, a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the offender has previously been convicted of a violation of this division, the failure to report is on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the first degree on each subsequent offense. Whoever violates division (E) of section 4778.18 of the Revised Code is guilty of disclosing confidential investigatory information, a misdemeanor of the first degree. Sec. 4785.041. (A) The division of industrial compliance within the department of commerce may renew a license issued under section 4785.04 of the Revised Code if the licensee does all of the following: (1) Submits an application for license renewal on a form prescribed by the division; (2) Pays the license renewal fee established by the division; (3) If the licensee is an elevator mechanic, submits evidence that the applicant has completed the continuing education coursework described in division (B) of this section; (4) If the license is an elevator contractor's license, submits proof that the applicant is in compliance with the insurance requirements prescribed in section 4785.07 of the Revised Code. (B) The continuing education courses described in division (A)(3) of this section shall: (1) Instruct licensees on new and existing rules and standards adopted by the division; (2) Consist of not less than eight hours of instruction; (3) Be attended and completed within one year immediately preceding the scheduled date for the license renewal; (4) Be taught by instructors through continuing education providers approved by the division. (C) A continuing education instructor who holds a license under this chapter is exempt from the continuing education requirement prescribed in division (A)(3) of this section, provided that any such applicant was qualified as an instructor at any time during the year immediately preceding the scheduled date for the license renewal. (D)(1) A licensee who is unable to complete the continuing education coursework required under this section before the expiration of the licensee's license due to a temporary disability may apply for a temporary continuing education waiver from the division. (2) An application for a temporary continuing education waiver shall be made in a form prescribed by the division, which shall be signed by the applicant under the penalty of perjury and accompanied by a certified statement from a competent physician attesting to the temporary disability. If the division grants the waiver, the licensee's license does not expire but is placed on inactive status. (3) On the termination of the temporary disability, the licensee shall submit to the division a certified statement from the same physician, if practicable, attesting to the termination of the temporary disability. The division shall then take the licensee's license off inactive status and shall issue a waiver sticker, valid for ninety days, to the licensee and affix the sticker to the license. The licensee may then perform the tasks the license authorizes the licensee to perform but the licensee shall meet the continuing education requirement during this ninety-day period or be considered to have not met the continuing education requirement and the license shall be deemed to be expired. (E)(1) Approved continuing education providers shall keep uniform records, for a period of ten years, of attendance of licensees in a format approved by the division. Such records shall be available for inspection by the division on request. (2) Approved training providers are responsible for the security of all attendance records and certificates of completion, provided, however, that falsifying or knowingly allowing another to falsify such attendance records or certificates of completion constitutes grounds for suspension or revocation of a continuing education provider's division approval. (F) The division shall not renew the license of an individual or entity if the individual or entity would be denied an initial license for a reason listed in division (E) of section 4785.04 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4903.10. After any order has been made by the public utilities commission, any party who has entered an appearance in person or by counsel in the proceeding may apply for a rehearing in respect to any matters determined in the proceeding. Such application shall be filed within thirty days after the entry of the order upon the journal of the commission. Notwithstanding the preceding paragraph, in any uncontested proceeding or, by leave of the commission first had in any other proceeding, any affected person, firm, or corporation may make an application for a rehearing within thirty days after the entry of any final order upon the journal of the commission. Leave to file an application for rehearing shall not be granted to any person, firm, or corporation who did not enter an appearance in the proceeding unless the commission first finds: (A) The applicant's failure to enter an appearance prior to the entry upon the journal of the commission of the order complained of was due to just cause; and, (B) The interests of the applicant were not adequately considered in the proceeding. Every applicant for rehearing or for leave to file an application for rehearing shall give due notice of the filing of such application to all parties who have entered an appearance in the proceeding in the manner and form prescribed by the commission. Such application shall be in writing and shall set forth specifically the ground or grounds on which the applicant considers the order to be unreasonable or unlawful. No party shall in any court urge or rely on any ground for reversal, vacation, or modification not so set forth in the application. Where such application for rehearing has been filed before the effective date of the order as to which a rehearing is sought, the effective date of such order, unless otherwise ordered by the commission, shall be postponed or stayed pending disposition of the matter by the commission or by operation of law. In all other cases the making of such an application shall not excuse any person from complying with the order, or operate to stay or postpone the enforcement thereof, without a special order of the commission. Where such application for rehearing has been filed, the commission may grant and hold such rehearing on the matter specified in such application, if in its judgment sufficient reason therefor is made to appear. Notice of such rehearing shall be given by regular mail to all parties who have entered an appearance in the proceeding. If the commission does not grant or deny such application for rehearing within thirty days from the date of filing thereof, it is denied by operation of law. If the commission grants such rehearing, it shall specify in the notice of such granting the purpose for which it is granted. The commission shall also specify the scope of the additional evidence, if any, that will be taken, but it shall not upon such rehearing take any evidence that, with reasonable diligence, could have been offered upon the original hearing. If, after such rehearing, the commission is of the opinion that the original order or any part thereof is in any respect unjust or unwarranted, or should be changed, the commission may abrogate or modify the same; otherwise such order shall be affirmed. An order made after such rehearing, abrogating or modifying the original order, shall have the same effect as an original order, but shall not affect any right or the enforcement of any right arising from or by virtue of the original order prior to the receipt of notice by the affected party of the filing of the application for rehearing. If the commission does not affirm, abrogate, or modify the original order within ninety days from the date granting such rehearing, the order is affirmed by operation of law. No cause of action arising out of any order of the commission, other than in support of the order, shall accrue in any court to any person, firm, or corporation unless such person, firm, or corporation has made a proper application to the commission for a rehearing. Sec. 4905.311. (A) As used in this section, "electric distribution utility" has the same meaning as in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, an electric distribution utility may supply behind the meter electric generation service, provided that an application for any behind the meter electric generation facilities that the utility intends to use to supply such service were was filed with the public utilities commission under section 4928.47 of the Revised Code, as that section existed prior to its repeal by H.B. 15 of the 136th General Assembly, no later than March 31, 2025. (C) No electric distribution utility shall recover any of the following costs through any rate, charge, or recovery from retail electric service customers that are not receiving behind the meter electric generation service from the utility: (1) Costs associated with supplying behind the meter electric generation service; (2) Costs associated with any behind the meter electric generation service facility; (3) Stranded costs associated with the closing of any behind the meter electric generation service facility or an end-use customer of the behind the meter electric generation service ceasing operations. (D) No electric distribution utility shall offer direct, associated inducements for contracting with the utility for any behind the meter electric generation service. (E) The public utilities commission shall periodically audit all electric distribution utilities that provide any behind the meter electric generation service to ensure compliance with this section. Sec. 4906.07. (A) Upon the receipt of an application complying with section 4906.06 of the Revised Code, the power siting board shall promptly fix a date for a public hearing thereon, not less than forty-five nor more than sixty days after such receipt, and shall conclude the proceeding as expeditiously as practicable. (B) On an application for an amendment of a certificate, the board shall hold a hearing in the same manner as a hearing is held on an application for a certificate if the proposed change in the facility would result in any material increase in any environmental impact of the facility or a substantial change in the location of all or a portion of such facility other than as provided in the alternates set forth in the application. (C) The chairperson of the power siting board shall cause each application filed with the board to be investigated and shall, not less than fifteen five days prior to the date any application is set for hearing submit a written report to the board and to the applicant. A copy of such report shall be made available to any person upon request. Such report shall set forth the nature of the investigation, and shall contain recommended findings with regard to division (A) of section 4906.10 of the Revised Code and shall become part of the record and served upon all parties to the proceeding. Sec. 4911.18. (A) For the sole purpose of maintaining and administering the office of the consumers' counsel and exercising the powers of the consumers' counsel under this chapter, an amount equal to the appropriation to the office of the consumers' counsel in each fiscal year shall be apportioned among and assessed against each public utility within this state, as defined in section 4911.01 of the Revised Code, by first computing an assessment as though it were to be made in proportion to the intrastate gross earnings or receipts of the public utility for the calendar year next preceding that in which the assessment is made, excluding earnings or receipts from sales to other public utilities for resale. The office may include in that first computation any amount of a public utility's intrastate gross earnings or receipts underreported in a prior year. In addition to whatever penalties apply under the Revised Code to such underreporting, the office shall assess the public utility interest at the rate stated in division (A) of section 1343.01 of the Revised Code. The office shall deposit any interest so collected into the consumers' counsel operating fund. The office may exclude from that first computation any such amounts that were over-reported in a prior year. The final computation of the assessment shall consist of imposing upon each public utility whose assessment under the first computation would have been one hundred dollars or less an assessment of one hundred dollars and recomputing the assessment of the remaining companies by apportioning an amount equal to the appropriation to the office of consumers' counsel in each fiscal year less the total amount to be recovered from those paying the minimum assessment, in proportion to the intrastate gross earnings or receipts of the remaining companies for the calendar year next preceding that in which the assessments are made, excluding earnings or receipts from sales to other public utilities for resale. In the case of an assessment based on intrastate gross receipts under this section against a public utility that is an electric utility as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, or an electric services company, electric cooperative, or governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code, such receipts shall be those specified in the utility's, company's, cooperative's, or aggregator's most recent report of intrastate gross receipts and sales of kilowatt hours of electricity, filed with the public utilities commission pursuant to division (F) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code, and verified by the commission. In the case of an assessment based on intrastate gross receipts under this section against a retail natural gas supplier or governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4929.20 of the Revised Code, such receipts shall be those specified in the supplier's or aggregator's most recent report of intrastate gross receipts and sales of hundred cubic feet of natural gas, filed with the commission pursuant to division (B) of section 4929.23 of the Revised Code, and verified by the commission. However, no such retail natural gas supplier or such governmental aggregator serving or proposing to serve customers of a particular natural gas company, as defined in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, shall be assessed under this section until after the commission, pursuant to section 4905.26 or 4909.18 of the Revised Code, has removed from the base rates of the natural gas company the amount of assessment under this section that is attributable to the value of commodity sales service, as defined in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, in the base rates paid by those customers of the company that do not purchase that service from the natural gas company. (B) Through calendar year 2005, on or before the first day of October in each year, the office of consumers' counsel shall notify each public utility of the sum assessed against it, whereupon payment shall be made to the counsel, who shall deposit it into the state treasury to the credit of the consumers' counsel operating fund, which is hereby created. Beginning in calendar year 2006, on or before the fifteenth day of May in each year, the consumers' counsel shall notify each public utility that had a sum assessed against it for the current fiscal year of more than one thousand dollars that fifty per cent of that amount shall be paid to the consumers' counsel by the twentieth day of June of that year as an initial payment of the assessment against the company for the next fiscal year. On or before the first day of October in each year, the consumers' counsel shall make a final determination of the sum of the assessment against each public utility and shall notify each public utility of the sum assessed against it. The consumers' counsel shall deduct from the assessment for each public utility any initial payment received. Payment of the assessment shall be made to the consumers' counsel by the first day of November of that year. The consumers' counsel shall deposit the payments received into the state treasury to the credit of the consumers' counsel operating fund. Any such amounts paid into the fund but not expended by the office shall be credited ratably by the office to the public utilities that pay more than the minimum assessment, according to the respective portions of such sum assessable against them for the ensuing fiscal year, after first deducting any deficits accumulated from prior years. The assessments for such fiscal year shall be reduced correspondingly. (C) Within five days after the beginning of each fiscal year through fiscal year 2006, the director of budget and management shall transfer from the general revenue fund to the consumers' counsel operating fund an amount sufficient for maintaining and administering the office of the consumers' counsel and exercising the powers of the consumers' counsel under this chapter during the first four months of the fiscal year. Not later than the thirty-first day of December of the fiscal year, the same amount shall be transferred back to the general revenue fund from the consumers' counsel operating fund. (D) (D)(1) As used in this section, "public utility" includes: (1) (a) In addition to an electric utility as defined in section 4928.01 of the Revised Code, an electric services company, an electric cooperative, or a governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code, to the extent of the company's, cooperative's, or aggregator's engagement in the business of supplying or arranging for the supply in this state of any retail electric service for which it must be so certified; (2) (b) In addition to a natural gas company as defined in section 4929.01 of the Revised Code, a retail natural gas supplier or governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4929.20 of the Revised Code, to the extent of the supplier's or aggregator's engagement in the business of supplying or arranging for the supply in this state of any competitive retail natural gas service for which it must be certified. (2) As used in this section, "public utility" does not include a wireless service provider or reseller as defined in section 128.01 of the Revised Code, to the extent either of them are providing wireless service as defined under section 128.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4921.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Ambulance" has the same meaning as in section 4766.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "For-hire motor carrier" means a person engaged in the business of transporting persons or property by motor vehicle for compensation, except when engaged in any of the following in intrastate commerce: (1) The transportation of persons in taxicabs in the usual taxicab service; (2) The transportation of pupils in school buses operating to or from school sessions or school events; (3) The transportation of farm supplies to the farm or farm products from farm to market or to food fabricating plants; (4) The distribution of newspapers; (5) The transportation of crude petroleum incidental to gathering from wells and delivery to destination by pipeline; (6) The transportation of injured, ill, or deceased persons by hearse or ambulance; (7) The transportation of compost (a combination of manure and sand or shredded bark mulch) or shredded bark mulch; (8) The transportation of persons in a ridesharing arrangement when any fee charged each person so transported is in such amount as to recover only the person's share of the costs of operating the motor vehicle for such purpose; (9) The operation of motor vehicles for contractors on public road work; (10) The operation of trailers that are all of the following: (a) Designed and used exclusively to transport a single boat between the following that are not more than ten miles apart: (i) A place of storage; (ii) A marina, or a place that is in and around a marina; (b) Drawn or towed within this state on a public road or highway at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less; (c) The gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight rating, gross vehicle weight, and gross combination weight or any combination thereof does not exceed twenty-six thousand one pounds. "For-hire motor carrier" includes the carrier's agents, officers, and representatives, as well as employees responsible for hiring, supervising, training, assigning, or dispatching drivers and employees concerned with the installation, inspection, and maintenance of motor-vehicle equipment and accessories. Divisions (B)(1) to (9) of this section shall not be construed to relieve a person from compliance with rules governing unified carrier registration adopted under section 4921.11 of the Revised Code. (C) "Household goods" means personal effects and property used or to be used in a dwelling, excluding property moving from a factory or store. (D) "Interstate commerce" means trade, traffic, or transportation in the United States that is any of the following: (1) Between a place in a state and a place outside of that state (including a place outside of the United States); (2) Between two places in a state through another state or a place outside of the United States; (3) Between two places in a state as part of trade, traffic, or transportation originating or terminating outside the state or the United States. (E) "Intrastate commerce" means any trade, traffic, or transportation in any state which is not described in the term "interstate commerce." (F) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power and used upon the highways in the transportation of persons or property, or any combination thereof, but does not include any vehicle, locomotive, or car operated exclusively on a rail or rails, or a trolley bus operated by electric power derived from a fixed overhead wire, furnishing local passenger transportation similar to street-railway service and does not include trailers that are all of the following: (1) Designed and used exclusively to transport a single boat between the following that are not more than ten miles apart: (a) A place of storage; (b) A marina, or a place that is in and around a marina; (2) Drawn or towed within this state on a public road or highway at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less; (3) The gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight rating, gross vehicle weight, and gross combination weight or any combination thereof does not exceed twenty-six thousand one pounds. (G) "Public highway" means any public street, road, or highway in this state, whether within or without the corporate limits of a municipal corporation. (H) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of persons in a motor vehicle where such transportation is incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver, and includes ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and buspools. (I) "School bus" has the same meaning as in section 4511.01 of the Revised Code. (J) "Trailer" means any vehicle without motive power designed or used for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a separate motor vehicle, including any vehicle of the trailer type, whether designed or used for carrying persons or property wholly on its own structure, or so designed or used that a part of its own weight or the weight of its load rests upon and is carried by such motor vehicle. Sec. 4923.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Ambulance," "interstate commerce," "intrastate commerce," "motor vehicle," "public highway," "ridesharing arrangement," and "school bus" have the same meanings as in section 4921.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "For-hire motor carrier" means a person engaged in the business of transporting persons or property by motor vehicle for compensation, except when engaged in any of the following in intrastate commerce: (1) The transportation of persons in taxicabs in the usual taxicab service; (2) The transportation of pupils in school busses buses operating to or from school sessions or school events; (3) The transportation of farm supplies to the farm or farm products from farm to market or to food fabricating plants; (4) The distribution of newspapers; (5) The transportation of crude petroleum incidental to gathering from wells and delivery to destination by pipe line; (6) The transportation of injured, ill, or deceased persons by hearse or ambulance; (7) The transportation of compost (a combination of manure and sand or shredded bark mulch) or shredded bark mulch; (8) The transportation of persons in a ridesharing arrangement when any fee charged each person so transported is in such amount as to recover only the person's share of the costs of operating the motor vehicle for such purpose; (9) The operation of motor vehicles for contractors on public road work; (10) The operation of trailers that are all of the following: (a) Designed and used exclusively to transport a single boat between the following that are not more than ten miles apart: (i) A place of storage; (ii) A marina, or a place that is in and around a marina; (b) Drawn or towed within this state on a public road or highway at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less; (c) The gross vehicle weight rating, gross combination weight rating, gross vehicle weight, and gross combination weight or any combination thereof does not exceed twenty-six thousand one pounds. "For-hire motor carrier" includes the carrier's agents, officers, and representatives, as well as employees responsible for hiring, supervising, training, assigning, or dispatching drivers and employees concerned with the installation, inspection, and maintenance of motor-vehicle equipment and accessories. Divisions (B)(1) to (9) of this section shall not be construed to relieve a person from compliance with rules adopted under division (A)(2) of section 4923.04 of the Revised Code, division (E) of section 4923.06 of the Revised Code, division (B) of section 4923.07 of the Revised Code, and section 4923.11 of the Revised Code, or from compliance with rules regarding commercial driver's licenses adopted under division (A)(1) of section 4923.04 of the Revised Code. (C) "Motor carrier" means both a for-hire motor carrier and a private motor carrier. (D) "Private motor carrier" means a person who is not a for-hire motor carrier but is engaged in the business of transporting persons or property by motor vehicle, except as provided in section 4923.02 of the Revised Code. "Private motor carrier" includes the carrier's agents, officers, and representatives, as well as employees responsible for hiring, supervising, training, assigning, or dispatching drivers and employees concerned with the installation, inspection, and maintenance of motor-vehicle equipment and accessories. Sec. 4927.01. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Basic local exchange service" means residential-end-user access to and usage of telephone-company-provided services over a single line or small-business-end-user access to and usage of telephone-company-provided services over the primary access line of service, which in the case of residential and small-business access and usage is not part of a bundle or package of services, that does both of the following: (a) Enables a customer to originate or receive voice communications within a local service area as that area exists on September 13, 2010, or as that area is changed with the approval of the public utilities commission; (b) Consists of all of the following services: (i) Local dial tone service; (ii) For residential end users, flat-rate telephone exchange service; (iii) Touch tone dialing service; (iv) Access to and usage of 9-1-1 services, where such services are available; (v) Access to operator services and directory assistance; (vi) Provision of a telephone directory in any reasonable format, which includes, at the telephone company's option, an internet-accessible database of directory listings, for no additional charge and a listing in that directory, with reasonable accommodations made for private listings, and for a telephone company that no longer offers a printed directory, provision of reasonable customer notice of the available options to obtain directory information; (vii) Per call, caller identification blocking services; (viii) Access to telecommunications relay service; and (ix) Access to toll presubscription, interexchange or toll providers or both, and networks of other telephone companies. "Basic local exchange service" excludes any voice service to which customers are transitioned following a withdrawal of basic local exchange service under section 4927.10 of the Revised Code. (2) "Bundle or package of services" means one or more telecommunications services or other services offered together as one service option at a single price. (3) "Carrier access" means access to and usage of telephone company-provided facilities that enable end user customers originating or receiving voice grade, data, or image communications, over a local exchange telephone company network operated within a local service area, to access interexchange or other networks and includes special access. (4) "Federal poverty level" means the income level represented by the poverty guidelines as revised annually by the United States department of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Omnibus Reconciliation Act of 1981," 95 Stat. 511, 42 U.S.C. 9902, as amended, for a family size equal to the size of the family of the person whose income is being determined. (5) "Incumbent local exchange carrier" means, with respect to an area, the local exchange carrier that: (a) On February 8, 1996, provided telephone exchange service in such area; and (b)(i) On February 8, 1996, was deemed to be a member of the exchange carrier association pursuant to 47 C.F.R. 69.601(b); or (ii) Is a person or entity that, on or after February 8, 1996, became a successor or assign of a member described in division (A)(5)(b)(i) of this section. (6) "Internet protocol-enabled services" means any services, capabilities, functionalities, or applications that are provided using internet protocol or a successor protocol to enable an end user to send or receive communications in internet protocol format or a successor format, regardless of how any particular such service is classified by the federal communications commission, and includes voice over internet protocol service. (7) "Interstate-access component" means the portion of carrier access that is within the jurisdiction of the federal communications commission. (8) "Local exchange carrier" means any person engaged in the provision of telephone exchange service, or the offering of access to telephone exchange service or facilities for the purpose of originating or terminating telephone toll service. (9) "Local service area" means the geographic area that may encompass more than one exchange area and within which a telephone customer, by paying the rate for basic local exchange service, may complete calls to other telephone customers without being assessed long distance toll charges. (10) "Small business" means a nonresidential service customer with three or fewer service access lines. (11) "Telecommunications" means the transmission, between or among points specified by the user, of information of the user's choosing, without change in the form or content of the information as sent and received. (12) "Telecommunications carrier" has the same meaning as in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 110 Stat. 60, 47 U.S.C. 153. (13) "Telecommunications service" means the offering of telecommunications for a fee directly to the public, or to such classes of users as to be effectively available directly to the public, regardless of the facilities used. (14) "Telephone company" means a company described in division (A) of section 4905.03 of the Revised Code that is a public utility under section 4905.02 of the Revised Code. (15) "Telephone exchange service" means telecommunications service that is within a telephone exchange, or within a connected system of telephone exchanges within the same exchange area operated to furnish to subscribers intercommunicating service of the character ordinarily furnished by a single exchange, and that is covered by the exchange service charge; or comparable service provided through a system of switches, transmission equipment, or other facilities, or combination thereof, by which a customer can originate and terminate a telecommunications service. (16) "Telephone toll service" means telephone service between stations in different exchange areas for which there is made a separate charge not included in contracts with customers for exchange service. (17) "Voice over internet protocol service" means a service that enables real-time, two-way, voice communications that originate or terminate from the user's location using internet protocol or a successor protocol, including, but not limited to, any such service that permits an end user to receive calls from and terminate calls to the public switched network. (18) "Voice service" includes all of the applicable functionalities described in 47 C.F.R. 54.101(a). "Voice service" is not the same as basic local exchange service. (19) "Wireless service" means federally licensed commercial mobile service as defined in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 110 Stat. 61, 151, 153, 47 U.S.C. 332(d) and further defined as commercial mobile radio service in 47 C.F.R. 20.3. Under division (A)(19) of this section, commercial mobile radio service is specifically limited to mobile telephone, mobile cellular telephone, paging, personal communications services, and specialized mobile radio service provided by a common carrier in this state and excludes fixed wireless service. (20) "Wireless service provider" means a facilities-based provider of wireless service to one or more end users in this state. (21) "Broadband internet access service" has the same meaning as in 47 C.F.R. 8.1. (B) The definitions of this section shall be applied consistent with the definitions in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 110 Stat. 56, 47 U.S.C. 151 et seq., as amended, and with federal decisions interpreting those definitions. Sec. 4927.22. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code, other than division (B) of this section: (1) Broadband internet access service is not subject to regulation by the public utilities commission. (2) No agency, commission, or political subdivision of this state shall enact, adopt, or enforce, either directly or indirectly, any law, rule, regulation, ordinance, standard, order or other provision having the force or effect of law that regulates, or has the effect of regulating, the rates, terms, or conditions of any broadband internet access service, or otherwise treats providers of broadband internet access services as public utilities or telecommunications carriers. (B) This section shall not be construed to do any of the following: (1) Restrict any authority delegated to the commission or to any state agency to administer a state or federal grant program under state or federal statute, rule, or order; (2) Restrict the application to broadband internet access service, or providers thereof, of any law that applies generally to the conduct of business in the state relating to consumer protection and fair competition; (3) Restrict the authority of any political subdivision in the state to manage access to and use of any public way or public rights-of-way. Sec. 4928.05. (A)(1) A competitive retail electric service supplied by an electric services company, or by an electric utility consistent with section 4928.141 of the Revised Code, shall not be subject to supervision and regulation by a municipal corporation under Chapter 743. of the Revised Code or by the public utilities commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code, except sections 4905.10 and 4905.31, division (B) of section 4905.33, and sections 4905.35 and 4933.81 to 4933.90; except sections 4905.06, 4935.03, 4963.40, and 4963.41 of the Revised Code only to the extent related to service reliability and public safety; and except as otherwise provided in this chapter. The commission's authority to enforce those excepted provisions with respect to a competitive retail electric service shall be such authority as is provided for their enforcement under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code and this chapter. Nothing in this division shall be construed to limit the commission's authority under sections 4928.141, 4928.142, and 4928.144 of the Revised Code. (2) A competitive retail electric service supplied by an electric cooperative shall not be subject to supervision and regulation by the commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise expressly provided in sections 4928.01 to 4928.10 and 4928.16 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) A noncompetitive retail electric service supplied by an electric utility shall be subject to supervision and regulation by the commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code and this chapter, to the extent that authority is not preempted by federal law. The commission's authority to enforce those provisions with respect to a noncompetitive retail electric service shall be the authority provided under those chapters and this chapter, to the extent the authority is not preempted by federal law. Notwithstanding Chapters 4905. and 4909. of the Revised Code, commission authority under this chapter shall include the authority to provide for the recovery, through a reconcilable rider on an electric distribution utility's distribution rates, of all transmission and transmission-related costs, including ancillary and congestion costs, imposed on or charged to the utility by the federal energy regulatory commission or a regional transmission organization, independent transmission operator, or similar organization approved by the federal energy regulatory commission. The commission shall adopt, for each electric distribution utility that provides customers with a standard service offer in compliance with sections 4928.141 and 4928.142 of the Revised Code, a nonbypassable bypassable cost recovery mechanism relating to transmission, ancillary, congestion, or any related service required for such standard service offer that includes provisions for the recovery of any cost of such service that the electric distribution utility incurs pursuant to the standard service offer. (2) The commission shall exercise its jurisdiction with respect to the delivery of electricity by an electric utility in this state so as to ensure that no aspect of the delivery of electricity by the utility to consumers in this state that consists of a noncompetitive retail electric service is unregulated. (3) A noncompetitive retail electric service supplied by an electric cooperative shall not be subject to supervision and regulation by the commission under Chapters 4901. to 4909., 4933., 4935., and 4963. of the Revised Code, except sections 4933.81 to 4933.90 and 4935.03 of the Revised Code. The commission's authority to enforce those excepted sections with respect to a noncompetitive retail electric service of an electric cooperative shall be such authority as is provided for their enforcement under Chapters 4933. and 4935. of the Revised Code. Sec. 4928.06. (A) Beginning on the starting date of competitive retail electric service, the public utilities commission shall ensure that the policy specified in section 4928.02 of the Revised Code is effectuated. To the extent necessary, the commission shall adopt rules to carry out this chapter. Initial rules necessary for the commencement of the competitive retail electric service under this chapter shall be adopted within one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the proceedings and orders of the commission under the chapter shall be subject to and governed by Chapter 4903. of the Revised Code. (B) If the commission determines, on or after the starting date of competitive retail electric service, that there is a decline or loss of effective competition with respect to a competitive retail electric service of an electric utility, which service was declared competitive by commission order issued pursuant to division (A) of section 4928.04 of the Revised Code, the commission shall ensure that that service is provided at compensatory, fair, and nondiscriminatory prices and terms and conditions. (C) In addition to its authority under section 4928.04 of the Revised Code and divisions (A) and (B) of this section, the commission, on an ongoing basis, shall monitor and evaluate the provision of retail electric service in this state for the purpose of discerning any noncompetitive retail electric service that should be available on a competitive basis on or after the starting date of competitive retail electric service pursuant to a declaration in the Revised Code, and for the purpose of discerning any competitive retail electric service that is no longer subject to effective competition on or after that date. Upon such evaluation, the commission periodically shall report its findings and any recommendations for legislation to the standing committees of both houses of the general assembly that have primary jurisdiction regarding public utility legislation. Until 2008, the commission and the consumer's counsel also shall provide biennial reports to those standing committees, regarding the effectiveness of competition in the supply of competitive retail electric services in this state. In addition, until the end of all market development periods as determined by the commission under section 4928.40 of the Revised Code, those standing committees shall meet at least biennially to consider the effect on this state of electric service restructuring and to receive reports from the commission, consumers' counsel, and director of development. (D) In determining, for purposes of division (B) or (C) of this section, whether there is effective competition in the provision of a retail electric service or reasonably available alternatives for that service, the commission shall consider factors including, but not limited to, all of the following: (1) The number and size of alternative providers of that service; (2) The extent to which the service is available from alternative suppliers in the relevant market; (3) The ability of alternative suppliers to make functionally equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive prices, terms, and conditions; (4) Other indicators of market power, which may include market share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and the affiliation of suppliers of services. The burden of proof shall be on any entity requesting, under division (B) or (C) of this section, a determination by the commission of the existence of or a lack of effective competition or reasonably available alternatives. (E)(1) Beginning on the starting date of competitive retail electric service, the commission has authority under Chapters 4901. to 4909. of the Revised Code, and shall exercise that authority, to resolve abuses of market power by any electric utility that interfere with effective competition in the provision of retail electric service. (2) In addition to the commission's authority under division (E)(1) of this section, the commission, beginning the first year after the market development period of a particular electric utility and after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, may take such measures within a transmission constrained area in the utility's certified territory as are necessary to ensure that retail electric generation service is provided at reasonable rates within that area. The commission may exercise this authority only upon findings that an electric utility is or has engaged in the abuse of market power and that that abuse is not adequately mitigated by rules and practices of any independent transmission entity controlling the transmission facilities. Any such measure shall be taken only to the extent necessary to protect customers in the area from the particular abuse of market power and to the extent the commission's authority is not preempted by federal law. The measure shall remain in effect until the commission, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, determines that the particular abuse of market power has been mitigated. (F) An electric utility, electric services company, electric cooperative, or governmental aggregator subject to certification under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code shall provide the commission with such information, regarding a competitive retail electric service for which it is subject to certification, as the commission considers necessary to carry out this chapter. An electric utility shall provide the commission with such information as the commission considers necessary to carry out divisions (B) to (E) of this section. The commission shall take such measures as it considers necessary to protect the confidentiality of any such information. The commission shall require each electric utility to file with the commission on and after the starting date of competitive retail electric service an annual report of its intrastate gross receipts and sales of kilowatt hours of electricity, and shall require each electric services company, electric cooperative, and governmental aggregator subject to certification to file an annual report on and after that starting date of such receipts and sales from the provision of those retail electric services for which it is subject to certification. For the purpose of the reports, sales of kilowatt hours of electricity are deemed to occur at the meter of the retail customer. Sec. 4928.102. (A) If a competitive retail electric service supplier offers a residential or small commercial customer a contract for a fixed introductory rate that converts to a variable rate upon the expiration of the fixed rate, the supplier shall send two notices to each residential and small commercial customer that enters into such a contract. Each notice shall provide all of the following information to the customer: (1) The fixed rate that is expiring under the contract; (2) The expiration date of the contract's fixed rate; (3) The public utilities commission web site that, as a comparison tool, lists rates offered by competitive retail electric service suppliers; (4) A statement explaining that appearing on each customer's bill is a price-to-compare notice that lists the utility's standard service offer price. (B) The second notice shall include all the requirements as stated in division (A) of this section and shall also identify the initial rate to be charged upon the contract's conversion to a variable rate. (C) The notices shall be sent by standard United States mail or electronically with a customer's verifiable consent as follows: (1) The supplier shall send the first notice not earlier than ninety days, and not later than sixty days, prior to the expiration of the fixed rate. (2) The supplier shall send the second notice not earlier than forty-five days, and not later than fifteen days, prior to the expiration of the fixed rate. (D) A competitive retail electric service supplier shall provide an annual notice, by standard United States mail or electronically with a customer's verifiable consent, to each residential and small commercial customer that has entered into a contract with the supplier that has converted to a variable rate upon the expiration of the contract's fixed introductory rate. The notice shall inform the customer that the customer is currently subject to a variable rate and that other fixed rate contracts are available. (E) Not later than one hundred fifty days after the effective date of this sectionAugust 14, 2025, the commission shall adopt rules in order to implement divisions (A) to (D) of this section. The rules, at a minimum, shall include the following requirements regarding the notices required under divisions (A) to (D) of this section: (1) To use clear and unambiguous language in order to enable the customer to make an informed decision; (2) To design the notices in a way to ensure that they cannot be confused with marketing materials. (F) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under this section 4928.101 of the Revised Code is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4928.34. (A) The public utilities commission shall not approve or prescribe a transition plan under division (A) or (B) of section 4928.33 of the Revised Code unless the commission first makes all of the following determinations: (1) The unbundled components for the electric transmission component of retail electric service, as specified in the utility's rate unbundling plan required by division (A)(1) of section 4928.31 of the Revised Code, equal the tariff rates determined by the federal energy regulatory commission that are in effect on the date of the approval of the transition plan under sections 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code, as each such rate is determined applicable to each particular customer class and rate schedule by the commission. The unbundled transmission component shall include a sliding scale of charges under division (B) of section 4905.31 of the Revised Code to ensure that refunds determined or approved by the federal energy regulatory commission are flowed through to retail electric customers. (2) The unbundled components for retail electric distribution service in the rate unbundling plan equal the difference between the costs attributable to the utility's transmission and distribution rates and charges under its schedule of rates and charges in effect on the effective date of this section, based upon the record in the most recent rate proceeding of the utility for which the utility's schedule was established, and the tariff rates for electric transmission service determined by the federal energy regulatory commission as described in division (A)(1) of this section. (3) All other unbundled components required by the commission in the rate unbundling plan equal the costs attributable to the particular service as reflected in the utility's schedule of rates and charges in effect on the effective date of this section. (4) The unbundled components for retail electric generation service in the rate unbundling plan equal the residual amount remaining after the determination of the transmission, distribution, and other unbundled components, and after any adjustments necessary to reflect the effects of the amendment of section 5727.111 of the Revised Code by Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd general assembly. (5) All unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan have been adjusted to reflect any base rate reductions on file with the commission and as scheduled to be in effect by December 31, 2005, under rate settlements in effect on the effective date of this section. However, all earnings obligations, restrictions, or caps imposed on an electric utility in a commission order prior to the effective date of this section are void. (6) Subject to division (A)(5) of this section, the total of all unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan are capped and shall equal during the market development period, except as specifically provided in this chapter, the total of all rates and charges in effect under the applicable bundled schedule of the electric utility pursuant to section 4905.30 of the Revised Code in effect on the day before the effective date of this section, including the transition charge determined under section 4928.40 of the Revised Code, adjusted for any changes in the taxation of electric utilities and retail electric service under Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd General Assembly, and the universal service percentage of income payment plan rider authorized by section 4928.51 4928.52 of the Revised Code, and the temporary rider authorized by section 4928.61 of the Revised Code. For the purpose of this division, the rate cap applicable to a customer receiving electric service pursuant to an arrangement approved by the commission under section 4905.31 of the Revised Code is, for the term of the arrangement, the total of all rates and charges in effect under the arrangement. For any rate schedule filed pursuant to section 4905.30 of the Revised Code or any arrangement subject to approval pursuant to section 4905.31 of the Revised Code, the initial tax-related adjustment to the rate cap required by this division shall be equal to the rate of taxation specified in section 5727.81 of the Revised Code and applicable to the schedule or arrangement. To the extent such total annual amount of the tax-related adjustment is greater than or less than the comparable amount of the total annual tax reduction experienced by the electric utility as a result of the provisions of Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd general assembly, such difference shall be addressed by the commission through accounting procedures, refunds, or an annual surcharge or credit to customers, or through other appropriate means, to avoid placing the financial responsibility for the difference upon the electric utility or its shareholders. Any adjustments in the rate of taxation specified in section 5727.81 of the Revised Code shall not occur without a corresponding adjustment to the rate cap for each such rate schedule or arrangement. The department of taxation shall advise the commission and self-assessors under section 5727.81 of the Revised Code prior to the effective date of any change in the rate of taxation specified under that section, and the commission shall modify the rate cap to reflect that adjustment so that the rate cap adjustment is effective as of the effective date of the change in the rate of taxation. This division shall be applied, to the extent possible, to eliminate any increase in the price of electricity for customers that otherwise may occur as a result of establishing the taxes contemplated in section 5727.81 of the Revised Code. (7) The rate unbundling plan complies with any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code. (8) The corporate separation plan required by division (A)(2) of section 4928.31 of the Revised Code complies with section 4928.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code. (9) Any plan or plans the commission requires to address operational support systems and any other technical implementation issues pertaining to competitive retail electric service comply with any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code. (10) The employee assistance plan required by division (A)(4) of section 4928.31 of the Revised Code sufficiently provides severance, retraining, early retirement, retention, outplacement, and other assistance for the utility's employees whose employment is affected by electric industry restructuring under this chapter. (11) The consumer education plan required under division (A)(5) of section 4928.31 of the Revised Code complies with former section 4928.42 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code. (12) The transition revenues for which an electric utility is authorized a revenue opportunity under sections 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code are the allowable transition costs of the utility as such costs are determined by the commission pursuant to section 4928.39 of the Revised Code, and the transition charges for the customer classes and rate schedules of the utility are the charges determined pursuant to section 4928.40 of the Revised Code. (13) Any independent transmission plan included in the transition plan filed under section 4928.31 of the Revised Code reasonably complies with section 4928.12 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted by the commission under division (A) of section 4928.06 of the Revised Code, unless the commission, for good cause shown, authorizes the utility to defer compliance until an order is issued under division (G) of section 4928.35 of the Revised Code. (14) The utility is in compliance with sections 4928.01 to 4928.11 of the Revised Code and any rules or orders of the commission adopted or issued under those sections. (15) All unbundled components in the rate unbundling plan have been adjusted to reflect the elimination of the tax on gross receipts imposed by section 5727.30 of the Revised Code. In addition, a transition plan approved by the commission under section 4928.33 of the Revised Code but not containing an approved independent transmission plan shall contain the express conditions that the utility will comply with an order issued under division (G) of section 4928.35 of the Revised Code. (B) If the commission finds that any part of the transition plan would constitute an abandonment under sections 4905.20 and 4905.21 of the Revised Code, the commission shall not approve that part of the transition plan unless it makes the finding required for approval of an abandonment application under section 4905.21 of the Revised Code. Sections 4905.20 and 4905.21 of the Revised Code otherwise shall not apply to a transition plan under sections 4928.31 to 4928.40 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4928.43. (A) Each state agency that provides employment assistance and job training programs, including the bureau of employment department of job and family services and the department of development, shall provide concentrated attention through those programs to assisting employees whose employment is affected by electric industry restructuring under this chapter. (B) To the extent not prohibited by federal law or any law of this state and except as otherwise provided in a labor contract or other agreement, no unencumbered money in a pension fund for employees of electric utilities shall be used for any purpose other than to pay allowable pensions or early retirement buyouts for the employees. Sec. 4928.51. (A) There is hereby established in the state treasury a universal service the electric partnership plan fund, into which shall be deposited all universal service revenues remitted to the director of development job and family services under this section, for the exclusive purposes of providing funding for the low-income customer assistance programs and for the consumer education program authorized under section 4928.56 of the Revised Code, and paying the administrative costs of the low-income customer assistance programs and the consumer education program. Interest on the fund shall be credited to the fund. Disbursements from the fund shall be made to any supplier that provides a competitive retail electric service or a noncompetitive retail electric service to a customer who is approved to receive assistance under a specified low-income customer assistance program and to any authorized provider of weatherization or energy efficiency service to a customer approved to receive such assistance under a specified low-income customer assistance program. (B) Universal service revenues Revenues deposited in the electric partnership plan fund shall include all of the following: (1) Revenues revenues remitted to the director after collection by an electric distribution utility beginning July 1, 2000, attributable to the collection from customers of the universal service rider prescribed under pursuant to division (C) of section 4928.52 of the Revised Code; (2) Revenues remitted to the director that have been collected by an electric distribution utility beginning July 1, 2000, as customer payments under the percentage of income payment plan program, including revenues remitted under division (C) of this section; (3) Adequate revenues remitted to the director after collection by a municipal electric utility or electric cooperative in this state not earlier than July 1, 2000, upon the utility's or cooperative's decision to participate in the low-income customer assistance programs. (C)(1) Beginning July 1, 2000, an electric distribution utility shall transfer to the director the right to collect all arrearage payments of a customer for percentage of income payment plan program debt owed to the utility on the day before that date or retain the right to collect that debt but remit to the director all program revenues received by the utility for that customer. (2) A current or past percentage of income payment plan program customer is relieved of any payment obligation under the percentage of income payment program for any unpaid arrears accrued by the customer under the program as of the effective date of this section if the customer, as determined by the director, meets both of the following criteria: (a) The customer as of that date has complied with customer payment responsibilities under the program. (b) The customer is permanently and totally disabled as defined in section 5117.01 of the Revised Code or is sixty-five years of age or older as defined in that section. (D) The public utilities commission shall complete an audit of each electric utility by July 1, 2000, for the purpose of establishing a baseline for the percentage of income payment plan program component of the low-income assistance programs. Sec. 4928.52. (A) Beginning July January 1, 2000, the 2026, the percentage of income payment plan rider shall replace, for each electric distribution utility, the universal service rider shall replace the percentage of income payment plan rider in existence on the effective date of the amendment of this section and any amount in the rates of an electric utility for the funding of low-income customer energy efficiency programsby this act. The universal service percentage of income payment plan rider shall be a rider on retail electric distribution service rates as such rates are determined by the public utilities commission pursuant to this chapter. The universal service percentage of income payment plan rider for the first five years after the starting date of competitive retail electric service shall be the sum of all of recover the following: (1) The level of prudently incurred costs of providing the percentage of income payment plan program rider in existence on the effective date of this sectionfor each electric distribution utility; (2) An amount equal to the level of funding for low-income customer energy efficiency programs provided through electric utility rates in effect on the effective date of this sectionThe total of the electric distribution utilities' allocated shares, as determined by the public utilities commission, under division (B)(1) of this section; (3) Any additional amount necessary and sufficient to fund through the universal service percentage of income payment plan rider the administrative costs of the low-income customer assistance programs and the consumer education program created in section 4928.56 of the Revised Code. (B)(B)(1) If, during or after the five-year period specified in division (A) of this section, the director of development, after consultation with the public benefits advisory board created under section 4928.58 of the Revised Code, determines that revenues in the universal service fund and revenues from federal or other sources of funding for those programs, including general revenue fund appropriations for the Ohio energy credit program, will be insufficient to cover the administrative costs of the low-income customer assistance programs and the consumer education program and provide adequate funding for those programs, the director shall file a petition with the commission for an increase in the universal service rider. The commission, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, may adjust the universal service rider by the minimum amount necessary to provide the additional revenues. The commission shall not decrease the universal service rider without the approval of the director, after consultation by the director with the advisory boardallocate to each electric distribution utility a share of the funding for low-income customer assistance programs administered by the director of job and family services according to each electric distribution utility's annual distribution service revenues. (2) Each electric distribution utility's allocation determined under division (B)(1) of this section shall include a separately designated allocation equal to the electric distribution utility's share of an amount not to exceed fifteen million dollars annually for funding the consumer education program administered by the department of job and family services under section 4928.56 of the Revised Code. (C) On the thirtieth day of June of each year, each electric distribution utility shall remit to the department for deposit in the electric partnership plan fund the utility's share of the following: (1) The utility's allocation determined under division (B)(2) of this section for funding the consumer education program administered by the department of job and family services under section 4928.56 of the Revised Code; (2) The costs under division (A)(3) of this section for the administration of the low-income customer assistance programs administered by the director. (C)(D) The universal service percentage of income payment plan rider established under division (A) or (B) of this section shall be set in such a manner so as not to shift among the customer classes of electric distribution utilities the costs of funding low-income customer assistance programs. Sec. 4928.53. (A) Beginning July 1, 20002026, the director of development is hereby authorized to job and family services shall administer the low-income customer assistance programs, except for the percentage of income payment plan rider established under section 4928.52 of the Revised Code. For that purpose, the public utilities commission shall cooperate with and provide such assistance as the director requires for administration of the low-income customer assistance programs. The director shall consolidate the administration of and redesign and coordinate the operations of those the low-income customer assistance programs within the department to provide, to the maximum extent possible, for efficient program administration and a one-stop application and eligibility determination process at the local level for consumers. (B)(1) Not later than March 1, 2000, the The director, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules to carry out sections 4928.51 to 4928.58 of the Revised Code and ensure the effective and efficient administration and operation of the low-income customer assistance programs. The rules shall take effect on July 1, 2000. (2) The director's authority to adopt rules under this division for the Ohio energy credit program shall be subject to such rule-making authority as is conferred on the director of development by sections 5117.01 to 5117.12 of the Revised Code, as amended by Sub. S.B. No. 3 of the 123rd general assembly, except that rules initially adopted by the director of development for the Ohio energy credit program shall incorporate the substance of those sections as they exist on the effective date of this section. (3) The director's Under the director of job and family service's authority to adopt rules under this division section, the director may adopt rules for the percentage of income payment plan program shall include authority to adopt, including rules prescribing criteria for customer eligibility and policies regarding payment and crediting arrangements and responsibilities, and procedures for verifying customer eligibility, procedures for disbursing public funds to suppliers and otherwise administering funds under the director's jurisdiction, and requirements as to timely remittances of revenues described in division (B) of section 4928.51 of the Revised Code. The rules shall prohibit the imposition of a waiting period before enrolling an eligible customer in the percentage of income payment plan. The director's authority in division (B)(3) of this section excludes authority to prescribe service disconnection and customer billing policies and procedures and to address complaints against suppliers under the percentage of payment plan program, which excluded authority shall be exercised by the public utilities commission, in coordination with the director. Rules adopted by the director under this division for the percentage of income payment plan program shall specify a level of payment responsibility to be borne by an eligible customer based on a percentage of the customer's income. Rules initially adopted by the director for the percentage of income payment plan program shall incorporate the eligibility criteria and payment arrangement and responsibility policies set forth in rule 4901:1-18-04(B) of the Ohio Administrative Code in effect on the effective date of this section. Sec. 4928.54. The director of development services public utilities commission shall aggregate percentage of income payment plan program customers for the purpose of establishing a competitive procurement process for the supply of competitive retail electric service for those customers. The process shall be an auction. Only bidders certified under section 4928.08 of the Revised Code may participate in the auction. Sec. 4928.542. The winning bid or bids selected through the competitive procurement process established under section 4928.54 of the Revised Code shall meet all of the following requirements: (A) Be designed to provide reliable competitive retail electric service to percentage of income payment plan program customers; (B) Reduce the cost of the percentage of income payment plan program relative to the otherwise applicable standard service offer established under sections 4928.141 and 4928.142 of the Revised Code; (C) Result in the best value for persons paying the universal service percentage of income payment plan rider under section 4928.52 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4928.543. The director of development services public utilities commission shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement sections 4928.54, 4928.541, and 4928.542 of the Revised Code. The rules shall ensure a fair and unbiased auction process and the performance of the winning bidder or bidders. Sec. 4928.544. (A) For the purpose of facilitating compliance with sections 4928.54, 4928.541, and 4928.542 of the Revised Code, and upon written request by the director of development services, the public utilities commission shall design, manage, and supervise the competitive procurement process required by section 4928.54 of the Revised Code. To the extent reasonably possible, and to minimize costs, the process may be designed based on any existing competitive procurement process for the establishment of the default generation supply price for electric distribution utilities. This division section does not preclude a process design that is based on a competitive procurement process that applies to the combined certified territories of electric distribution utilities subject to common ownership. (B) The director of development services shall reimburse the commission for its costs incurred under division (A) of this section. The reimbursements constitute administrative costs of the low-income customer assistance programs for the purpose of division (A) of section 4928.51 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4928.545. The public utilities commission shall administer the percentage of income payment plan rider established under section 4928.52 of the Revised Code, including by performing periodic audits of each electric distribution utility's percentage of income payment plan rider. The commission shall adopt rules for the administration of the percentage of income payment plan rider and shall cooperate with, and provide such assistance to, the director of job and family services as the director requires for administration of the low-income customer assistance programs. Sec. 4928.55. The director of development job and family services shall establish an energy efficiency and weatherization program targeted, to the extent practicable, to high-cost, high-volume use structures occupied by customers eligible for the percentage of income payment plan program, with the goal of reducing the energy bills of the occupants. Acceptance of energy efficiency and weatherization services provided by the program shall be a condition for the eligibility of any such customer to participate in the percentage of income payment plan program. Sec. 4928.56. The director of development job and family services may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing an education program for consumers eligible to participate in the low-income customer assistance programs. The education program shall provide information to consumers regarding energy efficiency and energy conservation. Sec. 4928.58. (A) There is hereby created the public benefits advisory board, which has the purpose of ensuring that energy services be provided to low-income consumers in this state in an affordable manner consistent with the policy specified in section 4928.02 of the Revised Code. The advisory board shall consist of twenty-one members as follows: the director of developmentjob and family services, the chairperson of the public utilities commission, the consumers' counsel, and the director of the air quality development authority, each serving ex officio and represented by a designee at the official's discretion; two members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, neither of the same political party, and two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, neither of the same political party; and thirteen members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, consisting of one representative of suppliers of competitive retail electric service; one representative of the residential class of electric utility customers; one representative of the industrial class of electric utility customers; one representative of the commercial class of electric utility customers; one representative of agricultural or rural customers of an electric utility; two customers receiving assistance under one or more of the low-income customer assistance programs, to represent customers eligible for any such assistance, including senior citizens; one representative of the general public; one representative of local intake agencies; one representative of a community-based organization serving low-income customers; one representative of environmental protection interests; one representative of lending institutions; and one person considered an expert in energy efficiency or renewables technology. Initial appointments shall be made not later than November 1, 1999. (B) Initial terms of six of the appointed members shall end on June 30, 2003, and initial terms of the remaining seven appointed members shall end on June 30, 2004. Thereafter, terms of appointed members shall be for three years, with each term ending on the same day of the same month as the term it succeeds. Each member shall hold office from the date of the member's appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Members may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration date of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office as a member for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue in office after the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. (C) Board members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of board duties. The reimbursements constitute, as applicable, administrative costs of the low-income customer assistance programs for the purpose of division (A) of section sections 4928.51 and 4928.52 of the Revised Code or administrative costs of the advanced energy program for the purpose of division (A) of section 4528.61 of the Revised Code. (D) The advisory board shall select a chairperson from among its members. Only board members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate shall be voting members of the board; each shall have one vote in all deliberations of the board. A majority of the voting members constitute a quorum. (E) The duties of the advisory board shall be as follows: (1) Advise advise the director of job and family services in the administration of the universal service fund and the low-income customer assistance programs and advise the director on the director's recommendation to the commission regarding the appropriate level of the universal service rider; (2) Advise the director on the administration of the advanced energy program and the advanced energy fund under sections 4928.61 to 4928.63 of the Revised Code. (F) The advisory board is not an agency for purposes of sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4928.61. (A) There is hereby established in the state treasury the advanced energy fund, into which shall be deposited all advanced energy revenues remitted to the director of development under division (B) of this section, for the exclusive purposes of funding the advanced energy program created under section 4928.62 of the Revised Code and paying the program's administrative costs. Interest on the fund shall be credited to the fund. (B) Advanced energy revenues shall include all of the following: (1) Revenues remitted to the director after collection by each electric distribution utility in this state of a temporary rider on retail electric distribution service rates as such rates are determined by the public utilities commission pursuant to this chapter. The rider shall be a uniform amount statewide, determined by the director of development, after consultation with the public benefits advisory board created by section 4928.58 of the Revised Code. The amount shall be determined by dividing an aggregate revenue target for a given year as determined by the director, after consultation with the advisory board, by the number of customers of electric distribution utilities in this state in the prior year. Such aggregate revenue target shall not exceed more than fifteen million dollars in any year through 2005 and shall not exceed more than five million dollars in any year after 2005. The rider shall be imposed beginning on the effective date of the amendment of this section by Sub. H.B. 251 of the 126th general assembly, January 4, 2007, and shall terminate at the end of ten years following the starting date of competitive retail electric service or until the advanced energy fund, including interest, reaches one hundred million dollars, whichever is first. (2) Revenues from payments, repayments, and collections under the advanced energy program and from program income; (3) (2) Revenues remitted to the director after collection by a municipal electric utility or electric cooperative in this state upon the utility's or cooperative's decision to participate in the advanced energy fund; (4) (3) Revenues from renewable energy compliance payments as provided under division (C)(2) of section 4928.64 of the Revised Code; (5) (4) Revenue from forfeitures under division (C) of section 4928.66 of the Revised Code; (6) (5) Funds transferred pursuant to division (B) of Section 512.10 of S.B. 315 of the 129th general assembly; (7) (6) Interest earnings on the advanced energy fund. (C)(1) Each electric distribution utility in this state shall remit to the director on a quarterly basis the revenues described in divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section. Such remittances shall occur within thirty days after the end of each calendar quarter. (2) Each participating electric cooperative and participating municipal electric utility shall remit to the director on a quarterly basis the revenues described in division (B)(3) of this section. Such remittances shall occur within thirty days after the end of each calendar quarter. For the purpose of division (B)(3) of this section, the participation of an electric cooperative or municipal electric utility in the energy efficiency revolving loan program as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of the amendment of this section by Sub. H.B. 251 of the 126th general assembly, January 4, 2007, does not constitute a decision to participate in the advanced energy fund under this section as so amended. (3) All remittances under divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section shall continue only until the end of ten years following the starting date of competitive retail electric service or until the advanced energy fund, including interest, reaches one hundred million dollars, whichever is first. (D) Any moneys collected in rates for non-low-income customer energy efficiency programs, as of October 5, 1999, and not contributed to the energy efficiency revolving loan fund authorized under this section prior to the effective date of its amendment by Sub. H.B. 251 of the 126th general assembly, January 4, 2007, shall be used to continue to fund cost-effective, residential energy efficiency programs, be contributed into the universal service fund as a supplement to that required under section 4928.53 of the Revised Code, or be returned to ratepayers in the form of a rate reduction at the option of the affected electric distribution utility. Sec. 4928.62. (A) There is hereby created the advanced energy program, which shall be administered by the director of development. Under the program, the director may authorize the use of moneys in the advanced energy fund for financial, technical, and related assistance for advanced energy projects in this state or for economic development assistance, in furtherance of the purposes set forth in section 4928.63 of the Revised Code. (1) To the extent feasible given approved applications for assistance, the assistance shall be distributed among the certified territories of electric distribution utilities and participating electric cooperatives, and among the service areas of participating municipal electric utilities, in amounts proportionate to the remittances of each utility and cooperative under divisions (B)(1) and (3)division (B)(2) of section 4928.61 of the Revised Code. (2) The funds described in division (B)(6)(B)(5) of section 4928.61 of the Revised Code shall not be subject to the territorial requirements of division (A)(1) of this section. (3) The director shall not authorize financial assistance for an advanced energy project under the program unless the director first determines that the project will create new jobs or preserve existing jobs in this state or use innovative technologies or materials. (B) In carrying out sections 4928.61 to 4928.63 of the Revised Code, the director may do all of the following to further the public interest in advanced energy projects and economic development: (1) Award grants, contracts, loans, loan participation agreements, linked deposits, and energy production incentives; (2) Acquire in the name of the director any property of any kind or character in accordance with this section, by purchase, purchase at foreclosure, or exchange, on such terms and in such manner as the director considers proper; (3) Make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of the director's duties and the exercise of the director's powers under sections 4928.61 to 4928.63 of the Revised Code; (4) Employ or enter into contracts with financial consultants, marketing consultants, consulting engineers, architects, managers, construction experts, attorneys, technical monitors, energy evaluators, or other employees or agents as the director considers necessary, and fix their compensation; (5) Adopt rules prescribing the application procedures for financial assistance under the advanced energy program; the fees, charges, interest rates, payment schedules, local match requirements, and other terms and conditions of any grants, contracts, loans, loan participation agreements, linked deposits, and energy production incentives; criteria pertaining to the eligibility of participating lending institutions; and any other matters necessary for the implementation of the program; (6) Do all things necessary and appropriate for the operation of the program. (C) The department of development may hold ownership to any unclaimed energy efficiency and renewable energy emission allowances provided for in Chapter 3745-14 of the Administrative Code or otherwise, that result from advanced energy projects that receive funding from the advanced energy fund, and it may use the allowances to further the public interest in advanced energy projects or for economic development. (D) Financial statements, financial data, and trade secrets submitted to or received by the director from an applicant or recipient of financial assistance under sections 4928.61 to 4928.63 of the Revised Code, or any information taken from those statements, data, or trade secrets for any purpose, are not public records for the purpose of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (E) Nothing in the amendments of sections 4928.61, 4928.62, and 4928.63 of the Revised Code by Sub. H.B. 251 of the 126th general assembly shall affect any pending or effected assistance, pending or effected purchases or exchanges of property made, or pending or effected contracts or agreements entered into pursuant to division (A) or (B) of this section as the section existed prior to the effective date of those amendments, January 4, 2007, or shall affect the exemption provided under division (C) of this section as the section existed prior to that effective date. (F) Any assistance a school district receives for an advanced energy project, including a geothermal heating, ventilating, and air conditioning system, shall be in addition to any assistance provided under Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code and shall not be included as part of the district or state portion of the basic project cost under that chapter. Sec. 4928.63. The director of development and the public benefits advisory board have has the powers and duties provided in sections 4928.61 and 4928.62 of the Revised Code, in order to promote the welfare of the people of this state; stabilize the economy; assist in the improvement and development within this state of not-for-profit entity, industrial, commercial, distribution, residential, and research buildings and activities required for the people of this state; improve the economic welfare of the people of this state by reducing energy costs and by reducing energy usage in a cost-efficient manner using, as determined by the director, both the most appropriate national, federal, or other standards for products and the best practices for the use of technology, products, or services in the context of a total facility or building; and assist in the lowering of energy demand to reduce air, water, or thermal pollution. It is hereby determined that the accomplishment of those purposes is essential so that the people of this state may maintain their present high standards in comparison with the people of other states and so that opportunities for improving the economic welfare of the people of this state, for improving the housing of residents of this state, and for favorable markets for the products of this state's natural resources, agriculture, and manufacturing shall be improved; and that it is necessary for this state to establish the program authorized pursuant to sections 4928.61 and 4928.62 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4928.66. (A)(1)(a) Beginning in 2009, an electric distribution utility shall implement energy efficiency programs that achieve energy savings equivalent to at least three-tenths of one per cent of the total, annual average, and normalized kilowatt-hour sales of the electric distribution utility during the preceding three calendar years to customers in this state. An energy efficiency program may include a combined heat and power system placed into service or retrofitted on or after the effective date of the amendment of this section by S.B. 315 of the 129th general assembly, September 10, 2012, or a waste energy recovery system placed into service or retrofitted on or after September 10, 2012, except that a waste energy recovery system described in division (A)(38)(b) of section 4928.01 of the Revised Code may be included only if it was placed into service between January 1, 2002, and December 31, 2004. For a waste energy recovery or combined heat and power system, the savings shall be as estimated by the public utilities commission. The savings requirement, using such a three-year average, shall increase to an additional five-tenths of one per cent in 2010, seven-tenths of one per cent in 2011, eight-tenths of one per cent in 2012, nine-tenths of one per cent in 2013, and one per cent in 2014. In 2015 and 2016, an electric distribution utility shall achieve energy savings equal to the result of subtracting the cumulative energy savings achieved since 2009 from the product of multiplying the baseline for energy savings, described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section, by four and two-tenths of one per cent. If the result is zero or less for the year for which the calculation is being made, the utility shall not be required to achieve additional energy savings for that year, but may achieve additional energy savings for that year. The annual savings requirements shall be, for years 2017, 2018, 2019, and 2020, an additional one per cent of the baseline. For purposes of a waste energy recovery or combined heat and power system, an electric distribution utility shall not apply more than the total annual percentage of the electric distribution utility's industrial-customer load, relative to the electric distribution utility's total load, to the annual energy savings requirement. (b) Beginning in 2009, an electric distribution utility shall implement peak demand reduction programs designed to achieve a one per cent reduction in peak demand in 2009 and an additional seventy-five hundredths of one per cent reduction each year through 2014. In 2015 and 2016, an electric distribution utility shall achieve a reduction in peak demand equal to the result of subtracting the cumulative peak demand reductions achieved since 2009 from the product of multiplying the baseline for peak demand reduction, described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section, by four and seventy-five hundredths of one per cent. If the result is zero or less for the year for which the calculation is being made, the utility shall not be required to achieve an additional reduction in peak demand for that year, but may achieve an additional reduction in peak demand for that year. In 2017 and each year thereafter through 2020, the utility shall achieve an additional seventy-five hundredths of one per cent reduction in peak demand. (2) For the purposes of divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section: (a) The baseline for energy savings under division (A)(1)(a) of this section shall be the average of the total kilowatt hours the electric distribution utility sold in the preceding three calendar years. The baseline for a peak demand reduction under division (A)(1)(b) of this section shall be the average peak demand on the utility in the preceding three calendar years, except that the commission may reduce either baseline to adjust for new economic growth in the utility's certified territory. Neither baseline shall include the load and usage of any of the following customers: (i) Beginning January 1, 2017, a customer for which a reasonable arrangement has been approved under section 4905.31 of the Revised Code; (ii) A customer that has opted out of the utility's portfolio plan under section 4928.6611 of the Revised Code; (iii) A customer that has opted out of the utility's portfolio plan under Section 8 of S.B. 310 of the 130th general assembly. (b) The commission may amend the benchmarks set forth in division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section if, after application by the electric distribution utility, the commission determines that the amendment is necessary because the utility cannot reasonably achieve the benchmarks due to regulatory, economic, or technological reasons beyond its reasonable control. (c) Compliance with divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section shall be measured by including the effects of all demand-response programs for mercantile customers of the subject electric distribution utility, all waste energy recovery systems and all combined heat and power systems, and all such mercantile customer-sited energy efficiency, including waste energy recovery and combined heat and power, and peak demand reduction programs, adjusted upward by the appropriate loss factors. Any mechanism designed to recover the cost of energy efficiency, including waste energy recovery and combined heat and power, and peak demand reduction programs under divisions (A)(1)(a) and (b) of this section may exempt mercantile customers that commit their demand-response or other customer-sited capabilities, whether existing or new, for integration into the electric distribution utility's demand-response, energy efficiency, including waste energy recovery and combined heat and power, or peak demand reduction programs, if the commission determines that that exemption reasonably encourages such customers to commit those capabilities to those programs. If a mercantile customer makes such existing or new demand-response, energy efficiency, including waste energy recovery and combined heat and power, or peak demand reduction capability available to an electric distribution utility pursuant to division (A)(2)(c) of this section, the electric utility's baseline under division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall be adjusted to exclude the effects of all such demand-response, energy efficiency, including waste energy recovery and combined heat and power, or peak demand reduction programs that may have existed during the period used to establish the baseline. The baseline also shall be normalized for changes in numbers of customers, sales, weather, peak demand, and other appropriate factors so that the compliance measurement is not unduly influenced by factors outside the control of the electric distribution utility. (d)(i) Programs implemented by a utility may include the following: (I) Demand-response programs; (II) Smart grid investment programs, provided that such programs are demonstrated to be cost-beneficial; (III) Customer-sited programs, including waste energy recovery and combined heat and power systems; (IV) Transmission and distribution infrastructure improvements that reduce line losses; (V) Energy efficiency savings and peak demand reduction that are achieved, in whole or in part, as a result of funding provided from the universal service electric partnership plan fund established by section 4928.51 of the Revised Code to benefit low-income customers through programs that include, but are not limited to, energy audits, the installation of energy efficiency insulation, appliances, and windows, and other weatherization measures. (ii) No energy efficiency or peak demand reduction achieved under divisions (A)(2)(d)(i)(IV) and (V) of this section shall qualify for shared savings. (iii) Division (A)(2)(c) of this section shall be applied to include facilitating efforts by a mercantile customer or group of those customers to offer customer-sited demand-response, energy efficiency, including waste energy recovery and combined heat and power, or peak demand reduction capabilities to the electric distribution utility as part of a reasonable arrangement submitted to the commission pursuant to section 4905.31 of the Revised Code. (e) No programs or improvements described in division (A)(2)(d) of this section shall conflict with any statewide building code adopted by the board of building standards. (B) In accordance with rules it shall adopt, the public utilities commission shall produce and docket at the commission an annual report containing the results of its verification of the annual levels of energy efficiency and of peak demand reductions achieved by each electric distribution utility pursuant to division (A) of this section. A copy of the report shall be provided to the consumers' counsel. (C) If the commission determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing and based upon its report under division (B) of this section, that an electric distribution utility has failed to comply with an energy efficiency or peak demand reduction requirement of division (A) of this section, the commission shall assess a forfeiture on the utility as provided under sections 4905.55 to 4905.60 and 4905.64 of the Revised Code, either in the amount, per day per undercompliance or noncompliance, relative to the period of the report, equal to that prescribed for noncompliances under section 4905.54 of the Revised Code, or in an amount equal to the then existing market value of one renewable energy credit per megawatt hour of undercompliance or noncompliance. Revenue from any forfeiture assessed under this division shall be deposited to the credit of the advanced energy fund created under section 4928.61 of the Revised Code. (D) The commission may establish rules regarding the content of an application by an electric distribution utility for commission approval of a revenue decoupling mechanism under this division. Such an application shall not be considered an application to increase rates and may be included as part of a proposal to establish, continue, or expand energy efficiency or conservation programs. The commission by order may approve an application under this division if it determines both that the revenue decoupling mechanism provides for the recovery of revenue that otherwise may be forgone by the utility as a result of or in connection with the implementation by the electric distribution utility of any energy efficiency or energy conservation programs and reasonably aligns the interests of the utility and of its customers in favor of those programs. (E) The commission additionally shall adopt rules that require an electric distribution utility to provide a customer upon request with two years' consumption data in an accessible form. (F)(1) As used in divisions (F)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, "portfolio plan" has the same meaning as in division (C)(1) of section 4928.6610 of the Revised Code. (2) If an electric distribution utility has a portfolio plan in effect as of October 22, 2019, and that plan expires before December 31, 2020, the commission shall extend the plan through that date. All portfolio plans shall terminate on that date. (3) If a portfolio plan is extended beyond its commission approved term by division (F)(2) of this section, the existing plan's budget shall be increased for the extended term to include an amount equal to the annual average of the approved budget for all years of the portfolio plan in effect as of October 22, 2019. (4) All other terms and conditions of a portfolio plan extended beyond its commission-approved term by division (F)(2) of this section shall remain the same unless changes are authorized by the commission. (G)(1) Not later than February 1, 2021, the commission shall determine the cumulative energy savings collectively achieved, since 2009, by all electric distribution utilities in this state as of December 31, 2020. In determining that cumulative total, the commission shall do both of the following: (a) Include energy savings that were estimated by the commission to be achieved as of December 31, 2020, and banked under division (G) of section 4928.662 of the Revised Code; (b) Use an energy savings baseline that is the average of the total kilowatt hours sold by all electric distribution utilities in this state in the calendar years 2018, 2019, and 2020. The baseline shall exclude the load and usage described in division (A)(2)(a)(i), (ii), and (iii) of this section. That baseline may also be reduced for new economic growth in the utility's certified territory as provided in division (A)(2)(a) of this section and adjusted and normalized as provided in division (A)(2)(c) of this section. (2)(a) If the cumulative energy savings collectively achieved as determined by the commission under division (G)(1) of this section is at least seventeen and one-half per cent of the baseline described in division (G)(1)(b) of this section, then full compliance with division (A)(1)(a) of this section shall be deemed to have been achieved notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary. (b) If the cumulative energy savings collectively achieved as determined by the commission under division (G)(1) of this section is less than seventeen and one-half per cent of the baseline described in division (G)(1)(b) of this section, then both of the following shall apply: (i) The commission shall determine the manner in which further implementation of energy efficiency programs shall occur as may be reasonably necessary for collective achievement of cumulative energy savings equal to seventeen and one-half per cent, and not more, of the baseline described in division (G)(1)(b) of this section. (ii) Full compliance with division (A)(1)(a) of this section shall be deemed to be achieved as of a date certain established by the commission notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary. (3) Upon the date that full compliance with division (A)(1)(a) of this section is deemed achieved under division (G)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, any electric distribution utility cost recovery mechanisms authorized by the commission for compliance with this section shall terminate except as may be necessary to reconcile the difference between revenue collected and the allowable cost of compliance associated with compliance efforts occurring prior to December 31, 2021, for programs re-established under section 4928.661 of the Revised Code, and prior to the date upon which full compliance with division (A)(1)(a) of this section is deemed achieved, for all other compliance efforts. No such cost recovery mechanism shall be authorized by the commission beyond the period of time required to complete this final reconciliation. Sec. 4928.75. Beginning in fiscal year 2021 and each fiscal year thereafter, the The director of development job and family services shall, in each fiscal year, submit a completed waiver request in accordance with section 96.83 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations to the United States department of health and human services and any other applicable federal agencies for the state to expend twenty-five per cent of federal low-income home energy assistance programs funds from the home energy assistance block grants for weatherization services allowed by section 96.83(a) of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations to the United States department of health and human services. Sec. 4928.86. (A) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, each entity public utility, as defined in section 4905.02 of the Revised Code, that owns or controls transmission facilities located in this state and is not a regional transmission organization shall create a heat map that includes both of the following: (1) For major transmission lines and substations, the additional power load the lines and substations can take at the time that the map is created, accounting for all signed electric service agreements; (2) The amount of localized generation that can be hosted on each transmission line. (B) If a heat map created under this section is not critical electric infrastructure information, then the entity utility that created the map shall publish the map on the entity's utility's web site. (C) The following entities are exempt from the requirements of this section: (1) An electric utility owned or operated by a municipal corporation; (2) An electric cooperative. Sec. 4981.02. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio rail development commission, as an independent agency of the state within the department of transportation, consisting of the following members: (1) Two members of the Ohio senate, one of whom shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the president of the senate and one of whom shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the minority leader of the senate; (2) Two members of the Ohio house of representatives, one of whom shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the speaker of the house of representatives and one of whom shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the minority leader of the house of representatives; (3) Two members representing the general public, one of whom shall be appointed by the president of the senate and one of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; (4) The director of transportation, or the director's designee, who shall be an ex officio member; (5) The director of development, or the director's designee, who shall be an ex officio member; (6) The following members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate: (a) One member, who shall serve as chairperson of the commission until October 21, 2025, or an earlier date if the member resigns or otherwise leaves office; (b) One memberTwo members, who shall represent the interests of a freight rail company. One such member shall represent a class I railroad and one such member shall represent a class II or class III railroad, as defined by the surface transportation board under 49 C.F.R. 1201; (c) One member, who shall represent the interests of passenger rail service; (d) One member, who shall have expertise in infrastructure financing; (e)(d) One member, who shall represent the interests of organized labor; (f)(e) One member, who shall represent the interests of manufacturers; (g)(f) One member who shall represent the general public, subject to division (B) of this section. (B) Beginning on October 21, 2025, or at an earlier date if there is a vacancy in the position of chairperson, the director of transportation or the director's designee shall serve as the chairperson of the commission. Upon the director or director's designee assuming the position of chairperson, the governor shall appoint an additional member to the commission to represent the general public. (C) All members shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The members of the commission from the Ohio senate and the Ohio house of representatives shall serve as nonvoting members. No more than four members of the seven appointed to the commission by the governor shall be from the same political party. Each member of the commission shall be a resident of this state. , except for the two members appointed under division (A)(6)(b) of this section who may be nonresidents with a substantial connection to freight rail operations in Ohio. (D) Within sixty days after October 20, 1994, the governor shall make initial appointments to the commission. Of the initial appointments made to the commission, three shall be for a term ending three years after October 20, 1994, and three shall be for a term ending six years after that date. Terms for all other appointments made to the commission shall be for six years. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy shall have the same qualifications as the member's predecessor. Each term shall end on the same day of the same month of the year as did the term which it succeeds. Each appointed member shall hold office from the date of the member's appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy before the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of that term. Any appointed member shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or for a period of sixty days, whichever occurs first. All members shall be eligible for reappointment. (E) The commission may employ an executive director, who shall have appropriate experience as determined by the commission, and a secretary-treasurer and other employees that the commission considers appropriate. The commission may fix the compensation of the employees. (F) Six members of the commission shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of six members shall be necessary for any action taken by the commission. No vacancy in the membership of the commission shall impair the rights of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the commission. (G) All members of the commission are subject to Chapter 102. of the Revised Code. (H) The department of transportation may use all appropriate sources of revenue to assist the commission in developing and implementing rail service. (I) Expenditures by the department of transportation, the Ohio rail development commission, or any other state agency for capital improvements for the development of passenger rail shall be subject to the approval of the controlling board with an affirmative vote of not fewer than five members, including the affirmative vote of a majority of the controlling board members appointed by the president of the senate and a majority of the controlling board members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. All public funds acquired by the commission shall be used for developing, implementing, and regulating rail service and not for operating rail service unless the general assembly specifically approves the expenditure of funds for operating rail service. Sec. 5101.042. (A) As used in this section, "public assistance benefits" means all of the following: (1) Supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits; (2) Benefits funded in part by the temporary assistance for needy families block grant; (3) Cash assistance provided through the Ohio works first program; (4) Benefits provided by the medicaid program; (5) Publicly funded child care as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of job and family services shall update the systems used by the department and by county departments of job and family services to determine eligibility for public assistance benefits programs. The updates shall include a mechanism by which application information input by individual caseworkers may be tracked and audited and shall require county departments of job and family services to provide caseworker training regarding improper determinations. Sec. 5101.101. (A) This section establishes the order of priority to be followed by the department of job and family services when distributing funds for the purpose of providing family planning services, including funds the department receives through Title XX of the "Social Security Act," 88 Stat. 2337 (1974), 42 U.S.C. 1397, as amended, and funds the department receives through Title IV-A of the "Social Security Act," 110 Stat. 2113 (1996), 42 U.S.C. 601, as amended, to be used for purposes of providing Title XX social services. This section does not apply to payments made under the medicaid program. (B) With respect to each period during which funds from a particular source are distributed for the purpose of providing family planning services, the department is subject to both of the following when distributing the funds to applicants seeking those funds: (1) Foremost priority shall be given to public entities that are operated by state or local government entities and that provide or are able to provide family planning services. (2) If any funds remain after the department distributes funds to public entities under division (B)(1) of this section, the department may distribute funds to nonpublic entities. If funds are distributed to nonpublic entities, the department shall distribute the funds in the following order of descending priority: (a) Nonpublic entities that are federally qualified health centers or federally qualified health center look-alikes, both as defined in section 3701.047 of the Revised Code, or community action agencies, as defined in section 122.66 5101.311 of the Revised Code; (b) Nonpublic entities that provide comprehensive primary and preventive care services in addition to family planning services; (c) Nonpublic entities that provide family planning services, but do not provide comprehensive primary and preventive care services. Sec. 5101.211. The director of job and family services or the director of children and youth may provide for a grant agreement entered into under section 5101.21 of the Revised Code to have a retroactive effective date of the first day of July of an odd-numbered year if both of the following are the case: (A) The agreement is entered into after that date and before the last day of that July. (B) The board of county commissioners requests the retroactive effective date and provides the director good cause satisfactory to the director for the reason the agreement was not entered into on or before the first day of that July. Sec. 5101.212. The department of job and family services or the director of children and youth shall publish in a manner accessible to the public all of the following that concern family services duties for which grants included in grant agreements entered into under section 5101.21 of the Revised Code are awarded: state plans for receipt of federal financial participation, agreements between the department and a federal agency, and executive orders issued by the governor. The department may publish the materials electronically or otherwise. Sec. 5101.215. If the director of job and family services or the director of children and youth enters into an agreement or contracts with, or issues a grant to, a religious organization under section 5101.214 of the Revised Code, the religious organization shall comply with section 104 of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity and Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193). Sec. 5101.222. The director of job and family services or the director of children and youth may adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code to implement sections 5101.22 to 5101.222 of the Revised Code. If the director adopts the rules, the director shall adopt the rules as if they were internal management rules. Sec. 5101.242. The department of job and family services or the director of children and youth may certify a claim to the attorney general under section 131.02 of the Revised Code for the attorney general to take action under that section against a responsible county grantee or responsible entity to recover any funds that the department determines the responsible county grantee or responsible entity owes the department for actions taken under division (C)(2), (3), (4), or (5) of section 5101.24 or 5101.241 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.26. As used in this section and in sections 5101.27 to 5101.30 of the Revised Code: (A) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "County agency" means a county department of job and family services or a public children services agency. (C) "Fugitive felon" means an individual who is fleeing to avoid prosecution, or custody or confinement after conviction, under the laws of the place from which the individual is fleeing, for a crime or an attempt to commit a crime that is a felony under the laws of the place from which the individual is fleeing or, in the case of New Jersey, a high misdemeanor, regardless of whether the individual has departed from the individual's usual place of residence. (D) "Information" means records as defined in section 149.011 of the Revised Code, any other documents in any format, and data derived from records and documents that are generated, acquired, or maintained by the department of job and family services, the department of children and youth, a county agency, or an entity performing duties on behalf of the department or a county agency. (E) "Law enforcement agency" has the same meaning as in section 109.573 of the Revised Code. (F) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Public assistance" means financial assistance or social services that are provided under a program administered by the department of job and family services, department of children and youth, or a county agency pursuant to Chapter 329., 5101., 5104., 5107., or 5108. of the Revised Code or an executive order issued under section 107.17 of the Revised Code. "Public assistance" does not mean medical assistance provided under a medical assistance program, as defined in section 5160.01 of the Revised Code. (H) "Public assistance recipient" means an applicant for or recipient or former recipient of public assistance. (I) "Publicly funded child care" has the same meaning as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (J) "Tuberculosis control unit" means the county tuberculosis control unit designated by a board of county commissioners under section 339.72 of the Revised Code or the district tuberculosis control unit designated pursuant to an agreement entered into by two or more boards of community commissioners under that section. Sec. 5101.272. (A) For the purposes of section 5101.27 of the Revised Code, an authorization shall be made on a form that uses language understandable to the average person and contains all of the following: (1) A description of the information to be used or disclosed that identifies the information in a specific and meaningful fashion; (2) The name or other specific identification of the person or class of persons authorized to make the requested use or disclosure; (3) The name or other specific identification of the person or governmental entity to which the information may be released; (4) A description of each purpose of the requested use or disclosure of the information; (5) The date on which the authorization expires or an event related either to the individual who is the subject of the request or to the purposes of the requested use or disclosure, the occurrence of which will cause the authorization to expire; (6) A statement that the information used or disclosed pursuant to the authorization may be disclosed by the recipient of the information and may no longer be protected from disclosure; (7) The signature of the individual or the individual's authorized representative and the date on which the authorization was signed; (8) If signed by an authorized representative, a description of the representative's authority to act for the individual; (9) A statement of the individual or authorized representative's right to prospectively revoke the written authorization in writing, along with one of the following: (a) A description of how the individual or authorized representative may revoke the authorization; (b) If the department of job and family services' or department of children and youth's privacy notice contains a description of how the individual or authorized representative may revoke the authorization, a reference to that privacy notice. (10) A statement that treatment, payment, enrollment, or eligibility for public assistance cannot be conditioned on signing the authorization unless the authorization is necessary for determining eligibility for the public assistance program. (B) When an individual requests information pursuant to section 5101.27 of the Revised Code regarding the individual's receipt of public assistance and does not wish to provide a statement of purpose, the statement "at request of the individual" is a sufficient description for purposes of division (A)(4) of this section. Sec. 5101.273. The department of job and family services or the department of children and youth shall enter into any necessary agreements with the United States department of health and human services and neighboring states to join and participate as an active member in the public assistance reporting information system. The department may disclose information regarding a public assistance recipient to the extent necessary to participate as an active member in the public assistance reporting information system. Sec. 5101.28. (A)(1) On request of the department of job and family services, the department of children and youth, or a county agency, a law enforcement agency shall provide information regarding public assistance recipients to enable the department of job and family services, department of children and youth, or county agency to determine, for eligibility purposes, whether a recipient or a member of a recipient's assistance group is a fugitive felon or violating a condition of probation, a community control sanction, parole, or a post-release control sanction imposed under state or federal law. (2) A county agency may enter into a written agreement with a local law enforcement agency establishing procedures concerning access to information and providing for compliance with this section. (B) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department of job and family services, department of children and youth, and county agencies shall provide information regarding recipients of public assistance to a law enforcement agency on request for use in the performance of the law enforcement agency's official duties. (C) Information about a public assistance recipient shall be exchanged, obtained, or shared only if the department of job and family services, department of children and youth, county agency, or law enforcement agency requesting the information gives sufficient information to specifically identify the recipient. In addition to the recipient's name, identifying information may include the recipient's current or last known address, social security number, other identifying number, age, gender, physical characteristics, any information specified in an agreement entered into under division (A) of this section, or any information considered appropriate by the department of job and family services, department of children and youth or agency. (D)(1) The department of job and family services, department of children and youth, and its each department's officers and employees are not liable in damages in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from the release of information in accordance with divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section. This section does not affect any immunity or defense that the department of job and family services, department of children and youth, and its each department's officers and employees may be entitled to under another section of the Revised Code or the common law of this state, including section 9.86 of the Revised Code. (2) The county agencies and their employees are not liable in damages in a civil action for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from the release of information in accordance with divisions (A), (B), and (C) of this section. "Employee" has the same meaning as in division (B) of section 2744.01 of the Revised Code. This section does not affect any immunity or defense that the county agencies and their employees may be entitled to under another section of the Revised Code or the common law of this state, including section 2744.02 and division (A)(6) of section 2744.03 of the Revised Code. (E) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department of job and family services, department of children and youth, and county agencies shall provide access to information to the auditor of state acting pursuant to Chapter 117. or sections 5101.181 and 5101.182 of the Revised Code and to any other government entity authorized by federal law to conduct an audit of, or similar activity involving, a public assistance program. (F) To the extent permitted by law, nothing in this section prohibits the department of job and family services, the department of children and youth, county departments of job and family services, and employees of the departments from reporting to a public children services agency or other appropriate agency information on known or suspected physical or mental injury, sexual abuse or exploitation, or negligent treatment or maltreatment, of a child. Sec. 5101.30. (A) The director of job and family services and the director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code implementing sections 5101.26 to 5101.30 of the Revised Code and governing the custody, use, disclosure, and preservation of the information generated or received by the department of job and family services, the department of children and youth, county agencies, other state and county entities, contractors, grantees, private entities, or officials participating in the administration of public assistance programs. The rules shall comply with applicable federal statutes and regulations. (1) The rules shall specify conditions and procedures for the release of information which may include, among other conditions and procedures, both of the following: (a) Permitting providers of services or assistance under public assistance programs limited access to information that is essential for the providers to render services or assistance or to bill for services or assistance rendered. The department of aging, when investigating a complaint under section 173.20 of the Revised Code, shall be granted any limited access permitted in the rules pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section. (b) Permitting a contractor, grantee, or other state or county entity limited access to information that is essential for the contractor, grantee, or entity to perform administrative or other duties on behalf of the department or county agency. A contractor, grantee, or entity given access to information pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section is bound by the director's rules, and disclosure of the information by the contractor, grantee, or entity in a manner not authorized by the rules is a violation of section 5101.27 of the Revised Code. (2) The rules may define who is an "authorized representative" for purposes of sections 5101.27 and 5101.272 of the Revised Code. (B) Whenever names, addresses, or other information relating to public assistance recipients is held by any agency other than the department or a county agency, that other agency shall adopt rules consistent with sections 5101.26 to 5101.30 of the Revised Code to prevent the publication or disclosure of names, lists, or other information concerning those recipients. Sec. 122.66 5101.311. As used in sections 122.66 5101.311 to 122.702 5101.318 of the Revised Code: (A) "Poverty line" means the official poverty line established by the director of the United States office of management and budget and as revised by the secretary of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 1609, 42 U.S.C.A. 9902. (B) "Low-income person" means a person whose adjusted gross income as defined in division (A) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code is below the poverty line as defined in division (A) of this section. (C) "Advocacy" means the act of pleading for, supporting, or recommending actions on behalf of low-income persons. (D) "Community action agency" means a community-based and operated private nonprofit agency or organization incorporated under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code that includes or is designed to include a sufficient number of projects or components to provide a range of services and activities having a measurable and potentially major impact on the causes of poverty in the community or those areas of the community where poverty is a particularly acute problem and is designated as a community action agency by the community services division department of job and family services pursuant to sections 122.68 5101.313 and 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code. A "community action agency" is not a state agency or public office. (E) "Community" means a city, village, county, multicity or multicounty unit, a neighborhood or other area, disregarding boundaries or political subdivisions, which provides a suitable organizational base and possesses a commonality of needs and interests for a community action program suitable to be served by a community action agency. (F) "Service area" means the geographical area served by a community action agency. Sec. 122.67 5101.312. There is hereby created in the development services agency the community services division. The director of development services job and family services shall employ and fix the compensation of professional and technical unclassified personnel as necessary to carry out the provisions of sections 122.66 5101.311 to 122.701 5101.317 of the Revised Code. Sec. 122.68 5101.313. The community services division department of job and family services shall: (A) Administer all federal funds appropriated to the state from the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 511, 42 U.S.C.A. 9901, and comply with requirements imposed by that act in its application for, and administration of, the funds; (B) Designate community action agencies to receive community services block grant funds; (C)(1) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, disburse at least ninety-one per cent of the funds received in the state from the "Community Services Block Grant Act" to community action agencies that comply with the requirements of section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code and migrant and seasonal farm worker organizations that are not designated community action agencies but which provide the services described in division (B)(1) of section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code; (2) Disburse at least four and one-half per cent of the funds received in the state from the "Community Services Block Grant Act" to one or more nonprofit organizations to which both of the following apply: (a) The organization or organizations were incorporated under the laws of this state before January 1, 2015. (b) The primary purpose of the organization or organizations is to provide training and technical assistance to community action agencies that comply with the requirements of section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code. (D) Provide technical assistance to community action agencies to improve program planning, development, and administration; (E) Conduct yearly performance assessments, according to criteria determined by development services agency department of job and family services rule, to determine whether community action agencies are in compliance with section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code; (F) Annually prepare and submit to the United States secretary of health and human services, the governor, the president of the Ohio senate, and the speaker of the Ohio house of representatives, a comprehensive report that includes: (1) Certification that all community action agencies designated to receive funds from the "Community Services Block Grant Act" are in compliance with section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code; (2) A program plan for the next federal fiscal year that has been made available for public inspection and that details how community services block grant funds will be disbursed and used during that fiscal year; (3) Information detailing how funds were expended for the current fiscal year; (4) An audit of community services block grant expenditures for the preceding federal fiscal year that is conducted in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles by an independent auditing firm that has no connection with any community action agency receiving community services block grant funds or with any employee of the division. (G) Serve as a statewide advocate for social and economic opportunities for low-income persons. Sec. 122.681 5101.314. (A) Except as permitted by this section, or when required by federal law, no person or government entity shall solicit, release, disclose, receive, use, or knowingly permit or participate in the use of any information regarding an individual receiving assistance pursuant to a community services division department of job and family services program under sections 122.66 5101.311 to 122.702 5101.318 of the Revised Code for any purpose not directly related to the administration of a division department assistance program. (B) To the extent permitted by federal law, the divisiondepartment, and any entity that receives division department funds to administer a division department program to assist individuals, shall release information regarding an individual assistance recipient to the following: (1) A government entity responsible for administering the assistance program for purposes directly related to the administration of the program; (2) A law enforcement agency for the purpose of any investigation, prosecution, or criminal or civil proceeding relating to the administration of the assistance program; (3) A government entity responsible for administering a children's protective services program, for the purpose of protecting children; (4) Any appropriate person in compliance with a search warrant, subpoena, or other court order. (C) To the extent permitted by federal law and section 1347.08 of the Revised Code, the divisiondepartment, and any entity administering a division department program, shall provide access to information regarding an individual assistance recipient to all of the following: (1) The individual assistance recipient; (2) The authorized representative of the individual assistance recipient; (3) The legal guardian of the individual assistance recipient; (4) The attorney of the individual assistance recipient. (D) To the extent permitted by federal law, the divisiondepartment, and any entity administering a division department program, may do either of the following: (1) Release information about an individual assistance recipient if the recipient gives voluntary, written authorization; (2) Release information regarding an individual assistance recipient to a state, federal, or federally assisted program that provides cash or in-kind assistance or services directly to individuals based on need. (E) The community services divisiondepartment of job and family services, or an entity administering a division department program, shall provide, at no cost, a copy of each written authorization to the individual who signed it. (F) The development services agency department may adopt rules defining who may serve as an individual assistance recipient's authorized representative for purposes of division (C)(2) of this section. Sec. 122.69 5101.315. (A) Any nonprofit agency or organization seeking designation as a community action agency by the community services division department of job and family services shall obtain the endorsement of the chief elected officials of at least two-thirds of the municipal corporations and the counties within the community to be served by the agency or organization. (B) Any nonprofit agency or organization that receives the endorsement provided for in division (A) of this section shall be designated by the division department as the community action agency for the community it serves and shall receive community services block grant funds for any period of time that the nonprofit agency or organization: (1) Provides a range of services and opportunities having a measurable and potentially major impact on the causes of poverty in the community or those areas of the community where poverty is a particularly acute problem. These activities may include but shall not be limited to: (a) Providing activities designed to assist low-income persons, including low-income persons who are elderly and who have disabilities, to: (i) Secure and maintain meaningful employment, training, work experience, and unsubsidized employment; (ii) Attain an adequate education; (iii) Make better use of available income; (iv) Obtain and maintain adequate housing and a suitable living environment; (v) Obtain emergency assistance through loans or grants to meet immediate and urgent individual and family needs, including the need for health services, nutritious food, housing, and employment-related assistance; (vi) Remove obstacles and solve personal and family problems that block the achievement of self-sufficiency; (vii) Achieve greater participation in the affairs of the community; (viii) Undertake family planning, consistent with personal and family goals and religious and moral convictions; (ix) Obtain energy assistance, conservation, and weatherization services. (b) Providing, on an emergency basis, supplies and services, nutritious foodstuffs, and related services necessary to counteract conditions of starvation and malnutrition among low-income persons; (c) Coordinating and establishing links between government and other social services programs to assure the effective delivery of services to low-income individuals; (d) Providing child care services, nutrition and health services, transportation services, alcoholism and narcotic addiction prevention and rehabilitation services, youth development services, and community services to persons who are elderly and who have disabilities; (e) Encouraging entities in the private sector to participate in efforts to ameliorate poverty in the community. (2) Annually submits to the division department a program plan and budget for use of community services block grant funds for the next federal fiscal year. At least ten days prior to its submission to the divisiondepartment, a copy of the program plan and budget shall be made available to the chief elected officials of the municipal corporations and counties within the service area in order to provide them the opportunity to review and comment upon such plan and budget. (3) Composes its board of directors in compliance with section (c)(3) of section 675 of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 1609, 42 U.S.C.A. 9904U.S.C. 9910, except that the board shall consist of not less than fifteen nor more than thirty-three members; (4) Complies with the prohibitions against discrimination and political activity, as provided in the "Community Services Block Grant Act"; (5) Complies with fiscal and program requirements established by development services agency department rule. Sec. 122.70 5101.316. The board of directors of a community action agency shall: (A) Select, appoint, and may remove the executive director of the community action agency; (B) Approve contracts, annual program budgets, and policies of the community action agency; (C) Advise the elected officials of any political subdivision located within its service area, and state and federal elected officials who represent its service area, of the nature and extent of poverty within its community, and advise them of any needed changes; (D) Convene public meetings to provide community members the opportunity to comment on public policies and programs to reduce poverty; (E) Annually evaluate the policies and programs of the community action agency according to criteria determined by department of development department of job and family services rule; (F) Submit the results of the evaluation required by division (E) of this section, along with recommendations for improved administration of the community action agency, to the community services divisiondepartment; (G) Adopt a code of ethics for the board of directors and the employees of the community action agency; (H) Adopt written policies describing all of the following: (1) How the community action agency is to expend and distribute the community services block grant funds that it receives from the division under sections 122.68 5101.313 and 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code; (2) The salary, benefits, travel expenses, and any other compensation that persons are to receive for serving on the community action agency's board of directors; (3) The operating procedures to be used by the board to conduct its meetings, to vote on all official business it considers, and to provide notice of its meetings. The written operating procedures described in this division shall specify the methods by which the board may conduct meetings using virtual electronic technology, and shall specify that the board may provide notice of its meetings by any means deemed appropriate to the board. (I) Provide for the posting of notices in a conspicuous place indicating that the code of ethics described in division (G) of this section and the policies described in division (H) of this section are available for public inspection at the community action agency during normal business hours. Sec. 122.701 5101.317. (A) Prior to designating a new community action agency or rescinding a community action agency's designation, the community services division department of job and family services shall: (1) Determine whether a community action agency is in compliance with section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code; (2) Consult with the chief elected officials of political subdivisions located within a community action agency's service area, and, in designating a new community action agency, obtain their endorsement of the agency in accordance with division (A) of section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code; (3) Hold at least one public meeting within a community action agency's service area for the purpose of allowing citizens to comment on the community action agency's delivery of services; (4) Evaluate the proposed service area of the community action agency, and, as may be necessary, modify the boundaries of the service area so that low-income persons in the area are adequately and efficiently served. (B) After providing notice and hearing pursuant to sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code, the director of development job and family services: (1) May rescind the designation of a community action agency after finding that the agency is not in compliance with any or all of the provisions of section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code; (2) Shall rescind the designation of a community action agency upon notification from the chief elected officials of more than one-half of the municipal corporations and the counties within a community currently served by a community action agency that such agency is not endorsed by them and after finding that the agency is not in compliance with section 122.69 5101.315 of the Revised Code. Any agency whose designation is rescinded pursuant to this section may appeal from an order rescinding such designation pursuant to section 119.12 of the Revised Code. Sec. 122.702 5101.318. The general assembly shall conduct public hearings each year on the proposed use and distribution of community services block grant funds, as required by section 675(b)676 of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 1609, 42 U.S.C.A. 9904U.S.C. 9901. Sec. 5101.33. (A) As used in this section, "benefits" means any of the following: (1) Cash assistance paid under Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code; (2) Supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits provided under section 5101.54 of the Revised Code; (3) Any other program administered by the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth under which assistance is provided or service rendered; (4) Any other program, service, or assistance administered by a person or government entity that the department determines may be delivered through the medium of electronic benefit transfer. (B) The department of job and family services or department of children and youth may make any payment or delivery of benefits to eligible individuals through the medium of electronic benefit transfer by doing all of the following: (1) Contracting with an agent to supply debit cards to the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth for use by such individuals in accessing their benefits and to credit such cards electronically with the amounts specified by the director of job and family services or the director of children and youth pursuant to law; (2) Informing such individuals about the use of the electronic benefit transfer system and furnishing them with debit cards and information that will enable them to access their benefits through the system; (3) Arranging with specific financial institutions or vendors, county departments of job and family services, or persons or government entities for individuals to have their cards credited electronically with the proper amounts at their facilities; (4) Periodically preparing vouchers for the payment of such benefits by electronic benefit transfer; (5) Satisfying any applicable requirements of federal and state law. (C) The department may enter into a written agreement with any person or government entity to provide benefits administered by that person or entity through the medium of electronic benefit transfer. A written agreement may require the person or government entity to pay to the department either or both of the following: (1) A charge that reimburses the department for all costs the department incurs in having the benefits administered by the person or entity provided through the electronic benefit transfer system; (2) A fee for having the benefits provided through the electronic benefit transfer system. (D) The department may designate which counties will participate in the medium of electronic benefit transfer, specify the date a designated county will begin participation, and specify which benefits will be provided through the medium of electronic benefit transfer in a designated county. (E) The department of job and family services or the department of children and youth may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the efficient administration of this section. Sec. 5101.35. (A) As used in this section: (1)(a) "Agency" means the following entities that administer a family services program: (i) The department of job and family services; (ii) The department of children and youth; (iii) A county department of job and family services; (iv) A public children services agency; (v) A private or government entity administering, in whole or in part, a family services program for or on behalf of the department of job and family services, the department of children and youth, or a county department of job and family services or public children services agency. (b) If the department of medicaid contracts with the department of job and family services to hear appeals authorized by section 5160.31 of the Revised Code regarding medical assistance programs, "agency" includes the department of medicaid. (2) "Appellant" means an applicant, participant, former participant, recipient, or former recipient of a family services program who is entitled by federal or state law to a hearing regarding a decision or order of the agency that administers the program. (3)(a) "Family services program" means all of the following: (i) A Title IV-A program as defined in section 5101.80 of the Revised Code; (ii) Programs that provide assistance under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code; (iii) Programs that provide assistance under section 5101.141, 5101.461, 5101.54, 5119.41, 5153.163, or 5153.165, or 5180.42 of the Revised Code; (iv) Title XX social services provided under section 5101.46 of the Revised Code, other than such services provided by the department of mental health and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, or a county board of developmental disabilities. (b) If the department of medicaid contracts with the department of job and family services to hear appeals authorized by section 5160.31 of the Revised Code regarding medical assistance programs, "family services program" includes medical assistance programs. (4) "Medical assistance program" has the same meaning as in section 5160.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided by divisions (G) and (H) of this section, an appellant who appeals under federal or state law a decision or order of an agency administering a family services program shall, at the appellant's request, be granted a state hearing by the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as appropriate. This state hearing shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted under this section. The state hearing shall be recorded, but neither the recording nor a transcript of the recording shall be part of the official record of the proceeding. Except as provided in section 5160.31 of the Revised Code, a state hearing decision is binding upon the agency and department, unless it is reversed or modified on appeal to the director of job and family services, director of children and youth, or a court of common pleas. (C) Except as provided by division (G) of this section, an appellant who disagrees with a state hearing decision may make an administrative appeal to the director of job and family services or director of children and youth in accordance with rules adopted under this section. This administrative appeal does not require a hearing, but the director or the director's designee shall review the state hearing decision and previous administrative action and may affirm, modify, remand, or reverse the state hearing decision. An administrative appeal decision is the final decision of the department and, except as provided in section 5160.31 of the Revised Code, is binding upon the department and agency, unless it is reversed or modified on appeal to the court of common pleas. (D) An agency shall comply with a decision issued pursuant to division (B) or (C) of this section within the time limits established by rules adopted under this section. If a county department of job and family services or a public children services agency fails to comply within these time limits, the department may take action pursuant to section 5101.24 of the Revised Code. If another agency, other than the department of medicaid, fails to comply within the time limits, the department may force compliance by withholding funds due the agency or imposing another sanction established by rules adopted under this section. (E) An appellant who disagrees with an administrative appeal decision of the director of job and family services, the director of children and youth, or either director's designee issued under division (C) of this section may appeal from the decision to the court of common pleas pursuant to section 119.12 of the Revised Code. The appeal shall be governed by section 119.12 of the Revised Code except that: (1) The person may apply to the court for designation as an indigent and, if the court grants this application, the appellant shall not be required to furnish the costs of the appeal. (2) The appellant shall mail the notice of appeal to the department of job and family services or director of children and youth, as appropriate, and file notice of appeal with the court within thirty days after the department mails the administrative appeal decision to the appellant. For good cause shown, the court may extend the time for mailing and filing notice of appeal, but such time shall not exceed six months from the date the department mails the administrative appeal decision. Filing notice of appeal with the court shall be the only act necessary to vest jurisdiction in the court. (3) The department shall be required to file a transcript of the testimony of the state hearing with the court only if the court orders the department to file the transcript. The court shall make such an order only if it finds that the department and the appellant are unable to stipulate to the facts of the case and that the transcript is essential to a determination of the appeal. The department shall file the transcript not later than thirty days after the day such an order is issued. (F) The department of job and family service and department of children and youth, as applicable, shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section, including rules governing the following: (1) State hearings under division (B) of this section. The rules shall include provisions regarding notice of eligibility termination and the opportunity of an appellant appealing a decision or order of a county department of job and family services to request a county conference with the county department before the state hearing is held. (2) Administrative appeals under division (C) of this section; (3) Time limits for complying with a decision issued under division (B) or (C) of this section; (4) Sanctions that may be applied against an agency under division (D) of this section. (G) The department of job and family services and the department of children and youth, as applicable, may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing an appeals process for an appellant who appeals a decision or order regarding a Title IV-A program identified under division (A)(4)(c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code that is different from the appeals process established by this section. The different appeals process may include having a state agency that administers the Title IV-A program pursuant to an interagency agreement entered into under section 5101.801 of the Revised Code administer the appeals process. (H) If an appellant receiving medicaid through a health insuring corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 1751. of the Revised Code is appealing a denial of medicaid services based on lack of medical necessity or other clinical issues regarding coverage by the health insuring corporation, the person hearing the appeal may order an independent medical review if that person determines that a review is necessary. The review shall be performed by a health care professional with appropriate clinical expertise in treating the recipient's condition or disease. The department shall pay the costs associated with the review. A review ordered under this division shall be part of the record of the hearing and shall be given appropriate evidentiary consideration by the person hearing the appeal. (I) The requirements of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code apply to a state hearing or administrative appeal under this section only to the extent, if any, specifically provided by rules adopted under this section. Sec. 5101.351. The department of job and family services or the department of children and youth may employ or contract with hearing officers to draft and recommend state hearing decisions under division (B) of section 5101.35 of the Revised Code. The department may employ or contract with hearing authorities to issue state hearing decisions under division (B) of section 5101.35 of the Revised Code. A hearing authority employed or contracted with under this section is not required to have been admitted to the practice of law in this state. Sec. 5101.38. The department of job and family services or the department of children and youth may appoint and commission any competent officer, employee, agency, or person to serve as a special agent, investigator, or representative to perform a designated duty for and in behalf of the department. Specific credentials shall be given by the department to each person so designated, and each credential shall state: (A) The person's name; (B) Agency with which such person is connected; (C) Purpose of appointment; (D) Date of expiration of appointment, if appropriate; (E) Such information as the department considers proper. Sec. 5101.461. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Title IV-A" means Title IV-A of the "Social Security Act," 110 Stat. 2113 (1996), 42 U.S.C. 601, as amended. (2) "Title XX" has the same meaning as in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code. (B) To the extent authorized by federal law, the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth may use funds received through the Title IV-A temporary assistance for needy families block grant for purposes of providing Title XX social services. The amount used under this section shall not exceed the maximum amount permitted by federal law. The funds and provision of Title XX social services with the funds are not subject to section 5101.46 of the Revised Code. Funds distributed under this section for the purpose of providing family planning services shall be distributed by a county department of job and family services according to the same order of priority that applies to the department of job and family services under section 5101.101 of the Revised Code. (C) The department and any county department of job and family services may require an entity under contract to provide Title XX social services with funds used under this section to submit to an audit on the basis of alleged misuse or improper accounting of funds. If an audit is required, the social services provider shall reimburse the state department or county department for the cost it incurred in conducting the audit or having the audit conducted. If an audit demonstrates that a social services provider is responsible for one or more adverse findings, the provider shall reimburse the state department or county department the amount of the adverse findings. The amount shall not be reimbursed with funds received under this section. The state department and county departments may terminate or refuse to enter into a contract with a social services provider to provide services with funds available pursuant to this section if there are adverse findings in an audit that are the responsibility of the provider. (D) The state department of job and family services or the department of children and youth may adopt rules to implement and carry out the purposes of this section. Rules governing financial and operational matters of the department or matters between the department and county departments of job and family services shall be adopted as internal management rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code. Rules governing eligibility for services, program participation, and other matters pertaining to applicants and participants shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.542. (A) Immediately following a county department of job and family services' certification that a household determined under division (B) of section 5101.54 of the Revised Code to be in immediate need of nutrition assistance is eligible for the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the department of job and family services shall provide for the household to be sent by regular United States mail an electronic benefit transfer card containing the amount of benefits the household is eligible to receive under the program. The card shall be sent to the member of the household in whose name application for the supplemental nutrition assistance program was made or that member's authorized representative. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, the department shall replace any electronic benefit transfer card that is reported by a household to be lost, stolen, or damaged, within two business days of receiving notice of the card's condition, in accordance with 7 C.F.R. 274.6(b). (C)(1) The department shall implement the option described in 7 C.F.R. 274.6(b)(5) and shall withhold a replacement electronic benefit transfer card from a household that requests four or more replacement cards during a twelve-month period until the requirements specified in 7 C.F.R. 274.6(b)(5) have been satisfied. (2) The department shall not withhold a replacement card as described under division (C)(1) of this section if the individual requesting the replacement has a disability directly related to the loss of the card. (D) The department shall establish a process as part of the department's existing customer service telephone hotline that allows individuals to lock or unlock an electronic benefit transfer card that has been lost or stolen. Sec. 5101.543. To ensure program integrity within the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the department of job and family services shall periodically monitor the balances of supplemental nutrition assistance program accounts. If the department discovers an account with a balance that exceeds five thousand dollars, the department shall take steps to determine whether the account is inactive and, if inactive, identify the causes for the accruing balance. Sec. 5101.548. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the department of job and family services shall not implement the option available under section 6(o)(6) of the "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008," 7 U.S.C. 2015(o)(6). (2) The department of job and family services may implement the option described in division (A)(1) of this section only to prevent a federal penalty and to maintain compliance with federal rules governing the supplemental nutrition assistance program. The department shall not delegate the authority to waive individual work requirements or otherwise grant exemptions to county departments of job and family services. The department shall notify the chairpersons of the standing committees having jurisdiction in both the house of representatives and the senate when implementing the option described in division (A)(1) of this section. (B) The department of job and family services shall not request, apply for, or renew a waiver authorized by section 6(o)(4) of the "Food and Nutrition Act of 2008," 7 U.S.C. 2015(o)(4). Sec. 5101.549. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Food additive" means any of the following: (a) Synthetic food dyes derived from petroleum or coal tar, including red 40, red 3, yellow 5, yellow 6, blue 1, blue 2, and green 3; (b) Titanium dioxide and any other whitening agents classified as nanoparticles; (c) Brominated vegetable oil and other chemical emulsifiers linked to hormone disruption; (d) Potassium bromate, propylparaben, and any chemical additives classified as probable carcinogens. (2) "Sugar-sweetened beverages" means nonalcoholic beverages that are made with carbonated water that is flavored, contains a food additive, and is sweetened with sugar or artificial sweeteners. "Sugar-sweetened beverages" do not include a beverage that contains milk, milk products, soy, rice, or other milk substitutes, or that contain greater than fifty per cent vegetable or fruit juice by volume, or that contain less than five grams of added sugar. (B) The director of job and family services shall submit a request to the United States department of agriculture for a waiver to exclude sugar-sweetened beverages as items that may be purchased in this state under the supplemental nutrition assistance program. If a waiver submitted under this section is not approved, the director shall resubmit a request for a waiver on an annual basis. Sec. 5101.612. (A) As used in this section, "federal poverty line" has the same meaning as in section 5162.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Within available funds, the department of job and family services shall distribute funds to the counties not later than thirty days after the beginning of each calendar quarter for a part of the counties' costs for protective services. Funds provided to a county under this section shall be deposited into the public assistance fund created under section 5101.161 of the Revised Code. (C) In each fiscal year, the amount of funds available for distribution under this section shall be allocated to counties as follows: (1) If the amount is less than the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year, each county shall receive an amount equal to the percentage of the funding it received in the immediately preceding fiscal year, exclusive of any releases from or additions to the allocation or any sanctions imposed under this section; (2) If the amount is equal to the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year, each county shall receive an amount equal to the amount it received in the preceding fiscal year, exclusive of any releases from or additions to the allocation or any sanctions imposed under this section; (3) If the amount is greater than the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year, each county shall receive the amount determined under division (C)(2) of this section as a base allocation, plus a percentage of the amount that exceeds the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The amount exceeding the amount initially appropriated in the immediately preceding fiscal year shall be allocated to the counties as follows: (a) Twelve per cent divided equally among all counties; (b) Forty-eight per cent in the ratio that the number of residents of the county aged sixty or older bears to the total number of such persons residing in this state; (c) Forty per cent in the ratio that the number of residents of the county with incomes under the federal poverty line bears to the total number of such persons in this state. (D) Not later than ninety days after the end of each state fiscal biennium, each county shall return any unspent funds to the department. (E) The director of job and family services may adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code to allocate funds under this section and prescribe reports on expenditures to be submitted by the counties as necessary for the implementation of this section. Sec. 5101.80. (A) As used in this section and in section 5101.801 of the Revised Code: (1) "County family services agency" has the same meaning as in section 307.981 of the Revised Code. (2) "State agency" has the same meaning as in section 9.82 of the Revised Code. (3) "Title IV-A administrative agency" means both of the following: (a) A county family services agency or state agency administering a Title IV-A program under the supervision of the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth; (b) A government agency or private, not-for-profit entity administering a project funded in whole or in part with funds provided under the Title IV-A demonstration program created under section 5101.803 of the Revised Code. (4) "Title IV-A program" means all of the following that are funded in part with funds provided under the temporary assistance for needy families block grant established by Title IV-A of the "Social Security Act," 110 Stat. 2113 (1996), 42 U.S.C. 601, as amended: (a) The Ohio works first program established under Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code; (b) The prevention, retention, and contingency program established under Chapter 5108. of the Revised Code; (c) A program established by the general assembly or an executive order issued by the governor that is administered or supervised by the department of job and family services or department of children and youth pursuant to section 5101.801 of the Revised Code; (d) The kinship permanency incentive program created under section 5101.802 5180.52 of the Revised Code; (e) The Title IV-A demonstration program created under section 5101.803 of the Revised Code; (f) The Ohio parenting and pregnancy program created under section 5101.804 5180.71 of the Revised Code; (g) Fatherhood programs recommended by the Ohio commission on fatherhood under section 5101.805 5180.704 of the Revised Code; (h) A component of a Title IV-A program identified under divisions (A)(4)(a) to (g) of this section that the Title IV-A state plan prepared under division (C)(1) of this section identifies as a component. (B) The department of job and family services shall act as the single state agency to administer and supervise the administration of Title IV-A programs. The Title IV-A state plan and amendments to the plan prepared under division (C) of this section are binding on Title IV-A administrative agencies. No Title IV-A administrative agency may establish, by rule or otherwise, a policy governing a Title IV-A program that is inconsistent with a Title IV-A program policy established, in rule or otherwise, by the director of job and family services. (C) The department of job and family services shall do all of the following: (1) Prepare and submit to the United States secretary of health and human services a Title IV-A state plan for Title IV-A programs; (2) Prepare and submit to the United States secretary of health and human services amendments to the Title IV-A state plan that the department determines necessary, including amendments necessary to implement Title IV-A programs identified in divisions (A)(4)(c) to (h) of this section; (3) Prescribe forms for applications, certificates, reports, records, and accounts of Title IV-A administrative agencies, and other matters related to Title IV-A programs; (4) Make such reports, in such form and containing such information as the department may find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports, regarding Title IV-A programs; (5) Require reports and information from each Title IV-A administrative agency as may be necessary or advisable regarding a Title IV-A program; (6) Afford a fair hearing in accordance with section 5101.35 of the Revised Code to any applicant for, or participant or former participant of, a Title IV-A program aggrieved by a decision regarding the program; (7) Administer and expend, pursuant to Chapters 5104., 5107., and 5108. of the Revised Code and sections 5101.801, 5101.802, 5101.803, and 5101.804 5180.52, and 5180.71 of the Revised Code, any sums appropriated by the general assembly for the purpose of those chapters and sections and all sums paid to the state by the secretary of the treasury of the United States as authorized by Title IV-A of the "Social Security Act," 110 Stat. 2113 (1996), 42 U.S.C. 601, as amended; (8) Conduct investigations and audits as are necessary regarding Title IV-A programs; (9) Enter into reciprocal agreements with other states relative to the provision of Ohio works first and prevention, retention, and contingency to residents and nonresidents; (10) Contract with a private entity to conduct an independent on-going evaluation of the Ohio works first program and the prevention, retention, and contingency program. The contract must require the private entity to do all of the following: (a) Examine issues of process, practice, impact, and outcomes; (b) Study former participants of Ohio works first who have not participated in Ohio works first for at least one year to determine whether they are employed, the type of employment in which they are engaged, the amount of compensation they are receiving, whether their employer provides health insurance, whether and how often they have received benefits or services under the prevention, retention, and contingency program, and whether they are successfully self sufficient; (c) Provide the department with reports at times the department specifies. (11) Not later than the last day of each January and July, prepare a report containing information on the following: (a) Individuals exhausting the time limits for participation in Ohio works first set forth in section 5107.18 of the Revised Code. (b) Individuals who have been exempted from the time limits set forth in section 5107.18 of the Revised Code and the reasons for the exemption. (D) The department shall provide copies of the reports it receives under division (C)(10) of this section and prepares under division (C)(11) of this section to the governor, the president and minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives. The department shall provide copies of the reports to any private or government entity on request. (E) An authorized representative of the department or a county family services agency or state agency administering a Title IV-A program shall have access to all records and information bearing thereon for the purposes of investigations conducted pursuant to this section. An authorized representative of a government entity or private, not-for-profit entity administering a project funded in whole or in part with funds provided under the Title IV-A demonstration program shall have access to all records and information bearing on the project for the purpose of investigations conducted pursuant to this section. Sec. 5101.801. (A) Except as otherwise provided by the law enacted by the general assembly or executive order issued by the governor establishing the Title IV-A program, a Title IV-A program identified under division (A)(4)(c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code shall provide benefits and services that are not "assistance" as defined in 45 C.F.R. 260.31(a) and are benefits and services that 45 C.F.R. 260.31(b) excludes from the definition of assistance. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided by the law enacted by the general assembly or executive order issued by the governor establishing the Title IV-A program, the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as appropriate, shall do either of the following regarding a Title IV-A program identified under division (A)(4)(c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code: (a) Administer the program or supervise a county family services agency's administration of the program; (b) Enter into an interagency agreement with a state agency for the state agency to administer the program under the department's supervision. (2) The department of job and family services and the department of children and youth may enter into an agreement with a government entity and, to the extent permitted by federal law, a private, not-for-profit entity for the entity to receive funding for a project under the Title IV-A demonstration program created under section 5101.803 of the Revised Code. (3) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department of children and youth may enter into an agreement with a private, not-for-profit entity for the entity to receive funds under the Ohio parenting and pregnancy program created under section 5101.804 5180.71 of the Revised Code. (4) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department of children and youth may enter into an agreement with a private, not-for-profit entity for the entity to receive funds as recommended by the Ohio commission on fatherhood under section 5101.805 5180.704 of the Revised Code. (C) The department of job and family services and the department of children and youth, may adopt rules governing Title IV-A programs identified under divisions (A)(4)(c), (d), (e), (f), (g), and (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code. Rules governing financial and operational matters of either department or between either department and county family services agencies shall be adopted as internal management rules adopted in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code. All other rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (D) If the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, enters into an agreement regarding a Title IV-A program identified under division (A)(4)(c), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) or (2) of this section, the agreement shall include at least all of the following: (1) A requirement that the state agency or entity comply with the requirements for the program or project, including all of the following requirements established by federal statutes and regulations, state statutes and rules, the United States office of management and budget, and the Title IV-A state plan prepared under section 5101.80 of the Revised Code: (a) Eligibility; (b) Reports; (c) Benefits and services; (d) Use of funds; (e) Appeals for applicants for, and recipients and former recipients of, the benefits and services; (f) Audits. (2) A complete description of all of the following: (a) The benefits and services that the program or project is to provide; (b) The methods of program or project administration; (c) The appeals process under section 5101.35 of the Revised Code for applicants for, and recipients and former recipients of, the program or project's benefits and services; (d) Other requirements that the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, requires be included. (3) Procedures for the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, to approve a policy, established by rule or otherwise, that the state agency or entity establishes for the program or project before the policy is established; (4) Provisions regarding how the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, is to reimburse the state agency or entity for allowable expenditures under the program or project that the applicable department approves, including all of the following: (a) Limitations on administrative costs; (b) The department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, at its discretion, doing either of the following: (i) Withholding no more than five per cent of the funds that the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, would otherwise provide to the state agency or entity for the program or project; (ii) Charging the state agency or entity for the costs to the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, of performing, or contracting for the performance of, audits and other administrative functions associated with the program or project. (5) If the state agency or entity arranges by contract, grant, or other agreement for another entity to perform a function the state agency or entity would otherwise perform regarding the program or project, the state agency or entity's responsibilities for both of the following: (a) Ensuring that the other entity complies with the agreement between the state agency or entity and the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable and federal statutes and regulations and state statutes and rules governing the use of funds for the program or project; (b) Auditing the other entity in accordance with requirements established by the United States office of management and budget. (6) The state agency or entity's responsibilities regarding the prompt payment, including any interest assessed, of any adverse audit finding, final disallowance of federal funds, or other sanction or penalty imposed by the federal government, auditor of state, department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, a court, or other entity regarding funds for the program or project; (7) Provisions for the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, to terminate the agreement or withhold reimbursement from the state agency or entity if either of the following occur: (a) The federal government disapproves the program or project or reduces federal funds for the program or project; (b) The state agency or entity fails to comply with the terms of the agreement. (8) Provisions for both of the following: (a) The department of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, and state agency or entity determining the performance outcomes expected for the program or project; (b) An evaluation of the program or project to determine its success in achieving the performance outcomes determined under division (D)(8)(a) of this section. (E) To the extent consistent with the law enacted by the general assembly or executive order issued by the governor establishing the Title IV-A program and subject to the approval of the director of budget and management, the director of job and family services or the director of children and youth, as applicable, may terminate a Title IV-A program identified under division (A)(4)(c), (d), (e), (f), (g), or (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code or reduce funding for the program if the applicable director determines that federal or state funds are insufficient to fund the program. If the director of budget and management approves the termination or reduction in funding for such a program, the director of job and family services or the department of children and youth, as applicable, shall issue instructions for the termination or funding reduction. If a Title IV-A administrative agency is administering the program, the agency is bound by the termination or funding reduction and shall comply with the applicable director's instructions. (F) The director of job and family services and the director of children and youth may adopt internal management rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code as necessary to implement this section. The rules are binding on each Title IV-A administrative agency. Sec. 5101.89. As used in sections 5101.89 to 5101.899 of the Revised Code: (A) "Youth" means a person who is any of the following: (1) Less than eighteen years of age; (2) An emancipated young adult; (3) Is in the temporary or permanent custody of a public children services agency, a planned permanent living arrangement, or in the Title-IV-E-eligible care and placement responsibility of a juvenile court or other governmental agency that provides Title IV-E reimbursable placement services. (B) "Emancipated young adult" has the same meaning as in section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.891. (A) There is created a youth and family ombudsman ombudsmen office under the department of job and family services consisting of the following: (1) A family ombudsman, who shall be appointed by the governor, to investigate complaints made by adults; (2) A youth ombudsman, who shall be appointed by the governor with advice from the overcoming hurdles in Ohio youth advisory board, to investigate complaints made by youth and to advocate for the best interests of children involved in concerns investigated by the office; (3) Not fewer than two regional ombudsmen; (4) Any necessary support staff. (B) The office shall investigate and resolve concerns made by or on behalf of children and families involved with public children services agencies, Title IV-E agencies, or private provider agencies that administer or oversee foster care or placement services for the children services system. The office shall ensure the independent and impartial review of youth, family, and community complaints or concerns. Sec. 5101.892. The youth and family ombudsman ombudsmen office shall perform all of the following duties: (A) Receive, investigate, and attempt to resolve complaints from citizens, including children in the custody of a public children services agency or in the care and placement of a Title IV-E agency, related to government services regarding child protective services, foster care, and adoption; (B) Establish procedures for receiving, investigating, and resolving complaints, consistent with state and federal law; (C) Provide an annual report to the governor, speaker of the house of representatives, president of the senate, minority leadership of the house of representatives and senate, the director of job and family services, the director of children and youth, and representatives of the overcoming hurdles in Ohio youth advisory board. Sec. 5101.893. Not later than sixty days after release of the annual report described under section 5101.892 of the Revised Code, the overcoming hurdles in Ohio youth advisory board shall provide an evaluation of the report to the governor and the youth ombudsman of the youth and family ombudsman ombudsmen office. Sec. 5101.894. To the extent permitted by state or federal law, a representative of the youth and family ombudsman ombudsmen office may report to an appropriate authority any suspected violation of state law discovered during the course of a complaint review. Sec. 5101.895. The department of job and family services shall be responsible for all administrative undertakings for the youth and family ombudsman ombudsmen office, including the provision of offices, equipment, and supplies, as necessary. Sec. 5101.897. (A) No employee of the youth and family ombudsman ombudsmen office shall do any of the following: (1) Hold any office of trust or profit; (2) Engage in any occupation or business interfering or inconsistent with the duties of the office; (3) Serve on any committee of any political party; (4) Have any interest that is, or may be, in conflict with the interests and concerns of the office. (B) As used in this section, "office of trust or profit" means any of the following: (1) A federal or state elective office or an elective office of a political subdivision of the state; (2) A position on a board or commission of the state that is appointed by the governor; (3) An office set forth in section 121.03, 121.04, or 121.05 of the Revised Code; (4) An office of the government of the United States that is appointed by the president of the United States. Sec. 5101.899. (A) The youth and family ombudsman ombudsmen office shall have access to only the records of the department of children and youth and the department of job and family services that are necessary for the administration of sections 5101.89 to 5101.899 of the Revised Code and in the performance of its official duties, including any records maintained in the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code. The office has the right to request of the director of children and youth and the director of job and family services necessary information from any work unit of the department having information. The collection, compilation, analysis, and dissemination of information by the office shall be performed in a manner that protects complainants, individuals providing information about a complaint, public entities, and confidential records. (B) The office shall have access to any necessary records in the control of a public children services agency, a Title IV-E agency, or a private provider agency that administers or oversees foster care or placement services for the children services system. (C) Files of the office and any records contained in those files are not public records subject to inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Information contained in investigative and other files maintained by the office shall be disclosed only at the discretion of the office or if disclosure is required by a court order. Sec. 5101.95. Not later than thirty days before submitting a waiver or state plan amendment relating to a public assistance benefit program to the appropriate federal entity, the director of job and family services shall submit a copy of the waiver or state plan amendment to the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the chairpersons of the relevant house of representatives and senate committees with jurisdiction over the subject matter of the waiver or state plan amendment. Sec. 5101.98. (A) Quarterly, the department of job and family services shall compile a report on public assistance programs in this state, including the following information: (1) Regarding the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the number of: (a) Accounts with high balances, as determined by the department; (b) Out-of-state transactions; (c) Transactions when the final amount processed was a whole dollar amount without additional cents. (2) Regarding public assistance programs in this state, including medicaid, the supplemental nutrition assistance program, temporary assistance for needy families, or cash assistance, the number of: (a) Payments made in error, and the dollar amount of those payments; (b) Work requirement exemptions issued; (c) Confirmed cases of intentional program violation and fraud. (B) The department shall submit the report to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives, who shall distribute the report to the chairs of any legislative committee with jurisdiction over public assistance. Sec. 5101.99. (A) Whoever violates division (A) of section 5101.27 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (B) Whoever violates section 5101.133, division (A) of section 5101.63, or division (C)(2) of section 5101.631 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. Sec. 5103.02. As used in sections 5103.03 to 5103.181 of the Revised Code: (A)(1) "Association" or "institution" includes all of the following: (a) Any incorporated or unincorporated organization, society, association, or agency, public or private, that receives or cares for children for two or more consecutive weeks; (b) Any individual, including the operator of a foster home, who, for hire, gain, or reward, receives or cares for children for two or more consecutive weeks, unless the individual is related to them by blood or marriage; (c) Any individual not in the regular employ of a court, or of an institution or association certified in accordance with section 5103.03 of the Revised Code, who in any manner becomes a party to the placing of children in foster homes, unless the individual is related to such children by blood or marriage or is the appointed guardian of such children. (2) "Association" or "institution" does not include any of the following: (a) Any organization, society, association, school, agency, child guidance center, detention or rehabilitation facility, or children's clinic licensed, regulated, approved, operated under the direction of, or otherwise certified by the department of education and workforce, a local board of education, the department of youth services, the department of mental health and addiction services, or the department of developmental disabilities; (b) Any individual who provides care for only a single-family group, placed there by their parents or other relative having custody; (c) A private, nonprofit therapeutic wilderness camp; (d) A qualified organization as defined in section 2151.90 of the Revised Code. (B) "Family foster home" means a foster home that is not a specialized foster home. (C) "Foster caregiver" means a person holding a valid foster home certificate issued under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. (D) "Foster home" means a private residence in which children are received apart from their parents, guardian, or legal custodian, by an individual reimbursed for providing the children nonsecure care, supervision, or training twenty-four hours a day. "Foster home" does not include care provided for a child in the home of a person other than the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian while the parent, guardian, or legal custodian is temporarily away. Family foster homes and specialized foster homes are types of foster homes. (E) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (F) "Medically fragile foster home" means a foster home that provides specialized medical services designed to meet the needs of children with intensive health care needs who meet all of the following criteria: (1) Under rules adopted by the medicaid director governing medicaid payments for long-term care services, the children require a skilled level of care. (2) The children require the services of a doctor of medicine or osteopathic medicine at least once a week due to the instability of their medical conditions. (3) The children require the services of a registered nurse on a daily basis. (4) The children are at risk of institutionalization in a hospital, skilled nursing facility, or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities. (G) "Private, nonprofit therapeutic wilderness camp" means a structured, alternative residential setting for children who are experiencing emotional, behavioral, moral, social, or learning difficulties at home or school in which all of the following are the case: (1) The children spend the majority of their time, including overnight, either outdoors or in a primitive structure. (2) The children have been placed there by their parents or another relative having custody. (3) The camp accepts no public funds for use in its operations. (H) "Recommending agency" means a public children services agency, private child placing agency, or private noncustodial agency that recommends that the department of children and youth take any of the following actions under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code regarding a foster home: (1) Issue a certificate; (2) Deny a certificate; (3) Revoke a certificate. (I) "Resource caregiver" means a foster caregiver or a kinship caregiver. (J) "Resource family" means a foster home or the kinship caregiver family. (K) "Specialized foster home" means a medically fragile foster home or a treatment foster home. (L) "Treatment foster home" means a foster home that incorporates special rehabilitative services designed to treat the specific needs of the children received in the foster home and that receives and cares for children who are emotionally or behaviorally disturbed, who are chemically dependent, who have developmental disabilities, or who otherwise have exceptional needs. Sec. 5103.021. (A) As used in this section, a "scholars residential center" is a center that meets all of the following: (1) The center is a certified affiliate in good standing of a national organization with a mission to help underserved children in middle school and high school in a comprehensive manner that is academically focused and service-oriented and in a family-like setting. (2) The center is private and not-for-profit. (3) The center does not receive Title IV-E funding or any associated Title IV funds related to child welfare. (4) The center only accepts children placed by their parents or legal custodian. (5) The center is voluntary and uses a competitive selection process. (B) The director of job and family services children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement standards regarding a scholars residential center. The rules shall be substantially similar, as determined by the director, to other similarly situated providers of residential care for children, including rules provided in Chapters 5101:2-5 and 5101:2-9 of the Administrative Code, except that the rules shall reflect all of the following: (1) A center is not subject to any policy that is not specific or relevant to the center. (2) A center is not required to provide discharge summaries. (3) A center is permitted to request agency waivers. (4) A center is not required to implement case plans or service plans. (5) Training requirements for center staff are limited to completion of all of the following: (a) Orientation training; (b) Current American red cross, American heart association, or equivalent first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation certification; (c) One hour of annual trauma training. (6) A center is not subject to existing rules regarding: (a) Recreation and leisure activity requirements, provided that the center has a recreation area available and permits children to swim if a person who has completed life-saving or water safety training is present; (b) Visiting and communications policies, provided that the center ensures that children have contact with their family; (c) Qualified residential treatment program requirements; (d) Treatment-focused requirements established for residential agencies. (7) A center shall provide notification and documentation of critical incidents to parents and legal custodians. (C) The director shall certify a scholars residential center that submits an application to the director, on a form prescribed by the director, that indicates to the director's satisfaction that the center meets the standards set forth in rules adopted under division (B) of this section. Sec. 5103.039. (A) The department of children and youth may suspend, without a prior hearing, the certificate of an institution or association, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, which includes a foster caregiver, if any of the following occur: (1) A child dies or suffers a serious injury while placed or residing with the institution or association, including a foster home, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (2) A public children services agency receives a report pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code, and the person alleged to have inflicted abuse or neglect on the child who is the subject of the report is any of the following: (a) A principal of the institution or association; (b) An employee or volunteer of the institution or association who has not immediately been placed on administrative leave or released from employment; (c) Any person who resides in the foster home. (3) One of the following is charged by an indictment, information, or complaint with an offense relating to the death, injury, abuse, or neglect of a child: (a) A principal of the institution or association; (b) An employee or volunteer of the institution or association who has not immediately been placed on administrative leave or released from employment. (4) The department, the recommending agency, a public children services agency, or a county department of job and family services determines that a principal, employee, or volunteer of the institution or association, including a foster caregiver, or a person residing in the foster home, created a serious risk to the health or safety of a child placed therein that resulted in or could have resulted in a child's death or injury. (5) The department determines that the owner of the institution or association or the foster caregiver does not meet the requirements of section 2151.86, 5103.0310, or 5103.053 of the Revised Code. (B) In suspending a license under division (A) of this section, the department shall comply with section 119.07 of the Revised Code. A principal of an institution or association, including a foster caregiver, may request an adjudicatory hearing before the department pursuant to sections 119.06 and 119.12 of the Revised Code. If a hearing is requested and the department does not issue its final adjudication order within one hundred twenty days after the suspension, the suspension is void on the one hundred twenty-first day after the suspension, unless the hearing on the suspension is continued on agreement by the parties or for good cause. (C) A summary suspension imposed under this section shall remain in effect until any of the following occurs: (1) The public children services agency completes its investigation of the report pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code and determines that all of the allegations are unsubstantiated. (2) All criminal charges are disposed of through dismissal or a finding of not guilty. (3) The department issues pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code a final order terminating the suspension. (D) An institution or association shall not have children placed in the institution or association while a summary suspension remains in effect. Upon the issuance of the order of suspension, the department shall place a hold on the certificate or indicate that the certificate is suspended in Ohio's statewide automated child welfare information system. (E) The director of children and youth may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing standards and procedures for the summary suspension of certificates. (F) This section does not limit the authority of the department to revoke a certificate pursuant to section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. (G) As used in this section, "principal" means any of the following: (1) The institution or association's administrator or director; (2) The institution or association's owners or partners; (3) Members of the institution or association's governing body; (4) A foster caregiver. Sec. 5103.0329. (A) A recommending agency may submit a request to the department of children and youth, on a case-by-case basis only, to waive any non-safety standards for a kinship caregiver seeking foster home certification. Non-safety standards include training hours and other requirements under sections 5103.031 and 5103.032 of the Revised Code and standards established by rules adopted under sections 5103.03 and 5103.0316 of the Revised Code, in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 671 (a)(10). (B) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5103.0520. (A) As used in this section, "group home" has the same meaning as "group home for children" in section 5103.05 of the Revised Code. (B) Not later than two hundred seventy days after the effective date of this section, the director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to establish requirements regarding all of the following for group homes: (1) The use of the Ohio professional registry, as operated by the Ohio child care resource and referral association or its successor organization or entity, to complete background checks or criminal records checks pursuant to section 2151.86, 5103.037, 5103.0310, or 5103.053 of the Revised Code for any owner, board president, administrator, officer, operator, staff, volunteer, intern, and subcontractor of a group home; (2) Training on behavioral intervention, including the use of de-escalation, for all new and existing individuals working at a group home; (3) The supervision of children, including a ratio of at least one staff person for every seven children or, if the group home accepts placement of fewer than seven children, one staff person for every six children. (C) The operator of a group home shall comply with the ratio requirements established in rules adopted under division (B)(3) of this section as a requirement for certification. (D) The director of children and youth may suspend or revoke the certificate of a group home in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for any violation under this section or rules adopted under this section. Sec. 5103.09. (A) As used in this section, "Title IV-E agency" has the same meaning as in section 5101.132 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon receiving the care and placement of a child, a Title IV-E agency shall determine if the child is eligible for or receiving benefits administered by the United States social security administration, the United States department of veterans affairs, the Ohio public employee retirement system, the Ohio police and fire pension fund, the state teachers retirement system of Ohio, the school employees retirement system of Ohio, or the Ohio highway patrol retirement system. If the child is eligible for or receiving such benefits, the agency shall not use the child's benefits to pay for or reimburse the agency, county, or state for any cost of the child's care. (C) The director of children and youth may adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code to implement this section, including the establishment of new procedures necessary to assist a Title IV-E agency in complying with this section. Sec. 5103.15. (A)(1) The parents, guardian, or other persons having the custody of a child may enter into an agreement with any public children services agency or private child placing agency, whereby the child is placed without the approval of the juvenile court in the temporary custody of the agency for a period of time of up to thirty days, except that an agreement for temporary custody can be for a period of time of up to sixty days without court approval if the agreement is executed solely for the purpose of obtaining the adoption of a child who is less than six months of age on the date of the execution of the agreement. (2) Except as provided in division (A)(3) of this section for agreements entered into to obtain the adoption of a child under the age of six months, any public children services agency or private child placing agency that obtains, without court approval, temporary custody of a child pursuant to an agreement executed in accordance with this division may request the juvenile court of the county in which the child has a residence or legal settlement for an original thirty-day extension of the temporary custody agreement. Upon the filing of a request for the extension of the temporary custody agreement, the juvenile court shall determine whether the extension is in the best interest of the child and may extend the temporary custody agreement for a period of thirty days beyond the initial thirty-day period for which court approval is not required by this division. The agency requesting the original extension shall file a case plan, prepared pursuant to section 2151.412 of the Revised Code, with the court at the same time that it files its request for an extension. At the expiration of the original thirty-day extension period, the agency may request the juvenile court to grant an additional thirty-day extension of the temporary custody agreement. Upon the filing of the request for the additional extension, the juvenile court may extend the temporary custody agreement for a period of thirty days beyond the original thirty-day extension period if it determines that the additional extension is in the best interest of the child. The agency shall file an updated version of the child's case plan at the same time that it files its request for an additional extension. At the expiration of an additional thirty-day extension period and at the expiration of the original thirty-day extension period if the agency does not request an additional thirty-day extension, the agency shall either return the child to the child's parents, guardian, or other person having custody of the child or file a complaint with the court pursuant to section 2151.27 of the Revised Code requesting temporary or permanent custody of the child. The complaint shall be accompanied by a case plan prepared in accordance with section 2151.412 of the Revised Code. (3) Any public children services agency or private child placing agency that obtains, without court approval and solely for the purpose of obtaining the adoption of the child, temporary custody of a child who is under the age of six months pursuant to an agreement executed in accordance with this division may request the juvenile court in the county in which the child has a residence or legal settlement to grant a thirty day extension of the temporary custody agreement. Upon the filing of the request, the court shall determine whether the extension is in the best interest of the child and may extend the temporary custody agreement for a period of thirty days beyond the sixty day period for which the court approval is not required by this division. The agency requesting the extension shall file a case plan, prepared pursuant to section 2151.412 of the Revised Code, with the court at the same time that it files its request for an extension. At the expiration of the thirty day extension, the agency shall either return the child to the parents, guardian, or other person having custody of the child or file a complaint with the court pursuant to section 2151.27 of the Revised Code requesting temporary or permanent custody of the child. The complaint shall be accompanied by a case plan prepared in accordance with section 2151.412 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Subject to juvenile court approval, the following may enter into an agreement with a public children services agency or private child placing agency surrendering the child into the permanent custody of that agency: (a) The parents, guardian, or other persons having custody of the child; (b) The parents of a child who is in the temporary custody of a public children services agency or private child placing agency. (2) An agency that enters into an agreement under division (B)(1) of this section may take and care for the child or place the child in a family home. (3) A private child placing agency or public children services agency that seeks permanent custody of a child pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section shall file a request with the juvenile court of the county in which the child has a residence or legal settlement for approval of the agency's permanent surrender agreement with the parents, guardian, or other persons having custody of the child. Not later than fourteen business days after the request is filed, the juvenile court shall determine whether the permanent surrender agreement is in the best interest of the child. The court may approve the permanent surrender agreement if it determines that the agreement is in the best interest of the child and, in the case of an agreement between a parent and an agency, the requirements of section 5103.151 of the Revised Code are met. The agency requesting the approval of the permanent surrender agreement shall file with the court an original or amended case plan, prepared pursuant to section 2151.412 of the Revised Code, at the same time that it files its request for the approval of the permanent surrender agreement. (4) Notwithstanding division (B)(1) of this section, the parents of a child less than six months of age may enter into an agreement with a private child placing agency surrendering the child into the permanent custody of the agency without juvenile court approval if the agreement is executed solely for the purpose of obtaining the adoption of the child. The agency shall, not later than two business days after entering into the agreement, notify the juvenile court. The agency also shall notify the court not later than two business days after the agency places the child for adoption. The court shall journalize the notices it receives under division (B)(4) of this section. (C) The agreements provided for in this section shall be in writing, on forms prescribed and furnished by the department of children and youth, and may contain any proper and legal stipulations for proper care of the child, and may authorize the public children services agency or private child placing agency when such agreements are for permanent care and custody to appear in any proceeding for the legal adoption of the child, and consent to the child's adoption, as provided in section 3107.06 of the Revised Code. If an agreement for permanent care and custody of a child is executed, social and medical histories shall be completed in relation to the child in accordance with section 3107.09 of the Revised Code. The adoption order of the probate court judge made upon the consent shall be binding upon the child and the child's parents, guardian, or other person, as if those persons were personally in court and consented to the order, whether made party to the proceeding or not. (D) An agreement entered into under this section by a parent under age eighteen is as valid as an agreement entered into by a parent age eighteen or older. Sec. 5103.155. As used in this section, "children with special needs" has the same meaning as in rules adopted under section 5153.163 of the Revised Code. If the department of job and family services children and youth determines that money in the putative father registry fund created under section 2101.16 of the Revised Code is more than is needed to perform its duties related to the putative father registry, the department may transfer use surplus moneys in the fund to the department of children and youth to promote adoption of children with special needs. Sec. 5103.18. (A)(1) Prior to certification as a foster home under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code, a recommending agency shall obtain a summary report of a search of the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system, established under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code, from an entity listed in section 5101.132 5180.402 of the Revised Code. (2) Whenever a prospective foster parent or any other person eighteen years of age or older who resides with a prospective foster parent has resided in another state within the five-year period immediately prior to the date on which a criminal records check is requested for the person under division (A) of section 2151.86 of the Revised Code, the recommending agency shall request a check of the central registry of abuse and neglect of this state from the department of children and youth regarding the prospective foster parent or the person eighteen years of age or older who resides with the prospective foster parent to enable the agency to check any child abuse and neglect registry maintained by that other state. The recommending agency shall make the request and shall review the results of the check before the prospective foster parent may be finally approved for placement of a child. Information received pursuant to such a request shall be considered for purposes of this chapter as if it were a summary report required under division (A) of this section. The department of children and youth shall comply with any request to check the central registry that is similar to the request described in this division and that is received from any other state. (B)(1) The summary report required under division (A) of this section shall contain, if applicable, a chronological list of abuse and neglect determinations or allegations of which a person seeking to become a foster caregiver of a child is subject and in regards to which a public children services agency has done one of the following: (a) Determined that abuse or neglect occurred; (b) Initiated an investigation, and the investigation is ongoing; (c) Initiated an investigation, and the agency was unable to determine whether abuse or neglect occurred. (2) The summary report required under division (A) of this section shall not contain any of the following: (a) An abuse and neglect determination of which a person seeking to become a foster caregiver of a child is subject and in regards to which a public children services agency determined that abuse or neglect did not occur; (b) Information or reports the dissemination of which is prohibited by, or interferes with eligibility under, the "Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act," 88 Stat. 4 (1974), 42 U.S.C. 5101 et seq., as amended; (c) The name of the person who or entity that made, or participated in the making of, the report of abuse or neglect. (C)(1) A foster home certification may be denied based on a summary report containing the information described under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, when considered within the totality of the circumstances. (2) A foster home certification shall not be denied solely based on a summary report containing the information described under division (B)(1)(b) or (c) of this section. (D) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code necessary for the implementation and execution of this section. Sec. 5103.30. The Ohio child welfare training program is hereby established in the department of children and youth as a statewide program. The program shall provide all of the following: (A) The training that section 3107.014 of the Revised Code requires an assessor to complete; (B) The preplacement training that sections 5103.031 and 5103.033 of the Revised Code require a prospective foster caregiver to complete; (C) The continuing training that sections 5103.032 and 5103.033 of the Revised Code require a foster caregiver to complete; (D) The training that section 5153.122 of the Revised Code requires a PCSA caseworker to complete; (E) The training that section 5153.123 of the Revised Code requires a PCSA caseworker supervisor to complete; (F) The training required under section 5101.1414 5180.4211 of the Revised Code for a case manager and supervisor. Sec. 5103.32. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Title IV-B" means Title IV-B of the "Social Security Act of 1967," 81 Stat. 821, 42 U.S.C. 620, as amended. (2) "Title IV-E" means Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501, 42 U.S.C. 670(1980). (3) "Title XX" has the same meaning as in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code. (B) For purposes of adequately funding the Ohio child welfare training program, the department of children and youth may use any of the following: (1) The federal financial participation funds withheld pursuant to division (E) of section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code in an amount determined by the department; (2) Funds available under Title XX, Title IV-B, and Title IV-E to pay for training costs; (3) Other available state or federal funds; (4) Funds that a person, including a foundation, makes available for the program. Sec. 5103.41. The department of job and family serviceschildren and youth, in consultation with the Ohio child welfare training program steering committee, shall designate training regions in the state. The department of children and youth, at times it selects, shall review the composition of the training regions. The committee, at times it selects, shall also review the training regions' composition and provide the department recommendations on changes. The department of children and youth may change the composition of the training regions as the department considers necessary. The department may make a grant to a public children services agency that establishes and maintains a regional training center under this section for the purpose of wholly or partially subsidizing the operation of the center. The department shall specify in the grant all of the center's duties, including the duties specified in section 5103.42 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5104.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Administrator" means the person responsible for the daily operation of a center, type A home, or approved child day camp. The administrator and the owner may be the same person. (B) "Approved child day camp" means a child day camp approved pursuant to section 5104.22 of the Revised Code. (C) "Authorized representative" means an individual employed by a center, type A home, or approved child day camp that is owned by a person other than an individual and who is authorized by the owner to do all of the following: (1) Communicate on the owner's behalf; (2) Submit on the owner's behalf applications for licensure or approval; (3) Enter into on the owner's behalf provider agreements for publicly funded child care. (D) "Border state child care provider" means a child care provider that is located in a state bordering Ohio and that is licensed, certified, or otherwise approved by that state to provide child care funded by the child care block grant act. (E) "Career pathways model" means an alternative pathway to meeting the requirements to be a child care staff member or administrator that does both of the following: (1) Uses a framework approved by the director of children and youth to document formal education, training, experience, and specialized credentials and certifications; (2) Allows the child care staff member or administrator to achieve a designation as an early childhood professional level one, two, three, four, five, or six. (F) "Caretaker parent" means the father or mother of a child whose presence in the home is needed as the caretaker of the child, a person who has legal custody of a child and whose presence in the home is needed as the caretaker of the child, a guardian of a child whose presence in the home is needed as the caretaker of the child, and any other person who stands in loco parentis with respect to the child and whose presence in the home is needed as the caretaker of the child. (G) "Chartered nonpublic school" means a school that meets standards for nonpublic schools prescribed by the director of education and workforce for nonpublic schools pursuant to section 3301.07 of the Revised Code. (H) "Child" includes an infant, toddler, preschool-age child, or school-age child. (I) "Child care block grant act" means the "Child Care and Development Block Grant Act of 2014," 128 Stat. 1971 (2014), 42 U.S.C. 9858, as amended. (J) "Child day camp" means a program in which only school-age children attend or participate, that operates for no more than twelve hours per day and no more than fifteen weeks during the summer. For purposes of this division, the maximum twelve hours of operation time does not include transportation time from a child's home to a child day camp and from a child day camp to a child's home. (K) "Child care" means all of the following: (1) Administering to the needs of infants, toddlers, preschool-age children, and school-age children outside of school hours; (2) By persons other than their parents, guardians, or custodians; (3) For part of the twenty-four-hour day; (4) In a place other than a child's own home, except that an in-home aide provides child care in the child's own home; (5) By a provider required by this chapter to be licensed or approved by the department of children and youth, certified by a county department of job and family services, or under contract with the department to provide publicly funded child care as described in section 5104.32 of the Revised Code. (L) "Child care center" and "center" mean any place that is not the permanent residence of the licensee or administrator in which child care or publicly funded child care is provided for seven or more children at one time. "Child care center" and "center" do not include any of the following: (1) A place located in and operated by a hospital, as defined in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code, in which the needs of children are administered to, if all the children whose needs are being administered to are monitored under the on-site supervision of a physician licensed under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code or a registered nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code, and the services are provided only for children who, in the opinion of the child's parent, guardian, or custodian, are exhibiting symptoms of a communicable disease or other illness or are injured; (2) A child day camp; (3) A place that provides care, if all of the following apply: (a) An organized religious body provides the care; (b) A parent, custodian, or guardian of at least one child receiving care is on the premises and readily accessible at all times; (c) The care is not provided for more than thirty days a year; (d) The care is provided only for preschool-age and school-age children. (M) "Child care resource and referral service organization" means a community-based nonprofit organization that provides child care resource and referral services but not child care. (N) "Child care resource and referral services" means all of the following services: (1) Maintenance of a uniform data base of all child care providers in the community that are in compliance with this chapter, including current occupancy and vacancy data; (2) Provision of individualized consumer education to families seeking child care; (3) Provision of timely referrals of available child care providers to families seeking child care; (4) Recruitment of child care providers; (5) Assistance in developing, conducting, and disseminating training for child care professionals and provision of technical assistance to current and potential child care providers, employers, and the community; (6) Collection and analysis of data on the supply of and demand for child care in the community; (7) Technical assistance concerning locally, state, and federally funded child care and early childhood education programs; (8) Stimulation of employer involvement in making child care more affordable, more available, safer, and of higher quality for their employees and for the community; (9) Provision of written educational materials to caretaker parents and informational resources to child care providers; (10) Coordination of services among child care resource and referral service organizations to assist in developing and maintaining a statewide system of child care resource and referral services if required by the department of children and youth; (11) Cooperation with the county department of job and family services in encouraging the establishment of parent cooperative child care centers and parent cooperative type A family child care homes. (O) "Child care staff member" means an employee of a child care center, type A family child care home, licensed type B family child care home, or approved child day camp who is primarily responsible for the care and supervision of children. The administrator, authorized representative, or owner may be a child care staff member when not involved in other duties. (P) "Drop-in child care center," "drop-in center," "drop-in type A family child care home," and "drop-in type A home" mean a center or type A home that provides child care or publicly funded child care for children on a temporary, irregular basis. (Q) "Early learning and development program" has the same meaning as "licensed child care program." (R) "Employee" means a person who either: (1) Receives compensation for duties performed in a child care center, type A family child care home, licensed type B family child care home, or approved child day camp; (2) Is assigned specific working hours or duties in a child care center, type A family child care home, licensed type B family child care home, or approved child day camp. (R)(S) "Employer" means a person, firm, institution, organization, or agency that operates a child care center, type A family child care home, licensed type B family child care home, or approved child day camp subject to licensure or approval under this chapter. (S)(T) "Federal poverty line" means the official poverty guideline as revised annually in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981," 95 Stat. 511, 42 U.S.C. 9902, as amended, for a family size equal to the size of the family of the person whose income is being determined. (T)(U) "Head start program" means a school-readiness program that satisfies all of the following: (1) Is for children from birth to age five who are from low-income families; (2) Receives funds distributed under the "Improving Head Start for School-Readiness Act of 2007," 42 U.S.C. 9831, as amended; (3) Is licensed as a child care program. (U)(V) "Home education" has the same meaning as in section 3321.042 of the Revised Code. (V)(W) "Home education learning pod" means a voluntary association of parents who direct their children's education through home education and includes the following characteristics: (1) The parents choose to group their children together in a home or other location at various times, which may include hours when home education is not provided. (2) The pod includes only the parents' children who are receiving home education, except that it also may include siblings of those children, or other children who are under the care of the parents, regardless of age. (3) At least one parent of any of the children participating in the pod must be on the premises while the pod is meeting. (W)(X) "Homeless child care" means child care provided to a child who satisfies any of the following: (1) Is homeless as defined in 42 U.S.C. 11302; (2) Is a homeless child or youth as defined in 42 U.S.C. 11434a; (3) Resides temporarily with a caretaker in a facility providing emergency shelter for homeless families or is determined by a county department of job and family services to be homeless. (X)(Y) "Income" means gross income, as defined in section 5107.10 of the Revised Code, less any amounts required by federal statutes or regulations to be disregarded. (Y)(Z) "Indicator checklist" means an inspection tool, used in conjunction with an instrument-based program monitoring information system, that contains selected licensing requirements that are statistically reliable indicators or predictors of a child care center's, type A family child care home's, or licensed type B family child care home's compliance with licensing requirements. (Z)(AA) "Infant" means a child who is less than eighteen months of age. (AA)(BB) "In-home aide" means a person who does not reside with the child but provides care in the child's home and is certified by a county director of job and family services pursuant to section 5104.12 of the Revised Code to provide publicly funded child care to a child in a child's own home pursuant to this chapter and any rules adopted under it. (BB)(CC) "Instrument-based program monitoring information system" means a method to assess compliance with licensing requirements for child care centers, type A family child care homes, and licensed type B family child care homes in which each licensing requirement is assigned a weight indicative of the relative importance of the requirement to the health, growth, and safety of the children that is used to develop an indicator checklist. (CC)(DD) "License capacity" means the maximum number in each age category of children who may be cared for in a child care center, type A family child care home, or licensed type B family child care home at one time as determined by the director of children and youth considering building occupancy limits established by the department of commerce, amount of available indoor floor space and outdoor play space, and amount of available play equipment, materials, and supplies. (DD)(EE) "Licensed child care program" means any of the following: (1) A child care center licensed by the department of children and youth pursuant to this chapter; (2) A type A family child care home or type B family child care home licensed by the department of children and youth pursuant to this chapter; (3) A licensed preschool program or licensed school child program. (EE)(FF) "Licensed preschool program" or "licensed school child program" means a preschool program or school child program, as defined in section 3301.52 of the Revised Code, that is licensed by the department of children and youth pursuant to sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code. (FF)(GG) "Licensed type B family child care home" and "licensed type B home" mean a type B family child care home for which there is a valid license issued by the director of children and youth pursuant to section 5104.03 of the Revised Code. (GG)(HH) "Licensee" means the owner of a child care center, type A family child care home, or type B family child care home that is licensed pursuant to this chapter and who is responsible for ensuring compliance with this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. (HH)(II) "Operate a child day camp" means to operate, establish, manage, conduct, or maintain a child day camp. (II)(JJ) "Owner" includes a person, as defined in section 1.59 of the Revised Code, or government entity. (JJ)(KK) "Parent cooperative child care center," "parent cooperative center," "parent cooperative type A family child care home," and "parent cooperative type A home" mean a corporation or association organized for providing educational services to the children of members of the corporation or association, without gain to the corporation or association as an entity, in which the services of the corporation or association are provided only to children of the members of the corporation or association, ownership and control of the corporation or association rests solely with the members of the corporation or association, and at least one parent-member of the corporation or association is on the premises of the center or type A home during its hours of operation. (KK)(LL) "Part-time child care center," "part-time center," "part-time type A family child care home," and "part-time type A home" mean a center or type A home that provides child care or publicly funded child care for not more than four hours a day for any child or not more than fifteen consecutive weeks per year, regardless of the number of hours per day. (LL)(MM) "Place of worship" means a building where activities of an organized religious group are conducted and includes the grounds and any other buildings on the grounds used for such activities. (MM)(NN) "Preschool-age child" means a child who is three years old or older but is not a school-age child. (NN)(OO) "Protective child care" means publicly funded child care for the direct care and protection of a child to whom all of the following apply: (1) A case plan has been prepared and maintained for the child pursuant to section 2151.412 of the Revised Code. (2) The case plan indicates a need for protective care. (3) The child resides with a parent, stepparent, guardian, or another person who stands in loco parentis as defined in rules adopted under section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. (OO)(PP) "Publicly funded child care" means administering to the needs of infants, toddlers, preschool-age children, and school-age children under age thirteen during any part of the twenty-four-hour day by persons other than their caretaker parents for remuneration wholly or in part with federal or state funds, including funds available under the child care block grant act, Title IV-A, and Title XX, distributed by the department of children and youth. (PP)(QQ) "Religious activities" means any of the following: worship or other religious services; religious instruction; Sunday school classes or other religious classes conducted during or prior to worship or other religious services; youth or adult fellowship activities; choir or other musical group practices or programs; meals; festivals; or meetings conducted by an organized religious group. (QQ)(RR) "School-age child" means a child who is enrolled in or is eligible to be enrolled in a grade of kindergarten or above but is less than fifteen years old or, in the case of a child who is receiving special needs child care, is less than eighteen years old. (RR)(SS) "Serious risk noncompliance" means a licensure or certification rule violation that leads to a great risk of harm to, or death of, a child, and is observable, not inferable. (SS)(TT) "Special needs child care" means child care provided to a child who is less than eighteen years of age and either has one or more chronic health conditions or does not meet age appropriate expectations in one or more areas of development, including social, emotional, cognitive, communicative, perceptual, motor, physical, and behavioral development and that may include on a regular basis such services, adaptations, modifications, or adjustments needed to assist in the child's function or development. (TT)(UU) "Title IV-A" means Title IV-A of the "Social Security Act," 110 Stat. 2113 (1996), 42 U.S.C. 601, as amended. (UU)(VV) "Title XX" means Title XX of the "Social Security Act," 88 Stat. 2337 (1974), 42 U.S.C. 1397, as amended. (VV)(WW) "Toddler" means a child who is at least eighteen months of age but less than three years of age. (WW)(XX) "Type A family child care home" and "type A home" mean the permanent residence of the administrator in which child care or publicly funded child care is provided for seven eight to twelve fourteen children at one time or a permanent residence of the administrator in which child care is provided for four to twelve fourteen children at one time if four or more children at one time are under two years of age, provided that if the number of children under the age of two years at one time is greater than three or the total number of children at one time is greater than seven, an additional adult shall be present. In counting children for the purposes of this division, any children under six years of age who are related to a licensee, administrator, or employee and who are on the premises of the type A home shall be counted. "Type A family child care home" and "type A home" do not include any child day camp. (XX)(YY) "Type B family child care home" and "type B home" mean a permanent residence of the provider in which care is provided for one to six seven children at one time and in which no more than three children are under two years of age at one time. In counting children for the purposes of this division, any children under six years of age who are related to the provider and who are on the premises of the type B home shall be counted. "Type B family child care home" and "type B home" do not include any child day camp. Sec. 5104.12. (A)(1) A county director of job and family services may certify in-home aides to provide publicly funded child care pursuant to this chapter and any rules adopted under it. Any in-home aide who receives a certificate pursuant to this section to provide publicly funded child care is an independent contractor and is not an employee of the county department of job and family services that issues the certificate. (2) Every person desiring to receive certification as an in-home aide shall apply for certification to a county director of job and family services on such forms as the director of children and youth prescribes. A county director shall provide at no charge to each applicant a copy of rules for certifying in-home aides adopted pursuant to this chapter. (B) To be eligible for certification as an in-home aide, a person shall not be either of the following: (1) The owner of a center or home whose license was revoked pursuant to section 5104.04 of the Revised Code within the previous five years; (2) An in-home aide whose certificate was revoked under division (C)(2) of this section within the previous five years. (C)(1) If the county director of job and family services determines that the applicant complies with this chapter and any rules adopted under it, the county director shall certify the person as an in-home aide and issue the person a certificate to provide publicly funded child care for twenty-four months. The county director shall furnish a copy of the certificate to the parent, custodian, or guardian. The certificate shall state the name and address of the in-home aide, the expiration date of the certification, and the name and telephone number of the county director who issued the certificate. (2) The county director may revoke the certificate in either of the following circumstances: (a) The county director determines, pursuant to rules adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, that revocation is necessary; (b) The in-home aide does not comply with division (C)(2) of section 5104.32 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) The county director of job and family services shall inspect every home of a child who is receiving publicly funded child care in the child's own home while the in-home aide is providing the services. Inspections may be unannounced. Upon receipt of a complaint, the county director shall investigate the in-home aide, shall investigate the home of a child who is receiving publicly funded child care in the child's own home, and division (D)(2) of this section applies regarding the complaint. The caretaker parent shall permit the county director to inspect any part of the child's home. The county director shall prepare a written inspection report and furnish one copy each to the in-home aide and the caretaker parent within a reasonable time after the inspection. (2) Upon receipt of a complaint as described in division (D)(1) of this section, in addition to the investigations that are required under that division, both of the following apply: (a) If the complaint alleges that a child suffered physical harm while receiving publicly funded child care in the child's own home from an in-home aide or that the noncompliance with law or act alleged in the complaint involved, resulted in, or poses a substantial risk of physical harm to a child receiving publicly funded child care in the child's own home from an in-home aide, the county director shall inspect the home of the child. (b) If division (D)(2)(a) of this section does not apply regarding the complaint, the county director may inspect the home of the child. (3) Division (D)(2) of this section does not limit, restrict, or negate any duty of the county director to inspect a home of a child who is receiving publicly funded child care from an in-home aide that otherwise is imposed under this section, or any authority of the county director to inspect such a home that otherwise is granted under this section when the county director believes the inspection is necessary and it is permitted under the grant. Sec. 5104.29. (A) As used in this section, "early learning and development program" has the same meaning as "licensed child care program" as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby created in the department of children and youth the step up to quality program, under which the department of children and youth, in cooperation with the department of education and workforce, shall develop a tiered quality rating and improvement system for all early learning and development programs in this state. The step up to quality program shall include all of the following components: (1) Quality program standards for early learning and development programs; (2) Accountability measures that include tiered ratings representing each program's level of quality; (3) Program and provider outreach and support to help programs meet higher standards and promote participation in the step up to quality program; (4) Financial incentives for early learning and development programs that provide publicly funded child care and are linked to achieving and maintaining quality standards; (5) Parent and consumer education to help parents learn about program quality and ratings so they can make informed choices on behalf of their children. (C)(B) The step up to quality program shall have the following goals: (1) Increasing the number of low-income children, special needs children, and children with limited English proficiency participating in quality early learning and development programs; (2) Providing families with an easy-to-use tool for evaluating the quality of early learning and development programs; (3) Recognizing and supporting early learning and development programs that achieve higher levels of quality; (4) Providing incentives and supports to help early learning and development programs implement continuous quality improvement systems. (D)(C) Under the step up to quality program, participating early learning and development programs may be eligible for grants, technical assistance, training, and other assistance. Programs that maintain a quality rating may be eligible for unrestricted monetary awards. (E)(D) The tiered ratings developed pursuant to this section shall be based on an early learning and development program's performance in meeting program standards in the following four domains: (1) Learning and development; (2) Administration and leadership practices; (3) Staff quality and professional development; (4) Family and community partnerships. The ratings developed under this section shall not take into consideration whether an administrator or employee of an early learning and development program holds or obtains a bachelor's, master's, or doctoral degree. (F)(E) The director of children and youth, in collaboration with the director of education and workforce, shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement the step up to quality program described in this section. Sec. 5104.30. (A) The department of children and youth is hereby designated as the state agency responsible for administration and coordination of federal and state funding for publicly funded child care in this state. Publicly funded child care shall be provided to the following: (1) Recipients of transitional child care as provided under section 5104.34 of the Revised Code; (2) Participants in the Ohio works first program established under Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code; (3) Individuals who would be participating in the Ohio works first program if not for a sanction under section 5107.16 of the Revised Code and who continue to participate in a work activity, developmental activity, or alternative work activity pursuant to an assignment under section 5107.42 of the Revised Code; (4) A family receiving publicly funded child care on October 1, 1997, until the family's income reaches one hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty line; (5) Subject to available funds, other individuals determined eligible in accordance with rules adopted under section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. The department shall apply to the United States department of health and human services for authority to operate a coordinated program for publicly funded child care, if the director of children and youth determines that the application is necessary. For purposes of this section, the department of children and youth may enter into agreements with other state agencies that are involved in regulation or funding of child care. The department shall consider the special needs of migrant workers when it administers and coordinates publicly funded child care and shall develop appropriate procedures for accommodating the needs of migrant workers for publicly funded child care. (B) The department of children and youth shall distribute state and federal funds for publicly funded child care, including appropriations of state funds for publicly funded child care and appropriations of federal funds available under the child care block grant act, Title IV-A, and Title XX. The department may use any state funds appropriated for publicly funded child care as the state share required to match any federal funds appropriated for publicly funded child care. (C) In the use of federal funds available under the child care block grant act, all of the following apply: (1) The department may use the federal funds to hire staff to prepare any rules required under this chapter and to administer and coordinate federal and state funding for publicly funded child care. (2) Not more than five per cent of the aggregate amount of the federal funds received for a fiscal year may be expended for administrative costs. (3) The department shall allocate and use at least four per cent of the federal funds for the following: (a) Activities designed to provide comprehensive consumer education to parents and the public; (b) Activities that increase parental choice; (c) Activities, including child care resource and referral services, designed to improve the quality, and increase the supply, of child care; (d) Establishing the step up to quality program pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code. (4) The department shall ensure that the federal funds will be used only to supplement, and will not be used to supplant, federal, state, and local funds available on the effective date of the child care block grant act for publicly funded child care and related programs. If authorized by rules adopted by the department pursuant to section 5104.42 of the Revised Code, county departments of job and family services may purchase child care from funds obtained through any other means. (D) The department shall encourage the development of suitable child care throughout the state, especially in areas with high concentrations of recipients of public assistance and families with low incomes. The department shall encourage the development of suitable child care designed to accommodate the special needs of migrant workers. On request, the department, through its employees or contracts with state or community child care resource and referral service organizations, shall provide consultation to groups and individuals interested in developing child care. The department of children and youth may enter into interagency agreements with the department of education and workforce, the chancellor of higher education, the department of development, and other state agencies and entities whenever the cooperative efforts of the other state agencies and entities are necessary for the department of children and youth to fulfill its duties and responsibilities under this chapter. The department shall develop and maintain a registry of persons providing child care. The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing procedures and requirements for the registry's administration. (E)(1) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing both of the following: (a) Reimbursement Payment rates for providers of publicly funded child care not later than the first day of July in each odd-numbered year; (b) A procedure for reimbursing and paying providers of publicly funded child care. (2) In establishing reimbursement payment rates under division (E)(1)(a) of this section, the director shall do all of the following: (a) Use the information obtained from the market rate survey developed and conducted in accordance with 45 C.F.R. 98.45; (b) Establish an enhanced reimbursement payment rate for providers who provide child care for enroll children whose caretaker parents who work nontraditional hours; (c) With regard to the step up to quality program established pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code, establish enhanced reimbursement payment rates for child care providers that participate in the program. (3) In establishing reimbursement payment rates under division (E)(1)(a) of this section, the director may establish different reimbursement payment rates based on any of the following: (a) Geographic location of the provider; (b) Type of care provided; (c) Age of the child served; (d) Special needs of the child served; (e) Whether the expanded hours of service are provided; (f) Whether weekend service is provided; (g) Whether the provider has exceeded the minimum requirements of state statutes and rules governing child care; (h) Any other factors the director considers appropriate. Sec. 5104.302. In addition to establishing payment rates for publicly funded child care providers in each odd-numbered year, as required by section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, the director of children and youth may contract with a third-party entity to analyze information regarding the prices charged for child care for the subsequent even-numbered year. Sec. 5104.32. (A) All purchases of publicly funded child care shall be made under a contract entered into by a licensed child care center, licensed type A family child care home, licensed type B family child care home, certified in-home aide, approved child day camp, licensed preschool program, licensed school child program, or border state child care provider and the department of children and youth. All contracts for publicly funded child care shall be contingent upon the availability of state and federal funds. The department shall prescribe a standard form to be used for all contracts for the purchase of publicly funded child care, regardless of the source of public funds used to purchase the child care. To the extent permitted by federal law and notwithstanding any other provision of the Revised Code that regulates state contracts or contracts involving the expenditure of state or federal funds, all contracts for publicly funded child care shall be entered into in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and are exempt from any other provision of the Revised Code that regulates state contracts or contracts involving the expenditure of state or federal funds. (B) Each contract for publicly funded child care shall specify at least the following: (1) That the provider of publicly funded child care agrees to be paid for rendering services at the lower of the rate customarily charged by the provider for children enrolled for child care or the reimbursement rate of payment established pursuant to section 5104.30 of the Revised Code; (2) That, if a provider provides child care to an individual potentially eligible for publicly funded child care who is subsequently determined to be eligible, the department agrees to pay for all child care provided between the date the county department of job and family services receives the individual's completed application and the date the individual's eligibility is determined; (3) Whether the county department of job and family services, the provider, or a child care resource and referral service organization will make eligibility determinations, whether the provider or a child care resource and referral service organization will be required to collect information to be used by the county department to make eligibility determinations, and the time period within which the provider or child care resource and referral service organization is required to complete required eligibility determinations or to transmit to the county department any information collected for the purpose of making eligibility determinations; (4)(3) That the provider, other than a border state child care provider, shall continue to be licensed, approved, or certified pursuant to this chapter and shall comply with all standards and other requirements in this chapter and in rules adopted pursuant to this chapter for maintaining the provider's license, approval, or certification; (5)(4) That, in the case of a border state child care provider, the provider shall continue to be licensed, certified, or otherwise approved by the state in which the provider is located and shall comply with all standards and other requirements established by that state for maintaining the provider's license, certificate, or other approval; (6) (5) Whether the provider will be paid by the department of children and youth or in some other manner as prescribed by rules adopted under section 5104.42 of the Revised Code; (7) (6) That the contract is subject to the availability of state and federal funds. (C)(1) The department shall establish an automated child care system to track child attendance and enrollment and calculate payments for publicly funded child care. Not later than July 5, 2026, and thereafter, the department shall calculate payments for publicly funded child care based on a child's enrollment, as described in 45 C.F.R. 98.45(m), rather than on a child's attendance. (2) Each eligible provider that provides publicly funded child care shall participate in the automated child care system. A provider participating in the system shall not do any of the following: (a) Use or have possession of a personal identification number or password issued to a caretaker parent under the automated child care system; (b) Falsify child attendance or enrollment records; (c) Knowingly seek or accept payment for publicly funded child care that was not provided for a child not enrolled with the provider or for which the provider was not eligible; (d) Knowingly seek or accept payment for child care provided to for a child who resides in the provider's own home. (D) The department may withhold any money due under this chapter and may recover through any appropriate method any money erroneously paid under this chapter if evidence demonstrates that a provider of publicly funded child care failed to comply with either of the following: (1) The terms of the contract entered into under this section; (2) This chapter or any rules adopted under it. (E) If the department has evidence that a provider has employed an individual who is ineligible for employment under section 5104.013 of the Revised Code and the provider has not released the individual from employment upon notice that the individual is ineligible, the department may terminate immediately the contract entered into under this section to provide publicly funded child care. (F) Any decision by the department concerning publicly funded child care, including the recovery of funds, overpayment determinations, and contract terminations is final and is not subject to appeal, hearing, or further review under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5104.34. (A)(1) Each county department of job and family services shall implement procedures for making determinations of eligibility for publicly funded child care. Under those procedures, the eligibility determination for each applicant shall be made no later than thirty calendar days from the date the county department receives a completed application for publicly funded child care. Each applicant shall be notified promptly of the results of the eligibility determination. An applicant aggrieved by a decision or delay in making an eligibility determination may appeal the decision or delay to the department of children and youth in accordance with section 5101.35 of the Revised Code. The due process rights of applicants shall be protected. To the extent permitted by federal law, the county department may make all determinations of eligibility for publicly funded child care, may contract with child care providers or child care resource and referral service organizations for the providers or resource and referral service organizations to make all or any part of the determinations, and may contract with child care providers or child care resource and referral service organizations for the providers or resource and referral service organizations to collect specified information for use by the county department in making determinations. If a county department contracts with a child care provider or a child care resource and referral service organization for eligibility determinations or for the collection of information, the contract shall require the provider or resource and referral service organization to make each eligibility determination no later than thirty calendar days from the date the provider or resource and referral organization receives a completed application that is the basis of the determination and to collect and transmit all necessary information to the county department within a period of time that enables the county department to make each eligibility determination no later than thirty days after the filing of the application that is the basis of the determination. The county department may station employees of the department in various locations throughout the county to collect information relevant to applications for publicly funded child care and to make eligibility determinations. The county department, child care provider, and child care resource and referral service organization shall make each determination of eligibility for publicly funded child care no later than thirty days after the filing of the application that is the basis of the determination, shall make each determination in accordance with any relevant rules adopted pursuant to section 5104.38 of the Revised Code, and shall notify promptly each applicant for publicly funded child care of the results of the determination of the applicant's eligibility. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for monitoring the eligibility determination process. In accordance with those rules, the state department shall monitor eligibility determinations made by county departments of job and family services and shall direct any entity that is not in compliance with this division or any rule adopted under this division to implement corrective action specified by the department. (2)(a) All eligibility determinations for publicly funded child care shall be made in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (A) of section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this section, all of the following apply: (i) Publicly funded child care may be provided only to eligible infants, toddlers, preschool-age children, school-age children under age thirteen, or children receiving special needs child care. (ii) For an applicant to be eligible for publicly funded child care, the caretaker parent must be employed or participating in a program of education or training for an amount of time reasonably related to the time that the parent's children are receiving publicly funded child care. This restriction does not apply to families whose children are eligible for protective child care. (iii) The eligibility period for publicly funded child care shall be at least twelve months. (b) In accordance with rules adopted under division (B) of section 5104.38 of the Revised Code, an applicant may receive publicly funded child care while the county department determines eligibility. An applicant may receive publicly funded child care while a county department determines eligibility only once during a twelve-month period. If the county department determines that an applicant is not eligible for publicly funded child care, the child care provider shall be paid for providing publicly funded child care for up to five days after that determination if the county department received a completed application with all required documentation. A program may appeal a denial of payment under this division. (c) If a caretaker parent who has been determined eligible to receive publicly funded child care no longer meets the requirements of division (A)(2)(a)(ii) of this section, the caretaker parent may continue to receive publicly funded child care for a period of at least three but not more than four months not to extend beyond the caretaker parent's eligibility period. (d)(c) If a child turns thirteen, or if a child receiving special needs child care turns eighteen, during the eligibility period, the caretaker parent may continue to receive publicly funded child care until the end of that eligibility period. Subject to available funds, the department of children and youth shall allow a family to receive publicly funded child care unless the family's income exceeds the maximum income eligibility limit. Initial and continued eligibility for publicly funded child care is subject to available funds unless the family is receiving child care pursuant to division (A)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 5104.30 of the Revised Code. If the department must limit eligibility due to lack of available funds, it shall give first priority for publicly funded child care to an assistance group whose income is not more than the maximum income eligibility limit that received transitional child care in the previous month but is no longer eligible because the eligibility period has expired. Such an assistance group shall continue to receive priority for publicly funded child care until its income exceeds the maximum income eligibility limit. (3) An assistance group that ceases to participate in the Ohio works first program established under Chapter 5107. of the Revised Code is eligible for transitional child care at any time during the immediately following twelve-month period that both of the following apply: (a) The assistance group requires child care due to employment; (b) The assistance group's income is not more than one hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty line. An assistance group ineligible to participate in the Ohio works first program pursuant to section 5101.83 or section 5107.16 of the Revised Code is not eligible for transitional child care. (B) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department of children and youth may require a caretaker parent determined to be eligible for publicly funded child care to pay a fee according to the schedule of fees established in rules adopted under section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. The department shall make protective child care services and homeless child care services available to children without regard to the income or assets of the caretaker parent of the child. (C) A caretaker parent receiving publicly funded child care shall report to the entity that determined eligibility any changes in status with respect to employment or participation in a program of education or training not later than ten calendar days after the change occurs. (D) If the department of children and youth determines that available resources are not sufficient to provide publicly funded child care to all eligible families who request it, the department may establish a waiting list. The department may establish separate waiting lists within the waiting list based on income. (E) A caretaker parent shall not receive publicly funded child care from more than one child care provider per child during a week, unless a county department grants the family an exemption for one of the following reasons: (1) The child needs additional care during non-traditional hours; (2) The child needs to change providers in the middle of the week and the hours of care provided by the providers do not overlap; (3) The child's provider is closed on scheduled school days off or on calamity days. (F) As used in this section, "maximum income eligibility limit" means the amount of income specified in rules adopted under division (A) of section 5104.38 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5104.36. The licensee or administrator of a child care center, type A family child care home, or licensed type B family child care home, an in-home aide providing child care services, the director or administrator of an approved child day camp, and a border state child care provider shall keep a record for each eligible child enrolled with the center, home, in-home aide, camp, or provider, to be made available to the county department of job and family services or the department of children and youth on request. The record shall include all of the following: (A) The name and date of birth of the child; (B) The name and address of the child's caretaker parent; (C) The name and address of the caretaker parent's place of employment or program of education or training; (D) The hours for which the child has been enrolled with the center, home, in-home aide, camp, or provider and the hours for which child care services have been provided for the child; (E) Any other information required by the county department of job and family services or the department of children and youth. Sec. 5104.37. (A) In addition to the duties described in division (D) of section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, the director of job and family services children and youth shall engage in activities to do the following: (1) Encourage the establishment and licensure of family day-care child care homes in this state, especially in areas with the greatest need for child care; (2) Connect families and caretaker parents in need of child care with family day-care child care homes not meeting the license capacity specified on their licenses, as described in division (E) of section 5104.03 of the Revised Code. (B) The director may contract with one or more third-party entities to assist the director in performing the duties described in division (A) of this section. (C) Not later than May 30, 2023, and periodically thereafter, the director shall submit to the general assembly a report documenting any barriers that may prevent the establishment or licensure of family day-care child care homes. The director shall submit the required report in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5104.38. In addition to any other rules adopted under this chapter, the director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing financial and administrative requirements for publicly funded child care and establishing all of the following: (A) Procedures and criteria to be used in making determinations of eligibility for publicly funded child care that give priority to children of families with lower incomes and procedures and criteria for eligibility for publicly funded protective child care or homeless child care. The rules shall specify the maximum amount of income a family may have for initial and continued eligibility. The maximum amount shall not exceed three hundred per cent of the federal poverty line. The rules may specify exceptions to the eligibility requirements in the case of a family that previously received publicly funded child care and is seeking to have the child care reinstated after the family's eligibility was terminated. (B) Procedures under which an applicant for publicly funded child care may receive publicly funded child care while the county department of job and family services determines eligibility and under which a child care provider may appeal a denial of payment under division (A)(2)(b) of section 5104.34 of the Revised Code; (C) A schedule of fees requiring all eligible caretaker parents to pay a fee for publicly funded child care according to income and family size, which shall be uniform for all types of publicly funded child care, except as authorized by rule, and, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall permit the use of state and federal funds to pay the customary deposits and other advance payments that a provider charges all children who receive child care from that provider. (D)(C) A formula for determining the amount of state and federal funds appropriated for publicly funded child care that may be allocated to a county department to use for administrative purposes; (E)(D) Procedures to be followed by the department and county departments in recruiting individuals and groups to become providers of child care; (F)(E) Procedures to be followed in establishing state or local programs designed to assist individuals who are eligible for publicly funded child care in identifying the resources available to them and to refer the individuals to appropriate sources to obtain child care; (G)(F) Procedures to deal with fraud and abuse committed by either recipients or providers of publicly funded child care; (H)(G) Procedures for establishing a child care grant or loan program in accordance with the child care block grant act; (I)(H) Standards and procedures for applicants to apply for grants and loans, and for the department to make grants and loans; (J)(I) A definition of "person who stands in loco parentis" for the purposes of division (NN)(3)(OO)(3) of section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; (K)(J) Procedures for a county department of job and family services to follow in making eligibility determinations and redeterminations for publicly funded child care available through telephone, computer, and other means at locations other than the county department; (L)(K) If the director establishes a different reimbursement payment rate under division (E)(3)(d) of section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, standards and procedures for determining the amount of the higher payment that is to be issued to a child care provider based on the special needs of the child being served; (M)(L) To the extent permitted by federal law, procedures for enrolling and paying for up to thirty days of child care for a child whose caretaker parent is seeking employment, taking part in employment orientation activities, or taking part in activities in anticipation of enrolling in or attending an education or training program or activity, if the employment or the education or training program or activity is expected to begin within the thirty-day period; (N)(M) Any other rules necessary to carry out sections 5104.30 to 5104.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5104.41. A child and the child's caretaker who are otherwise ineligible for publicly funded child care are eligible for homeless child care for the lesser of the following: (A) Not more than ninety days; (B) The period of time they reside in a facility providing emergency shelter for homeless families or the period of time in which the county department determines they are homelesstwelve months. Sec. 5104.53. (A) As used in this section: (1) "IEP" has the same meaning as in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Resource caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (B) The early childhood education grant program is created in the department of children and youth. Subject to available funds, the program shall support and invest in early learning and development programs operating in this state by awarding grants to programs that meet the conditions of this section in an amount that corresponds to the number of eligible children served by the programs. (C) To be eligible for a grant under this section, an early learning and development program shall meet each of the following conditions: (1) The program is rated through the step up to quality program established under section 5104.29 of the Revised Code at the tiered rating specified by the department in rules adopted under this section. (2) The program provides early learning and development services to one or more preschool-age children described in division (D) of this section. (3) The program meets any other eligibility condition specified by the department in rules adopted under this section. (D) A preschool-age child who meets all of the following conditions, as determined by a county department of job and family services, is eligible to participate in the early childhood education grant program if a slot is available: (1) Either the amount of the child's family income does not exceed two hundred per cent of the federal poverty line or the child meets one of the following conditions: (a) An IEP has been developed for the child; (b) The child is placed with a resource caregiver as described in Chapter 5103. of the Revised Code, with such placement documented by either a family case plan or kinship permanency incentive payments; (c) The child is homeless as described in division (V) of section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (2) The child is a citizen of the United States or a qualified alien. (3) The child meets any other eligibility condition specified by the department in rules adopted under this section. (E) Any funds appropriated to the department for purposes of the early childhood education grant program shall be used as follows: (1) In each fiscal year, not more than two per cent of appropriated funds shall be used for program support and technical assistance. (2) Appropriated funds other than those described in division (E)(1) of this section shall be distributed to grant recipients. (F) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director shall adopt rules to implement this section and administer the early childhood education grant program, including rules addressing all of the following topics: (1) Eligibility conditions and other requirements for participation in the grant program by early learning and development programs, including the tiered rating at which a program becomes eligible to participate; (2) Eligibility conditions for children participating in the early childhood education grant program if a slot is available; (3) Standards, procedures, and requirements to apply for and distribute funds to participating early learning and development programs; (4) In the event funds are distributed in error under the program, methods by which the department may recover those funds. Sec. 5104.54. (A) The child care cred program is created in the department of children and youth, under which the costs of child care are shared by participating employees, their employers, and, subject to available funds, the department. The distribution of the costs shall be as follows: employees are responsible for forty per cent; employers are responsible for forty per cent; and, subject to available funds, the department is responsible for twenty per cent. The program has all of the following goals: enabling employers to attract and retain talent; assisting employees with child care costs; and sustaining the businesses of child care providers. (B) To be eligible to participate in the program, all of the following apply: (1) In the case of an employee, the maximum amount of the family's income shall not exceed four hundred per cent of the federal poverty line and the employee shall reside in this state and have been selected for participation by the employee's employer. (2) In the case of an employer, the employer shall be located in this state and have selected one or more of its employees to participate in the program. (3) In the case of a child care provider, the provider shall either hold a license issued under this chapter or be certified by a county department of job and family services under section 5104.12 of the Revised Code. The department shall not require participation in the step up to quality program in order to be an eligible provider for this program. (C) Each employee and employer seeking to participate in the program shall together submit an application to the department in a manner prescribed by the department. The department shall review each application as soon as practicable after it is received and shall determine if the employee and employer are both eligible to participate. (D) After an employee and employer are both determined eligible and agree to participate in the program, all of the following apply: (1) The employee, with the assistance of the department, shall select a child care provider for the employee's child and shall enroll the child with the provider. An employee may opt to select the employee's existing child care provider so long as that provider is licensed or certified as described in this section. (2) In addition to the employer's share, the employer may agree to contribute some or all of an employee's share of child care costs. (3) As a condition of participation, the department may require the employee, employer, and child care provider to each sign a memorandum of understanding with the department. (4) The department is responsible for coordinating and performing all administrative activities associated with the sharing of child care costs and making payments to child care providers. (E) An eligibility determination made under division (C) of this section remains valid as long as the employee, employer, and child care provider continue to satisfy the eligibility conditions described in division (B) of this section. (F) If the department finds that an employee or employer has committed fraud, misrepresentation, or deception in applying to participate, or in participating, in the program, the employee or employer is permanently ineligible to participate, or continue to participate, in the program. (G)(1) The department may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. Any rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (2) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under division (G)(1) of this section is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5104.60. The director of children and youth shall contract with a third-party entity to develop a registry information system to provide, on an ongoing basis, training and professional development opportunities to the employees of early learning and development programs that receive funding under the child care block grant act. The registry information system shall be known as the Ohio professional registry. In developing the registry information system, the third-party entity shall comply with requirements set forth in the child care block grant act and 45 C.F.R. Part 98. Sec. 5104.99. (A) Whoever violates section 5104.02 of the Revised Code shall be punished as follows: (1) For each offense, the offender shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars multiplied by the number of children receiving child care at the child care center or type A family child care home that either exceeds the number of children to which a type B family day-care child care home may provide child care or, if the offender is a licensed type A family child care home that is operating as a child care center without being licensed as a center, exceeds the license capacity of the type A home. (2) In addition to the fine specified in division (A)(1) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) Except as provided in divisions (A)(2)(b), (c), and (d) of this section, the court shall order the offender to reduce the number of children to which it provides child care to a number that does not exceed either the number of children to which a type B family child care home may provide child care or, if the offender is a licensed type A family child care home that is operating as a child care center without being licensed as a center, the license capacity of the type A home. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one violation of section 5104.02 of the Revised Code, the court shall order the offender to cease the provision of child care to any person until it obtains a child care center license or a type A family child care home license, as appropriate, under section 5104.03 of the Revised Code. (c) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two violations of section 5104.02 of the Revised Code, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, and the court shall order the offender to cease the provision of child care to any person until it obtains a child care center license or a type A family child care home license, as appropriate, under section 5104.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall impose the fine specified in division (A)(1) of this section and may impose an additional fine provided that the total amount of the fines so imposed does not exceed the maximum fine authorized for a misdemeanor of the first degree under section 2929.28 of the Revised Code. (d) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or more violations of section 5104.02 of the Revised Code, the offender is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree, and the court shall order the offender to cease the provision of child care to any person until it obtains a child care center license or a type A family child care home license, as appropriate, under section 5104.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall impose the fine specified in division (A)(1) of this section and may impose an additional fine provided that the total amount of the fines so imposed does not exceed the maximum fine authorized for a felony of the fifth degree under section 2929.18 of the Revised Code. (B) Whoever violates section 5104.09 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. Sec. 5117.07. (A) On or before the first day of October, the director of development shall review all applications submitted under division (C) of section 5117.03 of the Revised Code and shall determine the eligibility of each applicant to receive a credit or payment. The total income and current total income amounts set forth in division (A) of this section are subject to adjustment under section 5117.071 of the Revised Code. (1) An applicant is eligible for a credit of thirty per cent if the applicant is a head of household, has a total income of five thousand dollars or less or a current total income of two thousand five hundred dollars or less, owns and occupies or rents and occupies a household receiving the source of energy for its primary heating system from an energy company and such energy is separately metered, and is either of the following: (a) Sixty-five years of age or older; (b) Permanently and totally disabled. (2) An applicant is eligible for a credit of twenty-five per cent if the applicant is a head of household, has a total income of more than five thousand dollars but not more than nine thousand dollars or a current total income of more than two thousand five hundred dollars but not more than four thousand five hundred dollars, is sixty-five years of age or older or permanently and totally disabled, and owns and occupies or rents and occupies a household receiving the source of energy for its primary heating system from an energy company and such energy is separately metered. (3) An applicant is eligible for a payment if either of the following applies to the applicant: (a) The applicant would be eligible for the credit under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section but for the fact that the source of energy for the primary heating system of the applicant's household is not separately metered; (b) The applicant is a head of household, has a total income of no more than nine thousand dollars or a current total income of no more than four thousand five hundred dollars, is sixty-five years of age or older or permanently and totally disabled, and owns and occupies or rents and occupies a household receiving the source of energy for its primary heating system from an energy dealer. (4) In the case of a multiple unit dwelling for which separate metering for the source of energy for its primary heating system is not provided, more than one applicant occupying such dwelling may be determined eligible for a payment under division (A)(3)(a) of this section. (B) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section: (1) No head of household who resides in public housing or receives a rent subsidy from a government agency is eligible for a credit or payment unless the person's rent subsidy does not reflect the costs of that person's household receiving the source of energy for its primary heating system; (2) A resident of a nursing home, hospital, or other extended health care facility is not eligible for a credit or payment for the costs of providing the source of energy for the primary heating system of the facility. (C) The director shall establish a procedure whereby the director commissioner can verify total income and current total income for the calendar year in which an applicant is determined eligible for a payment or credit. If a person receives a credit or payment that the person is ineligible to receive under division (A) of this section as determined by the director, that person shall refund to the director the credit or payment, or excess portion of a credit or payment, that person received. The sum refunded shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the universal service electric partnership plan fund created in section 4928.51 of the Revised Code. (D) The director may request an additional certification of permanent and total disability for any applicant claiming such status on an application renewal form submitted under section 5117.03 of the Revised Code. Such certification shall be requested from the person or agency named on the form pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 5117.03 of the Revised Code. If such additional certification is refused due to a conclusion by the person or agency that the applicant is not permanently and totally disabled, the director shall determine the applicant ineligible for any credit or payment. If such additional certification is unavailable or refused for any other reason, the director may determine the applicant to be eligible for a credit or payment provided the director commissioner has good cause to believe the applicant is permanently and totally disabled. (E) On or before the first day of October, the director shall notify each applicant of the disposition of the applicant's application under divisions (A) and (B) of this section. At the same time, the director tax commissioner shall notify the applicant, regardless of whether the applicant's application is approved or disapproved, that the applicant may be eligible to participate in a state or federal weatherization program and should contact the applicant's community action agency for further information. If an application is disapproved, the applicant may appeal to the director for a hearing on the matter. A notice of disapproval shall include a detailed explanation of the applicant's right of appeal under this chapter. Any such appeal shall be on an appeal form prescribed by the director and shall be filed with the director within twenty days of the receipt of the notice of disapproval. Sec. 5117.12. (A) On or before the thirty-first day of August of each year, each energy company shall file a written report with the director of development regarding the impact, if any, of the requirements of division (E) of section 5117.11 of the Revised Code on the number of uncollectible and past due residential accounts for the twelve-month period ending on the preceding thirty-first day of July. The report shall include such information as is prescribed by the director. The information shall be based on actual reviews of residential customer accounts and shall be presented in verifiable form. The director may consult with the public utilities commission and the consumers' counsel in prescribing the contents of such reports and complying with the requirements of division (C)(4) of this section. (B) Before the thirty-first day of January of each year, the director shall prepare a written report including a final review of the Ohio energy credit program for which applications were required to be mailed or provided by the fifteenth day of June of the second preceding calendar year pursuant to section 5117.03 of the Revised Code and an interim review of the program for which applications were required to be mailed or provided by the fifteenth day of June of the preceding calendar year under such section. On or before the thirty-first day of January of each year, the director shall provide written copies of such report to the speaker of the house of representatives, president of the senate, minority leaders of the house of representatives and senate, chairpersons of the house finance and appropriations committee and senate finance committee, chairpersons of the committees of the house of representatives and senate customarily entrusted with matters concerning public utilities, clerk of the house of representatives, and clerk of the senate. (C) Each report prepared under division (B) of this section shall include a review of: (1) Program costs; (2) The number of persons receiving credits or payments under the program; (3) Progress in the implementation of any changes in the program made by the general assembly within the period covered by the report; (4) The impact, if any, of the requirements of division (E) of section 5117.11 of the Revised Code on the number of uncollectible and past due residential accounts of energy companies for the twelve-month period ending on the preceding thirty-first day of July; (5) The impact of any federal energy assistance programs available to the same groups of people as are eligible for the energy credit program under sections 5117.01 to 5117.12 of the Revised Code, together with any recommendations on modifications that may, because of the federal programs, be needed in the energy credit program; (6) Any suggestions for improving the program; (7) Any other matters considered appropriate by the director. (D) The director shall consult with the auditor of state, energy companies, energy dealers, department of aging, and commission on Hispanic-Latino affairs in the preparation of any report under this section. The director may require information from such agencies for the purpose of preparing such report. Sec. 5119.01. (A) As used in this chapter: (1) "Addiction" means the chronic and habitual use of alcoholic beverages, the use of a drug of abuse as defined in section 3719.011 of the Revised Code, or the use of gambling by an individual to the extent that the individual no longer can control the individual's use of alcohol, the individual becomes physically or psychologically dependent on the drug, the individual's use of alcohol or drugs endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the individual or others, or the individual's gambling causes psychological, financial, emotional, marital, legal, or other difficulties endangering the health, safety, or welfare of the individual or others. (2) "Addiction services" means services, including intervention, for the treatment of persons with alcohol, drug, or gambling addictions, and for the prevention of such addictions. (3) "Alcohol and drug addiction services" means services, including intervention, for the treatment of persons with alcohol use disorder or persons who abuse drugs of abuse and for the prevention of alcohol use disorder and drug addiction. (4) "Alcohol use disorder" means a medical condition characterized by an individual's impaired ability to stop or control the individual's alcohol use despite adverse social, occupational, or health consequences. An alcohol use disorder may be classified as mild, moderate, or severe. (5) "Certifiable services and supports" means all of the following: (a) Alcohol and drug addiction services; (b) Mental health services; (c) The types of recovery supports that are specified in rules adopted under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code as requiring certification under that section. (6) "Community addiction services provider" means an agency, association, corporation or other legal entity, individual, or program that provides one or more of the following: (a) Alcohol and drug addiction services that are certified by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code; (b) Gambling addiction services; (c) Recovery supports that are related to alcohol and drug addiction services or gambling addiction services and paid for with federal, state, or local funds administered by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services or a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. (7) "Community mental health services provider" means an agency, association, corporation, individual, or program that provides either of the following: (a) Mental health services that are certified by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code; (b) Recovery supports that are related to mental health services and paid for with federal, state, or local funds administered by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services or a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. (8) "Drug addiction" means the use of a drug of abuse, as defined in section 3719.011 of the Revised Code, by an individual to the extent that the individual becomes physically or psychologically dependent on the drug or endangers the health, safety, or welfare of the individual or others. (9) "Gambling addiction" means the use of gambling by an individual to the extent that it causes psychological, financial, emotional, marital, legal, or other difficulties endangering the health, safety, or welfare of the individual or others. (10) "Gambling addiction services" means services for the treatment of persons who have a gambling addiction and for the prevention of gambling addiction. (11) "Hospital" means a hospital or inpatient unit licensed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, and any institution, hospital, or other place established, controlled, or supervised by the department under this chapter. (12) "Included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports" means the addiction services and recovery supports that, pursuant to section 340.033 of the Revised Code, are included in the array of services and recovery supports for all levels of opioid and co-occurring drug addiction required to be included in the community-based continuum of care established under section 340.032 of the Revised Code. (13) "Medication-assisted treatment" has the same meaning as in section 340.01 of the Revised Code. (14) "Mental illness" means a substantial disorder of thought, mood, perception, orientation, or memory that grossly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to meet the ordinary demands of life. (15) "Mental health services" means services for the assessment, care, or treatment of persons who have a mental illness and for the prevention of mental illness. (16) "Opioid treatment program" has the same meaning as in 42 C.F.R. 8.2. (17) "Recovery housing residence" means a residence for individuals recovering from alcohol use disorder or drug addiction that provides an alcohol-free and drug-free living environment, peer support, assistance with obtaining alcohol and drug addiction services, and other recovery assistance for alcohol use disorder and drug addiction. (18) "Recovery supports" means assistance that is intended to help an individual with alcohol use disorder, drug addiction, or mental illness, or a member of such an individual's family, initiate and sustain the individual's recovery from alcohol use disorder, drug addiction, or mental illness. "Recovery supports" does not mean alcohol and drug addiction services or mental health services. (19)(a) "Residence," except when referring to a recovery housing residence or the meaning of "residence" in section 5119.90 of the Revised Code, means a person's physical presence in a county with intent to remain there, except in either of the following circumstances: (i) If a person is receiving a mental health treatment service at a facility that includes nighttime sleeping accommodations, "residence" means that county in which the person maintained the person's primary place of residence at the time the person entered the facility; (ii) If a person is committed pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code, "residence" means the county where the criminal charges were filed. (b) When the residence of a person is disputed, the matter of residence shall be referred to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services for investigation and determination. Residence shall not be a basis for a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to deny services to any person present in the board's service district, and the board shall provide services for a person whose residence is in dispute while residence is being determined and for a person in an emergency situation. (B) Any reference in this chapter to a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services also refers to an alcohol and drug addiction services board or a community mental health board in a service district in which an alcohol and drug addiction services board or a community mental health board has been established under section 340.021 or former section 340.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.011. (A) Whenever the term "department of mental health," the term "Ohio department of mental health," the term "department of alcohol and drug addiction services," or the term "Ohio department of alcohol and drug addiction services" "department of mental health and addiction services" is used, referred to, or designated in any statute, rule, contract, grant, or other document, the use, reference, or designation shall be construed to mean the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (B) Whenever the term "director of mental health" or the term "director of alcohol and drug addiction services" "director of mental health and addiction services" is used, referred to, or designated in any statute, rule, contract, grant, or other document, the use, reference, or designation shall be construed to mean the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Sec. 5119.04. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and any institutions under its supervision or jurisdiction shall, where applicable, be in substantial compliance with standards set forth for psychiatric facilities by the joint commission or medical assistance standards under Title XIX of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C. 301, as amended, or other applicable standards. The requirements of this section are in addition to any other requirements established by the Revised Code and nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any rights, privileges, protections, or immunities which may exist under the constitution and laws of the United States or this state. Sec. 5119.05. Subject to the rules of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, each institution under the jurisdiction of the department shall be under the management and control of a managing officer to be known as a chief executive officer or by another appropriate title. Such managing officer shall be appointed by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, and shall be in the unclassified service and serve at the pleasure of the director. Each managing officer shall be of good moral character and have skill, ability, and experience in the managing officer's profession. The managing officer, under the director, shall serve as the appointing authority of the institution to which such managing officer is appointed. Subject to civil service rules, the managing officer shall have the power to appoint and remove employees of the institution. On behalf of the institution, the managing officer has the authority and responsibility for entering into contracts and other agreements for the efficient operations of the institution. Sec. 5119.051. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall keep in its office a proper and complete set of books and accounts with each institution, which shall clearly show the nature and amount of every expenditure authorized and made at such institution, and which shall contain an account of all appropriations made by the general assembly and of all other funds, together with the disposition of such funds. The department shall prescribe the form of vouchers, records, and methods of keeping accounts at each of the institutions, which shall be as nearly uniform as possible. The department may examine the records of each institution at any time. The department may authorize any of its bookkeepers, accountants, or employees to examine and check the records, accounts, and vouchers or take an inventory of the property of any institution, or do whatever is necessary, and pay the actual and reasonable expenses incurred in such service when an itemized account is filed and approved. Sec. 5119.06. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall keep in its office, accessible only to its employees, except by the consent of the department or the order of the judge of a court of record, a record showing the name, residence, sex, age, nativity, occupation, condition, and date of entrance or commitment of every patient in the institutions governed by it, the date, cause, and terms of discharge and the condition of such person at the time of leaving, and also a record of all transfers from one institution to another, and, if such person dies while in the care or custody of the department, the date and cause of death. These and such other facts as the department requires shall be furnished by the managing officer of each institution within twenty-four hours after the commitment, entrance, death, or discharge of a patient. In case of an accident or injury or peculiar death of a patient the managing officer shall make a special report to the department within twenty-four hours thereafter, giving the circumstances as fully as possible. Sec. 5119.07. A person, firm, or corporation may file a petition in the court of common pleas of the county in which a benevolent institution of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services is located, in which petition the desire to erect or carry on at a less distance than that prescribed in section 3767.19 of the Revised Code shall be set forth, the business prohibited, the precise point of its establishment, and the reasons and circumstances, in its opinion, why the erection or carrying on of the business would not annoy or endanger the health, convenience, or recovery of the patients of such institution. The petitioner shall give notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county of the pendency and prayer of the petition for at least six consecutive weeks before the day set for hearing the petition and serve a written notice upon the managing officer of the institution at least thirty days before the day set for hearing the petition. If, upon the hearing of the petition, it appears that the notice has been given as required and the court is of the opinion that no good reason exists why such establishment may not be erected or such business carried on and that by the erection or carrying on of the business at the point named, the institution will sustain no detriment, the court may issue an order granting the prayer of the petitioner. Thereafter the petitioner may locate such establishment or carry on such business at the point named in the petition. Sec. 5119.08. (A) As used in this section, "felony" has the same meaning as in section 109.511 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Subject to division (C) of this section, upon the recommendation of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, the managing officer of an institution under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may designate one or more employees to be special police officers of the department. The special police officers shall take an oath of office, wear the badge of office, and give bond for the proper and faithful discharge of their duties in an amount that the director requires. (2) In accordance with section 109.77 of the Revised Code, the special police officers shall be required to complete successfully a peace officer basic training program approved by the Ohio peace officer training commission and to be certified by the commission. The cost of the training shall be paid by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (3) Special police officers, on the premises of institutions under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and subject to the rules of the department, shall protect the property of the institutions and the persons and property of patients in the institutions, suppress riots, disturbances, and breaches of the peace, and enforce the laws of the state and the rules of the department for the preservation of good order. They may arrest any person without a warrant and detain the person until a warrant can be obtained under the circumstances described in division (F) of section 2935.03 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The managing officer of an institution under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall not designate an employee as a special police officer of the department pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section on a permanent basis, on a temporary basis, for a probationary term, or on other than a permanent basis if the employee previously has been convicted of or has pleaded guilty to a felony. (2)(a) The managing officer of an institution under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall terminate the employment as a special police officer of the department of an employee designated as a special police officer under division (B)(1) of this section if that employee does either of the following: (i) Pleads guilty to a felony; (ii) Pleads guilty to a misdemeanor pursuant to a negotiated plea agreement as provided in division (D) of section 2929.43 of the Revised Code in which the employee agrees to surrender the certificate awarded to that employee under section 109.77 of the Revised Code. (b) The managing officer shall suspend from employment as a special police officer of the department an employee designated as a special police officer under division (B)(1) of this section if that employee is convicted, after trial, of a felony. If the special police officer files an appeal from that conviction and the conviction is upheld by the highest court to which the appeal is taken or if the special police officer does not file a timely appeal, the managing officer shall terminate the employment of that special police officer. If the special police officer files an appeal that results in that special police officer's acquittal of the felony or conviction of a misdemeanor, or in the dismissal of the felony charge against that special police officer, the managing officer shall reinstate that special police officer. A special police officer of the department who is reinstated under division (C)(2)(b) of this section shall not receive any back pay unless that special police officer's conviction of the felony was reversed on appeal, or the felony charge was dismissed, because the court found insufficient evidence to convict the special police officer of the felony. (3) Division (C) of this section does not apply regarding an offense that was committed prior to January 1, 1997. (4) The suspension from employment, or the termination of the employment, of a special police officer under division (C)(2) of this section shall be in accordance with applicable collective bargaining agreements. Sec. 5119.091. The attorney general shall attend to all claims instituted on behalf of or against the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services or any institution under the jurisdiction of the department and the managing officer thereof, except such institutions as are privately owned or operated under a license from the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, and shall represent the public hospital in proceedings under section 5122.15 of the Revised Code. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall reimburse the attorney general for the compensation of assistant attorneys general required to represent the public hospital in proceedings under section 5122.15 of the Revised codeCode and shall also pay the costs of litigation incurred by the attorney general under that section. If a writ of habeas corpus is applied for, the clerk of the court shall give notice of the time and place of hearing to the attorney general. Sec. 5119.10. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services is the chief executive and appointing authority of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The director may organize the department for its efficient operation, including creating divisions or offices as necessary. The director may establish procedures for the governance of the department, conduct of its employees and officers, performance of its business, and custody, use, and preservation of departmental records, papers, books, documents, and property. Whenever the Revised Code imposes a duty upon or requires an action of the department or any of its institutions, the director or the director's designee shall perform the action or duty in the name of the department, except that the medical director appointed pursuant to section 5119.11 of the Revised Code shall be responsible for decisions relating to medical diagnosis, treatment, rehabilitation, quality assurance, and the clinical aspects of the following: licensure of hospitals and residential facilities, research, community addiction and mental health plans, and certification and delivery of addiction services and mental health services. (B) The director shall: (1) Adopt rules for the proper execution of the powers and duties of the department with respect to the institutions under its control, and require the performance of additional duties by the officers of the institutions as necessary to fully meet the requirements, intents, and purposes of this chapter. In case of an apparent conflict between the powers conferred upon any managing officer and those conferred by such sections upon the department, the presumption shall be conclusive in favor of the department. (2) Adopt rules for the nonpartisan management of the institutions under the department's control. An officer or employee of the department or any officer or employee of any institution under its control who, by solicitation or otherwise, exerts influence directly or indirectly to induce any other officer or employee of the department or any of its institutions to adopt the exerting officer's or employee's political views or to favor any particular person, issue, or candidate for office shall be removed from the exerting officer's or employee's office or position, by the department in case of an officer or employee, and by the governor in case of the director. (3) Appoint such employees, including the medical director, as are necessary for the efficient conduct of the department, and prescribe their titles and duties; (4) Prescribe the forms of affidavits, applications, medical certificates, orders of hospitalization and release, and all other forms, reports, and records that are required in the hospitalization or admission and release of all persons to the institutions under the control of the department, or are otherwise required under this chapter or Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code; (5) Exercise the powers and perform the duties relating to addiction and mental health facilities, addiction services, mental health services, 9-8-8 suicide and crisis response, and recovery supports that are assigned to the director under this chapter and Chapter 340. of the Revised Code; (6) Develop and implement clinical evaluation and monitoring of services that are operated by the department; (7) Adopt rules establishing standards for the performance of evaluations by a forensic center or other psychiatric program or facility of the mental condition of defendants ordered by the court under section 2919.271, or 2945.371 of the Revised Code, and for the treatment of defendants who have been found incompetent to stand trial and ordered by the court under section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code to receive treatment in facilities; (8) On behalf of the department, have the authority and responsibility for entering into contracts and other agreements with providers, agencies, institutions, and other entities, both public and private, as necessary for the department to carry out its duties under this chapter and Chapters 340., 2919., 2945., and 5122. of the Revised Code. Chapter 125. of the Revised Code does not apply to contracts the director enters into under this section for addiction services, mental health services, or recovery supports provided to individuals who have an addiction or mental illness by providers, agencies, institutions, and other entities not owned or operated by the department. (9) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code specifying the supplemental services that may be provided through a trust authorized by section 5815.28 of the Revised Code; (10) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing standards for the maintenance and distribution to a beneficiary of assets of a trust authorized by section 5815.28 of the Revised Code. (C) The director may contract with hospitals licensed by the department under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code for the care and treatment of patients with mental illnesses, or with persons, organizations, or agencies for the custody, evaluation, supervision, care, or treatment of persons with mental illnesses receiving services elsewhere than within the enclosure of a hospital operated under section 5119.14 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.11. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall appoint a medical director who is eligible or certified by the American board of psychiatry and neurology or the American osteopathic board of neurology and psychiatry, and has at least five years of clinical and two years of administrative experience. The medical director shall also have certification or substantial training and experience in the field of addiction medicine or addiction psychiatry. The medical director shall be responsible for decisions relating to medical diagnosis, treatment, prevention, rehabilitation, quality assurance, and the clinical aspects of addiction services and mental health services involving all of the following: (1) Licensure of hospitals, residential facilities, and outpatient facilities; (2) Research; (3) Community addiction and mental health plans; (4) Certification and delivery of addiction and mental health services. (B) The medical director shall also exercise clinical supervision of the chief clinical officers of hospitals and institutions under the jurisdiction of the department and shall review and approve decisions relating to the employment of the chief clinical officers. The medical director or the medical director's designee shall advise the director on matters relating to licensure, research, the certification and delivery of addiction services and mental health services, and community addiction and mental health plans. The medical director shall participate in the development of guidelines for community addiction and mental health plans. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may establish other duties of the medical director. Sec. 5119.14. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall maintain, operate, manage, and govern state institutions and other services for the care and treatment of persons with mental illnesses. (B)(1) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may, with the approval of the governor, designate the name and purpose of any institutions under its jurisdiction and may change, with the approval of the governor, the designation and name when necessary. (2) The department shall divide the state into districts for the purpose of designating the institution in which persons with mental illnesses are hospitalized and may change the districts. (3)(C) Subject to section 5139.08 and pursuant to Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code and on the agreement of the departments department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and department of youth services, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may receive from the department of youth services for psychiatric observation, diagnosis, or treatment any person eighteen years of age or older in the custody of the department of youth services. The departments may enter into a written agreement specifying the procedures necessary to implement this division. (C)(D) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall designate hospitals, facilities, and community mental health services providers for the custody, care, and special treatment of, and authorize payment for such custody, care, and special treatment provided to, persons who are charged with a crime and who are found incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity. (D)(E) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may do any of the following: (1) Require reports from the managing officer of any institution under the department's jurisdiction, relating to the admission, examination, comprehensive evaluation, diagnosis, release, or discharge of any patient; (2) Visit each institution regularly to review its operations and to investigate complaints made by any patient or by any person on behalf of a patient, provided these duties may be performed by a person designated by the director. (E)(F) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may provide or contract to provide addiction services for offenders incarcerated in the state prison system. (F)(G) In addition to the powers expressly conferred on the department of behavioral health, the department of mental health and addiction services shall have all other powers and authority necessary for the full and efficient exercise of the executive, administrative, and fiscal supervision over the state institutions described in this section. Sec. 5119.141. The In addition to the powers and duties expressly conferred on the department of behavioral health, the department of mental health and addiction services has all the authority may take any other action it considers necessary to carry out its powers and duties under the purposes of this chapter and Chapters 340., 2919., 2945., and 5122. of the Revised Code, including . Actions authorized by this section include the authority to adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and Chapters 340., 2919., 2945., and 5122. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.15. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may make such investigations as are necessary in the performance of its duties and to that end the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall have the same power as a judge of a county court to administer oaths and to enforce the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books or papers. The department shall keep a record of such investigations stating the time, place, charges or subject, witnesses summoned and examined, and its conclusions. In matters involving the conduct of an officer, a stenographic report of the evidence shall be taken and a copy of such report, with all documents introduced, kept on file at the office of the department. The fees of witnesses for attendance and travel shall be the same as in the court of common pleas, but no officer or employee of the institution under investigation is entitled to such fees. Any judge of the probate court or of the court of common pleas, upon application of the department, may compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of books or papers, and the giving of testimony before the department, by a judgment for contempt or otherwise, in the same manner as in cases before such courts. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may appoint and commission any competent agency or person, to serve without compensation, as a special agent, investigator, or representative to perform a designated duty for the department. Specific credentials shall be given by the department to each person so designated. Each credential shall state the: (A) Name of the agent, investigator, or representative; (B) Agency with which such person is connected; (C) Purpose of appointment; (D) Date of expiration of appointment; (E) Such information as the department considers proper. Sec. 5119.161. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, in conjunction with the department of job and family services, shall develop a joint state plan to improve the accessibility and timeliness of alcohol and drug addiction services for individuals identified by a public children services agency as in need of those services. The plan shall address the fact that Ohio works first participants may be among the persons receiving services under section 340.15 of the Revised Code and shall require the department of job and family services to seek federal funds available under Title IV-A of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, for the provision of the services to Ohio works first participants who are receiving services under section 340.15 of the Revised Code. The departments shall review and amend the plan as necessary. Sec. 5119.17. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, in accordance with division (B) of this section, shall give priority to developing, and promptly shall develop, with available public and private resources a program that does all of the following: (1) Provides a manner of identifying the aggregate number of pregnant women in this state who are addicted to a drug of abuse; (2) Provides for an effective means of intervention to eliminate the addiction of pregnant women to drugs of abuse prior to the birth of their children; (3) Gives priority to the treatment of pregnant women addicted to drugs of abuse, including by requiring community addiction services providers that receive public funds to give priority to pregnant women referred for treatment; (4) Provides for the continued monitoring of women who were addicted to a drug of abuse during their pregnancies, after the birth of their children, and for the availability of treatment and rehabilitation for those women; (5) Provides a manner of determining the aggregate number of children who are born in this state to women who are addicted, at the time of birth, to a drug of abuse, and of children who are born in this state with an addiction to or a dependency on a drug of abuse; (6) Provides for the continued monitoring of children who are born in this state to women who are addicted, at the time of birth, to a drug of abuse, or who are born in this state with an addiction to or dependency on a drug of abuse, after their birth; (7) Provides for the treatment and rehabilitation of any child who is born to a woman who is addicted, at the time of birth, to a drug of abuse, and of any child who is born with an addiction to or dependency on a drug of abuse. (B) In developing the program described in division (A) of this section, the department may obtain information from the department of health and the department of job and family services, and those departments shall cooperate with the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services in its development and implementation of the program. (C) Immediately upon its development of the program described in division (A) of this section, the department shall implement the program. (D) Any record or information that is obtained or maintained by the department in connection with the program described in division (A) of this section and could enable the identification of any woman or child described in division (A)(1) or (5) of this section is not a public record subject to inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (E) A community addiction services provider that receives public funds shall not refuse to treat a person solely because the person is pregnant if appropriate treatment is offered by the provider. Sec. 5119.18. An appointing authority may appoint a person who holds a certified or permanent position in the classified service within the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services to a position in the unclassified service within the department. A person appointed pursuant to this section to a position in the unclassified service shall retain the right to resume the position and status held by the person in the classified service immediately prior to the person's appointment to the position in the unclassified service, pursuant to division (D) of section 124.11 of the Revised Code. A person who holds a position in the classified service and who is appointed to a position in the unclassified service on or after January 1, 2016, shall have the right to resume a position in the classified service under this section only within five years after the effective date of the person's appointment in the unclassified service. Sec. 5119.181. (A) No appointing officer shall appoint a person to fill a position in either the classified or unclassified service of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services if the person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of the following: (1) Any felony contained in the Revised Code, if the felony bears a direct and substantial relationship to the position being filled; (2) Any crime contained in the Revised Code constituting a misdemeanor of the first degree on the first offense and a felony on subsequent offenses, if the crime bears a direct and substantial relationship to the position being filled; (3) An existing or former law of this state, any other state, or the United States, if the law violated is substantially equivalent to any of the offenses described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. (B) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, to implement this section. (C) The director or an appointing officer shall request the bureau of criminal identification and investigation created by section 109.51 of the Revised Code or, at the director's or appointing officer's discretion, any other state or federal agency, to supply the director or appointing officer with a written report regarding the criminal records of any applicant. For each investigation undertaken at the department's request under this section, the department shall pay a reasonable fee to the bureau or other state or federal agency conducting the investigation. The amount of the fee shall be determined by the bureau or other state or federal agency conducting the investigation and shall be sufficient to cover the costs of conducting the investigation. The report made by the bureau or other state or federal agency is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person, except the applicant, the director, the appointing officer or the appointing officer's designees, or any hearing officer involved in a case denying employment. (D) As used in this section, "applicant" means a person who is under final consideration for appointment to a position in the classified or unclassified service of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Sec. 5119.182. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may require any of its employees and each officer and employee of every institution under its control who may be charged with custody or control of any money or property belonging to the state or who is required to give bond, to give a surety company bond, properly conditioned, in a sum to be fixed by the department which when approved by the department, shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state. The cost of such bonds, when approved by the department, shall be paid from funds available for the department. The bonds required or authorized by this section may, in the discretion of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, be individual, schedule, or blanket bonds. Sec. 5119.184. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may provide educational grants or tuition reimbursements to upgrade the education, training, and professional achievement of its employees, whenever it determines that provision of such grants or reimbursements is essential to the achievement of its goals. The department may enter into agreements with its employees for the purposes of this section. The agreements may require, as a condition of each grant or reimbursement, that the employee continue employment with the department or with another federal, state, or local public agency designated by the department for a period of time stated in the agreement. If an employee does not fulfill the employment requirement stated in the agreement, the department may take action to recover the amount of all educational grants or tuition reimbursements paid to the employee under this section, plus interest at the rate of ten per cent per year calculated from the date of payment of each grant or reimbursement. Sec. 5119.185. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the same meaning as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Clinician" means any of the following: (a) An advanced practice registered nurse; (b) A physician; (c) A physician assistant. (3) "Physician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgery. (4) "Physician assistant" means an individual who holds a current, valid license to practice as a physician assistant issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code. (B) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may establish a clinician recruitment program under which the department agrees to repay all or part of the principal and interest of a government or other educational loan incurred by a clinician who agrees to provide services to inpatients and outpatients of institutions under the department's administration. To be eligible to participate in the program, a clinician must have attended the following: (1) In the case of a physician, a school that was, at the time of attendance, a medical school or osteopathic medical school in this country accredited by the liason liaison committee on medical education or the American osteopathic association, or a medical school or osteopathic medical school located outside this country that was acknowledged by the world health organization and verified by a member state of that organization as operating within that state's jurisdiction; (2) In the case of a physician assistant, a school that was, at the time of attendance, accredited by the accreditation review commission on education for the physician assistant or a regional or specialized and professional accrediting agency recognized by the council for higher education accreditation; (3) In the case of an advanced practice registered nurse, a school that was, at the time of attendance, accredited by a national or regional accrediting organization. (C) The department shall enter into a contract with each clinician it recruits under this section. Each contract shall include at least the following terms: (1) The clinician agrees to provide a specified scope of health care services for a specified number of hours per week and a specified number of years to patients of one or more specified institutions administered by the department. (2) The department agrees to repay all or a specified portion of the principal and interest of a government or other educational loan taken by the clinician for the following expenses if the clinician meets the service obligation agreed to and the expenses were incurred while the clinician was enrolled in, for up to a maximum of four years, a school that qualifies the clinician to participate in the program: (a) Tuition; (b) Other educational expenses for specific purposes, including fees, books, and laboratory expenses, in amounts determined to be reasonable in accordance with rules adopted under division (D) of this section; (c) Room and board, in an amount determined to be reasonable in accordance with rules adopted under division (D) of this section. (3) The clinician agrees to pay the department a specified amount, which shall be not less than the amount already paid by the department pursuant to its agreement, as damages if the clinician fails to complete the service obligation agreed to or fails to comply with other specified terms of the contract. The contract may vary the amount of damages based on the portion of the clinician's service obligation that remains uncompleted as determined by the department. (4) Other terms agreed upon by the parties. (D) If the department elects to implement the clinician recruitment program, it shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish all of the following: (1) Criteria for designating institutions for which clinicians will be recruited; (2) Criteria for selecting clinicians for participation in the program; (3) Criteria for determining the portion of a clinician's loan that the department will agree to repay; (4) Criteria for determining reasonable amounts of the expenses described in divisions (C)(2)(b) and (c) of this section; (5) Procedures for monitoring compliance by clinicians with the terms of their contracts; (6) Any other criteria or procedures necessary to implement the program. Sec. 5119.186. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services or the managing officer of an institution of the department may enter into an agreement with boards of trustees or boards of directors of one or more institutions of higher education or hospitals licensed pursuant to section 5119.33 of the Revised Code to establish, manage, and conduct collaborative training efforts for students enrolled in courses of studies for occupations or professions that involve the care and treatment for persons receiving addiction or mental health services. (B) Such collaborative training efforts may include but are not limited to programs in psychiatry, psychology, nursing, social work, counseling professions, and others considered appropriate by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Any such program shall be approved or accredited by its respective professional organization or state board having jurisdiction over the profession. (1) The department shall require that the following be provided for in agreements between the department and institutions of higher education or hospitals licensed pursuant to section 5119.33 of the Revised Code: (a) Establishment of inter-disciplinary committees to advise persons responsible for training programs. Each committee shall have representation drawn from the geographical community the institution of higher education or hospital serves and shall include representatives of agencies, boards, targeted populations as determined by the department, racial and ethnic minority groups, and publicly funded programs; (b) Funding procedures; (c) Specific outcomes and accomplishments that are expected or required of a program under such agreement; (d) The types of services to be provided under such agreement. (2) The department may require that the following be provided for in agreements between the department and institutions of higher education or hospitals licensed pursuant to section 5119.33 of the Revised Code: (a) Special arrangements for individual residents or trainees to encourage their employment in publicly funded settings upon completion of their training; (b) Procedures for the selection of residents or trainees to promote the admission, retention, and graduation of women, minorities, and disabled persons; (c) Cross-cultural training and other subjects considered necessary to enhance training efforts and the care and treatment of patients and clients; (d) Funding of faculty positions oriented toward meeting the needs of publicly funded programs. Subject to appropriations by the general assembly, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services has final approval of the funding of these collaborative training efforts. Sec. 5119.187. The courses of study for the instruction and training of all persons in institutions under the control of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall be subject to the approval of the superintendent of public instruction. All teachers employed in institutions under the control of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall possess such educator licenses or have such qualifications and approval as the superintendent of public instruction, after consulting with the officers in charge of the institutions, prescribes for the various types of service in the institutions. Sec. 5119.188. (A) As used in this section, "state correctional institution" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall develop a program that is designed to educate and train the employees of each state correctional institution, the employees of each department of youth services institution, and other persons associated by contract or otherwise with each state correctional institution or each department of youth services institution, who will be responsible for the conduct of, or otherwise providing treatment or rehabilitation services pursuant to, a substance abuse treatment or rehabilitation program offered in the institution to adult prisoners or juvenile offenders. Upon the development of the educational and training program, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services promptly shall commence its implementation. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may charge to the department of rehabilitation and correction and to the department of youth services a reasonable annual fee that reflects the expenses incurred by it during the immediately preceding calendar year in preparing and offering the educational and training program during that year to the respective employees and other associated persons described in this division. The director of rehabilitation and correction and the director of youth services shall require the respective employees and other associated persons described in this division to attend and successfully complete the educational and training program developed pursuant to this division as a condition of their continuing to have responsibility for the conduct of, or their continuing to provide treatment or rehabilitation services pursuant to, any treatment or rehabilitation program that is offered in a state correctional institution or in a department of youth services institution to adult prisoners or juvenile offenders. If the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services charges a reasonable annual fee as described in this division, the director involved shall cause that fee to be paid from any available funds of the department of rehabilitation and correction or any available funds of the department of youth services. (C) The department of rehabilitation and correction and the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services jointly shall develop program specifications for the alcohol and drug addiction treatment programs offered in state correctional institutions. Sec. 5119.19. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Community-based correctional facility" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Drug used in medication-assisted treatment" means a drug approved by the United States food and drug administration for use in medication-assisted treatment, regardless of the method the drug is administered or the form in which it is dispensed, including an oral drug, an injectable drug, or a long-acting or extended-release drug. "Drug used in medication-assisted treatment" includes all of the following: (a) A full agonist; (b) A partial agonist; (c) An antagonist. (3) "Drug used in withdrawal management or detoxification" means a drug approved by the United States food and drug administration for use in, or a drug in standard use for, mitigating opioid or alcohol withdrawal symptoms or assisting with detoxification, regardless of the method the drug is administered or the form in which it is dispensed, including an oral drug, an injectable drug, or a long-acting or extended-release drug. "Drug used in withdrawal management or detoxification" includes all of the following: (a) A full agonist; (b) A partial agonist; (c) An antagonist; (d) An alpha-2 adrenergic agonist. (4) "Medication-assisted treatment" has the same meaning as in section 340.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Prescribed drug" has the same meaning as in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code. (6)(a) "Psychotropic drug" means, except as provided in division (A)(6)(b) of this section, a drug that has the capability of changing or controlling mental functioning or behavior through direct pharmacological action. "Psychotropic drug" includes all of the following: (i) Antipsychotic medications, including those administered or dispensed in a long-acting injectable form; (ii) Antidepressant medications; (iii) Anti-anxiety medications; (iv) Mood stabilizing medications. (b) "Psychotropic drug" excludes a stimulant prescribed for the treatment of attention deficit hyperactivity disorder. (7) "Withdrawal management or detoxification" means a set of medical interventions aimed at managing the acute physical symptoms of intoxication and withdrawal. Withdrawal management seeks to minimize the physical harm caused by the intoxication and withdrawal from a substance of abuse. Detoxification denotes a clearing of toxins from the body of the patient who is acutely intoxicated, dependent on a substance of abuse, or both. (B) There is hereby created a program to be known as the behavioral health drug reimbursement program. The program, which shall be administered by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The purpose of the program is to provide state reimbursement financial assistance to counties for the cost of the following drugs that are administered or dispensed to inmates of county jails in this state and individuals confined in community-based correctional facilities in this state: psychotropic drugs, drugs used in medication-assisted treatment, and drugs used in withdrawal management or detoxification. Each county shall ensure that inmates of county jails and individuals confined in community-based correctional facilities have access to all behavioral health drugs specified in this division that are prescribed drugs covered by the fee-for-service component of the medicaid program. (C) The department, based on factors it considers appropriate, shall allocate an amount to each county for reimbursement of drug costs that have been or will be incurred by the county pursuant to this section. (D) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. The rules, if adopted, shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.20. (A) As used in this section: "Electroencephalogram (EEG) combined transcranial magnetic stimulation" means treatment in which transcranial magnetic stimulation (TMS) frequency pulses are tuned to the patient's physiology and biometric data. "First responder" has the meaning defined in section 2903.01 of the Revised Code. "Law enforcement officer" has the meaning defined in section 9.69 of the Revised Code. (B) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall establish a program to make electroencephalogram (EEG) combined transcranial magnetic stimulation available for veterans, first responders, and law enforcement officers. Eligible individuals must have substance use disorders, mental illness, sleep disorders, traumatic brain injuries, sexual trauma, post traumatic stress disorder and accompanying comorbidities, concussions or other brain trauma, or other issues identified by the individual's qualified medical practitioner as issues that would warrant treatment under the program. The program shall be operated in conjunction with a supplier selected under this section. (C) The director shall choose a location for the program and for up to ten branch sites, and shall enter into a contract for the purchase of services related to the program. Each branch site may operate one or more portable units or EEG combined neuromodulation portable units if the director determines that portable units or EEG combined neuromodulation portable units are necessary to expand access to care. The contract shall include provisions requiring the supplier to create and conduct a clinical trial, to establish and operate a clinical practice, to evaluate outcomes of the clinical trial and the clinical practice, to expend payments received from the state as needed for purposes of the program, and to report quarterly regarding the program to the president of the senate and to the standing committee of the senate that generally considers legislation regarding veterans affairs. (D) There is the electroencephalogram (EEG) combined transcranial magnetic stimulation fund in the state treasury. It shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly. The director, with the approval of the controlling board, may authorize a disbursement from the fund for services rendered under the contract. (E) The director shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to administer this section. (F) The supplier, in conducting the clinical trial and in operating the clinical practice, shall adhere to all of the following: (1) The United States food and drug administration regulations governing the conduct of clinical practice and clinical trials; (2) A peer-to-peer support network shall be made available by the supplier to any individual receiving treatment under the program. (3) The program protocol shall use adapted stimulation frequency and intensity modulation based on EEG and motor threshold testing as well as clinical symptoms and signs, and biometrics. (4) Each individual who receives treatment under the program also shall receive neurophysiological monitoring, monitoring for symptoms of substance use and mental health disorders, and access to counseling and wellness programming. Each individual also shall participate in the peer-to-peer support network established by the supplier. (5) Clinical protocols and outcomes of the clinical trial, and of any treatment provided by the clinical practice, shall be collected and reported quarterly in a report provided by the supplier to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services and to the United States food and drug administration. (6) Any individual who receives treatment at the clinical practice shall be eligible for a minimum of two electroencephalograms, plus an additional electroencephalogram for every ten treatments, during the course of the individual's treatment. (7) The report required by this section shall include a thorough accounting of the use and expenditure of all funds received from the state under this section. (G) Contracts entered into under this section are subject to section 9.231 and Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. (H) Operation of the program established under this section is contingent upon an appropriation by the general assembly designated for that purpose. Sec. 5119.201. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise such real and personal property rights in the name of the state as are necessary for the purposes of the department. (B) When it is necessary for a state institution under the jurisdiction of the department to acquire any real estate, right-of-way, or easement in real estate in order to accomplish the purposes for which it was organized or is being conducted, and the department is unable to agree with the owner of such property upon the price to be paid for the property, such property may be appropriated in the manner provided for the appropriation of property for other state purposes. (C) The director may work with the department of administrative services to sell, lease, or exchange portions of real and personal property of the department when the sale, lease, or exchange is advantageous to the state. Money received from such sales, leases, or exchanges shall be credited to the the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services trust fund, created in section 5119.46 of the Revised Code. (D) Any instrument by which real property is acquired pursuant to this section shall identify the agency of the state that has the use and benefit of the real property as specified in section 5301.012 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.21. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall: (1) To the extent the department has available resources and in consultation with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, support the community-based continuum of care that the boards are required by section 340.032 of the Revised Code to establish. The department shall provide the support on a district or multi-district basis. The department shall assist in identifying resources, and may prioritize support, for one or more of the elements of the community-based continuum of care. For the purpose of division (A)(10) of section 340.032 of the Revised Code and to the extent the department determines is necessary, the department shall define additional elements to be included in the community-based continuum of care. (2) Provide training, consultation, and technical assistance regarding addiction services, mental health services, recovery supports, and appropriate prevention, recovery, and mental health promotion activities, including those that are culturally competent, to employees of the department, community addiction services providers, community mental health services providers, and boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; (3) To the extent the department has available resources, promote and support a full range of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports that are available and accessible to all residents of this state, especially for severely emotionally disturbed children and adolescents, adults with severe mental disabilities, pregnant women, parents, guardians or custodians of children at risk of abuse or neglect, and other special target populations, including racial and ethnic minorities, as determined by the department; (4) Develop standards and measures for both of the following: (a) Evaluating the effectiveness of addiction services, including opioid treatment programs, of mental health services, and of recovery supports; (b) Increasing the accountability of community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers. (5) Design and set criteria for the determination of priority populations; (6) Promote, direct, conduct, and coordinate scientific research, taking ethnic and racial differences into consideration, concerning all of the following: (a) The causes and prevention of mental illness and addiction; (b) Methods of providing effective addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports; (c) Means of enhancing the mental health of and recovery from addiction of all residents of this state. (7) Foster the establishment and availability of vocational rehabilitation services and the creation of employment opportunities for individuals with addiction and mental health needs, including members of racial and ethnic minorities; (8) Establish a program to protect and promote the rights of persons receiving addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports, including the issuance of guidelines on informed consent and other rights; (9) Promote the involvement of persons who are receiving or have received addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports including families and other persons having a close relationship to a person receiving those services and supports, in the planning, evaluation, delivery, and operation of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports; (10) Notify and consult with the relevant constituencies that may be affected by rules, standards, and guidelines issued by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. These constituencies shall include consumers of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports and the families of such consumers. These constituencies may include public and private providers, employee organizations, and others when appropriate. Whenever the department proposes the adoption, amendment, or rescission of rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the notification and consultation required by this division shall occur prior to the commencement of proceedings under Chapter 119. The department shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish procedures for the notification and consultation required by this division. (11) Provide consultation to the department of rehabilitation and correction concerning the delivery of addiction services and mental health services in state correctional institutions; (12) Promote and coordinate efforts in the provision of addiction services by other state agencies, as defined in section 1.60 of the Revised Code; courts; hospitals; clinics; physicians in private practice; public health authorities; boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; community addiction services providers; law enforcement agencies; and related groups; (13) Provide to each court of record, and biennially update, a list of the treatment and education programs within that court's jurisdiction that the court may require an offender, sentenced pursuant to section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, to attend; (14) Make the warning sign described in sections 3313.752, 3345.41, and 3707.50 of the Revised Code available on the department's internet web site; (15) Provide a program of gambling addiction services on behalf of the state lottery commission, pursuant to an agreement entered into with the director of the commission under division (K) of section 3770.02 of the Revised Code, and provide a program of gambling addiction services on behalf of the Ohio casino control commission, under an agreement entered into with the executive director of the commission under section 3772.062 of the Revised Code. Under Section 6(C)(3) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, the department may enter into agreements with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, including boards with districts in which a casino facility is not located, and nonprofit organizations to provide addiction services, and with state institutions of higher education or private nonprofit institutions that possess a certificate of authorization issued under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code to perform related research. (B) The department may accept and administer grants from public or private sources for carrying out any of the duties enumerated in this section. (C) The department may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to implement the requirements of this chapter. Sec. 5119.211. The department of behavioral health may establish a process and standards for the state certification of certified community behavioral health clinics. The process and standards may be based on the provisions of section 223 of the "Protecting Access to Medicare Act of 2014," 42 U.S.C. 1396a note. If the department establishes a process and standards for the state certification of certified community behavioral health clinics, the department may coordinate with local, state, and federal government entities for the development and establishment of the clinics. The director of behavioral health may adopt rules as the director considers necessary to implement this section. If the director adopts rules, the rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.22. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, with respect to all mental health and addiction facilities, addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports established and operated or provided under Chapter 340. of the Revised Code, shall do all of the following: (A) Adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and Chapters 340. and 5122. of the Revised Code. (B) Review and evaluate the community-based continuum of care required by section 340.032 of the Revised Code to be established in each service district, taking into account the findings and recommendations of the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services of the district submitted under division (A)(4) of section 340.03 of the Revised Code and the priorities and plans of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, including the needs of residents of the district currently receiving services in state-operated hospitals, and make recommendations for needed improvements to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; (C) At the director's discretion, provide to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services state or federal funds, in addition to those allocated under section 5119.23 of the Revised Code, for special programs or projects the director considers necessary but for which local funds are not available; (D) Establish criteria by which each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services reviews and evaluates the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of the facility services, addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports for which it contracts under section 340.036 of the Revised Code. The criteria shall include requirements ensuring appropriate utilization of the services and supports. The department shall assess each board's evaluation of the services and supports and the compliance of each board with this section, Chapter 340. of the Revised Code, and other state or federal law and regulations. The department, in cooperation with the board, periodically shall review and evaluate the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of the facility services, addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports for which each board contracts under section 340.036 of the Revised Code and the facilities, addiction services, and mental health services that each board operates or provides under section 340.037 of the Revised Code. The department shall collect information that is necessary to perform these functions. (E) To the extent the director determines necessary and after consulting with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, community addiction services providers, and community mental health services providers, develop and operate, or contract for the operation of, a community behavioral health information system or systems. The department shall specify the information that must be provided by the boards and providers for inclusion in the system or systems. Boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, community addiction services providers, and community mental health services providers shall submit information requested by the department in the form and manner and in accordance with time frames prescribed by the department. Information collected by the department may include all of the following: (1) Information on addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports provided; (2) Financial information regarding expenditures of federal, state, or local funds; (3) Information about persons served. The department shall not collect any personal information from the boards or providers except as required or permitted by state or federal law for purposes related to payment, health care operations, program and service evaluation, reporting activities, research, system administration, and oversight. (F) In consultation with representatives of boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and after consideration of recommendations made by the medical director appointed under section 5119.11 of the Revised Code, establish all of the following: (1) Guidelines, including a timetable, for the boards' development and submission of proposed community addiction and mental health plans, budgets, and lists of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports under sections 340.03 and 340.08 of the Revised Code; (2) Procedures, including a timetable, for the director's review and approval or disapproval of the plans, budgets, and lists; (3) Procedures for corrective action regarding the plans, budgets, and lists, including submission of revised or new plans, budgets, and lists; (4) Procedures for the director to follow in offering technical assistance to boards to assist them in making the plans, budgets, and lists acceptable or in making proposed amendments to approved plans, budgets, and lists meet criteria for approval; (5) Procedures for issuing time-limited waivers under section 5119.221 of the Revised Code. (G) Review each board's proposed community addiction and mental health plan, budget, and list of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports submitted pursuant to sections 340.03 and 340.08 of the Revised Code and approve or disapprove the plan, the budget, and the list in whole or in part. The director shall disapprove a board's proposed budget in whole or in part if the proposed budget would not make available in the board's service district the essential elements of the community-based continuum of care required by section 340.032 of the Revised Code, including, except as otherwise authorized by a time-limited waiver issued under section 5119.221 of the Revised Code, an array of addiction services and recovery supports for all levels of opioid and co-occurring drug addiction. Prior to a final decision to disapprove a plan, budget, or list in whole or in part, a representative of the director shall meet with the board and discuss the reason for the action the director proposes to take and any corrective action that should be taken to make the plan, budget, or list acceptable to the director. In addition, the director shall offer technical assistance to the board to assist it to make the plan, budget, or list acceptable. The director shall give the board a reasonable time in which to revise the plan, budget, or list. The board thereafter shall submit a revised plan, budget, or list or a new plan, budget, or list. (H) Approve or disapprove all or part of proposed amendments that a board of alcohol, drug addiction, or mental health services submits under section 340.03 or 340.08 of the Revised Code to an approved community addiction and mental health plan, budget, or list of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports. If the director disapproves of all or part of any proposed amendment, the director shall provide the board an opportunity to present its position. The director shall inform the board of the reasons for the disapproval and of the criteria that must be met before the proposed amendment may be approved. The director shall give the board a reasonable time within which to meet the criteria and shall offer technical assistance to the board to help it meet the criteria. Sec. 5119.221. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, in accordance with procedures established under division (F)(5) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code, may issue to a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services a time-limited waiver of the requirement of section 340.033 of the Revised Code that ambulatory detoxification and medication-assisted treatment be made available within the borders of the board's service district if the director determines that both of the following apply: (1) The board seeking the waiver has made reasonable efforts to make ambulatory detoxification and medication-assisted treatment available within the borders of the board's service district; (2) Ambulatory detoxification and medication-assisted treatment can be made available through one or more contracts between the board seeking the waiver and community addiction services providers that are located not more than thirty miles beyond the borders of the board's service district. (B) Each waiver issued under this section shall specify the amount of time for which it is in effect and whether it applies to ambulatory detoxification, medication-assisted treatment, or both. Sec. 5119.23. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall establish a methodology for allocating to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services the funds appropriated by the general assembly to the department for the purpose of the community-based continuum of care that each board establishes under section 340.032 of the Revised Code. The department shall establish the methodology after notifying and consulting with relevant constituencies as required by division (A)(10) of section 5119.21 of the Revised Code. The methodology may provide for the funds to be allocated to boards on a district or multi-district basis. (B) Subject to section 5119.25 of the Revised Code, and to required submissions and approvals under sections 340.08 and 5119.22 of the Revised Code, the department shall allocate the funds to the boards in a manner consistent with the methodology, this section, other state and federal laws, rules, and regulations. (C) In consultation with boards, community addiction services providers, community mental health services providers, and persons receiving addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports, the department shall establish guidelines for the use of funds allocated under this section. Sec. 5119.24. (A) As used in this section, "administrative function" means a function related to one or more of the following: (1) Continuous quality improvement; (2) Utilization review; (3) Resource development; (4) Fiscal administration; (5) General administration; (6) Any other function related to administration that is required by Chapter 340. of the Revised Code. (B) Each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall submit an annual report to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services specifying how the board used funds allocated to the board under section 5119.23 of the Revised Code for administrative functions in the year preceding the report's submission. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall establish the date by which the report must be submitted each year. Sec. 5119.25. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may withhold funds, in whole or in part, that otherwise are to be allocated to a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services under section 5119.23 of the Revised Code if either of the following circumstances apply: (1) The board fails to comply with Chapter 340. or 5119. of the Revised Code or rules of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (2) The board denies available service on the basis of race, color, religion, ancestry, military status, sex, age, national origin, disability as defined in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code, or developmental disability. (B) The director shall withhold funds, in whole or in part, that otherwise are to be allocated to a board under section 5119.23 of the Revised Code if either of the following circumstances apply: (1) The director, under division (G) of section 5119.22 of the Revised Code, disapproves all or part of the board's proposed community addiction and mental health plan, budget, or list of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports; (2) The board's use of state and federal funds fails to comply with the board's approved budget, including approved amendments to the budget. (C) The director shall issue a notice identifying the areas of noncompliance and the action necessary to achieve compliance. The director may offer technical assistance to the board to achieve compliance. The board shall have thirty days from receipt of the notice of noncompliance to present its position that it is in compliance or to submit to the director evidence of corrective action the board took to achieve compliance. Before withholding funds, the director or the director's designee shall hold a hearing within thirty days of receipt of the board's position or evidence to determine if there are continuing violations and that either assistance is rejected or the board is unable, or has failed, to achieve compliance. The director may appoint a representative from another board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to serve as a mentor for the board in developing and executing a plan of corrective action to achieve compliance. Any such representative shall be from a board that is in compliance with Chapter 340. of the Revised Code, this chapter, and the department's rules. Subsequent to the hearing process, if it is determined that compliance has not been achieved, the director may allocate all or part of the withheld funds to one or more community mental health services providers or community addiction services providers to provide the mental health service, addiction service, or recovery support for which the board is not in compliance until the time that there is compliance. (D) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. Sec. 5119.27. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Federally assisted," "program," and "substance use disorder" have the same meanings as in 42 C.F.R. 2.11 and as further described in 42 C.F.R. 2.12(b). (3) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (B) In accordance with 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2, records or information created or maintained by a federally assisted program for the treatment of substance use disorders shall be kept confidential and may be disclosed only for the purposes and under the circumstances expressly authorized under 42 C.F.R. Part 2. (C) When the person, with respect to whom any record or information referred to in division (B) of this section is maintained, gives consent in the form of a written release signed by the person, the content of the record or information may be disclosed if the written release conforms to all of the requirements set forth in 42 C.F.R. 2.31. (D) In accordance with 42 C.F.R. 2.35, a person who is subject to a community control sanction, a post-release control sanction, is on parole, or is ordered to intervention in lieu of conviction, and who has agreed to participate in a federally assisted program for the treatment of substance use disorders as a condition of the community control sanction, post-release control sanction, parole, or intervention order, shall consent to the release of records and information relating to the progress of treatment, frequency of treatment, adherence to treatment requirements, and probable outcome of treatment. Release of information and records under this division shall be limited to the court or governmental personnel having the responsibility for supervising the person's community control sanction, post-release control sanction, parole, or intervention order. A person, described in this division, who refuses to allow disclosure may be considered in violation of the conditions of the person's community control sanction, post-release control sanction, parole, or intervention order. (E) In accordance with 42 C.F.R. 2.52 and 2.53, disclosure of a person's record may be made without the person's consent to qualified personnel for the purpose of conducting scientific research, management, financial audits, or program evaluation, but these personnel may not identify, directly or indirectly, any particular person in any report of the research, audit, or evaluation, or otherwise disclose a person's identity in any manner. (F) In accordance with 42 C.F.R. 2.66, upon the request of a prosecuting attorney or the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, a court of competent jurisdiction may order the disclosure of records or information referred to in division (B) of this section if the court has reason to believe that a federally assisted program for the treatment of substance use disorders is being operated or used in a manner contrary to law. The use of any information or record so disclosed shall be limited to the prosecution of persons who are or may be charged with any offense related to the illegal operation or use of the program, or to the decision to withdraw the authority of a the program to continue operation. For purposes of this division the court shall do all of the following: (1) Limit disclosure to those parts of the person's record considered essential to fulfill the objective for which the order was granted; (2) Require, where appropriate, that all information be disclosed in chambers; (3) Include any other appropriate measures to keep disclosure to a minimum, consistent with the protection of the persons seeking or receiving services, the provider-client relationship, and the administration of the program. Sec. 5119.28. (A) All records, and reports, other than court journal entries or court docket entries, identifying a person and pertaining to the person's mental health condition, assessment, provision of care, treatment, or recovery supports, or payment for assessment, care, treatment, or recovery supports that are maintained in connection with any services certified by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, any recovery supports paid for with funds administered by the department or a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, or any hospitals or facilities licensed or operated by the department, shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person except: (1) If the person identified, or the person's legal guardian, if any, or if the person is a minor, the person's parent or legal guardian, consents; (2) When disclosure is provided for in this chapter or Chapter 340. or 5122. of the Revised Code or in accordance with other provisions of state or federal law authorizing such disclosure; (3) That hospitals, boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, licensed facilities, and community mental health services providers may release necessary information to insurers and other third-party payers, including government entities responsible for processing and authorizing payment, to obtain payment for goods and services furnished to the person; (4) Pursuant to a court order signed by a judge; (5) That a person shall be granted access to the person's own psychiatric and medical records, unless access specifically is restricted in a person's treatment plan for clear treatment reasons; (6) That the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may exchange psychiatric records and other pertinent information with community mental health services providers and boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services relating to the person's care or services. Records and information that may be exchanged pursuant to this division shall be limited to medication history, physical health status and history, financial status, summary of course of treatment, summary of treatment needs, and a discharge summary, if any. (7) That the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, hospitals and community providers operated by the department, hospitals licensed by the department under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, and community mental health services providers may exchange psychiatric records and other pertinent information with payers and other providers of treatment and health services if the purpose of the exchange is to facilitate continuity of care for the person or for the emergency treatment of the person; (8) That the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and community mental health services providers may exchange psychiatric records and other pertinent information with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services for purposes of any board function set forth in Chapter 340. of the Revised Code. Boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall not access any personal information from the department or providers except as required or permitted by this section, or Chapter 340. or 5122. of the Revised Code for purposes related to payment, care coordination, health care operations, program and service evaluation, reporting activities, research, system administration, oversight, or other authorized purposes. (9) That a person's family member who is involved in the provision, planning, and monitoring of services to the person may receive medication information, a summary of the person's diagnosis and prognosis, and a list of the services and personnel available to assist the person and the person's family, if the person's treatment provider determines that the disclosure would be in the best interests of the person. No such disclosure shall be made unless the person is notified first and receives the information and does not object to the disclosure. (10) That community mental health services providers may exchange psychiatric records and certain other information with the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and other providers in order to provide services to a person involuntarily committed to a board. Release of records under this division shall be limited to medication history, physical health status and history, financial status, summary of course of treatment, summary of treatment needs, and discharge summary, if any. (11) That information may be disclosed to the executor or the administrator of an estate of a deceased person when the information is necessary to administer the estate; (12) That information may be disclosed to staff members of the appropriate board or to staff members designated by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services for the purpose of evaluating the quality, effectiveness, and efficiency of mental health services and recovery supports and determining if the services and supports meet minimum standards. Information obtained during such evaluations shall not be retained with the name of any person. (13) That records pertaining to the person's diagnosis, course of treatment, treatment needs, and prognosis shall be disclosed and released to the appropriate prosecuting attorney if the person was committed pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code, or to the attorney designated by the board for proceedings pursuant to involuntary commitment under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code; (14) That the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may exchange psychiatric hospitalization records, other mental health treatment records, and other pertinent information with the department of rehabilitation and correction and with the department of youth services to ensure continuity of care for inmates and offenders who are receiving mental health services in an institution of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services and may exchange psychiatric hospitalization records, other mental health treatment records, and other pertinent information with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and community mental health services providers to ensure continuity of care for inmates or offenders who are receiving mental health services in an institution and are scheduled for release within six months. The release of records under this division is limited to records regarding an inmate's or offender's medication history, physical health status and history, summary of course of treatment, summary of treatment needs, and a discharge summary, if any. (15) That a community mental health services provider that ceases to operate may transfer to either a community mental health services provider that assumes its caseload or to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services of the service district in which the person resided at the time mental health services or recovery supports were most recently provided any records concerning the services or supports that have not been transferred elsewhere at the person's request; (16) That records and reports relating to a person who has been deceased for fifty years or more are no longer considered confidential. (B) Before records are disclosed pursuant to divisions (A)(3), (6), and (10) of this section, the custodian of the records shall attempt to obtain the person's consent for the disclosure. (C) No person shall reveal the content of a medical record of a person that is confidential pursuant to this section, except as authorized by law. Sec. 5119.29. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, in conjunction with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and community mental health boards, shall develop a coordinated system for tracking and monitoring persons found not guilty by reason of insanity and committed pursuant to section 2945.40 of the Revised Code who have been granted a conditional release and persons found incompetent to stand trial and committed pursuant to section 2945.39 of the Revised Code who have been granted a conditional release. The system shall do all of the following: (A) Centralize responsibility for the tracking of those persons; (B) Develop uniformity in monitoring those persons; (C) Develop a mechanism to allow prompt rehospitalization, reinstitutionalization, or detention when a violation of the conditional release or decompensation occurs. Sec. 5119.30. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services promptly shall develop and maintain a program that continually provides the courts of this state with relevant information pertaining to addiction services and programs available both within their jurisdictions and statewide in order to facilitate the ability of the courts to utilize treatment and rehabilitation alternatives in addition to or in lieu of imposing sentences of imprisonment upon appropriate offenders. Sec. 5119.31. The department of administrative services shall purchase all supplies needed for the proper support and maintenance of the institutions under the control of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services in accordance with the competitive selection procedures of Chapter 125. of the Revised Code and such rules as the department of administrative services adopts. All bids shall be publicly opened on the day and hour and at the place specified in the advertisement. Preference shall be given to bidders in localities wherein the institution is located, if the price is fair and reasonable and not greater than the usual price; but bids not meeting the specifications shall be rejected. The department of administrative services may require such security as it considers proper to accompany the bids and shall fix the security to be given by the contractor. The department of administrative services may reject any or all bids and secure new bids, if for any reason it is deemed for the best interest of the state to do so, and it may authorize the managing officer of any institution to purchase perishable goods and supplies for use in cases of emergency, in which cases such managing officer shall certify such fact in writing and the department of administrative services shall record the reasons for such purchase. Sec. 5119.311. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may examine into, with or without expert assistance, the question of the mental and physical condition of any person committed to or involuntarily confined in any hospital for persons with mental illnesses, or restrained of liberty at any place within this state by reason of alleged mental illness and may order and compel the discharge of any such person who is not a person with a mental illness subject to court order as defined in division (B) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code and direct what disposition shall be made of the person. The order of discharge shall be signed by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. Upon receipt of such order by the superintendent or other person in charge of the building in which the person named in such order is confined, such person shall forthwith be discharged or otherwise disposed of according to the terms of said order, and any further or other detention of such person is unlawful. No such order shall be made in favor of any person committed and held for trial on a criminal charge, in confinement by an order of a judge or court made in a criminal proceeding, or in any case unless notice is given to the superintendent or other person having charge of the building in which the alleged person with a mental illness is detained, and a reasonable opportunity is allowed the person in charge to justify further detention of the person confined. Sec. 5119.32. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services is hereby designated as the state administrative agency for the substance abuse prevention treatment block grant and the community mental health services block grant authorized by the "Public Health Services Act," 95 Stat. 357, 543, 42 U.S.C. 300x, as amended, and similar alcohol, drug abuse, or mental health programs that are specified in an appropriations act. Sec. 5119.33. (A)(1) (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall inspect and license all hospitals that receive persons with mental illnesses, except those hospitals managed by the department. No hospital may receive for care or treatment, either at public or private expense, any person who is or appears to have a mental illness, whether or not so adjudicated, unless the hospital has received a license from the department authorizing it to receive for care or treatment persons with mental illnesses or the hospital is managed by the department. (2) No such license shall be granted to a hospital for the treatment of persons with mental illnesses unless both of the following are the case: (a) The department is satisfied, after investigation, that the hospital is managed and operated by qualified persons, is adequately staffed and equipped to operate, and has on its staff one or more qualified physicians responsible for the medical care of the patients confined there. At least one such physician shall be a psychiatrist. (b) The department has not been notified under section 5119.334 of the Revised Code or is not otherwise aware that the hospital, or any owner, sponsor, medical director, administrator, or principal of the hospital, has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of application. (B) The department shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code prescribing minimum standards for the operation of hospitals for the care and treatment of persons with mental illnesses and establishing standards and procedures for the issuance, renewal, or revocation of full, probationary, and interim licenses. No license shall be granted to any hospital established or used for the care of persons with mental illnesses unless such hospital is operating in accordance with this section and rules adopted pursuant to this section. A full license shall expire one year after the date of issuance, a probationary license shall expire at the time prescribed by rule adopted pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, and an interim license shall expire ninety days after the date of issuance. A full, probationary, or interim license may be renewed, except that an interim license may be renewed only twice. The department may fix reasonable fees for licenses and for license renewals. Such hospitals are subject to inspection and on-site review by the department. (C) Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, neither the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services; an employee of the department; a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or employee of a community mental health services provider; nor any other public official shall hospitalize any person with a mental illness for care or treatment in any hospital that is not licensed in accordance with this section. (D)(1) The department may issue an order suspending the admission of patients with mental illnesses to a hospital for care or treatment if it finds either of the following: (a) The hospital is not in compliance with rules adopted by the director pursuant to this section. (b) The hospital has been cited for more than one violation of statutes or rules during any previous period of time during which the hospital is licensed pursuant to this section. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (D)(2)(b) of this section, proceedings initiated to suspend the admission of patients are governed by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (b) If a suspension of admissions is proposed because the director has determined that the licensee has demonstrated a pattern of serious noncompliance or that a violation creates a substantial risk to the health and safety of patients, the director may issue an order imposing the suspension of admissions before providing an opportunity for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The director shall lift the order for the suspension of admissions if the director determines that the violation that formed the basis for the order has been corrected. (3) Appeals from proceedings initiated to order the suspension of admissions shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, unless the order was issued before providing an opportunity for an adjudication, in which case all of the following apply: (a) The licensee may request a hearing not later than ten days after being served in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. (b) If a timely request for a hearing that includes the licensee's current address is made, the hearing shall commence not later than thirty days after the department receives the request. (c) After commencing, the hearing shall continue uninterrupted, except for Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, unless other interruptions are agreed to by the licensee and the director. (d) If the hearing is conducted by a hearing examiner, the hearing examiner shall file a report and recommendations with the department not later than ten days after the last of the following: (i) The close of the hearing; (ii) If a transcript of the proceedings is ordered, the hearing examiner receives the transcript; (iii) If post-hearing briefs are timely filed, the hearing examiner receives the briefs. (e) The hearing examiner shall send a written copy of the report and recommendations, by certified mail, to the licensee, or the licensee's attorney, if applicable, not later than five days after the report is filed with the department. (f) Not later than five days after receiving the report and recommendations, the licensee may file objections with the department. (g) Not later than fifteen days after the hearing examiner files the report and recommendations, the department shall issue an order approving, modifying, or disapproving the report and recommendations. (h) Notwithstanding the pendency of the hearing, the department shall lift the order for the suspension of admissions if the department determines the violation that formed the basis for the order has been corrected. (E)(1) Any license issued by the department under this section may be revoked or not renewed by the department The department may deny, refuse to renew, or revoke a license for any of the following reasons: (a) The hospital is no longer not a suitable place for the care or treatment of persons with mental illnesses. (b) The hospital refuses to be subject to inspection or on-site review by the department. (c) The hospital has failed fails to furnish humane, kind, and adequate treatment and care. (d) The hospital fails to comply with the licensure rules of the department. (e) The department finds that the hospital is not managed and operated by qualified persons, is not adequately staffed and equipped to operate, or does not have on its staff one or more qualified physicians, including at least one psychiatrist, who is responsible for the care of the patients in the hospital. (f) The department has been notified under section 5119.334 of the Revised Code or otherwise becomes aware that the hospital, any owner, sponsor, medical director, administrator, or principal of the hospital, or any subsidiary of the hospital, owner, or sponsor has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of notification or date of becoming aware of the adverse action. (2) Proceedings initiated to deny applications for full or probationary licenses, to refuse to renew full or probationary licenses, or to revoke full or probationary licenses are governed by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If an order has been issued suspending the admission of patients, the order remains in effect during the pendency of those proceedings. (F)(1) In a proceeding initiated to suspend the admission of patients, to deny an application for a full or probationary license, to refuse to renew a full or probationary license, or to revoke a full or probationary license, the department may order the suspension, denial, refusal, or revocation regardless of whether some or all of the deficiencies that prompted the proceedings have been corrected at the time of the hearing. (2) When the department issues an order suspending the admission of patients, denies an application for a full or probationary license, refuses to renew a full or probationary license, or revokes a full or probationary license, the department shall not grant an opportunity for submitting a plan of correction. (G) The department may inspect, conduct an on-site review, and review the records of any hospital that the department has reason to believe is operating without a license. Sec. 5119.331. If the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services determines that a hospital not licensed by the department is receiving for care or treatment any person who is or appears to have a mental illness, the department may request in writing that the attorney general petition the court of common pleas in the county where the hospital is located to enjoin the hospital from continued operation in violation of section 5119.33 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.332. No third-party payer shall directly or indirectly reimburse, nor shall any person be obligated to pay any hospital for psychiatric services for which a license is required under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code unless the hospital is licensed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. As used in this section, "third-party payer" means a health insuring corporation licensed under Chapter 1751. of the Revised Code, an insurance company that issues sickness and accident insurance in conformity with Chapter 3923. of the Revised Code, a state-financed health insurance program under Chapter 3701., 4123., or 5101. of the Revised Code, or any self-insurance plan. Sec. 5119.333. No person shall keep or maintain a hospital for the care or treatment of persons with mental illnesses unless it is licensed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, as provided by section 5119.33 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.334. (A) As used in this section, "adverse action" means an action by a state, provincial, federal, or other licensing or regulatory authority other than the department of behavioral health to deny, revoke, suspend, place on probation, or otherwise restrict a license, certificate, or other approval to operate a hospital or practice a health care profession. (B)(1) When submitting an application for initial or renewed licensure of a hospital under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, the applicant shall notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services of any adverse action taken against any of the following during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of application: (a) The hospital or the hospital's ; (b) Any owner, sponsor, medical director, administrator, or any of its principals within principal of the three-year period immediately preceding the date of applicationhospital; (c) Any subsidiary of the hospital, owner, or sponsor. (2) Not later than seven days after receiving a notice of adverse action from a licensing or regulatory authority that is other than the department of mental health and addiction services, the holder of a hospital license issued under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code shall notify the department of the action. (C) To notify the department as required by this section, a copy of the notice of adverse action shall be provided to the department. Sec. 5119.34. (A) As used in this section and sections 5119.341 to 5119.343 5119.344 of the Revised Code: (1) "Accommodations" means housing, daily meal preparation, laundry, housekeeping, arranging for transportation, social and recreational activities, maintenance, security, and other services that do not constitute personal care services or skilled nursing care. (2) "ADAMHS board" means a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. (3) "Adult" means a person who is eighteen years of age or older, other than a person described in division (A)(4) of this section who is between eighteen and twenty-one years of age. (4) "Child" means a person who is under eighteen years of age or a person with a mental disability who is under twenty-one years of age. (5) "Community mental health services provider" means a community mental health services provider as defined in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Community mental health services" means any mental health services certified by the department pursuant to section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. (7) "Operator" means the person or persons, firm, partnership, agency, governing body, association, corporation, or other entity that is responsible for the administration and management of a residential facility and that is the applicant for a residential facility license. (8)(6) "Personal care services" means services including, but not limited to, the following: (a) Assisting residents with activities of daily living; (b) Assisting residents with self-administration of medication in accordance with rules adopted under this section; (c) Preparing special diets, other than complex therapeutic diets, for residents pursuant to the instructions of a physician or a licensed dietitian, in accordance with rules adopted under this section. "Personal care services" does not include "skilled nursing care" as defined in section 3721.01 of the Revised Code. A facility need not provide more than one of the services listed in division (A)(8)(A)(6) of this section to be considered to be providing personal care services. (9)(7) "Room and board" means the provision of sleeping and living space, meals or meal preparation, laundry services, housekeeping services, or any combination thereof. (10)(8) "Residential state supplement program" means the program established under section 5119.41 of the Revised Code. (11)(9) "Supervision" means any of the following: (a) Observing a resident to ensure the resident's health, safety, and welfare while the resident engages in activities of daily living or other activities; (b) Reminding a resident to perform or complete an activity, such as reminding a resident to engage in personal hygiene or other self-care activities; (c) Assisting a resident in making or keeping an appointment. (12)(10) "Unrelated" means that a resident is not related to the owner or operator of a residential facility or to the owner's or operator's spouse as a parent, grandparent, child, stepchild, grandchild, brother, sister, niece, nephew, aunt, or uncle, or as the child of an aunt or uncle. (B)(1) A "residential facility" is a publicly or privately operated home or facility that falls into one of the following categories: (a) Class one facilities provide accommodations, supervision, personal care services, and mental health services for one or more unrelated adults with mental illness or one or more unrelated children or adolescents with severe emotional disturbances; (b) Class two facilities provide accommodations, supervision, and personal care services to any of the following: (i) One or two unrelated persons with mental illness; (ii) One or two unrelated adults who are receiving payments under the residential state supplement program; (iii) Three to sixteen unrelated adults. (c) Class three facilities provide room and board for five or more unrelated adults with mental illness. (2) "Residential facility" does not include any of the following: (a) A hospital subject to licensure under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code or an institution maintained, operated, managed, and governed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services for the hospitalization of persons with mental illnesses pursuant to section 5119.14 of the Revised Code; (b) A residential facility licensed under section 5123.19 of the Revised Code or otherwise regulated by the department of developmental disabilities; (c) An institution or association subject to certification under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (d) A facility operated by a hospice care program licensed under section 3712.04 of the Revised Code that is used exclusively for care of hospice patients; (e) A nursing home, residential care facility, or home for the aging as defined in section 3721.02 of the Revised Code; (f) A facility licensed under section 5119.37 of the Revised Code to operate an opioid treatment program; (g) Any facility that receives funding for operating costs from the department of development under any program established to provide emergency shelter housing or transitional housing for the homeless; (h) A terminal care facility for the homeless that has entered into an agreement with a hospice care program under section 3712.07 of the Revised Code; (i) A facility approved by the veterans administration under section 104(a) of the "Veterans Health Care Amendments of 1983," 97 Stat. 993, 38 U.S.C. 630, as amended, and used exclusively for the placement and care of veterans; (j) The residence of a relative or guardian of a person with mental illness. (C) Nothing in division (B) of this section shall be construed to permit personal care services to be imposed on a resident who is capable of performing the activity in question without assistance. (D) Except in the case of a residential facility described in division (B)(1)(a) of this section, members of the staff of a residential facility shall not administer medication to the facility's residents, but may do any of the following: (1) Remind a resident when to take medication and watch to ensure that the resident follows the directions on the container; (2) Assist a resident in the self-administration of medication by taking the medication from the locked area where it is stored, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to this section, and handing it to the resident. If the resident is physically unable to open the container, a staff member may open the container for the resident. (3) Assist a resident who is physically impaired but mentally alert, such as a resident with arthritis, cerebral palsy, or Parkinson's disease, in removing oral or topical medication from containers and in consuming or applying the medication, upon request by or with the consent of the resident. If a resident is physically unable to place a dose of medicine to the resident's mouth without spilling it, a staff member may place the dose in a container and place the container to the mouth of the resident. (E) A person operating or seeking to operate a residential facility shall apply for licensure of the facility to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The application shall be submitted by the operator. When applying for the license, the applicant shall pay to the department the application fee specified in rules adopted under division (N) of this section. The fee is nonrefundable. The department shall send a copy of an application to the ADAMHS board serving the county in which the person operates or seeks to operate the facility. The ADAMHS board shall review the application and provide to the department any information about the applicant or the facility that the board would like the department to consider in reviewing the application. (F) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall inspect and license the operation of residential facilities. The department may issue a license to operate a residential facility only if all of the following are the case: (1) The department is satisfied, after investigation, that the facility is managed and operated by qualified persons and is adequately staffed and equipped to operate. (2) The department has not been notified under section 5119.343 of the Revised Code or is not otherwise aware that the residential facility or any owner, operator, or manager of the residential facility has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of application. (3) The department has not been notified or is not otherwise aware that the residential facility or any owner, operator, or manager of the facility has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken at any time based on an act or omission that violated the right of a residential facility resident to be free from abuse, neglect, or exploitation. The department may issue full, probationary, and interim licenses. A full license shall expire up to three years after the date of issuance, a probationary license shall expire in a shorter period of time as specified in rules adopted by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services under division (N) of this section, and an interim license shall expire ninety days after the date of issuance. A license may be renewed in accordance with rules adopted by the director under division (N) of this section. The renewal application shall be submitted by the operator. When applying for renewal of a license, the applicant shall pay to the department the renewal fee specified in rules adopted under division (N) of this section. The fee is nonrefundable. (G)(1) If the department finds any of the following with respect to a residential facility, the department may issue an order suspending the admission of residents to the facility, refuse to issue or renew a license for the facility, or revoke the facility's license: (a) The facility is not in compliance with rules adopted by the director pursuant to division (N) of this section; (b) Any facility operated by the applicant or licensee has been cited for a pattern of serious noncompliance or repeated violations of statutes or rules during the period of current or previous licenses; (c) The applicant or licensee submits false or misleading information as part of a license application, renewal, or investigation. (d) The facility is not managed and operated by qualified persons or adequately staffed and equipped to operate. (e) The department has been notified under section 5119.343 of the Revised Code or otherwise becomes aware that the facility, any owner, operator, or manager of the facility, or any subsidiary of the facility, owner, or operator has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of notification or date of becoming aware of the adverse action. (f) The department has been notified under section 5119.343 of the Revised Code or otherwise becomes aware that the facility, any owner, operator, or manager of the facility, or any subsidiary of the facility, owner, or operator has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken at any time based on an act or omission that violated the right of a residential facility resident to be free from abuse, neglect, or exploitation. (2) Proceedings initiated to deny applications for full or probationary licenses, to refuse to renew full or probationary licenses, or to revoke full or probationary licenses are governed by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If an order has been issued suspending the admission of residents to the facility, the order remains in effect during the pendency of those proceedings. Proceedings initiated to suspend the admission of residents to a facility are governed by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except as provided in division (H) of this section. (3) In a proceeding initiated to suspend the admission of residents to a facility, to deny an application for a full or probationary license, to refuse to renew a full or probationary license, or to revoke a full or probationary license, the department may order the suspension, denial, refusal, or revocation regardless of whether some or all of the deficiencies that prompted the proceedings have been corrected at the time of the hearing. (4) When the department issues an order suspending the admission of residents to a facility, denies an application for a full or probationary license, refuses to renew a full or probationary license, or revokes a full or probationary license, the department shall not grant an opportunity for submitting a plan of correction. (H)(1) If a suspension of admissions of residents to a facility is proposed because the director has determined that the licensee has demonstrated a pattern of serious noncompliance or that a violation creates a substantial risk to the health and safety of residents, the director may issue an order imposing the suspension of admissions before providing an opportunity for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The director shall lift the order for the suspension of admissions if the director determines that the violation that formed the basis for the order has been corrected. (2) Appeals from proceedings initiated to order the suspension of admissions to a facility shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, unless the order was issued before providing an opportunity for an adjudication, in which case all of the following apply: (a) The licensee may request a hearing not later than ten days after being served in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. (b) If a timely request for a hearing that includes the licensee's current address is made, the hearing shall commence not later than thirty days after the department receives the request. (c) After commencing, the hearing shall continue uninterrupted, except for Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, unless other interruptions are agreed to by the licensee and the director. (d) If the hearing is conducted by a hearing examiner, the hearing examiner shall file a report and recommendations with the department not later than ten days after the last of the following: (i) The close of the hearing; (ii) If a transcript of the proceedings is ordered, the hearing examiner receives the transcript; (iii) If post-hearing briefs are timely filed, the hearing examiner receives the briefs. (e) The hearing examiner shall send a written copy of the report and recommendations, by certified mail, to the licensee, or the licensee's attorney, if applicable, not later than five days after the report is filed with the department. (f) Not later than five days after receiving the report and recommendations, the licensee may file objections with the department. (g) Not later than fifteen days after the hearing examiner files the report and recommendations, the department shall issue an order approving, modifying, or disapproving the report and recommendations. (h) Notwithstanding the pendency of the hearing, the department shall lift the order for the suspension of admissions if the department determines the violation that formed the basis for the order has been corrected. (I) The department may issue an interim license to operate a residential facility if both of the following conditions are met: (1) The department determines that the closing of or the need to remove residents from another residential facility has created an emergency situation requiring immediate removal of residents and an insufficient number of licensed beds are available. (2) The residential facility applying for an interim license meets standards established for interim licenses in rules adopted by the director under division (N) of this section. An interim license shall be valid for ninety days and may be renewed by the director no more than twice. Proceedings initiated to deny applications for or to revoke interim licenses under this division are not subject to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (J)(1) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may conduct an inspection of a residential facility as follows: (a) Prior to issuance of a license for the facility; (b) Prior to renewal of the license; (c) To determine whether the facility has completed a plan of correction required pursuant to division (J)(2) of this section and corrected deficiencies to the satisfaction of the department and in compliance with this section and rules adopted pursuant to it; (d) Upon complaint by any individual or agency; (e) At any time the director considers an inspection to be necessary in order to determine whether the facility is in compliance with this section and rules adopted pursuant to this section. (2) In conducting inspections the department may conduct an on-site examination and evaluation of the residential facility and its personnel, activities, and services. The department shall have access to examine and copy all records, accounts, and any other documents relating to the operation of the residential facility, including records pertaining to residents, and shall have access to the facility in order to conduct interviews with the operator, staff, and residents. Following each inspection and review, the department shall complete a report listing any deficiencies, and including, when appropriate, a time table within which the operator shall correct the deficiencies. The department may require the operator to submit a plan of correction describing how the deficiencies will be corrected. (K) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Operate a residential facility unless the facility holds a valid license; (2) Violate any of the conditions of licensure after having been granted a license; (3) Interfere with a state or local official's inspection or investigation of a residential facility; (4) Violate any of the provisions of this section or any rules adopted pursuant to this section. (L) The following may enter a residential facility at any time: (1) Employees designated by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services; (2) Employees of an ADAMHS board under either of the following circumstances: (a) When a resident of the facility is receiving services from a community mental health services provider under contract with that ADAMHS board or another ADAMHS board; (b) When authorized by section 340.05 of the Revised Code. (3) Employees of a community mental health services provider under either of the following circumstances: (a) When the provider has a person receiving services residing in the facility; (b) When the provider is acting as an agent of an ADAMHS board other than the board with which it is under contract. (4) Representatives of the state long-term care ombudsman program when the facility provides accommodations, supervision, and personal care services for three to sixteen unrelated adults or to one or two unrelated adults who are receiving payments under the residential state supplement program. The persons specified in division (L) of this section shall be afforded access to examine and copy all records, accounts, and any other documents relating to the operation of the residential facility, including records pertaining to residents. (M) Employees of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may enter, for the purpose of investigation, any institution, residence, facility, or other structure which has been reported to the department as, or that the department has reasonable cause to believe is, operating as a residential facility without a valid license. (N) The director of behavioral health shall adopt and may amend and rescind rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the licensing and operation of residential facilities. The rules shall establish all of the following: (1) Minimum standards for the health, safety, adequacy, and cultural competency of treatment of and services for persons in residential facilities; (2) Procedures for the issuance, renewal, or revocation of the licenses of residential facilities; (3) Procedures for conducting background investigations for prospective or current operators, employees, volunteers, and other non-resident occupants who may have direct access to facility residents; (4) The fee to be paid when applying for a new residential facility license or renewing the license; (5) Procedures for the operator of a residential facility to follow when notifying the ADAMHS board serving the county in which the facility is located when the facility is serving residents with mental illness or severe mental disability, including the circumstances under which the operator is required to make such a notification; (6) Procedures for the issuance and termination of orders of suspension of admission of residents to a residential facility; (7) Measures to be taken by residential facilities relative to residents' medication; (8) Requirements relating to preparation of special diets; (9) The maximum number of residents who may be served in a residential facility; (10) The rights of residents of residential facilities and procedures to protect such rights; (11) Standards and procedures under which the director may waive the requirements of any of the rules adopted. (O)(1) The department of behavioral health may withhold the source of any complaint reported as a violation of this section when the department determines that disclosure could be detrimental to the department's purposes or could jeopardize the investigation. The department may disclose the source of any complaint if the complainant agrees in writing to such disclosure and shall disclose the source upon order by a court of competent jurisdiction. (2) Any person who makes a complaint under division (O)(1) of this section, or any person who participates in an administrative or judicial proceeding resulting from such a complaint, is immune from civil liability and is not subject to criminal prosecution, other than for perjury, unless the person has acted in bad faith or with malicious purpose. (P)(1) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may petition the court of common pleas of the county in which a residential facility is located for an order enjoining any person from operating a residential facility without a license or from operating a licensed facility when, in the director's judgment, there is a present danger to the health or safety of any of the occupants of the facility. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant such injunctive relief upon a showing that the respondent named in the petition is operating a facility without a license or there is a present danger to the health or safety of any residents of the facility. (2) When the court grants injunctive relief in the case of a facility operating without a license, the court shall issue, at a minimum, an order enjoining the facility from admitting new residents to the facility and an order requiring the facility to assist with the safe and orderly relocation of the facility's residents. (3) If injunctive relief is granted against a facility for operating without a license and the facility continues to operate without a license, the director shall refer the case to the attorney general for further action. (Q) The director of behavioral health may fine a person for violating division (K) of this section. The fine shall be five hundred dollars for a first offense; for each subsequent offense, the fine shall be one thousand dollars. The director's actions in imposing a fine shall be taken in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.342. (A) Upon petition by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, the court of common pleas or the probate court may appoint a receiver to take possession of and operate a residential facility licensed pursuant to section 5119.34 of the Revised Code, when conditions existing at the residential facility present a substantial risk of physical or mental harm to residents and no other remedies at law are adequate to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the residents. Petitions filed pursuant to this section shall include: (1) A description of the specific conditions existing at the residential facility which present a substantial risk of physical or mental harm to residents; (2) A statement of the absence of other adequate remedies at law; (3) The number of individuals residing at the facility; (4) A statement that the facts have been brought to the attention of the owner or licensee and that conditions have not been remedied within a reasonable period of time or that the conditions, though remedied periodically, habitually exist at the residential facility as a pattern or practice; and (5) The name and address of the person holding the license for the residential facility. (B) A court in which a petition is filed pursuant to this section shall notify the person holding the license for the facility of the filing. The department shall send notice of the filing to the following, as appropriate: the Ohio protection and advocacy system as defined in section 5123.60 of the Revised Code; facility owner; facility operator; board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; board of health; department of developmental disabilities; department of job and family services; facility residents; and residents' families and guardians. The court shall provide a hearing on the petition within five court days of the time it was filed, except that the court may appoint a receiver prior to that time if it determines that the circumstances necessitate such action. Following a hearing on the petition, and upon a determination that the appointment of a receiver is warranted, the court shall appoint a receiver and notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and appropriate persons of this action. In setting forth the powers of the receiver, the court may generally authorize the receiver to do all that is prudent and necessary to safely and efficiently operate the residential facility within the requirements of state and federal law, but shall require the receiver to obtain court approval prior to making any single expenditure of more than five thousand dollars to correct deficiencies in the structure or furnishings of a facility. The court shall closely review the conduct of the receiver and shall require regular and detailed reports. (C) A receivership established pursuant to this section shall be terminated, following notification of the appropriate parties and a hearing, if the court determines either of the following: (1) The residential facility has been closed and the former residents have been relocated to an appropriate facility; (2) Circumstances no longer exist at the residential facility which present a substantial risk of physical or mental harm to residents, and there is no deficiency in the residential facility that is likely to create a future risk of harm. Notwithstanding division (C)(2) of this section, the court shall not terminate a receivership for a residential facility that has previously operated under another receivership unless the responsibility for the operation of the facility is transferred to an operator approved by the court and the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (D) Except for the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services or appropriate board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, no party or person interested in an action shall be appointed a receiver pursuant to this section. To assist the court in identifying persons qualified to be named as receivers, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall maintain a list of the names of such persons. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, the department of job and family services, and the department of health shall provide technical assistance to any receiver appointed pursuant to this section. Before entering upon the duties of receiver, the receiver must be sworn to perform the duties faithfully, and, with surety approved by the court, judge, or clerk, execute a bond to such person, and in such sum as the court or judge directs, to the effect that such receiver will faithfully discharge the duties of receiver in the action, and obey the orders of the court therein. (1) Under the control of the appointing court, a receiver may do the following: (a) Bring and defend actions in the appointee's name as receiver; (b) Take and keep possession of property. (2) The court shall authorize the receiver to do the following: (a) Collect payment for all goods and services provided to the residents or others during the period of the receivership at the same rate as was charged by the licensee at the time the petition for receivership was filed, unless a different rate is set by the court; (b) Honor all leases, mortgages, and secured transactions governing all buildings, goods, and fixtures of which the receiver has taken possession, but, in the case of a rental agreement only to the extent of payments that are for the use of the property during the period of the receivership, or, in the case of a purchase agreement, only to the extent that payments come due during the period of the receivership; (c) If transfer of residents is necessary, provide for the orderly transfer of residents by: (i) Cooperating with all appropriate state and local agencies in carrying out the transfer of residents to alternative community placements; (ii) Providing for the transportation of residents' belongings and records; (iii) Helping to locate alternative placements and develop plans for transfer; (iv) Encouraging residents or guardians to participate in transfer planning except when an emergency exists and immediate transfer is necessary. (d) Make periodic reports on the status of the residential facility to the court; the appropriate state agencies; and the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. Each report shall be made available to residents, their guardians, and families. (e) Compromise demands or claims; and (f) Generally do such acts respecting the residential facility as the court authorizes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, contracts which are necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the receiver need not be competitively bid. Sec. 5119.343. (A) As used in this section, "adverse action" means an action by a state, provincial, federal, or other licensing or regulatory authority other than the department of behavioral health to deny, revoke, suspend, place on probation, or otherwise restrict a license, certificate, or other approval to operate a residential facility or practice a health care profession. (B)(1) When submitting an application for initial or renewed licensure of a residential facility under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code, the applicant shall notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services of any adverse action taken against any of the following during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of application: (a) The residential facility or the facility's ; (b) Any owner, operator, or manager within of the three-year period immediately preceding the date of applicationfacility; (c) Any subsidiary of the facility, owner, or operator. (2) Not later than seven days after receiving a notice of adverse action from a licensing or regulatory authority that is other than the department of mental health and addiction services, the holder of a residential facility license issued under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code shall notify the department of the action. (3) To notify the department as required by this section, a copy of the notice of adverse action shall be provided to the department. Sec. 5119.344. (A) As used in this section, "principal" means an owner, operator, or manager of a class one residential facility. (B) The department of mental health and addiction services may suspend, without a prior hearing, the license of a class one residential facility that serves children if any of the following occurs: (1) A child suffers a serious injury or dies while residing in the residential facility. (2) The department, a public children services agency, or a county department of job and family services determines that a principal, employee, volunteer, or nonresident occupant of the residential facility created a serious risk to the health or safety of a child residing in the facility that resulted in or could have resulted in a child's death or injury. (3) A principal, employee, resident, volunteer, or nonresident occupant of the facility was charged by an indictment, information, or complaint with an offense relating to the death, injury, or sexual assault of another person that occurred on the premises of the facility. (4) A principal, employee, volunteer, or nonresident occupant of the facility was charged by an indictment, information, or complaint with an offense relating to the death, injury, or sexual assault of a child residing in the facility. (5) A public children services agency receives a report pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code, and the person alleged to have inflicted abuse or neglect on the child, who is the subject of the report, is either of the following: (a) A principal of the residential facility; (b) An employee of the residential facility who has not been immediately placed on administrative leave or released from employment. (6) The residential facility is not in compliance with the rule, adopted under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code, pertaining to background investigations for owners, operators, employees, and other specified individuals. (C) In suspending a license under division (B) of this section, the department shall comply with section 119.07 of the Revised Code. The owner of a class one residential facility may request an adjudicatory hearing before the department pursuant to sections 119.06 and 119.12 of the Revised Code. If a hearing is requested and the department does not issue its final adjudication order within one hundred twenty days after the suspension, the suspension is void on the one hundred twenty-first day after the suspension, unless the hearing on the suspension is continued on agreement by the parties or for good cause. (D) Any summary suspension imposed under this section shall remain in effect until any of the following occurs: (1) The public children services agency completes its investigation of the report pursuant to section 2151.421 of the Revised Code and determines that all of the allegations are unsubstantiated. (2) All criminal charges are disposed of through dismissal or a finding of not guilty. (3) The department issues, pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, a final order terminating the suspension. (E) A class one residential facility serving children shall not have children placed in the facility while a summary suspension remains in effect. Upon the issuance of the order of suspension, the department shall place a hold on the license or indicate that the license is suspended in Ohio's statewide automated child welfare information system. (F) The director of mental health and addiction services may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing standards and procedures for the summary suspension of licenses. (G) This section does not limit the authority of the department to take other action, such as issuing an order suspending the admission of residents to a residential facility, refusing to issue or renew a license for a facility, or revoking a facility's license under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.345. The department of behavioral health shall publish a directory of all residential facilities licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code on the department's web site. For each facility, the directory shall include all of the following: (A) The name of the facility; (B) The facility's full address; (C) The facility's categorization as a class one, class two, or class three facility; (D) The services offered at the facility. Sec. 5119.35. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, if a mental health service or alcohol and drug addiction service has been specified in rules adopted under this section as a service that is required to be certified, no person or government entity shall provide that service unless it has been certified under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. (B) Division (A) of this section does not apply to either of the following: (1) An individual who holds a valid license, certificate, or registration issued by this state authorizing the practice of a health care profession that includes the performance of any service that is required to be certified as described in this section, regardless of whether the service is performed as part of a sole proprietorship, partnership, or group practice; (2) An individual who provides any service that is required to be certified as described in this section as part of an employment or contractual relationship with a hospital outpatient clinic that is accredited by an accreditation agency or organization approved by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (C)(1) If the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services determines that a person or government entity is violating division (A) of this section, the director may request, in writing, that the attorney general petition the court of common pleas in the county where the person or government entity is located or providing the services to enjoin the person or government entity from engaging in the conduct that violates division (A) of this section. (2) No person or government entity that is subject to this section is eligible to receive, for a service that is subject to this section, any federal funds, state funds, or funds administered by a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, unless that service has been certified under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. This limitation is in addition to the injunction that may be sought under division (C)(1) of this section for a violation of division (A) of this section. (D) The director may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to specify mental health services and alcohol and drug addiction services that are required to be certified under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.36. (A) A person or government entity that seeks initial certification of one or more certifiable services and supports, or that seeks to renew certification of one or more certifiable services and supports, shall submit an application to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. On receipt of the application, the director shall determine whether the standards established by divisions division (B) and (C) of this section and any rules adopted under this section are satisfied or continue to be satisfied by the applicant. As part of the determination the director may conduct an on-site review of the applicant. In doing so, the director may conduct the review in cooperation with a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that seeks to contract or has a contract with the applicant under section 340.036 of the Revised Code. Not later than fourteen days after receipt of an initial or renewal application for initial or renewed certification, the director shall inform the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district in which the applicant's certifiable services and supports will be provided of the receipt of the application. On the board's request, the director shall provide the board with a copy of the application. Not later than thirty days after a provider's certification ceases to be valid for any reason, including the provider's failure to renew the certification prior to expiration, the director's acceptance of the provider's surrender of the certification, or the issuance of a final order for disciplinary action under division (G)(F) or (M)(L) of this section, the director shall provide notice to the applicable board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services of the reason the certification ceased to be valid and the date it became invalid. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, beginning on the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, an applicant seeking initial certification of certifiable services and supports shall be accredited by one or more national accrediting organizations specified in division (B)(3) of this section for certifiable services and supports for which national accreditation exists for such services and supports or equivalent services and supports. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(4) of this section, beginning October 1, 2025, an applicant seeking to renew certification of certifiable services and supports shall be accredited by one or more national accrediting organizations specified in division (B)(3) of this section for certifiable services and supports for which national accreditation exists for such services and supports or equivalent services and supports. (3) For purposes of divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, the director shall accept appropriate accreditation of an applicant's certifiable services and supports from any of the following national accrediting organizations: (a) The joint commission; (b) The commission on accreditation of rehabilitation facilities; (c) The council on accreditation; (d) Any other national accrediting organization the director considers appropriate. (4) The accreditation requirements of divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to an applicant seeking an initial or renewed certification to provide prevention services, as that term is defined in rules adopted under this section. For such applicants, accreditation is optional. (C) In addition to meeting the accreditation standard set forth in division (B) of this section, an applicant seeking initial or renewed certification of one or more certifiable services and supports is eligible to receive the certification only if both of the following are the case, as determined by the director: (1) The applicant has adequate staff and equipment to provide the certifiable services and supports; (2) The department has not been notified under section 5119.367 of the Revised Code or is not otherwise aware that the applicant, or any owner or principal of the applicant, has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of application. (D)(1)(C)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2)(C)(2) of this section, if the director determines that an applicant has paid any required certification fee, that the applicant's accreditation of certifiable services and supports is current and appropriate for the services and supports for which the applicant is seeking initial or renewed certification, that the applicant meets the requirements of division (C) of this section, and that the applicant meets any other requirements established by this section or rules adopted under it, the director shall certify the services and supports or renew the certification of the services and supports, as applicable. Except as provided in division (J)(I) of this section, the director shall issue or renew the certification without further evaluation of the services and supports. (2) Prior to October 1, 2025, if an applicant that seeks to renew certification of certifiable services and supports is not accredited to provide those services and supports by one or more national accrediting organizations specified in division (B)(3) of this section, the director shall conduct an evaluation of the applicant to determine whether the applicant's certifiable services and supports satisfy the standards for certification. The evaluation is in addition to any on-site review conducted under division (A) of this section and shall be performed in cooperation with a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that seeks to contract or has a contract with the applicant under section 340.036 of the Revised Code. If the director determines that an applicant has paid any required certification fee, that the applicant's certifiable services and supports satisfy the standards for renewed certification, that the applicant meets the requirements of division (C) of this section, and that the applicant meets any other requirements established by this section or the rules adopted under it, the director shall certify the certifiable services and supports. (E)(D) For purposes of the accreditation requirements of this section, both of the following apply: (1) The director may review the accrediting organizations specified in division (B)(3) of this section to evaluate whether the accreditation standards and processes used by the organizations are consistent with service delivery models the director considers appropriate for mental health services, alcohol and drug addiction services, or physical health services. The director may communicate to an accrediting organization any identified concerns, trends, needs, and recommendations. (2) The director shall require a community mental health services provider and a community addiction services provider to notify the director not later than ten days after any change in the provider's accreditation status. The provider may notify the director by providing a copy of the relevant document the provider received from the accrediting organization. (F)(E) The director may require a community mental health services provider or a community addiction services provider to submit to the director cost reports pertaining to the provider. (G)(F) The director may refuse to certify certifiable services and supports, refuse to renew certification, or revoke certification if any of the following apply to an applicant for certification or the holder of the certification: (1) The applicant or holder is not in compliance with rules adopted under this section. (2) The applicant or holder has been cited for a pattern of serious noncompliance or repeated violations of statutes or rules during the current certification period or any previous certification period. (3) The applicant or holder has been found to be in violation of section 5119.396 of the Revised Code; (4) The applicant or holder submits false or misleading information as part of a certification application, renewal, or investigation. (5) The applicant does not have adequate staff and equipment to provide the certifiable services and supports. (6) The department has been notified under section 5119.367 of the Revised Code or is otherwise aware that the applicant, any owner or principal of the applicant, or any subsidiary of the applicant or owner has been the subject of an adverse action, as defined in that section, taken during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of notification or date of becoming aware of the adverse action. (H)(G) Proceedings initiated to deny applications to certify certifiable services and supports, to refuse to renew certification, or to revoke certification are governed by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If an order has been issued suspending admissions to a community addiction services provider, as provided in division (M)(L) of this section, the order remains in effect during the pendency of those proceedings. (I)(H) The director may conduct an on-site review or otherwise evaluate a community mental health services provider or a community addiction services provider at any time based on cause, including complaints made by or on behalf of persons receiving mental health services or alcohol and drug addiction services and confirmed or alleged deficiencies brought to the attention of the director. This authority does not affect the director's duty to conduct the inspections required by section 5119.37 of the Revised Code. In conducting an on-site review under this division, the director may do so in cooperation with a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that seeks to contract or has a contract with the applicant under section 340.036 of the Revised Code. In conducting any other evaluation under this division, the director shall do so in cooperation with such a board. (J)(I) If the director proposes to take action under division (G)(F) of this section, the director shall notify the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district in which the certifiable services and supports will be or were provided, and provide the board opportunity to respond as specified in division (A) of this section with respect to initial or renewal applications. When a final order is issued by the director under division (G)(F) of this section, the director may request that the appropriate board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services reallocate any funds for the certifiable services and supports the applicant was to provide to a community mental health services provider or community addiction services provider whose certifiable services and supports satisfy the standards. If the board does not reallocate such funds in a reasonable period of time, the director may withhold state and federal funds for the certifiable services and supports and allocate those funds directly to a community mental health services provider or community addiction services provider whose certifiable services and supports satisfy the standards. (K)(J) Each applicant seeking initial or renewed certification of its certifiable services and supports shall pay a fee for the certification required by this section, unless the applicant is exempt under rules adopted under this section. Fees shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the sale of goods and services fund created pursuant to section 5119.45 of the Revised Code. (L)(K) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. The rules shall do all of the following: (1) Subject to section 340.034 of the Revised Code, specify the types of recovery supports that are required to be certified under this section; (2) Establish certification standards for certifiable services and supports that are consistent with nationally recognized applicable standards and facilitate participation in federal assistance programs. The rules shall include as certification standards only requirements that improve the quality of certifiable services and supports or the health and safety of persons receiving certifiable services and supports. The standards shall address at a minimum all of the following: (a) Reporting major unusual incidents to the director; (b) Procedures for applicants for and persons receiving certifiable services and supports to file grievances and complaints; (c) Seclusion; (d) Restraint; (e) Requirements regarding the physical facilities in which certifiable services and supports are provided; (f) Requirements with regard to health, safety, adequacy, and cultural specificity and sensitivity; (g) Standards for evaluating certifiable services and supports; (h) Standards and procedures for granting full, probationary, and interim certification of the certifiable services and supports of an applicant; (i) Standards and procedures for revoking the certification of a community mental health services provider's or community addiction services provider's certifiable services and supports that do not continue to meet the minimum standards established pursuant to this section; (j) The limitations to be placed on a provider whose certifiable services and supports are granted probationary or interim certification; (k) Development of written policies addressing the rights of persons receiving certifiable services and supports, including all of the following: (i) The right to a copy of the written policies addressing the rights of persons receiving certifiable services and supports; (ii) The right at all times to be treated with consideration and respect for the person's privacy and dignity; (iii) The right to have access to the person's own psychiatric, medical, or other treatment records unless access is specifically restricted in the person's treatment plan for clear treatment reasons; (iv) The right to have a client rights officer provided by the provider or board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services advise the person of the person's rights, including the person's rights under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code if the person is committed to the provider or board. (l) Documentation that must be submitted as evidence of holding appropriate accreditation; (m) A process by which the director may review the accreditation standards and process used by the national accrediting organizations specified in division (B)(3) of this section. (3) Establish the process for certification of certifiable services and supports; (4) Set the amount of initial and renewal certification fees and any reasons for which applicants may be exempt from the fees; (5) Specify the type of notice and hearing to be provided prior to a decision on whether to reallocate funds; (6) Establish a process by which the director, based on deficiencies identified as a result of conducting an on-site review or otherwise evaluating a community mental health services provider or community addiction services provider under division (I)(H) of this section, may take any range of correction actions, including revocation of the provider's certification. (M)(1)(L)(1) The director may issue an order suspending admissions to a community addiction services provider that provides overnight accommodations if the director finds either of the following: (a) The provider's certifiable services and supports are not in compliance with rules adopted under this section; (b) The provider has been cited for more than one violation of statutes or rules during any previous certification period of the provider. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (M)(2)(b)(L)(2)(b) of this section, proceedings initiated to suspend admissions to a community addiction services provider that provides overnight accommodations are governed by Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (b) If a suspension of admissions is proposed because the director has determined that the provider has demonstrated a pattern of serious noncompliance or that a violation creates a substantial risk to the health and safety of patients, the director may issue an order suspending admissions before providing an opportunity for an adjudication under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The director shall lift the order for the suspension of admissions if the director determines that the violation that formed the basis for the order has been corrected. (3) Appeals from proceedings initiated to order the suspension of admissions shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, unless the order was issued before providing an opportunity for an adjudication, in which case all of the following apply: (a) The provider may request a hearing not later than ten days after being served in accordance with sections 119.05 and 119.07 of the Revised Code. (b) If a timely request for a hearing that includes the provider's current address is made, the hearing shall commence not later than thirty days after the department receives the request. (c) After commencing, the hearing shall continue uninterrupted, except for Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, unless other interruptions are agreed to by the provider and the director. (d) If the hearing is conducted by a hearing examiner, the hearing examiner shall file a report and recommendations with the department not later than ten days after the last of the following: (i) The close of the hearing; (ii) If a transcript of the proceedings is ordered, the hearing examiner receives the transcript; (iii) If post-hearing briefs are timely filed, the hearing examiner receives the briefs. (e) The hearing examiner shall send a written copy of the report and recommendations, by certified mail, to the provider, or the provider's attorney, if applicable, not later than five days after the report is filed with the department. (f) Not later than five days after receiving the report and recommendations, the provider may file objections with the department. (g) Not later than fifteen days after the hearing examiner files the report and recommendations, the department shall issue an order approving, modifying, or disapproving the report and recommendations. (h) Notwithstanding the pendency of the hearing, the department shall lift the order for the suspension of admissions if the department determines the violation that formed the basis for the order has been corrected. (N)(1)(M)(1) In a proceeding initiated to suspend admissions to a community addiction services provider that provides overnight accommodations, to deny an application for certification of certifiable services and supports, to refuse to renew certification, or to revoke certification, the department may order the suspension, denial, refusal, or revocation regardless of whether some or all of the deficiencies that prompted the proceedings have been corrected at the time of the hearing. (2) When the department issues an order suspending admissions to a community addiction services provider that provides overnight accommodations, denies an application for certification of certifiable services and supports, refuses to renew certification, or revokes a certification, the department shall not grant an opportunity for submitting a plan of correction. (O)(N) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall maintain a current list of community addiction services providers and shall provide a copy of the list to a judge of a court of common pleas who requests a copy for the use of the judge under division (H) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code. The list shall identify each provider by its name, its address, and the county in which it is located. (P)(O) No person shall represent in any manner that a community mental health services provider's or community addiction services provider's certifiable services and supports are certified by the director if the certifiable services and supports are not so certified at the time the representation is made. (Q)(P) If a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services requests the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services to investigate a community mental health services provider or community addiction services provider pursuant to this section, the department shall initiate the investigation not later than ten business days after receipt of the request. If the department initiates an investigation of a community mental health services provider or community addiction services provider under this section for any other reason, the department shall notify the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the applicable alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district of the investigation and the reason for the investigation not later than three business days after the investigation begins. On the board's request, the department shall provide the board with information specifying the status of the investigation and the final disposition of the investigation. Sec. 5119.362. (A) In accordance with rules adopted under section 5119.363 of the Revised Code, each community addiction services provider shall do all of the following: (1) Maintain a waiting list for the provider's included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports; (2) Notify an individual included on the provider's waiting list when the provider has a slot available for the individual and, if the individual does not contact the provider about the slot within a period of time specified in the rules, contact the individual to determine why the individual did not contact the provider and to assess whether the individual still needs the included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports; (3) Remove an individual from the waiting list if either of the following applies: (a) The individual withdraws the individual's request for included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports; (b) When the provider notifies the individual about an available slot, the individual does not contact the provider about the slot within the period of time specified in the rules or otherwise vacates the slot before beginning to receive the services and supports. (4) As part of the process of maintaining the waiting list, determine both of the following: (a) For each individual who seeks from the provider included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports, the number of days that starts with the day the individual first contacts the provider about accessing the services and supports and ends on the following day: (i) If the individual is required to be assessed for the individual's clinical need for the services and supports, the day of the assessment; (ii) If the individual is not required to be assessed for the individual's clinical need for the services and supports, the first day of the individual's access to the services and supports. (b) For each such individual who is required to be assessed for the individual's clinical need for the services and supports, the number of days that starts with the day of the assessment and ends with the first day of the individual's access to the services and supports. (5) Using information the provider acquires by maintaining the waiting list, determine whether included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports are insufficient to meet the needs of individuals on the waiting list; (6) Subject to division (B) of this section, report all of the following information not later than the last day of each month to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services: (a) An unduplicated count of all individuals who were included on the provider's waiting list during the immediately preceding month and each type of included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports for which they were waiting; (b) The total number of days each such individual had been on the provider's waiting list during the immediately preceding month; (c) The last known type of residential setting in which each such individual resided during the immediately preceding month; (d) The total number of individuals who did not contact the provider after receiving, during the immediately preceding month, the notices under division (A)(2) of this section about the provider having slots available for the individuals and, if known, the reasons the contacts were not made; (e) The total number of such individuals who withdrew, in the immediately preceding month, their requests for included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports, each type of service and support that those individuals had requested or been assessed as having a clinical need for, and, if known, the reasons those individuals withdrew their requests; (f) An unduplicated count of all individuals who were referred to another community addiction services provider because the referring provider does not provide the type of included opioid and co-occurring drug addiction services and recovery supports that those individuals had requested or been assessed as having a clinical need for and each type of service and support for which those individuals were referred; (g) All other information specified in the rules. (B) Each report that a community addiction services provider provides to the department under this section shall do both of the following: (1) For the purposes of divisions (A)(6)(a) and (f) of this section, specify the counties of residence of the individuals in the unduplicated counts and include identifying information required by the rules adopted under section 5119.363 of the Revised Code so that the department is able to identify any individuals who are inadvertently duplicated in the counts; (2) For the purpose of the information reported under division (A)(6)(c) of this section, identify the types of residential settings at least as either institutional or noninstitutional. Sec. 5119.363. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall adopt rules governing the duties of community addiction services providers under section 5119.362 of the Revised Code. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The director shall adopt rules under this section that authorize the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services to determine an advanced practice registered nurse's, physician assistant's, or physician's compliance with section 3719.064 of the Revised Code if such practitioner works for a community addiction services provider. Sec. 5119.364. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall do both of the following with the reports it receives from community addiction services providers under section 5119.362 of the Revised Code: (1) Subject to division (B) of this section, make the reports available on the department's internet web site; (2) Make the reports available in an electronic format to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services in a manner that provides the information about an individual contained in a report to the board that serves the individual's county. (B) In making the reports available on the department's web site, the department shall present the information contained in the reports on both a statewide aggregate basis and county-level aggregate basis. The information on the web site shall be updated monthly after the community addiction services providers submit new reports to the department. Sec. 5119.365. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to do both of the following: (A) Streamline the intake procedures used by a community addiction services provider accepting and beginning to serve a new individual, including procedures regarding intake forms and questionnaires; (B) Enable a community addiction services provider to retain an individual as an active patient even though the patient last received services from the provider more than thirty days before resumption of services so that the individual and provider do not have to repeat the intake procedures. Sec. 5119.366. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall require that each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services ensure that each community mental health services provider and community addiction services provider with which it contracts under section 340.036 of the Revised Code to provide certifiable services and supports establish grievance procedures consistent with rules adopted under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code that are available to all persons seeking or receiving certifiable services and supports from a community mental health services provider or community addiction services provider. Sec. 5119.367. (A) As used in this section, "adverse action" means an action by a state, provincial, federal, or other licensing or regulatory authority other than the department of behavioral health to deny, revoke, suspend, place on probation, or otherwise restrict a license, certification, or other approval to provide certifiable services and supports or an equivalent to certifiable services and supports. (B)(1) When submitting an application for initial or renewed certification of one or more certifiable services and supports, the applicant shall notify the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services of any adverse action taken against the following during the three-year period immediately preceding the date of application: (a) The applicant or any ; (b) Any owner or principal of the applicant within ; (c) Any subsidiary of the three-year period immediately preceding the date of applicationapplicant or owner. (2) Not later than seven days after receiving a notice of adverse action from a licensing or regulatory authority that is other than the department of mental health and addiction services, an applicant for initial or renewed certification or the holder of a certification issued under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code shall notify the department of the action. (C) To notify the department as required by this section, a copy of the notice of adverse action shall be provided to the department. Sec. 5119.368. (A) As used in this section, "telehealth services" has the same meaning as in section 4743.09 of the Revised Code. (B) Each community mental health services provider and community addiction services provider shall establish written policies and procedures describing how the provider will ensure that staff persons assisting clients with receiving telehealth services or providing telehealth services are fully trained in using equipment necessary for providing the services. (C) Prior to providing telehealth services to a client, a provider shall describe to the client the potential risks associated with receiving treatment through telehealth services and shall document that the client was provided with the risks and agreed to assume those risks. The risks communicated to a client shall address the following: (1) Clinical aspects of receiving treatment through telehealth services; (2) Security considerations when receiving treatment through telehealth services; (3) Confidentiality for individual and group counseling. (D) It is the responsibility of the provider, to the extent possible, to ensure contractually that any entity or individuals involved in the transmission of information through telehealth mechanisms guarantee that the confidentiality of the information is protected. (E) Every provider shall have a contingency plan for providing telehealth services to clients in the event that technical problems occur during the provision of those services. (F) Providers shall maintain, at a minimum, the following information pertaining to local resources: (1) The local suicide prevention telephone hotline, if available, or the national suicide prevention telephone hotline. (2) Contact information for the local police and fire departments. The provider shall provide the client written information on how to access assistance in a crisis, including one caused by equipment malfunction or failure. (G) It is the responsibility of the provider to ensure that equipment meets standards sufficient to do the following: (1) To the extent possible, ensure confidentiality of communication; (2) Provide for interactive communication between the provider and the client; (3) When providing telehealth services using synchronous technology, ensure that video or audio are sufficient to enable real-time interaction between the client and the provider and to ensure the quality of the service provided. (H) A mental health facility or unit that is serving as a client site shall be maintained in such a manner that appropriate staff persons are on hand at the facility or unit in the event of a malfunction with the equipment used to provide telehealth services. (I)(1) All telehealth services provided by interactive videoconferencing shall meet both of the following conditions: (a) Begin with the verification of the client through a name and password or personal identification number when treatment services are being provided; (b) Be provided in accordance with state and federal law. (2) When providing telehealth services in accordance with this section, a provider shall comply with all requirements under state and federal law regarding the protection of patient information. Each provider shall ensure that any username or password information and any electronic communications between the provider and a client are securely transmitted and stored. (J) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may adopt rules as it considers necessary to implement this section. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Any such rules adopted by the department are not subject to the requirements of division (F) of section 121.95 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.37. (A)(1)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(1)(b) of this section, no person or government entity shall operate an opioid treatment program requiring certification, as certification is defined in 42 C.F.R. 8.2, unless the person or government entity is a community addiction services provider and the program is licensed under this section. (b) Division (A)(1)(a) of this section does not apply to a program operated by the United States department of veterans affairs. (2) No community addiction services provider licensed under this section shall operate an opioid treatment program in a manner inconsistent with this section and the rules adopted under it. (B) A community addiction services provider seeking a license to operate an opioid treatment program shall apply to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The department shall review all applications received. (C) The department may issue a license to operate an opioid treatment program to a community addiction services provider only if all of the following apply: (1) During the three-year period immediately preceding the date of application, the provider or any owner, sponsor, medical director, administrator, or principal of the provider has and each of the following, as the case may be, have been in good standing to operate an opioid treatment program in all other locations where the provider or such other person has been operating a similar program, as : an owner, sponsor, medical director, administrator, or principal of the provider; a subsidiary of the provider; or a subsidiary of the provider's owner or sponsor. Good standing shall be evidenced by both of the following: (a) Not having been denied a license, certificate, or similar approval to operate an opioid treatment program by this state or another jurisdiction; (b) Not having been the subject of any of the following in this state or another jurisdiction: (i) An action that resulted in the suspension or revocation of the license, certificate, or similar approval of the provider or other person; (ii) A voluntary relinquishment, withdrawal, or other action taken by the provider or other person to avoid suspension or revocation of the license, certificate, or similar approval; (iii) A disciplinary action that was based, in whole or in part, on the provider or other person engaging in the inappropriate prescribing, dispensing, administering, personally furnishing, diverting, storing, supplying, compounding, or selling of a controlled substance or other dangerous drug. (2) It affirmatively appears to the department that the provider is adequately staffed and equipped to operate an opioid treatment program. (3) It affirmatively appears to the department that the provider will operate an opioid treatment program in strict compliance with all laws relating to drug abuse and the rules adopted by the department. (4) Except as provided in division (D) of this section and section 5119.371 of the Revised Code, if the provider is seeking an initial license for a particular location, the proposed opioid treatment program is not located on a parcel of real estate that is within a radius of five hundred linear feet of the boundaries of a parcel of real estate having situated on it a public or private school, child care center licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code, or child-serving agency regulated by the department under this chapter. (5) The provider meets any additional requirements established by the department in rules adopted under division (F) of this section. (D) The department may waive the requirement of division (C)(4) of this section if it receives, from each public or private school, child care center, or child-serving agency that is within the five hundred linear feet radius described in that division, a letter of support for the location. The department shall determine whether a letter of support is satisfactory for purposes of waiving the requirement. (E)(1) Except as provided in division (E)(2) of this section, a license to operate an opioid treatment program shall expire two years from the date of issuance. Licenses may be renewed. (2) In circumstances in which the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services has concerns regarding compliance of a community addiction services provider licensed as an opioid treatment program, the department shall notify the provider of those concerns and stipulate that the provider's license expires annually on a date determined by the department. (F) The department shall establish procedures and adopt rules for licensing, inspection, and supervision of community addiction services providers that operate an opioid treatment program. The rules shall establish standards for the control, storage, furnishing, use, dispensing, and administering of medications used in medication-assisted treatment; prescribe minimum standards for the operation of the opioid treatment program component of the provider's operations; and comply with federal laws and regulations. All rules adopted under this division shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. All actions taken by the department regarding the licensing of providers to operate opioid treatment programs shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except as provided in division (L) of this section. (G)(1) The department shall inspect all community addiction services providers licensed to operate an opioid treatment program. Inspections shall be conducted at least biennially and may be conducted more frequently. In addition, the department may inspect any provider or other person that it reasonably believes to be operating an opioid treatment program without a license issued under this section. (2) When conducting an inspection, the department may do both of the following: (a) Examine and copy all records, accounts, and other documents relating to the provider's or other person's operations, including records pertaining to patients or clients; (b) Conduct interviews with any individual employed by or contracted or otherwise associated with the provider or person, including an administrator, staff person, patient, or client. (3) No person or government entity shall interfere with a state or local government official acting on behalf of the department while conducting an inspection. (H) A community addiction services provider shall not administer or dispense methadone in a tablet, powder, or intravenous form. Methadone shall be administered or dispensed only in a liquid form intended for ingestion. A community addiction services provider shall not administer or dispense a medication used in medication-assisted treatment for pain or other medical reasons. (I) As used in this division, "program sponsor" means a person who assumes responsibility for the operation and employees of the opioid treatment program component of a community addiction services provider's operations. A provider shall not permit an individual to act as a program sponsor, medical director, or director of the provider if the individual is receiving a medication used in medication-assisted treatment from any community addiction services provider. (J) The department may issue orders to ensure compliance with all laws relating to drug abuse and the rules adopted under this section. Subject to section 5119.27 of the Revised Code, the department may hold hearings, require the production of relevant matter, compel testimony, issue subpoenas, and make adjudications. Upon failure of a person without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to produce relevant matter, the department may apply to a court of common pleas for an order compelling compliance. (K) The department may refuse to issue, or may withdraw or revoke, a license to operate an opioid treatment program. A license may be refused if a community addiction services provider does not meet the requirements of division (C) of this section. A license may be withdrawn at any time the department determines that the provider no longer meets the requirements for receiving the license. A license may be revoked in accordance with division (L) of this section. Once a license is issued under this section, the department shall not consider the requirement of division (C)(4) of this section in determining whether to renew, withdraw, or revoke the license or whether to reissue the license as a result of a change in ownership. (L) If the department finds reasonable cause to believe that a community addiction services provider licensed under this section is in violation of any state or federal law or rule relating to drug abuse, the department may issue an order immediately revoking the license, subject to division (M) of this section. The department shall set a date not more than fifteen days later than the date of the order of revocation for a hearing on the continuation or cancellation of the revocation. For good cause, the department may continue the hearing on application of any interested party. In conducting hearings, the department has all the authority and power set forth in division (J) of this section. Following the hearing, the department shall either confirm or cancel the revocation. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that the provider shall not be permitted to operate an opioid treatment program pending the hearing or pending any appeal from an adjudication made as a result of the hearing. Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to the contrary, a court shall not stay or suspend any order of revocation issued by the department under this division pending judicial appeal. (M) The department shall not revoke a license to operate an opioid treatment program unless all clients receiving medication used in medication-assisted treatment from the community addiction services provider are provided adequate substitute medication or treatment. For purposes of this division, the department may transfer the clients to other providers licensed to operate opioid treatment programs or replace any or all of the administrators and staff of the provider with representatives of the department who shall continue on a provisional basis the opioid treatment component of the provider's operations. (N) Each time the department receives an application from a community addiction services provider for a license to operate an opioid treatment program, issues or refuses to issue a license, or withdraws or revokes a license, the department shall notify the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services of each alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district in which the provider operates. (O) Whenever it appears to the department from files, upon complaint, or otherwise, that a community addiction services provider has engaged in any practice declared to be illegal or prohibited by section 3719.61 of the Revised Code, or any other state or federal laws or regulations relating to drug abuse, or when the department believes it to be in the best interest of the public and necessary for the protection of the citizens of the state, the department may request criminal proceedings by laying before the prosecuting attorney of the proper county any evidence of criminality which may come to its knowledge. (P) The department shall maintain a current list of community addiction services providers licensed by the department under this section and shall provide a copy of the current list to a judge of a court of common pleas who requests a copy for the use of the judge under division (H) of section 2925.03 of the Revised Code and to a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services that requests a copy for purposes of division (I)(3) of section 340.08 of the Revised Code. The list of licensed community addiction services providers shall identify each licensed provider by its name, its address, and the county in which it is located. Sec. 5119.371. (A) On application by a community addiction services provider that has purchased or leased real property to be used as the location of an opioid treatment program subject to licensure under section 5119.37 of the Revised Code, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall determine whether the location of the proposed program complies with the requirements of division (C)(4) of section 5119.37 of the Revised Code by not being located on a parcel of real estate that is within a radius of five hundred linear feet of the boundaries of a parcel of real estate having situated on it a public or private school, child care center licensed under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code, or child-serving agency regulated by the department under this chapter. If the department determines that the location is in compliance with division (C)(4) of section 5119.37 of the Revised Code, the department shall issue a declaration stating that the location is in compliance. The declaration is valid for two years from the date of issuance. The department shall provide to the provider either a copy of the declaration or a notice that the department has determined that the location is not in compliance with division (C)(4) of section 5119.37 of the Revised Code. If, before expiration of the declaration, a community addiction services provider applies for a license to operate an opioid treatment program, the department shall not consider the requirement of division (C)(4) of section 5119.37 of the Revised Code in determining whether to issue the license. (B) A community addiction services provider seeking to relocate an opioid treatment program licensed under section 5119.37 of the Revised Code may apply for and be granted a declaration under division (A) of this section. If, before expiration of the declaration, the provider applies for issuance of a license due to relocation, the department shall not consider the requirement of division (C)(4) of section 5119.37 of the Revised Code in determining whether to reissue the license due to relocation. Sec. 5119.38. A drivers' intervention program may be used as an alternative to a term of imprisonment for an offender sentenced pursuant to division (G)(1)(a) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code, if it is certified by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services pursuant to this section. No drivers' intervention program shall be used as an alternative to a term of imprisonment that is imposed pursuant to division (G)(1)(b), (c), (d), or (e) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code. To qualify for certification by the director and to receive funds from the statewide treatment and prevention fund created by section 4301.30 of the Revised Code in any amounts and at any times that the director determines are appropriate, a drivers' intervention program shall meet state minimum standards that the director shall establish by rule. The rules shall include, but are not limited to, standards governing program course hours and content, qualifications of program personnel, methods of identifying and testing participants to isolate participants with alcohol and drug abuse problems, referral of such persons to community addiction services providers, the prompt notification of courts by program operators of the completion of the programs by persons required by courts to attend them, and record keeping, including methods of tracking participants for a reasonable time after they have left the program. The director shall issue a certificate to any qualified drivers' intervention program. The certificate is valid for three years. Sec. 5119.39. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall monitor the operation of recovery housing in this state by doing either of the following: (1) Certifying recovery housing residences through a process established by the department; (2) Accepting accreditation, or its equivalent for recovery housing, from one or more of the following: (a) The Ohio affiliate of the national alliance for recovery residences; (b) Oxford house, inc.; (c) Any other organization that is designated by the department for purposes of this section. (B) If the department certifies recovery housing residences, the department shall, in rules adopted under section 5119.397 of the Revised Code, establish requirements for initial certification and renewal certification, as well as grounds and procedures for disciplinary action against operators of recovery housing residences. Sec. 5119.391. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall monitor the establishment of recovery housing residences in this state. (B) For purposes of division (A) of this section, and within the timeframe specified in division (C) of this section, each person or government entity that will operate a recovery housing residence on or after the effective date of this section October 3, 2023, including any recovery housing that was established and in operation prior to the effective date of this section October 3, 2023, shall file with the department, on a form prescribed by the department, all of the following information: (1) The name of the recovery housing residence and any other name under which the residence does business; (2) The address of the recovery housing residence; (3) The name of the person or government entity operating the residence; (4) The primary telephone number and electronic mail address for the recovery housing operator; (5) The date the recovery housing residence was first occupied, or will be occupied, by its first resident; (6) Information related to any existing accreditation or its equivalent that the recovery housing residence has obtained or is in the process of obtaining; (7) Any other information the department considers appropriate. (C) The form required by division (B) of this section shall be filed with the department as follows: (1) For a recovery housing residence that began operating before the effective date of this section, not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section October 3, 2023; (2) For a recovery housing residence that will begin operating on or after the effective date of this section October 3, 2023, not later than thirty days after the first resident begins occupying the residence. (D) If the department accepts accreditation or its equivalent from an organization specified in section 5119.39 of the Revised Code, the department may provide copies of forms filed in accordance with this section to any such organization. Sec. 5119.392. (A) Beginning January 1, 2025, no person or government entity shall operate a recovery housing residence unless either of the following applies: (1)(a) If the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services certifies recovery housing residences, the recovery housing residence is certified by the department. (b) If the department accepts accreditation or its equivalent from an organization specified in section 5119.39 of the Revised Code, the residence is accredited by such an organization. (2) The recovery housing residence has been operating for not more than eighteen months and is actively engaged in efforts to obtain certification or accreditation, as applicable. For purposes of identifying this eighteen-month timeframe, a recovery housing residence is considered to begin operating on the date that the first resident occupies the residence, as specified on the form filed in accordance with section 5119.391 of the Revised Code. (B) If the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services determines that a recovery housing residence is operating in violation of this section, the director may request, in writing, that the attorney general petition the court of common pleas of the county in which the recovery housing residence is located for an order enjoining operation of the recovery housing residence. Sec. 5119.393. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall establish a procedure to receive and investigate complaints from residents, staff, and the public regarding recovery housing residences. The department may contract with one or more of the organizations specified in section 5119.39 of the Revised Code to fulfill some or all of the functions associated with receiving and investigating complaints. (B) Any organization under contract with the department to receive and investigate complaints shall make reports to the department as follows: (1) Not less than monthly, the contractor shall report the status of each pending investigation and shall report the outcome of each investigation that has been completed since the last report was made; (2) As soon as practicable, but not later than ten days after making an adverse decision, if a contractor's accreditation or its equivalent is accepted by the department for purposes of section 5119.39 of the Revised Code, the contractor shall report that decision to the department in a manner prescribed by the department. (C)(1) With respect to complaints received by the department or a contractor of the department, information and records received, collected, or generated by the department or a contractor pursuant to an investigation, and reports that are made under division (B) of this section, all of the following apply to those items, subject to division (C)(2) of this section: (a) The items are confidential and not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (b) The items are exempt from the provisions of Chapter 1347. of the Revised Code. (c) The items are not subject to discovery in any civil action. (2)(a) The items described in division (C)(1) of this section shall be disclosed if required by law. (b) The items described in division (C)(1) of this section may be disclosed to any federal, state, or local law enforcement, prosecutorial, or regulatory agency or its officers or agents. (c) The items described in division (C)(1) of this section may be admitted into evidence in a criminal trial in accordance with the Rules of Evidence, or in an administrative hearing conducted by an agency, but the court or agency shall require that appropriate measures be taken to ensure that confidentiality is maintained with respect to any part thereof that contains names or other identifying information about residents, complainants, or others whose confidentiality was protected by the department or its contractor when the items were in the possession of the department or contractor. Measures to ensure confidentiality that may be taken by the court or agency include sealing its records or redacting specific information from its records. (d) The items described in division (C)(1) of this section may be included in the registry established and maintained under section 5119.394 of the Revised Code, but the department shall make its best effort to do so in a manner that protects the confidentiality of complainants, individuals or organizations providing information about a complaint, and recovery housing residents. The department may refer to any of the foregoing in the registry as long as it removes personally identifying information or uses any other technique it considers appropriate to maintain confidentiality. Sec. 5119.394. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall establish and maintain a registry of recovery housing residences that meet the criteria described in division (A)(1) or (2) of section 5119.392 of the Revised Code. For (B) For each residence, the registry shall include all of the following, subject to the confidentiality requirements of division (C) of section 5119.393 of the Revise Code: (1) Any information from the form required by division (B) of section 5119.391 of the Revised Code that the department chooses to include in the registry; (2) If a complaint received under section 5119.393 of the Revised Code has been investigated and substantiated, a description of the complaint, the date the complaint was submitted to the department or its contractor, and the outcome of the investigation; (3) Any other information the department considers appropriate. (B)(C) The department shall immediately remove from the registry a recovery housing residence that ceases to meet the criteria described in division (A)(1) or (2) of section 5119.392 of the Revised Code, including if the criteria described in those divisions ceases to be met because the residence has had its certification or accreditation, as applicable, revoked or not renewed. (C)(D) The department shall make the registry available to the public on the department's web site. Sec. 5119.395. (A) Beginning January 1, 2025, no person or government entity shall advertise or represent any residence or other building to be a recovery housing residence, sober living home, or any other alcohol and drug free housing for persons recovering from alcohol use disorder or drug addiction unless the residence or building meets either of the following conditions: (1) The residence or building is on the registry established and maintained under section 5119.394 of the Revised Code; (2) The residence or building is regulated by the department of rehabilitation and correction under section 2967.14 of the Revised Code. (B) If the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services determines that a person or government entity is violating division (A) of this section, the director may request, in writing, that the attorney general petition the court of common pleas of the county where the person or government entity is operating the residence or other building to enjoin that person or government entity from engaging in the conduct that violates division (A) of this section. Sec. 5119.397. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement sections 5119.39 to 5119.396 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.40. (A) As used in this section, "individual with a mental illness" and "specialized services" have the same meanings as in section 5165.03 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section and rules adopted under division (E)(3) of this section, for purposes of section 5165.03 of the Revised Code, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall determine in accordance with the "Social Security Act," section 1919(e)(7), 42 U.S.C. 1396r(e)(7), and regulations adopted under section 1919(f)(8)(A) of that act, 42 U.S.C. 1396r(f)(8)(A), whether, because of the individual's physical and mental condition, an individual with a mental illness seeking admission to a nursing facility requires the level of services provided by a nursing facility and, if the individual requires that level of services, whether the individual requires specialized services for mental illness. The determination required by this division shall be based on an independent physical and mental evaluation performed by a person or entity other than the department. (2) Except as provided in division (B)(3) of this section, a determination under division (B)(1) of this section is not required for any of the following: (a) An individual seeking readmission to a nursing facility after having been transferred from a nursing facility to a hospital for care; (b) An individual who meets all of the following conditions: (i) The individual is admitted to the nursing facility directly from a hospital after receiving inpatient care at the hospital; (ii) The individual requires nursing facility services for the condition for which care in the hospital was received; (iii) The individual's attending physician has certified, before admission to the nursing facility, that the individual is likely to require less than thirty days of nursing facility services. (c) An individual transferred from one nursing facility to another nursing facility, with or without an intervening hospital stay. (3) A determination under division (B)(1) of this section is required for an individual described in division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section if the hospital from which the individual is transferred or directly admitted to a nursing facility is either of the following: (a) A hospital that the department maintains, operates, manages, and governs under section 5119.14 of the Revised Code for the care and treatment of persons with mental illnesses; (b) A free-standing hospital, or unit of a hospital, licensed by the department under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code. (C) Except as provided in rules adopted under division (E)(3) of this section, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall review and determine for each resident of a nursing facility who has a mental illness, whether the resident, because of the resident's physical and mental condition, requires the level of services provided by a nursing facility and whether the resident requires specialized services for mental illness. The review and determination shall be conducted in accordance with section 1919(e)(7) of the "Social Security Act" and the regulations adopted under section 1919(f)(8)(A) of the act and based on an independent physical and mental evaluation performed by a person or entity other than the department. The review and determination shall be completed promptly after a nursing facility has notified the department that there has been a significant change in the resident's mental or physical condition. (D)(1) In the case of a nursing facility resident who has continuously resided in a nursing facility for at least thirty months before the date of a review and determination under division (C) of this section, if the resident is determined not to require the level of services provided by a nursing facility, but is determined to require specialized services for mental illness, the department, in consultation with the resident's family or legal representative and care givers, shall do all of the following: (a) Inform the resident of the institutional and noninstitutional alternatives covered under the state plan for medical assistance; (b) Offer the resident the choice of remaining in the nursing facility or receiving covered services in an alternative institutional or noninstitutional setting; (c) Clarify the effect on eligibility for services under the state plan for medical assistance if the resident chooses to leave the facility, including its effect on readmission to the facility; (d) Provide for or arrange for the provision of specialized services for the resident's mental illness in the setting chosen by the resident. (2) In the case of a nursing facility resident who has continuously resided in a nursing facility for less than thirty months before the date of the review and determination under division (C) of this section, if the resident is determined not to require the level of services provided by a nursing facility, but is determined to require specialized services for mental illness, or if the resident is determined to require neither the level of services provided by a nursing facility nor specialized services for mental illness, the department shall act in accordance with its alternative disposition plan approved by the United States department of health and human services under section 1919(e)(7)(E) of the "Social Security Act." (3) In the case of an individual who is determined under division (B) or (C) of this section to require both the level of services provided by a nursing facility and specialized services for mental illness, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall provide or arrange for the provision of the specialized services needed by the individual or resident while residing in a nursing facility. (E) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that do all of the following: (1) Establish criteria to be used in making the determinations required by divisions (B) and (C) of this section. The criteria shall not exceed the criteria established by regulations adopted by the United States department of health and human services under section 1919(f)(8)(A) of the "Social Security Act." (2) Specify information to be provided by the individual or nursing facility resident being assessed; (3) Specify any circumstances, in addition to circumstances listed in division (B) of this section, under which determinations under divisions (B) and (C) of this section are not required to be made. Sec. 5119.41. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall implement the residential state supplement program under which the state supplements the amounts received by aged, blind, or disabled adults as supplemental security income payments under Title XVI of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1381 et seq., or as social security benefits or social security disability insurance benefits under Title II of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 401 et seq. Residential state supplement payments shall be used for the provision of accommodations, supervision, and personal care services to recipients of supplemental security income payments, social security benefits, and social security disability insurance benefits who the department determines are at risk of needing institutional care. In implementing the program, the department may designate one or more entities to be responsible for providing administrative services regarding the program. The department may designate an entity either by entering into a contract with the entity to provided provide the services or by otherwise delegating to the entity the responsibility to provide the services. (B) To be eligible for residential state supplement payments, an individual must satisfy all eligibility requirements established by rules adopted under this section. (C) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services and the medicaid director shall adopt rules as necessary to implement the residential state supplement program, including the requirements that an individual must satisfy to be eligible for payments under the program. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. The rules adopted by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may establish the method to be used to determine the payment an eligible individual will receive under the program. The amount the general assembly appropriates for the program may be a factor included in the method that director establishes. To the extent permitted by Title XVI of the "Social Security Act" and any other provision of federal law, the rules adopted by the medicaid director may establish standards for adjusting the eligibility requirements concerning the level of impairment an individual must have so that the amount appropriated for the program by the general assembly is adequate for the number of eligible individuals. The rules shall not limit the eligibility of individuals who are disabled solely on a basis classifying disabilities as physical or mental. (D) The county department of job and family services of the county in which an applicant for the residential state supplement program resides or the department of medicaid shall determine whether the applicant meets income and resource requirements for the program. The county department of job and family services or the department of medicaid shall notify each individual who is denied approval for payments under the program of the individual's right to a hearing. On request, the hearing shall be provided in accordance with section 5101.35 of the Revised Code. (E) An individual in a licensed or certified living arrangement receiving state supplementation on November 15, 1990, under former section 5101.531 of the Revised Code shall not become ineligible for payments under this program solely by reason of the individual's living arrangement as long as the individual remains in the living arrangement in which the individual resided on November 15, 1990. Sec. 5119.42. (A) As used in this section, "private, nonprofit organization" means a private association, organization, corporation, or other entity that is tax exempt under section 501(a) and described in section 501(c) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 501. (B) To the extent funds are available and on application by boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may approve state reimbursement of, or state grants for, community construction programs including residential housing for persons with severe mental disabilities and persons with substance use disorders. The director may also approve an application for reimbursement or a grant for such programs submitted by other governmental entities or by private, nonprofit organizations, after the application has been reviewed and recommended for approval or disapproval by the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services for the district from which the application came, and the application is consistent with the board's approved community addiction and mental health plan submitted under division (A) of section 340.03 of the Revised Code and the board's approved budget and list of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports submitted under divisions (A) and (B) of section 340.08 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that specify procedures for applying for state reimbursement of and state grants for community construction programs, including residential housing for persons with severe mental disabilities and persons with substance use disorders and procedures and criteria for approval of such reimbursement and grants. (2) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall not approve state reimbursement or a state grant unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The applicant includes with the application a plan specifying the services, in addition to housing, that will be provided to persons who will reside in the residential housing. Services specified may include any of the services described in section 340.09 of the Revised Code. (b) The director is satisfied that the residential housing for persons with severe mental disabilities will be developed to promote the maximum practical integration of persons with severe mental disabilities with persons at the same site who do not have severe mental disabilities. (c) The use of any funds distributed pursuant to the reimbursement or grant will not subject any obligation from which the funds are derived to federal income taxation. (3) The director may enter into an agreement establishing terms for any reimbursement or grant approved under this division with the organization, board, or other government entity that is the recipient of the reimbursement or grant. Any such agreement is subject to any covenant or agreement pertaining to any obligation issued to provide funds for the reimbursement or grant. Sec. 5119.421. (A) This section applies to a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, another governmental entity, or a private, nonprofit organization that received a grant or reimbursement under section 5119.42 of the Revised Code for a facility on which the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services holds a security interest. (B) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, another governmental entity, or a private, nonprofit organization to which this section applies may apply to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services for approval to sell its facility and acquire, construct, or renovate a replacement facility pursuant to this section. The director shall prescribe the form of the application. Before submitting an application to the director, a governmental entity or private, nonprofit organization must obtain approval of the application from the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services with jurisdiction over the service district in which the existing facility is located. The director shall approve an application for a replacement project upon determining that the project provides for the continuation of appropriate mental health and addiction services to the population served by the board, entity, or organization. (C) A board, entity, or organization that obtains approval for a project under division (B) of this section shall pay the proceeds of the sale of its facility to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The director shall deposit the proceeds to the credit of the community capital replacement facilities fund. (D) When a board, entity, or organization that has sold its facility notifies the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services that it is ready to acquire, construct, or renovate a replacement facility, the director shall do one of the following: (1) If the replacement facility is located in the same alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district as the original facility, and if the purposes for which the replacement facility will be used are the same as or similar to those for the original facility, the director shall pay to the board, entity, or organization from the community capital replacement facilities fund an amount equal to the lesser of an amount equal to the proceeds of the sale of the original facility or the amount of the state's agreed-upon participation (as a per cent of the total cost) in the cost of the replacement facility. If the amount of the state's agreed-upon participation in the cost of the replacement facility is less than the value of the state's security interest in the original facility, the difference between the state's agreed-upon participation in the cost of the replacement facility and the value of the state's security interest in the original facility shall be retained in the community capital replacement facilities fund, and any excess proceeds shall be paid to the board, entity, or organization. (2) If the replacement facility is located in a different alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district than the original facility, or if the purposes for which the replacement facility will be used are not the same as or similar to those for the original facility, the director shall request controlling board approval for release of funds for the project. If the controlling board so approves, the director shall pay to the board, entity, or organization from the community capital replacement facilities fund the lesser of an amount equal to the proceeds of the sale of the original facility or the amount of the state's agreed-upon participation (as a per cent of the total cost) in the cost of the replacement facility. If the amount of the state's agreed-upon participation in the cost of the replacement facility is less than the value of the state's security interest in the original facility, the difference between the state's agreed-upon participation in the cost of the replacement facility and the value of the state's security interest in the original facility shall be retained in the community capital replacement facilities fund, and any excess proceeds shall be paid to the board, entity, or organization. (E) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services and a board, entity, or organization shall enter into an agreement specifying the terms of any payment made to the board, entity, or organization under division (D) of this section. The terms may include provision for the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services to hold a security interest in the facility. (F)(1) When approving an application under division (B) of this section, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall establish a deadline by which the board, entity, or organization must notify the director that it is ready to acquire, construct, or renovate a replacement facility. If the board, entity, or organization does not notify the director on or before the deadline, the director may cancel the project. Upon canceling the project, the director shall pay to the board, entity, or organization from the community capital replacement facilities fund an amount equal to the portion of the proceeds of the sale of the original facility that exceeds the value of the state's security interest in the facility. (2) Notwithstanding the deadline established under division (F)(1) of this section, if at any time a board, entity, or organization notifies the director that it does not intend to acquire, construct, or renovate a replacement facility under this section, the director shall cancel the replacement project and pay to the board, entity, or organization from the community capital replacement facilities fund an amount equal to the portion of the proceeds of the sale of the original facility that exceeds the value of the state's security interest in the facility. (G) If a replacement project is canceled after the sale of the original facility, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall use funds equal to the value of the state's security interest in the original facility for additional grants or reimbursements under section 5119.42 of the Revised Code. The director shall obtain the approval of the controlling board before releasing the additional grants or reimbursements. (H) The community capital replacement facilities fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall use the fund for the purposes of this section. Sec. 5119.43. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may enter into agreements with any person, political subdivision, or state agency for the sale or lease of land or facilities under the jurisdiction of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services in the following manner: (1) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall designate lands and facilities that are not needed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and are under the jurisdiction of the department. (2) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall have a preliminary appraisal made of any lands or facilities designated under division (A)(1) of this section by a disinterested professional appraiser from the department of administrative services. The appraiser shall deliver to the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services a signed certificate of the probable market value of the lands and facilities as determined from the preliminary appraisal. (3) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall certify to the clerk of the house of representatives and to the clerk of the senate a list of all lands and facilities which may be sold or leased, and shall include with the list the results of the preliminary appraisals of the lands and facilities, a general description of the land and facilities, and a description of the current use of the land and facilities. (4) Every list of lands and facilities certified by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services to the clerk of the house of representatives and to the clerk of the senate under division (A)(3) of this section, shall immediately be transmitted by the respective clerks to the committees in the house and the senate to which land conveyance bills are usually referred. If either committee files in its clerk's office, within sixty calendar days of the original certification of the lands and facilities by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, a report disapproving the sale or lease of any lands or facilities, the sale or lease of the lands or facilities disapproved in the report shall not be made under this section. With respect to a sale or lease of lands and facilities that has not been disapproved under this division, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall certify those lands and facilities to the director of administrative services. (5) After certification to the director of administrative services under division (A)(4) of this section, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall have a formal appraisal made of the lands and facilities by a disinterested professional appraiser from the department of administrative services. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may accept the formal appraisal or may reject it and order a new formal appraisal by a disinterested professional appraiser who shall not be from the department of administrative services. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may then sell or lease the lands or facilities in accordance with this division and department of administrative services procedures as set forth in Chapter 123. of the Revised Code. Any such deed or lease shall be prepared and recorded pursuant to section 5301.13 of the Revised Code. The department of administrative services shall be the sole agent for the state and shall complete the sale or lease of the lands or facilities, up to and including the closing thereof, after the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services approves the sale price. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services and the director of administrative services may, if it is determined to be in the best interests of the state, agree to sell surplus land for an amount less than the formal appraised value but shall not sell any land for less than two-thirds of the formal appraised value. (B) Coincident with the certification made under division (A)(3) of this section concerning lands which may be sold, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall give written notice of intention to sell the lands by certified mail to the executive officer of each county, township, municipal corporation, and school district within which the lands are situated. In each notice, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall specify the conditions under which the lands shall be sold, including whether the lands will be sold as a single unit or sold in specific parcels that the director designates, and shall solicit from the subdivision offers to purchase the lands in accordance with the conditions the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services has specified and at a price equal to the preliminary appraised value determined pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section. If, within thirty days of having certified the lands to the director of administrative services under division (A)(4) of this section, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services receives from the executive officer of a subdivision a written offer to purchase the lands at or above the price specified in the original notice from the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services to the officer, provided such offer otherwise complies with the conditions of purchase specified in the original notice from the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall forthwith enter into an agreement to sell the lands to the subdivision. The agreement shall incorporate any and all terms that are acceptable to both parties and that are consistent with the terms specified in the original notice from the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services. If no offer to purchase is received by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services within the thirty-day period provided in this division, the original notice from the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall be considered withdrawn and the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall be under no obligation to sell any of the lands specified in the notice to the subdivision. If two or more offers to purchase the same parcels of land are received by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services within the required time period from the executive officers of two or more subdivisions, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall accept the offer or offers to purchase that the director considers to be in the best interests of the state and of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and shall proceed to enter into agreements of sale pursuant to this division. If all of the original notices from the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services relating to a given parcel of land become withdrawn, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may thereupon proceed to sell the parcel as otherwise provided in this section. No subdivision may commence an action to enforce the provisions of this division, or to seek any other legal or equitable remedy relative to this division, with respect to any lands certified to the director of administrative services under division (A)(4) of this section, except within sixty days of the date on which the lands were so certified. (C) Any agreement under this section shall be at such terms as will be in the best interests of the state and the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. However, the terms of any agreement for sale shall include a provision that the purchaser will abide by any comprehensive plan for the area that has been adopted by the local government in which the property is located before the parties enter into the agreement. No lease shall be of a duration greater than fifteen years. No agreement, except an agreement entered into under division (B) of this section, shall be entered into before the proposal to sell or lease the land or facilities has been advertised once each week for four weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in every county in which the lands or facilities are located and if the preliminary appraised value of the land to be sold or leased is more than one hundred thousand dollars, advertisement shall be made once each week for four weeks in at least two newspapers in the state having a daily circulation of one hundred thousand or more. If a city in this state is served by more than one newspaper having a circulation of one hundred thousand or more, advertisement may be made in only one of the newspapers serving the city. (D) Each deed or lease prepared and recorded pursuant to this section shall contain a recital stating that all provisions of this section have been complied with. The recital shall be considered binding and conclusive against all subdivisions of the state provided no action has been commenced pursuant to division (B) of this section. Any deed or lease containing such a recital shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with this section insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or transferees of the property is concerned. (E) Nothing in this section shall be construed as establishing a precedent for the disposal of state lands and facilities by other departments of the state. Sec. 5119.431. When it is necessary for a state institution under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services to acquire any real estate, right of way, or easement in real estate in order to accomplish the purposes for which it was organized or is being conducted, and the department is unable to agree with the owner of such property upon the price to be paid therefor, such property may be appropriated in the manner provided for the appropriation of property for other state purposes. Any instrument by which real property is acquired pursuant to this section shall identify the agency of the state that has the use and benefit of the real property as specified in section 5301.012 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.44. As used in this section, "free clinic" has the same meaning as in section 2305.2341 of the Revised Code. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may provide certain goods and services for the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, the department of developmental disabilities, the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department of youth services, and other state, county, or municipal agencies requesting such goods and services when the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services determines that it is in the public interest, and considers it advisable, to provide these goods and services. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services also may provide goods and services to agencies operated by the United States government and to public or private nonprofit agencies, other than free clinics, that are funded in whole or in part by the state if the public or private nonprofit agencies are designated for participation in this program by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services for community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers, the director of developmental disabilities for community developmental disabilities agencies, the director of rehabilitation and correction for community rehabilitation and correction agencies, or the director of youth services for community youth services agencies. Designated community agencies or services providers shall receive goods and services through the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services only in those cases where the designating state agency certifies that providing such goods and services to the agency or services provider will conserve public resources to the benefit of the public and where the provision of such goods and services is considered feasible by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (B) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may permit free clinics to purchase certain goods and services to the extent the purchases fall within the exemption to the Robinson-Patman Act, 15 U.S.C. 13 et seq., applicable to nonprofit institutions, in 15 U.S.C. 13c, as amended. (C) The goods and services that may be provided by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under divisions (A) and (B) of this section may include: (1) Procurement, storage, processing, and distribution of food and professional consultation on food operations; (2) Procurement, storage, and distribution of medical and laboratory supplies, dental supplies, medical records, forms, optical supplies, and sundries; (3) Procurement, storage, repackaging, distribution, and dispensing of drugs, the provision of professional pharmacy consultation, and drug information services; (4) Other goods and services. (D) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may provide the goods and services designated in division (C) of this section to its institutions and to state-operated community-based mental health or addiction services providers. (E) After consultation with and advice from the director of developmental disabilities, the director of rehabilitation and correction, and the director of youth services, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may provide the goods and services designated in division (C) of this section to the department of developmental disabilities, the department of rehabilitation and correction, and the department of youth services. (F) The cost of administration of this section shall be determined by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and paid by the agencies, services providers, or free clinics receiving the goods and services to the department for deposit in the state treasury to the credit of the Ohio pharmacy services fund, which is hereby created. The fund shall be used to pay the cost of administration of this section to the department. (G) Whenever a state agency fails to make a payment for goods and services provided under this section within thirty-one days after the date the payment was due, the office of budget and management may transfer moneys from the state agency to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The amount transferred shall not exceed the amount of overdue payments. Prior to making a transfer under this division, the office of budget and management shall apply any credits the state agency has accumulated in payments for goods and services provided under this section. (H) Purchases of goods and services under this section are not subject to section 307.86 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.45. Unless otherwise specifically provided by law, all moneys received by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services from the sale of goods and services, including, but not limited to, shared service agreements with other governmental entities and nongovernmental entities, employee housing and cafeteria receipts, fees for copying services, and sales of other tangible personal property under the department's control, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the sale of goods and services fund, which is hereby created. Moneys received by the department pursuant to section 5119.44 of the Revised Code shall not be paid into the fund. The department shall use the moneys in the fund for paying operating expenses of the department. Sec. 5119.46. There is hereby created in the state treasury the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services trust fund. Not later than the first day of September of each year, the director of mental health and addiction services shall certify to the director of budget and management the amount of all of the unexpended, unencumbered balances of general revenue fund appropriations made to the department of mental health and addiction services for the previous fiscal year, excluding funds appropriated for rental payments to the Ohio public facilities commission. On receipt of the certification, the director of budget and management shall transfer cash to the trust fund in an amount up to, but not exceeding, the total of the amounts certified by the director of mental health and addiction services. In addition, the The trust fund shall receive all amounts, subject to any provisions in bond documents, received from the sale or lease of lands and facilities by the department. All moneys in the trust fund shall be used by the department of mental health and addiction services to pay for expenditures the department incurs in performing any of its duties under this chapterare subject to appropriation by the general assembly or may be used with the approval of the controlling board. The use of moneys in the trust fund pursuant to this section does not represent an ongoing commitment to the continuation of the trust fund or to the use of moneys in the trust fund. Sec. 5119.47. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall administer the problem casino gambling and addictions fund. The director shall use the money in the fund to support gambling addiction services, alcohol and drug addiction services, other services that relate to gambling addiction and substance abuse, and research that relates to gambling addiction and substance abuse. Treatment and prevention services supported by money in the fund under this section shall be services that are certified by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The director shall prepare an annual report describing the use of the fund for these purposes. The director shall submit the report to the Ohio casino control commission, the speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives, the president and minority leader of the senate, and the governor. Sec. 5119.48. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall create the all roads lead to home program. The program shall include all of the following initiatives: (1) A media campaign. As part of the campaign, the department shall develop public service announcements and shall make the announcements available to television and radio media outlets. The announcements shall be made available beginning on January 1, 2018, and . Thereafter, the announcements shall be made at least twice annually, once between January and March of each year, and once in September of each year as part of national recovery month. (2) A web site as that meets the requirements described in division (C) of this section; (3) A twenty-four-hour hotline, that is operated by a call center, for the purpose of helping individuals access addiction services. (B) The media campaign described in division (A)(1) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Include messages to reduce the stigma associated with seeking help for drug addiction; (2) Provide directions for people who are in need of drug addiction assistance to a web-based location that includes all of the following: (a) Information on where to find help for drug addiction; (b) Information on intervention and referral options; (c) Contact information for county board boards of alcohol, drug addiction assistance authorities, and mental health services. (3) Prioritize its efforts in media markets that have the highest rates of drug overdose deaths in this state; (4) Utilize television and radio public service announcements provided to media outlets, as well as internet advertising models such as low-cost social media outlets. (C) Before January 1, 2018, for purposes of division (A)(2) of this section, the department shall create a web site as described in division (A)(2) of this section that is interactive and offers all of the following components: (1) If reasonably available for use, an evidence-based self-reporting screening tool approved by the department's medical director; (2) Community detoxification and withdrawal management options and community treatment options; (3) A searchable database of certified substance abuse providers organized by zip code; (4) Information on recovery supports, including recovery housing residences; (5) Clinical information regarding what a person may expect during detoxification, withdrawal, and treatment. (D) The department may contract with private vendors for the creation and maintenance of the interactive web site described in division (C) of this section. Sec. 5119.49. (A) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall collaborate with the state board of pharmacy and attorney general in the establishment and administration of a drug take-back program, as provided under section 4729.69 of the Revised Code. (B) The department may accept grants, gifts, or donations for purposes of the program. Money received under this division shall be deposited into the drug take-back program fund established under section 109.90 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.50. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may accept, hold, and administer in trust on behalf of the state, if it is for the public interest, any grant, gift, devise, or bequest of money or property made to the state for the use or benefit of any institution described in section 5119.14 of the Revised Code or for the use and benefit of persons with mental illnesses under its control. If the trust so provides, the money or property may be used for any work which the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services is authorized to undertake. The department shall keep such gift, grant, devise, or bequest as a distinct property or fund and, if it is in money, shall invest it in the manner provided by law. The department may deposit in a proper trust company or savings bank any money left in trust during a specified life or lives and shall adopt rules governing the deposit, transfer, withdrawal, or investment of such money and the income thereof. The department shall, in the manner prescribed by the director of budget and management pursuant to section 126.21 of the Revised Code, account for all money or property received or expended under this section. The records, together with a statement certified by the depository showing the funds deposited there to the credit of the trust, shall be open to public inspection. The director of budget and management may require the department to file a report with the director on any particular portion, or the whole, of any trust property received or expended by it. The department shall, upon the expiration of any trust according to its terms, dispose of the funds or property held thereunder in the manner provided in the instrument creating the trust. If the instrument creating the trust failed to make any terms of disposition, or if no trust was in evidence, then the decedent patient's money, saving or commercial deposits, dividends or distributions, bonds, or any other interest-bearing debt certificate or stamp issued by the United States government shall escheat to the state. All such unclaimed intangible personal property of a former patient shall be retained by the managing officer in such institution for the period of one year, during which time every possible effort shall be made to find such former patient or the former patient's legal representative. If, after a period of one year from the time the patient has left the institution or has died, the managing officer has been unable to locate such person or the person's legal representative, then upon proper notice of such fact the director shall at that time formulate in writing a method of disposition on the minutes of the department authorizing the managing officer to convert such intangible personal property to cash to be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund. The department shall include in its annual report a statement of all money and property and the terms and conditions relating thereto. Sec. 5119.51. (A) As used in this section, "supplemental services" has the same meaning as in section 5815.28 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby created in the state treasury the services fund for individuals with mental illness. On the death of the beneficiary of a trust created pursuant to section 5815.28 of the Revised Code, the portion of the remaining assets of the trust specified in the trust instrument shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Money credited to the fund shall be used for individuals with mental illness. Supplemental services may be provided through the department or boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services. In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section. Sec. 5119.52. Each managing officer of an institution under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services as described in section 5119.14 of the Revised Code, with the approval of the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, may establish local institution funds designated as follows: (A) Industrial and entertainment fund created and maintained for the entertainment and welfare of the patients of the institution. The director shall establish rules for the operation of the industrial and entertainment fund. (B) Commissary fund created and maintained for the benefit of patients in the institution. Commissary revenue over and above operating costs and reserve shall be considered profits. All profits from the commissary fund operations shall be paid into the industrial and entertainment fund and used only for the entertainment and welfare of patients. The director shall establish rules for the operation of the commissary fund. Sec. 5119.54. The treasurer of state shall have charge of all funds under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and shall pay out the same only in accordance with this chapter. The department shall cause to be furnished a contract of indemnity to cover all funds received by it or by its managing officers, employees, or agents while the funds are in the possession of such managing officers, employees or agents. Such funds are designated as follows: (A) Funds which are due and payable to the treasurer of state as provided by Chapter 131. of the Revised Code; (B) Those funds which are held in trust by the managing officers, employees, or agents of the institution as local funds or accounts under the jurisdiction of the department. Such contract of indemnity shall be made payable to the state and the premium for such contract of indemnity may be paid from any of the moneys received for the use of the department under this chapter and Chapters 5121. and 5122. of the Revised Code. Funds collected from various sources, such as the sale of goods, and all miscellaneous articles, shall be transmitted on or before Monday of each week to the treasurer of state and a detailed statement of such collections shall be made to the department. Sec. 5119.55. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may pay an amount for personal use to each individual residing in a state institution as described in section 5119.14 of the Revised Code who would be eligible for supplemental security income benefits at the reduced rate established by Title XVI of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1381 et seq., if the medicaid program covers services provided in such institutions. The amount paid by the department shall not exceed the reduced supplemental security income benefit rate established by Title XVI of the "Social Security Act." Sec. 5119.56. Money or property deposited with managing officers of institutions under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services by any patient under the department's control or by relatives, guardians, conservators, and others for the special benefit of such patient, as well as all other funds and all other income paid to the patient, the patient's estate, or on the patient's behalf, or paid to the managing officer or to the institution as representative payee or otherwise paid on the patient's behalf, shall remain in the hands of such officers in appropriate accounts for use accordingly. The managing officer shall keep itemized book accounts of the receipt and disposition of such money and property, which book shall be open at all times to the inspection of the department. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall adopt rules governing the deposit, transfer, withdrawal, or investment of the funds and the income thereof, as well as rules under which such funds and income shall be paid by managing officers for the support of the patients pursuant to Chapter 5121. of the Revised Code, or for their other needs. Whenever any patient confined in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department dies, escapes, or is discharged from such institution, and any personal funds of such person remain in the hands of the managing officer thereof and no demand for such funds is made upon such managing officer by the owner of the funds or the owner's legally appointed representative, the managing officer shall hold the funds in the personal deposit fund for a period of at least one year during which time the managing officer shall make every effort possible to locate the owner or the owner's legally appointed representative. If at the end of this period no demand has been made for the funds, the managing officer shall dispose of the funds as follows: (A) All money in a personal deposit fund in excess of ten dollars due for the support of a patient shall be paid in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5121. of the Revised Code. (B) All money in a personal deposit fund in excess of ten dollars not due for the support of a patient shall be placed to the credit of the institution's local account designated as the "industrial and entertainment" fund. (C) The first ten dollars to the credit of a patient shall be placed to the credit of the institution's local account designated as the "industrial and entertainment" fund. Whenever any patient in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the department dies, escapes, or is discharged from such institution, and any personal effects of such person remain in the hands of the managing officer thereof, and no demand is made upon such managing officer by the owner of the property or the owner's legally appointed representative, the managing officer shall hold and dispose of such property in the following manner. All the miscellaneous personal effects shall be held for a period of at least one year, during which time the managing officer shall make every effort possible to locate the owner or the owner's legal representative. If at the end of this period, no demand has been made by the owner of the property or the owner's legal representative, the managing officer shall file with the county recorder of the county of commitment of such owner, all deeds, wills, contract mortgages, or assignments. The balance of the personal effects shall be sold at public auction after being duly advertised, and the funds turned over to the treasurer of state for credit to the general revenue fund. If any of the property is not of a type to be filed with the county recorder and is not salable at public auction, then the managing officer of the institution shall destroy such property. Sec. 5119.60. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall submit an annual report to the governor that shall describe the services the department offers and how appropriated funds have been spent. The report shall include all of the following: (A) The utilization of state hospitals by each alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district; (B) The number of persons served by community addiction services providers that receive funds distributed by the department, with a breakdown into categories including age, sex, race, the type of drug to which the person is addicted, and any other categories the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services considers significant; (C) The number of persons with severe mental disabilities served in each district; (D) The number and types of addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports provided to persons with severe mental disabilities through state-operated services, community addiction services providers, and community mental health services providers; (E) A report measuring the success of community addiction services providers, based on the measures for accountability developed by the department, including the percentage of persons served by such community addiction services providers who have not relapsed; (F) Any other information that the director considers significant or is requested by the governor. Sec. 5119.61. (A) The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall collect and compile statistics and other information on the care and treatment of persons with mental disabilities, and the care, treatment, and rehabilitation of persons with alcohol use disorder, persons with drug dependencies, persons in danger of drug dependence, and persons with or in danger of developing a gambling addiction in this state. The information shall include, without limitation, information on the number of such persons, the type of drug involved, if any, the type of care, treatment, or rehabilitation prescribed or undertaken, and the success or failure of the care, treatment, or rehabilitation. The department shall collect information about addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports delivered and persons served as required for reporting and evaluation relating to state and federal funds expended for such purposes. (B) No community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider shall fail to supply statistics and other information within its knowledge and with respect to its addiction services, mental health services, and recovery supports upon request of the department. (C) Communications by a person seeking aid in good faith for alcohol use disorder or drug dependence are confidential, and this section does not require the collection or permit the disclosure of information which reveals or comprises the identity of any person seeking aid. (D) Based on the information collected and compiled under division (A) of this section, the department shall develop a project to assess the outcomes of persons served by community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers that receive funds distributed by the department. (E) The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services may fine a community addiction services provider or community mental health services provider for violating division (B) of this section. In determining whether to impose a fine, the director shall consider whether the provider has engaged in a pattern of noncompliance. If a fine is imposed, it shall be one thousand dollars for a first failure to comply with division (B) of this section and two thousand dollars for each subsequent failure. The director's actions in imposing a fine shall be taken in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. All fines collected under this division shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the department's statewide treatment and prevention fund created by section 4301.30 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5119.71. Pursuant to Article X of the compact set forth in section 5119.70 of the Revised Code, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services and the director of developmental disabilities each shall designate an officer who shall be the compact administrator for the department and who, acting jointly with like officers of other party states, shall adopt rules to carry out more effectively the terms of the compact. The compact administrators of each department shall serve subject to the pleasure of the governor and shall cooperate with all departments, agencies, and officers of and in the government of this state and its subdivisions in facilitating the proper administration of the compact or of any supplementary agreements entered into by this state thereunder. Sec. 5119.82. There is hereby established a 9-8-8 administrator within the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services to oversee the administration of the 9-8-8 suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system statewide. Sec. 5119.85. (A) As used in this section, "telephone company" has the same meaning as in section 128.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Except for willful or wanton misconduct, a telephone company, a provider of interconnected voice over internet protocol service, and any other installer, maintainer, or provider, through the sale or otherwise, of customer premises equipment, or service used for or with the 9-8-8 hotline, and their respective officers, directors, employees, agents, suppliers, corporate parents, and affiliates are not liable in damages in a civil action for injuries, death or loss to persons or property incurred by any person resulting from such an entity's or its officers', directors', employees', agents', or suppliers' participation in or acts or omissions in connection with participating in or developing, maintaining, or operating the 9-8-8 hotline. Sec. 5119.89. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall consult with the superintendent of insurance as required by section 3901.90 of the Revised Code to develop consumer and payer education on mental behavioral health and addiction services insurance parity and establish and promote a consumer hotline to collect information and help consumers understand and access their insurance benefits. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and the department of insurance shall jointly report annually on the departments' efforts, which shall include information on consumer and payer outreach activities and identification of trends and barriers to access and coverage in this state. The departments shall submit the report to the general assembly, the joint medicaid oversight committee, and the governor, not later than the thirtieth day of January of each year. Sec. 5119.90. As used in sections 5119.90 to 5119.98 of the Revised Code: (A) "Alcohol and other drug abuse" means alcohol use disorder or drug addiction. (B) "Another drug" means a controlled substance as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code or a harmful intoxicant as defined in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services" means a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services established under section 340.02 or 340.021 of the Revised Code. (D) "Danger" or "threat of danger to self, family, or others" means substantial physical harm or threat of substantial physical harm upon self, family, or others. (E) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 3701.01 or 3727.01 of the Revised Code but does not include either a hospital operated by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services or an inpatient unit licensed by the department. (F) "Intoxicated" means being under the influence of alcohol, another drug, or both alcohol and another drug and, as a result, having a significantly impaired ability to function. (G) "Petitioner" means a person who institutes a proceeding under sections 5119.91 to 5119.98 of the Revised Code. (H) "Probate court" means the probate division of the court of common pleas. (I) "Qualified health professional" means a person that is properly credentialed or licensed to conduct a drug and alcohol assessment and diagnosis under Ohio law. (J) "Residence" means the legal residence of a person as determined by applicable principles governing conflicts of law. (K) "Respondent" means a person alleged in a petition filed or hearing under sections 5119.91 to 5119.98 of the Revised Code to be a person who is experiencing alcohol and other drug abuse and who may be ordered under those sections to undergo treatment. (L) "Treatment" means services and programs for the care and rehabilitation of intoxicated persons and persons experiencing alcohol and other drug abuse. "Treatment" includes residential treatment, a halfway house setting, and an intensive outpatient or outpatient level of care. Sec. 5119.99. (A) Whoever violates section 5119.333 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. (B) Whoever violates section 5119.27 or 5119.28, division (P)(O) of section 5119.36, or division (A)(1) or (2) of section 5119.37 of the Revised Code is guilty of a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 5120.034. (A)(1) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall permit representatives of all nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that are registered with the department to enter institutions under the control of the department for the purpose of providing reentry services to inmates. Reentry services may include, but are not limited to, counseling, housing, job-placement, and money-management assistance. (2) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the screening and registration of nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that apply to provide reentry services in institutions under the department's control. (B)(1) The department shall post a department telephone number on the department's official internet web site that nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that wish to provide reentry services to inmates may call to obtain information. The internet web site also shall list all of the nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that are registered with the department under this section. (2) The department shall actively recruit nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations to provide reentry services in institutions under the department's control. The department shall recruit nonprofit organizations from all faiths and beliefs. (C) Annually, the department shall issue a written report on the department's progress in implementing the recommendations of the correctional faith-based initiatives task force. The department shall provide a copy of the written report to each member of the correctional institution inspection committee created under section 103.71 of the Revised Codethe general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. (D) The department shall not endorse or sponsor any faith-based reentry program or endorse any specific religious message. The department may not require an inmate to participate in a faith-based program. Sec. 5120.035. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Community treatment provider" means a program that provides substance use disorder assessment and treatment for persons and that satisfies all of the following: (a) It is located outside of a state correctional institution. (b) It shall provide the assessment and treatment for qualified prisoners referred and transferred to it under this section in a suitable facility that is licensed pursuant to division (C) (D) of section 2967.14 of the Revised Code. (c) All qualified prisoners referred and transferred to it under this section shall reside initially in the suitable facility specified in division (A)(1)(b) of this section while undergoing the assessment and treatment. (2) "Electronic monitoring device" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "State correctional institution" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Qualified prisoner" means a person who satisfies all of the following: (a) The person is confined in a state correctional institution under a prison term imposed for a felony of the third, fourth, or fifth degree that is not an offense of violence. (b) The department of rehabilitation and correction determines, using a standardized assessment tool, that the person has a substance use disorder. (c) The person has not more than twelve months remaining to be served under the prison term described in division (A)(4)(a) of this section. (d) The person is not serving any prison term other than the term described in division (A)(4)(a) of this section. (e) The person is eighteen years of age or older. (f) The person does not show signs of drug or alcohol withdrawal and does not require medical detoxification. (g) As determined by the department of rehabilitation and correction, the person is physically and mentally capable of uninterrupted participation in the substance use disorder treatment program established under division (B) of this section. (B) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall establish and operate a program for community-based substance use disorder treatment for qualified prisoners. The purpose of the program shall be to provide substance use disorder assessment and treatment through community treatment providers to help reduce substance use relapses and recidivism for qualified prisoners while preparing them for reentry into the community and improving public safety. (C)(1) The department shall determine which qualified prisoners in its custody should be placed in the substance use disorder treatment program established under division (B) of this section. The department has full discretion in making that determination. If the department determines that a qualified prisoner should be placed in the program, the department may refer the prisoner to a community treatment provider the department has approved under division (E) of this section for participation in the program and transfer the prisoner from the state correctional institution to the provider's approved and licensed facility. Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(3) of this section, no prisoner shall be placed under the program in any facility other than a facility of a community treatment provider that has been so approved. If the department places a prisoner in the program, the prisoner shall receive credit against the prisoner's prison term for all time served in the provider's approved and licensed facility and may earn days of credit under section 2967.193 or 2967.194 of the Revised Code, but otherwise neither the placement nor the prisoner's participation in or completion of the program shall result in any reduction of the prisoner's prison term. (2) If the department places a prisoner in the substance use disorder treatment program, the prisoner does not satisfactorily participate in the program, and the prisoner has not served the prisoner's entire prison term, the department may remove the prisoner from the program and return the prisoner to a state correctional institution. (3) If the department places a prisoner in the substance use disorder treatment program and the prisoner is satisfactorily participating in the program, the department may permit the prisoner to reside at a residence approved by the department if the department determines, with input from the community treatment provider, that residing at the approved residence will help the prisoner prepare for reentry into the community and will help reduce substance use relapses and recidivism for the prisoner. If a prisoner is permitted under this division to reside at a residence approved by the department, the prisoner shall be monitored during the period of that residence by an electronic monitoring device. (D)(1) When a prisoner has been placed in the substance use disorder treatment program established under division (B) of this section, before the prisoner is released from custody of the department upon completion of the prisoner's prison term, the department shall conduct and prepare an evaluation of the prisoner, the prisoner's participation in the program, and the prisoner's needs regarding substance use disorder treatment upon release. Before the prisoner is released from custody of the department upon completion of the prisoner's prison term, the parole board or the court acting pursuant to an agreement under section 2967.29 of the Revised Code shall consider the evaluation, in addition to all other information and materials considered, as follows: (a) If the prisoner is a prisoner for whom post-release control is mandatory under section 2967.28 of the Revised Code, the board or court shall consider it in determining which post-release control sanction or sanctions to impose upon the prisoner under that section. (b) If the prisoner is a prisoner for whom post-release control is not mandatory under section 2967.28 of the Revised Code, the board or court shall consider it in determining whether a post-release control sanction is necessary and, if so, which post-release control sanction or sanctions to impose upon the prisoner under that section. (2) If the department determines that a prisoner it placed in the substance use disorder treatment program successfully completed the program and successfully completed a term of post-release control, if applicable, and if the prisoner submits an application under section 2953.32 or the prosecutor in the case submits an application under section 2953.39 of the Revised Code for sealing or expungement of the record of the conviction, the director may issue a letter to the court in support of the application. (E)(1) The department shall accept applications from community treatment providers that satisfy the requirement specified in division (E)(2) of this section and that wish to participate in the substance use disorder treatment program established under division (B) of this section, and shall approve for participation in the program at least four and not more than eight of the providers that apply. To the extent feasible, the department shall approve one or more providers from each geographical quadrant of the state. (2) Each community treatment provider that applies under division (E)(1) of this section to participate in the program shall have the provider's alcohol and drug addiction services that provide substance use disorder treatment certified by the department of mental health and addiction services under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. A community treatment provider is not required to have the provider's halfway house or residential treatment certified by the department of mental health and addiction services. (F) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall adopt rules for the operation of the substance use disorder treatment program it establishes under division (B) of this section and shall operate the program in accordance with this section and those rules. The rules shall establish, at a minimum, all of the following: (1) Criteria that establish which qualified prisoners are eligible for the program; (2) Criteria that must be satisfied to transfer a qualified prisoner to a residence pursuant to division (C)(3) of this section; (3) Criteria for the removal of a prisoner from the program pursuant to division (C)(2) of this section; (4) Criteria for determining when an offender has successfully completed the program for purposes of division (D)(2) of this section; (5) Criteria for community treatment providers to provide assessment and treatment, including minimum standards for treatment. Sec. 5120.16. (A) Persons sentenced to any institution, division, or place under the control of the department of rehabilitation and correction are committed to the control, care, and custody of the department. Subject to division (B)(C) of this section, the director of rehabilitation and correction or the director's designee may direct that persons sentenced to the department, or to any institution or place within the department, shall be conveyed by the sheriff initially to an appropriate facility established and maintained by the department, or committed electronically in accordance with division (B) of this section, for reception, examination, observation, and classification of the persons so sentenced. Prior to removal of an individual on an out of jurisdiction detainer, the sheriff shall convey the sentenced person to the department of rehabilitation and correction or electronically commit the sentenced person in accordance with division (B) of this section. If a presentence investigation report was not prepared pursuant to section 2947.06 or 2951.03 of the Revised Code or Criminal Rule 32.2 regarding any person sentenced to the department or to any institution or place within the department, the director or the director's designee may order the department's field staff to conduct an offender background investigation and prepare an offender background investigation report regarding the person. The investigation and report shall be conducted in accordance with division (A) of section 2951.03 of the Revised Code and the report shall contain the same information as a presentence investigation report prepared pursuant to that section. When the examination, observation, and classification of the person have been completed by the facility and a written report of the examination, observation, and classification is filed with the commitment papers, the director or the director's designee, subject to division (B) of this section, shall assign the person to a suitable state institution or place maintained by the state within the director's department or shall designate that the person is to be housed in a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, if authorized by section 5120.161 of the Revised Code, there to be confined, cared for, treated, trained, and rehabilitated until paroled, released in accordance with section 2929.20, 2967.26, 2967.28, or 5120.036 of the Revised Code, or otherwise released under the order of the court that imposed the person's sentence. No person committed by a probate court, a trial court pursuant to section 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code subsequent to a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity, or a juvenile court shall be assigned to a state correctional institution. If a person is sentenced, committed, or assigned for the commission of a felony to any one of the institutions or places maintained by the department or to a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, the department, by order duly recorded and subject to division (B) of this section, may transfer the person to any other institution, or, if authorized by section 5120.161 of the Revised Code, to a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse. (B) An agreement may be entered into between a court of common pleas and the department of rehabilitation and correction under which persons may be electronically committed to the department of rehabilitation and correction. (C) If the case of a child who is alleged to be a delinquent child is transferred for criminal prosecution to the appropriate court having jurisdiction of the offense pursuant to section 2152.12 of the Revised Code, if the child is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony in that case, if the child is sentenced to a prison term, as defined in section 2901.01 of the Revised Code, and if the child is under eighteen years of age when delivered to the custody of the department of rehabilitation and correction, all of the following apply regarding the housing of the child: (1) Until the child attains eighteen years of age, subject to divisions (B)(2)(C)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, the department shall house the child in a housing unit in a state correctional institution separate from inmates who are eighteen years of age or older. (2) The department is not required to house the child in the manner described in division (B)(1)(C)(1) of this section if the child does not observe the rules and regulations of the institution or the child otherwise creates a security risk by being housed separately. (3) If the department receives too few inmates who are under eighteen years of age to fill a housing unit in a state correctional institution separate from inmates who are eighteen years of age or older, as described in division (B)(1)(C)(1) of this section, the department may house the child in a housing unit in a state correctional institution that includes both inmates who are under eighteen years of age and inmates who are eighteen years of age or older and under twenty-one years of age. (4) Upon the child's attainment of eighteen years of age, the department may house the child with the adult population of the state correctional institution. (C)(D) The director or the director's designee shall develop a policy for dealing with problems related to infection with the human immunodeficiency virus. The policy shall include methods of identifying individuals committed to the custody of the department who are at high risk of infection with the virus and counseling those individuals. Arrangements for housing individuals diagnosed as having AIDS or an AIDS-related condition shall be made by the department based on security and medical considerations and in accordance with division (B)(C) of this section, if applicable. Sec. 5120.173. Any person who is required to report abuse or neglect of a child under eighteen years of age that is reasonably suspected or believed to have occurred or the threat of which is reasonably suspected or believed to exist pursuant to division (A) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code, any person who is permitted to report or cause a report to be made of reasonably suspected abuse or neglect of a child under eighteen years of age pursuant to division (B) of that section, any person who is required to report suspected abuse or neglect of a person with a developmental disability pursuant to division (C) of section 5123.61 of the Revised Code, and any person who is permitted to report suspected abuse or neglect of a person with a developmental disability pursuant to division (F) of that section and who makes or causes the report to be made, shall direct that report to the state highway patrol if the child or the person with a developmental disability is an inmate in the custody of a state correctional institution. If the state highway patrol determines after receipt of the report that it is probable that abuse or neglect of the inmate occurred, the patrol shall report its findings to the department of rehabilitation and correction, to the court that sentenced the inmate for the offense for which the inmate is in the custody of the department, and to the chairperson and vice-chairperson of the correctional institution inspection committee established by section 103.71 of the Revised Codeattorney general. Sec. 5120.21. (A) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall keep in its office, accessible only to its employees, except by the consent of the department or the order of the judge of a court of record, and except as provided in division (C) of this section, a record showing the name, residence, sex, age, nativity, occupation, condition, and date of entrance or commitment of every inmate in the several institutions governed by it. The record also shall include the date, cause, and terms of discharge and the condition of such person at the time of leaving, a record of all transfers from one institution to another, and, if such inmate is dead, the date and cause of death. These and other facts that the department requires shall be furnished by the managing officer of each institution within ten days after the commitment, entrance, death, or discharge of an inmate. (B) In case of an accident or injury or peculiar death of an inmate, the managing officer shall make a special report to the department within twenty-four hours thereafter, giving the circumstances as fully as possible. (C)(1) As used in this division, "medical record" means any document or combination of documents that pertains to the medical history, diagnosis, prognosis, or medical condition of a patient and that is generated and maintained in the process of medical treatment. (2) A separate medical record of every inmate in an institution governed by the department shall be compiled, maintained, and kept apart from and independently of any other record pertaining to the inmate. Upon the signed written request of the inmate to whom the record pertains together with the written request of a person the inmate designates who is either a licensed attorney at law or a licensed physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner, the department shall make the inmate's medical record available to the designated attorney, physician, or nurse. The record may be inspected or copied by the inmate's designated attorney, physician, or nurse. The department may establish a reasonable fee for the copying of any medical record. If a physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner concludes that presentation of all or any part of the medical record directly to the inmate will result in serious medical harm to the inmate, the physician or nurse shall so indicate on the medical record. An inmate's medical record shall be made available to a physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse practitioner, or attorney designated in writing by the inmate not more than once every twelve months. (D) Except as otherwise provided by a Notwithstanding any other law of this state or the United States to the contrary, the department and the officers of its institutions shall keep confidential and accessible only to its employees, except by the consent of the department or the order of a judge of a court of record, all of the following: (1) Architectural, engineering, or construction diagrams, drawings, or plans of a correctional institution; (2) Plans for hostage negotiation, for disturbance control, for the control and location of keys, and for dealing with escapes; (3) Statements made by inmate informants; (4) Records that are maintained by the department of youth services, that pertain to children in its custody, and that are released to the department of rehabilitation and correction by the department of youth services pursuant to section 5139.05 of the Revised Code; (5) Victim impact statements and information provided by victims of crimes that the department considers when determining the security level assignment, program participation, and release eligibility of inmates; (6) Information and data of any kind or medium pertaining to groups that pose a security threat; (7) Conversations recorded from the monitored inmate telephones that involve nonprivileged communications. (E)(E)(1) Records regarding inmates committed to the department of rehabilitation and correction or records of persons under the supervision of the adult parole authority are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division prohibits the disclosure of the following information related to inmates committed to the department of rehabilitation and correction: (a) Name; (b) Criminal convictions; (c) Photograph; (d) Supervision status, including current and past place of incarceration; (e) Disciplinary history. (2) Except as otherwise provided by a law of this state or the United States, the department of rehabilitation and correction may release inmate records to the department of youth services or a court of record, and the department of youth services or the court of record may use those records for the limited purpose of carrying out the duties of the department of youth services or the court of record. Inmate records released by the department of rehabilitation and correction to the department of youth services or a court of record shall remain confidential and shall not be considered public records as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (F) Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section, records of inmates committed to the department of rehabilitation and correction as well as records of persons under the supervision of the adult parole authority shall not be considered public records as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5120.51. (A)(1) If the director of rehabilitation and correction determines that a bill introduced in the general assembly is likely to have a significant more than a de minimis impact on the population of, or the cost of operating, any or all state correctional institutions under the administration of the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department shall prepare a population and cost impact statement for the bill, in accordance with division (A)(2) of this section. (2) A population and cost impact statement required for a bill shall estimate the increase or decrease in the correctional institution population that likely would result if the bill were enacted, shall estimate, in dollars, the amount by which revenues or expenditures likely would increase or decrease if the bill were enacted, and briefly shall explain each of the estimates. A population and cost impact statement required for a bill initially shall be prepared after the bill is referred to a committee of the general assembly in the house of origination but before the meeting of the committee at which the committee is scheduled to vote on whether to recommend the bill for passage. A copy of the statement shall be distributed to each member of the committee that is considering the bill and to the member of the general assembly who introduced it. If the bill is recommended for passage by the committee, the department shall update the statement before the bill is taken up for final consideration by the house of origination. A copy of the updated statement shall be distributed to each member of that house and to the member of the general assembly who introduced the bill. If the bill is passed by the house of origination and is introduced in the second house, the provisions of this division concerning the preparation, updating, and distribution of the statement in the house of origination also apply in the second house. (B) The governor or any member of the general assembly, at any time, may request the department to prepare a population and cost impact statement for any bill introduced in the general assembly. Upon receipt of a request, the department promptly shall prepare a statement that includes the estimates and explanations described in division (A)(2) of this section and present a copy of it to the governor or member who made the request. (C) In the preparation of a population and cost impact statement required by division (A) or (B) of this section, the department shall use a technologically sophisticated system capable of estimating future state correctional institution populations. The system shall have the capability to adjust its estimates based on actual and proposed changes in sentencing laws and trends, sentence durations, parole rates, crime rates, and any other data that affect state correctional institution populations. The department, in conjunction with the advisory committee appointed under division (E) of this section, shall review and update the data used in the system, not less than once every six months, to improve the accuracy of the system. (D) At least once every six months, the department shall provide, to the correctional institution inspection committee chairperson of the committee in each house that primarily handles criminal justice matters, a copy of the estimates of state correctional institution populations obtained through use of the system described in division (C) of this section and a description of the assumptions regarding sentencing laws and trends, sentence durations, parole rates, crime rates, and other relevant data that were made by the department to obtain the estimates. Additionally, a copy of the estimates and a description of the assumptions made to obtain them shall be provided, upon reasonable request, to other legislative staff, including the staff of the legislative service commission, to the office of budget and management, and to the division of criminal justice services in the department of public safety. (E) The correctional institution inspection committee attorney general shall appoint an advisory committee to review the operation of the system for estimating future state correctional institution populations that is used by the department in the preparation of population cost impact statements pursuant to this section and to join with the department in its reviews and updating of the data used in the system under division (C) of this section. The advisory committee shall be comprised of at least one prosecuting attorney, at least one common pleas court judge, at least one public defender, at least one person who is a member or staff employee of the committeethe attorney general or a representative of the attorney general, and at least one representative of the division of criminal justice services in the department of public safety. Sec. 5121.30. As used in sections 5121.30 to 5121.56 of the Revised Code: (A) "Countable assets" means all of the following: (1) Cash; (2) Bank deposits; (3) Securities; (4) Individual retirement accounts; (5) Qualified employer plans, including 401(k) and Keogh plans; (6) Annuities; (7) Funds in a trust created under section 5815.28 of the Revised Code; (8) Investment property and income; (9) The cash surrender values of life insurance policies; (10) Assets acquired by gift, bequest, devise, or inheritance; (11) Any other asset determined by the department of mental health and addiction services to be equivalent to the assets enumerated in this division. (B) "Federal poverty level" or "FPL" means the income level represented by the poverty guidelines as revised annually by the United States department of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Omnibus Reconciliation Act of 1981," 95 Stat. 511, 42 U.S.C. 9902, as amended, for a family size equal to the size of the family of the person whose income is being determined. (C) "Federal poverty guidelines" means the poverty guidelines as revised annually by the United States department of health and human services in accordance with section 673(2) of the "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981," 95 Stat. 511, 42 U.S.C. 9902, as amended, for a family size equal to the size of the family of the person whose income is being determined. (D) "Hospital" means an institution, hospital, or other place established, controlled, or supervised by the department of mental health and addiction services under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code, except when otherwise described only as a hospital operated by the department. (E) "Liable relative" means all of the following: (1) A patient's spouse; (2) A patient's mother or father, or both, if the patient is under eighteen years of age; (3) A patient's guardian. (F) "Patient" means a person admitted to a hospital for inpatient care or treatment, including a person transferred to a hospital from a state correctional institution or a person under indictment or conviction who has been transferred to a hospital. Sec. 5121.32. On an annual basis, the department of mental health and addiction services shall determine both of the following using generally accepted governmental accounting principles: (A) The applicable per diem charge for each hospital operated by the department; (B) The ancillary per diem rate for each hospital operated by the department. In determining a hospital's applicable per diem charge and ancillary per diem rate, the department shall consider the average actual per diem cost of maintaining and treating a patient at the hospital or, at the department's discretion, the average actual per diem cost of maintaining and treating a patient in a unit of the hospital. Sec. 5121.33. (A) Except as provided in sections 5121.35, 5121.43, 5121.46, 5121.47, 5121.49, and 5121.52 of the Revised Code, the department of mental health and addiction services shall, for each billing cycle, charge a patient, patient's estate, or liable relative an amount equal to the sum of the following: (A) The applicable per diem charge multiplied the amount calculated under division (B) of this section for care and treatment the patient receives in a hospital operated by the department. (B) The amount to be charged under division (A) of this section shall be calculated by multiplying the hospital's per diem charge or ancillary per diem rate determined under section 5121.32 of the Revised Code, whichever the department determines applies, by the number of days the patient was admitted to the hospital; (B) An amount that was previously billed but not paid during the period that is covered by the billing cycle. Sec. 5121.34. (A) A patient, patient's estate, and patient's liable relatives shall be jointly and severally liable for amounts charged by the department of mental health and addiction services in accordance with section 5121.33 or 5121.35 of the Revised Code. In no case shall any of the foregoing persons be liable for more than one hundred per cent of the full sum amount charged under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code. (B) Collections of support payments shall be made by the department and, subject to meeting prior requirements for payment and crediting of such collections and other available receipts, in accordance with the bond proceedings applicable to obligations issued pursuant to section 154.20 of the Revised Code. The collections and other available receipts designated by the director of mental health and addiction services for deposit in the special accounts, together with insurance contract payments provided for in section 5121.43 of the Revised Code, shall be remitted to the treasurer of state for deposit in the state treasury to the credit of the mental health operating fund, which is hereby created, to be used for the general purposes of the department. The department shall make refunds of overpayment of support charges from the mental health operating fund. Sec. 5121.41. (A) If the assets of a patient, patient's estate, or liable relative do not exceed the countable asset limit in section 5121.40 of the Revised Code and the annual income of the patient, estate, or relative does not exceed four hundred per cent of the federal poverty level, the patient, estate, or relative shall be charged an amount discounted from the amount the department charges under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code for the first thirty days the patient is admitted as an inpatient in a hospital and for which the patient is liable for the cost of care. The amount of the discount shall be computed according to the following schedule: Annual Gross Income Expressed as a Percentage of FPL 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 A Inpatient Days at a Hospital 0 - 175 176 - 199 200 - 249 250 - 299 300 - 349 350 - 400 Percentage discount from charged amount 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 A 1 - 14 100 90 70 50 30 10 B 15 - 30 100 95 75 55 35 15 (B) A patient, estate, or relative who is charged a discounted amount for the first thirty days the patient is admitted as an inpatient and who has an annual income not greater than one hundred seventy-five per cent of the federal poverty level shall not be charged for the days the patient is admitted beyond the thirtieth day. (C) A patient, estate, or relative who is charged a discounted amount for the first thirty days the patient is admitted as an inpatient and who has an annual income greater than one hundred seventy-five per cent of the federal poverty level shall be charged an amount equal to the sum of the following for the days the patient is admitted beyond the thirtieth day: (1) The ancillary per diem rate that applies to the hospital, as determined under section 5121.32 of the Revised Code, multiplied by the number of days the patient was admitted to the hospital; (2) An amount that was previously charged but not paid. Sec. 5121.43. (A) If a patient is covered by an insurance policy or other contract that provides for payment of expenses for care and treatment for mental illness at or from a hospital under the jurisdiction of operated by the department of mental health and addiction services, sections 5121.33 to 5121.55 of the Revised Code are inapplicable to the extent that the policy or contract is in force. Any insurance carrier or other third party payor providing coverage for such care and treatment shall pay for the patient's support obligation in amounts equal to the lesser of amounts charged by the department under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code or the benefits provided under the policy or other contract. Whether or not an insured, owner of, or other person having an interest in such policy or other contract is liable for support payments, the all of the following apply with respect to the amount owed to the department for such care and treatment: (1) The insured, policy owner, or other person having an interest in the policy or other contract shall assign payment directly to the department of all assignable benefits under the policy or other contract and shall pay to the department, within ten days of receipt, all insurance or other benefits received as reimbursement or payment for expenses incurred by the patient or for any other reason. If the insured, policy owner, or other person refuses to assign payment to the department or refuses to pay received reimbursements or payments to the department within ten days of receipt, the total liability of the insured, policy owner, or other person for the services is an amount equal to the per diem charge for the hospital where the patient was admitted multiplied by the number of days the patient was admitted. (2)(a) Regardless of the coverage provided by the policy or other contract, the patient, patient's estate, or patient's liable relative is liable to the department for the actual cost of care and treatment calculated under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code. (b) If the amount the department receives through the assignment of benefits, as required by division (A)(1) of this section, is less than the actual cost of care and treatment that is calculated under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code, the department shall charge the patient, patient's estate, or liable relative the lesser of the following: (i) The amount calculated under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code that remains after subtracting the amount the department receives through the assignment of benefits; (ii) The amount calculated under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code that applies after the department takes into consideration the exceptions described in sections 5121.35, 5121.46, 5121.47, 5121.49, and 5121.52 of the Revised Code. (3) In no event shall this total a patient, patient's estate, or liable relative have liability exceed under this section for an amount that exceeds either, as the case may be, the department's actual cost of providing care and treatment to a patient calculated under section 5121.33 of the Revised Code or the amount that is charged under division (A)(2)(b) of this section. (B) With respect to the requirements of division (A)(1) of this section, both of the following apply: (1) The department may disqualify patients and liable relatives who have failed to assign benefits in accordance with division (A)(1) of this section, and retained third party funds, from future discounts that otherwise may have been available. (2) The department may request that the attorney general petition a court of competent jurisdiction to compel the an insured, policy owner of, or other person having an interest in the policy or other contract to comply with the assignment requirements in of division (A)(1) of this section. Sec. 5122.01. As used in this chapter and Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code: (A) "Mental illness" means a substantial disorder of thought, mood, perception, orientation, or memory that grossly impairs judgment, behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to meet the ordinary demands of life. (B) "Person with a mental illness subject to court order" means a person with a mental illness who, because of the person's illness: (1) Represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self as manifested by evidence of threats of, or attempts at, suicide or serious self-inflicted bodily harm; (2) Represents a substantial risk of physical harm to others as manifested by evidence of recent homicidal or other violent behavior, evidence of recent threats that place another in reasonable fear of violent behavior and serious physical harm, or other evidence of present dangerousness; (3) Represents a substantial and immediate risk of serious physical impairment or injury to self as manifested by evidence that the person is unable to provide for and is not providing for the person's basic physical needs because of the person's mental illness and that appropriate provision for those needs cannot be made immediately available in the community; (4) Would benefit from treatment for the person's mental illness and is in need of such treatment as manifested by evidence of behavior that creates a grave and imminent risk to substantial rights of others or the person; (5)(a) Would benefit from treatment as manifested by evidence of behavior that indicates all of the following: (i) The person is unlikely to survive safely in the community without supervision, based on a clinical determination. (ii) The person has a history of lack of compliance with treatment for mental illness and one of the following applies: (I) At least twice within the thirty-six months prior to the filing of an affidavit seeking court-ordered treatment of the person under section 5122.111 of the Revised Code, the lack of compliance has been a significant factor in necessitating hospitalization in a hospital or receipt of services in a forensic or other mental health unit of a correctional facility, provided that the thirty-six-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the thirty-six-month period. (II) Within the forty-eight months prior to the filing of an affidavit seeking court-ordered treatment of the person under section 5122.111 of the Revised Code, the lack of compliance resulted in one or more acts of serious violent behavior toward self or others or threats of, or attempts at, serious physical harm to self or others, provided that the forty-eight-month period shall be extended by the length of any hospitalization or incarceration of the person that occurred within the forty-eight-month period. (iii) The person, as a result of the person's mental illness, is unlikely to voluntarily participate in necessary treatment. (iv) In view of the person's treatment history and current behavior, the person is in need of treatment in order to prevent a relapse or deterioration that would be likely to result in substantial risk of serious harm to the person or others. (b) An individual who meets only the criteria described in division (B)(5)(a) of this section is not subject to hospitalization. (C)(1) "Patient" means, subject to division (C)(2) of this section, a person who is admitted either voluntarily or involuntarily to a hospital or other place under section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code subsequent to a finding of not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetence to stand trial or under this chapter, who is under observation or receiving treatment in such place. (2) "Patient" does not include a person admitted to a hospital or other place under section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code to the extent that the reference in this chapter to patient, or the context in which the reference occurs, is in conflict with any provision of sections 2945.37 to 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (D) "Licensed physician" means a person licensed under the laws of this state to practice medicine or a medical officer of the government of the United States while in this state in the performance of the person's official duties. (E) "Psychiatrist" means a licensed physician who has satisfactorily completed a residency training program in psychiatry, as approved by the residency review committee of the American medical association, the committee on post-graduate education of the American osteopathic association, or the American osteopathic board of neurology and psychiatry, or who on July 1, 1989, has been recognized as a psychiatrist by the Ohio state medical association or the Ohio osteopathic association on the basis of formal training and five or more years of medical practice limited to psychiatry. (F) "Hospital" means a hospital or inpatient unit licensed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, and any institution, hospital, or other place established, controlled, or supervised by the department under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code. (G) "Public hospital" means a facility that is tax-supported and under the jurisdiction of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (H) "Community mental health services provider" means an agency, association, corporation, individual, or program that provides community mental health services that are certified by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services under section 5119.36 of the Revised Code. (I) "Licensed clinical psychologist" means a person who holds a current, valid psychologist license issued under section 4732.12 of the Revised Code, and in addition, meets the educational requirements set forth in division (B) of section 4732.10 of the Revised Code and has a minimum of two years' full-time professional experience, or the equivalent as determined by rule of the state board of psychology, at least one year of which shall be a predoctoral internship, in clinical psychological work in a public or private hospital or clinic or in private practice, diagnosing and treating problems of mental illness or intellectual disability under the supervision of a psychologist who is licensed or who holds a diploma issued by the American board of professional psychology, or whose qualifications are substantially similar to those required for licensure by the state board of psychology when the supervision has occurred prior to enactment of laws governing the practice of psychology. (J) "Health officer" means any public health physician; public health nurse; or other person authorized or designated by a city or general health district or a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to perform the duties of a health officer under this chapter. (K) "Chief clinical officer" means the medical director of a hospital, community mental health services provider, or board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, or, if there is no medical director, the licensed physician responsible for the treatment provided by a hospital or community mental health services provider. The chief clinical officer may delegate to the attending physician responsible for a patient's care the duties imposed on the chief clinical officer by this chapter. In the case of a community mental health services provider, the chief clinical officer shall be designated by the governing body of the services provider and shall be a licensed physician or licensed clinical psychologist who supervises diagnostic and treatment services. A licensed physician or licensed clinical psychologist designated by the chief clinical officer may perform the duties and accept the responsibilities of the chief clinical officer in the chief clinical officer's absence. (L) "Working day" or "court day" means Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday, except when such day is a holiday. (M) "Indigent" means unable without deprivation of satisfaction of basic needs to provide for the payment of an attorney and other necessary expenses of legal representation, including expert testimony. (N) "Respondent" means the person whose detention, commitment, hospitalization, continued hospitalization or commitment, or discharge is being sought in any proceeding under this chapter. (O) "Ohio protection and advocacy system" has the same meaning as in section 5123.60 of the Revised Code. (P) "Independent expert evaluation" means an evaluation conducted by a licensed clinical psychologist, psychiatrist, or licensed physician who has been selected by the respondent or the respondent's counsel and who consents to conducting the evaluation. (Q) "Court" means the probate division of the court of common pleas. (R) "Expunge" means: (1) The removal and destruction of court files and records, originals and copies, and the deletion of all index references; (2) The reporting to the person of the nature and extent of any information about the person transmitted to any other person by the court; (3) Otherwise insuring that any examination of court files and records in question shall show no record whatever with respect to the person; (4) That all rights and privileges are restored, and that the person, the court, and any other person may properly reply that no such record exists, as to any matter expunged. (S) "Residence" means a person's physical presence in a county with intent to remain there, except that: (1) If a person is receiving a mental health service at a facility that includes nighttime sleeping accommodations, residence means that county in which the person maintained the person's primary place of residence at the time the person entered the facility; (2) If a person is committed pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code, residence means the county where the criminal charges were filed. When the residence of a person is disputed, the matter of residence shall be referred to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services for investigation and determination. Residence shall not be a basis for a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to deny services to any person present in the board's service district, and the board shall provide services for a person whose residence is in dispute while residence is being determined and for a person in an emergency situation. (T) "Admission" to a hospital or other place means that a patient is accepted for and stays at least one night at the hospital or other place. (U) "Prosecutor" means the prosecuting attorney, village solicitor, city director of law, or similar chief legal officer who prosecuted a criminal case in which a person was found not guilty by reason of insanity, who would have had the authority to prosecute a criminal case against a person if the person had not been found incompetent to stand trial, or who prosecuted a case in which a person was found guilty. (V)(1) "Treatment plan" means a written statement of reasonable objectives and goals for an individual established by the treatment team, with specific criteria to evaluate progress towards achieving those objectives. (2) The active participation of the patient in establishing the objectives and goals shall be documented. The treatment plan shall be based on patient needs and include services to be provided to the patient while the patient is hospitalized, after the patient is discharged, or in an outpatient setting. The treatment plan shall address services to be provided. In the establishment of the treatment plan, consideration should be given to the availability of services, which may include but are not limited to all of the following: (a) Community psychiatric supportive treatment; (b) Assertive community treatment; (c) Medications; (d) Individual or group therapy; (e) Peer support services; (f) Financial services; (g) Housing or supervised living services; (h) Alcohol or substance abuse treatment; (i) Any other services prescribed to treat the patient's mental illness and to either assist the patient in living and functioning in the community or to help prevent a relapse or a deterioration of the patient's current condition. (3) If the person subject to the treatment plan has executed an advance directive for mental health treatment, the treatment team shall consider any directions included in such advance directive in developing the treatment plan. (W) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (X) "Post-release control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (Y) "Local correctional facility" has the same meaning as in section 2903.13 of the Revised Code. (Z) "Clinical nurse specialist" and "certified nurse practitioner" have the same meanings as in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.03. A patient admitted under section 5122.02 of the Revised Code who requests release in writing, or whose release is requested in writing by the patient's counsel, legal guardian, parent, spouse, or adult next of kin shall be released forthwith, except when any of the following is the case: (A) The patient was admitted on the patient's own application and the request for release is made by a person other than the patient, release may be conditional upon the agreement of the patient. (B) The patient was, within the past twelve months, a defendant described in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code and the chief clinical officer of the hospital decides not to file or cause to be filed an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code as described in division (C) of this section. In that circumstance, the chief clinical officer shall immediately notify the trial court or prosecutor described in division (B)(1)(a)(v)(I) of section 2945.38 of the Revised Code of the chief clinical officer's decision and intent to release the patient. Not later than three court days after being notified of the intent to release, the trial court or prosecutor may file or cause to be filed with the court of the county where the patient is hospitalized, or the court of the county where the patient resides, an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. If such an affidavit is filed, the patient's release must be postponed until a hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code is held. (C) The chief clinical officer of the hospital, within three court days from the receipt of the request for release, files or causes to be filed with the court of the county where the patient is hospitalized or of the county where the patient is a resident, an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. Release may be postponed until the hearing held under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code. A telephone communication within three court days from the receipt of the request for release from the chief clinical officer to the court, indicating that the required affidavit has been mailed, is sufficient compliance with the time limit for filing such affidavit. Unless the patient is released within three days from the receipt of the request by the chief clinical officer, the request shall serve as a request for an initial hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code. If the court finds that the patient is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, all provisions of this chapter with respect to involuntary hospitalization apply to such person. Judicial proceedings for hospitalization shall not be commenced with respect to a voluntary patient except pursuant to this section. Sections 5121.30 to 5121.56 of the Revised Code apply to persons received in a hospital operated by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services on a voluntary application. The chief clinical officer of the hospital shall provide reasonable means and arrangements for informing patients of their rights to release as provided in this section and for assisting them in making and presenting requests for release or for a hearing under section 5122.141 of the Revised Code. Before a patient is released from a public hospital, the chief clinical officer shall, when possible, notify provide notice of the patient's pending release to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the patient's county of residence of the patient's pending release after . Before the notice is given, the chief clinical officer has informed shall inform the patient that the board will be so notified. Sec. 5122.10. (A)(1) Any of the following who has reason to believe that a person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination may take the person into custody and may immediately transport the person to a hospital or, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, to a general hospital not licensed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services where the person may be held for the period prescribed in this section: (a) A psychiatrist; (b) A licensed physician; (c) A licensed clinical psychologist; (d) A clinical nurse specialist who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health CNS by the American nurses credentialing center; (e) A certified nurse practitioner who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health NP by the American nurses credentialing center; (f) A health officer; (g) A parole officer; (h) A police officer; (i) A sheriff. (2) If the chief of the adult parole authority or a parole or probation officer with the approval of the chief of the authority has reason to believe that a parolee, an offender under a community control sanction or post-release control sanction, or an offender under transitional control is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination, the chief or officer may take the parolee or offender into custody and may immediately transport the parolee or offender to a hospital or, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, to a general hospital not licensed by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services where the parolee or offender may be held for the period prescribed in this section. (B) A written statement shall be given to the hospital by the individual authorized under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section to transport the person. The statement shall specify the circumstances under which such person was taken into custody and the reasons for the belief that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order and represents a substantial risk of physical harm to self or others if allowed to remain at liberty pending examination. This statement shall be made available to the respondent or the respondent's attorney upon request of either. (C) Every reasonable and appropriate effort shall be made to take persons into custody in the least conspicuous manner possible. A person taking the respondent into custody pursuant to this section shall explain to the respondent: the name and professional designation and affiliation of the person taking the respondent into custody; that the custody-taking is not a criminal arrest; and that the person is being taken for examination by mental health professionals at a specified mental health facility identified by name. (D) If a person taken into custody under this section is transported to a general hospital, the general hospital may admit the person, or provide care and treatment for the person, or both, notwithstanding section 5119.33 of the Revised Code, but by the end of twenty-four hours after arrival at the general hospital, the person shall be transferred to a hospital as defined in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (E) A person transported or transferred to a hospital or community mental health services provider under this section shall be examined by the staff of the hospital or services provider within twenty-four hours after arrival at the hospital or services provider. If to conduct the examination requires that the person remain overnight, the hospital or services provider shall admit the person in an unclassified status until making a disposition under this section. After the examination, if the chief clinical officer of the hospital or services provider believes that the person is not a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the chief clinical officer shall release or discharge the person immediately unless a court has issued a temporary order of detention applicable to the person under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. After the examination, if the chief clinical officer believes that the person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the chief clinical officer may detain the person for not more than three court days following the day of the examination and during such period admit the person as a voluntary patient under section 5122.02 of the Revised Code or file an affidavit under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. If neither action is taken and a court has not otherwise issued a temporary order of detention applicable to the person under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer shall discharge the person at the end of the three-day period unless the person has been sentenced to the department of rehabilitation and correction and has not been released from the person's sentence, in which case the person shall be returned to that department. Sec. 5122.15. (A) Full hearings shall be conducted in a manner consistent with this chapter and with due process of law. The hearings shall be conducted by a judge of the probate court or a referee designated by a judge of the probate court and may be conducted in or out of the county in which the respondent is held. Any referee designated under this division shall be an attorney. (1) With the consent of the respondent, the following shall be made available to counsel for the respondent: (a) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of the state or prosecutor; (b) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of the hospital in which the respondent currently is held, or in which the respondent has been held pursuant to this chapter; (c) All relevant documents, information, and evidence in the custody or control of any hospital, facility, or person not included in division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (2) The respondent has the right to attend the hearing and to be represented by counsel of the respondent's choice. The right to attend the hearing may be waived only by the respondent or counsel for the respondent after consultation with the respondent. (3) If the respondent is not represented by counsel, is absent from the hearing, and has not validly waived the right to counsel, the court shall appoint counsel immediately to represent the respondent at the hearing, reserving the right to tax costs of appointed counsel to the respondent, unless it is shown that the respondent is indigent. If the court appoints counsel, or if the court determines that the evidence relevant to the respondent's absence does not justify the absence, the court shall continue the case. (4) The respondent shall be informed that the respondent may retain counsel and have independent expert evaluation. If the respondent is unable to obtain an attorney, the respondent shall be represented by court-appointed counsel. If the respondent is indigent, court-appointed counsel and independent expert evaluation shall be provided as an expense under section 5122.43 of the Revised Code. (5) The hearing shall be closed to the public, unless counsel for the respondent, with the permission of the respondent, requests that the hearing be open to the public. (6) If the hearing is closed to the public, the court, for good cause shown, may admit persons who have a legitimate interest in the proceedings. If the respondent, the respondent's counsel, or the designee of the director or of the chief clinical officer objects to the admission of any person, the court shall hear the objection and any opposing argument and shall rule upon the admission of the person to the hearing. (7) The affiant under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code shall be subject to subpoena by either party. (8) The court shall examine the sufficiency of all documents filed and shall inform the respondent, if present, and the respondent's counsel of the nature and content of the documents and the reason for which the respondent is being detained, or for which the respondent's placement is being sought. (9) The court shall receive only reliable, competent, and material evidence. (10) Unless proceedings are initiated pursuant to section 5120.17 or 5139.08 of the Revised Code, an attorney that the board designates shall present the case demonstrating that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The attorney shall offer evidence of the diagnosis, prognosis, record of treatment, if any, and less restrictive treatment plans, if any. In proceedings pursuant to section 5120.17 or 5139.08 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall designate an attorney who shall present the case demonstrating that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order. The attorney shall offer evidence of the diagnosis, prognosis, record of treatment, if any, and less restrictive treatment plans, if any. (11) The respondent or the respondent's counsel has the right to subpoena witnesses and documents and to examine and cross-examine witnesses. (12) The respondent has the right, but shall not be compelled, to testify, and shall be so advised by the court. (13) On motion of the respondent or the respondent's counsel for good cause shown, or on the court's own motion, the court may order a continuance of the hearing. (14) If the respondent is represented by counsel and the respondent's counsel requests a transcript and record, or if the respondent is not represented by counsel, the court shall make and maintain a full transcript and record of the proceeding. If the respondent is indigent and the transcript and record is made, a copy shall be provided to the respondent upon request and be treated as an expense under section 5122.43 of the Revised Code. (15) To the extent not inconsistent with this chapter, the Rules of Civil Procedure are applicable. (B) Unless, upon completion of the hearing the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, it shall order the respondent's discharge immediately. (C) If, upon completion of the hearing, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court shall order the respondent for a period not to exceed ninety days to any of the following: (1) A hospital operated by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services if the respondent is committed pursuant to section 5139.08 of the Revised Code; (2) A nonpublic hospital; (3) The veterans' administration or other agency of the United States government; (4) A board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or services provider the board designates; (5) Receive private psychiatric or psychological care and treatment; (6) Any other suitable facility or person consistent with the diagnosis, prognosis, and treatment needs of the respondent. A jail or other local correctional facility is not a suitable facility. (D) Any order made pursuant to division (C)(2), (3), (5), or (6) of this section shall be conditioned upon the receipt by the court of consent by the hospital, facility, agency, or person to accept the respondent and may include a requirement that a person or entity described in division (C)(2), (3), (5), or (6) of this section inform the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or community mental health services provider the board designates about the progress of the respondent with the treatment plan. (E) In determining the entity or person to which the respondent is to be committed under division (C) of this section, the court shall consider all of the following: (1) The respondent's diagnosis and prognosis made by a psychiatrist, licensed clinical psychologist, clinical nurse specialist who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health clinical nurse specialist by the American nurses credentialing center, or certified nurse practitioner who is certified as a psychiatric-mental health nurse practitioner by the American nurses credentialing center; (2) The respondent's preferences; (3) The respondent's projected treatment plan. The court shall order the implementation of the least restrictive alternative available and consistent with treatment goals. If the court determines that the least restrictive alternative available that is consistent with treatment goals is inpatient hospitalization, the court's order shall so state. (F) During the ninety-day period the entity or person shall examine and treat the respondent. If the respondent is receiving treatment in an outpatient setting, or receives treatment in an outpatient setting during a subsequent period of continued commitment under division (H) of this section, the entity or person to whom the respondent is committed shall determine the appropriate outpatient treatment for the respondent. If, at any time prior to the expiration of the ninety-day period, it is determined by the entity or person that the respondent's treatment needs could be equally well met in an available and appropriate less restrictive setting, both of the following apply: (1) The respondent shall be released from the care of the entity or person immediately and shall be referred to the court together with a report of the findings and recommendations of the entity or person; (2) The entity or person shall notify the respondent's counsel or the attorney designated by a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services or, if the respondent was committed to a board or a services provider designated by the board, it shall place the respondent in the least restrictive setting available consistent with treatment goals and notify the court and the respondent's counsel of the placement. The court shall dismiss the case or order placement in the least restrictive setting. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (G)(2) of this section, any person for whom proceedings for treatment have been commenced pursuant to section 5122.11 of the Revised Code, may apply at any time for voluntary admission or treatment to the entity or person to which the person was committed. Upon admission as a voluntary patient the chief clinical officer of the entity or the person immediately shall notify the court, the patient's counsel, and the attorney designated by the board, if the attorney has entered the proceedings, in writing of that fact, and, upon receipt of the notice, the court shall dismiss the case. (2) A person who is found incompetent to stand trial or not guilty by reason of insanity and who is committed pursuant to section 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code shall not voluntarily commit the person pursuant to this section until after the final termination of the commitment, as described in division (J) of section 2945.401 of the Revised Code. (H) If, at the end of the first ninety-day period or any subsequent period of continued commitment, there has been no disposition of the case, either by discharge or voluntary admission or treatment, the entity or person shall discharge the patient immediately, unless at least ten days before the expiration of the period the attorney the board designates or the prosecutor files with the court an application for continued commitment. The application of the attorney or the prosecutor shall include a written report containing the diagnosis, prognosis, past treatment, a list of alternative treatment settings and plans, and identification of the treatment setting that is the least restrictive consistent with treatment needs. The attorney the board designates or the prosecutor shall file the written report at least three days prior to the full hearing. A copy of the application and written report shall be provided to the respondent's counsel immediately. The court shall hold a full hearing on applications for continued commitment at the expiration of the first ninety-day period and at least every two years after the expiration of the first ninety-day period. Hearings following any application for continued commitment are mandatory and may not be waived. For a respondent who is ordered to receive treatment in an outpatient setting, if at any time after the first ninety-day period the entity or person to whom the respondent was ordered determines that the respondent has demonstrated voluntary consent for treatment, that entity or person shall immediately notify the respondent, the respondent's counsel, the attorney designated by the board, and the court. The entity or person shall submit to the court a report of the findings and recommendations. The court may dismiss the case upon review of the facts. Upon request of a person who is involuntarily committed under this section, or the person's counsel, that is made more than one hundred eighty days after the person's last full hearing, mandatory or requested, the court shall hold a full hearing on the person's continued commitment. Upon the application of a person involuntarily committed under this section, supported by an affidavit of a psychiatrist or licensed clinical psychologist, alleging that the person no longer is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court for good cause shown may hold a full hearing on the person's continued commitment prior to the expiration of one hundred eighty days after the person's last full hearing. Section 5122.12 of the Revised Code applies to all hearings on continued commitment. If the court, after a hearing for continued commitment finds by clear and convincing evidence that the respondent is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the court may order continued commitment at places or to persons specified in division (C) of this section. (I) Unless the admission is pursuant to section 5120.17 or 5139.08 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer of the entity admitting a respondent pursuant to a judicial proceeding, within ten working days of the admission, shall make a report of the admission to the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the respondent's county of residence. (J) A referee appointed by the court may make all orders that a judge may make under this section and sections 5122.11 and 5122.141 of the Revised Code, except an order of contempt of court. The orders of a referee take effect immediately. Within fourteen days of the making of an order by a referee, a party may file written objections to the order with the court. The filed objections shall be considered a motion, shall be specific, and shall state their grounds with particularity. Within ten days of the filing of the objections, a judge of the court shall hold a hearing on the objections and may hear and consider any testimony or other evidence relating to the respondent's mental condition. At the conclusion of the hearing, the judge may ratify, rescind, or modify the referee's order. (K) An order of the court under division (C), (H), or (J) of this section is a final order. (L) Before a board, or a services provider the board designates, may place an unconsenting respondent in an inpatient setting from a less restrictive placement, the board or services provider shall do all of the following: (1) Determine that the respondent is in immediate need of treatment in an inpatient setting because the respondent represents a substantial risk of physical harm to the respondent or others if allowed to remain in a less restrictive setting; (2) On the day of placement in the inpatient setting or on the next court day, file with the court a motion for transfer to an inpatient setting or communicate to the court by telephone that the required motion has been mailed; (3) Ensure that every reasonable and appropriate effort is made to take the respondent to the inpatient setting in the least conspicuous manner possible; (4) Immediately notify the board's designated attorney and the respondent's attorney. At the respondent's request, the court shall hold a hearing on the motion and make a determination pursuant to division (E) of this section within five days of the placement. (M) Before a board, or a services provider the board designates, may move a respondent from one residential placement to another, the board or services provider shall consult with the respondent about the placement. If the respondent objects to the placement, the proposed placement and the need for it shall be reviewed by a qualified mental health professional who otherwise is not involved in the treatment of the respondent. (N) The entity or person to whom the respondent was ordered for treatment in an outpatient setting may submit a report to the court indicating that the respondent has either failed to comply with the treatment plan or begun to demonstrate signs of decompensation that may be grounds for hospitalization. On receipt of the report, the court shall promptly schedule a hearing to review the case. The court shall conduct the hearing in a manner consistent with this chapter and due process of law. The board shall receive notice of the hearing and the board and entity or person treating the respondent shall submit a report to the court with a plan for appropriate alternative treatment, if any, or recommend that the court discontinue the court-ordered treatment. The court shall consider available and appropriate alternative placements but shall not impose criminal sanctions that result in confinement in a jail or other local correctional facility based on the respondent's failure to comply with the treatment plan. The court may not order the respondent to a more restrictive placement unless the criteria specified in division (L) of this section are met and may not order the respondent to an inpatient setting unless the court determines by clear and convincing evidence presented by the board that the respondent meets the criteria specified in divisions (A) and (B)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.20. The director of mental behavioral health and addiction services or the director's designee may transfer, or authorize the transfer of, an involuntary patient, or a consenting voluntary patient hospitalized pursuant to section 5122.02 or sections 5122.11 to 5122.15 of the Revised Code, from one public hospital to another, or to a hospital, community mental health services provider, or other facility offering treatment or other services for mental illness, if the medical director of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services determines that it would be consistent with the medical needs of the patient to do so. If such a transfer is made to a private facility, the transfer shall be conditioned upon the consent of the facility. Before an involuntary patient may be transferred to a more restrictive setting, the chief clinical officer shall file a motion with the court requesting the court to amend its order of placement issued under section 5122.15 of the Revised Code. At the patient's request, the court shall hold a hearing on the motion at which the patient has the same rights as at a full hearing under section 5122.15 of the Revised Code. The hearing shall be held within ten days after the date on which the respondent was transferred to the more restrictive setting or on which the motion was filed, whichever is earlier. On the motion of the respondent, the respondent's counsel, or the chief clinical officer, or on its own motion, and for good cause shown, the court may order a continuance of the hearing for up to ten days. Whenever an involuntary patient is transferred, written notice of the transfer shall be given to the patient's legal guardian, parents, spouse, and counsel, or, if none is known, to the patient's nearest known relative or friend. If the patient is a minor, the department, before making such a transfer, shall make a minute of the order for the transfer and the reason for it upon its record and shall send a certified copy at least seven days prior to the transfer to the person shown by its record to have had the care or custody of the minor immediately prior to the minor's commitment. Whenever a consenting voluntary patient is transferred, the notification shall be given only at the patient's request. The chief clinical officer shall advise a voluntary patient who is being transferred that the patient may decide if the notification shall be given. In all such transfers, due consideration shall be given to the wishes of the patient, and the relationship of the patient to the patient's family, legal guardian, or friends, so as to maintain the relationship and encourage visits beneficial to the patient. When a voluntary patient whose medical or psychological needs are found by the chief clinical officer to warrant a transfer refuses to be transferred to an alternate facility, the chief clinical officer may file an affidavit for a hearing under section 5122.11 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.21. (A) The chief clinical officer shall as frequently as practicable, and at least once every thirty days, examine or cause to be examined every patient, and, whenever the chief clinical officer determines that the conditions justifying involuntary hospitalization or commitment no longer obtain, shall discharge the patient not under indictment or conviction for crime and immediately make a report of the discharge to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. The chief clinical officer may discharge a patient who is under an indictment, a sentence of imprisonment, a community control sanction, or a post-release control sanction or on parole ten days after written notice of intent to discharge the patient has been given by personal service or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the court having criminal jurisdiction over the patient. Except when the patient was found not guilty by reason of insanity and the defendant's commitment is pursuant to section 2945.40 of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer has final authority to discharge a patient who is under an indictment, a sentence of imprisonment, a community control sanction, or a post-release control sanction or on parole. (B) After a finding pursuant to section 5122.15 of the Revised Code that a person is a person with a mental illness subject to court order, the chief clinical officer of the hospital or community mental health services provider to which the person is ordered or to which the person is transferred under section 5122.20 of the Revised Code, may grant a discharge without the consent or authorization of any court. Upon discharge, the chief clinical officer shall notify the court that caused the judicial hospitalization of the discharge from the hospital. Sec. 5122.23. The chief clinical officer of a public hospital shall immediately report to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services serving the patient's county of residence the removal, death, escape, discharge, or trial visit of any patient hospitalized under section 5122.15 of the Revised Code, or the return of such an escaped or visiting patient to the department, the probate judge of the county from which such patient was hospitalized, and the probate judge of the county of residence of such patient. In case of death, the chief clinical officer also shall notify one or more of the nearest relatives of the deceased patient, if known to the chief clinical officer, by letter, telegram, or telephone. If the place of residence of such relative is unknown to the chief clinical officer, immediately upon receiving notification the probate judge shall in the speediest manner possible notify such relatives, if known to the probate judge. The chief clinical officer of a public hospital, upon the request of the probate judge of the county from which a patient was hospitalized or the probate judge of the county of residence of such a patient, shall make a report to the judge of the condition of any patient under the care, treatment, custody, or control of the chief clinical officer. Sec. 5122.26. (A) If a patient is absent without leave, on a verbal or written order issued within five days of the time of the unauthorized absence by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, the chief clinical officer of the hospital from which the patient is absent without leave, or the court of either the county from which the patient was committed or in which the patient is found, any health or police officer or sheriff may take the patient into custody and transport the patient to the hospital in which the patient was hospitalized or to a place that is designated in the order. The officer immediately shall report such fact to the entity that issued the order. The chief clinical officer of a hospital may discharge a patient who is under an indictment, a sentence of imprisonment, a community control sanction, or a post-release control sanction or on parole and who has been absent without leave for more than thirty days but shall give written notice of the discharge to the court with criminal jurisdiction over the patient. The chief clinical officer of a hospital may discharge any other patient who has been absent without leave for more than fourteen days. The chief clinical officer shall take all proper measures for the apprehension of an escaped patient. The expense of the return of an escaped patient shall be borne by the hospital where the patient is hospitalized. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, no patient hospitalized under Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code whose absence without leave was caused or contributed to by the patient's mental illness shall be subject to a charge of escape. (2) Division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to any person who was hospitalized, institutionalized, or confined in a facility under an order made pursuant to or under authority of section 2945.37, 2945.371, 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code and who escapes from the facility, from confinement in a vehicle for transportation to or from the facility, or from supervision by an employee of the facility that is incidental to hospitalization, institutionalization, or confinement in the facility and that occurs outside the facility, in violation of section 2921.34 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.27. The chief clinical officer of the hospital or the chief clinical officer's designee shall assure that all patients hospitalized or committed pursuant to this chapter shall: (A) Receive, within twenty days of their admission sufficient professional care to assure that an evaluation of current status, differential diagnosis, probable prognosis, and description of the current treatment plan is stated on the official chart; (B) Have a written treatment plan consistent with the evaluation, diagnosis, prognosis, and goals which shall be provided, upon request of the patient or patient's counsel, to the patient's counsel and to any private physician or licensed clinical psychologist designated by the patient or the patient's counsel or to the Ohio protection and advocacy system; (C) Receive treatment consistent with the treatment plan. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall set standards for treatment provided to such patients, consistent wherever possible with standards set by the joint commission. (D) Receive periodic reevaluations of the treatment plan by the professional staff at intervals not to exceed ninety days; (E) Be provided with adequate medical treatment for physical disease or injury; (F) Receive humane care and treatment, including without limitation, the following: (1) The least restrictive environment consistent with the treatment plan; (2) The necessary facilities and personnel required by the treatment plan; (3) A humane psychological and physical environment; (4) The right to obtain current information concerning the patient's treatment program and expectations in terms that the patient can reasonably understand; (5) Participation in programs designed to afford the patient substantial opportunity to acquire skills to facilitate return to the community or to terminate an involuntary commitment; (6) The right to be free from unnecessary or excessive medication; (7) Freedom from restraints or isolation unless it is stated in a written order by the chief clinical officer or the chief clinical officer's designee, or the patient's individual physician or psychologist in a private or general hospital. If the chief clinical officer of the hospital is unable to provide the treatment required by divisions (C), (E), and (F) of this section for any patient hospitalized pursuant to Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code, the chief clinical officer shall immediately notify the patient, the court, the Ohio protection and advocacy system, the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, and the patient's counsel and legal guardian, if known. If within ten days after receipt of such notification by the director, the director is unable to effect a transfer of the patient, pursuant to section 5122.20 of the Revised Code, to a hospital, community mental health services provider, or other medical facility where treatment is available, or has not received an order of the court to the contrary, the involuntary commitment of any patient hospitalized pursuant to Chapter 5122. of the Revised Code and defined as a person with a mental illness subject to court order under division (B)(4) of section 5122.01 of the Revised Code shall automatically be terminated. Sec. 5122.31. (A) All certificates, applications, records, and reports made for the purpose of this chapter and sections 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, and 2945.402 of the Revised Code, other than court journal entries or court docket entries, and directly or indirectly identifying a patient or former patient or person whose hospitalization or commitment has been sought under this chapter, shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person except: (1) If the person identified, or the person's legal guardian, if any, or if the person is a minor, the person's parent or legal guardian, consents, and if the disclosure is in the best interests of the person, as may be determined by the court for judicial records and by the chief clinical officer for medical records; (2) When disclosure is provided for in this chapter or Chapters 340. or 5119. of the Revised Code or in accordance with other provisions of state or federal law authorizing such disclosure; (3) That hospitals, boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, and community mental health services providers may release necessary medical information to insurers and other third-party payers, including government entities responsible for processing and authorizing payment, to obtain payment for goods and services furnished to the patient; (4) Pursuant to a court order signed by a judge; (5) That a patient shall be granted access to the patient's own psychiatric and medical records, unless access specifically is restricted in a patient's treatment plan for clear treatment reasons; (6) That hospitals and other institutions and facilities within the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may exchange psychiatric records and other pertinent information with other hospitals, institutions, and facilities of the department, and with community mental health services providers and boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services with which the department has a current agreement for patient care or services. Records and information that may be released pursuant to this division shall be limited to medication history, physical health status and history, financial status, summary of course of treatment in the hospital, summary of treatment needs, and a discharge summary, if any. (7) That hospitals within the department and other institutions and facilities within the department may exchange psychiatric records and other pertinent information with payers and other providers of treatment, health services, and recovery supports if the purpose of the exchange is to facilitate continuity of care for a patient or for the emergency treatment of an individual; (8) That a patient's family member who is involved in the provision, planning, and monitoring of services to the patient may receive medication information, a summary of the patient's diagnosis and prognosis, and a list of the services and personnel available to assist the patient and the patient's family, if the patient's treating physician determines that the disclosure would be in the best interests of the patient. No such disclosure shall be made unless the patient is notified first and receives the information and does not object to the disclosure. (9) That community mental health services providers may exchange psychiatric records and certain other information with the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and other services providers in order to provide services to a person involuntarily committed to a board. Release of records under this division shall be limited to medication history, physical health status and history, financial status, summary of course of treatment, summary of treatment needs, and discharge summary, if any. (10) That information may be disclosed to the executor or the administrator of an estate of a deceased patient when the information is necessary to administer the estate; (11) That records in the possession of the Ohio history connection may be released to the closest living relative of a deceased patient upon request of that relative; (12) That records pertaining to the patient's diagnosis, course of treatment, treatment needs, and prognosis shall be disclosed and released to the appropriate prosecuting attorney if the patient was committed pursuant to section 2945.38, 2945.39, 2945.40, 2945.401, or 2945.402 of the Revised Code, or to the attorney designated by the board for proceedings pursuant to involuntary commitment under this chapter. (13) That the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may exchange psychiatric hospitalization records, other mental health treatment records, and other pertinent information with the department of rehabilitation and correction and with the department of youth services to ensure continuity of care for inmates or offenders who are receiving mental health services in an institution of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services and may exchange psychiatric hospitalization records, other mental health treatment records, and other pertinent information with boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services and community mental health services providers to ensure continuity of care for inmates or offenders who are receiving mental health services in an institution and are scheduled for release within six months. The release of records under this division is limited to records regarding an inmate's or offender's medication history, physical health status and history, summary of course of treatment, summary of treatment needs, and a discharge summary, if any; (14) That records and reports relating to a person who has been deceased for fifty years or more are no longer considered confidential. (B) Before records are disclosed pursuant to divisions (A)(3), (6), and (9) of this section, the custodian of the records shall attempt to obtain the patient's consent for the disclosure. No person shall reveal the contents of a medical record of a patient except as authorized by law. (C) The managing officer of a hospital who releases necessary medical information under division (A)(3) of this section to allow an insurance carrier or other third party payor to comply with section 5121.43 of the Revised Code shall neither be subject to criminal nor civil liability. Sec. 5122.32. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Quality assurance committee" means a committee that is appointed in the central office of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services by the director of mental behavioral health and addiction services, a committee of a hospital or community setting program, or a duly authorized subcommittee of a committee of that nature and that is designated to carry out quality assurance program activities. (2) "Quality assurance program" means a comprehensive program within the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services to systematically review and improve the quality of medical and mental health services within the department and its hospitals and community setting programs, the safety and security of persons receiving or administering medical and mental health services within the department and its hospitals and community setting programs, and the efficiency and effectiveness of the utilization of staff and resources in the delivery of medical and mental health services within the department and its hospitals and community setting programs. "Quality assurance program" includes the central office quality assurance committees, morbidity and mortality review committees, quality assurance programs of community setting programs, quality assurance committees of hospitals operated by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, and the office of licensure and certification of the department. (3) "Quality assurance program activities" include collecting or compiling information and reports required by a quality assurance committee, receiving, reviewing, or implementing the recommendations made by a quality assurance committee, and credentialing, privileging, infection control, tissue review, peer review, utilization review including access to patient care records, patient care assessment records, and medical and mental health records, medical and mental health resource management, mortality and morbidity review, and identification and prevention of medical or mental health incidents and risks, whether performed by a quality assurance committee or by persons who are directed by a quality assurance committee. (4) "Quality assurance records" means the proceedings, discussion, records, findings, recommendations, evaluations, opinions, minutes, reports, and other documents or actions that emanate from quality assurance committees, quality assurance programs, or quality assurance program activities. "Quality assurance records" does not include aggregate statistical information that does not disclose the identity of persons receiving or providing medical or mental health services in department of mental behavioral health and addiction services hospitals or community setting programs. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, quality assurance records are confidential and are not public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, and shall be used only in the course of the proper functions of a quality assurance program. (2) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, no person who possesses or has access to quality assurance records and who knows that the records are quality assurance records shall willfully disclose the contents of the records to any person or entity. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, no quality assurance record shall be subject to discovery, and is not admissible in evidence, in any judicial or administrative proceeding. (2) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, no member of a quality assurance committee or a person who is performing a function that is part of a quality assurance program shall be permitted or required to testify in a judicial or administrative proceeding with respect to quality assurance records or with respect to any finding, recommendation, evaluation, opinion, or other action taken by the committee, member, or person. (3) Information, documents, or records otherwise available from original sources are not to be construed as being unavailable for discovery or admission in evidence in a judicial or administrative proceeding merely because they were presented to a quality assurance committee. No person testifying before a quality assurance committee or person who is a member of a quality assurance committee shall be prevented from testifying as to matters within the person's knowledge, but the witness cannot be asked about the witness' testimony before the quality assurance committee or about an opinion formed by the person as a result of the quality assurance committee proceedings. (D)(1) A person who, without malice and in the reasonable belief that the information is warranted by the facts known to the person, provides information to a person engaged in quality assurance program activities is not liable for damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property to any person as a result of providing the information. (2) A member of a quality assurance committee, a person engaged in quality assurance program activities, and an employee of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall not be liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property to any person for any acts, omissions, decisions, or other conduct within the scope of the functions of the quality assurance program. (3) Nothing in this section shall relieve any institution or individual from liability arising from the treatment of a patient. (E) Quality assurance records may be disclosed, and testimony may be provided concerning quality assurance records, only to the following persons or entities: (1) Persons who are employed or retained by the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services and who have authority to evaluate or implement the recommendations of a state-operated hospital, community setting program, or central office quality assurance committee; (2) Public or private agencies or organizations if needed to perform a licensing or accreditation function related to department of mental behavioral health and addiction services hospitals or community setting programs, or to perform monitoring of a hospital or program of that nature as required by law. (F) A disclosure of quality assurance records pursuant to division (E) of this section does not otherwise waive the confidential and privileged status of the disclosed quality assurance records. (G) Nothing in this section shall limit the access of the Ohio protection and advocacy system to records or personnel as required under section 5123.601 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section shall limit the admissibility of documentary or testimonial evidence in an action brought by the Ohio protection and advocacy system in its own name or on behalf of a client. Sec. 5122.33. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services may prescribe the form of applications, reports, records, and medical certificates provided for under this chapter, and the information required to be contained therein; require reports from the chief clinical officer of any public hospital relating to the admission, examination, diagnosis, release, or discharge of any patient; visit each such hospital regularly to review the admission procedures of all new patients admitted between visits; investigate by personal visit complaints made by any patient or by any person on behalf of a patient; and adopt such rules as are reasonably necessary to effectuate the provisions of this chapter. Sec. 5122.341. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Facility or provider" means, in the context of a person committed to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under sections 2945.37 to 2945.402 of the Revised Code, any entity in which the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services places such a person. (2) "Person committed to the department" means a person committed to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services under sections 2945.37 to 2945.402 of the Revised Code. (B) No member of a board of directors, or employee, of a facility or provider in which the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services places a person committed to the department is liable for injury or damages caused by any action or inaction taken within the scope of the board member's official duties or employee's employment relating to the commitment of, and services provided to, the person committed to the department, unless the action or inaction constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. A board member's or employee's action or inaction does not constitute willful or wanton misconduct if the board member or employee acted in good faith and reasonably under the circumstances and with the knowledge reasonably attributable to the board member or employee. The immunity from liability conferred by this section is in addition to and not in limitation of any immunity conferred by any other section of the Revised Code or by judicial precedent. Sec. 5122.36. If the legal residence of a person with a mental illness is in another county of the state, the necessary expense of the person's return is a proper charge against the county of legal residence. If an adjudication and order of hospitalization by the probate court of the county of temporary residence are required, the regular probate court fees and expenses incident to the order of hospitalization under this chapter and any other expense incurred on the person's behalf shall be charged to and paid by the county of the person's legal residence upon the approval and certification of the probate judge of the county of the person's legal residence. The ordering court shall send to the probate court of the person's county of legal residence a certified copy of the commitment order from the ordering court. The receiving court shall enter and record the commitment order. The certified commitment order is prima facie evidence of the residence of the person. When the residence of the person cannot be established as represented by the ordering court, the matter of residence shall be referred to the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services for investigation and determination. Sec. 5122.44. As used in sections 5122.44 to 5122.47 of the Revised Code: (A) "Compilation" means a written list of the following information, as the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services is able to reasonably ascertain, for every patient who was buried, entombed, or inurned prior to March 31, 2005, in a cemetery located on the grounds of or adjacent to the grounds of a public hospital: (1) Name; (2) Date of birth; (3) Date of death or burial; (4) Specific physical location of the burial, entombment, or inurnment, including the plot or grave site number if available. (B) "Patient" means an individual who died while admitted to a public hospital that was under the control of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services. (C) "Record" has the same meaning as in section 149.011 of the Revised Code. (D) "State agency" means every organized body, office, or agency established by the laws of the state for the exercise of any function of state government. Sec. 5122.45. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall create a separate compilation for each cemetery located on the grounds of or adjacent to the grounds of a public hospital that is under the control of the department on March 31, 2005. The compilation shall be created within a reasonable time not exceeding three years after March 31, 2005. The department shall use its best efforts to create the most complete compilations possible using records in the department's possession and records obtained in accordance with section 5122.46 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5122.46. The Ohio history connection and each state agency shall, at the request of the department of mental behavioral health and addiction services, provide the department access to records and information in the possession of the Ohio history connection or state agency for purposes of creating compilations. Sec. 5122.47. The department of mental behavioral health and addiction services shall deposit a copy of each compilation with the Ohio history connection and the state library as soon as a compilation is completed. The department shall not disclose any record or information used to create a compilation except as provided in sections 149.43 and 5122.31 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5123.081. (A) As used in this section: (1)(a) "Applicant" means any of the following: (i) A person who is under final consideration for appointment to or employment with the department of developmental disabilities or a county board of developmental disabilities; (ii) A person who is being transferred to the department or a county board; (iii) An employee who is being recalled to or reemployed by the department or a county board after a layoff; (iv) A person under final consideration for a direct services position with a provider or subcontractor. (b) Neither of the following is an applicant: (i) A person who is employed by a responsible entity in a position for which a criminal records check is required by this section and either is being considered for a different position with the responsible entity or is returning after a leave of absence or seasonal break in employment, unless the responsible entity has reason to believe that the person has committed a disqualifying offense; (ii) A person who is to provide only respite care under a family support services program established under section 5126.11 of the Revised Code if a family member of the individual with a developmental disability who is to receive the respite care selects the person. (2) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (3) "Direct services position" means an employment position in which the employee has the opportunity to be alone with or exercises supervision or control over one or more individuals with developmental disabilities. (4) "Disqualifying offense" means any of the offenses listed or described in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (e) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (5)(a) "Employee" means either of the following: (i) A person appointed to or employed by the department of developmental disabilities or a county board of developmental disabilities; (ii) A person employed in a direct services position by a provider or subcontractor. (b) "Employee" does not mean a person who provides only respite care under a family support services program established under section 5126.11 of the Revised Code if a family member of the individual with a developmental disability who receives the respite care selected the person. (6) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Provider" means a person that provides specialized services to individuals with developmental disabilities and employs one or more persons in direct services positions. (8) "Responsible entity" means the following: (a) The department of developmental disabilities in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for appointment to or employment with the department, being transferred to the department, or being recalled to or reemployed by the department after a layoff; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is appointed to or employed by the department. (b) A county board of developmental disabilities in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for appointment to or employment with the county board, being transferred to the county board, or being recalled to or reemployed by the county board after a layoff; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is appointed to or employed by the county board. (c) A provider in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for a direct services position with the provider; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is employed in a direct services position by the provider. (d) A subcontractor in the case of either of the following: (i) A person who is an applicant because the person is under final consideration for a direct services position with the subcontractor; (ii) A person who is an employee because the person is employed in a direct services position by the subcontractor. (9) "Specialized services" means any program or service designed and operated to serve primarily individuals with developmental disabilities, including a program or service provided by an entity licensed or certified by the department of developmental disabilities. If there is a question as to whether a provider or subcontractor is providing specialized services, the provider or subcontractor may request that the director of developmental disabilities make a determination. The director's determination is final. (10) "Subcontractor" means a person to which both of the following apply: (a) The person has either of the following: (i) A subcontract with a provider to provide specialized services included in the contract between the provider and the department of developmental disabilities or a county board of developmental disabilities; (ii) A subcontract with another subcontractor to provide specialized services included in a subcontract between the other subcontractor and a provider or other subcontractor. (b) The person employs one or more persons in direct services positions. (B) A responsible entity shall not employ an applicant or continue to employ an employee if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant or employee fails to comply with division (D)(3) of this section. (2) Except as provided in rules adopted under this section, the applicant or employee is found by a criminal records check required by this section to have been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. (C) Before employing an applicant in a position for which a criminal records check is required by this section, a responsible entity shall require the applicant to submit a statement with the applicant's signature attesting that the applicant has not been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. The responsible entity also shall require the applicant to sign an agreement under which the applicant agrees to notify the responsible entity within fourteen calendar days if, while employed by the responsible entity, the applicant is formally charged with, is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or is found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. The agreement shall provide that the applicant's failure to provide the notification may result in termination of the applicant's employment. (D)(1) As a condition of employing any applicant in a position for which a criminal records check is required by this section, a responsible entity shall request the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation to conduct a criminal records check of the applicant. If rules adopted under this section require an employee to undergo a criminal records check, a responsible entity shall request the superintendent to conduct a criminal records check of the employee at times specified in the rules as a condition of the responsible entity's continuing to employ the employee in a position for which a criminal records check is required by this section. If an applicant or employee does not present proof that the applicant or employee has been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date upon which the criminal records check is requested, the responsible entity shall request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as a part of the criminal records check. If the applicant or employee presents proof that the applicant or employee has been a resident of this state for that five-year period, the responsible entity may request that the superintendent include information from the federal bureau of investigation in the criminal records check. For purposes of this division, an applicant or employee may provide proof of residency in this state by presenting, with a notarized statement asserting that the applicant or employee has been a resident of this state for that five-year period, a valid driver's license, notification of registration as an elector, a copy of an officially filed federal or state tax form identifying the applicant's or employee's permanent residence, or any other document the responsible entity considers acceptable. (2) A responsible entity shall do all of the following: (a) Provide to each applicant and employee for whom a criminal records check is required by this section a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard impression sheet to obtain fingerprint impressions prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code; (b) Obtain the completed form and standard impression sheet from the applicant or employee; (c) Forward the completed form and standard impression sheet to the superintendent at the time the criminal records check is requested. (3) Any applicant or employee who receives pursuant to this division a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a copy of the standard impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of that section and who is requested to complete the form and provide a set of the applicant's or employee's fingerprint impressions shall complete the form or provide all the information necessary to complete the form and shall provide the standard impression sheet with the impressions of the applicant's or employee's fingerprints. (4) A responsible entity shall pay to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation the fee prescribed pursuant to division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code for each criminal records check requested and conducted pursuant to this section. (E) A responsible entity may request any other state or federal agency to supply the responsible entity with a written report regarding the criminal record of an applicant or employee. If an employee holds an occupational or professional license or other credentials, the responsible entity may request that the state or federal agency that regulates the employee's occupation or profession supply the responsible entity with a written report of any information pertaining to the employee's criminal record that the agency obtains in the course of conducting an investigation or in the process of renewing the employee's license or other credentials. The responsible entity may consider the reports when determining whether to employ the applicant or to continue to employ the employee. (F) As a condition of employing an applicant in a position for which a criminal records check is required by this section and that involves transporting individuals with developmental disabilities or operating a responsible entity's vehicles for any purpose, the responsible entity shall obtain the applicant's driving record from the bureau of motor vehicles. If rules adopted under this section require a responsible entity to obtain an employee's driving record, the responsible entity shall obtain the employee's driving record from the bureau at times specified in the rules as a condition of continuing to employ the employee. The responsible entity may consider the applicant's or employee's driving record when determining whether to employ the applicant or to continue to employ the employee. (G) A responsible entity may employ an applicant conditionally pending receipt of a report regarding the applicant requested under this section. The responsible entity shall request the report before employing the applicant conditionally. The responsible entity shall terminate the applicant's employment if it is determined from a report that the applicant failed to inform the responsible entity that the applicant had been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. (H) A responsible entity may charge an applicant a fee for costs the responsible entity incurs in obtaining a report regarding the applicant under this section if the responsible entity notifies the applicant of the amount of the fee at the time of the applicant's initial application for employment and that, unless the fee is paid, the responsible entity will not consider the applicant for employment. The fee shall not exceed the amount of the fee, if any, the responsible entity pays for the report. (I)(1) Any report obtained pursuant to this section is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person, other than the following: (a) The applicant or employee who is the subject of the report or the applicant's or employee's representative; (b) The responsible entity that requested the report or its representative; (c) The department if a county board, provider, or subcontractor is the responsible entity that requested the report and the department requests the responsible entity to provide a copy of the report to the department; (d) A county board if a provider or subcontractor is the responsible entity that requested the report and the county board requests the responsible entity to provide a copy of the report to the county board; (e) Any court, hearing officer, or other necessary individual involved in a case dealing with any of the following: (i) The denial of employment to the applicant or employee; (ii) The denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate under section 5123.166 or 5123.45 of the Revised Code; (iii) A civil or criminal action regarding the medicaid program or a program the department administers. (2) An applicant or employee for whom the responsible entity has obtained reports under this section may submit a written request to the responsible entity to have copies of the reports sent to any state agency, entity of local government, or private entity. The applicant or employee shall specify in the request the agencies or entities to which the copies are to be sent. On receiving the request, the responsible entity shall send copies of the reports to the agencies or entities specified. (3) A responsible entity may request that a state agency, entity of local government, or private entity send copies to the responsible entity of any report regarding a records check or criminal records check that the agency or entity possesses, if the responsible entity obtains the written consent of the individual who is the subject of the report. (4) A responsible entity shall provide each applicant and employee with a copy of any report obtained about the applicant or employee under this section. (J) The director of developmental disabilities shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement this section. (1) The rules may do the following: (a) Require employees to undergo criminal records checks under this section; (b) Require responsible entities to obtain the driving records of employees under this section; (c) If the rules require employees to undergo criminal records checks, require responsible entities to obtain the driving records of employees, or both, exempt one or more classes of employees from the requirements. (2) The rules shall do all of the following: (a) If the rules require employees to undergo criminal records checks, require responsible entities to obtain the driving records of employees, or both, specify the times at which the criminal records checks are to be conducted and the driving records are to be obtained; (b) Specify circumstances under which a responsible entity may employ an applicant or employee who is found by a criminal records check required by this section to have been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense but meets standards in regard to rehabilitation set by the director; (c) Require a responsible entity to request a criminal records check under this section before employing an applicant conditionally as permitted under division (G) of this section. Sec. 5123.16. (A) As used in sections 5123.16 to 5123.1611 5123.1613 of the Revised Code: (1) "Applicant" means any of the following: (a) The chief executive officer of a business that applies under section 5123.161 of the Revised Code for a certificate to provide supported living; (b) The chief executive officer of a business that seeks renewal of the business's supported living certificate under section 5123.164 of the Revised Code; (c) An individual who applies under section 5123.161 of the Revised Code for a certificate to provide supported living as an independent provider; (d) An independent provider who seeks renewal of the independent provider's supported living certificate under section 5123.164 of the Revised Code. (2) "Business" means an association, corporation, nonprofit organization, partnership, trust, or other group of persons. "Business" does not mean an independent provider. (3) "Criminal records check" has the same meaning as in section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (4) "Disqualifying offense" means any of the offenses listed or described in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (e) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. (5) "Independent provider" means a provider who provides supported living on a self-employed basis and does not employ, directly or through contract, another person to provide the supported living. (6) "Provider" means a person or government entity certified by the director of developmental disabilities to provide supported living. For the purpose of division (A)(8) of this section, "provider" includes a person or government entity that seeks or previously held a certificate to provide supported living. (7) "Minor drug possession offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Related party" means any of the following: (a) In the case of a provider who is an individual, any of the following: (i) The spouse of the provider; (ii) A parent or stepparent of the provider or provider's spouse; (iii) A child of the provider or provider's spouse; (iv) A sibling, half sibling, or stepsibling of the provider or provider's spouse; (v) A grandparent of the provider or provider's spouse; (vi) A grandchild of the provider or provider's spouse. (b) In the case of a provider that is a person other than an individual, any of the following: (i) Any person or government entity that directly or indirectly controls the provider's day-to-day operations (including as a general manager, business manager, financial manager, administrator, or director), regardless of whether the person or government entity exercises the control pursuant to a contract or other arrangement and regardless of whether the person or government entity is required to file an Internal Revenue Code form W-2 for the provider; (ii) An officer of the provider, including the chief executive officer, president, vice-president, secretary, and treasurer; (iii) A member of the provider's board of directors or trustees; (iv) A person owning a financial interest of five per cent or more in the provider, including a direct, indirect, security, or mortgage financial interest; (v) The spouse, parent, stepparent, child, sibling, half sibling, stepsibling, grandparent, or grandchild of any of the persons specified in divisions (A)(8)(b)(i) to (iv) of this section; (vi) A person over which the provider has control of the day-to-day operation; (vii) A corporation that has a subsidiary relationship with the provider. (c) In the case of a provider that is a government entity, any of the following: (i) Any person or government entity that directly or indirectly controls the provider's day-to-day operations (including as a general manager, financial manager, administrator, or director), regardless of whether the person or government entity exercises the control pursuant to a contract or other arrangement; (ii) An officer of the provider; (iii) A member of the provider's governing board; (iv) A person or government entity over which the provider has control of the day-to-day operation. (B) No person or government entity may provide supported living without a valid supported living certificate issued by the director of developmental disabilities. (C) A county board of developmental disabilities may provide supported living only to the extent permitted by rules adopted under section 5123.1611 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5123.168. The director of developmental disabilities may issue an adjudication order in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to shall terminate a supported living certificate if the certificate holder has not billed for supported living for twelve twenty-four consecutive months. To terminate a supported living certificate under this section, the director shall send a notice by certified mail to the certificate holder at the address on file with the department of developmental disabilities explaining why the certificate is terminated. Sec. 5123.169. (A) The director of developmental disabilities shall not issue a supported living certificate to an applicant or renew an applicant's supported living certificate if either of the following applies: (1) The applicant fails to comply with division (C)(2) of this section; (2) Except as provided in rules adopted under section 5123.1611 of the Revised Code, the applicant is found by a criminal records check required by this section to have been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. (B) Before issuing a supported living certificate to an applicant or renewing an applicant's supported living certificate, the director shall require the applicant to submit a statement with the applicant's signature attesting that the applicant has not been convicted of, pleaded guilty to, or been found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. The director also shall require the applicant to sign an agreement under which the applicant agrees to notify the director within fourteen calendar days if, while holding a supported living certificate, the applicant is formally charged with, is convicted of, pleads guilty to, or is found eligible for intervention in lieu of conviction for a disqualifying offense. The agreement shall provide that the applicant's failure to provide the notification may result in action being taken by the director against the applicant under section 5123.166 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) As a condition of receiving a supported living certificate or having a supported living certificate renewed, an applicant shall request the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation to conduct a criminal records check of the applicant. If an applicant does not present proof to the director that the applicant has been a resident of this state for the five-year period immediately prior to the date that the applicant applies for issuance or renewal of the supported living certificate, the director shall require the applicant to request that the superintendent obtain information from the federal bureau of investigation as a part of the criminal records check. If the applicant presents proof to the director that the applicant has been a resident of this state for that five-year period, the director may require the applicant to request that the superintendent include information from the federal bureau of investigation in the criminal records check. For purposes of this division, an applicant may provide proof of residency in this state by presenting, with a notarized statement asserting that the applicant has been a resident of this state for that five-year period, a valid driver's license, notification of registration as an elector, a copy of an officially filed federal or state tax form identifying the applicant's permanent residence, or any other document the director considers acceptable. (2) Each applicant shall do all of the following: (a) Obtain a copy of the form prescribed pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and a standard impression sheet prescribed pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code; (b) Complete the form and provide the applicant's fingerprint impressions on the standard impression sheet; (c) Forward the completed form and standard impression sheet to the superintendent at the time the criminal records check is requested; (d) Instruct the superintendent to submit the completed report of the criminal records check directly to the director; (e) Pay to the bureau of criminal identification and investigation the fee prescribed pursuant to division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code for each criminal records check of the applicant requested and conducted pursuant to this section. (D) The director may request any other state or federal agency to supply the director with a written report regarding the criminal record of an applicant. The director may consider the reports when determining whether to issue a supported living certificate to the applicant or to renew an applicant's supported living certificate. (E) An applicant who seeks to be an independent provider or is an independent provider seeking renewal of the applicant's supported living certificate shall obtain the applicant's driving record from the bureau of motor vehicles and provide a copy of the record to the director if the supported living that the applicant will provide involves transporting individuals with developmental disabilities. The director may consider the applicant's driving record when determining whether to issue the applicant a supported living certificate or to renew the applicant's supported living certificate. (F)(1) A report obtained pursuant to this section is not a public record for purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall not be made available to any person, other than the following: (a) The applicant who is the subject of the report or the applicant's representative; (b) The director or the director's representative; (c) Any court, hearing officer, or other necessary individual involved in a case dealing with any of the following: (i) The denial of a supported living certificate or refusal to renew a supported living certificate; (ii) The denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate under section 5123.45 of the Revised Code; (iii) A civil or criminal action regarding the medicaid program. (2) An applicant for whom the director has obtained reports under this section may submit a written request to the director to have copies of the reports sent to any person or state or local government entity. The applicant shall specify in the request the person or entities to which the copies are to be sent. On receiving the request, the director shall send copies of the reports to the persons or entities specified. (3) The director may request that a person or state or local government entity send copies to the director of any report regarding a records check or criminal records check that the person or entity possesses, if the director obtains the written consent of the individual who is the subject of the report. (4) The director shall provide each applicant with a copy of any report obtained about the applicant under this section. Sec. 5123.1613. (A) A person who has been granted guardianship of an individual with a developmental disability shall not provide supported living to that individual either as an independent provider or as an employee or contractor of a supported living certificate holder unless there is a relationship by blood, adoption, or marriage between the guardian and the individual. (B) A supported living certificate holder owned or operated by a guardian of an individual with a developmental disability shall not provide supported living to that individual unless there is a relationship by blood, adoption, or marriage between the guardian and the individual. Sec. 5123.191. (A) The court of common pleas or a judge thereof in the judge's county, or the probate court, may appoint a receiver to take possession of and operate a residential facility licensed by the department of developmental disabilities, in causes pending in such courts respectively, when conditions existing at the facility present a substantial risk of physical or mental harm to residents and no other remedies at law are adequate to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the residents. Conditions at the facility that may present such risk of harm include, but are not limited to, instances when any of the following occur: (1) The residential facility is in violation of state or federal law or regulations. (2) The facility has had its license revoked or procedures for revocation have been initiated, or the facility is closing or intends to cease operations. (3) Arrangements for relocating residents need to be made. (4) Insolvency of the operator, licensee, or landowner threatens the operation of the facility. (5) The facility or operator has demonstrated a pattern and practice of repeated violations of state or federal laws or regulations. (B) A court in which a petition is filed pursuant to this section shall notify the person holding the license for the facility and the department of developmental disabilities of the filing. The court shall order the department to notify the facility owner, facility operator, county board of developmental disabilities, facility residents, and residents' parents and guardians of the filing of the petition. The court shall provide a hearing on the petition within five court days of the time it was filed, except that the court may appoint a receiver prior to that time if it determines that the circumstances necessitate such action. Following a hearing on the petition, and upon a determination that the appointment of a receiver is warranted, the court shall appoint a receiver and notify the department of developmental disabilities and appropriate persons of this action. (C) A residential facility for which a receiver has been named is deemed to be in compliance with section 5123.19 and Chapter 3721. of the Revised Code for the duration of the receivership. (D) When the operating revenue of a residential facility in receivership is insufficient to meet its operating expenses, including the cost of bringing the facility into compliance with state or federal laws or regulations, the court may order the state to provide necessary funding, except as provided in division (K) of this section. The state shall provide such funding, subject to the approval of the controlling board. The court may also order the appropriate authorities to expedite all inspections necessary for the issuance of licenses or the certification of a facility, and order a facility to be closed if it determines that reasonable efforts cannot bring the facility into substantial compliance with the law. (E) In establishing a receivership, the court shall set forth the powers and duties of the receiver. The court may generally authorize the receiver to do all that is prudent and necessary to safely and efficiently operate the residential facility within the requirements of state and federal law, but shall require the receiver to obtain court approval prior to making any single expenditure of more than five thousand dollars to correct deficiencies in the structure or furnishings of a facility. The court shall closely review the conduct of the receiver it has appointed and shall require regular and detailed reports. The receivership shall be reviewed at least every sixty days. (F) A receivership established pursuant to this section shall be terminated, following notification of the appropriate parties and a hearing, if the court determines either of the following: (1) The residential facility has been closed and the former residents have been relocated to an appropriate facility. (2) Circumstances no longer exist at the facility that present a substantial risk of physical or mental harm to residents, and there is no deficiency in the facility that is likely to create a future risk of harm. Notwithstanding division (F)(2) of this section, the court shall not terminate a receivership for a residential facility that has previously operated under another receivership unless the responsibility for the operation of the facility is transferred to an operator approved by the court and the department of developmental disabilities. (G) The department of developmental disabilities may, upon its own initiative or at the request of an owner, operator, or resident of a residential facility, or at the request of a resident's guardian or relative or a county board of developmental disabilities, petition the court to appoint a receiver to take possession of and operate a residential facility. When the department has been requested to file a petition by any of the parties listed above, it shall, within forty-eight hours of such request, either file such a petition or notify the requesting party of its decision not to file. If the department refuses to file, the requesting party may file a petition with the court requesting the appointment of a receiver to take possession of and operate a residential facility. Petitions filed pursuant to this division shall include the following: (1) A description of the specific conditions existing at the facility which present a substantial risk of physical or mental harm to residents; (2) A statement of the absence of other adequate remedies at law; (3) The number of individuals residing at the facility; (4) A statement that the facts have been brought to the attention of the owner or licensee and that conditions have not been remedied within a reasonable period of time or that the conditions, though remedied periodically, habitually exist at the facility as a pattern or practice; (5) The name and address of the person holding the license for the facility and the address of the department of developmental disabilities. The court may award to an operator appropriate costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, if it determines that a petitioner has initiated a proceeding in bad faith or merely for the purpose of harassing or embarrassing the operator. (H) Except for the department of developmental disabilities or a county board of developmental disabilities, no party or person interested in an action shall be appointed a receiver pursuant to this section. To assist the court in identifying persons qualified to be named as receivers, the director of developmental disabilities shall maintain a list of the names of such persons. The director shall, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, establish standards for evaluating persons desiring to be included on such a list. (I) Before a receiver enters upon the duties of that person, the receiver must be sworn to perform the duties of receiver faithfully, and, with surety approved by the court, judge, or clerk, execute a bond to such person, and in such sum as the court or judge directs, to the effect that such receiver will faithfully discharge the duties of receiver in the action, and obey the orders of the court therein. (J) Under the control of the appointing court, a receiver may bring and defend actions in the receiver's own name as receiver and take and keep possession of property. The court shall authorize the receiver to do the following: (1) Collect payment for all goods and services provided to the residents or others during the period of the receivership at the same rate as was charged by the licensee at the time the petition for receivership was filed, unless a different rate is set by the court; (2) Honor all leases, mortgages, and secured transactions governing all buildings, goods, and fixtures of which the receiver has taken possession and continues to use, subject to the following conditions: (a) In the case of a rental agreement, only to the extent of payments that are for the use of the property during the period of the receivership; (b) In the case of a purchase agreement only to the extent of payments that come due during the period of the receivership. (3) If transfer of residents is necessary, provide for the orderly transfer of residents by doing the following: (a) Cooperating with all appropriate state and local agencies in carrying out the transfer of residents to alternative community placements; (b) Providing for the transportation of residents' belongings and records; (c) Helping to locate alternative placements and develop discharge plans; (d) Preparing residents for the trauma of discharge; (e) Permitting residents or guardians to participate in transfer or discharge planning except when an emergency exists and immediate transfer is necessary. (4) Make periodic reports on the status of the residential program to the appropriate state agency, county board of developmental disabilities, parents, guardians, and residents; (5) Compromise demands or claims; (6) Generally do such acts respecting the residential facility as the court authorizes. (K) Neither the receiver nor the department of developmental disabilities is liable for debts incurred by the owner or operator of a residential facility for which a receiver has been appointed. (L) The department of developmental disabilities may contract for the operation of a residential facility in receivership. The department shall establish the conditions of a contract. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, contracts that are necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the receiver need not be competitively bid. (M) The department of developmental disabilities, the department of job and family serviceschildren and youth, and the department of health shall provide technical assistance to any receiver appointed pursuant to this section. Sec. 5123.41. As used in this section and sections 5123.42 to 5123.47 of the Revised Code: (A) "Adult services" has the same meaning as in section 5126.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "Certified supported living provider" means a person or government entity certified under section 5123.161 of the Revised Code. (C) "Drug" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (D) "Family member" means a parent, sibling, spouse, son, daughter, grandparent, aunt, uncle, cousin, or guardian of an individual with a developmental disability if the individual with a developmental disability lives with the person and is dependent on the person to the extent that, if the supports were withdrawn, another living arrangement would have to be found. (E) "Family support services" has the same meaning as in section 5126.01 of the Revised Code. (E)(F) "Health-related activities" means the following: (1) Taking vital signs; (2) Application of clean dressings that do not require health assessment; (3) Basic measurement of bodily intake and output; (4) Oral suctioning; (5) Use of glucometers; (6) External urinary catheter cleaning; (7) Emptying and replacing ostomy bags; (8) Collection of specimens by noninvasive means; (9) Pulse oximetry reading; (10) Use of continuous positive airway pressure machines; (11) Application of percussion vests; (12) Use of cough assist devices and insufflators; (13) Application of prescribed compression hosiery. (F)(G) "Licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (G)(H) "Metered dose inhaled medication" means a premeasured medication administered by inhalation using a hand-held dispenser or aerosol nebulizer. (H)(I) "Developmental disabilities personnel" means the employees and the workers under contract who provide specialized services to individuals with developmental disabilities. "Developmental disabilities personnel" includes those who provide the services as follows: (1) Through direct employment with the department of developmental disabilities or a county board of developmental disabilities; (2) Through an entity under contract with the department of developmental disabilities or a county board of developmental disabilities; (3) Through direct employment or by being under contract with private entities, including private entities that operate residential facilities. (I)(J) "Nursing delegation" means the process established in rules adopted by the board of nursing pursuant to Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code under which a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse acting at the direction of a registered nurse transfers the performance of a particular nursing activity or task to another person who is not otherwise authorized to perform the activity or task. (J)(K) "Over-the-counter medication" means a drug that may be sold and purchased without a prescription. (K)(L) "Prescribed medication" means a drug that is to be administered according to the instructions of a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs. (L)(M) "Residential facility" means a facility licensed under section 5123.19 of the Revised Code. (M)(N) "Specialized services" has the same meaning as in section 5123.50 of the Revised Code. (N)(O) "Topical over-the-counter musculoskeletal medication" means an over-the-counter medication that is applied topically or passes through the skin to provide relief from discomfort in the muscles, joints, or bones. Sec. 5123.42. (A) Developmental disabilities personnel who are not specifically authorized by other provisions of the Revised Code to administer medications or perform health-related activities may do so pursuant to this section as part of the specialized services the developmental disabilities personnel provide to individuals with developmental disabilities in the following categories: (1) Recipients of early intervention, preschool, and school-age services offered or provided pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (2) Recipients of adult services, if the services are received in a setting where seventeen or more individuals receive the services and the services are offered or provided pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (3) Recipients of adult services, if the services are received in a setting where not more than sixteen individuals receive the services and the services are offered or provided pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (4) Recipients of family support services offered or provided pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (5) Recipients of services from certified supported living providers, if the services are offered or provided pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (6) Recipients of residential support services from certified home and community-based services providers, if the services are received in a community living arrangement that includes not more than four individuals with developmental disabilities and the services are offered or provided pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (7) Recipients of services not included in divisions (A)(1) to (6) of this section that are offered or provided pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code; (8) Residents of a residential facility with not more than five resident beds; (9) Residents of a residential facility with at least six resident beds. (B)(1) In the case of individuals described in divisions (A)(1) to (9) of this section, developmental disabilities personnel may do all of the following without nursing delegation and without a certificate issued under section 5123.45 of the Revised Code: (a) Activate a vagal vagus nerve stimulator; (b) Use an epinephrine autoinjector to To treat anaphylaxis, administer prescribed epinephrine either by autoinjector or intranasally; (c) Administer topical over-the-counter medications for the purpose of cleaning, protecting, or comforting the skin, hair, nails, teeth, or oral surfaces, but not for the purpose of treating an open wound or a condition that requires a medical diagnosis, including a fungal infection. (2) The authority of developmental disabilities personnel to activate a vagal nerve stimulator, use an epinephrine autoinjector, and perform the health-related activity or administer topical over-the-counter the medications described in division (B)(1) of this section is subject to all of the following: (a) To activate a vagal nerve stimulator or use an epinephrine autoinjector, developmental Developmental disabilities personnel shall successfully complete the training course or courses developed under section 5123.43 of the Revised Code for developmental disabilities personnel. Developmental disabilities personnel shall activate a vagal nerve stimulator or use an epinephrine autoinjector perform the health-related activity or administer the medications described in division (B)(1) of this section only as authorized by the training completed. (b) The employer of developmental disabilities personnel shall ensure that the personnel have been trained specifically with respect to each individual for whom they activate a vagal nerve stimulator or use an epinephrine autoinjectorperform the health-related activity or administer the medications described in division (B)(1) of this section. Developmental disabilities personnel shall not activate a vagal nerve stimulator or use an epinephrine autoinjector perform such an activity or administer such medications for any individual for whom they have not been specifically trained. (c) If the employer of developmental disabilities personnel believes that the personnel have not or will not safely activate a vagal nerve stimulator or use an epinephrine autoinjectorperform the health-related activity or administer the medications described in division (B)(1) of this section, the employer shall prohibit the developmental disabilities personnel from continuing or commencing to do so. Developmental disabilities personnel shall not engage in the action or actions subject to an employer's prohibition. (d) Developmental disabilities personnel shall activate a vagal vagus nerve stimulator, use an administer prescribed epinephrine either by autoinjector or intranasally, or administer topical over-the-counter medications in accordance with the manufacturer's instructions. (C)(1) In the case of recipients of early intervention, preschool, and school-age services, as specified in division (A)(1) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may perform health-related activities. (b) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer oral and topical prescribed medications and topical over-the-counter musculoskeletal medications. (c) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer oxygen and metered dose inhaled medications. (d) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer prescribed medications through gastrostomy and jejunostomy tubes, if the tubes being used are stable and labeled. (e) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer routine doses of insulin through subcutaneous injections, inhalation, and insulin pumps. (f) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer prescribed medications for the treatment of metabolic glycemic disorders through subcutaneous injections. (2) In the case of individuals described in divisions (A)(2), (7), and (9) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may perform health-related activities. (b) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer oral and topical prescribed medications and topical over-the-counter musculoskeletal medications. (c) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer oxygen and metered dose inhaled medications. (d) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer prescribed medications through gastrostomy and jejunostomy tubes, if the tubes being used are stable and labeled. (e) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer routine doses of insulin through subcutaneous injections, inhalation, and insulin pumps. (f) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer prescribed medications for the treatment of metabolic glycemic disorders through subcutaneous injections. (3) In the case of individuals described in divisions (A)(3), (4), (5), (6), and (8) of this section, all of the following apply: (a) Without nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may perform health-related activities. (b) Without nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer oral and topical prescribed medications and topical over-the-counter musculoskeletal medications. (c) Without nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer oxygen and metered dose inhaled medications. (d) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer prescribed medications through gastrostomy and jejunostomy tubes, if the tubes being used are stable and labeled. (e) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer routine doses of insulin through subcutaneous injections, inhalation, and insulin pumps. (f) With nursing delegation, developmental disabilities personnel may administer prescribed medications for the treatment of metabolic glycemic disorders through subcutaneous injections. (D) The authority of developmental disabilities personnel to administer medications and perform health-related activities pursuant to division (C) of this section is subject to all of the following: (1) To administer medications or perform health-related activities for individuals in the categories specified under divisions (A)(1) to (9) of this section, developmental disabilities personnel shall obtain the certificate or certificates required by the department of developmental disabilities and issued under section 5123.45 of the Revised Code. Developmental disabilities personnel shall administer medications and perform health-related activities only as authorized by the certificate or certificates held. (2) If nursing delegation is required under division (C) of this section, developmental disabilities personnel shall not act without nursing delegation or in a manner that is inconsistent with the delegation. (3) The employer of developmental disabilities personnel shall ensure that the personnel have been trained specifically with respect to each individual for whom they administer medications or perform health-related activities. Developmental disabilities personnel shall not administer medications or perform health-related activities for any individual for whom they have not been specifically trained. (4) If the employer of developmental disabilities personnel believes that the developmental disabilities personnel have not or will not safely administer medications or perform health-related activities, the employer shall prohibit the the personnel from continuing or commencing to do so. Developmental disabilities personnel shall not engage in the action or actions subject to an employer's prohibition. (E) In accordance with section 5123.46 of the Revised Code, the department of developmental disabilities shall adopt rules governing its implementation of this section. The rules shall include the following: (1) Requirements for documentation of the administration of medications and performance of health-related activities by developmental disabilities personnel pursuant to the authority granted under this section; (2) Procedures for reporting errors that occur in the administration of medications and performance of health-related activities by developmental disabilities personnel pursuant to the authority granted under this section; (3) Other standards and procedures the department considers necessary for implementation of this section. Sec. 5123.423. A family member may administer medications or perform health-related activities as described in section 5123.42 of the Revised Code without either of the following: nursing delegation or a certificate issued under section 5123.45 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5123.47. (A) As used in this section: (1) "In-home care" means the supportive services provided within the home of an individual with a developmental disability who receives funding for the services through a county board of developmental disabilities, including any recipient of residential services funded as home and community-based services, family support services provided under section 5126.11 of the Revised Code, or supported living provided in accordance with sections 5126.41 to 5126.47 of the Revised Code. "In-home care" includes care that is provided outside an individual's home in places incidental to the home, and while traveling to places incidental to the home, except that "in-home care" does not include care provided in the facilities of a county board of developmental disabilities or care provided in schools. (2) "Parent" means either parent of a child, including an adoptive parent but not a foster parent. (3) "Unlicensed in-home care worker" means an individual who provides in-home care on a self-employed basis and does not employ, either directly or through contract, another person to provide the in-home care, but who is not a health care professional. (4) "Family member" means a parent, sibling, spouse, son, daughter, grandparent, aunt, uncle, cousin, or guardian of the individual with a developmental disability if the individual with a developmental disability lives with the person and is dependent on the person to the extent that, if the supports were withdrawn, another living arrangement would have to be found. (5) "Health care professional" means any of the following: (a) A dentist who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4715. of the Revised Code; (b) A registered or licensed practical nurse who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code; (c) An optometrist who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4725. of the Revised Code; (d) A pharmacist who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4729. of the Revised Code; (e) A person who holds a valid license or certificate issued under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathic medicine and surgery, podiatric medicine and surgery, or a limited brand of medicine; (f) A physician assistant who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4730. of the Revised Code; (g) An occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant or a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4755. of the Revised Code; (h) A respiratory care professional who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4761. of the Revised Code; (i) A certified mental health assistant who holds a valid license issued under Chapter 4772. of the Revised Code. (6)(5) "Health care task" means a task that is prescribed, ordered, delegated, or otherwise directed by a health care professional acting within the scope of the professional's practice. "Health care task" includes the administration of oral and topical prescribed medications; administration of nutrition and medications through gastrostomy and jejunostomy tubes that are stable and labeled; administration of oxygen and metered dose inhaled medications; administration of insulin through subcutaneous injections, inhalation, and insulin pumps; and administration of prescribed medications for the treatment of metabolic glycemic disorders through subcutaneous injections. (B) Except as provided in division (E)(F) of this section, a family member of an individual with a developmental disability may authorize an unlicensed in-home care worker to perform health care tasks as part of the in-home care the worker provides to the individual, if all of the following apply: (1) The family member is the primary supervisor of the care. (2) At the time the family member both authorizes the unlicensed in-home care worker to perform health care tasks and supervises the care provided to the individual, the family member is not acting as a paid provider for the individual. (3) The unlicensed in-home care worker has been selected by the family member or the individual receiving care and is under the direct supervision of the family member. (3) The unlicensed in-home care worker is providing the care through an employment or other arrangement entered into directly with the family member and is not otherwise employed by or under contract with a person or government entity to provide services to individuals with developmental disabilities. (4) The health care task is completed in accordance with standard, written instructions. (5) Performance of the health care task requires no judgment based on specialized health care knowledge or expertise. (6) The outcome of the health care task is reasonably predictable. (7) Performance of the health care task requires no complex observation of the individual receiving the care. (8) Improper performance of the health care task will result in only minimal complications that are not life-threatening. (C) A family member who authorizes an unlicensed in-home care worker to perform health care tasks under this section shall obtain do all of the following: (1) Obtain a prescription, if applicable, and written instructions from a health care professional for the care to be provided to the individual. The family member shall authorize; (2) Authorize the unlicensed in-home care worker to provide the care by preparing a written document granting the authority. The family member shall provide ; (3) Provide the unlicensed in-home care worker with appropriate training and written instructions in accordance with the instructions obtained from the health care professional. The family member or a health care professional shall be ; (4) Be available to communicate with the unlicensed in-home care worker either in person or by telecommunication while the in-home care worker performs a health care task. (D) Before an unlicensed in-home care worker may perform the health care tasks authorized by a family member under this section, the worker shall accept the written document described in division (C)(2) of this section granting the worker that authority. (E) A family member who authorizes an unlicensed in-home care worker to administer oral and topical prescribed medications or perform other health care tasks retains full responsibility for the health and safety of the individual receiving the care and for ensuring that the worker provides the care appropriately and safely. No entity that funds or monitors the provision of in-home care may be held liable for the results of the care provided under this section by an unlicensed in-home care worker, including such entities as the county board of developmental disabilities and the department of developmental disabilities. An unlicensed in-home care worker who is authorized under this section by a family member to provide care to an individual may not be held liable for any injury caused in providing the care, unless the worker provides the care in a manner that is not in accordance with the training and instructions received or the worker acts in a manner that constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. (E)(F) A county board of developmental disabilities may evaluate the authority granted by a family member under this section to an unlicensed in-home care worker at any time it considers necessary and shall evaluate the authority on receipt of a complaint. If In evaluating the authority, the board shall use appropriately licensed health care professionals. If, after its evaluation, the board determines that a family member has acted in a manner that is inappropriate for the health and safety of the individual receiving the care, then all of the following apply: (1) The authorization granted by the family member to an unlicensed in-home care worker is void, and the . (2) The family member may not authorize other unlicensed in-home care workers to provide the care. In making such a determination, the (3) The board shall use authorize appropriately licensed health care professionals and or certified providers to instead perform the health care tasks. (4) The board shall provide the family member an opportunity to file a complaint under section 5126.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5124.15. (A) Except as otherwise provided by section 5124.101 of the Revised Code, sections 5124.151 to 5124.154 of the Revised Code, and division (B) of this section, the total per medicaid day payment rate that the department of developmental disabilities shall pay to an ICF/IID provider for ICF/IID services the provider's ICF/IID provides during a fiscal year shall equal the sum of all of the following: (1) The per medicaid day capital component rate determined for the ICF/IID under section 5124.17 of the Revised Code; (2) The per medicaid day direct care costs component rate determined for the ICF/IID under section 5124.19 of the Revised Code; (3) The per medicaid day indirect care costs component rate determined for the ICF/IID under section 5124.21 of the Revised Code; (4) The per medicaid day other protected costs component rate determined for the ICF/IID under section 5124.23 of the Revised Code; (5) The sum of the following: (a) The per medicaid day quality incentive payment determined for the ICF/IID under section 5124.24 of the Revised Code; (b) A direct support personnel payment equal to two and four-hundredths per cent of the ICF/IID's desk-reviewed, actual, allowable, per medicaid day direct care costs from the applicable cost report year; (c) A For state fiscal year 2026, a professional workforce development payment equal to thirteen and fifty-five hundredths for state fiscal year 2024 and twenty and eighty-one hundredths during fiscal year 2025 ten and four hundred five thousandths per cent of the ICF/IID's desk-reviewed, actual, allowable, per medicaid day direct care costs from the applicable cost report year. (B) The department shall adjust the total per medicaid day payment rate otherwise determined for an ICF/IID under this section as directed by the general assembly through the enactment of law governing medicaid payments to ICF/IID providers. (C)(1) In addition to paying an ICF/IID provider the total per medicaid day payment rate determined for the provider's ICF/IID under divisions (A) and (B) of this section for a fiscal year, the department may do either or both of the following: (a) In accordance with section 5124.25 of the Revised Code, pay the provider a rate add-on for ventilator-dependent outlier ICF/IID services if the rate add-on is to be paid under that section and the department approves the provider's application for the rate add-on; (b) In accordance with section 5124.26 of the Revised Code, pay the provider for outlier ICF/IID services the ICF/IID provides to residents identified as needing intensive behavioral health support services if the rate add-on is to be paid under that section and the department approves the provider's application for the rate add-on. (2) The rate add-ons are not to be part of the ICF/IID's total per medicaid day payment rate. Sec. 5126.222. (A) A superintendent of a county board of developmental disabilities shall ensure that a service and support administrator, a conditional status service and support administrator, and a service and support administration supervisor successfully completes a web-based training program established by the department of developmental disabilities not later than thirty days after being hired. The training shall include all of the following topics: (1) Empowering individuals serviced through the development of person-centered individual service plans; (2) Coordinating services; (3) Enhancing team effectiveness; (4) Understanding medicaid; (5) An overview of ICFs/IID; (6) An overview of medicaid home and community-based services waivers administered by the department of developmental disabilities and county boards of developmental disabilities, including self-directed services, budget authority, and employer authority; (7) Targeted case management; (8) Employment navigation. (B) Before a superintendent of a county board of developmental disabilities renews the certification of a service and support administrator or service and support administration supervisor, the superintendent shall ensure that the renewal applicant has successfully completed the training program described in division (A) of this section. Sec. 5139.05. (A) The juvenile court may commit any child to the department of youth services as authorized in Chapter 2152. of the Revised Code, provided that any child so committed shall be at least ten years of age at the time of the child's delinquent act, and, if the child is ten or eleven years of age, the delinquent act is a violation of section 2909.03 of the Revised Code or would be aggravated murder, murder, or a first or second degree felony offense of violence if committed by an adult. Any order to commit a child to an institution under the control and management of the department shall have the effect of ordering that the child be committed to the department and assigned to an institution or placed in a community corrections facility in accordance with division (E) of section 5139.36 of the Revised Code as follows: (1) For an indefinite term consisting of the prescribed minimum period specified by the court under division (A)(1) of section 2152.16 of the Revised Code and a maximum period not to exceed the child's attainment of twenty-one years of age, if the child was committed pursuant to section 2152.16 of the Revised Code; (2) Until the child's attainment of twenty-one years of age, if the child was committed for aggravated murder or murder pursuant to section 2152.16 of the Revised Code; (3) For a period of commitment that shall be in addition to, and shall be served consecutively with and prior to, a period of commitment described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, if the child was committed pursuant to section 2152.17 of the Revised Code; (4) If the child is ten or eleven years of age, to an institution, a residential care facility, a residential facility, or a facility licensed by the department of job and family services children and youth that the department of youth services considers best designated for the training and rehabilitation of the child and protection of the public. The child shall be housed separately from children who are twelve years of age or older until the child is released or discharged or until the child attains twelve years of age, whichever occurs first. Upon the child's attainment of twelve years of age, if the child has not been released or discharged, the department is not required to house the child separately. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in section 5139.54 of the Revised Code, the release authority of the department of youth services, in accordance with section 5139.51 of the Revised Code and at any time after the end of the minimum period specified under division (A)(1) of section 2152.16 of the Revised Code, may grant the release from custody of any child committed to the department. The order committing a child to the department of youth services shall state that the child has been adjudicated a delinquent child and state the minimum period. The jurisdiction of the court terminates at the end of the minimum period except as follows: (a) In relation to judicial release procedures, supervision, and violations; (b) With respect to functions of the court related to the revocation of supervised release that are specified in sections 5139.51 and 5139.52 of the Revised Code; (c) In relation to its duties relating to serious youthful offender dispositional sentences under sections 2152.13 and 2152.14 of the Revised Code. (2) When a child has been committed to the department under section 2152.16 of the Revised Code, the department shall retain legal custody of the child until one of the following: (a) The department discharges the child to the exclusive management, control, and custody of the child's parent or the guardian of the child's person or, if the child is eighteen years of age or older, discharges the child. (b) The committing court, upon its own motion, upon petition of the parent, guardian of the person, or next friend of a child, or upon petition of the department, terminates the department's legal custody of the child. (c) The committing court grants the child a judicial release to court supervision under section 2152.22 of the Revised Code. (d) The department's legal custody of the child is terminated automatically by the child attaining twenty-one years of age. (e) If the child is subject to a serious youthful offender dispositional sentence, the adult portion of that dispositional sentence is imposed under section 2152.14 of the Revised Code. (C) When a child is committed to the department of youth services, the department may assign the child to a hospital for mental, physical, and other examination, inquiry, or treatment for the period of time that is necessary. The department may remove any child in its custody to a hospital for observation, and a complete report of every observation at the hospital shall be made in writing and shall include a record of observation, treatment, and medical history and a recommendation for future treatment, custody, and maintenance. The department shall thereupon order the placement and treatment that it determines to be most conducive to the purposes of Chapters 2151. and 5139. of the Revised Code. The committing court and all public authorities shall make available to the department all pertinent data in their possession with respect to the case. (D) Records maintained by the department of youth services pertaining to the children in its custody shall be accessible only to department employees, except by consent of the department, upon the order of the judge of a court of record, or as provided in divisions (D)(1) and (2) of this section. These records shall not be considered "public records," as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (1) Except as otherwise provided by a law of this state or the United States, the department of youth services may release records that are maintained by the department of youth services and that pertain to children in its custody to the department of rehabilitation and correction regarding persons who are under the jurisdiction of the department of rehabilitation and correction and who have previously been committed to the department of youth services. The department of rehabilitation and correction may use those records for the limited purpose of carrying out the duties of the department of rehabilitation and correction. Records released by the department of youth services to the department of rehabilitation and correction shall remain confidential and shall not be considered public records as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (2) The department of youth services shall provide to the superintendent of the school district in which a child discharged or released from the custody of the department is entitled to attend school under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code the records described in divisions (D)(4)(a) to (d) of section 2152.18 of the Revised Code. Subject to the provisions of section 3319.321 of the Revised Code and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, the records released to the superintendent shall remain confidential and shall not be considered public records as defined in section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) When a child is committed to the department of youth services, the department, orally or in writing, shall notify the parent, guardian, or custodian of a child that the parent, guardian, or custodian may request at any time from the superintendent of the institution in which the child is located any of the information described in divisions (E)(1)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section. The parent, guardian, or custodian may provide the department with the name, address, and telephone number of the parent, guardian, or custodian, and, until the department is notified of a change of name, address, or telephone number, the department shall use the name, address, and telephone number provided by the parent, guardian, or custodian to provide notices or answer inquiries concerning the following information: (a) When the department of youth services makes a permanent assignment of the child to a facility, the department, orally or in writing and on or before the third business day after the day the permanent assignment is made, shall notify the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child of the name of the facility to which the child has been permanently assigned. If a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child who is committed to the department of youth services requests, orally or in writing, the department to provide the parent, guardian, or custodian with the name of the facility in which the child is currently located, the department, orally or in writing and on or before the next business day after the day on which the request is made, shall provide the name of that facility to the parent, guardian, or custodian. (b) If a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child who is committed to the department of youth services, orally or in writing, asks the superintendent of the institution in which the child is located whether the child is being disciplined by the personnel of the institution, what disciplinary measure the personnel of the institution are using for the child, or why the child is being disciplined, the superintendent or the superintendent's designee, on or before the next business day after the day on which the request is made, shall provide the parent, guardian, or custodian with written or oral responses to the questions. (c) If a parent, guardian, or custodian of a child who is committed to the department of youth services, orally or in writing, asks the superintendent of the institution in which the child is held whether the child is receiving any medication from personnel of the institution, what type of medication the child is receiving, or what condition of the child the medication is intended to treat, the superintendent or the superintendent's designee, on or before the next business day after the day on which the request is made, shall provide the parent, guardian, or custodian with oral or written responses to the questions. (d) When a major incident occurs with respect to a child who is committed to the department of youth services, the department, as soon as reasonably possible after the major incident occurs, shall notify the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child that a major incident has occurred with respect to the child and of all the details of that incident that the department has ascertained. (2) The failure of the department of youth services to provide any notification required by or answer any requests made pursuant to division (E) of this section does not create a cause of action against the state. (F) The department of youth services, as a means of punishment while the child is in its custody, shall not prohibit a child who is committed to the department from seeing that child's parent, guardian, or custodian during standard visitation periods allowed by the department of youth services unless the superintendent of the institution in which the child is held determines that permitting that child to visit with the child's parent, guardian, or custodian would create a safety risk to that child, that child's parents, guardian, or custodian, the personnel of the institution, or other children held in that institution. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Permanent assignment" means the assignment or transfer for an extended period of time of a child who is committed to the department of youth services to a facility in which the child will receive training or participate in activities that are directed toward the child's successful rehabilitation. "Permanent assignment" does not include the transfer of a child to a facility for judicial release hearings pursuant to section 2152.22 of the Revised Code or for any other temporary assignment or transfer to a facility. (2) "Major incident" means the escape or attempted escape of a child who has been committed to the department of youth services from the facility to which the child is assigned; the return to the custody of the department of a child who has escaped or otherwise fled the custody and control of the department without authorization; the allegation of any sexual activity with a child committed to the department; physical injury to a child committed to the department as a result of alleged abuse by department staff; an accident resulting in injury to a child committed to the department that requires medical care or treatment outside the institution in which the child is located; the discovery of a controlled substance upon the person or in the property of a child committed to the department; a suicide attempt by a child committed to the department; a suicide attempt by a child committed to the department that results in injury to the child requiring emergency medical services outside the institution in which the child is located; the death of a child committed to the department; an injury to a visitor at an institution under the control of the department that is caused by a child committed to the department; and the commission or suspected commission of an act by a child committed to the department that would be an offense if committed by an adult. (3) "Sexual activity" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Controlled substance" has the same meaning as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Residential care facility" and "residential facility" have the same meanings as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5139.08. The department of youth services may enter into an agreement with the director of rehabilitation and correction pursuant to which the department of youth services, in accordance with division (C)(2) of section 5139.06 and section 5120.162 of the Revised Code, may transfer to a correctional medical center established by the department of rehabilitation and correction, children who are within its custody for diagnosis or treatment of an illness, physical condition, or other medical problem. The department of youth services may enter into any other agreements with the director of children and youth, the director of job and family services, the director of mental health and addiction services, the director of developmental disabilities, the director of rehabilitation and correction, with the courts having probation officers or other public officials, and with private agencies or institutions for separate care or special treatment of children subject to the control of the department of youth services. The department of youth services may, upon the request of a juvenile court not having a regular probation officer, provide probation services for such court. Upon request by the department of youth services, any public agency or group care facility established or administered by the state for the care and treatment of children and youth shall, consistent with its functions, accept and care for any child whose custody is vested in the department in the same manner as it would be required to do if custody had been vested by a court in such agency or group care facility. If the department has reasonable grounds to believe that any child or youth whose custody is vested in it is mentally ill or has an intellectual disability, the department may file an affidavit under section 5122.11 or 5123.76 of the Revised Code. The department's affidavit for admission of a child or youth to such institution shall be filed with the probate court of the county from which the child was committed to the department. Such court may request the probate court of the county in which the child is held to conduct the hearing on the application, in which case the court making such request shall bear the expenses of the proceeding. If the department files such an affidavit, the child or youth may be kept in such institution until a final decision on the affidavit is made by the appropriate court. Sec. 5139.12. Any person who is required, pursuant to division (A) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code, to report the person's knowledge of or reasonable cause to suspect abuse or neglect or threat of abuse or neglect of a child under eighteen years of age or a person with a developmental disability or physical impairment under twenty-one years of age, or any person who is permitted, pursuant to division (B) of that section, to report or cause such a report to be made and who makes or causes the report to be made, shall direct that report to the state highway patrol if the child is a delinquent child in the custody of an institution. If the state highway patrol determines after receipt of the report that there is probable cause that abuse or neglect or threat of abuse or neglect of the delinquent child occurred, the highway patrol shall report its findings to the department of youth services, to the court that ordered the disposition of the delinquent child for the act that would have been an offense if committed by an adult and for which the delinquent child is in the custody of the department, to the public children services agency in the county in which the child resides or in which the abuse or neglect or threat of abuse or neglect occurred, and to the chairperson and vice-chairperson of the correctional institution inspection committee established by section 103.71 of the Revised Codeattorney general. Sec. 5139.14. (A)(1) The department of youth services shall permit representatives of all nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that are registered with the department to enter institutions that are under the department's control and management for the purpose of providing reentry services to delinquent children in the department's custody. Reentry services may include, but are not limited to, counseling, housing, job-placement, and money-management assistance. (2) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for the screening and registration of nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that apply to provide reentry services to delinquent children in institutions under the department's control and management. (B)(1) The department shall post a department telephone number on the department's official internet web site that nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that wish to provide reentry services to delinquent children may call to obtain information. The internet web site also shall list all of the faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations that are registered with the department under this section. (2) The department shall actively recruit nonprofit faith-based, business, professional, civic, educational, and community organizations to provide reentry services in institutions under the department's control and management. The department shall recruit nonprofit organizations from all faiths and beliefs. (C) Annually, the department shall issue a written report on the department's progress in implementing the recommendations of the correctional faith-based initiatives task force. The department shall provide a copy of the written report to each member of the correctional institution inspection committee created under section 103.71 of the Revised Codethe general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. (D) The department shall not endorse or sponsor any faith-based reentry program or endorse any specific religious message. The department may not require any child in its custody to participate in a faith-based program. Sec. 5139.34. (A) Funds may be appropriated to the department of youth services for the purpose of granting state subsidies to counties. A county or the juvenile court that serves a county shall use state subsidies granted to the county pursuant to this section only in accordance with divisions (B)(2)(a) and (3)(a) of section 5139.43 of the Revised Code and the rules pertaining to the state subsidy funds that the department adopts pursuant to division (D) of section 5139.04 of the Revised Code. The department shall not grant financial assistance pursuant to this section for the provision of care and services for children in a placement facility unless the facility has been certified, licensed, or approved by a state or national agency with certification, licensure, or approval authority, including, but not limited to, the department of job and family serviceschildren and youth, department of education and workforce, department of mental health and addiction services, department of developmental disabilities, or American correctional association. For the purposes of this section, placement facilities do not include a state institution or a county or district children's home. The department of youth services also shall not grant financial assistance pursuant to this section for the provision of care and services for children, including, but not limited to, care and services in a detention facility, in another facility, or in out-of-home placement, unless the minimum standards applicable to the care and services that the department prescribes in rules adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 5139.04 of the Revised Code have been satisfied. (B) The department of youth services shall apply the following formula to determine the amount of the annual grant that each county is to receive pursuant to division (A) of this section, subject to the appropriation for this purpose to the department made by the general assembly: (1) Each county shall receive a basic annual grant of fifty thousand dollars. (2) The sum of the basic annual grants provided under division (B)(1) of this section shall be subtracted from the total amount of funds appropriated to the department of youth services for the purpose of making grants pursuant to division (A) of this section to determine the remaining portion of the funds appropriated. The remaining portion of the funds appropriated shall be distributed on a per capita basis to each county that has a population of more than twenty-five thousand for that portion of the population of the county that exceeds twenty-five thousand. (C)(1) Prior to a county's receipt of an annual grant pursuant to this section, the juvenile court that serves the county shall prepare, submit, and file in accordance with division (B)(3)(a) of section 5139.43 of the Revised Code an annual grant agreement and application for funding that is for the combined purposes of, and that satisfies the requirements of, this section and section 5139.43 of the Revised Code. In addition to the subject matters described in division (B)(3)(a) of section 5139.43 of the Revised Code or in the rules that the department adopts to implement that division, the annual grant agreement and application for funding shall address fiscal accountability and performance matters pertaining to the programs, care, and services that are specified in the agreement and application and for which state subsidy funds granted pursuant to this section will be used. (2) The county treasurer of each county that receives an annual grant pursuant to this section shall deposit the state subsidy funds so received into the county's felony delinquent care and custody fund created pursuant to division (B)(1) of section 5139.43 of the Revised Code. Subject to exceptions prescribed in section 5139.43 of the Revised Code that may apply to the disbursement, the department shall disburse the state subsidy funds to which a county is entitled in a lump sum payment that shall be made in July of each calendar year. (3) Upon an order of the juvenile court that serves a county and subject to appropriation by the board of county commissioners of that county, a county treasurer shall disburse from the county's felony delinquent care and custody fund the state subsidy funds granted to the county pursuant to this section for use only in accordance with this section, the applicable provisions of section 5139.43 of the Revised Code, and the county's approved annual grant agreement and application for funding. (4) The moneys in a county's felony delinquent care and custody fund that represent state subsidy funds granted pursuant to this section are subject to appropriation by the board of county commissioners of the county; shall be disbursed by the county treasurer as required by division (C)(3) of this section; shall be used in the manners referred to in division (C)(3) of this section; shall not revert to the county general fund at the end of any fiscal year; shall carry over in the felony delinquent care and custody fund from the end of any fiscal year to the next fiscal year; shall be in addition to, and shall not be used to reduce, any usual annual increase in county funding that the juvenile court is eligible to receive or the current level of county funding of the juvenile court and of any programs, care, or services for alleged or adjudicated delinquent children, unruly children, or juvenile traffic offenders or for children who are at risk of becoming delinquent children, unruly children, or juvenile traffic offenders; and shall not be used to pay for the care and custody of felony delinquents who are in the care and custody of an institution pursuant to a commitment, recommitment, or revocation of a release on parole by the juvenile court of that county or who are in the care and custody of a community corrections facility pursuant to a placement by the department as described in division (E) of section 5139.36 of the Revised Code. (5) As a condition of the continued receipt of state subsidy funds pursuant to this section, each county and the juvenile court that serves each county that receives an annual grant pursuant to this section shall comply with divisions (B)(3)(b), (c), and (d) of section 5139.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5145.162. (A) There is hereby created the office of enterprise development advisory board to advise and assist the department of rehabilitation and correction with the creation of training programs and jobs for inmates and releasees through partnerships with private sector businesses. The board shall consist of at least five appointed members and the staff representative assigned by the correctional institution inspection committee, who shall serve as an ex officio member. Each member shall have experience in labor relations, marketing, business management, or business. The members and chairperson shall be appointed by the director of the department of rehabilitation and correction. (B) Each member of the advisory board shall receive no compensation but may be reimbursed for expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of official duties of the board. Members of the board who are state employees shall be reimbursed for expenses pursuant to travel rules promulgated by the office of budget and management. (C) The advisory board shall adopt procedures for the conduct of the board's meetings. The board shall meet at least once every quarter, and otherwise shall meet at the call of the chairperson or the director of the department of rehabilitation and correction. Sixty per cent of the members shall constitute a quorum. No transaction of the board's business shall be taken without the concurrence of a quorum of the members. The board may have committees with persons who are not members of the board but whose experience and expertise is relevant and useful to the work of the committee. (D) The advisory board shall have the following duties: (1) Solicit business proposals offering job training, apprenticeship, education programs, and employment opportunities for inmates, releasees, and Ohio penal industries; (2) Provide information and input to the office of enterprise development to support the job training and employment program of inmates and releasees and any additional, related duties as requested by the director of the department of rehabilitation and correction; (3) Recommend to the office of enterprise development any legislation, administrative rule, or department policy change that the board believes is necessary to implement the department's program; (4) Promote public awareness of the office of enterprise development and the office's employment program; (5) Familiarize itself and the public with avenues to access the office of enterprise development on employment program concerns; (6) Advocate for the needs and concerns of the office of enterprise development in local communities, counties, and the state; (7) Play an active role in the office of enterprise development's efforts to reduce recidivism in the state by doing all of the following: (a) Providing input and making recommendations for the office's consideration in monitoring employment program compliance and effectiveness; (b) Making suggestions on the appropriate priorities for the office's grant award criteria; (c) Being a liaison between the office and constituents of the board's members; (d) Working to develop constituent groups interested in employment program issues; (8) Aid in the employment program development process by playing a leadership role in professional associations by discussing employment program issues. (E) The department of rehabilitation and correction shall initially screen each proposal obtained under division (D)(1) of this section to ensure that the proposal is a viable venture to pursue. If the department determines that a proposal is a viable venture to pursue, the department shall submit the proposal to the board for objective review against established guidelines. The board shall determine whether to recommend the implementation of the program to the department. Sec. 5145.32. Every officer or employee of a correctional institution under the control or supervision of the department of rehabilitation and correction, and every contractor, or employee of such contractor, upon entering the grounds of a state correctional institution, shall be subject to screening to prevent the conveyance of drugs of abuse into the institution. Sec. 5153.10. Each public children services agency shall designate an executive officer known as the "executive director," who shall not be in the classified civil service. The superintendent of the children's home, the county director of job and family services, or other individual may serve as the executive director. The agency shall, from time to time, inquire into community conditions affecting the welfare of children and study the work of the agency and its relation to the work of other organizations whose functions are related to child welfare. The agency may, after consultation with the executive director, adopt rules of general application, not inconsistent with law or with the rules adopted by the director of job and family serviceschildren and youth. Sec. 5153.122. Each PCSA caseworker hired after January 1, 2007, shall complete in-service training during the first year of the caseworker's continuous employment as a PCSA caseworker, except that the executive director of the public children services agency may waive the training requirement for a school of social work graduate who participated in the university partnership program described in division (E) of section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code and as provided in section 5153.124 of the Revised Code. The training shall consist of courses in all of the following: (A) Recognizing, accepting reports of, and preventing child abuse, neglect, and dependency; (B) Assessing child safety; (C) Assessing risks; (D) Interviewing persons; (E) Investigating cases; (F) Intervening; (G) Providing services to children and their families; (H) The importance of and need for accurate data; (I) Preparation for court; (J) Maintenance of case record information; (K) The legal duties of PCSA caseworkers to protect the constitutional and statutory rights of children and families from the initial time of contact during investigation through treatment, including instruction regarding parents' rights and the limitations that the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution places upon caseworkers and their investigations; (L) Content on other topics relevant to child abuse, neglect, and dependency, including permanency strategies, concurrent planning, and adoption as an option for unintended pregnancies. After a PCSA caseworker's first year of continuous employment as a PCSA caseworker, the caseworker annually shall complete thirty-six hours of training in areas relevant to the caseworker's assigned duties. During the first two years of continuous employment as a PCSA caseworker, each PCSA caseworker shall complete training in recognizing the signs of domestic violence and its relationship to child abuse as established in rules the director of children and youth shall adopt pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5153.16. (A) Except as provided in section 2151.422 of the Revised Code, in accordance with rules adopted under section 5153.166 of the Revised Code, and on behalf of children in the county whom the public children services agency considers to be in need of public care or protective services, the public children services agency shall do all of the following: (1) Make an investigation concerning any child alleged to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child; (2) Enter into agreements with the parent, guardian, or other person having legal custody of any child, or with the department of children and youth, department of mental health and addiction services, department of developmental disabilities, other department, any certified organization within or outside the county, or any agency or institution outside the state, having legal custody of any child, with respect to the custody, care, or placement of any child, or with respect to any matter, in the interests of the child, provided the permanent custody of a child shall not be transferred by a parent to the public children services agency without the consent of the juvenile court; (3) Enter into a contract with an agency providing prevention services in an effort to prevent neglect or abuse, to enhance a child's welfare, and to preserve the family unit intact when referring a family for prevention services under division (J) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code. (4) Accept custody of children committed to the public children services agency by a court exercising juvenile jurisdiction; (5) Provide such care as the public children services agency considers to be in the best interests of any child adjudicated to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child the agency finds to be in need of public care or service; (6) Provide social services to any unmarried girl adjudicated to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child who is pregnant with or has been delivered of a child; (7) Make available to the children with medical handicaps program of the department of health at its request any information concerning a child with a disability found to be in need of treatment under sections 3701.021 to 3701.028 of the Revised Code who is receiving services from the public children services agency; (8) Provide temporary emergency care for any child considered by the public children services agency to be in need of such care, without agreement or commitment; (9) Find certified foster homes, within or outside the county, for the care of children, including children with disabilities from other counties attending special schools in the county; (10) Subject to the approval of the board of county commissioners and the department of children and youth, establish and operate a training school or enter into an agreement with any municipal corporation or other political subdivision of the county respecting the operation, acquisition, or maintenance of any children's home, training school, or other institution for the care of children maintained by such municipal corporation or political subdivision; (11) Acquire and operate a county children's home, establish, maintain, and operate a receiving home for the temporary care of children, or procure certified foster homes for this purpose; (12) Enter into an agreement with the trustees of any district children's home, respecting the operation of the district children's home in cooperation with the other county boards in the district; (13) Cooperate with, make its services available to, and act as the agent of persons, courts, the department of children and youth, the department of health, and other organizations within and outside the state, in matters relating to the welfare of children, except that the public children services agency shall not be required to provide supervision of or other services related to the exercise of parenting time rights granted pursuant to section 3109.051 or 3109.12 of the Revised Code or companionship or visitation rights granted pursuant to section 3109.051, 3109.11, or 3109.12 of the Revised Code unless a juvenile court, pursuant to Chapter 2151. of the Revised Code, or a common pleas court, pursuant to division (E)(6) of section 3113.31 of the Revised Code, requires the provision of supervision or other services related to the exercise of the parenting time rights or companionship or visitation rights; (14) Make investigations at the request of any superintendent of schools in the county or the principal of any school concerning the application of any child adjudicated to be an abused, neglected, or dependent child for release from school, where such service is not provided through a school attendance department; (15) Administer funds provided under Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501 (1980), 42 U.S.C.A. 671, as amended, in accordance with rules adopted under section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code; (16) In addition to administering Title IV-E adoption assistance funds, enter into agreements to make adoption assistance payments under section 5153.163 of the Revised Code; (17) Implement a system of safety and risk assessment, in accordance with rules adopted by the director of children and youth, to assist the public children services agency in determining the risk of abuse or neglect to a child; (18) Enter into a plan of cooperation with the board of county commissioners under section 307.983 of the Revised Code and comply with each fiscal agreement the board enters into under section 307.98 of the Revised Code that include family services duties of public children services agencies and contracts the board enters into under sections 307.981 and 307.982 of the Revised Code that affect the public children services agency; (19) Make reasonable efforts to prevent the removal of an alleged or adjudicated abused, neglected, or dependent child from the child's home, eliminate the continued removal of the child from the child's home, or make it possible for the child to return home safely, except that reasonable efforts of that nature are not required when a court has made a determination under division (A)(2) of section 2151.419 of the Revised Code; (20) Make reasonable efforts to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan approved under division (E) of section 2151.417 of the Revised Code and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child; (21) Administer a Title IV-A program identified under division (A)(4)(c) or (h) of section 5101.80 of the Revised Code that the department of children and youth provides for the public children services agency to administer under the department's supervision pursuant to section 5101.801 of the Revised Code; (22) Administer the kinship permanency incentive program created under section 5101.802 5180.52 of the Revised Code under the supervision of the director of children and youth; (23) Provide independent living services pursuant to sections 2151.81 to 2151.84 of the Revised Code; (24) File a missing child report with a local law enforcement agency upon becoming aware that a child in the custody of the public children services agency is or may be missing. (B) The public children services agency shall use the system implemented pursuant to division (A)(17) of this section in connection with an investigation undertaken pursuant to division (G)(1) of section 2151.421 of the Revised Code to assess both of the following: (1) The ongoing safety of the child; (2) The appropriateness of the intensity and duration of the services provided to meet child and family needs throughout the duration of a case. (C) Except as provided in section 2151.422 of the Revised Code, in accordance with rules of the director of children and youth, and on behalf of children in the county whom the public children services agency considers to be in need of public care or protective services, the public children services agency may do the following: (1) Provide or find, with other child serving systems, specialized foster care for the care of children in a specialized foster home, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, certified under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (2)(a) Except as limited by divisions (C)(2)(b) and (c) of this section, contract with the following for the purpose of assisting the agency with its duties: (i) County departments of job and family services; (ii) Boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; (iii) County boards of developmental disabilities; (iv) Regional councils of political subdivisions established under Chapter 167. of the Revised Code; (v) Private and government providers of services; (vi) Managed care organizations and prepaid health plans. (b) A public children services agency contract under division (C)(2)(a) of this section regarding the agency's duties under section 2151.421 of the Revised Code may not provide for the entity under contract with the agency to perform any service not authorized by the department's rules. (c) Only a county children services board appointed under section 5153.03 of the Revised Code that is a public children services agency may contract under division (C)(2)(a) of this section. If an entity specified in division (B) or (C) of section 5153.02 of the Revised Code is the public children services agency for a county, the board of county commissioners may enter into contracts pursuant to section 307.982 of the Revised Code regarding the agency's duties. Sec. 5153.163. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Adoptive parent" means, as the context requires, a prospective adoptive parent or an adoptive parent. (2) "Relative" has the same meaning as in section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Before a child's adoption is finalized, a public children services agency may enter into an agreement with the child's adoptive parent under which the agency, to the extent state funds are available, may make state adoption maintenance subsidy payments as needed on behalf of the child when all of the following apply: (a) The child is a child with special needs. (b) The child was placed in the adoptive home by a public children services agency or a private child placing agency and may legally be adopted. (c) The adoptive parent has the capability of providing the permanent family relationships needed by the child. (d) The needs of the child are beyond the economic resources of the adoptive parent. (e) Acceptance of the child as a member of the adoptive parent's family would not be in the child's best interest without payments on the child's behalf under this section. (f) The gross income of the adoptive parent's family does not exceed one hundred twenty per cent of the median income of a family of the same size, including the child, as most recently determined for this state by the secretary of health and human services under Title XX of the "Social Security Act," 88 Stat. 2337, 42 U.S.C.A. 1397, as amended. (g) The child is not eligible for adoption assistance payments under Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501 (1980), 42 U.S.C.A. 671, as amended. (2) State adoption maintenance subsidy payment agreements must be made by either the public children services agency that has permanent custody of the child or the public children services agency of the county in which the private child placing agency that has permanent custody of the child is located. (3) State adoption maintenance subsidy payments shall be made in accordance with the agreement between the public children services agency and the adoptive parent and are subject to an annual redetermination of need. (4) Payments under this division may begin either before or after issuance of the final adoption decree, except that payments made before issuance of the final adoption decree may be made only while the child is living in the adoptive parent's home. Preadoption payments may be made for not more than twelve months, unless the final adoption decree is not issued within that time because of a delay in court proceedings. Payments that begin before issuance of the final adoption decree may continue after its issuance. (C)(1) A public children services agency may enter into an agreement with a child's relative under which the agency, to the extent state funds are available, may provide state kinship guardianship assistance as needed on behalf of the child when all of the following apply: (a) The relative has cared for the eligible child as a foster caregiver as defined by section 5103.02 of the Revised Code for at least six consecutive months. (b) Both of the following apply: (i) A juvenile court issued an order granting legal custody of the child to the relative, or a probate court issued an order granting guardianship of the child to the relative, and the order is not a temporary court order. (ii) The relative has committed to care for the child on a permanent basis. (c) The relative signed a state kinship guardianship assistance agreement prior to assuming legal guardianship or legal custody of the child. (d) The child had been removed from home pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement or as a result of a judicial determination to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child. (e) Returning the child home or adoption are not appropriate permanency options for the child. (f) The child demonstrates a strong attachment to the relative and the relative has a strong commitment to caring permanently for the child. (g) With respect to a child who has attained fourteen years of age, the child has been consulted regarding the state kinship guardianship assistance arrangement. (h) The child is not eligible for kinship guardianship assistance payments under Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 673(d), as amended. (2) The public children services agency that had custody of a child immediately prior to a court granting legal custody or guardianship of the child to a relative of the child described in division (C)(1) of this section is authorized to enter into a state kinship guardianship assistance agreement with that relative. (3) State kinship guardianship assistance for a child shall be provided in accordance with a state kinship guardianship assistance agreement entered into between the public children services agency and relative of the child described in division (C)(1) of this section and is subject to an annual redetermination of need. (4) Not later than fifteen months after September 30, 2021, if the amended state plan submitted under Title IV-E to implement 42 U.S.C. 673(d) as described in section 5101.1416 of the Revised Code is approved, division (C) of this section shall be implemented. (D) No payment shall be made under division (B) or (C) of this section on behalf of any person eighteen years of age or older beyond the end of the school year during which the person attains the age of eighteen or on behalf of a person with a mental or physical disability twenty-one years of age or older. (E) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are needed to implement this section. The rules shall establish all of the following: (1) The application process for all forms of assistance provided under this section; (2) The method to determine the amount of assistance payable under division (B) of this section; (3) The definition of "child with special needs" for this section; (4) The process whereby a child's continuing need for services provided under division (B) or (C) of this section is annually redetermined; (5) Any other rule, requirement, or procedure the department considers appropriate for the implementation of this section. (F) The state adoption special services subsidy program ceases to exist on July 1, 2004, except that, subject to the findings of the annual redetermination process established under division (E) of this section and the child's individual need for services, a public children services agency may continue to provide state adoption special services subsidy payments on behalf of a child for whom payments were being made prior to July 1, 2004. (G) Benefits and services provided under this section are inalienable whether by way of assignment, charge, or otherwise and exempt from execution, attachment, garnishment, and other like processes. Sec. 5160.37. (A) A medical assistance recipient's enrollment in a medical assistance program gives an automatic right of recovery to the department of medicaid and a county department of job and family services against the liability of a third party for the cost of medical assistance paid on behalf of the recipient. When an action or claim is brought against a third party by a medical assistance recipient, any payment, settlement or compromise of the action or claim, or any court award or judgment, is subject to the recovery right of the department of medicaid or county department. Except in the case of a medical assistance recipient who receives medical assistance through a medicaid managed care organization, the department's or county department's claim shall not exceed the amount of medical assistance paid by the department or county department on behalf of the recipient. A payment, settlement, compromise, judgment, or award that excludes the cost of medical assistance paid for by the department or county department shall not preclude a department from enforcing its rights under this section. (B)(1) In the case of a medical assistance recipient who receives medical assistance through a medicaid managed care organization that has a capitation agreement with a provider, the amount of the department's or county department's claim shall be the amount the medicaid managed care organization would have paid in the absence of a capitation agreement. (2) In the case of a medical assistance recipient who receives medical assistance through a medicaid managed care organization that does not have a capitation agreement with a provider, the amount of the department's or county department's claim shall be the amount the medicaid managed care organization pays for medical assistance rendered to the recipient, even if that amount is more than the amount the department or county department pays to the medicaid managed care organization for the recipient's medical assistance. (C) A medical assistance recipient, and the recipient's attorney, if any, shall cooperate with the departments. In furtherance of this requirement, the medical assistance recipient, or the recipient's attorney, if any, shall, not later than thirty days after initiating informal recovery activity or filing a legal recovery action against a third party, provide written notice of the activity or action to the department of medicaid or county department if it has paid for medical assistance under a medical assistance program. (D) The written notice that must be given under division (C) of this section shall disclose the identity and address of any third party against whom the medical assistance recipient has or may have a right of recovery. (E) No settlement, compromise, judgment, or award or any recovery in any action or claim by a medical assistance recipient where the department or county department has a right of recovery shall be made final without first giving the department or county department written notice as described in division (C) of this section and a reasonable opportunity to perfect its rights of recovery. If the department or county department is not given the appropriate written notice, the medical assistance recipient and, if there is one, the recipient's attorney, are liable to reimburse the department or county department for the recovery received to the extent of medical assistance payments made by the department or county department. (F) The department or county department shall be permitted to enforce its recovery rights against the third party even though it accepted prior payments in discharge of its rights under this section if, at the time the department or county department received such payments, it was not aware that additional medical expenses had been incurred but had not yet been paid by the department or county department. The third party becomes liable to the department or county department as soon as the third party is notified in writing of the valid claims for recovery under this section. (G)(1) Subject to division (G)(2) of this section, the right of recovery of the department or county department does not apply to that portion of any judgment, award, settlement, or compromise of a claim, to the extent of attorneys' fees, costs, or other expenses incurred by a medical assistance recipient in securing the judgment, award, settlement, or compromise, or to the extent of medical, surgical, and hospital expenses paid by such recipient from the recipient's own resources. (2) Reasonable attorneys' fees, not to exceed one-third of the total judgment, award, settlement, or compromise, plus costs and other expenses incurred by the medical assistance recipient in securing the judgment, award, settlement, or compromise, shall first be deducted from the total judgment, award, settlement, or compromise. After fees, costs, and other expenses are deducted from the total judgment, award, settlement, or compromise, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that the department of medicaid or county department shall receive no less than one-half of the remaining amount, or the actual amount of medical assistance paid, whichever is less. A party may rebut the presumption in accordance with division (L)(1) or , (2), or (3) of this section, as applicable. (H) A right of recovery created by this section may be enforced separately or jointly by the department of medicaid or county department. To enforce its recovery rights, the department or county department may do any of the following: (1) Intervene or join in any action or proceeding brought by the medical assistance recipient or on the recipient's behalf against any third party who may be liable for the cost of medical assistance paid; (2) Institute and pursue legal proceedings against any third party who may be liable for the cost of medical assistance paid; (3) Initiate legal proceedings in conjunction with any injured, diseased, or disabled medical assistance recipient or the recipient's attorney or representative. (I) A medical assistance recipient shall not assess attorney fees, costs, or other expenses against the department of medicaid or a county department when the department or county department enforces its right of recovery created by this section. (J) The right of recovery given to the department under this section includes payments made by a third party under contract with a person having a duty to support. (K) The department of medicaid may assign to a medical assistance provider the right of recovery given to the department under this section with respect to any claim for which the department has notified the provider that the department intends to recoup the department's prior payment for the claim. (L)(1) Prior to any payment to the department or a county department pursuant to the department's or county department's right of recovery under this section, a party that desires to rebut the presumption in division (G) of this section shall submit to the department or county department a request for a hearing in accordance with the procedure the department establishes in rules required by division (O) of this section. The amount sought by the department or county department shall be held in escrow or in an interest on lawyers' trust account until the hearing examiner renders a decision or the case is otherwise concluded. A party successfully rebuts the presumption by a showing of clear and convincing evidence that a different allocation is warranted. (2) A medical assistance recipient who has repaid money, on or after September 29, 2007, to the department or a county department pursuant to the department's or county department's right of recovery under this section, section 5160.38 of the Revised Code, or former section 5101.58 or 5101.59 of the Revised Code may request a hearing to rebut the presumption in division (G) of this section. The request shall be made in accordance with the procedure the department establishes for this purpose in rules required by division (O) of this section. It must be made not later than one hundred eighty days after September 29, 2015, or ninety days after the payment is made, whichever is later. A party successfully rebuts the presumption by a showing of clear and convincing evidence that a different allocation is warranted. (3) A medical assistance recipient who has repaid money, between April 6, 2007 and September 28, 2007, to the department or a county department pursuant to the department's or county department's right of recovery under this section, section 5160.38 of the Revised Code, or former section 5101.58 or 5101.59 of the Revised Code may request a hearing to rebut the presumption in division (G) of this section. The request shall be made not later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this amendment in accordance with the procedure the department establishes for this purpose in rules required by division (O) of this section. The presumption is successfully rebutted if the requestor demonstrates by clear and convincing evidence that a different allocation is warranted. (4) With respect to a hearing requested under division (L)(1) or , (2), or (3) of this section, all of the following are the case: (a) The hearing examiner may consider, but is not bound by the allocation of, medical expenses specified in a settlement agreement between the medical assistance recipient and the relevant third party; (b) The department or county department may raise affirmative defenses during the hearing, including the existence of a prior settlement with the medical assistance recipient, the doctrine of accord and satisfaction, or the common law principle of res judicata; (c) If the parties agree, live testimony shall not be presented at the hearing; (d) The hearing may be governed by rules adopted under section 5160.02 of the Revised Code. If such rules are adopted, Chapter 119. of the Revised Code applies to the hearing only to the extent specified in those rules; (e) The hearing examiner's decision is binding on the department or county department and the medical assistance recipient unless the decision is reversed or modified on appeal to the medicaid director as described in division (M) of this section; (f) A request for a hearing may be submitted by any of the following: (i) The medical assistance recipient; (ii) The medical assistance recipient's authorized representative; (iii) The executor or administrator of a medical assistance recipient's estate authorized to make or pursue a request; (iv) A court-appointed guardian; (v) An attorney who has been directly retained by the medical assistance recipient, or the recipient's parent, legal guardian, or court-appointed guardian. (M)(1) A medical assistance recipient who disagrees with a hearing examiner's decision under division (L) of this section may file an administrative appeal with the medicaid director in accordance with the procedure the department establishes for this purpose in rules required by division (O) of this section. A hearing is not required during the administrative appeal, but the director or the director's designee shall review the hearing examiner's decision and any prior relevant administrative action. After the review, the director or the director's designee shall affirm, modify, remand, or reverse the hearing decision. A decision made under this division is final and binding on the department or county department and the medical assistance recipient unless it is reversed or modified on appeal to a court of common pleas as described in division (N) of this section. (2) An administrative appeal may be governed by rules adopted under section 5160.02 of the Revised Code. If such rules are adopted, Chapter 119. of the Revised Code applies to an administrative appeal only to the extent specified in those rules. (N) A party to an administrative appeal described in division (M) of this section may file an appeal with a court of common pleas in accordance with section 119.12 of the Revised Code. (O) The medicaid director shall adopt rules under section 5160.02 of the Revised Code as necessary to implement this section, including rules establishing procedures a party may use to request a hearing under division (L)(1) or , (2), or (3) of this section or an administrative appeal under division (M)(1) of this section. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (P) Divisions (L) to (N) of this section are remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed by the courts of this state in accordance with section 1.11 of the Revised Code. Those divisions specify the sole remedy available to a party who claims the department or a county department has received or is to receive more money than entitled to receive under this section, section 5160.38 of the Revised Code, or former section 5101.58 or 5101.59 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5162.08. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, and in accordance with section 5166.03 of the Revised Code, the department of medicaid shall not seek or implement an amendment to the medicaid state plan or a medicaid waiver under section 1115 or 1915 of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1315 and 42 U.S.C. 1396n, that would expand medicaid coverage to any additional individuals or class of individuals or increase any net costs to the state, without first providing notice to the legislative service commission and the standing committees in the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over medicaid. (B) The department shall provide regular updates to those committees, on a schedule determined by the chairpersons of each committee, regarding the status of any amendment to the medicaid state plan or medicaid waiver described in division (A) of this section. Sec. 5162.13. (A) On or before the first day of January of each year, the department of medicaid shall complete a report on the effectiveness of the medicaid program in meeting the health care needs of low-income pregnant women, infants, and children. The report shall include all of the following, delineated by race and ethnic group: (1) The estimated number of pregnant women, infants, and children eligible for the program; (2) The actual number of eligible persons enrolled in the program; (3) The actual number of enrolled pregnant women categorized by estimated gestational age at time of enrollment; (4) The average number of days between the following events: (a) A pregnant woman's application for medicaid and enrollment in the fee-for-service component of medicaid; (b) A pregnant woman's application for enrollment in a medicaid managed care organization and enrollment in the managed care organization. The information described in divisions (A)(4)(a) and (b) of this section shall also be delineated by county and the urban and rural communities specified in rules adopted under section 3701.142 of the Revised Code. (5) The number of prenatal, postpartum, and child health visits; (6) The estimated number of enrolled women of child-bearing age who use a tobacco product; (7) The estimated number of enrolled women of child-bearing age who participate in a tobacco cessation program or who use a tobacco cessation product; (8) The rates at which enrolled pregnant women receive addiction or mental health services, progesterone therapy, and any other service specified by the department; (9) A report on birth outcomes, including a comparison of low-birthweight births and infant mortality rates of medicaid recipients with the general female child-bearing and infant population in this state; (10) A comparison of the prenatal, delivery, and child health costs of the program with such costs of similar programs in other states, where available; (11) A report on performance data generated by the component of the state innovation model (SIM) grant pertaining to episode-based payments for perinatal care that was awarded to this state by the center for medicare and medicaid innovation in the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services; (12) A report on funds allocated for infant mortality reduction initiatives in the urban and rural communities specified in rules adopted under section 3701.142 of the Revised Code; (13) A report on the results of client responses to questions related to pregnancy services and healthcheck that are asked by the personnel of county departments of job and family services; (14) A comparison of the performance of the fee-for-service component of medicaid with the performance of each medicaid managed care organization on perinatal health metrics; (15) A report demonstrating cost savings resulting from program investments; (16) Beginning two years after the effective date of this amendment April 30, 2024, a report on the medicaid coverage of doula services required by section 5164.071 of the Revised Code, including: (a) Outcomes related to maternal health and maternal morbidity; (b) Infant health outcomes; (c) The average costs of providing doula services to mothers and infants; (d) Estimated cost increases or savings as a result of providing doula coverage. (B) The department shall submit the report to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code and to the joint medicaid oversight committee. The department also shall make the report available to the public. (C) The department shall provide to the joint medicaid oversight committee legislative service commission a copy of the data used to calculate the information required in the report under division (A)(16) of this section. Sec. 5162.132. Annually(A) Not later than the thirty-first day of December of each year, the department of medicaid shall prepare a report on the department's efforts to minimize fraud, waste, and abuse in the medicaid program. The report shall include all of the following for the most recently concluded state fiscal year: (1) Improper medicaid payments and expenditures, including the individual and total dollar amounts for claims that were determined to be the result of fraud, waste, or abuse; (2) Federal and state recovered funds, including the dollar amounts per claim and the total dollar amounts concerning fraud, waste, and abuse in the medicaid program; (3) Aggregate data concerning improper payments and ineligible medicaid recipients who received medicaid services as a percentage of the claims investigated or reviewed; (4) The number of payments made in error, the dollar amount of those payments within the medicaid program, and the number of confirmed cases of intentional program violation and fraud. (B) Each report shall be made available on the department's web site. The department shall submit a copy of each report to the governor, general assembly, and joint medicaid oversight committeechairpersons and ranking members of the committees of the house of representatives and senate with jurisdiction over medicaid and the legislative service commission. The copy to the general assembly shall be submitted in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Copies of the report also shall be made available to the public on request. Sec. 5162.133. Not less than once each year, the medicaid director shall submit a report on the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program to the governor, and the general assembly, and joint medicaid oversight committee. The copy to the general assembly shall be submitted in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The report shall include all of the following information: (A) The number of individuals who participated in the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program; (B) The cost of the program; (C) The amount of revenue generated by premiums that participants pay under section 5163.094 of the Revised Code; (D) The average amount of earned income of participants' families; (E)(D) The average amount of time participants have participated in the program; (F)(E) The types of other health insurance participants have been able to obtain. Sec. 5162.134. Not later than the first day of each July, the medicaid director shall complete a report of the evaluation conducted under section 5164.911 of the Revised Code regarding the integrated care delivery system. The director shall provide a copy of the report to the general assembly and joint medicaid oversight committee. The copy to the general assembly shall be provided in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The director also shall make the report available to the public. Sec. 5162.136. (A) The department of medicaid shall conduct periodic reviews to determine the barriers that medicaid recipients face in gaining full access to interventions intended to reduce tobacco use, prevent prematurity, and promote optimal birth spacing. The first review shall occur not later than sixty days after the effective date of this section April 6, 2017. Thereafter, reviews shall be conducted every six months. The department shall prepare a report that summarizes the results of each review, which must contain the information specified in division (C)(1) or (2) of this section, as applicable. Each report shall be submitted to the commission on infant mortality, the joint medicaid oversight committee, and the general assembly. Submissions to the general assembly shall be made in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. (B) The department shall make a presentation on each report at the first meeting of the commission on infant mortality that follows the report's submission to the commission. (C)(1) All of the following shall be in the first report submitted in accordance with division (A) of this section: (a) Identification of the access barriers described in division (A) of this section, the individuals affected by the barriers, and whether the barriers result from policies implemented by the department, medicaid managed care organizations, providers, or others; (b) Recommendations for the expedient removal of the access barriers; (c) An analysis of the performance of the fee-for-service component of medicaid and the performance of each medicaid managed care organization on health metrics pertaining to tobacco cessation, prematurity prevention, and birth spacing; (d) Any other information the department considers pertinent to the report's topic. (2) All of the following shall be in each subsequent report submitted in accordance with division (A) of this section: (a) The progress that has been made on removing the access barriers described in division (A) of this section and the impact such progress has had on reducing the infant mortality rate in this state; (b) A performance analysis of the fee-for-service component of medicaid and each medicaid managed care organization on health metrics pertaining to tobacco cessation, prematurity prevention, and birth spacing; (c) Any other information the department considers pertinent. Sec. 5162.1310. (A) The department of medicaid shall periodically evaluate the success that members of the expansion eligibility group have with the following: (1) Obtaining employer-sponsored health insurance coverage; (2) Improving health conditions that would otherwise prevent or inhibit stable employment; (3) Improving the conditions of their employment, including duration and hours of employment. (B) For the purpose of aiding the department's evaluations under this section, medicaid managed care organizations shall collect and submit to the department relevant data about members of the expansion eligibility group who are enrolled in the organizations' medicaid MCO plans. The department may request that a medicaid managed care organization collect and submit to the department additional data the department needs for the evaluation. (C) The department shall complete a report for each evaluation conducted under this section. The director shall provide a copy of the report to the general assembly and joint medicaid oversight committee. The copy to the general assembly shall be provided in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5162.14. (A) The medicaid director shall immediately provide notice in accordance with this section if the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services does any of the following related to a quarterly medicaid statement of expenditures for medical assistance programs form that is submitted by the department of medicaid: (1) Determines that the form has a variance of expenditures of eight per cent or greater; (2) Asks any questions related to the form; (3) Refuses to certify the information provided on the form; (4) Refuses to release any funds to the state. (B) When providing notice under this section, the director shall include any letter or information that is provided by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services in its questioning or deciding not to certify the form, as well as any correspondences from the department in response. (C) The notice required under this section shall be provided to all of the following: (1) The speaker of the house of representatives and president of the senate; (2) The director of the legislative service commission; (3) The chairpersons of the relevant standing committees in both the house of representatives and the senate. Sec. 5162.25. (A) As used in this section: (1) "State directed payment program" means a payment program authorized by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c). (2) "Preprint" means a form created by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services to request approval of a state directed payment program, as required under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c). (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) or (3) of this section, the medicaid director shall comply with this section for all new and existing state directed payment programs. (2) The medicaid director shall not establish more than fifty state directed payment programs during a fiscal biennium. (3) This section does not apply to a state directed payment program that is funded by the department of medicaid or the hospital franchise permit fee program. (C) All of the following apply to a state directed payment program that is subject to this section: (1) The program shall comply with the requirements of 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c), including all of the following: (a) The program shall be approved by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services, and the director shall seek approval for the program in accordance with section 5162.07 of the Revised Code. (b) Directed payments under the program shall not exceed the average commercial rate for all providers participating under a preprint unless exempted by a value-based purchasing agreement approved by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services. (c) The program shall be subject to an evaluation plan, in accordance with 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(ii)(D). (2) The program shall be for hospital providers and services or professional services provided by hospitals. (3) Unless otherwise determined by the medicaid director, only one state directed payment preprint may be approved for each of the following provider classes: (a) Inpatient and outpatient hospital services; (b) Physician services; (c) Children's hospitals participating in the outcomes acceleration for kids quality initiative. (D) A hospital provider participating in a state directed payment program shall do all of the following: (1) Enter into one or more contracts related to the state directed payment program as necessary, as determined by the department; (2) Comply with all average commercial rate reporting requirements established by the department, related to the requirements set forth in 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(iii); (3) Comply with the department's state directed payment quality measure set, including the metrics and targets set by the department for the state directed payment program to advance the goals and objectives specified in the department's quality strategy, as specified in 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(ii)(C) and 42 C.F.R. 438.340; (4) Cooperate with any evaluation or reporting requirements established by the department related to the requirements set forth in 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(ii)(D) and (F). (E) For any preprint effective for a rating period beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a hospital provider contract required under division (D)(1) of this section shall be executed not later than the first day of October preceding the first fiscal year of a biennium. A contract required under this section may be entered into in accordance with section 5162.32 of the Revised Code. (F) The department shall enter into an agreement with the authorized representative of each entity participating in a state directed payment program established under this section. No agreement entered into under this section shall be valid and enforceable unless the director of budget and management first certifies that there is a balance in the appropriation used to support state directed payment programs that is not already obligated under existing directed payment programs, in an amount at least equal to the cost in the current fiscal year of the state directed payment program that is the subject of the agreement. (G)(1) All funds supporting a state directed payment program shall comply with the requirements specified in 42 C.F.R. 433.51. No hospital provider may participate in a state directed payment program unless sufficient funds are obligated and appropriated. (2) The department shall not at any time provide general revenue funds or other state funds for a state directed payment program that is subject to this section. The director shall terminate or decline to establish any state directed payment program if either of the following is the case: (a) Local funding is not available or sufficient to sustain the program. (b) The federal government restricts or limits the availability of federal funds to support state directed payment programs or otherwise requires the state to utilize general revenue funds or other state funds as a condition of establishing or maintaining a state directed payment program. (H) The department shall not utilize more than two per cent of funds received to support a state directed payment program established under this section, including federal financial participation, for the administration of state directed payment programs. Additionally, the department shall not utilize more than two per cent of funds received to support a state directed payment program established under this section, including federal financial participation, for the administration of the department and the medicaid program. Sec. 5162.251. The department of medicaid shall prepare and submit quarterly reports to the legislative service commission and the chairpersons of the standing committees in the house of representatives and the senate with jurisdiction over medicaid regarding any new state directed payment programs established under section 5162.25 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5162.70. (A) As used in this section: (1) "CPI" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers as published by the United States bureau of labor statistics. (2) "CPI medical inflation rate" means the inflation rate for medical care, or the successor term for medical care, for the midwest region as specified in the CPI. (3) "JMOC projected medical inflation rate" means the following: (a) The projected medical inflation rate for a fiscal biennium determined by the actuary with which the joint medicaid oversight committee contracts under section 103.414 of the Revised Code if the committee agrees with the actuary's projected medical inflation rate for that fiscal biennium; (b) The different projected medical inflation rate for a fiscal biennium determined by the joint medicaid oversight committee under section 103.414 of the Revised Code if the committee disagrees with the projected medical inflation rate determined for that fiscal biennium by the actuary with which the committee contracts under that section. (4) "Successor term" means a term that the United States bureau of labor statistics uses in place of another term in revisions to the CPI. (B) The medicaid director shall implement reforms to the medicaid program that do all of the following: (1) Limit the growth in the per member per month cost of the medicaid program, as determined on an aggregate basis for all eligibility groups, for a fiscal biennium to not more than the lesser of the following: (a) The average annual increase in the CPI medical inflation rate for the most recent three-year period for which the necessary data is available as of the first day of the fiscal biennium, weighted by the most recent year of the three years; (b) The JMOC projected medical inflation rate for the fiscal biennium, as determined under section 103.412 of the Revised Code. (2) Achieve the limit in the growth of the per member per month cost of the medicaid program under division (B)(1) of this section by doing all of the following: (a) Improving the physical and mental health of medicaid recipients; (b) Providing for medicaid recipients to receive medicaid services in the most cost-effective and sustainable manner; (c) Removing barriers that impede medicaid recipients' ability to transfer to lower cost, and more appropriate, medicaid services, including home and community-based services; (d) Establishing medicaid payment rates that encourage value over volume and result in medicaid services being provided in the most efficient and effective manner possible; (e) Implementing fraud and abuse prevention and cost avoidance mechanisms to the fullest extent possible. (3) Reduce the prevalence of comorbid health conditions among, and the mortality rates of, medicaid recipients; (4) Reduce infant mortality rates among medicaid recipients. (C) When determining the growth in the per member per month cost of the medicaid program for purposes of the reforms required by this section, the medicaid director shall not exclude any medicaid eligibility group, provider wages, or service. The director may exclude one-time expenses or expenses that are not directly related to enrollees. (D) The medicaid director shall implement the reforms under this section in accordance with evidence-based strategies that include measurable goals. (E) By October first of each calendar year, the medicaid director shall submit to the joint medicaid oversight committee legislative service commission a report detailing the reforms implemented under this section. In even-numbered years, the report shall include the department's historical and projected medicaid program expenditure and utilization trend rates by medicaid program and service category for each year of the upcoming fiscal biennium and an explanation of how the trend rates were calculated. (F) The reforms implemented under this section shall, without making the medicaid program's eligibility requirements more restrictive, reduce the relative number of individuals enrolled in the medicaid program who have the greatest potential to obtain the income and resources that would enable them to cease enrollment in medicaid and instead obtain health care coverage through employer-sponsored health insurance or an exchange. Sec. 5162.82. Before making any payment rate increases greater than ten per cent under the medicaid program, the medicaid director shall notify the joint medicaid oversight committee standing committees with oversight of the medicaid program as provided in section 103.41 of the Revised Code of the increase and be available to testify before the joint medicaid oversight committee regarding the increase. Sec. 5163.03. (A) Subject to section 5163.05 of the Revised Code, the The medicaid program shall cover all mandatory eligibility groups. (B) The medicaid program shall cover all of the optional eligibility groups that state statutes require the medicaid program to cover. (C) The medicaid program may cover any of the optional eligibility groups to which either of the following applies: (1) State statutes expressly permit the medicaid program to cover the optional eligibility group. (2) The medicaid program covers the optional eligibility group on the effective date of this amendment November 22, 2017. (D) The medicaid program shall not cover an optional eligibility group to which either of the following applies: (1) State statutes prohibit the medicaid program from covering the optional eligibility group. (2) Except as provided in divisions (B) and (C)(1) of this section, the medicaid program does not cover the optional eligibility group on the effective date of this amendment November 22, 2017. Sec. 5163.04. (A) If the federal medical assistance percentage for medical assistance provided to members of the expansion eligibility group is set below ninety per cent, the department of medicaid shall do both of the following: (1) Immediately discontinue all medical assistance for members of the group. (2) Not later than fifteen business days after the change to the federal medical assistance percentage, certify to the director of budget and management, legislative service commission, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of representatives the state and federal shares of total actual expenditure for the expansion eligibility group for the most recently completed month prior to the change. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, the state share amount certified under division (A)(2) of this section shall be multiplied by the number of months remaining in the fiscal year. The amount calculated under this division shall remain in the general revenue fund until the end of the fiscal year, at which time the funds shall be transferred in accordance with section 131.44 of the Revised Code. (2) If the change to the federal medical assistance percentage described in division (A) of this section occurs during the first year of a fiscal biennium, the state share amount certified under division (A)(2) of this section shall be multiplied by twelve for the second year of the fiscal biennium. The amount calculated under this division shall remain in the general revenue fund until the end of the fiscal biennium, at which time the funds shall be transferred in accordance with section 131.44 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5163.091. Under the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program, an individual who does all both of the following in accordance with rules authorized by section 5163.098 of the Revised Code qualifies for the medicaid program: (A) Applies for the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program; (B) Provides satisfactory evidence of all of the following: (1) That the individual is at least sixteen years of age and under sixty-five years of age; (2) Except as provided in section 5163.096 of the Revised Code, that one of the following applies to the individual: (a) The individual is considered disabled for the purpose of the supplemental security income program, regardless of whether the individual receives supplemental security income benefits, and the individual has earnings from employment. (b) The individual is an employed individual with a medically improved disability. (3) That the value of the individual's resources, less amounts disregarded pursuant to rules authorized by section 5163.098 of the Revised Code, does not exceed the amount provided for by section 5163.092 of the Revised Code; (4) That the individual's income, less amounts disregarded pursuant to section 5163.093 of the Revised Code, does not exceed two hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty line; (5) That the individual meets the additional eligibility requirements for the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program established in rules authorized by section 5163.098 of the Revised Code. (C) To the extent required by section 5163.094 of the Revised Code, pays the premium established under that section. Sec. 5163.093. For the purpose of determining whether an individual is within the income eligibility limit for the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program, all of the following apply: (A) Twenty thousand dollars of the individual's earned income shall be disregarded. (B) No amount that the individual's employer pays to obtain health insurance for one or more members of the individual's family, including any amount of a premium established under section 5163.094 of the Revised Code that the employer pays, shall be treated as the individual's income. (C) Any other amounts, if any, specified in rules authorized by section 5163.098 of the Revised Code shall be disregarded from the individual's earned income, unearned income, or both. Sec. 5163.094. An individual whose income exceeds one hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty line shall not be required to pay an annual a premium as a condition of qualifying for the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program. The amount of the premium shall be determined as follows: (A) Subtract one hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty line, as applicable for a family size equal to the size of the individual's family, from the amount of the income of the individual's family; (B) Subtract an amount specified in rules authorized by section 5163.098 of the Revised Code from the difference determined under division (A) of this section; (C) Multiply the difference determined under division (B) of this section by one tenth. Sec. 5163.098. (A) The medicaid director shall adopt rules under section 5163.02 of the Revised Code as necessary to implement the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program. The rules shall do all of the following: (1) Specify assets, asset values, and amounts to be disregarded in determining asset and income eligibility limits for the program; (2) Establish meanings for the terms "earned income," "health insurance," "resources," "spouse," and "unearned income"; (3) Establish additional eligibility requirements for the program that must be established for the United States secretary of health and human services to approve the program; (4) For the purpose of division (B) of section 5163.094 of the Revised Code, specify an amount to be subtracted from the difference determined under division (A) of that section. (B) The director may adopt rules under section 5163.02 of the Revised Code to specify amounts to be disregarded from an individual's earned income, unearned income, or both under division (C) of section 5163.093 of the Revised Code for the purpose of determining whether the individual is within the income eligibility limit for the medicaid buy-in for workers with disabilities program. Sec. 5163.104. As used in this section, "presumptive eligibility error rate" has the same meaning as in section 5163.103 of the Revised Code. Quarterly, the department of medicaid shall report to the general assembly the presumptive eligibility error rate for presumptive eligibility determinations made during the previous quarter. Reports made under this section shall be submitted to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5163.11. To the extent permissible under federal law, the department of medicaid shall redetermine the eligibility of members of the expansion eligibility group for medicaid benefits every six months. Sec. 5163.30. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Assets" include all of an individual's income and resources and those of the individual's spouse, including any income or resources the individual or spouse is entitled to but does not receive because of action by any of the following: (a) The individual or spouse; (b) A person or government entity, including a court or administrative agency, with legal authority to act in place of or on behalf of the individual or spouse; (c) A person or government entity, including a court or administrative agency, acting at the direction or on the request of the individual or spouse. (2) "Home and community-based services" means home and community-based services furnished under a medicaid waiver granted by the United States secretary of health and human services under the "Social Security Act," section 1915(c) or (d), 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c) or (d). (3) "Institutionalized individual" means a resident of a nursing facility, an inpatient in a medical institution for whom a payment is made based on a level of care provided in a nursing facility, or an individual described in the "Social Security Act," section 1902(a)(10)(A)(ii)(VI), 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(VI). (4) "Look-back date" means the date that is a number of months specified in rules adopted under section 5163.02 of the Revised Code immediately before either of the following: (a) The date an individual becomes an institutionalized individual if the individual is eligible for medicaid on that date; (b) The date an individual applies for medicaid while an institutionalized individual. (5) "Nursing facility equivalent services" means services that are covered by the medicaid program, equivalent to nursing facility services, provided by an institution that provides the same level of care as a nursing facility, and provided to an inpatient of the institution who is a medicaid recipient eligible for medicaid-covered nursing facility equivalent services. (6) "Undue hardship" means being deprived of either of the following: (a) Medical care such that an individual's health or life is endangered; (b) Food, clothing, shelter, or other necessities of life. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section and rules adopted under section 5163.02 of the Revised Code, an institutionalized individual is ineligible for nursing facility services, nursing facility equivalent services, and home and community-based services if the individual or individual's spouse disposes of assets for less than fair market value on or after the look-back date. The institutionalized individual's ineligibility shall begin on a date determined in accordance with rules adopted under section 5163.02 of the Revised Code and shall continue for a number of months determined in accordance with such rules. (C)(1) An institutionalized individual may be granted a waiver of all or a portion of the period of ineligibility to which the individual would otherwise be subjected under division (B) of this section if the ineligibility would cause an undue hardship for the individual. (2) An institutionalized individual shall may be granted a waiver of all or a portion of the period of ineligibility if the administrator of the nursing facility in which the individual resides has notified the individual of a proposed transfer or discharge under section 3721.16 of the Revised Code due to failure to pay for the care the nursing facility has provided to the individual, the individual or the individual's sponsor requests a hearing on the proposed transfer or discharge in accordance with section 3721.161 of the Revised Code, and the transfer or discharge is upheld by a final determination that is not subject to further appeal. (3) An institutionalized individual may be granted a waiver of all of the period of ineligibility if all of the assets that were disposed of for less than fair market value are returned to the individual or individual's spouse or if the individual or individual's spouse receives cash or other personal or real property that equals the difference between what the individual or individual's spouse received for the assets and the fair market value of the assets. Except as provided in division (C)(1) or (2) of this section, no waiver of any part of the period of ineligibility shall be granted if the amount the individual or individual's spouse receives is less than the difference between what the individual or individual's spouse received for the assets and the fair market value of the assets. (4) Waivers shall be granted in accordance with rules adopted under section 5163.02 of the Revised Code. (D) To secure compliance with this section, the medicaid director may require an individual, as a condition of initial or continued eligibility for medicaid, to provide documentation of the individual's assets up to five years before the date the individual becomes an institutionalized individual if the individual is eligible for medicaid on that date or the date the individual applies for medicaid while an institutionalized individual. Documentation may include tax returns, records from financial institutions, and real property records. Sec. 5163.33. (A) In determining the amount of income that a medicaid recipient must apply monthly toward payment of the cost of care in a nursing facility or ICF/IID, a county department of job and family services shall deduct from the recipient's monthly income a monthly personal needs allowance in accordance with the "Social Security Act," section 1902(q), 42 U.S.C. 1396a(q). (B) In the case of a resident of a nursing facility, the monthly personal needs allowance shall be not less than fifty seventy-five dollars for an individual resident and not less than one hundred fifty dollars for a married couple if both spouses are residents of a nursing facility and their incomes are considered available to each other in determining eligibility. (C) In the case of a resident of an ICF/IID, the monthly personal needs allowance shall be as follows: (1) Prior to January 1, 2016, forty dollars unless the resident has earned income, in which case the monthly personal needs allowance shall be determined by the department of medicaid, or the department's designee, but shall not exceed one hundred five dollars; (2) For calendar year 2016 and each calendar year thereafter, not less than fifty seventy-five dollars for an individual resident and not less than one hundred fifty dollars for a married couple if both spouses are residents of an ICF/IID and their incomes are considered available to each other in determining eligibility. Sec. 5163.50. (A) The department of medicaid shall issue one or more requests for information relating to medicaid eligibility data and operations to identify and assess systems and solutions that may be available to improve or augment the management, efficiency, frequency, and accuracy of medicaid eligibility determinations and processing. The requests for information shall include systems and data relating to all of the following: (1) Medicaid enrollee or applicant identity verification; (2) Medicaid enrollee death verification; (3) Employment and wages; (4) Lottery winnings; (5) Residency verification including residency relating to concurrent enrollment in medicaid programs in other states; (6) Household composition; (7) Medicaid enrollee incarceration status; (8) Third-party liability verification; (9) Asset verification; (10) Any other records or systems the department considers appropriate in order to strengthen program integrity, reduce costs, and reduce fraud, waste, and abuse in the medicaid program. (B) As part of the considerations under division (A) of this section, the department shall consider augmenting existing vendor arrangements relating to processing and managing medicaid eligibility cases. (C) The department may procure one or more vendors to implement any solutions identified as cost effective and feasible. Any vendor compensation under this section shall be performance-based. (D) The department shall prepare and submit a report to the chairpersons of the standing committees in the house of representatives and senate with jurisdiction over medicaid detailing its findings from the requests for information and considerations conducted under this section. Sec. 5164.093. (A) As used in this section, "rapid whole genome sequencing" means an investigation of the entire human genome, including coding and non-coding regions and mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid, to identify disease-causing genetic changes, and includes patient-only whole genome sequencing and duo and trio whole genome sequencing of the patient and biological parent or parents. (B) Beginning one year after the effective date of this section, and subject to approval from the centers for medicare and medicaid services, the medicaid program shall reimburse medicaid providers for rapid whole genome sequencing for patients who are Medicaid recipients and meet all of the following criteria: (1) The patient is under one year of age. (2) The patient has a complex or acute illness of unknown etiology that is not confirmed to be caused by an environmental exposure, toxic ingestion, infection with normal response to therapy, or trauma. (3) The patient is receiving hospital services in an intensive care unit or other high acuity care unit within a hospital. (C) A laboratory performing the rapid whole genome sequencing provided pursuant to this section shall return the preliminary positive results within seven days and final results within fifteen days from the date of receipt of the sample. (D) Payment provided pursuant to this section may be subject to any of the following evidence-based medical necessity criteria: (1) The patient has symptoms that suggest a broad differential diagnosis that would require an evaluation by multiple genetic tests if rapid whole genome sequencing is not performed. (2) The patient's treating health care provider has determined that timely identification of a molecular diagnosis is necessary to guide clinical decision-making and testing results may guide the treatment or management of the patient's condition. (3) The patient has a family genetic history related to the patient's condition. (4) The patient has a complex or acute illness of unknown etiology including at least one of the following conditions: (a) Congenital anomalies involving at least two organ systems or complex or multiple congenital anomalies in one organ system; (b) Specific organ malformations highly suggestive of a genetic etiology; (c) Abnormal laboratory tests or abnormal chemistry profiles suggesting the presence of a genetic disease, complex metabolic disorder, or inborn error of metabolism; (d) Refractory or severe hypoglycemia or hyperglycemia; (e) Abnormal response to therapy related to an underlying medical condition affecting vital organs or bodily systems; (f) Severe muscle weakness, rigidity, or spasticity; (g) A high-risk stratification for a brief, resolved, unexplained, and recurrent event that is any of the following: (i) An event without respiratory infection; (ii) A witnessed seizure-like event; (iii) A cardiopulmonary resuscitation event. (h) Refractory seizures; (i) Abnormal cardiac diagnostic testing results suggestive of possible channelopathies, arrhythmias, cardiomyopathies, myocarditis,or structural heart disease; (j) Abnormal diagnostic imaging studies suggestive of an underlying genetic condition; (k) Abnormal physiologic function studies suggestive of an underlying genetic etiology. (E) The director may add conditions to those specified in division (D)(4) of this section based on new medical evidence and may provide coverage for rapid whole genome sequencing or other next-generation sequencing and genetic testing in addition to the reimbursement required under this section. (F)(1) Except as provided in division(F)(2) of this section, genetic data generated as a result of performing rapid whole genome sequencing pursuant to this section shall have a primary use of assisting the ordering health care professional and treating care team to diagnose and treat the patient, and as protected health information it shall be subject to the requirements applicable to protected health information set forth in the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996," 42 U.S.C. 1320d et seq., the "Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act of 2009," 42 U.S.C. 17921 et seq., and any other applicable law regarding protected health information. (2) Genetic data generated from rapid whole genome sequencing reimbursed under this section can be used in scientific research if consent for such use of the data has been expressly given by the patient's legal guardian. The patient, the patient's legal guardian, or the patient's health care provider with the patient or the patient's guardian's consent, may request access to the results of the testing for use in other clinical settings. A health care provider may only charge a fee to the patient based on the direct costs of producing the results in a format usable in other clinical settings. A patient or a patient's legal guardian shall have the right to rescind the original consent to the use of the data in scientific research at any time, and upon receipt of a written revocation of the consent the health care provider or other entity using the data shall cease use and expunge the data from any data repository where it is held. (G) The director shall take any actions necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including: (1) Adopting rules authorized by section 5166.02 of the Revised Code; (2) Any other administrative action determined to be necessary to implement the requirements of this section. Sec. 5165.19. (A)(1) Semiannually, except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, the department of medicaid shall determine each nursing facility's per medicaid day payment rate for direct care costs by multiplying the facility's semiannual case-mix score determined under section 5165.192 of the Revised Code by the cost per case-mix unit determined under division (C) of this section for the facility's peer group. (2) Beginning January 1, 2024, during state fiscal years 2024 and 2025, the department shall determine each nursing facility's per medicaid day payment rate for direct care costs by multiplying the cost per case-mix unit determined under division (C) of this section for the facility's peer group by the case-mix score specified in division (A)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, as selected by the nursing facility not later than October 1, 2023. If the nursing facility does not make a selection by October 1, 2023, the case-mix score specified in division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall apply. The case-mix score may be either of the following: (a) The semiannual case-mix score determined for the facility under division (A)(1) of this section; (b) The facility's quarterly case-mix score from March 31, 2023, which shall apply to the facility's direct care rate from January 1, 2024, to June 30, 2025. (B) For the purpose of determining nursing facilities' rates for direct care costs, the department shall establish three peer groups. (1) Each nursing facility located in any of the following counties shall be placed in peer group one: Brown, Butler, Clermont, Clinton, Hamilton, and Warren. (2) Each nursing facility located in any of the following counties shall be placed in peer group two: Allen, Ashtabula, Champaign, Clark, Cuyahoga, Darke, Delaware, Fairfield, Fayette, Franklin, Fulton, Geauga, Greene, Hancock, Knox, Lake, Licking, Lorain, Lucas, Madison, Mahoning, Marion, Medina, Miami, Montgomery, Morrow, Ottawa, Pickaway, Portage, Preble, Ross, Sandusky, Seneca, Stark, Summit, Trumbull, Union, and Wood. (3) Each nursing facility located in any of the following counties shall be placed in peer group three: Adams, Ashland, Athens, Auglaize, Belmont, Carroll, Columbiana, Coshocton, Crawford, Defiance, Erie, Gallia, Guernsey, Hardin, Harrison, Henry, Highland, Hocking, Holmes, Huron, Jackson, Jefferson, Lawrence, Logan, Meigs, Mercer, Monroe, Morgan, Muskingum, Noble, Paulding, Perry, Pike, Putnam, Richland, Scioto, Shelby, Tuscarawas, Van Wert, Vinton, Washington, Wayne, Williams, and Wyandot. (C)(1) The Except as provided in division (C)(4) of this section, the department shall determine a cost per case-mix unit for each peer group established under division (B) of this section. The cost per case-mix unit determined under this division for a peer group shall be used for subsequent years until the department conducts a rebasing. To determine a peer group's cost per case-mix unit, the department shall do both of the following: (a) Determine the cost per case-mix unit for each nursing facility in the peer group for the applicable calendar year by dividing each facility's desk-reviewed, actual, allowable, per diem direct care costs for the applicable calendar year by the facility's annual average case-mix score determined under section 5165.192 of the Revised Code for the applicable calendar year; (b) Subject to division (C)(2) of this section, identify which nursing facility in the peer group is at the seventieth percentile of the cost per case-mix units determined under division (C)(1)(a) of this section. (2) In making the identification under division (C)(1)(b) of this section, the department shall exclude both of the following: (a) Nursing facilities that participated in the medicaid program under the same provider for less than twelve months in the applicable calendar year; (b) Nursing facilities whose cost per case-mix unit is more than one standard deviation from the mean cost per case-mix unit for all nursing facilities in the nursing facility's peer group for the applicable calendar year. (3) The department shall not redetermine a peer group's cost per case-mix unit under this division based on additional information that it receives after the peer group's per case-mix unit is determined. The department shall redetermine a peer group's cost per case-mix unit only if it made an error in determining the peer group's cost per case-mix unit based on information available to the department at the time of the original determination. (4) The department shall multiply each cost per case-mix unit determined under division (C)(1) of this section by the peer group average case-mix score in effect on December 31, 2025, divided by the peer group average case-mix score determined under section 5165.192 of the Revised Code for the semiannual period beginning January 1, 2026. The product determined under this division for each nursing facility's peer group shall be the cost per case-mix unit used to determine the nursing facility's per medicaid day payment rate for direct care costs under division (A)(1) of this section for the period beginning January 1, 2026, and ending on the day before the department's next rebasing conducted after that date takes effect. Sec. 5165.192. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (B) of this section and in accordance with the process specified in rules authorized by this section, the department of medicaid shall do all of the following: (a) Every quarter, determine the following two case-mix scores for each nursing facility: (i) A quarterly case-mix score that includes each resident who is a medicaid recipient and is not a low case-mix resident; (ii) A quarterly case-mix score that includes each resident regardless of payment source. (b) Every six months, determine a semiannual average case-mix score for each nursing facility by using the quarterly case-mix scores determined for the nursing facility pursuant to division (A)(1)(a)(i) of this section; (c) After the end of each calendar year, determine an annual average case-mix score for each nursing facility by using the quarterly case-mix scores determined for the nursing facility pursuant to division (A)(1)(a)(ii) of this section. (2) When determining case-mix scores under division (A)(1) of this section, the department shall use all of the following: (a) Data from a resident assessment instrument specified in rules authorized by section 5165.191 of the Revised Code; (b) Except as provided in rules authorized by this section, the case-mix values established by the United States department of health and human services; (c) Except as modified in rules authorized by this section, the grouper methodology used on June 30, 1999October 1, 2019, for the patient driven payment model nursing index, by the United States department of health and human services for prospective payment of skilled nursing facilities under the medicare program. (B)(1) Subject to division (B)(2) of this section, the department, for one or more months of a calendar quarter, may assign to a nursing facility a case-mix score that is five per cent less than the nursing facility's case-mix score for the immediately preceding calendar quarter if any of the following apply: (a) The provider does not timely submit complete and accurate resident assessment data necessary to determine the nursing facility's case-mix score for the calendar quarter; (b) The nursing facility was subject to an exception review under section 5165.193 of the Revised Code for the immediately preceding calendar quarter; (c) The nursing facility was assigned a case-mix score for the immediately preceding calendar quarter. (2) Before assigning a case-mix score to a nursing facility due to the submission of incorrect resident assessment data, the department shall permit the provider to correct the data. The department may assign the case-mix score if the provider fails to submit the corrected resident assessment data not later than the earlier of the forty-fifth day after the end of the calendar quarter to which the data pertains or the deadline for submission of such corrections established by regulations adopted by the United States department of health and human services under Title XVIII and Title XIX. (3) If, for more than six months in a calendar year, a provider is paid a rate determined for a nursing facility using a case-mix score assigned to the nursing facility under division (B)(1) of this section, the department may assign the nursing facility a cost per case-mix unit that is five per cent less than the nursing facility's actual or assigned cost per case-mix unit for the immediately preceding calendar year. The department may use the assigned cost per case-mix unit, instead of determining the nursing facility's actual cost per case-mix unit in accordance with section 5165.19 of the Revised Code, to establish the nursing facility's rate for direct care costs for the fiscal year immediately following the calendar year for which the cost per case-mix unit is assigned. (4) The department shall take action under division (B)(1), (2), or (3) of this section only in accordance with rules authorized by this section. The department shall not take an action that affects rates for prior payment periods except in accordance with sections 5165.41 and 5165.42 of the Revised Code. (C) The medicaid director shall adopt rules under section 5165.02 of the Revised Code as necessary to implement this section. (1) The rules shall do all of the following: (a) Specify the process for determining the semiannual and annual average case-mix scores for nursing facilities; (b) Adjust the case-mix values specified in division (A)(2)(b) of this section to reflect changes in relative wage differentials that are specific to this state; (c) Express all of those case-mix values in numeric terms that are different from the terms specified by the United States department of health and human services but that do not alter the relationship of the case-mix values to one another; (d) Modify the grouper methodology specified in division (A)(2)(c) of this section as follows: (i) Establish a different hierarchy for assigning residents to case-mix categories under the methodology; (ii) Allow the use of the index maximizer element of the methodology; (iii) Incorporate changes to the grouper methodology for the patient driven payment model nursing index used by the United States department of health and human services makes after June 30, 1999on October 1, 2019, for prospective payment of skilled nursing facilities under the medicare program; (iv)(ii) Make other changes the department determines are necessary. (e)(c) Establish procedures under which resident assessment data shall be reviewed for accuracy and providers shall be notified of any data that requires correction; (f)(d) Establish procedures for providers to correct resident assessment data and specify a reasonable period of time by which providers shall submit the corrections. The procedures may limit the content of corrections in the manner required by regulations adopted by the United States department of health and human services under Title XVIII and Title XIX. (g)(e) Specify when and how the department will assign case-mix scores or costs per case-mix unit to a nursing facility under division (B) of this section if information necessary to calculate the nursing facility's case-mix score is not provided or corrected in accordance with the procedures established by the rules. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the rules may provide for the exclusion of case-mix scores assigned to a nursing facility under division (B) of this section from the determination of the nursing facility's semiannual or annual average case-mix score and the cost per case-mix unit for the nursing facility's peer group. Sec. 5165.26. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Base rate" means the portion of a nursing facility's total per medicaid day payment rate determined under divisions (A) and (B) of section 5165.15 of the Revised Code. (2) "CMS" means the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services. (3) "Long-stay resident" means an individual who has resided in a nursing facility for at least one hundred one days. (4) "Nursing facilities for which a quality score was determined" includes nursing facilities that are determined to have a quality score of zero. (5) "SFF list" means the list of nursing facilities that the United States department of health and human services creates under the special focus facility program. (6) "Special focus facility program" means the program conducted by the United States secretary of health and human services pursuant to section 1919(f)(10) of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1396r(f)(10). (B) Subject to divisions (D) and (E) and except as provided in division (F) of this section, the department of medicaid shall determine each nursing facility's per medicaid day quality incentive payment rate as follows: (1) Determine the sum of the quality scores determined under division (C) of this section for all nursing facilities. (2) Determine the average quality score by dividing the sum determined under division (B)(1) of this section by the number of nursing facilities for which a quality score was determined. (3) Determine the sum of the total number of medicaid days for all of the calendar year preceding the fiscal year for which the rate is determined for all nursing facilities for which a quality score was determined. (4) Multiply the average quality score determined under division (B)(2) of this section by the sum determined under division (B)(3) of this section. (5) Determine the value per quality point by determining the quotient of the following: (a) The sum determined under division (E)(2) of this section. (b) The product determined under division (B)(4) of this section. (6) Multiply the value per quality point determined under division (B)(5) of this section by the nursing facility's quality score determined under division (C) of this section. (C)(1) Except as provided in divisions (C)(2) and (3) of this section, a nursing facility's quality score for a state fiscal year shall be the sum of the following: (a) The total number of points that CMS assigned to the nursing facility under CMS's nursing facility five-star quality rating system for the following quality metrics, or CMS's successor metrics as described below, based on the most recent four-quarter average data, or the average data for fewer quarters in the case of successor metrics, available in the database maintained by CMS and known as nursing home compare in the most recent month of the calendar year during which the fiscal year for which the rate is determined begins: (i) The percentage of the nursing facility's long-stay residents at high risk for pressure ulcers who had pressure ulcers; (ii) The percentage of the nursing facility's long-stay residents who had a urinary tract infection; (iii) The percentage of the nursing facility's long-stay residents whose ability to move independently worsened; (iv) The percentage of the nursing facility's long-stay residents who had a catheter inserted and left in their bladder. If CMS ceases to publish any of the metrics specified in division (C)(1)(a) of this section, the department shall use the nursing facility quality metrics on the same topics that CMS subsequently publishes. (b) Seven and five-tenths points for fiscal year 2024 and three points for fiscal year 2025 and subsequent fiscal years if the nursing facility's occupancy rate is greater than seventy-five per cent. For purposes of this division, the department shall utilize the facility's occupancy rate for licensed beds reported on its cost report for the calendar year preceding the fiscal year for which the rate is determined or, if the facility is not required to be licensed, the facility's occupancy rate for certified beds. If the facility surrenders licensed or certified beds before the first day of July of the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins, the department shall calculate a nursing facility's occupancy rate by dividing the inpatient days reported on the facility's cost report for the calendar year preceding the fiscal year for which the rate is determined by the product of the number of days in the calendar year and the facility's number of licensed, or if applicable, certified beds on the first day of July of the calendar year in which the fiscal year begins. (c) Beginning with state fiscal year 2025, the total number of points that CMS assigned to the nursing facility under CMS's nursing facility five-star quality rating system for the following quality metrics, or successor metrics designated by CMS, based on the most recent four-quarter average data available in the database maintained by CMS and known as nursing home compare in the most recent month of the calendar year during which the fiscal year for which the rate is determined begins: (i) The percentage of the nursing facility's long-stay residents whose need for help with daily activities has increased; (ii) The percentage of the nursing facility's long-stay residents experiencing one or more falls with major injury; (iii) The percentage of the nursing facility's long-stay residents who were administered an antipsychotic medication; (iv) Adjusted total nurse staffing hours per resident per day using quintiles instead of deciles by using the points assigned to the higher of the two deciles that constitute the quintile. If CMS ceases to publish any of the metrics specified in division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the department shall use the nursing facility quality metrics on the same topics CMS subsequently publishes. (2) In determining a nursing facility's quality score for a state fiscal year, the department shall make the following adjustment to the number of points that CMS assigned to the nursing facility for each of the quality metrics specified in divisions (C)(1)(a) and (c) of this section: (a) Unless division (C)(2)(b) or (c) of this section applies, divide the number of the nursing facility's points for the quality metric by twenty. (b) If CMS assigned the nursing facility to the lowest percentile for the quality metric, reduce the number of the nursing facility's points for the quality metric to zero. (c) If the nursing facility's total number of points calculated for or during a state fiscal year for all of the quality metrics specified in divisions (C)(1)(a), and if applicable, division (C)(1)(c) of this section is less than a number of points that is equal to the twenty-fifth percentile of all nursing facilities, calculated using the points for the July 1 rate setting of that fiscal year reduce the nursing facility's points to zero until the next point calculation. If a facility's recalculated points under division (C)(3) of this section are below the number of points determined to be the twenty-fifth percentile for that fiscal year, the facility shall receive zero points for the remainder of that fiscal year. (3) A nursing facility's quality score shall be recalculated for the second half of the state fiscal year based on the most recent four quarter average data, or the average data for fewer quarters in the case of successor metrics, available in the database maintained by CMS and known as the care compare, in the most recent month of the calendar year during which the fiscal year for which the rate is determined begins. The metrics specified by division (C)(1)(b) of this section shall not be recalculated. In redetermining the quality payment for each facility based on the recalculated points, the department shall use the same per point value determined for the quality payment at the start of the fiscal year. (D) A nursing facility shall not receive a quality incentive payment if the Department of Health assigned the nursing facility to the SFF list under the special focus facility program and the nursing facility is listed in table A, on the first day of May of the calendar year for which the rate is being determined. (E) The total amount to be spent on quality incentive payments under division (B) of this section for a fiscal year shall be determined as follows: (1) Determine the following amount for each nursing facility: (a) The amount that is five and two-tenths per cent of the nursing facility's base rate for nursing facility services provided on the first day of the state fiscal year plus one dollar and seventy-nine cents plus sixty per cent of the per diem amount by which the nursing facility's rate for direct care costs determined for the fiscal year under section 5165.19 of the Revised Code changed as a result of the rebasing conducted under section 5165.36 of the Revised Code. (b) Multiply the amount determined under division (E)(1)(a) of this section by the number of the nursing facility's medicaid days for the calendar year preceding the fiscal year for which the rate is determined. (2) Determine the sum of the products determined under division (E)(1)(b) of this section for all nursing facilities for which the product was determined for the state fiscal year. (3) To the sum determined under division (E)(2) of this section, add one hundred twenty-five million dollars. (F)(1) Beginning July 1, 2023, a new nursing facility shall receive a quality incentive payment for the fiscal year in which the new facility obtains an initial provider agreement and the immediately following fiscal year equal to the median quality incentive payment determined for nursing facilities for the fiscal year. For the state fiscal year after the immediately following fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, the quality incentive payment shall be determined under division (C) of this section. (2) A nursing facility that undergoes a change of operator with an effective date of July 1, 20232025, or later shall not receive a quality incentive payment until the earlier of the first day of January or the first day of July that is at least six months after the effective date of the change of operator. Thereafter any quality incentive payment shall be determined under division (C) of this section. (3) A nursing facility that undergoes a change of owner with an effective date of July 1, 2023, or later shall not receive a quality incentive payment until the earlier of the first day of January or the first day of July that is at least six months after the effective date of the change of owner if, within one year after the change of owner, there is an increase in the lease payments or other financial obligations of the operator to the owner above the payments or obligations specified by the agreement between the previous owner and the operator. Thereafter, any quality incentive payments for the facility shall be determined under division (C) of this section. Sec. 5166.03. The medicaid director may not submit a request to the United States secretary of health and human services for a medicaid waiver under the "Social Security Act," section 1115, 42 U.S.C. 1315, unless the director provides the speaker of the house of representatives and president of the senate written notice of the director's intent to submit the request at least ten days before the date the director submits the request to the United States secretary. The notice shall include a detailed explanation of the medicaid waiver the director proposes to seek and confirmation that the department of medicaid has complied with the requirements of section 5162.08 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5166.50. (A) Within one year of the effective date of this section, the department of medicaid shall apply for a medicaid waiver component to provide reentry services to medicaid-eligible imprisoned individuals for ninety days before an imprisoned individual's expected release date. The benefits provided shall include: (1) Mental health services; (2) Behavioral health services; (3) Substance use disorder treatment and related services; (4) A thirty-day supply of prescription medication at the time of release, including medication administered by injection. (B) The department shall implement the medicaid waiver component within one year after approval from the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services. (C)(1) If the department is unable to apply for the medicaid waiver component within the time frame specified in division (A) of this section, the department shall request an extension of up to thirty days from the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. (2) If the department is unable to implement the medicaid waiver component within the time frame specified in division (B) of this section, the department shall request an extension for the amount of time needed to implement the waiver component from the speaker of the house of representatives and the president of the senate. (D) If the medicaid waiver component is not approved by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services, the department shall reapply for the waiver within four years after the effective date of this section. Sec. 5167.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "340B covered entitygrantee" means an entity described in section 340B(a)(4)(A)-(K) of the "Public Health Service Act," 42 U.S.C. 256b(a)(4)(A)-(K) that is designated as an active (A)-(K) entity under the health resources and services administration covered entity daily report, and includes any pharmacy under contract with the entity to dispense drugs on behalf of the entity. (B) "Affiliated company" means an entity, including a third-party payer or specialty pharmacy, with common ownership, members of a board of directors, or managers, or that is a parent company, subsidiary company, jointly held company, or holding company with respect to the other entity. (C) "Care management system" means the system established under section 5167.03 of the Revised Code. (D) "Controlled substance" has the same meaning as in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code. (E) "Dual eligible individual" has the same meaning as in section 5160.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Emergency services" has the same meaning as in the "Social Security Act," section 1932(b)(2), 42 U.S.C. 1396u-2(b)(2). (G) "Enrollee" means a medicaid recipient who participates in the care management system and enrolls in a medicaid MCO plan. (H) "ICDS participant" has and "integrated care delivery system" have the same meaning meanings as in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code. (I) "ICDS successor program" means a fully integrated dual eligible special needs plan established in accordance with 42 C.F.R. 422.107, that the department of medicaid utilizes as a replacement for the integrated care delivery system. (J) "Medicaid managed care organization" means a managed care organization under contract with the department of medicaid pursuant to section 5167.10 of the Revised Code. (J)(K) "Medicaid MCO plan" means a plan that a medicaid managed care organization, pursuant to its contract with the department of medicaid under section 5167.10 of the Revised Code, makes available to medicaid recipients participating in the care management system. (K)(L) "Medicaid waiver component" has the same meaning as in section 5166.01 of the Revised Code. (L)(M) "Network provider" has the same meaning as in 42 C.F.R. 438.2. (M)(N) "Nursing facility services" has the same meaning as in section 5165.01 of the Revised Code. (N)(O) "Part B drug" means a drug or biological described in section 1842(o)(1)(C) of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1395u(o)(1)(C). (O)(P) "Pharmacy benefit manager" has the same meaning as in section 3959.01 of the Revised Code. (P)(Q) "Practice of pharmacy" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (Q)(R) "Prescribed drug" has the same meaning as in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code. (R)(S) "Prior authorization requirement" has the same meaning as in section 5160.34 of the Revised Code. (S)(T) "Provider" means any person or government entity that furnishes services to a medicaid recipient enrolled in a medicaid MCO plan, regardless of whether the person or entity has a provider agreement. (T)(U) "Provider agreement" has the same meaning as in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code. (U)(V) "State pharmacy benefit manager" means the pharmacy benefit manager selected by and under contract with the medicaid director under section 5167.24 of the Revised Code. (V)(W) "Third-party administrator" means any person who adjusts or settles claims on behalf of an insuring entity in connection with life, dental, health, prescription drugs, or disability insurance or self-insurance programs and includes a pharmacy benefit manager. Sec. 5167.03. (A) As part of the medicaid program, the department of medicaid shall establish a care management system. The department shall implement the system in some or all counties. (B) The department shall designate the medicaid recipients who are required or permitted to participate in the care management system. Those who shall be required to participate in the system include medicaid recipients who receive cognitive behavioral therapy as described in division (A)(2) of section 5167.16 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in section 5166.406 of the Revised Code, no medicaid recipient participating in the healthy Ohio program established under section 5166.40 of the Revised Code shall participate in the system. The (C) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the general assembly's authorization through the enactment of legislation is needed before home and community-based services available under a medicaid waiver component or nursing facility services are included in the care management system, except that . ICDS participants, or participants in the ICDS successor program, may be required or permitted to obtain such services under the system. Medicaid recipients who receive such services may be designated for voluntary or mandatory participation in the system in order to receive other health care services included in the system. The (D) Subject to division (E) of this section, the department may require or permit participants in the care management system to do either or both of the following: (A) (1) Obtain health care services from providers designated by the department; (B) (2) Enroll in a medicaid MCO plan. (E)(1) The department shall allow individuals participating in the care management system to enroll in the medicaid MCO plan of the individual's choosing. If an individual does not elect a medicaid MCO plan in which to enroll during the time period specified by the department, the department shall randomly assign the individual to a medicaid MCO plan. When assigning individuals to a medicaid MCO plan under this division, the department shall not give preference to any specific medicaid MCO plan or group of plans. (2) If the department is unable to satisfy the requirements established under division (E)(1) of this section, it shall notify the general assembly, the legislative service commission, and the auditor of state not later than thirty days after making such a determination. As part of the notice required under this division, the department shall provide an explanation as to why it is unable to satisfy the requirements. Sec. 5167.09. The department of medicaid shall include all of the following on the department's managed care financial dashboard: (A) Actuarial metrics for annual and quarterly cost reports, delineated by the following categories: (1) Adults for whom financial eligibility for the medicaid program is determined by utilizing the modified adjusted gross income standard and who are not members of the expansion eligibility group; (2) Children for whom financial eligibility for the medicaid program is determined by utilizing the modified adjusted gross income standard; (3) Individuals in the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group who are twenty-one years of age or older; (4) Individuals in the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group who are twenty years of age or younger; (5) Individuals who are members of the expansion eligibility group; (6) Individuals who are members of the adoption and foster kids eligibility group; (7) All other individuals eligible for medicaid benefits who are not included in another category described in division (A) of this section. (B) Quarterly and annual composite per member per month category of service reports for each managed care organization providing services under the care management system, delineated into the following categories: (1) Inpatient services; (2) Outpatient facility services; (3) Professional services; (4) Radiology, pathology, and laboratory services; (5) Pharmacy services; (6) Behavioral health services; (7) All other services. (C) As used in this section, "expansion eligibility group" has the same meaning as in section 5163.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5167.123. (A) No contract between a medicaid managed care organization, including a third-party administrator, and a 340B covered entity grantee shall contain any of the following provisions: (1) A payment rate for a prescribed drug provided by a 340B grantee to an individual as a result of health care services provided by the grantee directly to the individual, that is less than the national average drug acquisition cost rate for that drug as determined by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services, measured at the time the drug is administered or dispensed, or, if no such rate is available at that time, a reimbursement rate that is less than the wholesale acquisition cost of the drug, as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B)payment rate applied to health care providers that are not 340B grantees; (2) A fee that is not imposed on a health care provider that is not a 340B covered entitygrantee; (3) A fee amount that exceeds the amount for a health care provider that is not a 340B covered entitygrantee. (B) The organization, or its contracted third-party administrators, shall not discriminate against a 340B covered entity grantee in a manner that prevents or interferes with a medicaid recipient's choice to receive a prescription drug from a 340B covered entity or its contracted pharmaciesgrantee. (C) Any provision of a contract entered into between the organization and a 340B covered entity grantee that is contrary to division (A) of this section is unenforceable and shall be replaced with the dispensing fee or payment rate that applies for health care providers that are not 340B covered entitiesgrantees. (D) A medicaid managed care organization or a third-party administrator shall provide a payment rate for all prescribed drugs obtained through the federal 340B drug pricing program by providers that are not 340B grantees that is equal to the payment rate for those prescribed drugs that is specified in the medicaid state plan. (E) Any payment made pursuant to a payment rate described in this section is subject to audit by the department of medicaid under section 5160.20 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5167.24. (A) If the department of medicaid includes prescribed drugs in the care management system as authorized under section 5167.05 of the Revised Code, the medicaid director, through a procurement process, shall select a third-party administrator to serve as the single pharmacy benefit manager used by medicaid managed care organizations under the care management system. The state pharmacy benefit manager shall be responsible for processing all pharmacy claims under the care management system. The department of medicaid is responsible for enforcing the contract after the procurement process. (B) As part of the procurement process, the director shall do all of the following: (1) Accept applications from entities seeking to become the state pharmacy benefit manager; (2) Establish eligibility criteria an entity must meet in order to become the state pharmacy benefit manager; (3) Select and contract with a single state pharmacy benefit manager; (4) Develop a master contract to be used by the director when contracting with the state pharmacy benefit manager, which shall prohibit the state pharmacy benefit manager from requiring a medicaid recipient to obtain a specialty drug from a specialty pharmacy owned or otherwise associated with the state pharmacy benefit manager. (C) A prospective state pharmacy benefit manager shall disclose to the director all of the following during the procurement process: (1) Any activity, policy, practice, contract, or arrangement of the state pharmacy benefit manager that may directly or indirectly present any conflict of interest with the pharmacy benefit manager's relationship with or obligation to the department or a medicaid managed care organization; (2) All common ownership, members of a board of directors, managers, or other control of the pharmacy benefit manager (or any of the pharmacy benefit manager's affiliated companies) with any of the following: (a) A medicaid managed care organization and its affiliated companies; (b) An entity that contracts on behalf of a pharmacy or any pharmacy services administration organization and its affiliated companies; (c) A drug wholesaler or distributor and its affiliated companies; (d) A third-party payer and its affiliated companies; (e) A pharmacy and its affiliated companies. (3) Any direct or indirect fees, charges, or any kind of assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefit manager on pharmacies licensed in this state with which the pharmacy benefit manager shares common ownership, management, or control; or that are owned, managed, or controlled by any of the pharmacy benefit manager's affiliated companies; (4) Any direct or indirect fees, charges, or any kind of assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefit manager on pharmacies licensed in this state; (6)(5) Any financial terms and arrangements between the pharmacy benefit manager and a prescription drug manufacturer or labeler, including formulary management, drug substitution programs, educational support claims processing, or data sales fees. (D) The director shall select a provisional state pharmacy benefit manager not later than July 1, 2020. (1) Once a provisional state pharmacy benefit manager has been selected, full implementation of the entity as the state pharmacy benefit manager shall be subject to that entity's demonstrated ability to fulfill the duties and obligations of the state pharmacy benefit manager as illustrated through a readiness review process established by the director. Any entity failing to complete the readiness review process shall be deemed as having not met the criteria of the review process. The selected entity shall not enter into contracts with the department or medicaid managed care organizations as the state pharmacy benefit manager before the date on which the entity has satisfactorily completed the readiness review process. (2) If the director determines that, for reasons beyond the director's control, selection of a provisional state pharmacy benefit manager cannot occur before July 1, 2020, the director shall notify the joint medicaid oversight committee of the reasons for the delay and identify the steps the director is taking to complete the selection as expeditiously as possible. Sec. 5168.08. (A) Before or during each program year, the department of medicaid shall issue to each hospital the preliminary determination of the amount that the hospital is assessed under section 5168.06 of the Revised Code during the program year. The preliminary determination of a hospital's assessment shall be calculated for a cost-reporting period that is specified in rules adopted under section 5168.02 of the Revised Code. The department shall consult with hospitals each year when determining the date on which it will issue the preliminary determinations in order to minimize hospitals' cash flow difficulties. If no hospital submits a request for reconsideration under division (B) of this section, the preliminary determination constitutes the final reconciliation of each hospital's assessment under section 5168.06 of the Revised Code. The final reconciliation is constitutes an interim final order and may be subject to adjustments under made by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services pursuant to division (D) of this section. (B) Not later than fourteen days after the preliminary determinations are issued, any hospital may submit to the department a written request to reconsider the preliminary determinations. The request shall be accompanied by written materials setting forth the basis for the reconsideration, which may be delivered to the department by regular mail, electronic mail, or in-person delivery. If one or more hospitals submit a request, the department shall hold a public hearing not later than thirty days after the preliminary determinations are issued to reconsider the preliminary determinations. The department shall issue to each hospital a written notice of the date, time, and place of the hearing at least ten days prior to the hearing. On the basis of the evidence submitted to the department or presented at the public hearing, the department shall reconsider and may adjust the preliminary determinations. The result of the reconsideration is the final reconciliation of the hospital's assessment under section 5168.06 of the Revised Code. The final reconciliation is constitutes an interim final order and may be subject to adjustments under by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services pursuant to division (D) of this section. (C) The department shall issue to each hospital a written notice of its assessment for the program year under the final reconciliation. A hospital may appeal the final reconciliation of its assessment to the court of common pleas of Franklin county, pursuant to Chapter 2505. of the Revised Code. The complete record of the proceedings shall include all documentation considered by the department in issuing the final reconciliation. While a judicial appeal is pending, the hospital shall pay, in accordance with the schedules required by division (B) of section 5168.06 of the Revised Code, any amount of its assessment that is not in dispute into the hospital care assurance program fund created in section 5168.11 of the Revised Code. (D) In the course of any program year, the department may adjust the assessment rate or rates established in rules pursuant to section 5168.06 of the Revised Code or adjust the amounts of intergovernmental transfers required under section 5168.07 of the Revised Code and, as a result of the adjustment, adjust each hospital's assessment and intergovernmental transfer, to reflect refinements made by the United States centers for medicare and medicaid services during that program year to the limits it prescribed under the "Social Security Act," section 1923(f), 42 U.S.C. 1396r-4(f). When adjusted, the assessment rate or rates must comply with division (A) of section 5168.06 of the Revised Code. An adjusted intergovernmental transfer must comply with division (A) of section 5168.07 of the Revised Code. The department shall notify hospitals of adjustments made under this division and adjust for the remainder of the program year the installments paid by hospitals under sections 5168.06 and 5168.07 of the Revised Code in accordance with rules adopted under section 5168.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5168.11. (A) Except as provided in section 5162.52 of the Revised Code, all payments of assessments by hospitals under section 5168.06 of the Revised Code and all intergovernmental transfers under section 5168.07 of the Revised Code shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the hospital care assurance program fund, hereby created. All investment earnings of the hospital care assurance program fund shall be credited to the fund. The department of medicaid shall maintain records that show the amount of money in the hospital care assurance program fund at any time that has been paid by each hospital and the amount of any investment earnings on that amount. All moneys credited to the hospital care assurance program fund shall be used solely to make payments to hospitals under division (D) of this section and section 5168.09 of the Revised Code. (B) All federal matching funds received as a result of the department distributing funds from the hospital care assurance program fund to hospitals under section 5168.09 of the Revised Code shall be credited to the health care - federal fund created under section 5162.50 of the Revised Code. (C) All distributions of funds to hospitals under section 5168.09 of the Revised Code are conditional on: (1) Expiration of the time for appeals under section 5168.08 of the Revised Code without the filing of an appeal, or on court determinations, in the event of appeals, that the hospital is entitled to the funds; (2) The sum of the following being sufficient to distribute the funds after the final determination of any appeals: (a) The available money in the hospital care assurance program fund; (b) The available portion of the money in the health care - federal fund that is credited to that fund pursuant to division (B) of this section. (3) The hospital's compliance with section 5168.14 of the Revised Code. (D) If an audit conducted by the department, pursuant to 42 C.F.R. 455.304, of the amounts of payments made and funds received by hospitals under sections 5168.06, 5168.07, and 5168.09 of the Revised Code identifies amounts that, due to errors by the department, a hospital should not have been required to pay but did pay, should have been required to pay but did not pay, should not have received but did receive, or should have received but did not receive, the department shall: (1) Make payments to any hospital that the audit reveals paid amounts it should not have been required to pay or did not receive amounts it should have received; (2) Take action to recover from a hospital any amounts that the audit reveals it should have been required to pay but did not pay or that it should not have received but did receive. Payments made under division (D)(1) of this section shall be made from the hospital care assurance program fund. Amounts recovered under division (D)(2) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of that fund. Any hospital may appeal the amount An action authorized under Chapter 2721. of the Revised Code and filed in Franklin county shall be the exclusive remedy for any hospital that disagrees with the amount that the hospital is to be paid under division (D)(1) or the amount that is to be recovered from the hospital under division (D)(2) of this section to the court of common pleas of Franklin county. While any judicial proceeding is pending under division (D) of this section, a hospital shall pay to the hospital care assurance program fund any amount identified pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section that is not in dispute. Sec. 5168.22. (A) Before or during each assessment program year, the department of medicaid shall issue to each hospital the preliminary determination of the amount that the hospital is assessed under section 5168.21 of the Revised Code for the assessment program year. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the preliminary determination becomes the final determination for the assessment program year fifteen days after the preliminary determination is issued to the hospital. (B) A hospital may request that the department reconsider the preliminary determination issued to the hospital under division (A) of this section by submitting to the department a written request for a reconsideration not later than fourteen days after the hospital's preliminary determination is issued to the hospital. The request must be accompanied by written materials setting forth the basis for the reconsideration, which may be delivered to the department by regular mail, electronic mail, or in-person delivery. On receipt of the timely request, the department shall reconsider the preliminary determination and may adjust the preliminary determination on the basis of the written materials accompanying the request. The result of the reconsideration is the final determination of the hospital's assessment under section 5168.21 of the Revised Code for the assessment program year. (C) The department shall issue to each hospital a written notice of the final determination of its assessment for the assessment program year. A hospital may appeal the final determination to the court of common pleas of Franklin county, pursuant to Chapter 2505. of the Revised Code. The complete record of the proceedings shall include all documentation considered by the department in issuing the final determination. While a judicial appeal is pending, the hospital shall pay, in accordance with section 5168.23 of the Revised Code, any amount of its assessment that is not in dispute. Sec. 5168.25. There is hereby created in the state treasury the hospital assessment fund. All installment payments made by hospitals under section 5168.23 of the Revised Code and all recoveries the department of medicaid makes under section 5168.24 of the Revised Code shall be deposited into the fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. The department shall use money in the fund to pay for the costs of the medicaid program, including the program's administrative costs. Sec. 5168.90. (A) At least quarterly, the medicaid director shall report to the members of the joint medicaid oversight committee and the executive director of the joint medicaid oversight committee legislative service commission both of the following: (1) The fee rates and the aggregate total of the fees assessed for each of the following: (a) The hospital assessment established under section 5168.21 of the Revised Code; (b) The nursing home and hospital long-term care unit franchise permit fee under section 5168.41 of the Revised Code; (c) The ICF/IID franchise permit fee under section 5168.61 of the Revised Code; (d) The health insuring corporation franchise fee under section 5168.76 of the Revised Code. (2) If there is a rate increase for any of the fee rates listed under division (A)(1) of this section pending before the centers for medicare and medicaid services. (B) The director may adopt rules under section 5162.02 of the Revised Code to compile and submit the reports required under this section, including rules, as authorized under section 5162.021 of the Revised Code, that specify the information that must be submitted to the director by the department of developmental disabilities regarding the ICF/IID franchise permit fee. Sec. 5104.50 5180.04. (A) The governor shall create the early childhood children and youth advisory council in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 9837b(b)(1) and 20 U.S.C. 1441 and shall appoint one of its members to serve as chairperson of the council with the director of children and youth serving as co-chairperson. The (B)(1) The council shall serve as both the state advisory council on early childhood education and care, as described in 42 U.S.C. 9837b(b)(1), and the state interagency coordinating council, as described in 20 U.S.C. 1441. In addition to the duties specified in 42 U.S.C. 9837b(b)(1), the (2) The council shall promote advise the governor on the availability, accessibility, affordability, and quality of services provided through the prenatal and child-serving systems. This includes fostering a continuum of care that promotes family-centered programs and services that acknowledge and support the social, emotional, cognitive, intellectual, and physical development of children and the vital role of families in ensuring the well-being and success of children. (3) The early childhood advisory council shall advise the director of children and youth on matters affecting the licensing of centers, type A homes, and type B homes and the certification of in-home aides. The council shall make an annual report to the director that addresses the availability, affordability, accessibility, and quality of child care and that summarizes the recommendations and plans of action that the council has proposed to the director during the preceding fiscal year. The director shall provide copies of the report to the governor, speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives, and the president and minority leader of the senate and, on request, shall make copies available to the public. (C)(1) The advisory council shall include up to twenty-five members appointed by the governor, including the following: (a) At least one representative of the department of children and youth; (b) At least one representative of the department of medicaid; (c) At least one representative of the department of job and family services; (d) At least one representative of the department of behavioral health ; (e) At least one representative of the department of education and workforce; (f) At least one representative of the department of health; (g) At least one representative of the department of developmental disabilities; (h) At least one representative of the department of youth services; (i) At least one representative from each of the following stakeholder groups, selected from multi-sized municipal corporations and geographically diverse areas of the state, including rural, urban, and suburban areas: (i) Maternal and infant vitality; (ii) Early intervention; (iii) Home visiting; (iv) Early childhood education; (v) Child care centers providing publicly funded child care; (vi) Family child care homes providing publicly funded child care; (vii) School child programs; (viii) Preschool programs; (ix) Children's services. (2) In making appointments to the advisory council, the governor shall ensure that the membership of the council reasonably represents the population of the state. (D)(1) The advisory council shall create topic-specific advisory groups that address a continuum of services including the following: (a) Early childhood education and care; (b) Children services; (c) Maternal and infant vitality; (d) Early childhood mental health services and supports; (e) Early intervention services. (2) No representative of the department of children and youth shall serve as a chairperson for a topic-specific advisory group. (3) The governor shall appoint additional members as necessary to the early childhood education and care advisory group and the early intervention services advisory group to satisfy the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 9837b(b)(1) and 20 U.S.C. 1441. (4) The director of children and youth shall appoint each representative appointed pursuant to division (C)(1)(i) of this section to at least one topic-specific advisory group. Sec. 5180.14. (A) As used in this section and sections 5180.15, 5180.16, and 5180.17 of the Revised Code: (1) "Child care center," "type A family child care home," and "licensed type B family child care home" have the same meanings as in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Child care facility" means a child care center, a type A family child care home, or a licensed type B family child care home. (3) "Foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (4) "Freestanding birthing center" has the same meaning as in section 3701.503 of the Revised Code. (5) "Hospital" has the same meaning as in section 3722.01 of the Revised Code to which either of the following applies: (a) The hospital has a maternity unit. (b) The hospital receives for care infants who have been transferred to it from other facilities and who have never been discharged to their residences following birth. (6) "Infant" means a child who is less than one year of age. (7) "Maternity unit" means the distinct portion of a hospital in which maternity services are provided. (8) "Other person responsible for the infant" includes a foster caregiver. (9) "Parent" means either parent, unless the parents are separated or divorced or their marriage has been dissolved or annulled, in which case "parent" means the parent who is the residential parent and legal custodian of the child. "Parent" also means a prospective adoptive parent with whom a child is placed. (10) "Shaken baby syndrome" means signs and symptoms, including, but not limited to, retinal hemorrhages in one or both eyes, subdural hematoma, or brain swelling, resulting from the violent shaking or the shaking and impacting of the head of an infant or small child. (B) The director of children and youth shall establish the shaken baby syndrome education program by doing all of the following: (1) Developing educational materials that present readily comprehendible information on shaken baby syndrome; (2) Making available on the department of children and youth web site in an easily accessible format the educational materials developed under division (B)(1) of this section; (3) Annually assessing the effectiveness of the shaken baby syndrome education program by doing all of the following: (a) Evaluating the reports received pursuant to section 5101.135 5180.405 of the Revised Code; (b) Reviewing the content of the educational materials to determine if updates or improvements should be made; (c) Reviewing the manner in which the educational materials are distributed, as described in section 5180.15 of the Revised Code, to determine if modifications to that manner should be made. (C) In meeting the requirements under division (B) of this section, the director shall develop educational materials that, to the extent possible, minimize administrative or financial burdens on any of the entities or persons listed in section 5180.15 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5180.17. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Contractor" means a person who provides personal services pursuant to a contract. (2) "Critical access hospital" means a facility designated as a critical access hospital by the director of health under section 3701.073 of the Revised Code. (3) "Crib" includes a portable play yard or other suitable sleeping place. (B) Each hospital and freestanding birthing center shall implement an infant safe sleep screening procedure. The purpose of the procedure is to determine whether there will be a safe crib for an infant to sleep in once the infant is discharged from the facility to the infant's residence following birth. The procedure shall consist of questions that facility staff or volunteers must ask the infant's parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the infant regarding the infant's intended sleeping place and environment. The director of children and youth shall develop questions that facilities may use when implementing the infant safe sleep screening procedure required by this division. The director may consult with persons and government entities that have expertise in infant safe sleep practices when developing the questions. (C) If, prior to an infant's discharge from a facility to the infant's residence following birth, a facility other than a critical access hospital or a facility identified under division (D) of this section determines through the procedure implemented under division (B) of this section that the infant is unlikely to have a safe crib at the infant's residence, the facility shall make a good faith effort to arrange for the parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the infant to obtain a safe crib at no charge to that individual. In meeting this requirement, the facility may do any of the following: (1) Obtain a safe crib with its own resources; (2) Collaborate with or obtain assistance from persons or government entities that are able to procure a safe crib or provide money to purchase a safe crib; (3) Refer the parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the infant to a person or government entity described in division (C)(2) of this section to obtain a safe crib free of charge from that source; (4) If funds are available for the cribs for kids program or a successor program administered by the department of children and youth, refer the parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the infant to a site, designated by the department for purposes of the program, at which a safe crib may be obtained at no charge. If a safe crib is procured as described in division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the facility shall ensure that the crib recipient receives safe sleep education and crib assembly instructions from the facility or another source. If a safe crib is procured as described in division (C)(4) of this section, the department of children and youth shall ensure that the cribs for kids program or a successor program administered by the department provides safe sleep education and crib assembly instructions to the recipient. (D) The director of children and youth shall identify the facilities in this state that are not critical access hospitals and are not served by a site described in division (C)(4) of this section. The director shall identify not less than annually the facilities that meet both criteria and notify those that do so. (E) When a facility that is a hospital registers with the department of health under section 3701.07 of the Revised Code or a facility that is a freestanding birthing center renews its license in accordance with rules adopted under section 3702.30 of the Revised Code, the facility shall report the following information to the department of children and youth in a manner the department prescribes: (1) The number of safe cribs that the facility obtained and distributed by using its own resources as described in division (C)(1) of this section since the last time the facility reported this information to the department; (2) The number of safe cribs that the facility obtained and distributed by collaborating with or obtaining assistance from another person or government entity as described in division (C)(2) of this section since the last time the facility reported this information to the department; (3) The number of referrals that the facility made to a person or government entity as described in division (C)(3) of this section since the last time the facility reported this information to the department; (4) The number of referrals that the facility made to a site designated by the department as described in division (C)(4) of this section since the last time the facility reported this information to the department; (5) Demographic information specified by the director of children and youth regarding the individuals to whom safe cribs were distributed as described in division (E)(1) or (2) of this section or for whom a referral described in division (E)(3) or (4) of this section was made; (6) In the case of a critical access hospital or a facility identified under division (D) of this section, demographic information specified by the director of children and youth regarding each parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the infant determined to be unlikely to have a safe crib at the infant's residence pursuant to the procedure implemented under division (B) of this section; (7) Any other information collected by the facility regarding infant sleep environments and intended infant sleep environments that the director determines to be appropriate. (F) The director of children and youth shall prepare a written report that summarizes the information collected under division (E) of this section for the preceding twelve months, assesses whether at-risk families are sufficiently being served by the crib distribution and referral system established by this section, makes suggestions for system improvements, and provides any other information the director considers appropriate for inclusion in the report. On completion, the report shall be submitted to the general assembly with, and in the same manner as, the report that the department of medicaid submits to the general assembly and joint medicaid oversight committee pursuant to section 5162.13 of the Revised Code. A copy of the report also shall be submitted to the governor. (G) A facility, and any employee, contractor, or volunteer of a facility, that implements an infant safe sleep procedure in accordance with division (B) of this section is not liable for damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from an act or omission associated with implementation of the procedure, unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. A facility, and any employee, contractor, or volunteer of a facility, that implements an infant safe sleep screening procedure in accordance with division (B) of this section is not subject to criminal prosecution or, to the extent that a person is regulated under Title XLVII of the Revised Code, professional disciplinary action under that title, for an act or omission associated with implementation of the procedure. This division does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a facility, or an employee, contractor, or volunteer of a facility, may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code, or any other provision of the Revised Code, or the common law of this state. (H) A facility, and any employee, contractor, or volunteer of a facility, is neither liable for damages in a civil action, nor subject to criminal prosecution, for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from a crib obtained by a parent, guardian, or other person responsible for the infant as a result of any action the facility, employee, contractor, or volunteer takes to comply with division (C) of this section. The immunity provided by this division does not require compliance with division (D) of section 2305.37 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5180.20. (A) The director of children and youth shall identify each government program providing benefits, other than the help me grow program established by the department of children and youth pursuant to section 5180.21 of the Revised Code, that has the goal of reducing infant mortality and negative birth outcomes or the goal of reducing disparities among women who are pregnant or capable of becoming pregnant and who belong to a racial or ethnic minority. A program shall be identified only if it provides education, training, and support services related to those goals to program participants in their homes. The director may consult with the Ohio partnership to build stronger families for assistance with identifying the programs. (B) An administrator of a program identified under division (A) of this section shall report to the director data on program performance indicators that are used to assess progress toward achieving program goals. The administrator shall report the data in the format and within the time frames specified in rules adopted under division (C) of this section. Using the data reported under this division, the director shall prepare an annual report assessing the performance of each government program identified pursuant to division (A) of this section during the immediately preceding twelve-month period. In addition, the report shall summarize and provide an analysis of the information contained in the "information for medical and health use only" section of the birth records for individuals born during the prior twelve-month period. The director shall provide a copy of the report to the general assembly and the joint medicaid oversight committee. The copy to the general assembly shall be provided in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. (C) The director shall adopt rules specifying program performance indicators on which data must be reported by the administrators described in division (B) of this section as well as the format and time frames in which the data must be reported. To the extent possible, the program performance indicators specified in the rules shall be consistent with federal reporting requirements for federally funded home visiting services. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5180.21. (A) The department of children and youth shall establish the help me grow program as the state's evidence-based parent support program that encourages early prenatal and well-baby care, as well as provides parenting education to promote the comprehensive health and development of children. The program shall provide home visiting services to families with a pregnant woman or child under five years of age that meet the eligibility requirements established in rules adopted under this section. Home visiting services shall be provided through evidence-based home visiting models or innovative, promising home visiting models recommended by the Ohio home visiting consortium children and youth advisory council created under section 5180.23 5180.04 of the Revised Code. (B) Families shall be referred to the appropriate home visiting services through the central intake and referral system created under section 5180.22 of the Revised Code. (C) To the extent possible, the goals of the help me grow program shall be consistent with the goals of the federal home visiting program, as specified by the maternal and child health bureau of the health resources and services administration in the United States department of health and human services or its successor. (D) The director of children and youth shall enter into an interagency agreement with one or more state agencies, including the department of developmental disabilities, department of job and family services, department of medicaid, commission on minority health, Ohio fatherhood commission, and children's trust fund board, to implement the help me grow program, to ensure coordination of early childhood programs, and to maximize reimbursement for the help me grow program from any federal source. In addition to creating the central intake and referral system as described in section 5180.22 of the Revised Code, the department of children and youth shall ensure there is a consistent comprehensive screening and connection program to support the coordination of home visiting services across the state, including through the department of health, department of developmental disabilities, department of job and family services, department of medicaid, and commission on minority health. Following the program's establishment, the department of children and youth shall evaluate the program's effectiveness in coordinating home visiting services at least once annually. (E) The director may distribute help me grow program funds through contracts, grants, or subsidies to entities providing services under the program. (F) As a condition of receiving payments for home visiting services, providers shall report to the director data on the program performance indicators, specified in rules adopted under division (G) of this section, that are used to assess progress toward achieving all of the following: (1) The benchmark domains established for the federal home visiting program, including improvement in maternal and newborn health; reduction in child injuries, abuse, and neglect; improved school readiness and achievement; reduction in crime and domestic violence; and improved family economic self-sufficiency; (2) Improvement in birth outcomes and reduction in stillbirths, as that term is defined in section 5180.12 of the Revised Code; (3) Reduction in tobacco use by pregnant women, new parents, and others living in households with children. The providers shall report the data in the format and within the time frames specified in the rules. The director shall prepare an annual report on the data received from the providers. Each report shall include an evaluation addressing the number of families and children served, the number and type of services provided, health and developmental outcomes for participating families and children, and variation in outcomes between the types of home visiting programs specified in division (B)(3) of section 5180.22 of the Revised Code. The director shall submit the report to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code and make the report available on the internet web site maintained by the department of children and youth. (G) Pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director shall adopt rules that are necessary and proper to implement this section. The rules shall specify all of the following: (1) Subject to division (H) of this section, eligibility requirements for home visiting services; (2) Eligibility requirements for providers of home visiting services; (3) Standards and procedures for the provision of program services, including data collection, program monitoring, and program evaluation; (4) Procedures for appealing the denial of an application for program services or the termination of services; (5) Procedures for appealing the denial of an application to become a provider of program services or the termination of the department's approval of a provider; (6) Procedures for addressing complaints; (7) The program performance indicators on which data must be reported by providers of home visiting services under division (F) of this section, which, to the extent possible, shall be consistent with federal reporting requirements for federally funded home visiting services; (8) The format in which reports must be submitted under division (F) of this section and the time frames within which the reports must be submitted; (9) Criteria for payment of approved providers of program services; (10) Any other rules necessary to implement the program. (H) When adopting rules required by division (G)(1) of this section, the director shall specify that families residing in the urban and rural communities specified in rules adopted under section 3701.142 of the Revised Code and families in the child welfare system are to receive priority over other families for home visiting services. (I) The department, in collaboration with the departments of job and family services and medicaid, shall propose strategies to increase the workforce capacity of home visiting service providers and parenting support professionals, including efforts to incentivize and retain such providers and professionals in this state. Sec. 5180.22. (A) The department of children and youth shall create a central intake and referral system for all home visiting programs operating in this state. Through a competitive bidding process, the department of children and youth may select one or more persons or government entities to operate the system. In its oversight of the one or more system operators, the department shall streamline the system to ensure families and children receive services from home visiting programs as described in division (B)(3) of this section. (B) If the department of children and youth chooses to select one or more system operators as described in division (A) of this section, a contract with any system operator shall require that the system do all of the following: (1) Serve as a single point of entry for access, assessment, and referral of families and children to appropriate home visiting services based on each family's location of residence; (2) Use a standardized form or other mechanism to assess each family member's risk factors and social determinants of health; (3) Ensure that families and children are referred to and receive services from home visiting programs that are appropriate to their level of needs, including the following: (a) Programs using home visiting contractors that provide services within a pathways community HUB certified by the pathways community HUB institute; (b) Programs that provide services using the early head start home-based option. (C) The standardized form or other mechanism described in division (B)(2) of this section shall be agreed to by the home visiting consortium children and youth advisory council created under section 5180.23 5180.04 of the Revised Code. (D) A contract entered into under division (B) of this section shall require a system operator to issue an annual report to the department of children and youth that includes data regarding referrals made by the central intake and referral system, costs associated with the referrals, and the quality of services received by families and children who were referred to services through the system. The report shall be distributed to the home visiting consortium children and youth advisory council created under section 5180.23 5180.04 of the Revised Code. (E) Nothing in this section is intended to do any of the following: (1) Prohibit the department of children and youth from using alternative promotional materials or names for the central intake and referral system; (2) Require the use of help me grow program promotional materials or names; (3) Prohibit providers, central coordinators, the department of children and youth, or stakeholders from using the help me grow name for promotional materials for home visiting. Sec. 5101.76 5180.26. (A) A residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code, a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code may procure epinephrine autoinjectors for use in emergency situations identified under division (C)(5) of this section by doing one of the following: (1) Having a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, acting in accordance with section 4723.483, 4730.433, or 4731.96 of the Revised Code, personally furnish the epinephrine autoinjectors to the camp or issue a prescription for them in the name of the camp; (2) Obtaining a prescriber-issued protocol that includes definitive orders for epinephrine autoinjectors and the dosages of epinephrine to be administered through them. A camp that elects to procure epinephrine autoinjectors under this section is encouraged to maintain at least two epinephrine autoinjectors at all times. (B) A camp that elects to procure epinephrine autoinjectors under this section shall adopt a policy governing their maintenance and use. Before adopting the policy, the camp shall consult with a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs. (C) The policy adopted under division (B) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Identify the one or more locations in which an epinephrine autoinjector must be stored; (2) Specify the conditions under which an epinephrine autoinjector must be stored, replaced, and disposed; (3) Specify the individuals employed by or under contract with the camp who may access and use an epinephrine autoinjector to provide a dosage of epinephrine to an individual in an emergency situation identified under division (C)(5) of this section; (4) Specify any training that employees or contractors specified under division (C)(3) of this section must complete before being authorized to access and use an epinephrine autoinjector; (5) Identify the emergency situations, including when an individual exhibits signs and symptoms of anaphylaxis, in which employees or contractors specified under division (C)(3) of this section may access and use an epinephrine autoinjector; (6) Specify that assistance from an emergency medical service provider must be requested immediately after an epinephrine autoinjector is used; (7) Specify the individuals to whom a dosage of epinephrine may be administered through an epinephrine autoinjector in an emergency situation specified under division (C)(5) of this section. (D)(1) The following are not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from an act or omission associated with procuring, maintaining, accessing, or using an epinephrine autoinjector under this section, unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct: (a) A camp; (b) A camp employee or contractor; (c) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs who personally furnishes or prescribes epinephrine autoinjectors, provides a consultation, or issues a protocol pursuant to this section. (2) This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a camp or camp employee or contractor or licensed health professional may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state. (E) A camp may accept donations of epinephrine autoinjectors from a wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs, as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code, and may accept donations of money from any person to purchase epinephrine autoinjectors. (F) A camp that elects to procure epinephrine autoinjectors under this section shall report to the department of children and youth each procurement and occurrence in which an epinephrine autoinjector is used from a camp's supply of epinephrine autoinjectors. (G) As used in this section, "licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs" and "prescriber" have the same meanings as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.77 5180.261. (A) As used in this section, "inhaler" means a device that delivers medication to alleviate asthmatic symptoms, is manufactured in the form of a metered dose inhaler or dry powdered inhaler, and may include a spacer, holding chamber, or other device that attaches to the inhaler and is used to improve the delivery of the medication. (B) A residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code, a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code may procure inhalers for use in emergency situations identified under division (D)(5) of this section. A camp that elects to procure inhalers under this section is encouraged to maintain at least two inhalers at all times. (C) A camp that elects to procure inhalers under this section shall adopt a policy governing their maintenance and use. Before adopting the policy, the camp shall consult with a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (D) A component of a policy adopted by a camp under division (C) of this section shall be a prescriber-issued protocol specifying definitive orders for inhalers, including the dosages of medication to be administered through them, the number of times that each inhaler may be used before disposal, and the methods of disposal. The policy also shall do all of the following: (1) Identify the one or more locations in which an inhaler must be stored; (2) Specify the conditions under which an inhaler must be stored, replaced, and disposed; (3) Specify the individuals employed by or under contract with the camp who may access and use an inhaler to provide a dosage of medication to an individual in an emergency situation identified under division (D)(5) of this section; (4) Specify any training that employees or contractors specified under division (D)(3) of this section must complete before being authorized to access and use an inhaler; (5) Identify the emergency situations, including when an individual exhibits signs and symptoms of asthma, in which employees or contractors specified under division (D)(3) of this section may access and use an inhaler; (6) Specify that assistance from an emergency medical service provider must be requested immediately after an employee or contractor, other than a licensed health professional, uses an inhaler; (7) Specify the individuals to whom a dosage of medication may be administered through an inhaler in an emergency situation specified under division (D)(5) of this section. (E) A camp or camp employee or contractor is not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from an act or omission associated with procuring, maintaining, accessing, or using an inhaler under this section, unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct. This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a camp or camp employee or contractor may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state. (F) A camp may accept donations of inhalers from a wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs, as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code, and may accept donations of money from any person to purchase inhalers. (G) A camp that elects to procure inhalers under this section shall report to the department of children and youth each procurement and occurrence in which an inhaler is used from a camp's supply of inhalers. Sec. 5101.78 5180.262. (A) As used in this section, "licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs" and "prescriber" have the same meanings as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A residential camp, as defined in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code; a child day camp, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; or a child day camp operated by any county, township, municipal corporation, township park district created under section 511.18 of the Revised Code, park district created under section 1545.04 of the Revised Code, or joint recreation district established under section 755.14 of the Revised Code may procure injectable or nasally administered glucagon for use in emergency situations identified under division (D)(5) of this section by doing one of the following: (1) Having a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs, acting in accordance with section 4723.4811, 4730.437, or 4731.92 of the Revised Code, personally furnish the injectable or nasally administered glucagon to the camp or issue a prescription for the drug in the name of the camp; (2) Obtaining a prescriber-issued protocol that includes definitive orders for injectable or nasally administered glucagon and the dosages to be administered; A camp that elects to procure injectable or nasally administered glucagon under this section is encouraged to maintain at least two doses of the drug at all times. (C) A camp that elects to procure injectable or nasally administered glucagon under this section shall adopt a policy governing maintenance and use of the drug. Before adopting the policy, the camp shall consult with a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs. (D) The policy adopted under division (C) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Identify the one or more locations at the camp in which injectable or nasally administered glucagon must be stored; (2) Specify the conditions under which injectable or nasally administered glucagon must be stored, replaced, or disposed; (3) Specify the individuals employed by or under contract with the camp, or who volunteer at the camp, who may access and use injectable or nasally administered glucagon in an emergency situation identified under division (D)(5) of this section; (4) Specify any training that employees, contractors, or volunteers specified under division (D)(3) of this section must complete before being authorized to access and use injectable or nasally administered glucagon; (5) Identify the emergency situations, including when an individual exhibits signs and symptoms of severe hypoglycemia, in which employees, contractors, or volunteers specified under division (D)(3) of this section may access and use injectable or nasally administered glucagon; (6) Specify that assistance from an emergency medical service provider must be requested immediately after a dose of glucagon is administered; (7) Specify the individuals to whom a dose of glucagon may be administered in an emergency situation specified under division (D)(5) of this section. (E)(1) The following are not liable in damages in a civil action for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises from an act or omission associated with procuring, maintaining, accessing, or using injectable or nasally administered glucagon under this section, unless the act or omission constitutes willful or wanton misconduct: (a) A camp; (b) A camp employee, contractor, or volunteer; (c) A licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs who personally furnishes or prescribes injectable or nasally administered glucagon, provides a consultation, or issues a protocol pursuant to this section; (2) This section does not eliminate, limit, or reduce any other immunity or defense that a camp; camp employee, contractor, or volunteer; or licensed health professional may be entitled to under Chapter 2744. or any other provision of the Revised Code or under the common law of this state. (F) A camp may accept donations of injectable or nasally administered glucagon from a wholesale distributor of dangerous drugs or manufacturer of dangerous drugs, as defined in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code, and may accept donations of money from any person to purchase the drug. (G) A camp that elects to procure injectable or nasally administered glucagon under this section shall report to the department of children and youth each procurement and each occurrence in which a dose of the drug is used from the camp's supply. Sec. 3738.01 5180.27. (A) As used in this section and sections 3738.02 5180.271 to 3738.09 5180.278 of the Revised Code, "pregnancy-associated death" means the death of a woman while pregnant or anytime within one year of pregnancy regardless of cause. (B) There is hereby established in the department of health children and youth a pregnancy-associated mortality review (PAMR) board to identify and review all pregnancy-associated deaths statewide for the purpose of reducing the incidence of those deaths. Sec. 3738.02 5180.271. The PAMR board may not conduct a review of a pregnancy-associated death while an investigation of the death or prosecution of a person for causing the death is pending unless the prosecuting attorney agrees to allow the review. The law enforcement agency conducting the criminal investigation, on the conclusion of the investigation, and the prosecuting attorney prosecuting the case, on the conclusion of the prosecution, shall notify the chairperson of the PAMR board of the conclusion. Sec. 3738.03 5180.272. All of the following apply with respect to the PAMR board: (A) The director of health children and youth shall appoint the board's members. In doing so, the director shall make a good faith effort to select members who represent all regions of the state and multiple areas of expertise and constituencies concerned with the care of pregnant and postpartum women. (B) The board, by a majority vote of a quorum of its members, shall select an individual to serve as its chairperson. The board may replace a chairperson in the same manner. (C) An appointed member shall hold office until a successor is appointed. The director of health children and youth shall fill a vacancy as soon as practicable. (D) A member shall not receive any compensation for, and shall not be paid for any expenses incurred pursuant to, fulfilling the member's duties on the board. (E) The board shall meet at the call of the board's chairperson as often as the chairperson determines necessary for timely completion of pregnancy-associated death reviews. The reviews shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted under section 3738.09 5180.278 of the Revised Code. (F) The department of health children and youth shall provide meeting space, staff services, and other technical assistance required by the board in carrying out its duties. Sec. 3738.04 5180.273. The PAMR board shall seek to reduce the incidence of pregnancy-associated deaths in this state by doing all of the following: (A) Promoting cooperation, collaboration, and communication between all groups, professions, agencies, and entities that serve pregnant and postpartum women and families; (B) Recommending and developing plans for implementing service and program changes, as well as changes to the groups, professions, agencies, and entities that serve pregnant and postpartum women and families; (C) Providing the department of health children and youth with aggregate data, trends, and patterns regarding pregnancy-associated deaths using data and other relevant information specified in rules adopted under section 3738.09 5180.278 of the Revised Code; (D) Developing effective interventions to reduce the mortality of pregnant and postpartum women. Sec. 3738.05 5180.274. (A) Notwithstanding section 3701.243 and any other section of the Revised Code pertaining to confidentiality, and except as provided in division (B) of this section, an individual, government entity, agency that provides services specifically to individuals or families, law enforcement agency, health care provider, or other public or private entity that provided services to a woman whose death is being reviewed by the PAMR board shall submit to the board a copy of any record it possesses that the board requests. In addition, such an individual or entity may make available to the board additional information, documents, or reports that could be useful to the board's investigation. (B) No person, government entity, law enforcement agency, or prosecuting attorney shall provide any information regarding a pregnancy-associated death while an investigation of the death or prosecution of a person for causing the death is pending unless the prosecuting attorney agrees to allow the review. (C) A family member of the deceased may decline to participate in an interview as part of the review process. In that case, the review shall continue without the family member's participation. Sec. 3738.06 5180.275. (A) Any record, document, report, or other information presented to the PAMR board, as well as all statements made by board members during board meetings, all work products of the board, and data submitted to the department of health children and youth by the board, other than the biennial reports described in section 3738.08 5180.277 of the Revised Code, are confidential and not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Such materials shall be used by the board and department only in the exercise of the proper functions of the board and department. (B) No person shall permit or encourage the unauthorized dissemination of confidential information described in division (A) of this section. (C) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. Sec. 3738.07 5180.276. (A) An individual or public or private entity providing records, documents, reports, or other information to the PAMR board is immune from any civil liability for injury, death, or loss to person or property that otherwise might be incurred or imposed as a result of providing the records, documents, reports, or information to the board. (B) Each board member is immune from any civil liability for injury, death, or loss to person or property that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of the member's participation on the board. Sec. 3738.08 5180.277. (A) The PAMR board shall prepare a biennial report that does all of the following: (1) Summarizes the board's findings from the reviews completed in the immediately preceding two calendar years, including any trends or patterns identified by the board; (2) Makes recommendations on how pregnancy-associated deaths may be prevented, including changes that should be made to policies and laws; (3) Includes any other information related to pregnancy-associated mortality the board considers useful. (B) A report shall not contain individually identifiable information regarding any woman whose death was reviewed by the board. (C) The board shall submit a copy of each report to the director of healthchildren and youth, the general assembly, and the governor. The copy to the general assembly shall be submitted in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The initial report shall be submitted not later than March 1, 2020, with subsequent reports submitted not later than March 1 every two years thereafter. The director shall make a copy of each report available on the department of health's children and youth's web site. (D) Reports prepared under this section are public records under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3738.09 5180.278. The director of health children and youth shall adopt rules that are necessary for the implementation of sections 3738.01 5180.27 to 3738.08 5180.277 of the Revised Code, including rules that do all of the following: (A) Establish a procedure for the PAMR board to follow in conducting pregnancy-associated death reviews; (B) Specify the data and other relevant information the board must use when conducting pregnancy-associated death reviews; (C) Establish guidelines for the board to follow to prevent an unauthorized dissemination of confidential information in violation of division (B) of section 3738.06 5180.275 of the Revised Code. The rules shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.13 5180.40. (A) The department of children and youth shall establish and maintain a uniform statewide automated child welfare information system in accordance with the requirements of 42 U.S.C.A.U.S.C. 674(a)(3)(C) and related federal regulations and guidelines. The information system shall contain records regarding any of the following: (1) Investigations of children and families, and children's care in out-of-home care, in accordance with sections 2151.421 and 5153.16 of the Revised Code; (2) Care and treatment provided to children and families; (3) Any other information related to children and families that state or federal law, regulation, or rule requires the department or a public children services agency to maintain. (B) The department shall plan implementation of the information system on a county-by-county basis and shall finalize statewide implementation by all public children services agencies as described in section 5153.02 of the Revised Code not later than January 1, 2008. (C) The department shall promptly notify all public children services agencies of the initiation and completion of statewide implementation of the statewide information system established under division (A) of this section. (D) "Out-of-home care" has the same meaning as in section 2151.011 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.131 5180.401. Except as provided in section 5101.132 5180.402 of the Revised Code, information contained in or obtained from the information system established and maintained under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code is confidential and is not subject to disclosure pursuant to section 149.43 or 1347.08 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.132 5180.402. (A) Information contained in the information system established and maintained under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code may be accessed or entered only as follows: (1) The department of job and family services, the department of children and youth, a public children services agency, a title IV-E agency, a prosecuting attorney, a private child placing agency, and a private noncustodial agency may access or enter the information when either of the following is the case: (a) The access or entry is directly connected with assessment, investigation, or services regarding a child or family; (b) The access or entry is permitted by state or federal law, rule, or regulation. (2) A person may access or enter the information in a manner, to the extent, and for the purposes authorized by rules adopted by the department. (B) As used in this section, "title IV-E agency" means a public children services agency or a public entity with which the department of job and family services or department of children and youth has a title IV-E subgrant agreement in effect. Sec. 5101.133 5180.403. No person shall access or use information contained in the information system established and maintained under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code other than in accordance with section 5101.132 5180.402 of the Revised Code or rules authorized by that section. No person shall disclose information obtained from the information system established and maintained under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code in a manner not specified by rules authorized by section 5101.134 5180.404 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.134 5180.404. (A) Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code that requires confidentiality of information that is contained in the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system established in section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code, the department of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code regarding a private child placing agency's or private noncustodial agency's access, data entry, and use of information in the uniform statewide automated child welfare information system. (B)(1) The department of children and youth may adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code, as if they were internal management rules, as necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 5101.13 5180.40 to 5101.133 5180.403 of the Revised Code. (2) The department may adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to carry out the purposes of division (A)(2) of section 5101.132 5180.402 of the Revised Code. (C) Public children services agencies shall implement and use the information system established pursuant to section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code in accordance with rules adopted by the department. Sec. 5101.135 5180.405. (A) A public children services employee who is entering a report of an investigation of child abuse in the statewide automated child welfare information system, as required by section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code, shall make a notation on each case of child abuse that indicates whether the child abuse arose from an act that caused the child to suffer from, or resulted in the child suffering from, shaken baby syndrome. (B) On the first day of March of each year, the department of children and youth shall report to the director of health the number of reports of child abuse that arose from an act that caused the child to suffer from, or resulted in the child suffering from, shaken baby syndrome and that arose during the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year in which the report is made, as determined by an examination of the statewide automated child welfare information system established and maintained under section 5101.13 5180.40 of the Revised Code. (C) As used in this section, "shaken baby syndrome" has the same meaning as in section 5180.14 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.136 5180.406. If a person requests the department of job and family services children and youth to conduct a search of whether that person's name has been placed or remains in the statewide automated child welfare information system as an alleged perpetrator of child abuse or neglect and a search reveals that a "substantiated" disposition exists, the department shall send a letter to the person who requested the search indicating a "match." Sec. 5101.137 5180.407. The department of job and family services children and youth shall work with stakeholders to establish an expungement policy regarding dispositions of child abuse or neglect in Ohio's central registry on child abuse and neglect by March 1, 2024. Sec. 5101.14 5180.41. (A) As used in this section and section 5101.144 5180.411 of the Revised Code, "children services" means services provided to children pursuant to Chapter 5153. of the Revised Code. (B) Within available funds, the department of children and youth shall distribute funds to the counties within thirty days after the beginning of each calendar quarter for a part of the counties' costs for children services. Funds provided to the county under this section shall be deposited into the children services fund created pursuant to section 5101.144 5180.411 of the Revised Code. (C) In each fiscal year, the amount of funds available for distribution under this section shall be allocated to counties as follows: (1) If the amount is less than the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year, each county shall receive an amount equal to the percentage of the funding it received in the immediately preceding fiscal year, exclusive of any releases from or additions to the allocation or any sanctions imposed under this section; (2) If the amount is equal to the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year, each county shall receive an amount equal to the amount it received in the preceding fiscal year, exclusive of any releases from or additions to the allocation or any sanctions imposed under this section; (3) If the amount is greater than the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year, each county shall receive the amount determined under division (C)(2) of this section as a base allocation, plus a percentage of the amount that exceeds the amount initially appropriated for the immediately preceding fiscal year. The amount exceeding the amount initially appropriated in the immediately preceding fiscal year shall be allocated to the counties as follows: (a) Twelve per cent divided equally among all counties; (b) Forty-eight per cent in the ratio that the number of residents of the county under the age of eighteen bears to the total number of such persons residing in this state; (c) Forty per cent in the ratio that the number of residents of the county with incomes under the federal poverty guideline bears to the total number of such persons in this state. As used in division (C)(3)(c) of this section, "federal poverty guideline" means the poverty guideline as defined by the United States office of management and budget and revised by the United States secretary of health and human services in accordance with section 673 of the "Community Services Block Grant Act," 95 Stat. 511 (1981), 42 U.S.C.A. 9902, as amended. (D) Within ninety days after the end of each state fiscal biennium, each county shall return any unspent funds to the department. (E) The director of children and youth may adopt the following rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code: (1) Rules that are necessary for the allocation of funds under this section; (2) Rules prescribing reports on expenditures to be submitted by the counties as necessary for the implementation of this section. Sec. 5101.144 5180.411. Each county shall deposit all funds its public children services agency receives from appropriations made by the board of county commissioners or any other source for the purpose of providing children services into a special fund in the county treasury known as the children services fund. A county shall use money in the fund only for the purposes of meeting the expenses of providing children services. Sec. 5101.141 5180.42. (A) As used in sections 5101.141 5180.42 to 5101.1417 5180.4214 of the Revised Code: (1) "Adopted young adult" means a person: (a) Who was in the temporary or permanent custody of a public children services agency; (b) Who was adopted at the age of sixteen or seventeen and attained the age of sixteen before a Title IV-E adoption assistance agreement became effective; (c) Who has attained the age of eighteen; and (d) Who has not yet attained the age of twenty-one. (2) "Child" means any of the following: (a) A person who meets the requirements of division (B)(3) of section 5153.01 of the Revised Code; (b) An adopted young adult; (c) An emancipated young adult. (3) "Emancipated young adult" means a person: (a) Who was in the temporary or permanent custody of a public children services agency, a planned permanent living arrangement, or in the Title-IV-E-eligible care and placement responsibility of a juvenile court or other governmental agency that provides Title IV-E reimbursable placement services; (b) Whose custody, arrangement, or care and placement was terminated on or after the person's eighteenth birthday; and (c) Who has not yet attained the age of twenty-one. (4) "Kinship guardianship young adult" means an individual that meets the following criteria: (a) Was in the temporary or permanent custody of a public children services agency or a planned permanent living arrangement prior to the commitment described in division (A)(4)(b) of this section; (b) Was committed to the legal custody or legal guardianship of a kinship caregiver at the age of sixteen or seventeen and attained the age of sixteen before a Title IV-E kinship guardianship assistance agreement became effective; (c) Has attained the age of eighteen; (d) Has not yet attained the age of twenty-one. (5) "Relative" means, with respect to a child, any of the following who is eighteen years of age or older: (a) The following individuals related by blood or adoption to the child: (i) Grandparents, including grandparents with the prefix "great," "great-great," or "great-great-great"; (ii) Siblings; (iii) Aunts, uncles, nephews, and nieces, including such relatives with the prefix "great," "great-great," "grand," or "great-grand"; (iv) First cousins and first cousins once removed. (b) Stepparents and stepsiblings of the child; (c) Spouses and former spouses of individuals named in divisions (A)(5)(a) and (b) of this section; (d) A legal guardian of the child; (e) A legal custodian of the child; (f) Any nonrelative adult that has a familiar and long-standing relationship or bond with the child or the family, which relationship or bond will ensure the child's social ties. (6) "Representative" means a person with whom the department of children and youth has entered into a contract, pursuant to division (B)(2)(b) of this section. (7) "Title IV-E" means Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501, 42 U.S.C. 670 (1980), as amended. (B)(1) Except as provided in divisions (B)(2), and (3), and (4) of this section, the department of children and youth shall act as the single state agency to administer federal payments for foster care, kinship guardianship assistance, and adoption assistance made pursuant to Title IV-E. The director of children and youth shall adopt rules to implement this authority. Rules governing financial and administrative requirements applicable to public children services agencies and government entities that provide Title IV-E reimbursable placement services to children shall be adopted in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code, as if they were internal management rules. Rules governing requirements applicable to private child placing agencies and private noncustodial agencies and rules establishing eligibility, program participation, and other requirements concerning Title IV-E shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. A public children services agency to which the department distributes Title IV-E funds shall administer the funds in accordance with those rules. (2) If the (2)(a) The department shall implement the state plan is as amended under divisions (A) and (B) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code, both of the following shall apply: (a) Implementation of the amendments to the plan shall begin fifteen months after September 13, 2016, the effective date of H.B. 50 of the 131st general assembly, if both of the following apply: (i) The plan as amended is approved by the secretary of health and human services; (ii) The if the general assembly has appropriated sufficient funds to operate the program required under the plan as amended. (b) The department shall have, exercise, and perform all new duties required under the plan as amended. In doing so, the department may contract with another person to carry out those new duties, to the extent permitted under Title IV-E. (3) If the state plan is amended under division (C) of section 5101.1411 of the Revised Code, both of the following apply: (a) Implementation of the amendments to the plan shall begin fifteen months after September 30, 2021, if both of the following apply: (i) The plan as amended is approved by the secretary of health and human services. (ii) The general assembly has appropriated sufficient funds to operate the program required under the plan as amended. (b) The department shall perform all new duties required under the amended plan. In doing so, the department may contract with another person to carry out those new duties, to the extent permitted under Title IV-E. (4) If The department shall implement the state plan is as amended under section 5101.1416 5180.4213 of the Revised Code, and is approved by the secretary of health and human services, implementation of the amendments to the plan shall begin fifteen months after September 30, 2021. (C)(1) Except with regard to the new duties imposed on the department or its contractor under divisions division (B)(2)(b) and (B)(3)(b) of this section that are not imposed on the county, the county, on behalf of each child eligible for foster care maintenance payments under Title IV-E, shall make payments to cover the cost of providing all of the following: (a) The child's food, clothing, shelter, daily supervision, and school supplies; (b) The child's personal incidentals; (c) Reasonable travel to the child's home for visitation. (2) In addition to payments made under division (C)(1) of this section, the county may, on behalf of each child eligible for foster care maintenance payments under Title IV-E, make payments to cover the cost of providing the following: (a) Liability insurance with respect to the child; (b) If the county is participating in the demonstration project established under division (A) of section 5101.142 5180.421 of the Revised Code, services provided under the project. (3) With respect to a child who is in a child-care institution, including any type of group home designed for the care of children or any privately operated program consisting of two or more certified foster homes operated by a common administrative unit, the foster care maintenance payments made by the county on behalf of the child shall include the reasonable cost of the administration and operation of the institution, group home, or program, as necessary to provide the items described in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section. (D) To the extent that either foster care maintenance payments under division (C) of this section, Title IV-E kinship guardianship assistance, or Title IV-E adoption assistance payments for maintenance costs require the expenditure of county funds, the board of county commissioners shall report the nature and amount of each expenditure of county funds to the department. (E) The department shall distribute to public children services agencies that incur and report expenditures of the type described in division (D) of this section federal financial participation received for administrative and training costs incurred in the operation of foster care maintenance, kinship guardianship assistance, and adoption assistance programs. The department may withhold not more than three per cent of the federal financial participation received. The funds withheld may be used only to fund the following: (1) The Ohio child welfare training program established under section 5103.30 of the Revised Code; (2) The university partnership program for college and university students majoring in social work who have committed to work for a public children services agency upon graduation; (3) Efforts supporting organizational excellence, including voluntary activities to be accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation organization. The funds withheld shall be in addition to any administration and training cost for which the department is reimbursed through its own cost allocation plan. (F) All federal financial participation funds received by a county pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the county's children services fund created pursuant to section 5101.144 5180.411 of the Revised Code. (G)(G)(1) The department shall periodically publish and distribute the maximum amounts that the department will reimburse public children services agencies for making payments on behalf of children eligible for foster care maintenance payments. (2) The department may issue a request for proposals to establish statewide rate cards for placement and care of children eligible for foster care maintenance payments. If a request for proposals is issued, the department shall review and accept the reasonable cost of providing the items described in division (C) of this section. Foster homes, as defined in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code, and kinship caregivers, as defined in section 5101.85 of the Revised Code, shall be exempt from the established statewide rates. (H) The department, by and through its director, is hereby authorized to develop, participate in the development of, negotiate, and enter into one or more interstate compacts on behalf of this state with agencies of any other states, for the provision of social services to children in relation to whom all of the following apply: (1) They have special needs. (2) This state or another state that is a party to the interstate compact is providing kinship guardianship assistance or adoption assistance on their behalf. (3) They move into this state from another state or move out of this state to another state. Sec. 5101.142 5180.421. (A) The department of children and youth may apply to the United States secretary of health and human services for a waiver of requirements established under Title IV-E, or regulations adopted thereunder, to conduct a demonstration project expanding eligibility for and services provided under Title IV-E. The department may enter into agreements with the secretary necessary to implement the demonstration project, including agreements establishing the terms and conditions of the waiver authorizing the project. If a demonstration project is to be established, the department shall do all of the following: (1) Have the director of children and youth adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code governing the project. The rules shall be consistent with the agreements the department enters into with the secretary. (2) Enter into agreements with public children services agencies that the department selects for participation in the project. The department shall not select an agency that objects to participation or refuses to be bound by the terms and conditions of the project. (3) Contract with persons or governmental agencies providing services under the project; (4) Amend the state plan required by section 471 of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C.A.U.S.C. 671, as amended, as needed to implement the project; (5) Conduct ongoing evaluations of the project; (6) Perform other administrative and operational activities required by the agreement with the secretary. (B) The department may apply to the United States secretary of health and human services for a waiver of the requirements established under Title IV-B of the "Social Security Act of 1967," 81 Stat. 821, 42 U.S.C.A.U.S.C. 620 or regulations adopted thereunder and established under any other federal law or regulations that affect the children services functions prescribed by Chapter 5153. of the Revised Code, to conduct demonstration projects or otherwise improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the children services function. Sec. 5101.145 5180.422. (A) In adopting rules under section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code regarding financial requirements applicable to public children services agencies, private child placing agencies, private noncustodial agencies, and government entities that provide Title IV-E reimbursable placement services to children, the department of children and youth shall may establish both of the following: (1) A single form for the agencies or entities to report costs reimbursable under Title IV-E and costs reimbursable under medicaid; (2) Procedures to monitor cost reports submitted by the agencies or entities. (B) The procedures established under division (A)(2) of this section shall be implemented not later than October 1, 2003. The procedures shall be used to do both of the following: (1) Determine which of the costs are reimbursable under Title IV-E; (2) Ensure that costs reimbursable under medicaid are excluded from determinations made under division (B)(1) of this section. Sec. 5101.146 5180.423. The department of children and youth shall establish the following penalties, which shall be enforced at the discretion of the department, for the failure of a public children services agency, private child placing agency, private noncustodial agency, or government entity that provides Title IV-E reimbursable placement services to children to comply with procedures the department establishes to ensure fiscal accountability: (A) For initial failure, the department and the agency or entity involved shall jointly develop and implement a corrective action plan according to a specific schedule. If requested by the agency or entity involved, the department shall provide technical assistance to the agency or entity to ensure the fiscal accountability procedures and goals of the plan are met. (B) For subsequent failures or failure to achieve the goals of the plan described in division (A) of this section, one of the following: (1) For public children services agencies, the department may take any action permitted under division (C)(2), (4), (5), or (6) of section 5101.24 of the Revised Code. (2) For private child placing agencies or private noncustodial agencies, cancellation of any Title IV-E allowability rates for the agency involved pursuant to section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code or revocation pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code of that agency's certificate issued under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code; (3) For government entities, other than public children services agencies, that provide Title IV-E reimbursable placement services to children, cancellation of any Title IV-E allowability rates for the entity involved pursuant to section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.147 5180.424. If a public children services agency fails to comply with the fiscal accountability procedures established by the department of children and youth, the department shall notify the board of county commissioners of the county served by the agency. If a private child placing agency or private noncustodial agency fails to comply with the fiscal accountability procedures, the department shall notify the executive director of each public children services agency that has entered into a contract for services with the private child placing agency or private noncustodial agency. Sec. 5101.148 5180.425. If the department of children and youth sanctions a public children services agency, private child placing agency, or private noncustodial agency, it shall take every possible precaution to ensure that any foster children that have been placed by the agency under sanction are not unnecessarily removed from the certified foster homes in which they reside. Sec. 5101.149 5180.426. Money from the children services fund shall not be used to provide a personal loan to any individual. Sec. 5101.1410 5180.427. In addition to the remedies available under sections 5101.146 and 5101.24 and 5180.423 of the Revised Code, the department of children and youth may certify a claim to the attorney general under section 131.02 of the Revised Code for the attorney general to take action under that section against a public children services agency, private child placing agency, private noncustodial agency, or government entity that provides Title IV-E reimbursable placement services to children if all of the following are the case: (A) The agency or entity files a cost report with the department pursuant to rules adopted under division (B) of section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code. (B) The department receives and distributes federal Title IV-E reimbursement funds based on the cost report. (C) The agency's or entity's misstatement, misclassification, overstatement, understatement, or other inclusion or omission of any cost included in the cost report causes the United States department of health and human services to disallow all or part of the federal Title IV-E reimbursement funds the department received and distributed. (D) The agency's or entity's misstatement, misclassification, overstatement, understatement, or other inclusion or omission of any cost included in the cost report is not the direct result of a written directive concerning the agency or entity's cost report that the department issued to the agency or entity. Sec. 5101.1411 5180.428. (A)(1) The director of job and family services children and youth shall, not later than nine months after September 13, 2016, the effective date of H.B. 50 of the 131st general assembly, submit an amendment to the state plan required by 42 U.S.C. 671 to the United States secretary of health and human services to implement 42 U.S.C. 675(8) to make federal payments for foster care under Title IV-E directly to, or on behalf of, any emancipated young adult who meets the following requirements: (a) The emancipated young adult signs a voluntary participation agreement. (b) The emancipated young adult satisfies division (D) of this section. (2) Any emancipated young adult who meets the requirements of division (A)(1) of this section may apply for foster care payments and make the appropriate application at any time. (B)(1) The director of job and family services children and youth shall, not later than nine months after September 13, 2016, the effective date of H.B. 50 of the 131st general assembly, submit an amendment to the state plan required by 42 U.S.C. 671 to the United States secretary of health and human services to implement 42 U.S.C. 675(8) to make federal payments for adoption assistance under Title IV-E available to any parent who meets all of the following requirements: (a) The parent adopted a person who is an adopted young adult and the parent entered into an adoption assistance agreement under 42 U.S.C. 673 while the adopted person was age sixteen or seventeen. (b) The parent maintains parental responsibility for the adopted young adult. (c) The adopted young adult satisfies division (D) of this section. (2) Any parent who meets the requirements of division (B)(1) of this section that are applicable to a parent may request an extension of adoption assistance payments at any time before the adopted young adult reaches age twenty-one. (3) An adopted young adult who is eligible to receive adoption assistance payments is not considered an emancipated young adult and is therefore not eligible to receive payment under division (A) of this section. (C)(1) The director of job and family services children and youth shall, not later than nine months after September 30, 2021, submit an amendment to the state plan required by 42 U.S.C. 671 to the United States secretary of health and human services to implement 42 U.S.C. 673(d) to provide kinship guardianship assistance under Title IV-E available to any relative who meets all of the following requirements: (a) Both of the following apply: (i) A juvenile court issued an order granting legal custody of a person who is a kinship guardianship young adult to the relative, or a probate court issued an order granting guardianship of a person who is a kinship guardianship young adult to the relative, and the order is not a temporary court order. (ii) The relative entered into a kinship guardianship assistance agreement under 42 U.S.C. 673(d) while the kinship guardianship young adult was age sixteen or seventeen. (b) The relative maintains parental responsibility for the kinship guardianship young adult. (c) The kinship guardianship young adult satisfies division (D) of this section. (2) Any person who meets the requirements of division (C)(1) of this section may request an extension of kinship guardianship assistance at any time before the kinship guardianship young adult reaches age twenty-one. (3) A kinship guardianship young adult who is eligible to receive kinship guardianship assistance is not considered an emancipated young adult and is therefore not eligible to receive assistance under division (A) of this section. (D) In addition to other requirements, an adopted, kinship guardianship, or emancipated young adult must meet at least one of the following criteria: (1) Is completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential; (2) Is enrolled in an institution that provides post-secondary or vocational education; (3) Is participating in a program or activity designed to promote, or remove barriers to, employment; (4) Is employed for at least eighty hours per month; (5) Is incapable of doing any of the activities described in divisions (D)(1) to (4) of this section due to a physical or mental condition, which incapacity is supported by regularly updated information in the person's case record or plan. (E) Any emancipated young adult described in division (A)(1) of this section who is directly receiving foster care payments, or on whose behalf such foster care payments are received, or any relative described in division (C)(1) of this section who is receiving kinship guardianship assistance, or any parent receiving adoption assistance payments, may refuse the payments at any time. (F)(1) An emancipated young adult described in division (A)(1) of this section who is directly receiving foster care payments, or on whose behalf such foster care payments are received, or any relative described in division (C)(1) of this section who is receiving kinship guardianship assistance and the kinship guardianship young adult, or a parent receiving adoption assistance payments and the adopted young adult shall be eligible for services set forth in the federal, "Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008," P.L. 110-351, 122 Stat. 3949. (2) An emancipated young adult described in division (A)(1) of this section who is directly receiving foster care payments, or on whose behalf such foster care payments are received, pursuant to this section, may be eligible to reside in a supervised independent living setting, including apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, host homes, and shared roommate settings. (G) Any determination by the department of job and family services or the department of children and youth that denies or terminates foster care assistance, kinship guardianship assistance, kinship support program payments, or adoption assistance payments shall be subject to a state hearing pursuant to section 5101.35 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.1412 5180.429. (A) Without the approval of a court, an emancipated young adult who receives payments, or on whose behalf payments are received, under division (A) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code, may enter into a voluntary participation agreement with the department of children and youth, or its representative, for the emancipated young adult's care and placement. The agreement shall stay in effect until one of the following occurs: (1) The emancipated young adult enrolled in the program notifies the department, or its representative, that they want to terminate the agreement. (2) The emancipated young adult becomes ineligible for the program. (B) In order to maintain Title IV-E eligibility for the emancipated young adult, both of the following apply: (1) Not later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of the voluntary participation agreement, the department or its representative must petition the court for, and obtain, a judicial determination that the emancipated young adult's best interest is served by continuing the care and placement with the department or its representative. (2) Not later than twelve months after the effective date of the voluntary participation agreement, and at least once every twelve months thereafter, the department or its representative must petition the court for, and obtain, a judicial determination that the department or its representative has made reasonable efforts to finalize a permanency plan to prepare the emancipated young adult for independence. Sec. 5101.1413 5180.4210. Notwithstanding section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted thereunder, the department of children and youth shall pay the full nonfederal share of payments made pursuant to section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code. No public children services agency shall be responsible for the cost of any payments made pursuant to section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.1414 5180.4211. (A) The department of children and youth shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 5101.1411 5180.428 to 5101.1413 5180.4210 of the Revised Code, including rules that do all of the following: (1) Allow an emancipated young adult described in division (A)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code who is directly receiving foster care payments, or on whose behalf such foster care payments are received, or an adopted young adult whose adoptive parents are receiving adoption assistance payments, to maintain eligibility while transitioning into, or out of, qualified employment or educational activities; (2) Require that a thirty-day notice of termination be given by the department to an emancipated young adult described in division (A)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code who is receiving foster care payments, or on whose behalf such foster care payments are received, or to a parent receiving adoption assistance payments for an adopted young adult described in division (B)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code, who is determined to be ineligible for payments; (3) Establish the scope of practice and training necessary for case managers and supervisors who care for emancipated young adults described in division (A)(1) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code who are receiving foster care payments, or on whose behalf such foster care payments are received, under section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of children and youth shall create an advisory council to evaluate and make recommendations for statewide implementation of sections 5101.1411 5180.428 and 5101.1412 5180.429 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.1415 5180.4212. The provisions of divisions (A) and (D) to (G) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code shall not apply if the person is eligible for temporary or permanent custody until age twenty-one pursuant to a dispositional order under sections 2151.353, 2151.414, and 2151.415 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.1416 5180.4213. (A) Not later than nine months after the effective date of this section , the The director of job and family services children and youth shall submit an amendment to the state plan required by 42 U.S.C. 671 to the United States secretary of health and human services to implement 42 U.S.C. 673(d) to provide kinship guardianship assistance under Title IV-E on behalf of a child to a relative who meets the following requirements: (1) The relative has cared for the eligible child pursuant to division (B) of this section as a foster caregiver as defined by section 5103.02 of the Revised Code for at least six consecutive months. (2) Both of the following apply: (a) A juvenile court issued an order granting legal custody of the child to the relative, or a probate court issued an order granting guardianship of the child to the relative, and the order is not a temporary court order. (b) The relative has committed to care for the child on a permanent basis. (3) The relative signs a kinship guardianship assistance agreement required by 42 U.S.C. 673. (B) A child is an eligible child for kinship guardianship assistance under this section if the following are met: (1) The child has been removed from his or her home pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement or as a result of a judicial determination to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child. (2) The child has been eligible for foster care maintenance payments under section 5101.141 5180.42 of the Revised Code while residing for at least six consecutive months in the home of a relative described in division (A) of this section. (3) Returning the child home or adoption of the child are not appropriate permanency options for the child. (4) The child demonstrates a strong attachment to the child's relative described in division (A) of this section and the relative has a strong commitment to caring permanently for the child. (5) With respect to a child who has attained fourteen years of age, the child has been consulted regarding the kinship guardianship arrangement. Sec. 5101.1417 5180.4214. The department of children and youth shall adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of sections 5101.1415180.42, 5101.14115180.428, and 5101.1416 5180.4213 of the Revised Code, and 42 U.S.C. 673(d) of the "Social Security Act," including rules that do all of the following: (A) Allow a kinship guardianship young adult described in division (C) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code on whose behalf kinship guardianship assistance is received, to maintain eligibility while transitioning into, or out of, qualified employment or educational activities; (B) Require that a thirty-day notice of termination be given by the department to a person receiving kinship guardianship assistance for a kinship guardianship young adult described in division (C) of section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code, who is determined to be ineligible for assistance. Sec. 5101.1418 5180.43. (A)(1) If, after a child's adoption is finalized, the department of children and youth considers the child to be in need of public care or protective services, the department may, to the extent state funds are available for this purpose, enter into an agreement with the child's adoptive parent under which the department may make post adoption special services subsidy payments on behalf of the child as needed when both of the following apply: (a) The child has a physical or developmental disability or mental or emotional condition that either: (i) Existed before the adoption petition was filed; or (ii) Developed after the adoption petition was filed and can be directly attributed to factors in the child's preadoption background, medical history, or biological family's background or medical history. (b) The department determines the expenses necessitated by the child's disability or condition are beyond the adoptive parent's economic resources. (2) Services for which the department may make post adoption special services subsidy payments on behalf of a child under this section shall include medical, surgical, psychiatric, psychological, and counseling services, including residential treatment. (3) The department shall establish clinical standards to evaluate a child's physical or developmental disability or mental or emotional condition and assess the child's need for services. (4) The total dollar value of post adoption special services subsidy payments made on a child's behalf shall not exceed ten thousand dollars in any fiscal year, unless the department determines that extraordinary circumstances exist that necessitate further funding of services for the child. Under such extraordinary circumstances, the value of the payments made on the child's behalf shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars in any fiscal year. (5) The adoptive parent or parents of a child who receives post adoption special services subsidy payments shall pay at least five per cent of the total cost of all services provided to the child; except that the department may waive this requirement if the gross annual income of the child's adoptive family is not more than two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guideline. (6) The department may use other sources of revenue to make post adoption special services subsidy payments, in addition to any state funds appropriated for that purpose. (7) The department may contract with another person to carry out any of the duties described in this section. (B) No payment shall be made on behalf of any person eighteen years of age or older beyond the end of the school year during which the person attains the age of eighteen or on behalf of a mentally or physically disabled person twenty-one years of age or older. (C) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code necessary to implement this section. The rules shall establish all of the following: (1) The application process for all forms of assistance provided under this section; (2) Standards for determining the children who qualify to receive assistance provided under this section; (3) The method of determining the amount, duration, and scope of services provided to a child; (4) The method of transitioning the post adoption special services subsidy program from public children services agencies to the department; (5) Any other rule, requirement, or procedure the department considers appropriate for the implementation of this section. (D) The department shall implement this section not later than July 1, 2022. Sec. 5101.15 5180.44. Within available funds the department of children and youth may reimburse counties in accordance with this section for a portion of the salaries paid to child welfare workers employed under section 5153.12 of the Revised Code. No county with a population of eighty thousand or less, according to the latest census accepted by the department as official, shall be entitled to reimbursement on the salaries of more than two child welfare workers, and no county with a population of more than eighty thousand, according to such census, shall be entitled to reimbursement on the salaries of more than two child welfare workers plus one additional child welfare worker for each one hundred thousand of population in excess of eighty thousand. The maximum reimbursement to which a county may be entitled on any child welfare worker shall be as follows: (A) Twenty-seven hundred dollars a year for a child welfare worker who is a graduate of an accredited high school, college, or university; (B) Thirty-three hundred dollars a year for a child welfare worker who has one year or more of graduate training in social work or a field which the department finds to be related to social work; (C) Thirty-nine hundred dollars a year for a child welfare worker who has completed two years of social work training. The salary of the executive director, designated in accordance with section 5153.10 of the Revised Code, shall be subject to reimbursement under this section, provided that the executive director qualifies under division (A), (B), or (C) of this section. No funds shall be allocated under this section until the director of children and youth has approved a plan of child welfare services for the county submitted by the public children services agency. Sec. 5101.19 5180.45. As used in sections 5101.19 5180.45 to 5101.194 5180.454 of the Revised Code: (A) "Adopted child" means a person who is less than eighteen years of age when the person becomes subject to a final order of adoption, an interlocutory order of adoption, or when the adoption is recognized by this state under section 3107.18 of the Revised Code. (B) "Adoption" includes an adoption arranged by an attorney, a public children services agency, private child placing agency, or a private noncustodial agency, an interstate adoption, or an international or foreign adoption. (C) "Adoptive parent" means the person or persons who obtain parental rights and responsibilities over an adopted child pursuant to a final order of adoption, an interlocutory order of adoption, or an adoption recognized by this state under section 3107.18 of the Revised Code. (D) "Casework services" means services performed or arranged by a public children services agency, private child placing agency, private noncustodial agency, or public entity with whom the department of children and youth has a Title IV-E subgrant agreement in effect, to manage the progress, provide supervision and protection of the child and the child's parent, guardian, or custodian. (E) "Foster caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5103.02 of the Revised Code. (F) "Qualified professional" means an individual that is, but not limited to, any one of the following: (1) Audiologist; (2) Orthopedist; (3) Physician; (4) Certified nurse practitioner; (5) Physician assistant; (6) Psychiatrist; (7) Psychologist; (8) School psychologist; (9) Licensed marriage and family therapist; (10) Speech and language pathologist; (11) Licensed independent social worker; (12) Licensed professional clinical counselor; (13) Licensed social worker who is under the direct supervision of a licensed independent social worker; (14) Licensed professional counselor who is under the direct supervision of a licensed professional clinical counselor. (G) "Special needs" means any of the following: (1) A developmental disability as defined in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code; (2) A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more of the major life activities; (3) Any physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more body systems; (4) Any mental or psychological disorder; (5) A medical condition causing distress, pain, dysfunction, or social problems as diagnosed by a qualified professional that results in ongoing medical treatment. Sec. 5101.191 5180.451. (A) The director of children and youth shall establish and administer the Ohio adoption grant program in accordance with sections 5101.19 5180.45 to 5101.194 5180.454 of the Revised Code. (B) The director shall provide one, but not both,either of the following one-time payments for an adopted child to the child's adoptive parent if the requirements of division (A) of section 5101.192 5180.452 of the Revised Code, but not division (B) of that section, are satisfied regarding the child: (1) Ten thousand dollars; (2) Fifteen thousand dollars, if the parent was a foster caregiver who cared for the child prior to adoption. (C) The director shall provide a one-time payment for an adopted child of twenty thousand dollars to the child's adoptive parent if the requirements of divisions (A) and (B) of section 5101.192 5180.452 of the Revised Code are satisfied regarding the child. (D) The payment described in divisions (B) and (C) of this section shall be provided to all eligible applicants to the extent state funds are available for this purpose. Sec. 5101.192 5180.452. (A) To receive a grant payment under division (B) of section 5101.191 5180.451 of the Revised Code, all of the following must be satisfied: (1) The adoptive parent has not previously received a grant payment from the Ohio adoption grant program for the adopted child for whom the parent is seeking payment. (2) The adoptive parent does not also currently claim an adoption tax credit pursuant to former section 5747.37 of the Revised Code for the adopted child for whom the parent is seeking payment. (3) The adoptive parent applies for the grant not later than one year after the final adoption order, interlocutory order of adoption, or recognition of the adoption by this state under section 3107.18 of the Revised Code for the adopted child for whom the grant payment is sought. (4) The adoption was not by a parent whose spouse is a biological or adoptive parent of the child prior to the adoption for which the payment is sought. (5) The adoption is finalized on or after January 1, 2023. (6) The adoptive parent was a resident of Ohio at the time the adoption was finalized. (B) To receive a grant payment under division (C) of section 5101.191 5180.451 of the Revised Code, both of the following must be satisfied: (1) The requirements of division (A) of this section must be satisfied. (2) A qualified professional who does not provide casework services to the adopted child diagnoses the child with one or more special needs in the professional's area of expertise prior to the final order of adoption, interlocutory order of adoption, or recognition of the adoption by this state under section 3107.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.193 5180.453. (A) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules to administer and implement the Ohio adoption grant program. The director, in consultation with the tax commissioner, shall also adopt rules authorizing the department to withhold and remit to the Internal Revenue Service federal income tax from grant payments under division (B) of section 5101.191 5180.451 of the Revised Code, provided such withholding is authorized under federal law or approved by the Internal Revenue Service. (B) No application fee shall be charged for the grant program. (C) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the director may require, as necessary to administer the Ohio adoption grant program, either or both of the following: (1) The submission Certified copies of any court or legal document necessary to prove a final order of adoption, an interlocutory order of adoption, or recognition of the adoption under section 3107.18 of the Revised Code; (2) Any department, agency, court, or division of the state, including the department of health, to provide any document related to the adoption. (D)(D)(1) No person shall knowingly produce or submit any false or misleading documentation or information to the department of children and youth in an effort to qualify for or obtain a grant from the Ohio adoption grant program. (2) Whoever violates division (D)(1) of this section is guilty of falsification in accordance with section 2921.13 of the Revised Code. (E) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained in a rule adopted under section 5101.193 5180.453 of the Revised Code is not subject to sections 121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.194 5180.454. Any document provided to the department of children and youth under division (C) of section 5101.193 5180.453 of the Revised Code remains a : (A) A public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code if it was a public record under that section before being provided to the department; (B) Confidential if it was confidential under any state or federal law before being provided to the department. Sec. 5101.85 5180.50. As used in sections 5101.851 5180.51 to 5101.856 5180.514 of the Revised Code, "kinship caregiver" means any of the following who is eighteen years of age or older and is caring for a child in place of the child's parents: (A) The following individuals related by blood or adoption to the child: (1) Grandparents, including grandparents with the prefix "great," "great-great," or "great-great-great"; (2) Siblings; (3) Aunts, uncles, nephews, and nieces, including such relatives with the prefix "great," "great-great," "grand," or "great-grand"; (4) First cousins and first cousins once removed. (B) Stepparents and stepsiblings of the child; (C) Spouses and former spouses of individuals named in divisions (A) and (B) of this section; (D) A legal guardian of the child; (E) A legal custodian of the child; (F) Any nonrelative adult that has a familiar and long-standing relationship or bond with the child or the family, which relationship or bond will ensure the child's social ties. Sec. 5101.851 5180.51. The department of children and youth shall establish a statewide kinship care navigator program to assist kinship caregivers who are seeking information regarding, or assistance obtaining, services and benefits available at the state and local level that address the needs of those caregivers residing in each county. The program shall provide to kinship caregivers information and referral services and assistance obtaining support services including the following: (A) Publicly funded child care; (B) Respite care; (C) Training related to caring for special needs children; (D) A toll-free telephone number that may be called to obtain basic information about the rights of, and services available to, kinship caregivers; (E) Legal services. Sec. 5101.853 5180.511. The director of children and youth shall divide the state into not less than five and not greater than twelve regions, for the kinship care navigator program under section 5101.851 5180.51 of the Revised Code. The director shall take the following into consideration when establishing the regions: (A) The population size; (B) The estimated number of kinship caregivers; (C) The expertise of kinship navigators; (D) Any other factor the director considers relevant. Sec. 5101.854 5180.512. The program in each kinship care navigator region established under section 5101.853 5180.511 of the Revised Code shall provide information and referral services and assistance in obtaining support services for kinship caregivers within its region. Sec. 5101.855 5180.513. The department of children and youth shall adopt rules to implement the kinship care navigator program. The rules shall be adopted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, except that rules governing fiscal and administrative matters related to implementation of the program are internal management rules and shall be adopted under section 111.15 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.856 5180.514. (A)(1) The kinship care navigator program shall be funded to the extent that general revenue funds have been appropriated by the general assembly for that purpose. (2) The director of children and youth shall take any action necessary to obtain funds available for the kinship care navigator program under Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 94 Stat. 501 (1980), 42 U.S.C. 670, as amended. (B) The department shall pay the full nonfederal share for the kinship care navigator program. No county department of job and family services or public children services agency shall be responsible for the cost of the program. Sec. 5101.802 5180.52. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Custodian," "guardian," and "minor child" have the same meanings as in section 5107.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Federal poverty guidelines" has the same meaning as in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code. (3) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. (B) Subject to division (E) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code, there is hereby created the kinship permanency incentive program to promote permanency for a minor child in the legal and physical custody of a kinship caregiver. The program shall provide an initial one-time incentive payment to the kinship caregiver to defray the costs of initial placement of the minor child in the kinship caregiver's home. The program may provide additional permanency incentive payments for the minor child at six-month intervals, based on the availability of funds. An eligible caregiver may receive a maximum of eight incentive payments per minor child. (C) A kinship caregiver may participate in the program if all of the following requirements are met: (1) The kinship caregiver applies to a public children services agency in accordance with the application process established in rules authorized by division (E) of this section; (2) Not earlier than July 1, 2005, a juvenile court issues an order granting legal custody to the kinship caregiver, or a probate court grants guardianship to the kinship caregiver, except that a temporary court order is not sufficient to meet this requirement; (3) The kinship caregiver is either the minor child's custodian or guardian; (4) The minor child resides with the kinship caregiver pursuant to a placement approval process established in rules authorized by division (E) of this section; (5) Excluding any income excluded under rules adopted under division (E) of this section, the gross income of the kinship caregiver's family, including the minor child, does not exceed three hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines. (6) The kinship caregiver is not receiving kinship guardianship assistance under Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 673(d), as amended, or the program described in section 5101.1411 5180.428 of the Revised Code or the program described in section 5153.163 of the Revised Code. (D) Public children services agencies shall make initial and ongoing eligibility determinations for the kinship permanency incentive program in accordance with rules authorized by division (E) of this section. The director of children and youth shall supervise public children services agencies' duties under this section. (E) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules under division (C) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code as necessary to implement the kinship permanency incentive program. The rules shall establish all of the following: (1) The application process for the program; (2) The placement approval process through which a minor child is placed with a kinship caregiver for the kinship caregiver to be eligible for the program; (3) The initial and ongoing eligibility determination process for the program, including the computation of income eligibility; (4) The amount of the incentive payments provided under the program; (5) The method by which the incentive payments are provided to a kinship caregiver. (F) The amendments made to this section by Am. Sub. H.B. 119 of the 127th general assembly shall not affect the eligibility of any kinship caregiver whose eligibility was established before June 30, 2007. Sec. 5101.88 5180.53. As used in sections 5101.881 5180.531 to 5101.8811 5180.536 of the Revised Code: (A) "Cost-of-living adjustment" has the same meaning as in section 5107.04 of the Revised Code. (B) "Kinship caregiver" has the same meaning as in section 5101.85 5180.50 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.881 5180.531. There is hereby established the kinship support program. The department of children and youth shall coordinate and administer the program to the extent funds are appropriated and allocated for this purpose. Sec. 5101.884 5180.532. The kinship support program shall provide financial payments to kinship caregivers who: (A) Receive placement of a child who is in the temporary or permanent custody of a public children services agency or under the Title IV-E agency with legal responsibility for the care and placement of the child; and (B) Do not have foster home certification under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.885 5180.533. Kinship support program payments under section 5101.884 5180.532 of the Revised Code shall be ten dollars and twenty cents per child, per day, to the extent funds are available. The department of children and youth shall increase the payment amount on January 1, 2022, and on the first day of each January thereafter by the cost-of-living adjustment made in the immediately preceding December. Sec. 5101.886 5180.534. Kinship support program payments shall be made to kinship caregivers as follows: (A) For not more than nine months after the effective date of this section, if a child has been placed with the kinship caregiver as of the effective date of this section; (B) For not more than than nine months after the placement of a child with the kinship caregiver, if the placement occurs during the nine-month period that begins on the effective date of this section; (C) For for not more than six months after the date of placement of a child with the kinship caregiver, if the placement occurs after the nine-month period that began on the effective date of this section. Sec. 5101.887 5180.535. Kinship support program payments under section 5101.884 5180.532 of the Revised Code shall cease when any of the following occur: (A) The kinship caregiver obtains foster home certification under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code. (B) In accordance with section 5101.886 5180.534 of the Revised Code; (C) Placement with the kinship caregiver is terminated or otherwise ceases. Sec. 5101.8811 5180.536. The director of children and youth may adopt rules for the administration of the kinship support program in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.8812 5180.56. Benefits and services provided under the kinship guardianship assistance program, extended kinship guardianship assistance program, kinship support program, and kinship permanency incentive program are inalienable whether by way of assignment, charge, or otherwise and exempt from execution, attachment, guardianshipgarnishment, and other like processes. Sec. 5101.889 5180.57. A kinship caregiver, on obtaining foster home certification under section 5103.03 of the Revised Code, shall receive foster care maintenance payments equal to the custodial agency rate as determined by the certifying agency, which is either the custodial agency, private child placing agency, or private non-custodial agency. Sec. 5101.34 5180.70. (A) There is hereby created in the department of children and youth the Ohio commission on fatherhood. The commission shall consist of the following members: (1)(a) Four members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house, not more than two of whom are members of the same political party. Two of the members must be from legislative districts that include a county or part of a county that is among the one-third of counties in this state with the highest number per capita of households headed by females. (b) Two members of the senate appointed by the president of the senate, each from a different political party. One of the members must be from a legislative district that includes a county or part of a county that is among the one-third of counties in this state with the highest number per capita of households headed by females. (2) The governor, or the governor's designee; (3) One representative of the judicial branch of government appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court; (4) The directors of health, children and youth, rehabilitation and correction, mental health and addiction services, youth services, and education and workforce, or their designees; (5) One representative of the Ohio family and children first cabinet council created under section 121.37 of the Revised Code appointed by the chairperson of the council; (6) Five representatives of the general public appointed by the governor. These members shall have extensive experience in issues related to fatherhood. (B) Members appointed to the Ohio commission on fatherhood shall serve two-year terms. A member appointed pursuant to division (A)(1) of this section shall serve on the commission until the end of the general assembly from which the member was appointed or until the member ceases to serve in the chamber of the general assembly in which the member serves at the time of appointment, whichever occurs first. The governor or the governor's designee shall serve on the commission until the governor ceases to be governor. The directors or their designees shall serve on the commission until they cease, or the director a designee represents ceases, to be director. Each member shall serve on the commission from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Members may be reappointed. Vacancies shall be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration date of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall serve on the commission for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue to serve on the commission subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor is appointed or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. Members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses. Sec. 5101.341 5180.701. (A) The Ohio commission on fatherhood shall elect a chairperson from among its members in every odd-numbered year. (B) The governor shall appoint an individual to serve as the commission's executive director. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and shall report to the director of children and youth or the director's designee. The governor shall fix the executive director's salary on the basis of the executive director's experience and the executive director's responsibilities and duties. The executive director shall be in the unclassified civil service. The department of children and youth shall provide staff and other support services as necessary for the commission to fulfill its duties. (C) The commission may accept gifts, grants, donations, contributions, benefits, and other funds from any public agency or private source to carry out any or all of the commission's duties. The funds shall be deposited into the Ohio commission on fatherhood fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. All gifts, grants, donations, contributions, benefits, and other funds received by the commission pursuant to this division shall be used solely to support the operations of the commission. Sec. 5101.342 5180.702. The Ohio commission on fatherhood shall do both of the following: (A) Organize a state summit on fatherhood every four years; (B) Prepare a report each year that does the following: (1) Identifies resources available to fund fatherhood-related programs and explores the creation of initiatives to do the following: (a) Build the parenting skills of fathers; (b) Provide employment-related services for low-income, noncustodial fathers; (c) Prevent premature fatherhood; (d) Provide services to fathers who are inmates in or have just been released from imprisonment in a state correctional institution, as defined in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code, or in any other detention facility, as defined in section 2921.01 of the Revised Code, so that they are able to maintain or reestablish their relationships with their families; (e) Reconcile fathers with their families; (f) Increase public awareness of the critical role fathers play. (2) Describes the commission's expectations for the outcomes of fatherhood-related programs and initiatives and the methods the commission uses for conducting annual measures of those outcomes; (3) Evaluates the number of fathers and children served and the number and types of additional services provided as a result of the recommendations made to the director of job and family services pursuant to section 5101.805 5180.704 of the Revised Code; (4) Evaluates the performance of the nonprofit community-based organizations that received grants under section 5180.706 of the Revised Code. The commission shall submit each report to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. (C) Pursuant to section 5101.805 5180.704 of the Revised Code, the commission may make recommendations to the director of job and family services children and youth regarding funding, approval, and implementation of fatherhood programs in this state that meet at least one of the four purposes of the temporary assistance for needy families block grant, as specified in 42 U.S.C. 601. (D) The portion of the report prepared pursuant to division divisions (B)(2) and (4) of this section shall be prepared by the commission in collaboration with the director of children and youth. (E) The commission shall submit each report prepared pursuant to division (B) of this section to the president and minority leader of the senate, speaker and minority leader of the house of representatives, governor, and chief justice of the supreme court. The first report is due not later than one year after the last of the initial appointments to the commission is made under section 5101.341 5180.701 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.343 5180.703. Sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code do not apply to the Ohio commission on fatherhood. Sec. 5101.805 5180.704. (A) Subject to division (E) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code, the Ohio commission on fatherhood, created under section 5101.34 5180.70 of the Revised Code, may make recommendations to the director of job and family services children and youth concerning the funding, approval, and implementation of fatherhood programs in this state that meet at least one of the four purposes of the temporary assistance for needy families block grant, as specified in 42 U.S.C. 601. (B) The department of job and family services children and youth may provide funding under this section to government entities and, to the extent permitted by federal law, private, not-for-profit entities with which the department enters into agreements under division (B)(4) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5180.705. (A) The department of children and youth, through the Ohio commission on fatherhood, must contract for the development and implementation of the responsible fatherhood initiative (RFI). The initiative must provide an opportunity for every father in the state to obtain information and inspiration that will motivate and enable him to enhance his abilities as a father, recognizing that some fathers have greater challenges than others and would benefit from greater support. (B) The initiative must include the following: (1) A statewide media campaign that increases the awareness of the importance of fathers being involved in their children's lives. The media campaign may include print, television, digital, and social media elements and appearances by and involvement from public figures and influencers. (2) Resources and information for fathers and father figures to increase engagement and involvement in their children's lives. (C)(1) The department must contract for the development and implementation of the initiative with a nonprofit (RFI manager) organization that has both of the following: (a) A history of focusing on responsible fatherhood, including providing online resources to fathers, and engaging fathers, father figures, and children through community-based and school-based events to encourage responsible fatherhood; (b) The organizational capacity to manage a statewide initiative and successfully carry out the requirements of this section. (2) The organization must collaborate with other relevant government agencies and private organizations to develop and implement the initiative. Those agencies and organizations must collaborate with the contracted organization to carry out the initiative. (3) The RFI manager must be solely responsible for developing, collaborating, and managing the RFI media campaign and the resources, content, and information for fathers. Sec. 5180.706. (A) The department of children and youth, through the Ohio commission on fatherhood, must award grants to eligible nonprofit organizations, as described in section 5180.705 of the Revised Code, to address the needs of fathers. The department must award the following types of grants: (1) Grants that comprehensively address the needs of fathers, such as assisting them in finding employment, managing child support obligations, transitioning from a period of incarceration, accessing health care, understanding child development, and enhancing parenting skills. Services provided must be tailored to the needs of the father being served. Case management services must be provided by the grant recipient, either directly or by subcontract, to the fathers who are served by the grants under this section. If the father receiving case management services through a grant awarded under this section has a child receiving services from a public children services agency because the child is the subject of an abuse, neglect, or dependency proceeding, the case management services may be coordinated. (2) Grants that provide evidence-based parenting education specifically for fathers. The grants under this section must not require case management services. (B) The department must prioritize applicants for a grant based on the following: (1) Need in a geographic area and the population to be served by the grant as indicated by the following: (a) Unemployment rates; (b) Incarceration rates; (c) Housing instability; (d) The number of single-parent households; (e) The number of public benefit recipients; (f) Graduation rates; (g) Levels of academic achievement. (2) Whether an applicant has a primary mission of, or a history of a significant focus on and effective work towards, addressing the needs of men in their role as fathers; (3) Applicant current and historical involvement in the community being served; (4) Applicant commitment and capability to employ competent staff who can effectively engage with the fathers being served, including individuals who share similar backgrounds as the fathers being served; (5) The number of individuals the applicant plans to serve through the grant and the projected costs for the program; (6) Applicant organizational capacity to effectively meet the requirements of the grant and to deliver the programs proposed by the applicant. The department may offer technical assistance to applicants and grant recipients that have lower organizational capacity if they have, or their leadership has, significant experience serving fathers. (C) Grants are to be awarded for not more than three years, with subsequent funding contingent on compliance with grant requirements and adequate performance. Grant recipients must submit reports to the department in a format and at intervals, which must be at least annually, prescribed by the department. The RFI manager contracted with under section 5180.705 of the Revised Code may be a recipient of grants under this section. Sec. 5180.707. (A) A nonprofit organization that receives a grant under section 5180.706 of the Revised Code must address the unique needs of the fathers of children who are served by the organization. The organization must do all of the following: (1) Conduct an initial assessment of its engagement with those fathers and its provision of and referral to father-oriented services; (2) Create an action plan to address any gaps identified through the assessment and implement the action plan; (3) Engage with the Ohio commission on fatherhood to build relationships with fathers, help identify their needs, assist them in accessing services, and communicate with the organization about the challenges faced by these fathers and how to appropriately meet their unique needs. (B) The Ohio commission on fatherhood must annually review how all recipient organizations are meeting the needs of fathers, including how the organizations are helping fathers establish positive, stable relationships with their children and assisting fathers in receiving needed services. All recipient organizations must provide any relevant information on how they are meeting the needs of these fathers to the commission. The information must be included in the annual report required under section 5180.702 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.804 5180.71. (A) Subject to division (E) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code, there is hereby created the Ohio parenting and pregnancy program to provide services for pregnant women and parents or other relatives caring for children twelve months of age or younger that do both of the following: (1) Promote childbirth, parenting, and alternatives to abortion; (2) Meet one or more of the four purposes of the temporary assistance for needy families block grant as specified in 42 U.S.C. 601. (B) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department of children and youth may provide funds under the program to entities with which the department enters into agreements under division (B)(3) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code. In accordance with criteria the department develops, the department may solicit proposals from entities seeking to provide services under the program. The department may enter into an agreement with an entity only if it meets all of the following conditions: (1) Is a private, not-for-profit entity; (2) Is an entity whose primary purpose is to promote childbirth, rather than abortion, through counseling and other services, including parenting and adoption support; (3) Provides services to pregnant women and parents or other relatives caring for children twelve months of age or younger, including clothing, counseling, diapers, food, furniture, health care, parenting classes, postpartum recovery, shelter, and any other supportive services, programs, or related outreach; (4) Does not charge pregnant women and parents or other relatives caring for children twelve months of age or younger a fee for any services received; (5) Is not involved in or associated with any abortion activities, including providing abortion counseling or referrals to abortion clinics, performing abortion-related medical procedures, or engaging in pro-abortion advertising; (6) Does not discriminate in its provision of services on the basis of race, religion, color, age, marital status, national origin, disability, or gender. (C) An entity that has entered into an agreement with the department under division (B)(3) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code may enter into a subcontract with another entity under which the other entity provides all or part of the services described in division (B)(3) of this section. A subcontract may be entered into with another entity only if that entity meets all of the following conditions: (1) Is a private, not-for-profit entity; (2) Is physically and financially separate from any entity, or component of an entity, that engages in abortion activities; (3) Is not involved in or associated with any abortion activities, including providing abortion counseling or referrals to abortion clinics, performing abortion-related medical procedures, or engaging in pro-abortion advertising. (D) The director of children and youth shall adopt rules under division (C) of section 5101.801 of the Revised Code as necessary to implement the Ohio parenting and pregnancy program. Sec. 3701.65 5180.72. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "choose life" fund. The fund shall consist of the contributions that are paid to the registrar of motor vehicles by applicants who voluntarily elect to obtain "choose life" license plates pursuant to section 4503.91 of the Revised Code and any money returned to the fund under division (E)(1)(d) of this section. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. (B)(1) At least annually, the director of health children and youth shall distribute the money in the fund to any private, nonprofit organization that is eligible to receive funds under this section and that applies for funding under division (C) of this section. (2) The director shall allocate the funds to each county in proportion to the number of "choose life" license plates issued during the preceding year to vehicles registered in each county. The director shall distribute funds allocated for a county as follows: (a) To one or more eligible organizations located within the county; (b) If no eligible organization located within the county applies for funding, to one or more eligible organizations located in contiguous counties; (c) If no eligible organization located within the county or a contiguous county applies for funding, to one or more eligible organizations within any other county. (3) The director shall ensure that any funds allocated for a county are distributed equally among eligible organizations that apply for funding within the county. (C) Any organization seeking funds under this section annually shall apply for distribution of the funds based on the county in which the organization is located. An organization also may apply for funding in a county in which it is not located if it demonstrates that it provides services for pregnant women residing in that county. The director shall develop an application form and may determine the schedule and procedures that an organization shall follow when annually applying for funds. The application shall inform the applicant of the conditions for receiving and using funds under division (E) of this section. The application shall require evidence that the organization meets all of the following requirements: (1) Is a private, nonprofit organization; (2) Is committed to counseling pregnant women about the option of adoption; (3) Provides services within the state to pregnant women who are planning to place their children for adoption, including counseling and meeting the material needs of the women; (4) Does not charge women for any services received; (5) Is not involved or associated with any abortion activities, including counseling for or referrals to abortion clinics, providing medical abortion-related procedures, or pro-abortion advertising; (6) Does not discriminate in its provision of any services on the basis of race, religion, color, age, marital status, national origin, disability, gender, or age; (7) If the organization is applying for funding in a county in which it is not located, provides services for pregnant women residing in that county. (D) The director shall not distribute funds to an organization that does not provide verifiable evidence of the requirements specified in the application under division (C) of this section and shall not provide additional funds to any organization that fails to comply with division (E) of this section in regard to its previous receipt of funds under this section. (E)(1) An organization receiving funds under this section shall do all of the following: (a) Use not more than sixty per cent of the funds distributed to it for the material needs of pregnant women who are planning to place their children for adoption or for infants awaiting placement with adoptive parents, including clothing, housing, medical care, food, utilities, and transportation; (b) Use not more than forty per cent of the funds distributed to it for counseling, training, or advertising; (c) Not use any of the funds distributed to it for administrative expenses, legal expenses, or capital expenditures; (d) Annually return to the fund created under division (A) of this section any unused money that exceeds ten per cent of the money distributed to the organization. (2) The organization annually shall submit to the director an audited financial statement verifying its compliance with division (E)(1) of this section. (F) The director, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules to implement this section. It is not the intent of the general assembly that the department create a new position within the department to implement and administer this section. It is the intent of the general assembly that the implementation and administration of this section be accomplished by existing department personnel. (G) If funds that have been allocated to a county for any previous year have not been distributed to one or more eligible organizations, the director may distribute those funds in accordance with this section. Sec. 5180.40 5180.73. To increase participation in evidence-based parenting education programs, the department of children and youth shall ensure state departments, agencies, and boards have information to communicate with parents, caregivers, and child care providers about such programs to promote their benefits, including their parenting, caregiving, and educational resources. Sec. 5180.99. (A) Whoever violates division (B) of section 5180.275 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the second degree. (B) Whoever violates section 5180.403 of the Revised Code is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. Sec. 5303.34. (A) As used in this section, "bad faith" means a trespass committed with either of the following: (1) Actual knowledge that the entry onto, and the extraction of minerals from, the property was unlawful; (2) Willful or wanton disregard for the lawful property or mineral rights of another person and with the intent of depriving the lawful owner of the owner's minerals. "Bad faith" shall not be presumed and does not include an entry onto property based on a reasonable belief that such entry, or the extraction occurring after such entry, was lawful. (B) In an action brought by a person who owns mineral rights against any person who trespasses on the land containing such minerals and unlawfully extracts, exploits, or otherwise converts the minerals, damages shall be equal to one of the following: (1) In the case of minerals, such as coal, stone, or ore, that are extracted by underground or surface mining methods, the revenue received from the sale of the minerals measured at the mouth of the mine, less the cost of extraction, less any sums previously paid; (2) In the case of minerals, such as hydrocarbons, in liquid or gaseous states that are extracted by drilling, the revenue received from the sale of such minerals measured at the wellhead, less the cost of extraction, less any sums previously paid. (C) When calculating damages under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, if the person who trespassed is determined to have trespassed on the land in bad faith, no reduction for the cost of extraction shall be allowed, and the damaged party is entitled to the full revenue received from the sale of the minerals measured at the mouth of the mine or at the wellhead, as applicable, regardless of extraction method, less any sums previously paid. The damaged party is not entitled to punitive damages. Sec. 5310.06. All money received by the clerk of the probate court or the clerk of the court of common pleas under section 5310.05 of the Revised Code shall be paid at least once a month to the treasurer of state, who shall, with the advice and approval of the secretary of state and the auditor of state, invest, reinvest, and keep invested such funds in bonds and securities of the United States, or of this state, or of any county, township, district, or municipal corporation of this state, or in approved mortgages on incomeproducing income-producing lands that are registered, provided that no loan shall be made by mortgage on any land which is not assessed, at the latest general assessment, for at least twice the amount of the loan, exclusive of improvements. Sec. 5310.47. Abolition of land registration in a county does not bar either of the following: (A) A a person who is deprived of land, any interest therein, or any encumbrance thereon as the result of a decree obtained by fraud in a case relating to registered land or to the initial registration of land from filing a complaint to open up and review the case as provided in section 5309.23 or 5309.81 of the Revised Code; (B) A person who has a cause of action under section 5310.07 of the Revised Code from commencing and prosecuting an action as provided in that section, subject to the period of limitation provided in section 5310.12 of the Revised Code. If judgment is rendered for the plaintiff in such an action, recovery shall be had as provided in sections 5310.09 to 5310.11 and 5310.13 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5323.02. (A) An owner of residential rental property shall file with the county auditor of the county in which the property is located the following information: (1) The name, address, and telephone number of the owner; (2) If the residential rental property is owned by a trust, business trust, estate, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, association, corporation, or any other business entity, the name, address, and telephone number of the following: (a) A trustee, in the case of a trust or business trust; (b) The executor or administrator, in the case of an estate; (c) A general partner, in the case of a partnership or a limited partnership; (d) A member, manager, or officer, in the case of a limited liability company; (e) An associate, in the case of an association; (f) An officer, in the case of a corporation; (g) A member, manager, or officer, in the case of any other business entity. (3) The street address and permanent parcel number of the residential rental property. (B) The information required under division (A) of this section shall be filed and maintained on the tax list or the real property record. (C) An owner of residential rental property shall update the information required under division (A) of this section within sixty days after any change in the information occurs. (D) The county auditor shall provide an owner of residential rental property located in a county that has a population of more than two hundred thousand according to the most recent decennial census with notice pursuant to division (B) of section 323.131 of the Revised Code of the requirement to file the information required under division (A) of this section and the requirement to update that information under division (C) of this section. (E) The owner of residential real property shall comply with the requirements under divisions (A) and (C) of this section within sixty days after receiving the notice provided under division (D) of this section, division (D)(E) of section 319.202, or division (B) of section 323.131 of the Revised Code. (F) Any agent designated by the owner to manage the property on the owner's behalf may file or update any information, or do anything otherwise required by this section, on the owner's behalf. Sec. 5501.91. (A) As used in this section, "port authority" means a port authority created under Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby established the Ohio maritime assistance program, which the department of transportation shall administer. Under the program, a port authority may apply to the department for a grant to be used as prescribed in division (D) of this section. In order to be eligible for a grant under this section, a port authority is required to meet either of the following requirements: (1) At the time of application for a grant, the port authority owns or is the co-applicant with the owner of an active marine cargo terminal located on one of the following: (a) The shore of Lake Erie or the Ohio river or on ; (b) On a Lake Erie tributary; (c) On an Ohio river tributary. (2) At the time of application for a grant, the port authority is located in, or has jurisdiction within, a federally qualified opportunity zone and the federally qualified opportunity zone has an active marine cargo terminal with a stevedoring operation that is located on the shore of Lake Erie or the Ohio river. (C)(1) Every applicant for a grant shall submit with its application a written business justification for the investment that indicates the operational and market need for the project in a form the director of transportation shall prescribe. (2) The department shall evaluate all grant applications according to the following criteria: (a) The degree to which the proposed project will increase the efficiency or capacity of maritime cargo terminal operations; (b) Whether the project will result in the handling of new types of cargo or an increase in cargo volume; (c) Whether the project will meet an identified supply chain need or benefit Ohio firms that export goods to foreign markets, or import goods to Ohio for use in manufacturing or for value-added distribution; (d) Any other criteria the director determines to be appropriate. (3) If a grant application does not meet the criteria specified in divisions (C)(2)(b) and (c) of this section, an applicant is not eligible for a grant under this section. (D) A port authority shall use a grant awarded under this section only for any of the following purposes: (1) Land acquisition and site development for marine cargo terminal and associated uses, including demolition and environmental remediation; (2) Construction of wharves, quay walls, bulkheads, jetties, revetments, breakwaters, shipping channels, dredge disposal facilities, projects for the beneficial use of dredge material, and other structures and improvements directly related to maritime commerce and harbor infrastructure; (3) Construction and repair of warehouses, transit sheds, railroad tracks, roadways, gates and gatehouses, fencing, bridges, offices, shipyards, and other improvements needed for marine cargo terminal and associated uses, including shipyards; (4) Acquisition of cargo handling equipment, including mobile shore cranes, stationary cranes, tow motors, fork lifts, yard tractors, craneways, conveyor and bulk material handling equipment, and all types of ship loading and unloading equipment; (5) Planning and design services and other services associated with construction. (E) A port authority shall pay a matching amount of at least one dollar for each grant dollar received for the proposed project. (F) The director of transportation shall govern the program established under this section, including the grant application, evaluation, award processes, and how the grant money may be spent by a port authority. Sec. 5502.262. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Administrator" means the superintendent, principal, chief administrative officer, or other person having supervisory authority of any of the following: (a) A city, exempted village, local, or joint vocational school district; (b) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, as required through reference in division (A)(11)(d) of section 3314.03 of the Revised Code; (c) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, as required through reference in section 3326.11 of the Revised Code; (d) A college-preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code; (e) A district or school operating a career-technical education program approved by the department of education and workforce under section 3317.161 of the Revised Code; (f) A chartered nonpublic school; (g) An educational service center; (h) A preschool program or school-age child care program licensed by the department of education and workforce; (i) Any other facility that primarily provides educational services to children subject to regulation by the department of education and workforce. (2) "Emergency management test" means a regularly scheduled drill, exercise, or activity designed to assess and evaluate an emergency management plan under this section. (3) "Building" means any school, school building, facility, program, or center. (4) "Regional mobile training officer" means the regional mobile training officer appointed under section 5502.70 of the Revised Code for the region in which a district, school, center, program, or facility is located. (B)(1) Each administrator shall develop and adopt a comprehensive emergency management plan, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, for each building under the administrator's control. The administrator shall examine the environmental conditions and operations of each building to determine potential hazards to student and staff safety and shall propose operating changes to promote the prevention of potentially dangerous problems and circumstances. In developing the plan for each building, the administrator shall involve community law enforcement and safety officials, parents of students who are assigned to the building, and teachers and nonteaching employees who are assigned to the building. The administrator may involve the regional mobile training officer in the development of the plan. The administrator shall incorporate remediation strategies into the plan for any building where documented safety problems have occurred. (2) Each administrator shall also incorporate into the emergency management plan adopted under division (B)(1) of this section all of the following: (a) A protocol for addressing serious threats to the safety of property, students, employees, or administrators; (b) A protocol for responding to any emergency events that occur and compromise the safety of property, students, employees, or administrators. This protocol shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: (i) A floor plan that is unique to each floor of the building; (ii) A site plan that includes all building property and surrounding property; (iii) An emergency contact information sheet. (c) A threat assessment plan developed as prescribed in section 5502.263 of the Revised Code. A building may use the model plan developed by the department of public safety under that section; (d) A protocol for school threat assessment teams established under section 3313.669 of the Revised Code; (e) A protocol that addresses student use of cellular telephones during an active threat or emergency. (3) Each protocol described in division (B) of this section shall include procedures determined to be appropriate by the administrator for responding to threats and emergency events, respectively, including such things as notification of appropriate law enforcement personnel, calling upon specified emergency response personnel for assistance, and informing parents of affected students. Prior to the opening day of each school year, the administrator shall inform each student or child enrolled in the school and the student's or child's parent of the parental notification procedures included in the protocol. (4) Each administrator shall keep a copy of the emergency management plan adopted pursuant to this section in a secure place. (C)(1) The administrator shall submit to the director of public safety, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, an electronic copy of the emergency management plan prescribed by division (B) of this section not less than once every three years, whenever a major modification to the building requires changes in the procedures outlined in the plan, and whenever information on the emergency contact information sheet changes. (2) The administrator also shall file a copy of the plan with each law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the school building and, upon request, to any of the following: (a) The fire department that serves the political subdivision in which the building is located; (b) The emergency medical service organization that serves the political subdivision in which the building is located; (c) The county emergency management agency for the county in which the building is located; (d) The regional mobile training officer. (3) Upon receipt of an emergency management plan, the director shall post the information on the contact and information management system and submit the information in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, to the attorney general, who shall post that information on the Ohio law enforcement gateway or its successor. (4) Any department or entity to which copies of an emergency management plan are filed under this section shall keep the copies in a secure place. (D)(1) Not later than the first day of September of each year, each administrator shall review the emergency management plan and certify to the director that the plan is current and accurate. (2) Anytime that an administrator updates the emergency management plan pursuant to division (C)(1) of this section, the administrator shall file copies, not later than the tenth day after the revision is adopted and in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section, to the director and to any entity with which the administrator filed a copy under division (C)(2) of this section. (E) Each administrator shall do both of the following: (1) Prepare and conduct at least one annual emergency management test, as defined in division (A)(2) of this section, in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to division (F) of this section; (2) Grant access to each building under the control of the administrator to law enforcement personnel and to entities described in division (C)(2) of this section, to enable the personnel and entities to hold training sessions for responding to threats and emergency events affecting the building, provided that the access occurs outside of student instructional hours and the administrator, or the administrator's designee, is present in the building during the training sessions. (F) The director of public safety, in consultation with representatives from the education community and in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, shall adopt rules regarding emergency management plans under this section, including the content of the plans and procedures for filing the plans. The rules shall specify that plans and information required under division (B) of this section be submitted on standardized forms developed by the director for such purpose. The rules shall also specify the requirements and procedures for emergency management tests conducted pursuant to division (E)(1) of this section. Failure to comply with the rules may result in discipline pursuant to section 3319.31 of the Revised Code or any other action against the administrator as prescribed by rule. (G) Division (B) of section 3319.31 of the Revised Code applies to any administrator who is subject to the requirements of this section and is not exempt under division (H) of this section and who is an applicant for a license or holds a license from the state board of education pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) The director may exempt any administrator from the requirements of this section, if the director determines that the requirements do not otherwise apply to a building or buildings under the control of that administrator. (2) The director shall exempt from the requirements of this section the administrator of an online learning school, established under section 3302.42 of the Revised Code, unless students of that school participate in in-person instruction or assessments at a location that is not covered by an existing emergency management plan, developed under this section as of December 14, 2021. (I) Copies of the emergency management plan, including all records related to the plan, emergency management tests, and information required under division (B) of this section are security records and are not public records pursuant to section 149.433 of the Revised Code. In addition, the information posted to the contact and information management system, pursuant to division (C)(3)(b) of this section, is exempt from public disclosure or release in accordance with sections 149.43, 149.433, and 5502.03 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding section 149.433 of the Revised Code, a floor plan filed with the attorney general pursuant to this section is not a public record to the extent it is a record kept by the attorney general. Sec. 5502.29. (A) As used in this section, "political subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 5502.41 of the Revised Code. (B) Political subdivisions, in collaboration with other public and private agencies within this state, may develop mutual assistance or aid agreements for reciprocal emergency management assistance or aid for purposes of preparing for, responding to, and recovering from an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources. In time of any incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources, each political subdivision may render assistance in accordance with such mutual assistance or aid agreements. Such mutual assistance or aid agreements shall not in any manner relieve the chief elected official of any political subdivision of the responsibility for providing emergency management. (C) Political subdivisions, in collaboration with political subdivisions in adjacent states, may develop agreements for mutual assistance or aid for purposes of preparing for, responding to, and recovering from an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources. Each political subdivision may render assistance in accordance with the mutual assistance or aid agreements. A mutual assistance or aid agreement with political subdivisions in adjacent states shall be approved by the chief elected officials of the agreeing political subdivisions or their designees and shall be prepared in accordance with the laws, regulations, ordinances, and resolutions applicable to the agreeing political subdivisions. (D) When engaged in preparation for, response to, or recovery from an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources, and in accordance with the applicable mutual assistance or aid agreement, personnel from political subdivisions outside this state shall be permitted to provide services within this state in accordance with this section and the terms of the mutual assistance or aid agreement. (E) Personnel of the responding political subdivision shall continue under their local command and control structure, but shall be under the operational control of the appropriate officials within the incident management system of the political subdivision receiving the assistance or aid. (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a private company or its employees from participating in the provision of mutual assistance or aid, if the responding political subdivision approves the participation and the contract between the political subdivision and the private company permits the participation. (G) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit personnel of political subdivisions in this state from responding to a request for mutual assistance or aid resulting from an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources, when the personnel are responding as part of a regional response team that is under the operational control of the incident command structure. (H) Whenever a person from outside this state who is subject to a mutual assistance or aid agreement authorized by this section holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state evidencing qualification for professional, mechanical, or other skills, such license, certificate, or other permit shall be recognized by this state as authorizing the person to render assistance or aid in this state involving such skill to meet the request for assistance or aid, so long as the person is acting within the scope of the person's license, certificate, or other permit. (I) Personnel (1) Except as provided in division (I)(2) of this section, personnel rendering assistance or aid pursuant to a mutual assistance or aid agreement authorized by this section remain employees or agents of their respective political subdivisions, including for purposes of tort liability and immunity from tort liability, and nothing in this section or any mutual assistance or aid agreement entered into pursuant to this section creates an employment relationship between the political subdivision requesting aid and the employees or agents of the political subdivision rendering aid. (2) For purposes of Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code, personnel rendering intrastate mutual assistance or aid outside their respective political subdivisions pursuant to a mutual assistance or aid agreement authorized by this section shall be considered employees of the emergency management agency established within the department of public safety while rendering such intrastate mutual assistance or aid. (J) Responding political subdivisions and the personnel of that political subdivision, while rendering assistance or aid under this section, or while in route to or from rendering assistance or aid under this section, in a political subdivision in an adjacent state under an agreement authorized by this section, shall be deemed to be exercising governmental functions as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, shall have the defenses to and immunities from civil liability provided in sections 2744.02 and 2744.03 of the Revised Code, and shall be entitled to all applicable limitations on recoverable damages under section 2744.05 of the Revised Code. (K) All pension, disability, death benefits, workers' compensation, and other benefits enjoyed by personnel rendering interstate or intrastate mutual assistance or aid shall extend to the services they perform outside their respective political subdivisions to the same extent as while acting within the boundaries of the political subdivisions, and, subject to division (I)(2) of this section, personnel are entitled to the rights and benefits of Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code to the same extent as while performing service within the boundaries of the political subdivisions. Sec. 5502.30. (A) The state, any political subdivision, any municipal agency, any emergency management volunteer, another state, or an emergency management agency thereof or of the federal government or of another country or province or subdivision thereof performing emergency management services in this state pursuant to an arrangement, agreement, or compact for mutual aid and assistance, or any agency, member, agent, or representative of any of them, or any individual, partnership, corporation, association, trustee, or receiver, or any of the agents thereof, in good faith carrying out, complying with, or attempting to comply with any state or federal law or any arrangement, agreement, or compact for mutual aid and assistance, or any order issued by federal or state military authorities relating to emergency management, is not liable for any injury to or death of persons or damage to property as the result thereof during training periods, test periods, practice periods, or other emergency management operations, or false alerts, as well as during any hazard, actual or imminent, and subsequent to the same except in cases of willful misconduct. As used in this division, "emergency management volunteer" means only an individual who is authorized to assist any agency performing emergency management during a hazard. (B) The state, any political subdivision, any individual, partnership, corporation, association, trustee, or receiver, or any agent, agency, representative, officer, or employee of any of them that owns, maintains, occupies, operates, or controls all or part of any building, structure, or premises shall not be liable for any injury or death sustained by any person or damage caused to any property while that person or property is in the building, structure, or premises for duty, training, or shelter purposes during a hazard, drill, test, or false warning, or is entering therein for such purposes or departing therefrom, or for any injury, death, or property damage as the result of any condition in or on the building, structure, or premises or of any act or omission with respect thereto, except a willful act intended to cause injury or damage. (C) Any person deployed by the emergency management agency to render aid in another state pursuant to section 5502.40 of the Revised Code, including a full-time or part-time paid employee of a political subdivision of this state or a nonprofit organization, a paid or unpaid volunteer of a for-profit or nonprofit organization, and a health care worker of a for-profit or nonprofit organization, that is rendering aid in another state is considered an officer or employee of the state for purposes of the immunity established under Article VI of the emergency management assistance compact enacted under section 5502.40 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this division entitles an employee of a political subdivision any person deployed pursuant to section 5502.40 of the Revised Code to any other right or benefit of a state officer or employee. (D) This section does not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which the person may be entitled under Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code or any pension law, nor the rights of any person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress or under any law of this state. Sec. 5502.41. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Chief executive of a participating political subdivision" means the elected chief executive of a participating political subdivision or, if the political subdivision does not have an elected chief executive, a member of the political subdivision's governing body or an employee of the political subdivision appointed by the governing body's members to be its representative for purposes of the intrastate mutual aid program created pursuant to this section. (2) "Countywide emergency management agency" means a countywide emergency management agency established under section 5502.26 of the Revised Code. (3) "Emergency" means any period during which the congress of the United States, a chief executive as defined in section 5502.21 of the Revised Code, or a chief executive of a participating political subdivision has declared or proclaimed that an emergency exists. (4) "Participating political subdivision" means each political subdivision in this state except a political subdivision that enacts or adopts, by appropriate legislation, ordinance, resolution, rule, bylaw, or regulation signed by its chief executive, a decision not to participate in the intrastate mutual aid program created by this section and that provides a copy of the legislation, ordinance, resolution, rule, bylaw, or regulation to the state emergency management agency and to the countywide emergency management agency, regional authority for emergency management, or program for emergency management within the political subdivision. (5) "Planned event" means a scheduled nonemergency activity as defined by the national incident management system adopted under section 5502.28 of the Revised Code as the state's standard procedure for incident management. "Planned event" includes, but is not limited to, a sporting event, concert, or parade. (6) "Political subdivision" or "subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code and also includes a health district established under Chapter 3709. of the Revised Code. (7) "Program for emergency management within a political subdivision" means a program for emergency management created by a political subdivision under section 5502.271 of the Revised Code. (8) "Regional authority for emergency management" means a regional authority for emergency management established under section 5502.27 of the Revised Code. (9) "Regional response team" means a group of persons from participating political subdivisions who provide mutual assistance or aid in preparation for, response to, or recovery from an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources. "Regional response team" includes, but is not limited to, an incident management team, hazardous materials response team, water rescue team, bomb team, or search and rescue team. (B) There is hereby created the intrastate mutual aid program to be known as "the intrastate mutual aid compact" to complement existing mutual aid agreements. The program shall have two purposes: (1) Provide for mutual assistance or aid among the participating political subdivisions for purposes of preparing for, responding to, and recovering from an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources; (2) Establish a method by which a participating political subdivision may seek assistance or aid that resolves many of the common issues facing political subdivisions before, during, and after an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources, and that ensures, to the extent possible, eligibility for available state and federal disaster assistance or other funding. (C) Each countywide emergency management agency, regional authority for emergency management, and program for emergency management within a political subdivision, in coordination with all departments, divisions, boards, commissions, agencies, and other instrumentalities within that political subdivision, shall establish procedures or plans that, to the extent possible, accomplish both of the following: (1) Identify hazards that potentially could affect the participating political subdivisions served by that agency, authority, or program; (2) Identify and inventory the current services, equipment, supplies, personnel, and other resources related to the preparedness, response, and recovery activities of the participating political subdivisions served by that agency, authority, or program. (D)(1) The executive director of the state emergency management agency shall coordinate with the countywide emergency management agencies, regional authorities for emergency management, and programs for emergency management within a political subdivision in identifying and formulating appropriate procedures or plans to resolve resource shortfalls. (2) During and after the formulation of the procedures or plans to resolve resource shortfalls, there shall be ongoing consultation and coordination among the executive director of the state emergency management agency; the countywide emergency management agencies, regional authorities for emergency management, and programs for emergency management within a political subdivision; and all departments, divisions, boards, commissions, agencies, and other instrumentalities of, and having emergency response functions within, each participating political subdivision, regarding this section, local procedures and plans, and the resolution of the resource shortfalls. (E)(1) A participating political subdivision that is impacted by an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources, may request mutual assistance or aid by doing either of the following: (a) Declaring a state of emergency and issuing a request for assistance or aid from any other participating political subdivision; (b) Issuing to another participating political subdivision a verbal or written request for assistance or aid. If the request is made verbally, a written confirmation of the request shall be made not later than seventy-two hours after the verbal request is made. (2) Requests for assistance or aid made under division (E)(1) of this section shall be made through the emergency management agency of a participating political subdivision or an official designated by the chief executive of the participating political subdivision from which the assistance or aid is requested and shall provide the following information: (a) A description of the incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency; (b) A description of the assistance or aid needed; (c) An estimate of the length of time the assistance or aid will be needed; (d) The specific place and time for staging of the assistance or aid and a point of contact at that location. (F) A participating political subdivision shall provide assistance or aid to another participating political subdivision that is impacted by an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources. The provision of the assistance or aid is subject to the following conditions: (1) The responding political subdivision may withhold resources necessary to provide for its own protection. (2) Personnel of the responding political subdivision shall continue under their local command and control structure, but shall be under the operational control of the appropriate officials within the incident management system of the participating political subdivision receiving assistance or aid. (3) Responding law enforcement officers acting pursuant to this section have the same authority to enforce the law as when acting within the territory of their regular employment. (4) For purposes of Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code, personnel of the responding political subdivision shall be considered employees of the emergency management agency established within the department of public safety while rendering mutual assistance or aid to the participating political subdivision. (G)(1) Nothing in this section shall do any of the following: (a) Alter the duties and responsibilities of emergency response personnel; (b) Prohibit a private company from participating in the provision of mutual assistance or aid pursuant to the compact created pursuant to this section if the participating political subdivision approves the participation and the contract with the private company allows for the participation; (c) Prohibit employees of participating political subdivisions from responding to a request for mutual assistance or aid precipitated by an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources, when the employees are responding as part of a regional response team that is under the operational control of the incident command structure; (d) Authorize employees of participating political subdivisions to respond to an incident, disaster, exercise, training activity, planned event, or emergency, any of which requires additional resources, without a request from a participating political subdivision. (2) This section does not preclude a participating political subdivision from entering into a mutual aid or other agreement with another political subdivision, and does not affect any other agreement to which a participating political subdivision may be a party, or any request for assistance or aid that may be made, under any other section of the Revised Code, including, but not limited to, any mutual aid arrangement under this chapter, any fire protection or emergency medical services contract under section 9.60 of the Revised Code, sheriffs' requests for assistance to preserve the public peace and protect persons and property under section 311.07 of the Revised Code, any agreement for mutual assistance or aid in police protection under section 737.04 of the Revised Code, any agreement for law enforcement services between universities and colleges and political subdivisions under section 3345.041 or 3345.21 of the Revised Code, and mutual aid agreements among emergency planning districts for hazardous substances or chemicals response under sections 3750.02 and 3750.03 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Personnel Subject to division (F)(4) of this section, personnel of a responding participating political subdivision who suffer injury or death in the course of, and arising out of, their employment while rendering assistance or aid under this section to another participating political subdivision are entitled to all applicable benefits under Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code. (2) Personnel of a responding participating political subdivision shall be considered, while rendering assistance or aid under this section in another participating political subdivision, to be agents of the responding political subdivision for purposes of tort liability and immunity from tort liability under the law of this state. (3)(a) A responding participating political subdivision and the personnel of that political subdivision, while rendering assistance or aid under this section, or while in route to or from rendering assistance or aid under this section, in another participating political subdivision, shall be deemed to be exercising governmental functions as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, shall have the defenses to and immunities from civil liability provided in sections 2744.02 and 2744.03 of the Revised Code, and shall be entitled to all applicable limitations on recoverable damages under section 2744.05 of the Revised Code. (b) A participating political subdivision requesting assistance or aid and the personnel of that political subdivision, while requesting or receiving assistance or aid under this section from any other participating political subdivision, shall be deemed to be exercising governmental functions as defined in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code, shall have the defenses to and immunities from civil liability provided in sections 2744.02 and 2744.03 of the Revised Code, and shall be entitled to all applicable limitations on recoverable damages under section 2744.05 of the Revised Code. (I) If a person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by a participating political subdivision evidencing qualification in a professional, mechanical, or other skill, and if the assistance or aid of that person is asked for under this section by a participating political subdivision, the person shall be deemed to be licensed or certified in or permitted by the participating political subdivision receiving the assistance or aid to render the assistance or aid, subject to any limitations and conditions the chief executive of the participating political subdivision receiving the assistance or aid may prescribe by executive order or otherwise. (J)(1) Subject to division (K) of this section and except as provided in division (J)(2) of this section, any participating political subdivision rendering assistance or aid under this section in another participating political subdivision shall be reimbursed by the participating political subdivision receiving the assistance or aid for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in the operation of, any equipment used in rendering the assistance or aid, for any expense incurred in the provision of any service used in rendering the assistance or aid, and for all other costs incurred in responding to the request for assistance or aid. To avoid duplication of payments, insurance proceeds available to cover any loss or damage to equipment of a participating political subdivision rendering assistance or aid shall be considered in the reimbursement by the participating political subdivision receiving the assistance or aid. (2) A participating political subdivision rendering assistance or aid under this section to another participating political subdivision shall not be reimbursed for either of the following: (a) The first eight hours of mutual assistance or aid it provides to the political subdivision receiving the assistance or aid; (b) Expenses the participating political subdivision incurs under division (H)(1) of this section. (K) A participating political subdivision rendering assistance or aid under this section may do any of the following: (1) Assume, in whole or in part, any loss, damage, expense, or cost the political subdivision incurs in rendering the assistance or aid; (2) Loan, without charge, any equipment, or donate any service, to the political subdivision receiving the assistance or aid; (3) Enter into agreements with one or more other participating political subdivisions to establish different allocations of losses, damages, expenses, or costs among such political subdivisions. Sec. 5503.02. (A) The state highway patrol shall enforce the laws of the state relating to the titling, registration, and licensing of motor vehicles; enforce on all roads and highways, notwithstanding section 4513.39 of the Revised Code, the laws relating to the operation and use of vehicles on the highways; enforce and prevent the violation of the laws relating to the size, weight, and speed of commercial motor vehicles and all laws designed for the protection of the highway pavements and structures on the highways; investigate and enforce rules and laws of the public utilities commission governing the transportation of persons and property by motor carriers and report violations of such rules and laws to the commission; enforce against any motor carrier as defined in section 4923.01 of the Revised Code those rules and laws that, if violated, may result in a forfeiture as provided in section 4923.99 of the Revised Code; investigate and report violations of all laws relating to the collection of excise taxes on motor vehicle fuels; and regulate the movement of traffic on the roads and highways of the state, notwithstanding section 4513.39 of the Revised Code. The patrol, whenever possible, shall determine the identity of the persons who are causing or who are responsible for the breaking, damaging, or destruction of any improved surfaced roadway, structure, sign, marker, guardrail, or other appurtenance constructed or maintained by the department of transportation and shall arrest the persons who are responsible for the breaking, damaging, or destruction and bring them before the proper officials for prosecution. State highway patrol troopers shall investigate and report all motor vehicle accidents on all roads and highways outside of municipal corporations. The superintendent of the patrol or any state highway patrol trooper may arrest, without a warrant, any person, who is the driver of or a passenger in any vehicle operated or standing on a state highway, whom the superintendent or trooper has reasonable cause to believe is guilty of a felony, under the same circumstances and with the same power that any peace officer may make such an arrest. The superintendent or any state highway patrol trooper may enforce the criminal laws on all state properties and state institutions, owned or leased by the state, and, when so ordered by the governor in the event of riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, may, pursuant to sections 2935.03 to 2935.05 of the Revised Code, arrest offenders against the criminal laws wherever they may be found within the state if the violations occurred upon, or resulted in injury to person or property on, state properties or state institutions, or under the conditions described in division (B) of this section. This authority of the superintendent and any state highway patrol trooper to enforce the criminal laws shall extend to the Lake Erie Correctional Institution and the Northeast Ohio Correctional Center, to the same extent as if those prisons were owned by this state. (B) In the event of riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, or the reasonable threat of riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, and upon request, as provided in this section, of the sheriff of a county or the mayor or other chief executive of a municipal corporation, the governor may order the state highway patrol to enforce the criminal laws within the area threatened by riot, civil disorder, or insurrection, as designated by the governor, upon finding that law enforcement agencies within the counties involved will not be reasonably capable of controlling the riot, civil disorder, or insurrection and that additional assistance is necessary. In cities in which the sheriff is under contract to provide exclusive police services pursuant to section 311.29 of the Revised Code, in villages, and in the unincorporated areas of the county, the sheriff has exclusive authority to request the use of the patrol. In cities in which the sheriff does not exclusively provide police services, the mayor, or other chief executive performing the duties of mayor, has exclusive authority to request the use of the patrol. The superintendent or any state highway patrol trooper may enforce the criminal laws within the area designated by the governor during the emergency arising out of the riot, civil disorder, or insurrection until released by the governor upon consultation with the requesting authority. State highway patrol troopers shall never be used as peace officers in connection with any strike or labor dispute. When a request for the use of the patrol is made pursuant to this division, the requesting authority shall notify the law enforcement authorities in contiguous communities and the sheriff of each county within which the threatened area, or any part of the threatened area, lies of the request, but the failure to notify the authorities or a sheriff shall not affect the validity of the request. (C) Any person who is arrested by the superintendent or a state highway patrol trooper shall be taken before any court or magistrate having jurisdiction of the offense with which the person is charged. Any person who is arrested or apprehended within the limits of a municipal corporation shall be brought before the municipal court or other tribunal of the municipal corporation. (D)(1) State highway patrol troopers have the same right and power of search and seizure as other peace officers. No state official shall command, order, or direct any state highway patrol trooper to perform any duty or service that is not authorized by law. The powers and duties conferred on the patrol are supplementary to, and in no way a limitation on, the powers and duties of sheriffs or other peace officers of the state. (2)(a) A state highway patrol trooper, pursuant to the policy established by the superintendent of the state highway patrol under division (D)(2)(b) of this section, may render emergency assistance to any other peace officer who has arrest authority under section 2935.03 of the Revised Code, if both of the following apply: (i) There is a threat of imminent physical danger to the peace officer, a threat of physical harm to another person, or any other serious emergency situation; (ii) Either the peace officer requests emergency assistance, or it appears that the peace officer is unable to request emergency assistance and the circumstances observed by the state highway patrol trooper reasonably indicate that emergency assistance is appropriate, or the peace officer requests emergency assistance and in the request the peace officer specifies a particular location and the state highway patrol trooper arrives at that location prior to the time that the peace officer arrives at that location and the circumstances observed by the state highway patrol trooper reasonably indicate that emergency assistance is appropriate. (b) The superintendent of the state highway patrol shall establish, within sixty days of August 8, 1991, a policy that sets forth the manner and procedures by which a state highway patrol trooper may render emergency assistance to any other peace officer under division (D)(2)(a) of this section. The policy shall include a provision that a state highway patrol trooper never be used as a peace officer in connection with any strike or labor dispute. (3)(a) A state highway patrol trooper who renders emergency assistance to any other peace officer under the policy established by the superintendent pursuant to division (D)(2)(b) of this section shall be considered to be performing regular employment for the purposes of compensation, pension, indemnity fund rights, workers' compensation, and other rights or benefits to which the trooper may be entitled as incident to regular employment. (b) A state highway patrol trooper who renders emergency assistance to any other peace officer under the policy established by the superintendent pursuant to division (D)(2)(b) of this section retains personal immunity from liability as specified in section 9.86 of the Revised Code. (c) A state highway patrol trooper who renders emergency assistance under the policy established by the superintendent pursuant to division (D)(2)(b) of this section has the same authority as the peace officer for or with whom the state highway patrol trooper is providing emergency assistance. (E)(1) Subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated by the general assembly for security detail purposes, the state highway patrol shall provide security as follows: (a) For the governor; (b) At the direction of the governor, for other officials of the state government of this state; officials of the state governments of other states who are visiting this state; officials of the United States government who are visiting this state; officials of the governments of foreign countries or their political subdivisions who are visiting this state; or other officials or dignitaries who are visiting this state, including, but not limited to, members of trade missions; (c) For the capitol square, as defined in section 105.41 of the Revised Code; (d) For the Vern Riffe center and the James A. Rhodes state office tower, as directed by the department of public safety; (e) For other state property. (2) To carry out the security responsibilities of the patrol listed in division (E)(1) of this section, the superintendent may assign state highway patrol troopers to a separate unit that is responsible for security details. The number of troopers assigned to particular security details shall be determined by the superintendent. (3) The superintendent and any state highway patrol trooper, when providing security pursuant to division (E)(1)(a) or (b)(E)(1) of this section, have the same arrest powers as other peace officers to apprehend offenders against the criminal laws who endanger or threaten the security of any person or state property being protected under division (E) of this section, no matter where the offense occurs. This arrest authority is concurrent with that of any other peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code, or any other law enforcement officer, as defined in section 2901.01 of the Revised Code, with jurisdiction at the respective location. The superintendent, any state highway patrol trooper, and any special police officer designated under section 5503.09 of the Revised Code, if providing security pursuant to division (E)(1)(c) of this section, shall enforce any rules governing capitol square adopted by the capitol square review and advisory board. (F) The governor may order the state highway patrol to undertake major criminal investigations that involve state property interests. If an investigation undertaken pursuant to this division results in either the issuance of a no bill or the filing of an indictment, the superintendent shall file a complete and accurate report of the investigation with the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the house of representatives within fifteen days after the issuance of the no bill or the filing of an indictment. If the investigation does not have as its result any prosecutorial action, the superintendent shall, upon reporting this fact to the governor, file a complete and accurate report of the investigation with the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the minority leader of the senate, and the minority leader of the house of representatives. (G) The superintendent may purchase or lease real property and buildings needed by the patrol, negotiate the sale of real property owned by the patrol, rent or lease real property owned or leased by the patrol, and make or cause to be made repairs to all property owned or under the control of the patrol. Any instrument by which real property is acquired pursuant to this division shall identify the agency of the state that has the use and benefit of the real property as specified in section 5301.012 of the Revised Code. Sections 123.01 and 125.02 of the Revised Code do not limit the powers granted to the superintendent by this division. Sec. 5505.045. (A) No person shall knowingly fail to file a complete and accurate campaign finance statement or independent expenditure statement in accordance with section 5505.044 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, during the course of a person seeking nomination for, and during any campaign for, election to the state highway patrol retirement board, shall knowingly and with intent to affect the nomination or the outcome of the campaign do any of the following by means of campaign materials, an advertisement on radio or television or in a newspaper or periodical, a public speech, press release, or otherwise: (1) With regard to a candidate, identify the candidate in a manner that implies that the candidate is a member of the board or use the term "re-elect" when the candidate is not currently a member of the board; (2) Make a false statement concerning the formal schooling or training completed or attempted by a candidate; a degree, diploma, certificate, scholarship, grant, award, prize, or honor received, earned, or held by a candidate; or the period of time during which a candidate attended any school, college, community technical school, or institution; (3) Make a false statement concerning the professional, occupational, or vocational licenses held by a candidate, or concerning any position the candidate held for which the candidate received a salary or wages; (4) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been indicted or convicted of a theft offense, extortion, or other crime involving financial corruption or moral turpitude; (5) Make a statement that a candidate has been indicted for any crime or has been the subject of a finding by the Ohio elections commission, the secretary of state, or the Ohio election integrity commission without disclosing the outcome of any legal proceedings resulting from the indictment or finding; (6) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has a record of treatment or confinement for mental disorder; (7) Make a false statement that a candidate or board member has been subjected to military discipline for criminal misconduct or dishonorably discharged from the armed services; (8) Falsely identify the source of a statement, issue statements under the name of another person without authorization, or falsely state the endorsement of or opposition to a candidate by a person or publication; (9) Make a false statement concerning the voting record of a candidate or board member; (10) Post, publish, circulate, distribute, or otherwise disseminate a false statement concerning a candidate, either knowing the same to be false or with reckless disregard of whether it was false or not, if the statement is designed to promote the election, nomination, or defeat of the candidate. Sec. 5505.046. The secretary of state, or any person acting on personal knowledge and subject to the penalties of perjury, may file a A complaint with the Ohio elections commission alleging a violation of section 5505.045 of the Revised Code may be filed in accordance with section 3517.16 of the Revised Code. The complaint shall be made on a form prescribed and provided by the commission. On receipt of a complaint under this section, the commission shall hold a hearing open to the public to determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. The commission may administer oaths and issue subpoenas to any person in the state compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production of relevant papers, books, accounts, and reports. On the refusal of any person to obey a subpoena or to be sworn or to answer as a witness, the commission may apply to the court of common pleas of Franklin county under section 2705.03 of the Revised Code. The court shall hold contempt proceedings in accordance with Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. The commission shall provide the person accused of the violation at least seven days prior notice of the time, date, and place of the hearing. The accused may be represented by an attorney and shall have an opportunity to present evidence, call witnesses, and cross-examine witnesses. At the hearing, the commission shall determine whether the violation alleged in the complaint has occurred. If the commission determines that a violation of division (A) of section 5505.045 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall either impose a fine under section 5505.99 of the Revised Code or enter a finding that good cause has been shown not to impose the fine. If the commission determines that a violation of division (B) of section 5505.045 of the Revised Code has occurred, the commission shall impose the fine described in section 5505.99 of the Revised Code, refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor, or enter a finding that good cause has been shown to not impose a fine or refer the matter to the appropriate prosecutor. Sec. 5505.99. (A) Whoever violates division (A) of section 5505.045 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each day of the violation. (B) Whoever violates division (B) of section 5505.045 of the Revised Code shall be imprisoned for not more than six months or fined not more than five thousand dollars, or both. (C) Fines imposed by the Ohio elections commission under this section shall be paid into the Ohio elections commission fund created under section 3513.10 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5525.03. (A) All prospective bidders other than environmental remediators and specialty contractors for which there are no classes of work provided for in the rules adopted by the director of transportation shall apply for qualification on forms prescribed and furnished by the director. The application shall be accompanied by a certificate of compliance with affirmative action programs issued pursuant to section 9.47 of the Revised Code and dated no earlier than one hundred eighty days before the date fixed for the award of the contract for a particular project. (B) The director shall act upon an application for qualification within thirty days after it is presented to the director. Upon the receipt of any application for qualification, the director shall examine the application to determine whether the applicant is competent and responsible and possesses the financial resources required by section 5525.04 of the Revised Code. If the applicant is found to possess the qualifications prescribed by sections 5525.02 to 5525.09 of the Revised Code and by rules adopted by the director, including a certificate of compliance with affirmative action programs, a certificate of qualification shall be issued to the applicant, which shall be valid for the period of one year or such shorter period of time as the director prescribes, unless revoked by the director for cause as defined by rules adopted by the director under section 5525.05 of the Revised Code. (C) The certificate of qualification shall contain a statement fixing the aggregate amount of work, for any or all owners, that the applicant may have under construction and uncompleted at any one time and may contain a statement limiting such bidder to the submission of bids upon a certain class of work. Subject to any restriction as to amount or class of work therein contained, the certificate of qualification shall authorize its holder to bid on all work on which bids are taken by the department of transportation during the period of time therein specified. (D) An applicant who has received a certificate of qualification and desires to amend the certificate by the dollar amount or by the classes of work may submit to the director such documentation as the director considers appropriate. The director shall review the documentation submitted by the applicant and, within fifteen days, shall either amend the certificate of qualification or deny the request. If the director denies the request to amend the certificate, the applicant may appeal that decision to the director's prequalification review board in accordance with section 5525.07 of the Revised Code. Two or more persons, partnerships, or corporations may bid jointly on any one project, but only on condition that prior to the time bids are taken on the project the bidders make a joint application for qualification and obtain a joint certificate qualification. (E) The director may debar from participating in future contracts with the department any bidding company as well as any partner of a partnership, or the officers and directors of an association or corporation if the certificate of qualification of the company, partnership, association, or corporation is revoked or not renewed by the director. When the director reasonably believes that grounds for revocation and debarment exist, the director shall send the bidding company and any individual involved a notice of proposed revocation and debarment indicating the grounds for such action as established in rules adopted by the director under section 5525.05 of the Revised Code and the procedure for requesting a hearing. The notice and hearing shall be in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If the bidding company or individual does not respond with a request for a hearing in the manner specified in Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director shall revoke the certificate and issue the debarment decision without a hearing and shall notify the bidding company or individual of the decision by certified mail, return receipt requested. (F) The debarment period may be of any length determined by the director and the director may modify or rescind the debarment at any time. During the period of debarment, the director shall not issue a certificate of qualification for any company, partnership, association, or corporation affiliated with a debarred individual. After the debarment period expires, the bidding company or individual, and any partnership, association, or corporation affiliated with the individual may make an application for qualification if such entity or individual is not otherwise debarred. Sec. 5537.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Commission" means the Ohio turnpike and infrastructure commission created by section 5537.02 of the Revised Code or, if that commission is abolished, the board, body, officer, or commission succeeding to the principal functions thereof or to which the powers given by this chapter to the commission are given by law. (B) "Turnpike project" means any express or limited access highway, super highway, or motorway constructed, operated, or improved, under the jurisdiction of the commission and pursuant to this chapter, at a location or locations reviewed by the turnpike legislative review committee and approved by the governor, including all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, those portions of connecting public roads that serve interchanges and are determined by the commission and the director of transportation to be necessary for the safe merging of traffic between the turnpike project and those public roads, toll booths, service facilities, and administration, storage, and other buildings, property, and facilities that the commission considers necessary for the operation or policing of the turnpike project, together with all property and rights which may be acquired by the commission for the construction, maintenance, or operation of the turnpike project, and includes any sections or extensions of a turnpike project designated by the commission as such for the particular purpose. Each turnpike project shall be separately designated, by name or number, and may be constructed, improved, or extended in such sections as the commission may from time to time determine. Construction includes the improvement and renovation of a previously constructed turnpike project, including additional interchanges, whether or not the turnpike project was initially constructed by the commission. (C) "Infrastructure project" means any public express or limited access highway, super highway, or motorway, including all bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, entrance plazas, approaches, and those portions of connecting public roads that serve interchanges, that is constructed or improved, in whole or in part, with infrastructure funding approved pursuant to criteria established under section 5537.18 of the Revised Code. (D) "Cost," as applied to construction of a turnpike project or an infrastructure project, includes the cost of construction, including bridges over or under existing highways and railroads, acquisition of all property acquired either by the commission or by the owner of the infrastructure project for the construction, demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which the buildings or structures may be moved, site clearance, improvement, and preparation, diverting public roads, interchanges with public roads, access roads to private property, including the cost of land or easements therefor, all machinery, furnishings, and equipment, communications facilities, financing expenses, interest prior to and during construction and for one year after completion of construction, traffic estimates, indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, title work and title commitments, insurance, and guarantees, engineering, feasibility studies, and legal expenses, plans, specifications, surveys, estimates of cost and revenues, other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing or operating a turnpike project or an infrastructure project, administrative expenses, and any other expense that may be necessary or incident to the construction of the turnpike project or an infrastructure project, the financing of the construction, and the placing of the turnpike project or an infrastructure project in operation. Any obligation or expense incurred by the department of transportation with the approval of the commission for surveys, borings, preparation of plans and specifications, and other engineering services in connection with the construction of a turnpike project or an infrastructure project, or by the federal government with the approval of the commission for any public road projects which must be reimbursed as a condition to the exercise of any of the powers of the commission under this chapter, shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the turnpike project or an infrastructure project and shall be reimbursed to the state or the federal government, as the case may be, from revenues, state taxes, or the proceeds of bonds as authorized by this chapter. (E) "Owner" includes all persons having any title or interest in any property authorized to be acquired by the commission for turnpike projects under this chapter, or the public entity for whom an infrastructure project is funded, in whole or in part, by the commission under this chapter. (F) "Revenues" means all tolls, service revenues, investment income on special funds, rentals, gifts, grants, and all other moneys coming into the possession of or under the control of the commission by virtue of this chapter, except the proceeds from the sale of bonds. "Revenues" does not include state taxes. (G) "Public roads" means all public highways, roads, and streets in the state, whether maintained by a state agency or any other governmental agency. (H) "Public utility facilities" means tracks, pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances of any public utility. (I) "Financing expenses" means all costs and expenses relating to the authorization, issuance, sale, delivery, authentication, deposit, custody, clearing, registration, transfer, exchange, fractionalization, replacement, payment, and servicing of bonds including, without limitation, costs and expenses for or relating to publication and printing, postage, delivery, preliminary and final official statements, offering circulars, and informational statements, travel and transportation, underwriters, placement agents, investment bankers, paying agents, registrars, authenticating agents, remarketing agents, custodians, clearing agencies or corporations, securities depositories, financial advisory services, certifications, audits, federal or state regulatory agencies, accounting and computation services, legal services and obtaining approving legal opinions and other legal opinions, credit ratings, redemption premiums, and credit enhancement facilities. (J) "Bond proceedings" means the resolutions, trust agreements, certifications, notices, sale proceedings, leases, lease-purchase agreements, assignments, credit enhancement facility agreements, and other agreements, instruments, and documents, as amended and supplemented, or any one or more or any combination thereof, authorizing, or authorizing or providing for the terms and conditions applicable to, or providing for the security or sale or award or liquidity of, bonds, and includes the provisions set forth or incorporated in those bonds and bond proceedings. (K) "Bond service charges" means principal, including any mandatory sinking fund or mandatory redemption requirements for the retirement of bonds, and interest and any redemption premium payable on bonds, as those payments come due and are payable to the bondholder or to a person making payment under a credit enhancement facility of those bond service charges to a bondholder. (L) "Bond service fund" means the applicable fund created by the bond proceedings for and pledged to the payment of bond service charges on bonds provided for by those proceedings, including all moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to that fund as provided in the bond proceedings. (M) "Bonds" means bonds, notes, including notes anticipating bonds or other notes, commercial paper, certificates of participation, or other evidences of obligation, including any interest coupons pertaining thereto, issued by the commission pursuant to this chapter. (N) "Infrastructure fund" means the applicable fund or funds created by the bond proceedings, which shall be used to pay or defray the cost of infrastructure projects recommended by the director of transportation and evaluated and approved by the commission. (O) "Net revenues" means revenues lawfully available to pay both current operating expenses of the commission and bond service charges in any fiscal year or other specified period, less current operating expenses of the commission and any amount necessary to maintain a working capital reserve for that period. (P) "Pledged revenues" means net revenues, moneys and investments, and earnings on those investments, in the applicable bond service fund and any other special funds, and the proceeds of any bonds issued for the purpose of refunding prior bonds, all as lawfully available and by resolution of the commission committed for application as pledged revenues to the payment of bond service charges on particular issues of bonds. (Q) "Service facilities" means service stations, restaurants, and other facilities for food service, roadside parks and rest areas, parking, camping, tenting, rest, and sleeping facilities, hotels or motels, and all similar and other facilities providing services to the traveling public in connection with the use of a turnpike project and owned, leased, licensed, or operated by the commission. (R) "Service revenues" means those revenues of the commission derived from its ownership, leasing, licensing, or operation of service facilities. (S) "Special funds" means the applicable bond service fund and any accounts and subaccounts in that fund, any other funds or accounts permitted by and established under, and identified as a "special fund" or "special account" in, the bond proceedings, including any special fund or account established for purposes of rebate or other requirements under federal income tax laws. (T) "State agencies" means the state, officers of the state, and boards, departments, branches, divisions, or other units or agencies of the state. (U) "State taxes" means receipts of the commission from the proceeds of state taxes or excises levied and collected, or appropriated by the general assembly to the commission, for the purposes and functions of the commission. State taxes do not include tolls, or investment earnings on state taxes except on those state taxes referred to in Section 5a of Article XII, Ohio Constitution. (V) "Tolls" means tolls, special fees or permit fees, or other charges by the commission to the owners, lessors, lessees, or operators of motor vehicles for the operation of or the right to operate those vehicles on a turnpike project. (W) "Credit enhancement facilities" means letters of credit, lines of credit, standby, contingent, or firm securities purchase agreements, insurance, or surety arrangements, guarantees, and other arrangements that provide for direct or contingent payment of bond service charges, for security or additional security in the event of nonpayment or default in respect of bonds, or for making payment of bond service charges and at the option and on demand of bondholders or at the option of the commission or upon certain conditions occurring under put or similar arrangements, or for otherwise supporting the credit or liquidity of the bonds, and includes credit, reimbursement, marketing, remarketing, indexing, carrying, interest rate hedge, and subrogation agreements, and other agreements and arrangements for payment and reimbursement of the person providing the credit enhancement facility and the security for that payment and reimbursement. (X) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 of the Revised Code and, unless the context otherwise provides, also includes any governmental agency and any combination of those persons. (Y) "Refund" means to fund and retire outstanding bonds, including advance refunding with or without payment or redemption prior to stated maturity. (Z) "Governmental agency" means any state agency, federal agency, political subdivision, or other local, interstate, or regional governmental agency, and any combination of those agencies. (AA) "Property" has the same meaning as in section 1.59 of the Revised Code, and includes interests in property. (BB) "Administrative agent," "agent," "commercial paper," "floating rate interest structure," "indexing agent," "interest rate hedge," "interest rate period," "put arrangement," and "remarketing agent" have the same meanings as in section 9.98 of the Revised Code. (CC) "Outstanding," as applied to bonds, means outstanding in accordance with the terms of the bonds and the applicable bond proceedings. (DD) "Ohio turnpike system" or "system" means all existing and future turnpike projects constructed, operated, and maintained under the jurisdiction of the commission. (EE) "Ohio turnpike and infrastructure system" means turnpike projects and infrastructure projects funded by the commission existing on and after July 1, 2013, that facilitate access to, use of, and egress from the Ohio turnpike system, and also facilitate access to and from areas of population, commerce, and industry that are connected to the Ohio turnpike system. Sec. 5537.02. (A) There is hereby created a commission to be known on and after July 1, 2013, as the "Ohio turnpike and infrastructure commission." The commission is a body both corporate and politic, constituting an instrumentality of the state, and the exercise by it of the powers conferred by this chapter in the construction, operation, and maintenance of the Ohio turnpike system, and also in entering into agreements with the department of transportation to pay the cost or a portion of the costs of infrastructure projects, are and shall be held to be essential governmental functions of the state. Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code applies to the commission and the commission is a political subdivision of the state for purposes of that chapter. The commission is subject to all provisions of law generally applicable to state agencies which do not conflict with this chapter. (B)(1) The commission shall consist of ten members as follows: (a) Six members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, no more than three of whom shall be members of the same political party; (b) The director of transportation, or the director's designee, who shall be a voting member, and the director of budget and management, or the director's designee. The directors or their designees, as applicable, shall serve as ex officio members, without compensation; (c) One member of the senate, appointed by the president of the senate, who shall represent either a district in which is located or through which passes a portion of a turnpike project that is part of the Ohio turnpike system or a district located in the vicinity of a turnpike project that is part of the Ohio turnpike system; (d) One member of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, who shall represent either a district in which is located or through which passes a portion of a turnpike project that is part of the Ohio turnpike system or a district located in the vicinity of a turnpike project that is part of the Ohio turnpike system. (2) The members appointed by the governor shall be residents of the state, shall have been qualified electors therein for a period of at least five years next preceding their appointment. In making the appointments, the governor may appoint persons who reside in different geographic areas of the state, taking into consideration the various turnpike and infrastructure projects in the state. Members appointed to the commission prior to July 1, 2013, shall serve terms of eight years commencing on the first day of July and ending on the thirtieth day of June. Thereafter, members appointed by the governor shall serve terms of five years commencing on the first day of July and ending on the thirtieth day of June. Those members appointed by the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives shall serve a term of the remainder of the general assembly during which the senator or representative is appointed. Each appointed member shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. If a commission member dies or resigns, or if a senator or representative who is a member of the commission ceases to be a senator or representative, or if an ex officio member ceases to hold the applicable office, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as provided in division (B)(1) of this section. Any member who fills a vacancy occurring prior to the end of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall, if appointed by the governor, hold office for the remainder of such term or, if appointed by the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, shall hold office for the remainder of the term or for a shorter period of time as determined by the president or the speaker. Any member appointed by the governor shall continue in office subsequent to the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. A member of the commission is eligible for reappointment. Each member of the commission appointed by the governor, before entering upon the member's duties, shall take an oath as provided by Section 7 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution. The governor, the president of the senate, or the speaker of the house of representatives, may at any time remove their respective appointees to the commission for misfeasance, nonfeasance, or malfeasance in office. (3)(a) A member of the commission who is appointed by the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives shall not participate in any vote of the commission. Serving as an appointed member of the commission under divisions (B)(1)(c), (1)(d), or (2) of this section does not constitute grounds for resignation from the senate or the house of representatives under section 101.26 of the Revised Code. (b) The director of budget and management shall not participate in any vote of the commission. (C) The voting members of the commission shall elect one of the voting members as chairperson and another as vice-chairperson, and shall appoint a secretary-treasurer who need not be a member of the commission. Four of the voting members of the commission constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of four voting members is necessary for any action taken by the commission. No vacancy in the membership of the commission impairs the rights of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the commission. (D) Each member of the commission appointed by the governor shall give a surety bond to the commission in the penal sum of twenty-five thousand dollars and the secretary-treasurer shall give such a bond in at least the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars. The commission may require any of its officers or employees to file surety bonds including a blanket bond as provided in section 3.06 of the Revised Code. Each such bond shall be in favor of the commission and shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, approved by the governor, and filed in the office of the secretary of state. The costs of the surety bonds shall be paid or reimbursed by the commission from revenues. Each member of the commission appointed by the governor shall receive an annual salary of five thousand dollars, payable in monthly installments. Each member shall be reimbursed for the member's actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of the member's duties. All costs and expenses incurred by the commission in carrying out this chapter shall be payable solely from revenues and state taxes, and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the commission beyond the extent to which revenues have been provided for pursuant to this chapter. Sec. 5537.03. In order to remove present and anticipated impediments and potential hazards on the congested highways in this state, to facilitate vehicular traffic throughout the state, to finance infrastructure projects that improve and enhance mobility in Ohio, and also to promote the agricultural, recreational, tourism, and commercial, industrial, and economic development of the state, and to provide for the general welfare by the construction, improvement, and maintenance of modern express highways embodying safety devices, including without limitation center divisions, ample shoulder widths, longsight distances, multiple lanes in each direction, and grade separations at intersections with other public roads and railroads, the Ohio turnpike and infrastructure commission may do the following: (A) Subject to section 5537.26 of the Revised Code, construct, maintain, repair, and operate a system of turnpike projects at locations that are reviewed by the turnpike legislative review committee and approved by the governor, and in accordance with alignment and design standards that are approved by the director of transportation, and issue revenue bonds of this state, payable solely from pledged revenues, to pay the cost of those projects. The turnpikes and turnpike projects authorized by this chapter are hereby or shall be made part of the Ohio turnpike system. (B) Provide the infrastructure funds to pay the cost or a portion of the cost of infrastructure projects as recommended by the director of transportation pursuant to a determination made by the commission based on criteria set forth in rules adopted by the commission under section 5537.18 of the Revised Code. A determination by the commission to provide infrastructure funds for an infrastructure project shall be conclusive and incontestable. Sec. 5537.27. The Ohio turnpike and infrastructure commission, the director of transportation or the director's designee, and another person designated by the governor shall establish a procedure whereby a political subdivision or other government agency or agencies may submit a written application to the commission, requesting the commission to construct and operate a turnpike project within the boundaries of the subdivision, agency, or agencies making the request. The procedure shall include a requirement that the commission send a written reply to the subdivision, agency, or agencies, explaining the disposition of the request. The procedure established pursuant to this section shall not become effective unless it is approved by the commission and by the director or the director's designee and the designee of the governor, and shall require submission of the proposed turnpike project to the turnpike legislative review committee if the project must be approved by the governor. Sec. 5540.02. (A) A transportation improvement district may be created by the board of county commissioners of a county. The board, by resolution, shall determine the structure of the board of trustees of the transportation improvement district it creates by adopting the structure contained either in division (C)(1) or (2) of this section. (B) A transportation improvement district is a body both corporate and politic, and the exercise by it of the powers conferred by this chapter in the financing, construction, maintenance, repair, and operation of a project are and shall be held to be essential governmental functions. (C)(1) If the board of county commissioners so elects, a transportation improvement district shall be governed by a board of trustees consisting of the following members: (a) Two members appointed by the board of county commissioners; (b) Three members appointed by the legislative authority of the most populous municipal corporation in the district; (c) Two members appointed by the legislative authority of the second most populous municipal corporation in the district; (d) Two members appointed by the board of township trustees of the township in the county that is most populous in its unincorporated area; (e) The county engineer; (f) One member appointed by the legislative authority of any township or municipal corporation that cannot otherwise appoint a member to the board pursuant to this section, and that is wholly or partially within the area of the transportation improvement district as the district was originally designated by the board of county commissioners; (g) If the area of a transportation improvement district is expanded by the board of county commissioners, the legislative authority of any township or municipal corporation that is wholly or partially within the area of expansion and that cannot otherwise appoint a member to the board pursuant to this section, with the consent of the board of trustees of the district, may appoint one member to the board; (h) One member appointed by the regional planning commission for the county, who shall be a nonvoting member of the board; (i) One member appointed at the discretion of the speaker of the house of representatives, who, if appointed, shall be a nonvoting member of the board and who may be a member of the house of representatives. One of each of the appointments made by the board of county commissioners, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees under divisions (C)(1)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section, shall be members of the chamber of commerce for the respective political subdivision. Whenever the addition of members to the board of trustees of a transportation improvement district pursuant to division (C)(1)(f) or (g) of this section results in an even number of total voting members on the board, the board of trustees of the district may appoint an additional person to its membership to maintain an odd number of voting members. (2) As an alternative to the structure prescribed in division (C)(1) of this section, a board of county commissioners, by resolution, may elect that the transportation improvement district it creates be governed by a board of trustees consisting of the following members: (a) Five five members appointed by the board of county commissioners; (b) One member appointed at the discretion of the speaker of the house of representatives, who, if appointed, shall be a nonvoting member of the board and who may be a member of the house of representatives. (D) Each appointed member of the board shall hold office for a term of two years but subject to removal at the pleasure of the authority that appointed the member. Members may be reappointed. Except as otherwise provided in this division, any vacancy on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. Any vacancy on a board appointed under division (C)(1) of this section lasting longer than thirty days due to the failure of the legislative authority of a municipal corporation or a board of township trustees to make an appointment shall be filled by the board of trustees of the transportation improvement district. (E) The voting members of the board shall elect from the entire board membership a chairperson, vice-chairperson, and secretary-treasurer. A majority of the voting members of the board constitutes a quorum, the affirmative vote of which is necessary for any action of the district. No vacancy in the membership of the board impairs the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all duties of the district. (F) The board of county commissioners of any county, the legislative authority of any municipal corporation, and the board of township trustees of any township may make appropriations from moneys available to them and not otherwise appropriated to pay costs incurred by the district in the exercise of its functions under this chapter, provided those moneys are available to use for that purpose. (G) An organizational meeting of the board of trustees of a transportation improvement district created under this section shall be held at the time and place designated by the board member who has served the most years as a member of the board of county commissioners that created the transportation improvement district. Sec. 5595.02. (A) The boards of county commissioners of two or more counties may undertake a regional transportation improvement project for the purpose of completing transportation improvements within the territory of the counties. The project shall be administered by a governing board in accordance with a cooperative agreement. (B)(B)(1) The cooperative agreement shall provide for the creation of a governing board consisting of one the following individuals: (a) One county commissioner from each county that is a party to the agreement or a designee appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county for the purpose of serving on the governing board, and the ; (b) The county engineer of each such county or a designee appointed by the county engineer for the purpose of serving on the governing board. (2) The cooperative agreement may authorize the chief executive officer of the JobsOhio network partner that covers the majority of the area encompassed by the regional transportation improvement project or a designee appointed by the chief executive officer to serve as an additional member of the governing board. Membership (3) Membership on the board is not a direct or indirect interest in a contract or expenditure of money by the county. The board is a public body for the purposes of section 121.22 of the Revised Code and a public office for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code applies to the board. (C) The governing board of a regional transportation improvement project is a body both corporate and politic, and the exercise by it of the powers conferred by this chapter in the financing, construction, maintenance, repair, and operation of transportation improvements are essential governmental functions. (D) A board of county commissioners, in accordance with the cooperative agreement, may make appropriations to pay costs incurred by the governing board in the exercise of its functions under this chapter so long as such costs are approved by the director of transportation under section 5595.12 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5701.11. The effective date to which this section refers is the effective date of this section as amended by H.B. 14 of the 136th general assembly. (A)(1) Except as provided under division (A)(2) or (B) of this section, any reference in Title LVII or section 149.311, 3123.90, 3770.07, 3770.071, 3770.072, 3770.073, or 3772.37, or 3775.16 of the Revised Code to the Internal Revenue Code, to the Internal Revenue Code "as amended," to other laws of the United States, or to other laws of the United States, "as amended," means the Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the United States as they exist on the effective date. (2) This section does not apply to any reference in Title LVII of the Revised Code to the Internal Revenue Code as of a date certain specifying the day, month, and year, or to other laws of the United States as of a date certain specifying the day, month, and year. (B)(1) For purposes of applying section 5733.04, 5745.01, or 5747.01 of the Revised Code to a taxpayer's taxable year ending after March 15, 2023, and before the effective date, a taxpayer may irrevocably elect to incorporate the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the United States that are in effect for federal income tax purposes for that taxable year if those provisions differ from the provisions that, under division (A) of this section, would otherwise apply. The filing by the taxpayer for that taxable year of a report or return that incorporates the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the United States applicable for federal income tax purposes for that taxable year, and that does not include any adjustments to reverse the effects of any differences between those provisions and the provisions that would otherwise apply, constitutes the making of an irrevocable election under this division for that taxable year. (2) Elections under prior versions of division (B)(1) of this section remain in effect for the taxable years to which they apply. Sec. 5703.052. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the tax refund fund, from which refunds shall be paid for amounts illegally or erroneously assessed or collected, or for any other reason overpaid, with respect to taxes levied by Chapter 4301., 4305., 5726., 5728., 5729., 5731., 5733., 5735., 5736., 5739., 5741., 5743., 5747., 5748., 5749., 5751., or 5753. and sections 3737.71, 3905.35, 3905.36, 4303.33, 5707.03, 5725.18, 5727.28, 5727.38, 5727.81, and 5727.811 of the Revised Code. Refunds for fees levied under sections 3734.90 to 3734.9014 of the Revised Code, wireless 9-1-1 charges imposed under section 128.40 of the Revised Code, next generation 9-1-1 access fees imposed under sections 128.41 and 128.42 of the Revised Code, or any penalties assessed with respect to such fees or charges, that are illegally or erroneously assessed or collected, or for any other reason overpaid, also shall be paid from the fund. Refunds for amounts illegally or erroneously assessed or collected by the tax commissioner, or for any other reason overpaid, that are due under section 1509.50 of the Revised Code shall be paid from the fund. Refunds for amounts illegally or erroneously assessed or collected by the commissioner, or for any other reason overpaid to the commissioner, under sections 718.80 to 718.95 of the Revised Code shall be paid from the fund. However, refunds for amounts illegally or erroneously assessed or collected by the commissioner, or for any other reason overpaid to the commissioner, with respect to taxes levied under section 5739.101 of the Revised Code shall not be paid from the tax refund fund, but shall be paid as provided in section 5739.104 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Upon certification by the tax commissioner to the treasurer of state of a tax refund, a wireless 9-1-1 charge refund, a next generation 9-1-1 access fee refund, or another amount refunded, or by the superintendent of insurance of a domestic or foreign insurance tax refund, the treasurer of state shall place the amount certified to the credit of the fund. The certified amount transferred shall be derived from the receipts of the same tax, fee, wireless 9-1-1 charge, next generation 9-1-1 access fee, or other amount from which the refund arose. (2) When a refund is for a tax, fee, wireless 9-1-1 charge, next generation 9-1-1 access fee, or other amount that is not levied by the state or that was illegally or erroneously distributed to a taxing jurisdiction, the tax commissioner shall recover the amount of that refund from the next distribution of that tax, fee, wireless 9-1-1 charge, next generation 9-1-1 access fee, or other amount that otherwise would be made to the taxing jurisdiction. If the amount to be recovered would exceed twenty-five per cent of the next distribution of that tax, fee, wireless 9-1-1 charge, next generation 9-1-1 access fee, or other amount, the commissioner may spread the recovery over more than one future distribution, taking into account the amount to be recovered and the amount of the anticipated future distributions. In no event may the commissioner spread the recovery over a period to exceed thirty-six seventy-two months. Sec. 5703.19. (A) To carry out the purposes of the laws that the tax commissioner is required to administer, the commissioner or any person employed by the commissioner for that purpose, upon demand, may inspect books, accounts, records, and memoranda of any person or public utility subject to those laws, and may examine under oath any officer, agent, or employee of that person or public utility. If such books, accounts, records, or memoranda are kept electronically or available in an electronic format, the person or public utility shall provide such records to the commissioner electronically or in an electronic format at the commissioner's request. Any person other than the commissioner who makes a demand pursuant to this section shall produce the person's authority to make the inspection. (B) If a person or public utility receives at least ten days' written notice of a demand made under division (A) of this section and refuses to comply with that demand, a penalty of five hundred dollars shall be imposed upon the person or public utility for each day the person or public utility refuses to comply with the demand. Penalties imposed under this division may be assessed and collected in the same manner as assessments made under Chapter 3769., 4305., 5727., 5728., 5733., 5735., 5736., 5739., 5743., 5745., 5747., 5749., 5751., or 5753., or sections 718.90, 3734.90 to 3734.9014, of the Revised Code. Sec. 5703.21. (A) Except as provided in divisions (B) and (C) of this section, no agent of the department of taxation, except in the agent's report to the department or when called on to testify in any court or proceeding, shall divulge any information acquired by the agent as to the transactions, property, or business of any person while acting or claiming to act under orders of the department. Whoever violates this provision shall thereafter be disqualified from acting as an officer or employee or in any other capacity under appointment or employment of the department. (B)(1) For purposes of an audit pursuant to section 117.15 of the Revised Code, or an audit of the department pursuant to Chapter 117. of the Revised Code, or an audit, pursuant to that chapter, the objective of which is to express an opinion on a financial report or statement prepared or issued pursuant to division (A)(7) or (9) of section 126.21 of the Revised Code, the officers and employees of the auditor of state charged with conducting the audit shall have access to and the right to examine any state tax returns and state tax return information in the possession of the department to the extent that the access and examination are necessary for purposes of the audit. Any information acquired as the result of that access and examination shall not be divulged for any purpose other than as required for the audit or unless the officers and employees are required to testify in a court or proceeding under compulsion of legal process. Whoever violates this provision shall thereafter be disqualified from acting as an officer or employee or in any other capacity under appointment or employment of the auditor of state. (2) For purposes of an internal audit pursuant to section 126.45 of the Revised Code, the officers and employees of the office of internal audit in the office of budget and management charged with directing the internal audit shall have access to and the right to examine any state tax returns and state tax return information in the possession of the department to the extent that the access and examination are necessary for purposes of the internal audit. Any information acquired as the result of that access and examination shall not be divulged for any purpose other than as required for the internal audit or unless the officers and employees are required to testify in a court or proceeding under compulsion of legal process. Whoever violates this provision shall thereafter be disqualified from acting as an officer or employee or in any other capacity under appointment or employment of the office of internal audit. (3) As provided by section 6103(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, any federal tax returns or federal tax information that the department has acquired from the internal revenue service, through federal and state statutory authority, may be disclosed to the auditor of state or the office of internal audit solely for purposes of an audit of the department. (4) For purposes of Chapter 3739. of the Revised Code, an agent of the department of taxation may share information with the division of state fire marshal that the agent finds during the course of an investigation. (C) Division (A) of this section does not prohibit any of the following: (1) Divulging information contained in applications, complaints, and related documents filed with the department under section 5715.27 of the Revised Code or in applications filed with the department under section 5715.39 of the Revised Code; (2) Providing to the attorney general information the department obtains under division (J) of section 1346.01 of the Revised Code; (3) Permitting properly authorized officers, employees, or agents of a municipal corporation from inspecting reports or information pursuant to section 718.84 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under section 5745.16 of the Revised Code; (4) Providing information regarding the name, account number, or business address of a holder of a vendor's license issued pursuant to section 5739.17 of the Revised Code, a holder of a direct payment permit issued pursuant to section 5739.031 of the Revised Code, or a seller having a use tax account maintained pursuant to section 5741.17 of the Revised Code, or information regarding the active or inactive status of a vendor's license, direct payment permit, or seller's use tax account; (5) Providing to a county auditor notices or documents concerning or affecting the taxable value of property in the county auditor's county. Unless authorized by law to disclose documents so provided, the county auditor shall not disclose such documents; (6) Providing to a county auditor a sales or use tax return or audit information under section 333.06 of the Revised Code; (7) Disclosing to a state or federal government agency, for use in the performance of that agency's official duties in this state, information in the possession of the tax commissioner necessary to verify compliance with any provision of the Revised Code or federal law relating to that agency. Unless disclosure is otherwise authorized by law, information provided to any state or federal government agency under this section remains confidential and is not subject to further disclosure; (8) Disclosing to a current or former employee, for use in preparation of the employee's income tax return, the account number issued by the tax commissioner to an employer for use in filing returns and making payments under section 5747.07 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may require the employee to provide evidence of current or past employment before such disclosure; (9) Publishing or disclosing the amount of revenue distributed to a county, municipal corporation, township, school district, or any other political subdivision from any tax or fund administered by the tax commissioner; (10) Disclosing to a county auditor information in or discovered pursuant to the property tax relief screening system created in section 5703.83 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5703.37. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, whenever service of a notice or order is required in the manner provided in this section, a copy of the notice or order shall be served upon the person affected thereby either by personal service, by certified mail, or by a delivery service authorized under section 5703.056 of the Revised Code that notifies the tax commissioner of the date of delivery. (2) In lieu of serving a copy of a notice or order through one of the means provided in division (A)(1) of this section, the commissioner may serve a notice or order upon the person affected thereby through alternative means as provided in this section, including, but not limited to, delivery by secure electronic mail as provided in division (F) of this section or by ordinary mail. Delivery by such means satisfies the requirements for delivery under this section. (B)(1)(a) If certified or ordinary mail is returned because of an undeliverable address, the commissioner shall first utilize reasonable means to ascertain a new last known address, including the use of a change of address service offered by the United States postal service or an authorized delivery service under section 5703.056 of the Revised Code. If, after using reasonable means, the commissioner is unable to ascertain a new last known address, the assessment is final for purposes of section 131.02 of the Revised Code sixty days after the notice or order sent by certified mail is first returned to the commissioner, and the commissioner shall certify the notice or order, if applicable, to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code. (b) Notwithstanding certification to the attorney general under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, once the commissioner or attorney general, or the designee of either, makes an initial contact with the person to whom the notice or order is directed, the person may protest an assessment by filing a petition for reassessment within sixty days after the initial contact. The certification of an assessment under division (B)(1)(a) of this section is prima-facie evidence that delivery is complete and that the notice or order is served. (2) If mailing of a notice or order by certified or ordinary mail is returned for some cause other than an undeliverable address or if a person does not access an electronic notice or order within the time provided in division (F) of this section, the commissioner shall resend the notice or order by ordinary mail. The notice or order shall show the date the commissioner sends the notice or order and include the following statement: "This notice or order is deemed to be served on the addressee under applicable law ten days from the date this notice or order was mailed by the commissioner as shown on the notice or order, and all periods within which an appeal may be filed apply from and after that date." Unless the mailing is returned because of an undeliverable address, the mailing of that information is prima-facie evidence that delivery of the notice or order was completed ten days after the commissioner sent resent the notice or order by ordinary mail and that the notice or order was served. If the ordinary mail mailing is subsequently returned because of an undeliverable address, the commissioner shall proceed under division (B)(1)(a) of this section. A person may challenge the presumption of delivery and service under this division in accordance with division (C) of this section. (C)(1) A person disputing the presumption of delivery and service under division (B) of this section bears the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the address to which the notice or order was sent was not an address with which the person was associated at the time the commissioner originally mailed the notice or order by certified mail. For the purposes of this section, a person is associated with an address at the time the commissioner originally mailed the notice or order if, at that time, the person was residing, receiving legal documents, or conducting business at the address; or if, before that time, the person had conducted business at the address and, when the notice or order was mailed, the person's agent or the person's affiliate was conducting business at the address. For the purposes of this section, a person's affiliate is any other person that, at the time the notice or order was mailed, owned or controlled at least twenty per cent, as determined by voting rights, of the addressee's business. (2) If the person elects to protest an assessment certified to the attorney general for collection, the person must do so within sixty days after the attorney general's initial contact with the person. The attorney general may enter into a compromise with the person under sections 131.02 and 5703.06 of the Revised Code if the person does not file a petition for reassessment with the commissioner. (D) Nothing in this section prohibits the commissioner or the commissioner's designee from delivering a notice or order by personal service. (E) Collection actions taken pursuant to section 131.02 of the Revised Code upon any assessment being challenged under division (B)(1)(b) of this section shall be stayed upon the pendency of an appeal under this section. If a petition for reassessment is filed pursuant to this section on a claim that has been certified to the attorney general for collection, the claim shall be uncertified. (F)(1) The commissioner may serve a notice or order upon the person affected by the notice or order or that person's authorized representative through secure electronic means associated with the person's or representative's last known address, but only with the person's consent. The commissioner must inform the recipient, electronically or by mail, that a notice or order is available for electronic review and provide instructions to access and print the notice or order. The types of electronic notification the commissioner may use include electronic mail, text message, or any other form of electronic communication. The recipient's electronic access of the notice or order satisfies the requirements for delivery under this section. If the recipient fails to access the notice or order electronically within ten business days, then the commissioner shall inform the recipient a second time, electronically or by mail, that a notice or order is available for electronic review and provide instructions to access and print the notice or order. If the recipient fails to access the notice or order electronically within ten business days of the second notification, the notice or order shall be served upon the person through the means provided in division (B)(2) of this section. (2) The tax commissioner shall establish a system to issue notification of assessments to taxpayers through secure electronic means. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Last known address" means the address the department has at the time the document is originally sent by certified or ordinary mail, or any address the department can ascertain using reasonable means such as the use of a change of address service offered by the United States postal service or an authorized delivery service under section 5703.056 of the Revised Code. For documents sent by secure electronic means, "last known address" means an electronic mode of communication that is identified on a form prescribed by the commissioner for such purpose or that is associated with the person or the authorized representative of the person as of the date the notification was sent on the Ohio business gateway, as defined in section 718.01 of the Revised Code, as of the date the notification was sentor another electronic filing or payment system prescribed by the commissioner. (2) "Undeliverable address" means an address to which the United States postal service or an authorized delivery service under section 5703.056 of the Revised Code is not able to deliver a notice or order, except when the reason for nondelivery is because the addressee fails to acknowledge or accept the notice or order. Sec. 5703.70. (A) On the filing of an application for refund under section 718.91, 3734.905, 4307.05, 4307.07, 5726.30, 5727.28, 5727.91, 5728.061, 5733.12, 5735.122, 5735.13, 5735.14, 5735.141, 5735.142, 5735.18, 5736.08, 5739.07, 5739.071, 5739.104, 5741.10, 5743.05, 5743.53, 5747.11, 5749.08, 5751.08, or 5753.06 of the Revised Code, or an application for compensation under section 5739.061 of the Revised Code, if the tax commissioner determines that the amount of the refund or compensation to which the applicant is entitled is less than the amount claimed in the application, the commissioner shall give the applicant written notice electronically or by ordinary mail of the amount. The If sent by ordinary mail, the notice shall be sent to the address shown on the application unless the applicant notifies the commissioner of a different address. If sent electronically, the notice shall be sent to the person or the person's authorized representative through secure electronic means associated with the person's or representative's last known electronic mail address, but only with the person's consent. The applicant shall have sixty days from the date the commissioner electronically sends or mails the notice to provide additional information to the commissioner or request a hearing, or both. (B) If the applicant neither requests a hearing nor provides additional information to the tax commissioner within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the commissioner shall take no further action, and the refund or compensation amount denied becomes final. (C)(1) If the applicant requests a hearing within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the tax commissioner shall assign a time and place for the hearing and notify the applicant of such time and place, but the commissioner may continue the hearing from time to time, as necessary. After the hearing, the commissioner may make such adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper, and shall issue a final determination thereon. (2) If the applicant does not request a hearing, but provides additional information, within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the commissioner shall review the information, make such adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper, and issue a final determination thereon. The commissioner may review such information and make such adjustments as many times as the commissioner finds proper before the issuance of a final determination. (3) If the applicant requests a hearing and provides additional information within the time prescribed by division (A) of this section, the commissioner may review the information and make such adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper. The commissioner may review such information and make such adjustments as many times as the commissioner finds proper before the issuance of a final determination. The commissioner shall assign a time and place for the hearing and notify the applicant of such time and place, but the commissioner may continue the hearing from time to time, as necessary. After the hearing, the commissioner may make any additional adjustments to the refund or compensation as the commissioner finds proper and shall issue a final determination thereon. (4) The commissioner shall serve a copy of the final determination made under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section on the applicant in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code, and the decision is final, subject to appeal under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. (D) The tax commissioner shall certify to the director of budget and management and treasurer of state for payment from the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised Code, the amount of the refund to be refunded under division (B) or (C) of this section. The commissioner also shall certify to the director and treasurer of state for payment from the general revenue fund the amount of compensation to be paid under division (B) or (C) of this section. Sec. 5703.83. (A) The department of taxation shall establish policies, procedures, and internal controls, including implementing a property tax relief screening system to evaluate the eligibility of owners of real property and manufactured and mobile homes in this state that receive one or both of the following reductions in taxes: (1) The reduction authorized under division (B) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code; (2) The reductions authorized under division (A) of section 323.152 and section 4503.065 of the Revised Code. (B) Each county auditor shall have access to the property tax relief screening system authorized under this section. If a county auditor discovers an error in the system relative to real property or a manufactured or mobile home, the auditor shall notify the department of taxation of the error. (C) If the department of taxation discovers through the property tax relief screening system that real property or a manufactured or mobile home was granted one or more of the reductions described in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section for one or more tax years in which the property or home was not eligible for the reduction, the department shall notify the county auditor of the county in which the property or manufactured or mobile home is located. (D) The tax commissioner, on or before the last day of each calendar year, beginning in 2026, shall annually submit to the general assembly a report in accordance with division (B) of section 101.68 of the Revised Code that lists the number, arranged by county, of parcels of real property or manufactured or mobile homes that were identified through the property tax relief screening system as not eligible for a reduction in taxes since the inception of the system, for the first report, or since the preceding report. Sec. 5705.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Subdivision" means any county; municipal corporation; township; township police district; joint police district; township fire district; joint fire district; joint ambulance district; joint emergency medical services district; fire and ambulance district; joint recreation district; township waste disposal district; township road district; community college district; technical college district; detention facility district; a district organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code; a combined district organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code; a joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district; a drainage improvement district created under section 6131.52 of the Revised Code; a lake facilities authority created under Chapter 353. of the Revised Code; a union cemetery district; a county school financing district; a city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, joint vocational school district; a regional student education district created under section 3313.83 of the Revised Code; or a career-technical cooperative education district created under section 3313.831 of the Revised Code. (B) "Municipal corporation" means all municipal corporations, including those that have adopted a charter under Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution. (C) "Taxing authority" or "bond issuing authority" means, in any of the following: (1) In the case of any county, the board of county commissioners; in the case of a municipal corporation, the council or other legislative authority of the municipal corporation; in the case of a city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district, the board of education; in the case of a community college district, the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a technical college district, the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a detention facility district, a district organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, or a combined district organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code, the joint board of county commissioners of the district; in the case of a township, the board of township trustees; in the case of a joint police district, the joint police district board; in the case of a joint fire district, the board of fire district trustees; in the case of a joint recreation district, the joint recreation district board of trustees; in the case of a joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district, the district's board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services; in the case of a joint ambulance district or a fire and ambulance district, the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a union cemetery district, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation and the board of township trustees, acting jointly as described in section 759.341 of the Revised Code; in the case of a drainage improvement district, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the drainage district is located; in the case of a lake facilities authority, the board of directors; in the case of a joint emergency medical services district, the joint board of county commissioners of all counties in which all or any part of the district lies; and in the case of a township police district, a township fire district, a township road district, or a township waste disposal district, the board of township trustees of the township in which the district is located. "Taxing authority" also means the (2) The educational service center governing board that serves as the taxing authority of a county school financing district as provided in section 3311.50 of the Revised Code, the board of directors of a regional student education district created under section 3313.83 of the Revised Code, and the board of directors of a career-technical cooperative education district created under section 3313.831 of the Revised Code. (3) The governing body responsible for levying a tax for any taxing unit for which a taxing authority is not defined pursuant to division (C)(1) or (2) of this section. (D) "Fiscal officer" in the case of a county, means the county auditor; in the case of a municipal corporation, the city auditor or village clerk, or an officer who, by virtue of the charter, has the duties and functions of the city auditor or village clerk, except that in the case of a municipal university the board of directors of which have assumed, in the manner provided by law, the custody and control of the funds of the university, the chief accounting officer of the university shall perform, with respect to the funds, the duties vested in the fiscal officer of the subdivision by sections 5705.41 and 5705.44 of the Revised Code; in the case of a school district, the treasurer of the board of education; in the case of a county school financing district, the treasurer of the educational service center governing board that serves as the taxing authority; in the case of a township, the township fiscal officer; in the case of a joint police district, the treasurer of the district; in the case of a joint fire district, the clerk of the board of fire district trustees; in the case of a joint ambulance district, the clerk of the board of trustees of the district; in the case of a joint emergency medical services district, the person appointed as fiscal officer pursuant to division (D) of section 307.053 of the Revised Code; in the case of a fire and ambulance district, the person appointed as fiscal officer pursuant to division (B) of section 505.375 of the Revised Code; in the case of a joint recreation district, the person designated pursuant to section 755.15 of the Revised Code; in the case of a union cemetery district, the clerk of the municipal corporation designated in section 759.34 of the Revised Code; in the case of a children's home district, educational service center, general health district, joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district, county library district, detention facility district, district organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, a combined district organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code, or a metropolitan park district for which no treasurer has been appointed pursuant to section 1545.07 of the Revised Code, the county auditor of the county designated by law to act as the auditor of the district; in the case of a metropolitan park district which has appointed a treasurer pursuant to section 1545.07 of the Revised Code, that treasurer; in the case of a drainage improvement district, the auditor of the county in which the drainage improvement district is located; in the case of a lake facilities authority, the fiscal officer designated under section 353.02 of the Revised Code; in the case of a regional student education district, the fiscal officer appointed pursuant to section 3313.83 of the Revised Code; in the case of a career-technical cooperative education district, the fiscal officer appointed pursuant to section 3313.831 of the Revised Code; and in all other cases, the officer responsible for keeping the appropriation accounts and drawing warrants for the expenditure of the moneys of the district or taxing unit. (E) "Permanent improvement" or "improvement" means any property, asset, or improvement with an estimated life or usefulness of five years or more, including land and interests therein, and reconstructions, enlargements, and extensions thereof having an estimated life or usefulness of five years or more. (F) "Current operating expenses" and "current expenses" mean the lawful expenditures of a subdivision, except those for permanent improvements, and except payments for interest, sinking fund, and retirement of bonds, notes, and certificates of indebtedness of the subdivision. (G) "Debt charges" means interest, sinking fund, and retirement charges on bonds, notes, or certificates of indebtedness. (H) "Taxing unit" means any subdivision or other governmental district having authority to levy taxes on the property in the district or issue bonds that constitute a charge against the property of the district, including conservancy districts, metropolitan park districts, sanitary districts, road districts, and other districts. (I) "District authority" means any board of directors, trustees, commissioners, or other officers controlling a district institution or activity that derives its income or funds from two or more subdivisions, such as the educational service center, the trustees of district children's homes, the district board of health, a joint-county alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district's board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, detention facility districts, a joint recreation district board of trustees, districts organized under section 2151.65 of the Revised Code, combined districts organized under sections 2152.41 and 2151.65 of the Revised Code, and other such boards. (J) "Tax list" and "tax duplicate" mean the general tax lists and duplicates prescribed by sections 319.28 and 319.29 of the Revised Code. (K) "Property" as applied to a tax levy means taxable property listed on general tax lists and duplicates. (L) "Association library district" means a territory, the boundaries of which are defined by the state library board pursuant to division (I) of section 3375.01 of the Revised Code, in which a library association or private corporation maintains a free public library. (M) "Library district" means a territory, the boundaries of which are defined by the state library board pursuant to section 3375.01 of the Revised Code, in which the board of trustees of a county, municipal corporation, school district, or township public library maintains a free public library. (N) "Qualifying library levy" means either of the following: (1) A levy for the support of a library association or private corporation that has an association library district with boundaries that are not identical to those of a subdivision; (2) A levy proposed under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for the support of the board of trustees of a public library that has a library district with boundaries that are not identical to those of a subdivision. (O) "School library district" means a school district in which a free public library has been established that is under the control and management of a board of library trustees as provided in section 3375.15 of the Revised Code. (P) "The county auditor's appraised market value" means the true value in money of real property. (Q)(1) "Effective rate" means one of the following: (a) For a levy that is the renewal of an existing levy or an existing levy extended to additional territory, the effective tax rate of the levy on class one property, as most recently determined by the county auditor under section 323.08 of the Revised Code; (b) For a levy that is the increase of an existing levy, the effective tax rate of the portion of the levy equal to the rate of the existing levy on class one property, as most recently determined by the county auditor under section 323.08 of the Revised Code, plus the rate of the additional portion of the levy; (c) For a levy that is the decrease of an existing levy, the effective tax rate of the levy on class one property, as most recently determined by the county auditor under section 323.08 of the Revised Code, and as proportionately reduced to account for the decrease pursuant to rules adopted by the tax commissioner. (2) As used in division (Q)(1) of this section: (a) "Effective tax rate" has the same meaning in section 323.08 of the Revised Code. (b) "Class one property" means real property classified as residential or agricultural under section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. (R) "Qualifying subdivision" means a taxing unit, created by one or more member authorities, with a taxing authority or any other governing authority the majority of the members of which are not required to be elected local officials. (S) "Elected local official" means a member of a board of township trustees, a board of county commissioners, a legislative authority of a municipal corporation, a board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or an educational service center governing board, or any other township, county, or municipal official serving in an elected office. (T) "Member authority" means the board of commissioners of a county, the board of trustees of a township, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, or the educational service center governing board that either created or joined a qualifying subdivision and remains a member thereof or has territory therein. Sec. 5705.03. (A) The taxing authority of each subdivision may levy taxes annually, subject to the limitations of sections 5705.01 to 5705.47 of the Revised Code, on the real and personal property within the subdivision for the purpose of paying the current operating expenses of the subdivision and acquiring or constructing permanent improvements. The taxing authority of each subdivision and taxing unit shall, subject to the limitations of such sections, levy such taxes annually as are necessary to pay the interest and sinking fund on and retire at maturity the bonds, notes, and certificates of indebtedness of such subdivision and taxing unit, including levies in anticipation of which the subdivision or taxing unit has incurred indebtedness. (B)(1) When a taxing authority determines that it is necessary to levy a tax outside the ten-mill limitation for any purpose authorized by the Revised Code, the taxing authority shall certify to the county auditor a resolution or ordinance requesting that the county auditor certify to the taxing authority the amounts described in division (B)(2) of this section. The resolution or ordinance shall state all of the following: (a) The proposed rate of the tax, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, or the dollar amount of revenue to be generated by the proposed tax; (b) The purpose of the tax; (c) Whether the tax is an additional levy, a renewal or a replacement of an existing tax, a renewal or replacement of an existing tax with an increase or a decrease, a reduction or decrease of an existing tax, or an extension of an existing tax to additional territory; (d) The section of the Revised Code authorizing submission of the question of the tax; (e) The term of years of the tax or if the tax is for a continuing period of time; (f) That the tax is to be levied upon the entire territory of the subdivision or, if authorized by the Revised Code, a description of the portion of the territory of the subdivision in which the tax is to be levied; (g) The date of the election at which the question of the tax shall appear on the ballot; (h) That the ballot measure shall be submitted to the entire territory of the subdivision or, if authorized by the Revised Code, a description of the portion of the territory of the subdivision to which the ballot measure shall be submitted; (i) The tax year in which the tax will first be levied and the calendar year in which the tax will first be collected; (j) Each such county in which the subdivision has territory. The board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district may also designate, in a resolution adopted under division (B)(1) of this section, an amount of the district's carry-over balance from the proceeding fiscal year, based on the most recent certification made by the district under section 5705.36 of the Revised Code, as reserved for expenditure on current or future permanent improvements within the following three years. (2) Upon receipt of a resolution or ordinance certified under division (B)(1) of this section, the county auditor shall certify to the taxing authority each of the following, as applicable to that levy: (a) The total current tax valuation of the subdivision. (b) The number of mills for each one dollar of taxable value that is required to generate a specified amount of revenue. (c) Either of the following: (i) If the levy is to renew, renew and increase, renew and decrease, reduce or decrease, or extend to additional territory an existing levy that is subject to reduction under section 319.301 of the Revised Code, the levy's effective rate, expressed in dollars, rounded to the nearest dollar, for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value; (ii) For all other levies, the levy's rate, described in division (B)(2)(b) or (d) of this section, expressed in dollars, rounded to the nearest dollar, for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. (d) The dollar amount of revenue, rounded to the nearest dollar, that would be generated by a specified number of mills for each one dollar of taxable value. (e) For any levy or portion of a levy except a levy or portion of a levy to pay debt charges, an estimate of the levy's annual collections, rounded to the nearest dollar, which shall be calculated assuming that the amount of the tax list of the taxing authority remains throughout the life of the levy the same as the amount of the tax list most recently certified by the auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. (f) If the purpose of the tax is for current expenses or current operating expenses and the resolution is certified by a city, local, or exempted village school district, the amount by which the carry-over balance in the district's general operating budget from the preceding fiscal year exceeds the district's general fund expenditures made in the preceding fiscal year, expressed both in dollars and as a percentage of those expenditures. This amount and percentage shall be determined on the basis of the most recent certification made by the district to the county budget commission under section 5705.36 of the Revised Code. The auditor shall exclude any amount designated under division (B)(1) of this section for current or future permanent improvements in determining the district's carry-over balance for the purpose of this computation. If a subdivision is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain from the county auditor of each other county in which the subdivision is located the current tax valuation for the portion of the subdivision in that county. The county auditor shall issue the certification to the taxing authority within ten days after receiving the taxing authority's resolution or ordinance requesting it. (3) Upon receiving the certification from the county auditor under division (B)(2) of this section, unless the percentage certified under division (B)(2)(f) of this section is one hundred per cent or more, except in the case of a renewal levy, the taxing authority may adopt a resolution or ordinance stating the rate of the tax levy, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and the rate or effective rate, as applicable, in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, as estimated by the county auditor, and that the taxing authority will proceed with the submission of the question of the tax to electors. The taxing authority shall certify this resolution or ordinance, a copy of the county auditor's certifications, and the resolution or ordinance the taxing authority adopted under division (B)(1) of this section to the proper county board of elections in the manner and within the time prescribed by the section of the Revised Code governing submission of the question. The county board of elections shall not submit the question of the tax to electors unless a copy of the county auditor's certification accompanies the resolutions or ordinances the taxing authority certifies to the board. Before requesting a taxing authority to submit a tax levy, any agency or authority authorized to make that request shall first request the certification from the county auditor provided under this section. (4) This division is supplemental to, and not in derogation of, any similar requirement governing the certification by the county auditor of the tax valuation of a subdivision or necessary tax rates for the purposes of the submission of the question of a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation, including sections section 133.18 and 5705.195 of the Revised Code. (C) All taxes levied on property shall be extended on the tax list and duplicate by the county auditor of the county in which the property is located, and shall be collected by the county treasurer of such county in the same manner and under the same laws and rules as are prescribed for the assessment and collection of county taxes. The proceeds of any tax levied by or for any subdivision when received by its fiscal officer shall be deposited in its treasury to the credit of the appropriate fund. Sec. 5705.12. In addition to the funds provided for by sections 5705.09, 5705.121, 5705.13, and 5705.131 of the Revised Code, the taxing authority of a subdivision may establish, with the approval of and in the manner prescribed by the auditor of state, such other funds as are desirable, and may provide by ordinance or resolution that money derived from specified sources other than the general property tax shall be paid directly into such funds. The auditor of state shall consult with the tax commissioner before approving such funds. Sec. 5705.121. A municipal corporation may establish in the manner provided by law a sanitary police pension fund, an urban redevelopment tax increment equivalent fund, or a cemetery fund. A township may establish by law a cemetery fund. A subdivision that levies a tax for the purpose described in division (ZZ) or (AAA) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code shall establish a general capital and infrastructure fund to which the proceeds from that levy shall be credited. By resolution or ordinance, the taxing authority may establish accounts within that fund for any of the several particular purposes for which such money may lawfully be spent, may eliminate such accounts when no longer necessary or desirable, and may transfer money between such accounts. Money in the fund may not be used to pay the compensation of officers or employees of the subdivision. The board of health of a city or general health district may establish the home health services fund referred to in section 3709.15 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.13. (A) A taxing authority of a subdivision, by resolution or ordinance, may establish reserve balance accounts to accumulate currently available resources for the following purposes: (1) To stabilize subdivision budgets against cyclical changes in revenues and expenditures; (2) Except as otherwise provided by this section, to provide for the payment of claims and deductibles under an individual or joint self-insurance program for the subdivision, if the subdivision is permitted by law to establish such a program; (3) To provide for the payment of claims, assessments, and deductibles under a self-insurance program, individual retrospective ratings plan, group rating plan, group retrospective rating plan, medical only program, deductible plan, or large deductible plan for workers' compensation. The ordinance or resolution establishing a reserve balance account shall state the purpose for which the account is established, the fund in which the account is to be established, and the total amount of money to be reserved in the account. Not more than one reserve balance account may be established for each of the purposes permitted under divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section. Money to the credit of a reserve balance account may be expended only for the purpose for which the account was established. A reserve balance account established for the purpose described in division (A)(1) of this section may be established in the general fund or in one or more special funds for operating purposes of the subdivision. The amount of money to be reserved in such an account in any fiscal year shall not exceed five per cent of the revenue credited in the preceding fiscal year to the fund in which the account is established, or, in the case of a reserve balance account of a county or of a township, the greater of that amount or one-sixth of the expenditures during the preceding fiscal year from the fund in which the account is established. Subject to division (F) of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code, any reserve balance in an account established under division (A)(1) of this section shall not be considered part of the unencumbered balance or revenue of the subdivision under division (A) of section 5705.35 or division (A)(1) of section 5705.36 of the Revised Code. At any time, a taxing authority of a subdivision, by resolution or ordinance, may reduce or eliminate the reserve balance in a reserve balance account established for the purpose described in division (A)(1) of this section. A reserve balance account established for the purpose described in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section shall be established in the general fund of the subdivision or by the establishment of a separate internal service fund established to account for the operation of an individual or joint self-insurance program described in division (A)(2) of this section or a workers' compensation program or plan described in division (A)(3) of this section, and shall be based on sound actuarial principles. The total amount of money in a reserve balance account for self-insurance may be expressed in dollars or as the amount determined to represent an adequate reserve according to sound actuarial principles. A taxing authority of a subdivision, by resolution or ordinance, may rescind a reserve balance account established under this division. If a reserve balance account is rescinded, money that has accumulated in the account shall be transferred to the fund or funds from which the money originally was transferred. (B) A taxing authority of a subdivision, by resolution or ordinance, may establish a special revenue fund for the purpose of accumulating resources for the payment of accumulated sick leave and vacation leave, and for payments in lieu of taking compensatory time off, upon the termination of employment or the retirement of officers and employees of the subdivision. The special revenue fund may also accumulate resources for payment of salaries during any fiscal year when the number of pay periods exceeds the usual and customary number of pay periods. Notwithstanding sections 5705.14, 5705.15, and 5705.16 of the Revised Code, the taxing authority, by resolution or ordinance, may transfer money to the special revenue fund from any other fund of the subdivision from which such payments may lawfully be made. The taxing authority, by resolution or ordinance, may rescind a special revenue fund established under this division. If a special revenue fund is rescinded, money that has accumulated in the fund shall be transferred to the fund or funds from which the money originally was transferred. (C) A taxing authority of a subdivision, by resolution or ordinance, may establish a capital projects fund for the purpose of accumulating resources for the acquisition, construction, or improvement of fixed assets of the subdivision. For the purposes of this section, "fixed assets" includes motor vehicles. More than one capital projects fund may be established and may exist at any time. The ordinance or resolution shall identify the source of the money to be used to acquire, construct, or improve the fixed assets identified in the resolution or ordinance, the amount of money to be accumulated for that purpose, the period of time over which that amount is to be accumulated, and the fixed assets that the taxing authority intends to acquire, construct, or improve with the money to be accumulated in the fund. A taxing authority of a subdivision shall not accumulate money in a capital projects fund for more than ten years after the resolution or ordinance establishing the fund is adopted. If the subdivision has not entered into a contract for the acquisition, construction, or improvement of fixed assets for which money was accumulated in such a fund before the end of that ten-year period, the fiscal officer of the subdivision shall transfer all money in the fund to the fund or funds from which that money originally was transferred or the fund that originally was intended to receive the money. A taxing authority of a subdivision, by resolution or ordinance, may rescind a capital projects fund. If a capital projects fund is rescinded, money that has accumulated in the fund shall be transferred to the fund or funds from which the money originally was transferred. Notwithstanding sections 5705.14, 5705.15, and 5705.16 of the Revised Code, the taxing authority of a subdivision, by resolution or ordinance, may transfer money to the capital projects fund from any other fund of the subdivision that may lawfully be used for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, or improving the fixed assets identified in the resolution or ordinance. Sec. 5705.131. A taxing authority of a subdivision may establish a nonexpendable trust fund for the purpose of receiving donations or contributions that the donor or contributor requires to be maintained intact. The principal of such fund may be invested, and the investment earnings on the principal shall be credited to the fund. The principal of the fund, and any additions to principal arising from sources other than the reinvestment of investment earnings arising from the fund, shall not be considered part of the unencumbered balance or revenue of the subdivision under division (A) of section 5705.35 or division (A)(1) of section 5705.36 of the Revised Code. Only investment earnings arising from investment of the principal or investment of such additions to principal may be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue of the subdivision under that division. Sec. 5705.132. In addition to any reserve balance account established under section 5705.13 of the Revised Code, a board of township trustees, by resolution, may establish a reserve balance account to accumulate currently available resources for any purpose for which the board may lawfully expend money of the township other than for the purposes for which a reserve balance account may be established under section 5705.13 of the Revised Code. Money may be transferred to the reserve balance account from another fund or account of the township only if money in that fund or account may lawfully be expended for the purpose for which the reserve balance account is created. A reserve balance account created under this section may exist for not more than five fiscal years beginning with the first fiscal year in which money is credited to the account. The total amount of money to the credit of all reserve balance accounts established under this section at any time in any fiscal year shall not exceed five per cent of the total of the township's revenue from all sources for the preceding fiscal year and any unencumbered balances carried over to the current fiscal year from the preceding fiscal year. Money in a reserve balance account shall be expended only for the purpose for which the account is established. More than one reserve balance account may be established under this section. The resolution establishing a reserve balance account shall state the specific purpose for which the account is established, the fund within which the account is established, the fund or account from which money shall be transferred to the account, and the number of years the account will exist. The resolution shall specify the maximum total amount of money that may be credited to the account during its existence and the maximum amount of money to be credited to the account each fiscal year the account exists. The board, by subsequent resolution, may change the amount to be credited and the source from which money is transferred, subject to the limitations of this section. The board, by resolution, may rescind a reserve balance account established under this section before the expiration of the account. The board, by resolution, may extend the life of a reserve balance account, provided that the total number of years the fund exists shall not exceed five fiscal years beginning with the first fiscal year in which money is credited to the account. Upon the expiration or rescission of a reserve balance account established under this section, any unexpended balance in the account shall be transferred to the fund or account from which money in the account was originally transferred. If money in the account originally was transferred from more than one fund or account, a pro rata share of the unexpended balance shall be transferred to each such fund or account proportionate to the amount originally transferred from that fund or account. The balance to the credit of a reserve balance account shall not be considered part of the unencumbered balance or revenue of the township under division (A) of section 5705.35 or division (A)(1) of section 5705.36 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.14. No transfer shall be made from one fund of a subdivision to any other fund, by order of the court or otherwise, except as follows: (A) The unexpended balance in a bond fund that is no longer needed for the purpose for which such fund was created shall be transferred to the sinking fund or bond retirement fund from which such bonds are payable. (B) The unexpended balance in any specific permanent improvement fund, other than a bond fund, after the payment of all obligations incurred in the acquisition of such improvement, shall be transferred to the sinking fund or bond retirement fund of the subdivision; provided that if such money is not required to meet the obligations payable from such funds, it may be transferred to a special fund for the acquisition of permanent improvements, or, with the approval of the court of common pleas of the county in which such subdivision is located, to the general fund of the subdivision. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, the unexpended balance in the sinking fund or bond retirement fund of a subdivision, after all indebtedness, interest, and other obligations for the payment of which such fund exists have been paid and retired, shall be transferred, in the case of the sinking fund, to the bond retirement fund, and in the case of the bond retirement fund, to the sinking fund; provided that if such transfer is impossible by reason of the nonexistence of the fund to receive the transfer, such unexpended balance, with the approval of the court of common pleas of the county in which such division is located, may be transferred to any other fund of the subdivision. (2) Money in a bond fund or bond retirement fund of a city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district may be transferred to a specific permanent improvement fund provided that the county budget commission of the county in which the school district is located approves the transfer upon its determination that the money transferred will not be required to meet the obligations payable from the bond fund or bond retirement fund. In arriving at such a determination, the county budget commission shall consider the balance of the bond fund or bond retirement fund, the outstanding obligations payable from the fund, and the sources and timing of the fund's revenue. (D) The unexpended balance in any special fund, other than an improvement fund, existing in accordance with division (D), (F), or (G) of section 5705.09 or section 5705.12 of the Revised Code, may be transferred to the general fund or to the sinking fund or bond retirement fund after the termination of the activity, service, or other undertaking for which such special fund existed, but only after the payment of all obligations incurred and payable from such special fund. (E) Money may be transferred from the general fund to any other fund of the subdivision. (F) Moneys retained or received by a county under section 4501.04 or division (A)(2) of section 5735.27 of the Revised Code may be transferred from the fund into which they were deposited to the sinking fund or bond retirement fund from which any principal, interest, or charges for which such moneys may be used is payable. (G) Moneys retained or received by a municipal corporation under section 4501.04 or division (A)(1) of section 5735.27 of the Revised Code may be transferred from the fund into which they were deposited to the sinking fund or bond retirement fund from which any principal, interest, or charges for which such moneys may be used is payable. (H)(1) Money may be transferred from the county developmental disabilities general fund to the county developmental disabilities capital fund established under section 5705.091 of the Revised Code or to any other fund created for the purposes of the county board of developmental disabilities, so long as money in the fund to which the money is transferred can be spent for the particular purpose of the transferred money. The county board of developmental disabilities may request, by resolution, that the board of county commissioners make the transfer. The county board of developmental disabilities shall transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the board of county commissioners. Upon receiving the resolution, the board of county commissioners may make the transfer. Money transferred to a fund shall be credited to an account appropriate to its particular purpose. (2) An unexpended balance in an account in the county developmental disabilities capital fund or any other fund created for the purposes of the county board of developmental disabilities may be transferred back to the county developmental disabilities general fund. The transfer may be made if the unexpended balance is no longer needed for its particular purpose and all outstanding obligations have been paid. Money transferred back to the county developmental disabilities general fund shall be credited to an account for current expenses within that fund. The county board of developmental disabilities may request, by resolution, that the board of county commissioners make the transfer. The county board of developmental disabilities shall transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the board of county commissioners. Upon receiving the resolution, the board of county commissioners may make the transfer. (I) Money may be transferred from the public assistance fund established under section 5101.161 of the Revised Code to either of the following funds, so long as the money to be transferred from the public assistance fund may be spent for the purposes for which money in the receiving fund may be used: (1) The children services fund established under section 5101.144 5180.411 of the Revised Code; (2) The child support enforcement administrative fund established, as authorized under rules adopted by the director of job and family services, in the county treasury for use by any county family services agency. (J) Notwithstanding this section, money in any fund or account of a village dissolved in accordance with sections 703.31 to 703.39 of the Revised Code may be transferred by the receiver-trustee to a special account for the purpose of paying the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the dissolved village or to the general fund of any township into which the territory of the village is dissolved for any purpose that directly or indirectly benefits the former territory of the dissolved village. (K) Except in the case of transfer pursuant to division (E) or (J) of this section, transfers authorized by this section shall only be made by resolution of the taxing authority passed with the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members. Sec. 5705.17. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Qualifying levy" means any levy in excess of the ten-mill limitation for current expenses or current operating expenses. (2) "School district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district. (B) Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, any election notice and ballot language for qualifying levy submitted to electors by a school district shall display the information certified by the county auditor in division (B)(2)(f) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the notice and ballot to incorporate this information. Sec. 5705.194. The board of education of any city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district at any time before the effective date of this amendment may declare by resolution that the revenue that will be raised by all tax levies which the district is authorized to impose, when combined with state and federal revenues, will be insufficient to provide for the emergency requirements of the school district or to avoid an operating deficit, and that it is therefore necessary to levy an additional tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation. The resolution shall be confined to a single purpose and shall specify that purpose. If the levy is proposed to renew all or a portion of the proceeds derived from one or more existing levies imposed pursuant to this section, it shall be called a renewal levy and shall be so designated on the ballot. If two or more existing levies are to be included in a single renewal levy but are not scheduled to expire in the same year, the resolution shall specify that the existing levies to be renewed shall not be levied after the year preceding the year in which the renewal levy is first imposed. Notwithstanding the original purpose of any one or more existing levies that are to be in any single renewal levy, the purpose of the renewal levy may be either to avoid an operating deficit or to provide for the emergency requirements of the school district. The resolution shall further specify the amount of money it is necessary to raise for the specified purpose for each calendar year the millage is to be imposed; if a renewal levy, whether the levy is to renew all, or a portion of, the proceeds derived from one or more existing levies; and the number of years in which the millage is to be in effect, which may include a levy upon the current year's tax list. The number of years may be any number not exceeding ten. The question shall be submitted at a special election on a date specified in the resolution. The date shall not be earlier than eighty days after the adoption and certification of the resolution to the county auditor and shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. A resolution for a renewal levy shall not be placed on the ballot unless the question is submitted on a date on which a special election may be held under division (D) of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code, except for the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August, during the last year the levy to be renewed may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate, or at any election held in the ensuing year, except that if the resolution proposes renewing two or more existing levies, the question shall be submitted on the date of the general or primary election held during the last year at least one of the levies to be renewed may be extended on that list and duplicate, or at any election held during the ensuing year. For purposes of this section and sections 5705.197 and section 5705.199 of the Revised Code, a levy shall be considered to be an "existing levy" through the year following the last year it can be placed on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate. The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. A copy of the resolution shall immediately after its passing be certified to the county auditor of the proper county. Section 5705.195 of the Revised Code shall govern the arrangements for the submission of questions to the electors under this section and other matters concerning the election. Publication of notice of the election shall be made in one newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. If a majority of the electors voting on the question submitted in an election vote in favor of the levy, the board of education of the school district may make the additional levy necessary to raise the amount specified in the resolution for the purpose stated in the resolution. The tax levy shall be included in the next tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. After the approval of the levy and prior to the time when the first tax collection from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in an amount not exceeding the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. The notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have principal payment in the year of their issuance. Sec. 5705.199. (A) At any time before the effective date of this amendment the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that the revenue that will be raised by all tax levies that the district is authorized to impose, when combined with state and federal revenues, will be insufficient to provide for the necessary requirements of the school district, and that it is therefore necessary to levy a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the school district. Such a levy shall be proposed as a substitute for all or a portion of one or more existing levies imposed under sections section 5705.194 to 5705.197 of the Revised Code or under this section, by levying a tax as follows: (1) In the initial year the levy is in effect, the levy shall be in a specified amount of money equal to the aggregate annual dollar amount of proceeds derived from the levy or levies, or portion thereof, being substituted. (2) In each subsequent year the levy is in effect, the levy shall be in a specified amount of money equal to the sum of the following: (a) The dollar amount of the proceeds derived from the levy in the prior year; and (b) The dollar amount equal to the product of the total taxable value of all taxable real property in the school district in the then-current year, excluding carryover property as defined in section 319.301 of the Revised Code, multiplied by the annual levy, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, that was required to produce the annual dollar amount of the levy under this section in the prior year; provided, that the amount under division (A)(2)(b) of this section shall not be less than zero. (B) The resolution proposing the substitute levy shall specify the annual dollar amount the levy is to produce in its initial year; the first calendar year in which the levy will be due; and the term of the levy expressed in years, which may be any number not exceeding ten, or for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall specify the date of holding the election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after certification of the resolution to the board of elections, and which shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. If two or more existing levies are to be included in a single substitute levy, but are not scheduled to expire in the same year, the resolution shall specify that the existing levies to be substituted shall not be levied after the year preceding the year in which the substitute levy is first imposed. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. A copy of the resolution shall immediately after its passage be certified to the county auditor in the manner provided by section 5705.195 of the Revised Code, and sections 5705.194 and 5705.196 of the Revised Code shall govern the arrangements for the submission of the question and other matters concerning the notice of election and the election, except as may be provided otherwise in this section. (C) The form of the ballot to be used at the election on the question of a levy under this section shall be as follows: "Shall a tax levy substituting for an existing levy be imposed by the __________ (here insert name of school district) for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the school district in the initial sum of $__________ (here insert the annual dollar amount the levy is to produce in its initial year), and a levy of taxes be made outside of the ten-mill limitation estimated by the county auditor to require __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised value for the initial year of the tax, for a period of __________ (here insert the number of years the levy is to be imposed, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time), commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due), with the sum of such tax to increase only if and as new land or real property improvements not previously taxed by the school district are added to its tax list? FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " If the levy submitted is a proposal to substitute all or a portion of more than one existing levy, the form of the ballot may be changed so long as the ballot reflects the number of levies to be substituted and that none of the existing levies to be substituted will be levied after the year preceding the year in which the substitute levy is first imposed. The form of the ballot shall be modified by substituting the statement "Shall a tax levy substituting for an existing levy" with "Shall a tax levy substituting for existing levies" and adding the following statement after "added to its tax list?" and before "For the Tax Levy": "If approved, any remaining tax years on any of the __________ (here insert the number of existing levies) existing levies will not be collected after __________ (here insert the current tax year or, if not the current tax year, the applicable tax year)." (D) The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (E) If a majority of the electors voting on the question so submitted in an election vote in favor of the levy, the board of education may make the necessary levy within the school district at the rate and for the purpose stated in the resolution. The tax levy shall be included in the next tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. (F)(C) A levy for a continuing period of time may be decreased pursuant to section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. (G) A levy under this section substituting for all or a portion of one or more existing levies imposed under sections 5705.194 to 5705.197 of the Revised Code or under this section shall be treated as having renewed the levy or levies being substituted for purposes of the payments made under sections 5751.20 to 5751.22 of the Revised Code. (H)(D) After the approval of a levy on the current tax list and duplicate, and prior to the time when the first tax collection from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. The notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. Sec. 5705.21. (A) At any time, the board of education of any city, local, exempted village, cooperative education, or joint vocational school district, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that may be raised within the ten-mill limitation by levies on the current tax list will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the necessary requirements of the school district, that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of such limitation for one of the purposes specified in division (A), (D), (F), (H), or (DD) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, for general permanent improvements, for the purpose of operating a cultural center, for the purpose of providing for school safety and security, or for the purpose of providing education technology, and that the question of such additional tax levy shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election on a day to be specified in the resolution. In the case of a qualifying library levy for the support of a library association or private corporation, the question shall be submitted to the electors of the association library district. If the resolution states that the levy is for the purpose of operating a cultural center, the ballot shall state that the levy is "for the purpose of operating the__________ (name of cultural center)." As used in this division, "cultural center" means a freestanding building, separate from a public school building, that is open to the public for educational, musical, artistic, and cultural purposes; "education technology" means, but is not limited to, computer hardware, equipment, materials, and accessories, equipment used for two-way audio or video, and software; "general permanent improvements" means permanent improvements without regard to the limitation of division (F) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code that the improvements be a specific improvement or a class of improvements that may be included in a single bond issue; and "providing for school safety and security" includes but is not limited to providing for permanent improvements to provide or enhance security, employment of or contracting for the services of safety personnel, providing mental health services and counseling, or providing training in safety and security practices and responses. A resolution adopted under this division shall be confined to a single purpose and shall specify the amount of the increase in rate that it is necessary to levy, the purpose of the levy, and the number of years during which the increase in rate shall be in effect. The number of years may be any number not exceeding five or, if the levy is for current expenses of the district or for general permanent improvements, for a continuing period of time. (B)(1) The board of education of a qualifying school district, by resolution, may declare that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of paying the current expenses of partnering community schools and, if any of the levy proceeds are so allocated, of the district. A qualifying school district that is not a municipal school district may allocate all of the levy proceeds to partnering community schools. A municipal school district shall allocate a portion of the levy proceeds to the current expenses of the district. The resolution shall declare that the question of the additional tax levy shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election on a day to be specified in the resolution. The resolution shall state the purpose of the levy, the rate of the tax expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the number of such mills to be levied for the current expenses of the partnering community schools and the number of such mills, if any, to be levied for the current expenses of the school district, the number of years the tax will be levied, and the first year the tax will be levied. The number of years the tax may be levied may be any number not exceeding ten years, or for a continuing period of time. The levy of a tax for the current expenses of a partnering community school under this section and the distribution of proceeds from the tax by a qualifying school district to partnering community schools is hereby determined to be a proper public purpose. (2)(a) If any portion of the levy proceeds are to be allocated to the current expenses of the qualifying school district, the form of the ballot at an election held pursuant to division (B) of this section shall be as follows: "Shall a levy be imposed by the_________ (insert the name of the qualifying school district) for the purpose of current expenses of the school district and of partnering community schools, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, of which______ (insert the number of mills to be allocated to partnering community schools) mills is to be allocated to partnering community schools, which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for______ (insert the number of years the levy is to be imposed, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time), beginning______ (insert first year the tax is to be levied), which will first be payable in calendar year______ (insert the first calendar year in which the tax would be payable)? FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " (b) If all of the levy proceeds are to be allocated to the current expenses of partnering community schools, the form of the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall a levy be imposed by the_________ (insert the name of the qualifying school district) for the purpose of current expenses of partnering community schools, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding______ mills for each $1 of taxable value which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for______ (insert the number of years the levy is to be imposed, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time), beginning______ (insert first year the tax is to be levied), which will first be payable in calendar year______ (insert the first calendar year in which the tax would be payable)? FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " (3) Upon each receipt of a tax distribution by the qualifying school district, the board of education shall credit the portion allocated to partnering community schools to the partnering community schools fund. All income from the investment of money in the partnering community schools fund shall be credited to that fund. (a) If the qualifying school district is a municipal school district, the board of education shall distribute the partnering community schools amount among the then qualifying community schools not more than forty-five days after the school district receives and deposits each tax distribution. From each tax distribution, each such partnering community school shall receive a portion of the partnering community schools amount in the proportion that the number of its resident students bears to the aggregate number of resident students of all such partnering community schools as of the date of receipt and deposit of the tax distribution. (b) If the qualifying school district is not a municipal school district, the board of education may distribute all or a portion of the amount in the partnering community schools fund during a fiscal year to partnering community schools on or before the first day of June of the preceding fiscal year. Each such partnering community school shall receive a portion of the amount distributed by the board from the partnering community schools fund during the fiscal year in the proportion that the number of its resident students bears to the aggregate number of resident students of all such partnering community schools as of the date the school district received and deposited the most recent tax distribution. On or before the fifteenth day of June of each fiscal year, the board of education shall announce an estimated allocation to partnering community schools for the ensuing fiscal year. The board is not required to allocate to partnering community schools the entire partnering community schools amount in the fiscal year in which a tax distribution is received and deposited in the partnering community schools fund. The estimated allocation shall be published on the web site of the school district and expressed as a dollar amount per resident student. The actual allocation to community schools in a fiscal year need not conform to the estimate published by the school district so long if the estimate was made in good faith. Distributions by a school district under division (B)(3)(b) of this section shall be made in accordance with distribution agreements entered into by the board of education and each partnering community school eligible for distributions under this division. The distribution agreements shall be certified to the department of education each fiscal year before the thirtieth day of July. Each agreement shall provide for at least three distributions by the school district to the partnering community school during the fiscal year and shall require the initial distribution be made on or before the thirtieth day of July. (c) For the purposes of division (B) of this section, the number of resident students shall be the number of such students reported under section 3317.03 of the Revised Code and established by the department of education as of the date of receipt and deposit of the tax distribution. (4) To the extent an agreement whereby the qualifying school district and a community school endorse each other's programs is necessary for the community school to qualify as a partnering community school under division (B)(6)(b) of this section, the board of education of the school district shall certify to the department of education the agreement along with the determination that such agreement satisfies the requirements of that division. The board's determination is conclusive. (5) For the purposes of Chapter 3317. of the Revised Code or other laws referring to the "taxes charged and payable" for a school district, the taxes charged and payable for a qualifying school district that levies a tax under division (B) of this section includes only the taxes charged and payable under that levy for the current expenses of the school district, and does not include the taxes charged and payable for the current expenses of partnering community schools. The taxes charged and payable for the current expenses of partnering community schools shall not affect the calculation of "state education aid" as defined in section 5751.20 of the Revised Code. (6) As used in division (B) of this section: (a) "Qualifying school district" means a municipal school district, as defined in section 3311.71 of the Revised Code or a school district that contains within its territory a partnering community school. (b) "Partnering community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that is located within the territory of the qualifying school district and meets one of the following criteria: (i) If the qualifying school district is a municipal school district, the community school is sponsored by the district or is a party to an agreement with the district whereby the district and the community school endorse each other's programs; (ii) If the qualifying school district is not a municipal school district, the community school is sponsored by a sponsor that was rated as "exemplary" in the ratings most recently published under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code before the resolution proposing the levy is certified to the board of elections. (c) "Partnering community schools amount" means the product obtained, as of the receipt and deposit of the tax distribution, by multiplying the amount of a tax distribution by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of mills per dollar of taxable value of the property tax to be allocated to partnering community schools, and the denominator of which is the total number of mills per dollar of taxable value authorized by the electors in the election held under division (B) of this section, each as set forth in the resolution levying the tax. If the resolution allocates all of the levy proceeds to partnering community schools, the "partnering schools amount" equals the amount of the tax distribution. (d) "Partnering community schools fund" means a separate fund established by the board of education of a qualifying school district for the deposit of partnering community school amounts under this section. (e) "Resident student" means a student enrolled in a partnering community school who is entitled to attend school in the qualifying school district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. (f) "Tax distribution" means a distribution of proceeds of the tax authorized by division (B) of this section under section 321.24 of the Revised Code and distributions that are attributable to that tax under sections 323.156 and 4503.068 of the Revised Code or other applicable law. (C) A resolution adopted under this section shall specify the date of holding the election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after the adoption and certification of the resolution and which shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. A resolution adopted under this section may propose to renew one or more existing levies imposed under division (A) or (B) of this section or to increase or decrease a single levy imposed under either such division. If the board of education imposes one or more existing levies for the purpose specified in division (F) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, the resolution may propose to renew one or more of those existing levies, or to increase or decrease a single such existing levy, for the purpose of general permanent improvements. If the resolution proposes to renew two or more existing levies, the levies shall be levied for the same purpose. The resolution shall identify those levies and the rates at which they are levied. The resolution also shall specify that the existing levies shall not be extended on the tax lists after the year preceding the year in which the renewal levy is first imposed, regardless of the years for which those levies originally were authorized to be levied. If the resolution proposes to renew an existing levy imposed under division (B) of this section, the rates allocated to the qualifying school district and to partnering community schools each may be increased or decreased or remain the same, and the total rate may be increased, decreased, or remain the same. The resolution and notice of election shall specify the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the partnering community schools and the number of the mills, if any, to be levied for the current expenses of the qualifying school district. A resolution adopted under this section shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. A copy of the resolution shall immediately after its passing be certified, along with the county auditor's certification provided under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, to the board of elections of the proper county in the manner provided by section 5705.25 of the Revised Code. That section shall govern the arrangements for the submission of such question and other matters concerning the election to which that section refers, including publication of notice of the election, except that the election shall be held on the date specified in the resolution. In the case of a resolution adopted under division (B) of this section, the publication of notice of that election shall state the number of the mills, if any, to be levied for the current expenses of partnering community schools and the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the qualifying school district. If a majority of the electors voting on the question so submitted in an election vote in favor of the levy, the board of education may make the necessary levy within the school district or, in the case of a qualifying library levy for the support of a library association or private corporation, within the association library district, at the additional rate, or at any lesser rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation on the tax list, for the purpose stated in the resolution. A levy for a continuing period of time may be reduced pursuant to section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. The tax levy shall be included in the next tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. (D)(1) After the approval of a levy on the current tax list and duplicate for current expenses, for recreational purposes, for community centers provided for in section 755.16 of the Revised Code, or for a public library of the district under division (A) of this section, and prior to the time when the first tax collection from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. (2) After the approval of a levy for general permanent improvements for a specified number of years or for permanent improvements having the purpose specified in division (F) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy remaining to be collected in each year over a period of five years after the issuance of the notes. The notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (3) After approval of a levy for general permanent improvements for a continuing period of time, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected in each year over a specified period of years, not exceeding ten, after the issuance of the notes. The notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed ten years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (4) After the approval of a levy on the current tax list and duplicate under division (B) of this section, and prior to the time when the first tax collection from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy for the current expenses of the school district and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy and allocated to the school district. The portion of the levy proceeds to be allocated to partnering community schools under that division shall not be included in the estimated proceeds anticipated under this division and shall not be used to pay debt charges on any anticipation notes. The notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (E) The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (F) The board of education of any school district that levies a tax under this section for the purpose of providing for school safety and security may report to the department of education how the district is using revenue from that tax. The board of education of any school district that proposes to levy a tax for the purpose of providing for school safety and security may share the proceeds of the tax with chartered nonpublic schools, as defined by section 3310.01 of the Revised Code, that are located in the territory of the school district as provided in this division. The resolution levying the tax and the form of the ballot shall state that proceeds from the levy are to be shared with chartered nonpublic schools and shall state the percentage of the proceeds that is to be shared with those schools. If a percentage of the proceeds of such a tax are to be shared with chartered nonpublic schools under this division, such proceeds shall be shared with all chartered nonpublic schools located in the territory of the school district. Of the percentage of the proceeds to be shared with chartered nonpublic schools, each such school shall receive an amount that bears the same proportion of that percentage that the number of resident students attending that school bears to the total number of resident students attending all such schools in the territory of the school district. For the purposes of this section, a resident student is a student enrolled in a chartered nonpublic school located in the territory of the school district who is entitled to attend school in the school district under section 3313.64 or 3313.65 of the Revised Code. All proceeds of the levy shall be credited to a fund of the school district created for that purpose, and the board of education shall pay each chartered nonpublic school its share of the proceeds from that fund not less frequently than once after each settlement of taxes under divisions (A) and (C) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code. Any chartered nonpublic school receiving payments under this section shall use all of such payments only for providing for school safety and security. Sec. 5705.212. (A)(1) The board of education of any school district, at any time and by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that may be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district, that it is necessary to levy not more than five taxes in excess of that limitation for current expenses, and that each of the proposed taxes first will be levied in a different year, over a specified period of time. The board shall identify the taxes proposed under this section as follows: the first tax to be levied shall be called the "original tax." Each tax subsequently levied shall be called an "incremental tax." The rate of each incremental tax shall be identical, but the rates of such incremental taxes need not be the same as the rate of the original tax. The resolution also shall state that the question of these additional taxes shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election. The resolution shall specify separately for each tax proposed: the amount of the increase in rate that it is necessary to levy, expressed separately for the original tax and each incremental tax; that the purpose of the levy is for current expenses; the number of years during which the original tax shall be in effect; a specification that the last year in which the original tax is in effect shall also be the last year in which each incremental tax shall be in effect; and the year in which each tax first is proposed to be levied. The original tax may be levied for any number of years not exceeding ten, or for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall specify the date of holding the special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after the adoption and certification of the resolution and shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. (2) The board of education, by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may adopt a resolution proposing to renew taxes levied other than for a continuing period of time under division (A)(1) of this section. Such a resolution shall provide for levying a tax and specify all of the following: (a) That the tax shall be called and designated on the ballot as a renewal levy; (b) The rate of the renewal tax, which shall be a single rate that combines the rate of the original tax and each incremental tax into a single rate. The rate of the renewal tax shall not exceed the aggregate rate of the original and incremental taxes. (c) The number of years, not to exceed ten, that the renewal tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (d) That the purpose of the renewal levy is for current expenses; (e) Subject to the certification and notification requirements of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code, that the question of the renewal levy shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at the general election held during the last year the original tax may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate or at a special election held during the ensuing year. (3) A resolution adopted under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall go into immediate effect upon its adoption and no publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Immediately after its adoption, a copy of the resolution shall be certified to the board of elections of the proper county in the manner provided by division (A) of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code, and that division shall govern the arrangements for the submission of the question and other matters concerning the election to which that section refers. The election shall be held on the date specified in the resolution. If a majority of the electors voting on the question so submitted in an election vote in favor of the taxes or a renewal tax, the board of education, if the original or a renewal tax is authorized to be levied for the current year, immediately may make the necessary levy within the school district at the authorized rate, or at any lesser rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation, for the purpose stated in the resolution. No tax shall be imposed prior to the year specified in the resolution as the year in which it is first proposed to be levied. The rate of the original tax and the rate of each incremental tax shall be cumulative, so that the aggregate rate levied in any year is the sum of the rates of both the original tax and all incremental taxes levied in or prior to that year under the same proposal. A tax levied for a continuing period of time under this section may be reduced pursuant to section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding section 133.30 of the Revised Code, after the approval of a tax to be levied in the current or the succeeding year and prior to the time when the first tax collection from that levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in an amount not to exceed fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. The notes shall be sold as provided in Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. If anticipation notes are issued, they shall mature serially and in substantially equal amounts during each year over a period not to exceed five years; and the amount necessary to pay the interest and principal as the anticipation notes mature shall be deemed appropriated for those purposes from the levy, and appropriations from the levy by the board of education shall be limited each fiscal year to the balance available in excess of that amount. If the auditor of state has certified a deficit pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, the notes authorized under this section may be sold in accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except that the board may sell the notes after providing a reasonable opportunity for competitive bidding. (C)(1) The board of education of a qualifying school district, at any time and by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that it is necessary to levy not more than five taxes in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the current expenses of partnering community schools and, if any of the levy proceeds are so allocated, of the school district, and that each of the proposed taxes first will be levied in a different year, over a specified period of time. A qualifying school district that is not a municipal school district may allocate all of the levy proceeds to partnering community schools. A municipal school district shall allocate a portion of the levy proceeds to the current expenses of the district. The board shall identify the taxes proposed under this division in the same manner as in division (A)(1) of this section. The rate of each incremental tax shall be identical, but the rates of such incremental taxes need not be the same as the rate of the original tax. In addition to the specifications required of the resolution in division (A) of this section, the resolution shall state the number of the mills to be levied each year for the current expenses of the partnering community schools and the number of the mills, if any, to be levied each year for the current expenses of the school district. The number of mills for the current expenses of partnering community schools shall be the same for each of the incremental taxes, and the number of mills for the current expenses of the qualifying school district shall be the same for each of the incremental taxes. The levy of taxes for the current expenses of a partnering community school under division (C) of this section and the distribution of proceeds from the tax by a qualifying school district to partnering community schools is hereby determined to be a proper public purpose. (2) The board of education, by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may adopt a resolution proposing to renew taxes levied other than for a continuing period of time under division (C)(1) of this section. In such a renewal levy, the rates allocated to the qualifying school district and to partnering community schools each may be increased or decreased or remain the same, and the total rate may be increased, decreased, or remain the same. In addition to the requirements of division (A)(2) of this section, the resolution shall state the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the partnering community schools and the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the school district. (3) A resolution adopted under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section is subject to the rules and procedures prescribed by division (A)(3) of this section. (4) The proceeds of each tax levied under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section shall be credited and distributed in the manner prescribed by division (B)(3) of section 5705.21 of the Revised Code, and divisions (B)(4), (5), and (6) of that section apply to taxes levied under division (C) of this section. (5) Notwithstanding section 133.30 of the Revised Code, after the approval of a tax to be levied under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section, in the current or succeeding year and prior to the time when the first tax collection from that levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy for the current expenses of the qualifying school district and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy and allocated to the school district. The portion of levy proceeds to be allocated to partnering community schools shall not be included in the estimated proceeds anticipated under this division and shall not be used to pay debt charges on any anticipation notes. The notes shall be sold as provided in Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. If anticipation notes are issued, they shall mature serially and in substantially equal amounts during each year over a period not to exceed five years. The amount necessary to pay the interest and principal as the anticipation notes mature shall be deemed appropriated for those purposes from the levy, and appropriations from the levy by the board of education shall be limited each fiscal year to the balance available in excess of that amount. If the auditor of state has certified a deficit pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, the notes authorized under this section may be sold in accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except that the board may sell the notes after providing a reasonable opportunity for competitive bidding. As used in division (C) of this section, "qualifying school district" and "partnering community schools" have the same meanings as in section 5705.21 of the Revised Code. (D) The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (E) When a school board certifies a resolution to the county auditor under division (B)(1) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code proposing to levy a tax under division (A)(1) or (C)(1) of this section, the county auditor shall certify, in addition to the other information the auditor is required to certify under that section, an estimate of both the levy's annual collections for the tax year for which the original tax applies and the levies' aggregate annual collections for the tax year for which the final incremental tax applies, in both cases rounded to the nearest dollar, which shall be calculated assuming that the amount of the tax list of the taxing authority remains throughout the life of the levy the same as the amount of the tax list most recently certified by the county auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. If a school district is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain from the county auditor of each other county in which the district is located the current tax valuation for the portion of the district in that county. Sec. 5705.213. (A)(1) The board of education of any school district, at any time and by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that may be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district and that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of that limitation for current expenses. The resolution also shall state that the question of the additional tax shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election. The resolution shall specify, for each year the levy is in effect, the amount of money that the levy is proposed to raise, which may, for years after the first year the levy is made, be expressed in terms of a dollar or percentage increase over the prior year's amount. The resolution also shall specify that the purpose of the levy is for current expenses, the number of years during which the tax shall be in effect which may be for any number of years not exceeding ten, and the year in which the tax first is proposed to be levied. The resolution shall specify the date of holding the special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety-five days after the adoption and certification of the resolution to the county auditor and not earlier than ninety days after certification to the board of elections. The date of the election shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. (2) The board of education, by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may adopt a resolution proposing to renew a tax levied under division (A)(1) of this section. Such a resolution shall provide for levying a tax and specify all of the following: (a) That the tax shall be called and designated on the ballot as a renewal levy; (b) The amount of the renewal tax, which shall be no more than the amount of tax levied during the last year the tax being renewed is authorized to be in effect; (c) The number of years, not to exceed ten, that the renewal tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (d) That the purpose of the renewal levy is for current expenses; (e) Subject to the certification and notification requirements of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code, that the question of the renewal levy shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at the general election held during the last year the tax being renewed may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate or at a special election held during the ensuing year. (3) A resolution adopted under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall go into immediate effect upon its adoption and no publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Immediately after its adoption, a copy of the resolution shall be certified to the county auditor of the proper county, who shall, within ten days, calculate and certify to the board of education the estimated levy, for the first year, and for each subsequent year for which the tax is proposed to be in effect. The estimates shall be made both in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. In making the estimates, the auditor shall assume that the amount of the tax list remains throughout the life of the levy, the same as the tax list most recently certified by the county auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. If the board desires to proceed with the submission of the question, it shall certify its resolution, with the estimated tax levy expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value for each year that the tax is proposed to be in effect, to the board of elections of the proper county in the manner provided by division (A) of section 5705.251 of the Revised Code. Section 5705.251 of the Revised Code shall govern the arrangements for the submission of the question and other matters concerning the election to which that section refers. The election shall be held on the date specified in the resolution. If a majority of the electors voting on the question so submitted in an election vote in favor of the tax, and if the tax is authorized to be levied for the current year, the board of education immediately may make the additional levy necessary to raise the amount specified in the resolution or a lesser amount for the purpose stated in the resolution. (4) The submission of questions to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding section 133.30 of the Revised Code, after the approval of a tax to be levied in the current or the succeeding year and prior to the time when the first tax collection from that levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in an amount not to exceed fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. The notes shall be sold as provided in Chapter 133. of the Revised Code. If anticipation notes are issued, they shall mature serially and in substantially equal amounts during each year over a period not to exceed five years; and the amount necessary to pay the interest and principal as the anticipation notes mature shall be deemed appropriated for those purposes from the levy, and appropriations from the levy by the board of education shall be limited each fiscal year to the balance available in excess of that amount. If the auditor of state has certified a deficit pursuant to section 3313.483 of the Revised Code, the notes authorized under this section may be sold in accordance with Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, except that the board may sell the notes after providing a reasonable opportunity for competitive bidding. Sec. 5705.215. (A) The governing board of an educational service center that is the taxing authority of a county school financing district, upon receipt of identical resolutions adopted within a sixty-day period by a majority of the members of the board of education of each school district that is within the territory of the county school financing district, may submit a tax levy to the electors of the territory in the same manner as a school board may submit a levy under division (C) of section 5705.21 of the Revised Code, except that: (1) The levy may be for a period not to exceed ten years, or, if the levy is solely for the purpose or purposes described in division (A)(2)(a), (c), or (f) of this section, for a continuing period of time. (2) The purpose of the levy shall be one or more of the following: (a) For current expenses for the provision of special education and related services within the territory of the district; (b) For permanent improvements within the territory of the district for special education and related services; (c) For current expenses for specified educational programs within the territory of the district; (d) For permanent improvements within the territory of the district for specified educational programs; (e) For permanent improvements within the territory of the district; (f) For current expenses for school safety and security and mental health services, including training and employment of or contracting for the services of safety personnel, mental health personnel, social workers, and counselors. (B) If the levy provides for but is not limited to current expenses, the resolutions shall apportion the annual rate of the levy between current expenses and the other purposes. The apportionment need not be the same for each year of the levy, but the respective portions of the rate actually levied each year for current expenses and the other purposes shall be limited by that apportionment. (C) Prior to the application of section 319.301 of the Revised Code, the rate of a levy that is limited to, or to the extent that it is apportioned to, purposes other than current expenses shall be reduced in the same proportion in which the district's total valuation increases during the life of the levy because of additions to such valuation that have resulted from improvements added to the tax list and duplicate. (D) After the approval of a county school financing district levy under this section, the taxing authority may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of such levy and may from time to time during the life of such levy, but in any given year prior to the time when the tax collection from such levy can be made for that year, issue anticipation notes in an amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected in each year up to a period of five years after the date of the issuance of such notes, less an amount equal to the proceeds of such levy obligated for each year by the issuance of anticipation notes, provided that the total amount maturing in any one year shall not exceed fifty per cent of the anticipated proceeds of the levy for that year. Each issue of notes shall be sold as provided in Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, and shall, except for the limitation that the total amount of such notes maturing in any one year shall not exceed fifty per cent of the anticipated proceeds of such levy for that year, mature serially in substantially equal installments during each year over a period not to exceed five years after their issuance. (E)(1) In a resolution to be submitted to the taxing authority of a county school financing district under division (A) of this section calling for a ballot issue on the question of the levying of a tax for a continuing period of time by the taxing authority, the board of education of a school district that is part of the territory of the county school financing district also may propose to reduce the rate of one or more of that school district's property taxes levied for a continuing period of time in excess of the ten-mill limitation. The reduction in the rate of a property tax may be any amount, not exceeding the rate at which the tax is authorized to be levied. The reduction in the rate of a tax shall first take effect in the same year that the county school financing district tax takes effect, and shall continue for each year that the county school financing district tax is in effect. A board of education's resolution proposing to reduce the rate of one or more of its school district property taxes shall, in addition to including information required for a resolution under division (B)(1) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, specifically identify each such tax and shall state for each tax the maximum rate at which it currently may be levied and the maximum rate at which it could be levied after the proposed reduction, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value. Before submitting the resolution to the taxing authority of the county school financing district, the board of education of the school district shall certify a copy of it to the tax commissioner and the county auditor. The county auditor shall certify to the board all information required under division (B)(2) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, in the manner required under that division, and both of the following: (a) An estimate of the levy's annual collections beginning for the first year for which the reduction applies, rounded to the nearest dollar, which shall be calculated assuming that the amount of the tax list of the taxing authority remains throughout the life of the reduced levy the same as the amount of the tax list most recently certified by the county auditor under division (A) of section 319.28 of the Revised Code. If a school district is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain from the county auditor of each other county in which the district is located the current tax valuation for the portion of the district in that county. (b) The effective rate of the levy for the last year before the proposed reduction and the first year that the reduction applies, both expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. The tax commissioner, within ten days of receiving the resolution, shall certify to the board the reduction in the school district's total effective tax rate for each class of property that would have resulted if the proposed reduction in the rate or rates had been in effect the previous year. As used in this paragraph, "effective tax rate" has the same meaning as in section 323.08 of the Revised Code. After receiving these certifications from the commissioner and the auditor, the board may amend its resolution to change the proposed property tax rate reduction before submitting the resolution to the financing district taxing authority, provided the board certifies a copy of the amended resolution to the county auditor with a request to provide the information required under divisions (E)(1)(a) and (b) of this section and the auditor transmits that information to the taxing authority. If the board of education of a school district that is part of the territory of a county school financing district adopts a resolution proposing to reduce the rate of one or more of its property taxes in conjunction with the levying of a tax by the financing district, the resolution submitted by the board to the taxing authority of the financing district under division (A) of this section does not have to be identical in this respect to the resolutions submitted by the boards of education of the other school districts that are part of the territory of the county school financing district. (2) Each school district that is part of the territory of a county school financing district may tailor to its own situation a proposed reduction in one or more property tax rates in conjunction with the proposed levying of a tax by the county school financing district; if one such school district proposes a reduction in one or more tax rates, another school district may propose a reduction of a different size or may propose no reduction. Within each school district that is part of the territory of the county school financing district, the electors shall vote on one ballot issue combining the question of the levying of the tax by the taxing authority of the county school financing district with, if any such reduction is proposed, the question of the reduction in the rate of one or more taxes of the school district. If a majority of the electors of the county school financing district voting on the question of the proposed levying of a tax by the taxing authority of the financing district vote to approve the question, any tax reductions proposed by school districts that are part of the territory of the financing district also are approved. (3) The form of the ballot for an issue proposing to levy a county school financing district tax in conjunction with the reduction of the rate of one or more school district taxes shall be as follows: "Shall the _______ (name of the county school financing district) be authorized to levy an additional tax for _______ (purpose stated in the resolutions), that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for a continuing period of time? If the county school financing district tax is approved, the rate of an existing tax currently levied by the _______ (name of the school district of which the elector is a resident) at the rate of _______ mills shall be reduced to _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to a reduction from $_______ (effective rate) to $_______ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, until any such time as the county school financing district tax is decreased or repealed. FOR THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE TAX LEVY " If the board of education of the school district proposes to reduce the rate of more than one of its existing taxes, the second sentence of the ballot language shall be modified for residents of that district to express the rates and effective rates at which those taxes currently are levied and the rates and effective rates to which they would be reduced as well as each levy's estimated annual collections, as provided by the county auditor under division (E)(1)(a) of this section. If the board of education of the school district does not propose to reduce the rate of any of its taxes, the second sentence of the ballot language shall not be used for residents of that district. In any case, the first sentence of the ballot language shall be the same for all the electors in the county school financing district, but the second sentence shall be different in each school district depending on whether and in what amount the board of education of the school district proposes to reduce the rate of one or more of its property taxes. (4) If the rate of a school district property tax is reduced pursuant to this division, the tax commissioner shall compute the percentage required to be computed for that tax under division (D) of section 319.301 of the Revised Code each year the rate is reduced as if the tax had been levied in the preceding year at the rate to which it has been reduced. If the reduced rate of a tax is increased under division (E)(5) of this section, the commissioner shall compute the percentage required to be computed for that tax under division (D) of section 319.301 of the Revised Code each year the rate is increased as if the tax had been levied in the preceding year at the rate to which it has been increased. (5) After the levying of a county school financing district tax in conjunction with the reduction of the rate of one or more school district taxes is approved by the electors under this division, if the rate of the county school financing district tax is decreased pursuant to an election under section 5705.261 of the Revised Code, the rate of each school district tax that had been reduced shall be increased by the number of mills obtained by multiplying the number of mills of the original reduction by the same percentage that the financing district tax rate is decreased. If the county school financing district tax is repealed pursuant to an election under section 5705.261 of the Revised Code, each school district may resume levying the property taxes that had been reduced at the full rate originally approved by the electors. A reduction in the rate of a school district property tax under this division is a reduction in the rate at which the board of education may levy that tax only for the period during which the county school financing district tax is levied prior to any decrease or repeal under section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. The resumption of the authority of the board of education to levy an increased or the full rate of tax does not constitute the levying of a new tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation. (F) If a county school financing district has a tax in effect under this section, the territory of a city, local, or exempted village school district that is not a part of the county school financing district shall not become a part of the county school financing district unless approved by the electors of the city, local, or exempted village school district in accordance with division (C) of section 3311.50 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.217. (A) The board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, at any time by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that can be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district; that it is necessary to levy an additional tax in excess of that limitation for the purposes of providing funds for current operating expenses and for general permanent improvements as defined in section 5705.21 of the Revised Code; and that the question of the tax shall be submitted to the electors of the district at a special election. The tax may be levied for a specified number of years not exceeding five or for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall specify the proposed tax rate, the first year the tax will be levied, and the number of years it will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall apportion the annual rate of the tax between current operating expenses and permanent improvements. The apportionment may but need not be the same for each year of the tax, but the respective portions of the rate actually levied each year for current operating expenses and permanent improvements shall be limited by the apportionment. The resolution shall specify the date of holding the special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after certification of the resolution to the board of elections and shall be consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of it is necessary other than that provided in the notice of election. The board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately after its adoption. Section 5705.25 of the Revised Code governs the arrangements and form of the ballot for the submission of the question to the electors. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote in favor of the tax, the board of education may make the levy at the additional rate, or at any lesser rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation. If the tax is for a continuing period of time, it may be decreased in accordance with section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. A board of education may adopt a resolution to renew one or more existing levies imposed under this section, or to increase or decrease the rate of a tax levied under this section, for the purpose of providing funds for either current expenses and general permanent improvements or solely for general permanent improvements. (B)(1) After the approval of a tax for current operating expenses under this section and prior to the time the first collection and distribution from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of such levy and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax to be collected during the first year of the levy. (2) After the approval of a tax for general permanent improvements levied under this section for a specified number of years, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of such tax and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax remaining to be collected in each year over a specified period of years, not exceeding the number of years for which the tax was levied, after issuance of the notes. (3) After the approval of a tax for general permanent improvements levied under this section for a continuing period of time, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of such tax and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax to be collected in each year over a specified period of years, not exceeding ten, after issuance of the notes. Anticipation notes under this section shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code. Notes issued under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. Notes issued under division (B)(3) of this section shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed ten years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (C) The submission of a question to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of elections that can be held in a year under section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.218. (A) The board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, at any time by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that it may be necessary for the school district to issue general obligation bonds for permanent improvements. The resolution shall state all of the following: (1) The necessity and purpose of the bond issue; (2) The date of the special election at which the question shall be submitted to the electors; (3) The amount, approximate date, estimated rate of interest, and maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (4) The necessity of levying a tax outside the ten-mill limitation to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities. On adoption of the resolution, the board shall certify a copy of it to the county auditor. The county auditor promptly shall estimate and certify to the board the average annual property tax rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, required throughout the stated maturity of the bonds to pay debt charges on the bonds in the same manner as under division (C) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code. (B) After receiving the county auditor's certification under division (A) of this section, the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that can be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district; that it is necessary to issue general obligation bonds of the school district for permanent improvements and to levy an additional tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities; that it is necessary for a specified number of years or for a continuing period of time to levy additional taxes in excess of the ten-mill limitation to provide funds for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, renovation, and financing of permanent improvements or to pay for current operating expenses, or both; and that the question of the bonds and taxes shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after certification of the resolution to the board of elections, and the date of which shall be consistent with section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall specify all of the following: (1) The county auditor's estimate of the average annual property tax rate required throughout the stated maturity of the bonds to pay debt charges on the bonds; (2) The proposed rate of the tax, if any, for current operating expenses expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, the first year the tax will be levied, and the number of years it will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (3) The proposed rate of the tax, if any, for permanent improvements expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, the first year the tax will be levied, and the number of years it will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall apportion the annual rate of the tax between current operating expenses and permanent improvements, if both taxes are proposed. The apportionment may but need not be the same for each year of the tax, but the respective portions of the rate actually levied each year for current operating expenses and permanent improvements shall be limited by the apportionment. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of it is necessary other than that provided in the notice of election. The board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution, along with copies of the auditor's estimates and its resolution under division (A) of this section, to the board of elections immediately after its adoption. (C) The board of elections shall make the arrangements for the submission to the electors of the school district of the question proposed under division (B) or (J) of this section, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in the district for the election of county officers. The resolution shall be put before the electors as one ballot question, with a favorable vote indicating approval of the bond issue, the levy to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities, the current operating expenses levy, the permanent improvements levy, and the levy for the current expenses of a qualifying school district and of partnering community schools, as those levies may be proposed. The board of elections shall publish notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If a board of elections operates and maintains a web site, that board also shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice of election shall state all of the following: (1) The principal amount of the proposed bond issue; (2) The permanent improvements for which the bonds are to be issued; (3) The maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (4) The estimated additional average annual property tax rate to pay the debt charges on the bonds, as certified by the county auditor and expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value; (5) The proposed rate of the additional tax, if any, for current operating expenses expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value and, if the question is proposed under division (J) of this section, the portion of the rate to be allocated to the school district and the portion to be allocated to partnering community schools; (6) The number of years the current operating expenses tax will be in effect, or that it will be in effect for a continuing period of time; (7) The proposed rate of the additional tax, if any, for permanent improvements expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value; (8) The number of years the permanent improvements tax will be in effect, or that it will be in effect for a continuing period of time; (9) The annual estimated collections, if applicable, of the current operating expenses levy and permanent improvements levy, as certified by the county auditor; (10) The time and place of the special election. (D) The form of the ballot for an election under this section is as follows: "Shall the __________ school district be authorized to do the following: (1) Issue bonds for the purpose of __________ in the principal amount of $______, to be repaid annually over a maximum period of ______ years, and levy a property tax outside the ten-mill limitation, estimated by the county auditor to average over the bond repayment period ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds, and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of those bonds?" If either a levy for permanent improvements or a levy for current operating expenses is proposed, or both are proposed, the ballot also shall contain the following language, as appropriate: "(2) Levy an additional property tax to provide funds for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, renovation, and financing of permanent improvements, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for ______ (number of years of the levy, or a continuing period of time)? (3) Levy an additional property tax to pay current operating expenses, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for _______ (number of years of the levy, or a continuing period of time)? FOR THE BOND ISSUE AND LEVY (OR LEVIES) AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE AND LEVY (OR LEVIES) " If the question is proposed under division (J) of this section, the form of the ballot shall be modified as prescribed by division (J)(4) of this section. (E) The board of elections promptly shall certify the results of the election to the tax commissioner and the county auditor of the county in which the school district is located. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote for it, the board of education may proceed with issuance of the bonds and with the levy and collection of the property tax or taxes at the additional rate or any lesser rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation. Any securities issued by the board of education under this section are Chapter 133. securities, as that term is defined in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (F)(1) After the approval of a tax for current operating expenses under this section and prior to the time the first collection and distribution from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of such levy and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax to be collected during the first year of the levy. (2) After the approval of a tax under this section for permanent improvements having a specific purpose, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of such tax and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax remaining to be collected in each year over a period of five years after issuance of the notes. (3) After the approval of a tax under this section for general permanent improvements as defined under section 5705.21 of the Revised Code, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of such tax and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax to be collected in each year over a specified period of years, not exceeding ten, after issuance of the notes. Anticipation notes under this section shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code. Notes issued under division (F)(1) or (2) of this section shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. Notes issued under division (F)(3) of this section shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed ten years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (G) A tax for current operating expenses or for permanent improvements levied under this section for a specified number of years may be renewed or replaced in the same manner as a tax for current operating expenses or for permanent improvements levied under section 5705.21 of the Revised Code. A tax for current operating expenses or for permanent improvements levied under this section for a continuing period of time may be decreased in accordance with section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. (H) The submission of a question to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of elections that can be held in a year under section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (I) A school district board of education proposing a ballot measure under this section to generate local resources for a project under the school building assistance expedited local partnership program under section 3318.36 of the Revised Code may combine the questions under division (D) of this section with a question for the levy of a property tax to generate moneys for maintenance of the classroom facilities acquired under that project as prescribed in section 3318.361 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) After receiving the county auditor's certifications under division (A) of this section, the board of education of a qualifying school district, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of paying the current expenses of the school district and of partnering community schools, as defined in section 5705.21 of the Revised Code; that it is necessary to issue general obligation bonds of the school district for permanent improvements of the district and to levy an additional tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities; and that the question of the bonds and taxes shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after certification of the resolution to the board of elections, and the date of which shall be consistent with section 3505.01 of the Revised Code. The levy of taxes for the current expenses of a partnering community school under division (J) of this section and the distribution of proceeds from the tax by a qualifying school district to partnering community schools is hereby determined to be a proper public purpose. (2) The tax for the current expenses of the school district and of partnering community schools is subject to the requirements of divisions (B)(3), (4), and (5) of section 5705.21 of the Revised Code. (3) In addition to the required specifications of the resolution under division (B) of this section, the resolution shall express the rate of the tax in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, state the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the partnering community schools and the number of the mills to be levied for the current expenses of the school district, specify the number of years (not exceeding ten) the tax will be levied or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time, and state the first year the tax will be levied. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of it is necessary other than that provided in the notice of election. The board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution, along with copies of the auditor's estimate and its resolution under division (A) of this section, to the board of elections immediately after its adoption. (4) The form of the ballot shall be modified by replacing the ballot form set forth in division (D)(3) of this section with the following: "Levy an additional property tax for the purpose of the current expenses of the school district and of partnering community schools, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value (of which ______ (insert the number of mills to be allocated to partnering community schools) mills is to be allocated to partnering community schools), which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for ______ (insert the number of years the levy is to be imposed, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time)? FOR THE BOND ISSUE AND LEVY (OR LEVIES) AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE AND LEVY (OR LEVIES) " (5) After the approval of a tax for the current expenses of the school district and of partnering community schools under division (J) of this section, and prior to the time the first collection and distribution from the levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy for the current expenses of the school district and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy and allocated to the school district. The portion of levy proceeds to be allocated to partnering community schools shall not be included in the estimated proceeds anticipated under this division and shall not be used to pay debt charges on any anticipation notes. The notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (6) A tax for the current expenses of the school district and of partnering community schools levied under division (J) of this section for a specified number of years may be renewed or replaced in the same manner as a tax for the current expenses of a school district and of partnering community schools levied under division (B) of section 5705.21 of the Revised Code. A tax for the current expenses of the school district and of partnering community schools levied under this division for a continuing period of time may be decreased in accordance with section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. (7) The proceeds from the issuance of the general obligation bonds under division (J) of this section shall be used solely to pay for permanent improvements of the school district and not for permanent improvements of partnering community schools. Sec. 5705.219. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Eligible school district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district in which the taxes charged and payable for current expenses on residential/agricultural real property in the tax year preceding the year in which the levy authorized by this section will be submitted for elector approval or rejection are greater than two per cent of the taxable value of the residential/agricultural real property. (2) "Residential/agricultural real property" and "nonresidential/agricultural real property" means the property classified as such under section 5713.041 of the Revised Code. (3) "Effective tax rate" and "taxes charged and payable" have the same meanings as in division (B) of section 319.301 of the Revised Code. (B) On or after January 1, 2010, but before January 1, 2015, the board of education of an eligible school district, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may adopt a resolution proposing to convert existing levies imposed for the purpose of current expenses into a levy raising a specified amount of tax money by repealing all or a portion of one or more of those existing levies and imposing a levy in excess of the ten-mill limitation that will raise a specified amount of money for current expenses of the district. The board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution to the tax commissioner not later than one hundred five days before the election upon which the repeal and levy authorized by this section will be proposed to the electors. Within ten days after receiving the copy of the resolution, the tax commissioner shall determine each of the following and certify the determinations to the board of education: (1) The dollar amount to be raised by the proposed levy, which shall be the product of: (a) The difference between the aggregate effective tax rate for residential/agricultural real property for the tax year preceding the year in which the repeal and levy will be proposed to the electors and twenty mills for each one dollar of taxable value; (b) The total taxable value of all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for the tax year preceding the year in which the repeal and levy will be proposed to the electors. (2) The estimated tax rate of the proposed levy. (3) The existing levies and any portion of an existing levy to be repealed upon approval of the question. Levies shall be repealed in reverse chronological order from most recently imposed to least recently imposed until the sum of the effective tax rates repealed for residential/agricultural real property is equal to the difference calculated in division (B)(1)(a) of this section. (4) The sum of the following: (a) The total taxable value of nonresidential/agricultural real property for the tax year preceding the year in which the repeal and levy will be proposed to the electors multiplied by the difference between (i) the aggregate effective tax rate for nonresidential/agricultural real property for the existing levies and any portion of an existing levy to be repealed and (ii) the amount determined under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, but not less than zero; (b) The total taxable value of public utility tangible personal property for the tax year preceding the year in which the repeal and levy will be proposed to the electors multiplied by the difference between (i) the aggregate voted tax rate for the existing levies and any portion of an existing levy to be repealed and (ii) the amount determined under division (B)(1)(a) of this section, but not less than zero. (C) Upon receipt of the certification from the tax commissioner under division (B) of this section, a majority of the members of the board of education may adopt a resolution proposing the repeal of the existing levies as identified in the certification and the imposition of a levy in excess of the ten-mill limitation that will raise annually the amount certified by the commissioner. If the board determines that the tax should be for an amount less than that certified by the commissioner, the board may request that the commissioner redetermine the rate under division (B)(2) of this section on the basis of the lesser amount the levy is to raise as specified by the board. The amount certified under division (B)(4) and the levies to be repealed as certified under division (B)(3) of this section shall not be redetermined. Within ten days after receiving a timely request specifying the lesser amount to be raised by the levy, the commissioner shall redetermine the rate and recertify it to the board as otherwise provided in division (B) of this section. Only one such request may be made by the board of education of an eligible school district. The resolution shall state the first calendar year in which the levy will be due; the existing levies and any portion of an existing levy that will be repealed, as certified by the commissioner; the term of the levy expressed in years, which may be any number not exceeding ten, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; and the date of the election, which shall be the date of a primary or general election. Immediately upon its passage, the resolution shall go into effect and shall be certified by the board of education to the county auditor of the proper county. The county auditor and the board of education shall proceed as required under section 5705.195 of the Revised Code, as that section existed before the effective date of its repeal by this act. No publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Section 5705.196 of the Revised Code, as that section existed before the effective date of its repeal by this act, shall govern the matters concerning the election. The submission of a question to the electors under this section is subject to the limitation on the number of election dates established by section 5705.214 of the Revised Code. (D) The form of the ballot to be used at the election provided for in this section shall be as follows: "Shall the existing levy of __________ (insert the voted millage rate of the levy to be repealed), currently being charged against residential and agricultural property by the __________ (insert the name of school district) at a rate of __________ (insert the residential/agricultural real property effective tax rate of the levy being repealed) for the purpose of __________ (insert the purpose of the existing levy) be repealed, and shall a levy be imposed by the __________ (insert the name of school district) in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the necessary requirements of the school district in the sum of __________ (insert the annual amount the levy is to produce), estimated by the tax commissioner to require __________ (insert the number of mills) mills for each one dollar of valuation, which amounts to __________ (insert the rate expressed in dollars and cents) for each one hundred dollars of valuation for the initial year of the tax, for a period of __________ (insert the number of years the levy is to be imposed, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time), commencing in __________ (insert the first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (insert the first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)? FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE RENEWAL OF THE TAX LEVY " FOR THE REPEAL AND TAX AGAINST THE REPEAL AND TAX " If the question submitted is a proposal to repeal all or a portion of more than one existing levy, the form of the ballot shall be modified by substituting the statement "shall the existing levy of" with "shall existing levies of" and inserting the aggregate voted and aggregate effective tax rates to be repealed. (E) If a majority of the electors voting on the question submitted in an election vote in favor of the repeal and levy, the result shall be certified immediately after the canvass by the board of elections to the board of education. The board of education may make the levy necessary to raise the amount specified in the resolution for the purpose stated in the resolution and shall certify it to the county auditor, who shall extend it on the current year tax lists for collection. After the first year, the levy shall be included in the annual tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. (F) A levy imposed under this section for a continuing period of time may be decreased or repealed pursuant to section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. If a levy imposed under this section is decreased, the amount calculated under division (B)(4) of this section and paid under section 5705.2110 of the Revised Code shall be decreased by the same proportion as the levy is decreased. If the levy is repealed, no further payments shall be made to the district under that section. (G) At any time, the board of education, by a vote of two-thirds of all of its members, may adopt a resolution to renew a tax levied under this section. The resolution shall provide for levying the tax and specifically all of the following: (1) That the tax shall be called, and designated on the ballot as, a renewal levy; (2) The amount of the renewal tax, which shall be no more than the amount of tax previously collected; (3) The number of years, not to exceed ten, that the renewal tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (4) That the purpose of the renewal tax is for current expenses. The board shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections not later than ninety days before the date of the election at which the question is to be submitted, which shall be the date of a primary or general election. (H) The form of the ballot to be used at the election on the question of renewing a levy under this section shall be as follows: "Shall a tax levy renewing an existing levy of __________ (insert the annual dollar amount the levy is to produce each year), estimated to require __________ (insert the number of mills) mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, be imposed by the __________ (insert the name of school district) for the purpose of current expenses for a period of __________ (insert the number of years the levy is to be imposed, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time), commencing in __________ (insert the first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (insert the first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)? FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE TAX LEVY AGAINST THE RENEWAL OF THE TAX LEVY " If the levy submitted is to be for less than the amount of money previously collected, the form of the ballot shall be modified to add "and reducing" after "renewing" and to add before "estimated to require" the statement "be approved at a tax rate necessary to produce $__________ (insert the lower annual dollar amount the levy is to produce each year)." Sec. 5705.2111. (A) If the board of directors of a regional student education district created under section 3313.83 of the Revised Code desires to levy a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation throughout the district for the purpose of funding the services to be provided by the district to students enrolled in the school districts of which the district is composed and their immediate family members, the board shall propose the levy to each of the boards of education of those school districts. The proposal shall specify the rate or amount of the tax, the number of years the tax will be levied or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time, and that the aggregate rate of the tax shall not exceed three mills per dollar of taxable value in the regional student education district. (B)(1) If a majority of the boards of education of the school districts of which the regional student education district is composed approves the proposal for the tax levy, the board of directors of the regional student education district may adopt a resolution approved by a majority of the board's full membership declaring the necessity of levying the proposed tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation throughout the district for the purpose of funding the services to be provided by the district to students enrolled in the school districts of which the district is composed and their immediate family members. The resolution shall provide for the question of the tax to be submitted to the electors of the district at a general, primary, or special election on a day to be specified in the resolution that is consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code and that occurs at least ninety days after the resolution is certified to the board of elections. The resolution shall specify the rate or amount of the tax and the number of years the tax will be levied or that the tax will be levied for a continuing period of time. The aggregate rate of tax levied by a regional student education district under this section at any time shall not exceed three mills per dollar of taxable value in the district. A tax levied under this section may be renewed, subject to section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, or replaced as provided in section 5705.192 of the Revised Code. (2) The resolution shall take effect immediately upon passage, and no publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided in the notice of election. The resolution shall be certified and submitted in the manner provided under section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, and that section governs the arrangements governing submission of the question and other matters concerning the election. Sec. 5705.2114. (A) If the board of directors of a career-technical cooperative education district created under section 3313.831 of the Revised Code desires to levy a tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation throughout the district for the purpose of funding the services to be provided by the district to students enrolled in the school districts of which the district is composed, the board shall propose the levy to each of the boards of education of those school districts. The proposal shall specify the rate or amount of the tax, the number of years the tax will be levied or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time, and that the aggregate rate of the tax shall not exceed three mills per dollar of taxable value in the career-technical cooperative education district. (B)(1) If a majority of the boards of education of the school districts of which the career-technical cooperative education district is composed approves the proposal for the tax levy, the board of directors of the career-technical cooperative education district may adopt a resolution approved by a majority of the board's full membership declaring the necessity of levying the proposed tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation throughout the district for the purpose of funding the services to be provided by the district to students enrolled in the school districts of which the district is composed. The resolution shall provide for the question of the tax to be submitted to the electors of the district at a general, primary, or special election on a day to be specified in the resolution that is consistent with the requirements of section 3501.01 of the Revised Code and that occurs at least ninety days after the resolution is certified to the board of elections. The resolution shall specify the rate or amount of the tax and the number of years the tax will be levied or that the tax will be levied for a continuing period of time. The aggregate rate of tax levied by a career-technical cooperative education district under this section at any time shall not exceed three mills per dollar of taxable value in the district. A tax levied under this section may be renewed, subject to section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, except that the tax may not be renewed and increased. (2) The resolution shall take effect immediately upon passage, and no publication of the resolution is necessary other than that provided in the notice of election. The resolution shall be certified and submitted in the manner provided under section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, and that section governs the arrangements governing submission of the question and other matters concerning the election. Sec. 5705.221. (A) At any time, the board of county commissioners of any county by a majority vote of the full membership may declare by resolution and certify to the board of elections of the county that the amount of taxes which may be raised within the ten-mill limitation by levies on the current tax duplicate will be insufficient to provide the necessary requirements of the county's alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district established pursuant to Chapter 340. of the Revised Code, or the county's contribution to a joint-county district of which the county is a part, and that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of such limitation for the operation of community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers and the acquisition, construction, renovation, financing, maintenance, and operation of alcohol and drug addiction facilities and mental health facilities. Such resolution shall conform to section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, except that the increased rate may be in effect for any number of years not exceeding ten. The resolution shall be certified and submitted in the manner provided in section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, except that it may be placed on the ballot in any election, and except as otherwise provided in division (G) of this section. The resolution shall be certified to the board of elections not less than ninety days before the election at which it will be voted upon. If the majority of the electors voting on a levy to supplement general fund appropriations for the support of the comprehensive community addiction and mental health services providers vote in favor of the levy, the board may levy a tax within the county at the additional rate outside the ten-mill limitation during the specified period, for the purpose stated in the resolution. (B) When electors have approved a tax levy under this section, the board of county commissioners may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and, from time to time, issue anticipation notes in accordance with section 5705.191 or 5705.193 of the Revised Code. (C) The county auditor who is the fiscal officer of the alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district, upon receipt of a resolution from the board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services, shall establish for the district a capital improvements account or a reserve balance account, or both, as specified in the resolution. The capital improvements account shall be a contingency fund for the necessary acquisition, replacement, renovation, or construction of facilities and movable and fixed equipment. Upon the request of the board, funds not needed to pay for current expenses may be appropriated to the capital improvements account, in amounts such that the account does not exceed twenty-five per cent of the replacement value of all capital facilities and equipment currently used by the board for programs and services. Other funds which are available for current capital expenses from federal, state, or local sources may also be appropriated to this account. The reserve balance account shall contain those funds that are not needed to pay for current operating expenses and not deposited in the capital improvements account but that will be needed to pay for operating expenses in the future. Upon the request of a board, such funds shall be appropriated to the reserve balance account. Payments from the capital improvements account and the reserve balance account shall be made by the county treasurer who is the custodian of funds for the district upon warrants issued by the county auditor who is the fiscal officer of the district pursuant to orders of the board. (D) If a board of county commissioners levies a tax under this section for the county's contribution to a joint-county district of which the county is a part, revenue from the tax shall only be expended for the benefit of the residents of the county. (E) If a board of county commissioners levies a tax under this section for the county's contribution to a joint-county district of which the county is a part and that district expands or contracts due to the addition or withdrawal of another county, the board, provided that county remains a part of the newly expanded or contracted joint-county district, shall continue to levy and collect that tax, pursuant to the terms originally approved by electors, for the county's contribution to the newly expanded or contracted joint-county district of which the county is a part. Notwithstanding sections 5705.192 and section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, the election notice and ballot language of a renewal or replacement of such a levy shall identify the name of the newly expanded or contracted joint-county district. (F) If a board of county commissioners levies a tax under this section for the county's contribution to a joint-county district of which the county is a part and the county withdraws from the district, the board shall continue to levy and collect that tax, pursuant to the terms originally approved by electors, for one of the following purposes, if either situation applies: (1) For the county's contribution to a newly joined joint-county district, if the county joins such a joint-county district in the tax year after the year in which the county withdraws from the other joint-county district; (2) To provide the necessary requirements of the county's alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health service district, if the county establishes such a district under Chapter 340. of the Revised Code in the tax year after the year in which the county withdraws from the joint-county district. Notwithstanding sections 5705.192 and section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, the election notice and ballot language of a renewal or replacement of such a levy shall identify the name of the newly established district or newly joined joint-county district. (G) Division (G) of this section applies only if all of the following apply: (1) The county withdraws from a joint-county district. (2) The board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services of that joint-county district levies a tax under section 5705.19 of the Revised Code in the tax year for which the county withdraws from the joint-county district. (3) The board of county commissioners of the withdrawing county adopts a resolution under division (A) of this section proposing a tax under this section that specifies that the first tax year the tax is to be levied by the board is the tax year after the year the tax described in division (G)(2) of this section expires or is renewed or replaced, as authorized under division (B) of section 340.01 of the Revised Code. The proposed tax described in division (G)(3) of this section may be a renewal, renewal and decrease, or renewal and increase of the tax described in division (G)(2) of this section, except that, notwithstanding section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, the election notice and ballot language of a renewal of such a levy shall identify the county as the subdivision within which the tax will be levied and not the joint-county district from which the county withdrew. Alternatively, the tax described in division (G)(3) of this section may be a replacement, replacement and decrease, or replacement and increase of the tax described in division (G)(2) of this section, as authorized under section 5705.192 of the Revised Code, except that, notwithstanding that section, the election notice and ballot language of a replacement of such a levy shall identify the county as the subdivision within which the tax will be levied and not the joint-county district from which the county withdrew. Sec. 5705.222. (A) At any time the board of county commissioners of any county by a majority vote of the full membership may declare by resolution and certify to the board of elections of the county that the amount of taxes which may be raised within the ten-mill limitation by levies on the current tax duplicate will be insufficient to provide the necessary requirements of the county board of developmental disabilities established pursuant to Chapter 5126. of the Revised Code and that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of such limitation for the operation of community programs and services authorized by county boards of developmental disabilities, for the acquisition, construction, renovation, financing, maintenance, and operation of developmental disabilities facilities, or for both of such purposes. The resolution shall conform to section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, except that the increased rate may be in effect for any number of years not exceeding ten or for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall be certified and submitted in the manner provided in section 5705.25 of the Revised Code, except that it may be placed on the ballot in any election, and shall be certified to the board of elections not less than ninety days before the election at which it will be voted upon. If the majority of the electors voting on a levy for the support of the programs and services of the county board of developmental disabilities vote in favor of the levy, the board of county commissioners may levy a tax within the county at the additional rate outside the ten-mill limitation during the specified or continuing period, for the purpose stated in the resolution. The county board of developmental disabilities, within its budget and with the approval of the board of county commissioners through annual appropriations, shall use the proceeds of a levy approved under this section or division (L) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code solely for the purposes authorized by that section or division. A board of county commissioners that levies a tax under this section or for the purpose authorized by division (L) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, by a majority vote of the full membership, may adopt a resolution to renew such a levy, or renew two or more such levies as a single ballot question, in the manner provided by section 5705.25 of the Revised Code for the renewal of existing levies. The purpose of the renewal levy may be for any of the purposes authorized for a levy imposed under this section or division (L) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code. The term of the renewal levy may be for any number of years not exceeding ten or for a continuing period of time. (B) When electors have approved a tax levy under this section, the county commissioners may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in accordance with section 5705.191 or 5705.193 of the Revised Code. (C) The county auditor, upon receipt of a resolution from the county board of developmental disabilities, shall establish a capital improvements account or a reserve balance account, or both, as specified in the resolution. The capital improvements account shall be a contingency account for the necessary acquisition, replacement, renovation, or construction of facilities and movable and fixed equipment. Upon the request of the county board of developmental disabilities, moneys not needed to pay for current expenses may be appropriated to this account, in amounts such that this account does not exceed twenty-five per cent of the replacement value of all capital facilities and equipment currently used by the county board of developmental disabilities for developmental disabilities programs and services. Other moneys available for current capital expenses from federal, state, or local sources may also be appropriated to this account. The reserve balance account shall contain those moneys that are not needed to pay for current operating expenses and not deposited in the capital improvements account but that will be needed to pay for operating expenses in the future. Upon the request of a county board of developmental disabilities, the board of county commissioners may appropriate county funds, including funds from federal and state sources, to the reserve balance account. The total balance in a reserve balance account shall not exceed forty per cent of the county board of developmental disabilities' expenditures for all services in the preceding calendar year. Amounts in a capital improvements account or reserve balance account that are not in excess of the limitations prescribed in this division shall be considered reasonable and shall not be taken into consideration by the county budget commission when determining whether to reduce the taxing authority of a county under section 5705.32 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.233. (A) As used in this section, "criminal justice facility" means any facility located within the county in which a tax is levied under this section and for which the board of commissioners of such county may make an appropriation under section 307.45 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of county commissioners of any county, at any time, may declare by resolution that it may be necessary for the county to issue general obligation bonds for permanent improvements to a criminal justice facility, including the acquisition, construction, enlargement, renovation, or maintenance of such a facility. The resolution shall state all of the following: (1) The necessity and purpose of the bond issue; (2) The date of the general or special election at which the question shall be submitted to the electors; (3) The amount, approximate date, estimated rate of interest, and maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (4) The necessity of levying a tax outside the ten-mill limitation to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities. On adoption of the resolution, the board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of it to the county auditor. The county auditor promptly shall estimate and certify to the board the average annual property tax rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, required throughout the stated maturity of the bonds to pay debt charges on the bonds, in the same manner as under division (C) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in division (C) of this section, division (B) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code does not apply to tax levy proceedings initiated under this section. (C) After receiving the county auditor's certification under division (B) of this section and, if applicable, section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners may declare by resolution that the amount of taxes that can be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future criminal justice requirements of the county; that it is necessary to issue general obligation bonds of the county for permanent improvements to a criminal justice facility and to levy an additional tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities; that it is necessary for a specified number of years or for a continuing period of time to levy additional taxes in excess of the ten-mill limitation to provide funds for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, renovation, maintenance, and financing of permanent improvements to such a criminal justice facility or to pay for operating expenses of the facility and other criminal justice services for which the board may make an appropriation under section 307.45 of the Revised Code, or both; and that the question of the bonds and taxes shall be submitted to the electors of the county at a general or special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after certification of the resolution to the board of elections, and the date of which shall be consistent with section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall specify all of the following: (1) The county auditor's estimate of the average annual property tax rate required throughout the stated maturity of the bonds to pay debt charges on the bonds; (2) The proposed rate of the tax, if any, for operating expenses and criminal justice services, the first year the tax will be levied, and the number of years it will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (3) The proposed rate of the tax, if any, for permanent improvements to a criminal justice facility, the first year the tax will be levied, and the number of years it will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of it is necessary other than that provided in the notice of election, except that division (B) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code applies if the resolution proposes an additional tax for operating expenses and criminal justice services or permanent improvements. The board of county commissioners shall certify, immediately after its adoption, a copy of the resolution, along with copies of the auditor's certifications under division (B) of this section or section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, if applicable, and the board's resolution under division (B) of this section, to the board of elections. (D) The board of elections shall make the arrangements for the submission of the question proposed under division (C) of this section to the electors of the county, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in the county for the election of county officers. The resolution shall be put before the electors as one ballot question, with a favorable vote indicating approval of the bond issue, the levy to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities, the operating expenses and criminal justice services levy, and the permanent improvements levy, as those levies may be proposed. The board of elections shall publish notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, before the election. If a board of elections operates and maintains a web site, that board also shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days before the election. The notice of election shall state all of the following: (1) The principal amount of the proposed bond issue; (2) The permanent improvements for which the bonds are to be issued; (3) The maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (4) The estimated additional average annual property tax rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, to pay the debt charges on the bonds, as certified by the county auditor; (5) The proposed rate of the additional tax, if any, for operating expenses and criminal justice services; (6) The number of years the operating expenses or criminal justice services tax will be in effect, or that it will be in effect for a continuing period of time; (7) The proposed rate of the additional tax, if any, for permanent improvements; (8) The number of years the permanent improvements tax will be in effect, or that it will be in effect for a continuing period of time; (9) The estimated annual collections, if applicable, of the current operating expenses or criminal justice services levy and permanent improvements levy, as certified by the county auditor; (10) The time and place of the election. (E) The form of the ballot for an election under this section is as follows: "Shall __________ be authorized to do the following: (1) Issue bonds for the purpose of __________ in the principal amount of $______, to be repaid annually over a maximum period of ______ years, and levy a property tax outside the ten-mill limitation, estimated by the county auditor to average over the bond repayment period ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds, and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of those bonds?" If either a levy for permanent improvements or a levy for operating expenses and criminal justice services is proposed, or both are proposed, the ballot also shall contain the following language, as appropriate: "(2) Levy an additional property tax to provide funds for the acquisition, construction, enlargement, renovation, maintenance, and financing of permanent improvements to a criminal justice facility, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for ______ (number of years of the levy, or a continuing period of time)? (3) Levy an additional property tax to pay operating expenses of a criminal justice facility and provide other criminal justice services, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for _______ (number of years of the levy, or a continuing period of time)? FOR THE BOND ISSUE AND LEVY (OR LEVIES) AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE AND LEVY (OR LEVIES)" (F) The board of elections promptly shall certify the results of the election to the tax commissioner and the county auditor. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote for it, the board of county commissioners may proceed with issuance of the bonds and the levy and collection of the property tax for the debt service on the bonds and any anticipatory securities in the same manner and subject to the same limitations as for securities issued under section 133.18 of the Revised Code, and with the levy and collection of the property tax or taxes for operating expenses and criminal justice services and for permanent improvements at the additional rate or any lesser rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation. Any securities issued by the board of commissioners under this section are Chapter 133. securities, as that term is defined in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) After the approval of a tax for operating expenses and criminal justice services under this section and before the time the first collection and distribution from the levy can be made, the board of county commissioners may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax to be collected during the first year of the levy. (2) After the approval of a tax under this section for permanent improvements to a criminal justice facility, the board of county commissioners may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the tax and issue anticipation notes in a principal amount not exceeding fifty per cent of the total estimated proceeds of the tax remaining to be collected in each year over a period of five years after issuance of the notes. Anticipation notes under this section shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code. Notes issued under division (G) of this section shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (H) A tax for operating expenses and criminal justice services or for permanent improvements levied under this section for a specified number of years may be renewed or replaced in the same manner as a tax for current operating expenses or permanent improvements levied under section 5705.19 of the Revised Code. A tax levied under this section for a continuing period of time may be decreased in accordance with section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.25. (A)(1) A copy of any resolution adopted as provided in section 5705.19 or 5705.2111 of the Revised Code shall be certified by the taxing authority to the board of elections of the proper county not less than ninety days before the general election in any year, and the board shall submit the proposal to the electors of the subdivision at the succeeding November election. In the case of a qualifying library levy, the board shall submit the question to the electors of the library district or association library district. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a resolution to renew or to renew and increase or renew and decrease an existing levy, regardless of the section of the Revised Code under which the tax was imposed, shall not be placed on the ballot unless the question is submitted at the general election held during the last year the tax to be renewed may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate, or at any election held in the ensuing year. The limitation of the foregoing sentence does not apply to a resolution to renew and increase or to renew and decrease an existing levy that was imposed under section 5705.191 of the Revised Code to supplement the general fund for the purpose of making appropriations for one or more of the following purposes: for public assistance, human or social services, relief, welfare, hospitalization, health, and support of general hospitals. The limitation of the second preceding sentence also does not apply to a resolution that proposes to renew two or more existing levies imposed under section 5705.222 or division (L) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, or under section 5705.21 or 5705.217 of the Revised Code, in which case the question shall be submitted on the date of the general or primary election held during the last year at least one of the levies to be renewed may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate, or at any election held during the ensuing year. A resolution proposing to renew or renew and increase or decrease an existing levy may specify that the renewal, increase, or decrease of the existing levy shall be extended on the tax list for the tax year specified in the resolution, which may be the last year the existing levy may be extended on the list or the ensuing year. If the renewal, increase, or decrease is to be extended on the tax list for the last tax year the existing levy would otherwise be extended, the existing levy shall not be extended on the tax list for that last year unless the question of the renewal, increase, or decrease is not approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, in which case the existing levy shall be extended on the tax list for that last year. For purposes of this section, a levy shall be considered to be an "existing levy" through the year following the last year it can be placed on the tax list and duplicate. (3) The board of elections shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of such questions to the electors of such subdivision, library district, or association library district, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in such subdivision, library district, or association library district for the election of county officers. Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the subdivision, library district, or association library district once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice shall state the purpose, the levy's estimated annual collections if the levy is not to pay debt charges, the proposed increase in rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, either that rate or the effective rate, as applicable, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, the number of years during which the increase will be in effect, the first month and year in which the tax will be levied, and the time and place of the election. (B) The form of the ballots cast at an election held pursuant to division (A) of this section shall be as follows: "An additional tax for the benefit of (name of subdivision or public library) __________ for the purpose of (purpose stated in the resolution) __________, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $____________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for ______ (life of indebtedness or number of years the levy is to run). For the Tax Levy Against the Tax Levy " (C) If the levy is to be in effect for a continuing period of time, the notice of election and the form of ballot shall so state instead of setting forth a specified number of years for the levy. If the additional tax or the renewal, increase, or decrease of an existing levy is to be placed on the current tax list, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after the statement of the number of years the levy is to run, the phrase ", commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)." If the levy submitted is a proposal to renew, increase, or decrease an existing levy, the form of the ballot specified in division (B) of this section must be changed by substituting for the words "An additional" at the beginning of the form, the words "A renewal of a" in case of a proposal to renew an existing levy in the same amount; the words "A renewal of ________ mills and an increase of ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value to constitute a" in the case of an increase; or the words "A renewal of part of an existing levy, being a reduction of ______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, to constitute a" in the case of a decrease in the proposed levy. Additionally, the effective rate, in lieu of the rate, shall be expressed for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. If the levy submitted is a proposal to renew two or more existing levies imposed under section 5705.222 or division (L) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, or under section 5705.21 or 5705.217 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot specified in division (B) of this section shall be modified by substituting for the words "an additional tax" the words "a renewal of ____(insert the number of levies to be renewed) existing taxes." If the levy submitted is a levy under section 5705.72 of the Revised Code or a proposal to renew, increase, or decrease an existing levy imposed under that section, the name of the subdivision shall be "the unincorporated area of __________ (name of township)." If the levy is for the payment of debt charges, the form of the ballot shall be modified by omitting the phrase ", that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually." The question covered by a resolution adopted under this section shall be submitted as a separate proposition but may be printed on the same ballot with any other proposition submitted at the same election, other than the election of officers. More than one such question may be submitted at the same election. (D) A levy voted in excess of the ten-mill limitation under this section shall be certified to the tax commissioner. In the first year of the levy, it shall be extended on the tax lists after the February settlement succeeding the election. If the additional tax is to be placed upon the tax list of the current year, as specified in the resolution providing for its submission, the result of the election shall be certified immediately after the canvass by the board of elections to the taxing authority, who shall make the necessary levy and certify it to the county auditor, who shall extend it on the tax lists for collection. After the first year, the tax levy shall be included in the annual tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. (E) A tax levied under section 5705.2111 of the Revised Code shall not be renewed and increased. Sec. 5705.251. (A) A copy of a resolution adopted under section 5705.212 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code shall be certified by the board of education to the board of elections of the proper county not less than ninety days before the date of the election specified in the resolution, and the board of elections shall submit the proposal to the electors of the school district at a special election to be held on that date. The board of elections shall make the necessary arrangements for the submission of the question or questions to the electors of the school district, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in the school district for the election of county officers. Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the subdivision once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. (1) In the case of a resolution adopted under section 5705.212 of the Revised Code, the notice shall state separately, for each tax being proposed, the purpose; the proposed increase in rate, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value; the number of years during which the increase will be in effect; and the first calendar year in which the tax will be due. The notice shall also state the original tax's estimated annual collections and the estimated aggregate annual collections of all such taxes. For an election on the question of a renewal levy, the notice shall state the purpose; the levy's estimated annual collections; the proposed rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value; the effective rate, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value; and the number of years the tax will be in effect. If the resolution is adopted under division (C) of that section, the rate of each tax being proposed shall be expressed as both the total rate and the portion of the total rate to be allocated to the qualifying school district and the portion to be allocated to partnering community schools. (2) In the case of a resolution adopted under section 5705.213 of the Revised Code, the notice shall state the purpose; the amount proposed to be raised by the tax in the first year it is levied; the estimated average additional tax rate for the first year it is proposed to be levied, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value; the number of years during which the increase will be in effect; and the first calendar year in which the tax will be due. The notice also shall state the amount by which the amount to be raised by the tax may be increased in each year after the first year. The amount of the allowable increase may be expressed in terms of a dollar increase over, or a percentage of, the amount raised by the tax in the immediately preceding year. For an election on the question of a renewal levy, the notice shall state the purpose; the amount proposed to be raised by the tax; the estimated tax rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value; and the number of years the tax will be in effect. In any case, the notice also shall state the time and place of the election. (B)(1) The form of the ballot in an election on taxes proposed under section 5705.212 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: "Shall the __________ school district be authorized to levy taxes for current expenses, the aggregate rate of which may increase in ______ (number) increment(s) of not more than ______ mill(s) for each $1 of taxable value, from an original rate of ______ mill(s) for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, to a maximum rate of ______ mill(s) for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually? The original tax is first proposed to be levied in ______ (the first year of the tax), and the incremental tax in ______ (the first year of the increment) (if more than one incremental tax is proposed in the resolution, the first year that each incremental tax is proposed to be levied shall be stated in the preceding format, and the increments shall be referred to as the first, second, third, or fourth increment, depending on their number). The aggregate rate of tax so authorized will __________ (insert either, "expire with the original rate of tax which shall be in effect for ______ years" or "be in effect for a continuing period of time"). FOR THE TAX LEVIES AGAINST THE TAX LEVIES " If the tax is proposed by a qualifying school district under division (C)(1) of section 5705.212 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after the phrase "each $1 of taxable value," the following: "(of which ______ mills is to be allocated to partnering community schools)." (2) The form of the ballot in an election on the question of a renewal levy under section 5705.212 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: "Shall the _________ school district be authorized to renew a tax for current expenses, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_________ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for __________ (number of years the levy shall be in effect, or a continuing period of time)? FOR THE TAX LEVIES AGAINST THE TAX LEVIES " If the tax is proposed by a qualifying school district under division (C)(2) of section 5705.212 of the Revised Code and the total rate and the rates allocated to the school district and partnering community schools are to remain the same as those of the levy being renewed, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after the phrase "each $1 of taxable value," the following: "(of which ______ mills is to be allocated to partnering community schools)." If the total rate is to be increased, the form of the ballot shall state that the proposal is to renew the existing tax with an increase in rate and shall state the increase in rate, the total rate resulting from the increase, and, of that rate, the portion of the rate to be allocated to partnering community schools. If the total rate is to be decreased, the form of the ballot shall state that the proposal is to renew a part of the existing tax and shall state the reduction in rate, the total rate resulting from the decrease, and, of that rate, the portion of the rate to be allocated to partnering community schools. (3) If a tax proposed by a ballot form prescribed in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section is to be placed on the current tax list, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after the statement of the number of years the levy is to be in effect, the phrase ", commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)." (C) The form of the ballot in an election on a tax proposed under section 5705.213 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: "Shall the ________ school district be authorized to levy the following tax for current expenses? The tax will first be levied in ______ (year) to raise $______. In the ______ (number of years) following years, the tax will increase by not more than ______ (per cent or dollar amount of increase) each year, so that, during ______ (last year of the tax), the tax will raise approximately ______ (dollars). The county auditor estimates that the rate will be ______ mill(s) for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_____ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, both during ______ (first year of the tax) and ______ mill(s) for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, during ______ (last year of the tax). The tax will not be levied after ______ (year). FOR THE TAX LEVIES AGAINST THE TAX LEVIES " The form of the ballot in an election on the question of a renewal levy under section 5705.213 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: "Shall the _________ school district be authorized to renew a tax for current expenses which will raise $_________, estimated by the county auditor to be _________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value? The tax shall be in effect for _________ (the number of years the levy shall be in effect, or a continuing period of time). FOR THE TAX LEVIES AGAINST THE TAX LEVIES " If the tax is to be placed on the current tax list, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding, after the statement of the number of years the levy is to be in effect, the phrase ", commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year __________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)." (D) The question covered by a resolution adopted under section 5705.212 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code shall be submitted as a separate question, but may be printed on the same ballot with any other question submitted at the same election, other than the election of officers. More than one question may be submitted at the same election. (E) Taxes voted in excess of the ten-mill limitation under division (B) or (C) of this section shall be certified to the tax commissioner. If an additional tax is to be placed upon the tax list of the current year, as specified in the resolution providing for its submission, the result of the election shall be certified immediately after the canvass by the board of elections to the board of education. The board of education immediately shall make the necessary levy and certify it to the county auditor, who shall extend it on the tax list for collection. After the first year, the levy shall be included in the annual tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. Sec. 5705.261. (A) The question of decrease of an increased rate of levy approved for a continuing period of time by the voters of a subdivision or, in the case of a qualifying library levy, the voters of the library district or association library district, may be initiated by the filing of a petition with the board of elections of the proper county not less than ninety days before the general election in any year requesting that an election be held on such question. Such petition shall state the amount of the proposed decrease in the rate of levy and shall be signed by qualified electors residing in the subdivision, library district, or association library district equal in number to at least ten per cent of the total number of votes cast in the subdivision, library district, or association library district for the office of governor at the most recent general election for that office. Only one such petition may be filed during each five-year period following the election at which the voters approved the increased rate for a continuing period of time. After determination by it that such petition is valid, the board of elections shall do both of the following: (1) Request that the county auditor certify to the board, in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, an estimate of the levy's annual collections and the levy's effective rate in both the last year before the proposed decrease and the first year that the decrease applies, stated in dollars, rounded to the nearest dollar, for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. If the subdivision, library district, or association library district is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain from the county auditor of each other county in which the subdivision or district is located the tax valuation applicable to the portion of the subdivision or district in that county. The county auditor shall certify such information to the board of elections within ten days after receiving the board's request. (2) Submit the question to the electors of the subdivision, library district, or association library district at the succeeding general election pursuant to division (B) of this section. (B) The election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in such subdivision, library district, or association library district for county offices. Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice shall state the purpose, the levy's estimated annual collections, the amount of the proposed decrease in rate, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, the effective rate of the levy in the year before the proposed decrease and the first year that the decrease applies, both expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, and the time and place of the election. The form of the ballot cast at such election shall be prescribed by the secretary of state but must include all information required to be included in the notice. The question covered by the petition shall be submitted as a separate proposition but it may be printed on the same ballot with any other propositions submitted at the same election other than the election of officers. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question of a decrease at such election approve the proposed decrease in rate, the result of the election shall be certified immediately after the canvass by the board of elections to the appropriate taxing authority, which shall thereupon, after the current year, cease to levy such increased rate or levy such tax at such reduced rate upon the tax list of the subdivision, library district, or association library district. If notes have been issued in anticipation of the collection of such levy, the taxing authority shall continue to levy and collect under authority of the election authorizing the original levy such amounts as will be sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on such anticipation notes as the same fall due. In the case of a levy for the current expenses of a qualifying school district and of partnering community schools imposed under section 5705.192, as it existed before the effective date of this amendment, division (B) of section 5705.21, division (C) of section 5705.212, or division (J) of section 5705.218 of the Revised Code for a continuing period of time, the rate allocated to the school district and to partnering community schools shall each be decreased by a number of mills per dollar that is proportionate to the decrease in the rate of the levy in proportion to the rate at which the levy was imposed before the decrease. Sec. 5705.27. There is hereby created in each county a county budget commission consisting of the county auditor, the county treasurer, and the prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting attorney may recuse the prosecuting attorney, in which case a member of the board of county commissioners selected by the board of county commissioners shall serve in lieu of the prosecuting attorney. Upon petition filed with the board of elections, signed by the number of electors of the county equal in amount to three per cent of the total number of votes cast for governor at the most recent election therefor, there shall be submitted to the electors of the county at the next general election occurring not sooner than ninety days after the filing of the petition, the question "Shall the county budget commission consist of two additional members to be elected from the county?" Provision shall be made on the ballot for the election from the county at large of two additional members of the county budget commission who shall be electors of the county if a majority of the electors voting on the question shall have voted in the affirmative. In such counties, where the electors have voted in the affirmative, the county budget commission shall consist of such two elected members in addition to the county auditor, the county treasurer and the prosecuting attorney or commissioner as applicable. Such members, who shall not hold any other public office, shall serve for a term of four years. The The commission shall meet at the office of the county auditor in each county on the first Monday in February and on the first Monday in August, annually, and shall complete its work on or before the first day of September, annually, unless for good cause the tax commissioner extends the time for completing the work. The commission shall offer, during at least one public meeting annually, testimony from a member of the commission or an invited speaker describing the concept and function of taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation, how such taxes are allocated to various jurisdictions in the county, and the fiscal impact of such taxes in light of its exemption from the reduction authorized under section 319.301 of the Revised Code. A majority of members shall constitute a quorum, provided that no action of the commission shall be valid unless agreed to by a majority of the members of the commission. The auditor shall be the secretary of the commission and shall keep a full and accurate record of all proceedings. The auditor shall appoint such messengers and clerks as the commission deems necessary, and the budget commissioners shall be allowed their actual and necessary expenses. The elected members of the commission shall also receive twenty dollars for each day in attendance at commission meetings and in discharge of official duties. Any vacancy among such elected members shall be filled by the presiding judge of the court of common pleas. In adjusting the rates of taxation and fixing the amount of taxes to be levied each year, the commissioners shall be governed by the amount of the taxable property shown on the auditor's tax list for the current year; provided that if the auditor's tax list has not been completed, the auditor shall estimate, as nearly as practicable, the amount of the taxable property for such year, and such officers shall be governed by such estimate. In any county in which two members of the commission are elected, upon petition filed with the board of elections, signed by the number of electors of the county equal in amount to three per cent of the votes cast for governor at the most recent election therefor, there shall be submitted to the electors of the county at the next general election occurring not sooner than ninety days after the filing of the petition, the question "Shall the elected members be eliminated from the county budget commission?" If the majority of the electors voting thereon shall have voted in the affirmative, the county budget commission shall consist solely of the county auditor, the county treasurer, and the prosecuting attorney or commissioner as applicable. Sec. 5705.28. (A) Except as provided in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section or in section 5705.281 of the Revised Code, the taxing authority of each subdivision or other taxing unit shall adopt a tax budget for the next succeeding fiscal year: (1) On or before the fifteenth day of January in the case of school districts and the city of Cincinnati; (2) On or before the fifteenth day of July in the case of all other subdivisions and taxing units. (B)(1) Before the first day of June in each year, the board of trustees of a school library district entitled to participate in any appropriation or revenue of a school district or to have a tax proposed by the board of education of a school district shall file with the board of education of the school district a tax budget for the ensuing fiscal year. On or before the fifteenth day of July in each year, the board of education of a school district to which a school library district tax budget was submitted under this division shall adopt such tax budget on behalf of the library district, but such budget shall not be part of the school district's tax budget. (2)(a) The taxing authority of a taxing unit that does not levy a tax is not required to adopt a tax budget pursuant to division (A) of this section. Instead, on or before the fifteenth day of July each year, such taxing authority shall adopt an operating budget for the taxing unit for the ensuing fiscal year. The operating budget shall include an estimate of receipts from all sources, a statement of all taxing unit expenses that are anticipated to occur, and the amount required for debt charges during the fiscal year. The operating budget is not required to be filed with the county auditor or the county budget commission. (b) Except for this section and sections 5705.36, 5705.38, 5705.40, 5705.41, 5705.43, 5705.44, and 5705.45 of the Revised Code, a taxing unit that does not levy a tax is not a taxing unit for purposes of Chapter 5705. of the Revised Code. Documents prepared in accordance with such sections are not required to be filed with the county auditor or county budget commission. (c) The total appropriations from each fund of a taxing unit that does not levy a tax shall not exceed the total estimated revenue available for expenditures from the fund, and appropriations shall be made from each fund only for the purposes for which the fund is established. (C)(1) To assist in the preparation of the tax budget, the head of each department, board, commission, and district authority entitled to participate in any appropriation or revenue of a subdivision shall file with the taxing authority, or in the case of a municipal corporation, with its chief executive officer, before the forty-fifth day prior to the date on which the budget must be adopted, an estimate of contemplated revenue and expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year, in such form as is prescribed by the taxing authority of the subdivision or by the auditor of state. The taxing authority shall include in its budget of expenditures the full amounts requested by district authorities, not to exceed the amount authorized by law, if such authorities may fix the amount of revenue they are to receive from the subdivision. In a municipal corporation in which a special levy for a municipal university has been authorized to be levied in excess of the ten-mill limitation, or is required by the charter of the municipal corporation, the taxing authority shall include an amount not less than the estimated yield of such levy, if such amount is requested by the board of directors of the municipal university. (2) A county board of developmental disabilities may include within its estimate of contemplated revenue and expenditures a reserve balance account in the community developmental disabilities residential services fund. The account shall contain money that is not needed to pay for current expenses for residential services and supported living but will be needed to pay for expenses for such services in the future or may be needed for unanticipated emergency expenses. On the request of the county board of developmental disabilities, the board of county commissioners shall include such an account in its budget of expenditures and appropriate money to the account from residential service moneys for the county board. (D) The board of trustees of any public library desiring to participate in the distribution of the county public library fund shall adopt appropriate rules extending the benefits of the library service of such library to all the inhabitants of the county on equal terms, unless such library service is by law available to all such inhabitants, and shall certify a copy of such rules to the taxing authority with its estimate of contemplated revenue and expenditures. Where such rules have been so certified or where the adoption of such rules is not required, the taxing authority shall include in its budget of receipts such amounts as are specified by such board as contemplated revenue from the county public library fund, and in its budget of expenditures the full amounts requested therefrom by such board. No library association, incorporated or unincorporated, is entitled to participate in the proceeds of the county public library fund unless such association both was organized and operating prior to January 1, 1968, and participated in the distribution of the proceeds of the county public library fund prior to December 31, 2005. (E) Any health district created under Chapter 3709. of the Revised Code that does not file an estimate of contemplated revenue and expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year pursuant to division (C) of this section shall adopt a tax budget on its own behalf pursuant to division (A) of this section. Sec. 5705.29. This section does not apply to a subdivision or taxing unit for which the county budget commission has waived the requirement to adopt a tax budget pursuant to section 5705.281 of the Revised Code. The tax budget shall present the following information in such detail as is prescribed by the auditor of state: (A)(1) A statement of the necessary current operating expenses for the ensuing fiscal year for each department and division of the subdivision, classified as to personal services and other expenses, and the fund from which such expenditures are to be made. Except in the case of a school district, this estimate may include a contingent expense not designated for any particular purpose, and not to exceed three per cent of the total amount of appropriations for current expenses. In the case of a school district, this estimate may include a contingent expense not designated for any particular purpose and not to exceed thirteen per cent of the total amount of appropriations for current expenses. (2) A statement of the expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year necessary for permanent improvements, exclusive of any expense to be paid from bond issues, classified as to the improvements contemplated by the subdivision and the fund from which such expenditures are to be made; (3) The amounts required for the payment of final judgments; (4) A statement of expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year necessary for any purpose for which a special levy is authorized, and the fund from which such expenditures are to be made; (5) Comparative statements, so far as possible, in parallel columns of corresponding items of expenditures for the current fiscal year, including a statement of estimated expenses to the end of that fiscal year, and the two preceding fiscal years. (B)(1) An estimate of receipts from other sources than the general property tax during the ensuing fiscal year, which shall include an estimate of unencumbered balances at the end of the current fiscal year, and the funds to which such estimated receipts are credited; (2) The amount each fund requires from the general property tax, which shall be the difference between the contemplated expenditure from the fund and the estimated receipts, as provided in this section. The section of the Revised Code under which the tax is authorized shall be set forth. (3) Comparative statements, so far as possible, in parallel columns of taxes and other revenues for the current fiscal year and the two preceding fiscal years; (4) Comparative statements, so far as possible, in parallel columns of all funds in control of the subdivision for the current fiscal year and the two preceding fiscal years not already included in the tax budget pursuant to divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section. (C)(1) The amount required for debt charges; (2) The estimated receipts from sources other than the tax levy for payment of such debt charges, including the proceeds of refunding bonds to be issued to refund bonds maturing in the next succeeding fiscal year; (3) The net amount for which a tax levy shall be made, classified as to bonds authorized and issued prior to January 1, 1922, and those authorized and issued subsequent to such date, and as to what portion of the levy will be within and what in excess of the ten-mill limitation. (D) An estimate of amounts from taxes authorized to be levied in excess of the ten-mill limitation on the tax rate, and the fund to which such amounts will be credited, together with the sections of the Revised Code under which each such tax is exempted from all limitations on the tax rate. (E)(1)(E) If the taxing unit estimates that it will collect more revenue in the succeeding fiscal year than in the current fiscal year from any tax levied within the ten-mill limitation or due to the operation of division (E) of section 319.301 of the Revised Code, a declaration of the taxing unit's intent to collect the additional revenue or to forgo all or a portion of the additional revenue. (F)(1) A board of education may include in its budget for the fiscal year in which a levy proposed under section 5705.194, 5705.199, 5705.21, 5705.213, or 5705.219, a property tax levy proposed under section 5748.09, or the original levy under section 5705.212 of the Revised Code is first extended on the tax list and duplicate an estimate of expenditures to be known as a voluntary contingency reserve balance, which shall not be greater than twenty-five per cent of the total amount of the levy estimated to be available for appropriation in such year. (2) A board of education may include in its budget for the fiscal year following the year in which a levy proposed under section 5705.194, 5705.199, 5705.21, 5705.213, or 5705.219, a property tax levy proposed under section 5748.09, or the original levy under section 5705.212 of the Revised Code is first extended on the tax list and duplicate an estimate of expenditures to be known as a voluntary contingency reserve balance, which shall not be greater than twenty per cent of the amount of the levy estimated to be available for appropriation in such year. (3) Except as provided in division (E)(4)(F)(4) of this section, the full amount of any reserve balance the board includes in its budget shall be retained by the county auditor and county treasurer out of the first semiannual settlement of taxes until the beginning of the next succeeding fiscal year, and thereupon, with the depository interest apportioned thereto, it shall be turned over to the board of education, to be used for the purposes of such fiscal year. (4) A board of education, by a two-thirds vote of all members of the board, may appropriate any amount withheld as a voluntary contingency reserve balance during the fiscal year for any lawful purpose, provided that prior to such appropriation the board of education has authorized the expenditure of all amounts appropriated for contingencies under section 5705.40 of the Revised Code. Upon request by the board of education, the county auditor shall draw a warrant on the district's account in the county treasury payable to the district in the amount requested. (F) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the county budget commission shall not reduce the taxing authority of a subdivision as a result of the creation of a reserve balance account. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the county budget commission shall not consider the amount in a reserve balance account of a township, county, or municipal corporation as an unencumbered balance or as revenue for the purposes of division (E)(3) or (4) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code. The county budget commission may require documentation of the reasonableness of the reserve balance held in any reserve balance account. The commission shall consider any amount in a reserve balance account that it determines to be unreasonable as unencumbered and as revenue for the purposes of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code and may take such amounts into consideration when determining whether to reduce the taxing authority of a subdivision. Sec. 5705.30. This section does not apply to a subdivision for which the county budget commission has waived the requirement to adopt a tax budget under section 5705.281 of the Revised Code. In addition to the information required by section 5705.29 of the Revised Code, the budget of each subdivision and school library district shall include such other information as is prescribed by the auditor of state. At least two copies of the budget shall be filed in the office of the fiscal officer of the subdivision for public inspection not less than ten days before its adoption by the taxing authority, and such taxing authority shall hold at least one public hearing thereon, of which public notice shall be given by at least one publication not less than ten days prior to the date of hearing in the official publication of such subdivision, or in a newspaper having general circulation in the subdivision. The budget, after adoption, shall be submitted to the county auditor on or before the twentieth day of July, or in the case of a school district or the city of Cincinnati, by the twentieth day of January. The tax commissioner may prescribe a later date for the submission of a subdivision's tax budget. Any subdivision that fails to submit its budget to the county auditor on or before the date prescribed by this section or a later date prescribed by the commissioner shall not receive an apportionment from the undivided local government fund distribution for the ensuing calendar year unless the commissioner determines that the budget was adopted by the subdivision on or before the fifth day before the date prescribed by this section for submitting the budget, but was not submitted by the date so prescribed or the later time prescribed by the commissioner because of ministerial error by the subdivision or its officers, employees, or other representatives. Sec. 5705.31. The county auditor shall present to the county budget commission the annual tax budgets submitted under sections 5705.01 to 5705.47 of the Revised Code, together with an estimate prepared by the auditor of the amount of any state levy, the rate of any school tax levy as previously determined, the tax commissioner's estimate of the amount to be received in the county public library fund, the tax rates provided under section 5705.281 of the Revised Code if adoption of the tax budget was waived under that section, and such other information as the commission requests or the tax commissioner prescribes. The The budget commission shall examine such budget and, if the taxing authority is a board of education that has elected to include projections pursuant to division (E) of section 5705.391 of the Revised Code, shall examine such projections. Using the budget and, if applicable, included projections, the budget commission shall ascertain the total amount proposed to be raised in the county for the purposes of each subdivision and other taxing units in the county and the need for those amounts. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the county budget commission may reduce the amount to be raised by any levy pursuant to section 5705.32 of the Revised Code. The commission shall ascertain that the following levies have been properly authorized and, if so authorized, shall approve them without modification: (A) All levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation; in the first year they are levied, unless the levy is the renewal of an existing tax or the subdivision or taxing unit requests an amount requiring a lower rate for the succeeding fiscal year. Such a request for an amount requiring a lower rate applies only to the succeeding fiscal year unless the subdivision or taxing unit expressly states that the request is permanent. (B) All levies for unsatisfied debt charges not provided for by levies in excess of the ten-mill limitation, including levies that remain necessary to pay notes issued for emergency purposes; (C) The levies prescribed by division (B) of sections 742.33 and 742.34 of the Revised Code; (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, a minimum levy within the ten-mill limitation for the current expense and debt service of each subdivision or taxing unit, which shall equal two-thirds of the average levy for current expenses and debt service allotted within the fifteen-mill limitation to such subdivision or taxing unit during the last five years the fifteen-mill limitation was in effect unless such subdivision or taxing unit requests an amount requiring a lower rate. Except for the succeeding fiscal year, or if it expressed its intent to forgo collections from such a levy under division (E) of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code. Such a request for an amount requiring a lower rate applies only to the succeeding fiscal year unless the subdivision or taxing unit expressly states that the request is permanent. Except as provided in section 5705.312 of the Revised Code, if the levies required in divisions (B) and (C) of this section for the subdivision or taxing unit equal or exceed the entire minimum levy of the subdivision as fixed, the minimum levies of the other subdivisions or taxing units shall be reduced by the commission to provide for the levies and an operating levy for the subdivision. Such additional levy shall be deducted from the minimum levies of each of the other subdivisions or taxing units, but the operating levy for a school district shall not be reduced below a figure equivalent to forty-five per cent of the millage available within the ten-mill limitation after all the levies in divisions (B) and (C) of this section have been provided for. If a municipal corporation and a township have entered into an annexation agreement under section 709.192 of the Revised Code in which they agree to reallocate their shares of the minimum levies established under this division and if that annexation agreement is submitted along with the annual tax budget of both the township and the municipal corporation, then, when determining the minimum levy under this division, the auditor shall allocate, to the extent possible, the minimum levy for that municipal corporation and township in accordance with their annexation agreement. (E) The levies prescribed by section 3709.29 of the Revised Code. Divisions (A) to (E)(D) of this section are mandatory, and commissions shall be without discretion to reduce such minimum levies except as provided in such divisionssection 5705.316 of the Revised Code. If any debt charge is omitted from the budget, the commission shall include it therein. Sec. 5705.314. (A) If the board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district proposes to change its levy within the ten-mill limitation in a manner that will result in an increase in the amount of real property taxes levied by the board in the tax year the change takes effect, the board shall hold a public hearing solely on the proposal and obtain approval from the county budget commission of each county in which the district has territory before adopting a resolution to implement the proposal. The (B) Before holding the board of education hearing required by division (A) of this section, the board shall publish notice of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district once a week for two consecutive weeks or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. The second publication shall be not less than ten nor more than thirty days before the date of the hearing, and the notice shall include the date, time, place, and subject of the hearing, and a statement that the change proposed by the board may result in an increase in the amount of real property taxes levied by the board. At the time the board submits the notice for publication, the board shall send a copy of the notice to the auditor of the county where the school district is located or, if the school district is located in more than one county, to the auditor of each of those counties. Upon receipt of the notice, the county auditor shall certify a copy of the notice to the county budget commission. (C) Upon certification of a notice to a county budget commission pursuant to division (B) of this section, the county budget commission shall schedule a hearing for a date that is not less than ten and not more than thirty days after the date of certification. The hearing shall not be held on the same day as the hearing required by division (A) of this section, and if more than one county budget commission is required under this division to hold a hearing on the proposed levy, the county budget commission hearings shall not be held on the same day. Each commission shall publish the date, time, location, and purpose of the meeting on the county auditor's web site. The school district shall publish that information on the school's web site. During the hearing before each commission, the school district shall present evidence demonstrating the need to change the levy to the county budget commission. The district shall not change the levy unless, by majority vote, the county budget commission approves the need to change the levy. Sec. 5705.316. (A) A board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district shall make the certification required under section 5705.36 of the Revised Code to the county auditor of each county in which the district is located on or before the fifteenth day of July. A district that has designated funds for permanent improvements as provided in division (B) of this section shall, at the same time, certify to each such county auditor an accounting of the amount of such designation, the amount spent towards permanent improvements, and the amount remaining of the designation. (B) The county budget commission or, if applicable, joint budget commission shall convene on or before the fifteenth day of August to review the certifications from each such school district to determine if the amount of carry-over balance in the district's general operating budget from the preceding fiscal year exceeds forty per cent of the district's general fund expenditures made in the preceding fiscal year. A board may, by resolution, designate an amount of the district's carry-over balance as reserved for expenditure on current or future permanent improvements within the following three years. Upon certification of the resolution to the commission on or before the fifteenth day of July, the commission shall not consider the designated amount in determining whether the district's carry-over balance exceeded the threshold for those three years. If such funds are not expended as designated within those three years, the commission shall consider them as a part of the carry-over balance in all subsequent years. (C) If a district's carry-over balance exceeds the threshold, the commission shall reduce the rate of, or the annual amount of money to be raised by, any or all of the current expense taxes levied by the district for the current tax year so as to reduce the district's collections by the amount by which the district's general operating budget carry-over balance exceeded the threshold multiplied by a percentage as provided in the following table relative to the amount of the carry-over balance: 1 2 A Carry-over balance less than $2 million 0% B Carry-over balance is $2 million or more but less than $4 million 25% C Carry-over balance is $4 million or more but less than $6 million 50% D Carry-over balance is $6 million or more but less than $10 million 75% E Carry-over balance $10 million or more 100% .These reductions apply only for the current tax year and shall be made without regard to maintaining the reduction limit imposed under division (E)(2) of section 319.301 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner shall treat such a reduction as a reduction in the rate at which the tax is authorized to be levied. (D) Nothing in this section prohibits a county budget commission from reducing the rate of a current levy as otherwise authorized by law. This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) A school district with a current operating expenditure per equivalent pupil that is less than eighty per cent of the state average, as determined under section 3302.21 of the Revised Code, unless the district's carry-over balance exceeds fifty per cent of the preceding year's expenditures as otherwise determined under division (B) of this section. (2) An island school district. (3) A joint state school district. Sec. 5705.32. (A) The county budget commission shall adjust the estimated amounts required from the general property tax for each fund, as shown by the tax budgets or other information required to be provided under section 5705.281 of the Revised Code, so as to bring the tax levies required therefor within the limitations specified in sections 5705.01 to 5705.47 of the Revised Code, for such levies, but no levy shall be reduced below a minimum fixed by law. The commission may revise and adjust the estimate of balances and receipts from all sources for each fund and shall determine the total appropriations that may be made therefrom. If a taxing unit declared its intent to forgo all or a portion of collections under division (E) of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code, the commission shall adjust the rate of each levy as required to result in that reduction in collections. (B) Except as otherwise provided in section 5705.31 of the Revised Code, the county budget commission may adjust the estimated amounts required from the general property tax for each fund, as shown by the tax budgets or other information required to be provided under section 5705.281 of the Revised Code, so as to bring the tax levies required therefor within levels the commission finds reasonable and prudent to avoid unnecessary, excessive, or unneeded collections. If the county budget commission adjusts amounts from any tax levied by a taxing unit other than a qualifying subdivision, the adjustment shall be subject to both of the following: (1) Except as authorized by section 5705.316 of the Revised Code, no levy shall be reduced below the level that would cause it to collect less than what the levy collected in the preceding year, unless funds are available from reserve balance accounts, nonexpendable trust funds, or carryover amounts to offset a reduction below that level, and the budget commission shall consider reserve balance accounts, nonexpendable trust funds, and carryover amounts for that purpose; (2) Except as authorized by division (A) of this section or section 5705.316 of the Revised Code, no levy may be reduced to a level that would cause a school district subject to division (A) of section 3317.01 of the Revised Code to levy less than twenty mills for current operating expenses as required by that division. (C) The commission shall fix the amount of the county public library fund to be distributed to each board of public library trustees that has qualified under section 5705.28 of the Revised Code for participation in the proceeds of such fund. The amount paid to all libraries in the county from such fund shall never be a smaller per cent of the fund than the average of the percentages of the county's classified taxes that were distributed to libraries in 1982, 1983, and 1984, as determined by the county auditor. The commission shall base the amount for distribution on the needs of such library for the construction of new library buildings, parts of buildings, improvements, operation, maintenance, or other expenses. In determining the needs of each library board of trustees, and in calculating the amount to be distributed to any library board of trustees on the basis of its needs, the commission shall make no reduction in its allocation from the fund on account of additional revenues realized by a library from increased taxes or service charges voted by its electorate, from revenues received through federal or state grants, projects, or programs, or from grants from private sources. (C)(D) Notwithstanding the fact that alternative methods of financing such needs are available, after fixing the amount to be distributed to libraries, the commission shall fix the amount, if any, of the county public library fund to be distributed to each board of township park commissioners, the county, and each municipal corporation in accordance with the following: (1) Each municipal corporation in the county shall receive a per cent of the remainder that equals the per cent that the county auditor determines the classified property taxes originating in such municipal corporation in 1984 were of the total of all of the county's classified property taxes in 1984. The commission may deduct from this amount any amount that the budget commission allows to the board of township park commissioners of a township park district, the boundaries of which are coextensive with or contained within the boundaries of the municipal corporation. (2) The county shall receive a per cent of the remainder that equals the per cent that the county auditor determines the classified property taxes originating outside of the boundaries of municipal corporations in the county in 1984 were of the total of all of the county's classified property taxes in 1984. The commission may deduct from this amount any amount that the budget commission allows to the board of township park commissioners of a township park district, the boundaries of which are not coextensive with or contained within those of any municipal corporation in the county. (D)(E) The commission shall separately set forth the amounts fixed and determined under divisions (B)(C) and (C)(D) of this section in the "official certificate of estimated resources," as provided in section 5705.35 of the Revised Code, and separately certify such amount to the county auditor who shall be guided thereby in the distribution of the county public library fund for and during the fiscal year. In determining such amounts, the commission shall be guided by the estimate certified by the tax commissioner and presented by the auditor under section 5705.31 of the Revised Code, as to the total amount of revenue to be received in the county public library fund during such fiscal year. (E)(1)(F)(1) At least five days before the date of any meeting at which the budget commission plans to discuss the distribution of the county public library fund, it shall notify each legislative authority and board of public library trustees, county commissioners, and township park commissioners eligible to participate in the distribution of the fund of the date, time, place, and agenda for the meeting. Any legislative authority or board entitled to notice under this division may designate an officer or employee of such legislative authority or board to whom the commission shall deliver the notice. (2) Before the final determination of the amount to be allotted to each subdivision from any source, the commission shall permit representatives of each subdivision and of each board of public library trustees to appear before it to explain its financial needs. (F)(G) If any public library receives and expends any funds allocated to it under this section for the construction of new library buildings or parts of buildings, such library shall be free and open to the inhabitants of the county in which it is located. Any board of library trustees that receives funds under this section and section 5747.48 of the Revised Code shall have its financial records open for public inspection at all reasonable times. Sec. 5705.321. (A) As used in this section: (1) "City, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population" means the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population residing in the county; however, if the county budget commission on or before January 1, 1998, adopted an alternative method of apportionment that was approved by the city, located partially in the county, with the greatest population but not the greatest population residing in the county, "city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population" means the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population whether residing in the county or not, if this alternative meaning is adopted by action of the board of county commissioners and a majority of the boards of township trustees and legislative authorities of municipal corporations located wholly or partially in the county. (2) "Participating political subdivision" means a municipal corporation or township that satisfies all of the following: (a) It is located wholly or partially in the county. (b) It is not the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population. (c) Public library fund moneys are apportioned to it under the county's alternative method or formula of apportionment in the current calendar year. (B) In lieu of the method of apportionment of the county public library fund provided by division (C)(D) of section 5705.32 of the Revised Code, the county budget commission may provide for the apportionment of the fund under an alternative method or on a formula basis as authorized by this section. Except as otherwise provided in division (C) of this section, the alternative method of apportionment shall have first been approved by all of the following governmental units: the board of county commissioners; the legislative authority of the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population; and a majority of the boards of township trustees and legislative authorities of municipal corporations, located wholly or partially in the county, excluding the legislative authority of the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population. In granting or denying approval for an alternative method of apportionment, the board of county commissioners, boards of township trustees, and legislative authorities of municipal corporations shall act by motion. A motion to approve shall be passed upon a majority vote of the members of a board of county commissioners, board of township trustees, or legislative authority of a municipal corporation, shall take effect immediately, and need not be published. Any alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved under this division may be revised, amended, or repealed in the same manner as it may be adopted and approved. If an alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved under this division is repealed, the county public library fund shall be apportioned among the subdivisions eligible to participate in the fund, commencing in the ensuing calendar year, under the apportionment provided in divisions (B)(C) and (C)(D) of section 5705.32 of the Revised Code, unless the repeal occurs by operation of division (C) of this section or a new method for apportionment of the fund is provided in the action of repeal. (C) This division applies only in counties in which the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population has a population of twenty thousand or less and a population that is less than fifteen per cent of the total population of the county. In such a county, the legislative authorities or boards of township trustees of two or more participating political subdivisions, which together have a population residing in the county that is a majority of the total population of the county, each may adopt a resolution to exclude the approval otherwise required of the legislative authority of the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population. All of the resolutions to exclude that approval shall be adopted not later than the first Monday of August of the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions are to be made under an alternative method of apportionment. A motion granting or denying approval of an alternative method of apportionment under this division shall be adopted by a majority vote of the members of the board of county commissioners and by a majority vote of a majority of the boards of township trustees and legislative authorities of the municipal corporations located wholly or partially in the county, other than the city, located wholly or partially in the county, with the greatest population, shall take effect immediately, and need not be published. The alternative method of apportionment under this division shall be adopted and approved annually, not later than the first Monday of August of the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions are to be made under it. A motion granting approval of an alternative method of apportionment under this division repeals any existing alternative method of apportionment, effective with distributions to be made from the fund in the ensuing calendar year. An alternative method of apportionment under this division shall not be revised or amended after the first Monday of August of the year preceding the calendar year in which distributions are to be made under it. (D) In determining an alternative method of apportionment authorized by this section, the county budget commission may include in the method any factor considered to be appropriate and reliable, in the sole discretion of the county budget commission. (E) On the basis of any alternative method of apportionment adopted and approved as authorized by this section, as certified by the auditor to the county treasurer, the county treasurer shall make distribution of the money in the county public library fund to each subdivision eligible to participate in the fund, and the auditor, when the amount of those shares is in the custody of the treasurer in the amounts so computed to be due the respective subdivisions, shall at the same time certify to the tax commissioner the percentage share of the county as a subdivision. All money received into the treasury of a subdivision from the county public library fund in a county treasury shall be paid into the general fund and used for the current operating expenses of the subdivision. (F) The actions of the county budget commission taken pursuant to this section are final and may not be appealed to the board of tax appeals, except on the issues of abuse of discretion and failure to comply with the formula. Sec. 5705.35. (A) The certification of the budget commission to the taxing authority of each subdivision or taxing unit, as set forth in section 5705.34 of the Revised Code, shall show the various funds of such subdivisions other than funds to be created by transfer and shall be filed by the county budget commission with such taxing authority on or before the first day of March in the case of school districts and the city of Cincinnati and on or before the first day of September in each year in the case of all other taxing authorities. There shall be set forth on the credit side of each fund the estimated unencumbered balances and receipts, and if a tax is to be levied for such fund, the estimated revenue to be derived therefrom, the rate of the levy, and what portion thereof is within, and what in excess of, the ten-mill tax limitation, and on the debit side, the total appropriations that may be made therefrom. Subject to division (F) of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code, any reserve balance in an account established under section 5705.13 of the Revised Code for the purpose described in division (A)(1) of that section, and the principal of a nonexpendable trust fund established under section 5705.131 of the Revised Code and any additions to principal arising from sources other than the reinvestment of investment earnings arising from that fund, are not unencumbered balances for the purposes of this section. The balance in a reserve balance account established under section 5705.132 of the Revised Code is not an unencumbered balance for the purposes of this division. There shall be attached to the certification a summary, which shall be known as the "official certificate of estimated resources," that shall state the total estimated resources of each fund of the subdivision that are available for appropriation in the fiscal year, other than funds to be created by transfer, and a statement of the amount of the total tax duplicate of the school district to be used in the collection of taxes for the following calendar year. Before the end of the fiscal year, the taxing authority of each subdivision and other taxing unit shall revise its tax budget, if one was adopted, so that the total contemplated expenditures from any fund during the ensuing fiscal year will not exceed the total appropriations that may be made from such fund, as determined by the budget commission in its certification; and such revised budget shall be the basis of the annual appropriation measure. (B) Revenue from real property taxes scheduled to be settled on or before the tenth day of August and the fifteenth day of February of a fiscal year under divisions (A) and (C) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code shall not be available for appropriation by a board of education prior to the fiscal year in which such latest scheduled settlement date occurs, except that moneys advanced to the treasurer of a board of education under division (A)(2)(b) of section 321.34 of the Revised Code shall be available for appropriation in the fiscal year in which they are paid to the treasurer under such section. If the date for any settlement of taxes is extended under division (E) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code, the latest date set forth in divisions (A) to (D) of that section shall be used to determine in which fiscal year the revenues are first available for appropriation. Sec. 5705.36. (A)(1) On or about the first day of each fiscal year, the fiscal officer of each subdivision and other taxing unit shall certify to the county auditor the total amount from all sources available for expenditures from each fund set up in the tax budget or, if adoption of a tax budget was waived under section 5705.281 of the Revised Code, from each fund created by or on behalf of the taxing authority. The amount certified shall include any unencumbered balances that existed at the end of the preceding year, excluding any of the following: (a) Subject to division (F) of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code, any reserve balance in an account established under section 5705.13 of the Revised Code for the purpose described in division (A)(1) of that section; (b) The principal of a nonexpendable trust fund established under section 5705.131 of the Revised Code and any additions to principal arising from sources other than the reinvestment of investment earnings arising from that fund; (c) The balance in a reserve balance account established under section 5705.132 of the Revised Code. A school district's certification shall separately show the amount of any notes and unpaid and outstanding expenses on the preceding thirtieth day of June that are to be paid from property taxes that are to be settled during the current fiscal year under divisions (C) and (D) of section 321.24 of the Revised Code. The budget commission, taking into consideration the balances and revenues to be derived from taxation and other sources, shall revise its estimate of the amounts that will be credited to each fund from such sources, and shall certify to the taxing authority of each subdivision an amended official certificate of estimated resources. (2) Subject to divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section, upon a determination by the fiscal officer of a subdivision that the revenue to be collected by the subdivision will be greater or less than the amount included in an official certificate, the fiscal officer may certify the amount of the deficiency or excess to the commission, and if the commission determines that the fiscal officer's certification is reasonable, the commission shall certify an amended official certificate reflecting the deficiency or excess. (3) Upon a determination by the fiscal officer of a subdivision that the revenue to be collected by the subdivision will be greater than the amount included in an official certificate and the legislative authority intends to appropriate and expend the excess revenue, the fiscal officer shall certify the amount of the excess to the commission, and if the commission determines that the fiscal officer's certification is reasonable, the commission shall certify an amended official certificate reflecting the excess. (4) Upon a determination by the fiscal officer of a subdivision that the revenue to be collected by the subdivision will be less than the amount included in an official certificate and that the amount of the deficiency will reduce available resources below the level of current appropriations, the fiscal officer shall certify the amount of the deficiency to the commission, and the commission shall certify an amended certificate reflecting the deficiency. (5) The total appropriations made during the fiscal year from any fund shall not exceed the amount set forth as available for expenditure from such fund in the official certificate of estimated resources, or any amendment thereof, certified prior to the making of the appropriation or supplemental appropriation. (B) At the time of settlement of taxes against which notes have been issued under division (D) of section 133.10 of the Revised Code and at the time a tax duplicate is delivered pursuant to section 319.28 or 319.29 of the Revised Code, the county auditor shall determine whether the total amount to be distributed to each school district from such settlement or duplicate, when combined with the amounts to be distributed from any subsequent settlement, will increase or decrease the amount available for appropriation during the current fiscal year from any fund. The county auditor shall certify this finding to the budget commission, which shall certify an amended official certificate reflecting the finding or certify to the school district that no amended certificate needs to be issued. Sec. 5705.37. The taxing authority of any subdivision, or the board of trustees of any public library, nonprofit corporation, or library association maintaining a free public library that has adopted and certified rules under section 5705.28 of the Revised Code, that is dissatisfied with any action of the county budget commission may, through its fiscal officer, appeal to the board of tax appeals within thirty days after the receipt by the subdivision of the official certificate or notice of the commission's action. In like manner, but through its clerk, any park district may appeal to the board of tax appeals. An appeal under this section shall be taken by the filing of a notice of appeal, either in person or by certified mail, express mail, or authorized delivery service as provided in section 5703.056 of the Revised Code, with the board and with the commission. If notice of appeal is filed by certified mail, express mail, or authorized delivery service, date of the United States postmark placed on the sender's receipt by the postal service or the date of receipt recorded by the authorized delivery service shall be treated as the date of filing. Upon receipt of the notice of appeal, the commission, by certified mail, shall notify all persons who were parties to the proceeding before the commission of the filing of the notice of appeal and shall file proof of notice with the board of tax appeals. The secretary of the commission shall forthwith certify to the board a transcript of the full and accurate record of all proceedings before the commission, together with all evidence presented in the proceedings or considered by the commission, pertaining to the action from which the appeal is taken. The secretary of the commission also shall certify to the board any additional information that the board may request. The board of tax appeals, in a de novo proceeding, shall forthwith consider the matter presented to the commission, and may modify any action of the commission with reference to the budget, the estimate of revenues and balances, the allocation of the public library fund, or the fixing of tax rates. The If the appeal is taken in response to the fixing of tax rates through a reduction made by the county budget commission, the burden of proof is on the appellant to show the need for a different rate or amount to meet expenses in the ensuing fiscal year. The finding of the board of tax appeals shall be substituted for the findings of the commission, and shall be sent to the tax commissioner, the county auditor, and the taxing authority of the subdivision affected, or to the board of public library trustees affected, as the action of the commission under sections 5705.01 to 5705.47 of the Revised Code. At the request of the taxing authority, board of trustees, or park district that appealed an action of the county budget commission under this section, the findings of the board of tax appeals shall be sent by certified mail at the requestor's expense. This section does not give the board of tax appeals any authority to place any tax levy authorized by law within the ten-mill limitation outside of that limitation, or to reduce any levy below any minimum fixed by law. Sec. 5705.38. (A) This division does not apply to school district appropriation measures. On or about the first day of each fiscal year, the taxing authority of each subdivision or other taxing unit shall pass an appropriation measure, and thereafter during the year it may pass any supplemental appropriation measures as it finds necessary, based on the revised tax budget or the official certificate of estimated resources or amendments of the certificate. If it desires to postpone the passage of the annual appropriation measure until an amended certificate is received based on the actual balances, it may pass a temporary appropriation measure for meeting the ordinary expenses of the taxing unit until no later than the first day of April or, in the case of the city of Cincinnati, the first day of October, of the current year, and the appropriations made in the temporary measure shall be chargeable to the appropriations in the annual appropriation measure for that fiscal year when passed. (B) A board of education shall pass its annual appropriation measure by the first day of October. If, by the first day of October, a board has not received either the amended certificates of estimated resources required by division (B) of section 5705.36 of the Revised Code or certifications that no amended certificates need be issued, the adoption of the annual appropriation measure shall be delayed until the amended certificates or certifications are received. Prior to the passage of the annual appropriation measure, the board may pass a temporary appropriation measure for meeting the ordinary expenses of the district until it passes an annual appropriation measure, and appropriations made in the temporary measure shall be chargeable to the appropriations in the annual appropriation measure for that fiscal year when passed. During the fiscal year and after the passage of the annual appropriation measure, a district may pass any supplemental appropriation measures as it finds necessary, based on the revised tax budget or the official certificate of estimated resources or amendments of the certificate. School district appropriation measures shall be in the form as the auditor of state, after consultation with the tax commissioner, prescribes. (C) Appropriation measures shall be classified so as to set forth separately the amounts appropriated for each office, department, and division, and, within each, the amount appropriated for personal services. In the case of a municipal university, the board of directors of which have assumed, in the manner provided by law, custody and control of the funds of the university, funds shall be appropriated as a lump sum for the use of the university. Sec. 5705.391. (A) Not later than the thirty-first day of August of each fiscal year, each school district board of education shall submit to the department of education and workforce appropriations, revenue, and fund balance assumptions contained in the budget adopted by the board for that fiscal year and projections of expenditures, revenues, and fund balance for the three succeeding fiscal years. Not later than the last day of February of each fiscal year, each school district board of education shall submit updated appropriations, revenue, and fund balance information for the budget adopted for the fiscal year and updated projections of expenditures, revenues, and fund balance for the three succeeding fiscal years. The department of education and workforce and the auditor of state shall jointly adopt rules requiring boards of education to submit five-year governing the submission of current budget information and three-year projections of operational revenues and expenditures by boards of education. The rules shall specify the information required for current budget information and three-year forecast submissions and any additional school district financial and operating information necessary for the audits and analyses conducted by the auditor of state or the department, including special and federal funds expenditures, revenues, and balances. The rules shall provide for the auditor of state or the department to examine the five-year current budget information and three-year projections and to determine whether any further fiscal analysis is needed to ascertain whether a district has the potential to incur a deficit during the first three two years of the five-year three-year period. The auditor of state or the department may conduct any further audits or analyses necessary to assess any district's fiscal condition. If further audits or analyses are conducted by the auditor of state, the auditor of state shall notify the department of the district's fiscal condition, and the department shall immediately notify the district of any potential to incur a deficit in the current fiscal year or of any strong indications that a deficit will be incurred in either of the ensuing two years. If such audits or analyses are conducted by the department, the department shall immediately notify the district and the auditor of state of such potential deficit or strong indications thereof. A district notified under this section shall take immediate steps to eliminate any deficit in the current fiscal year and shall begin to plan to avoid the projected future deficits. (B) The state board of education, in accordance with sections 3319.31 and 3319.311 of the Revised Code, may limit, suspend, or revoke a license as defined under section 3319.31 of the Revised Code that has been issued to any school employee found to have willfully contributed erroneous, inaccurate, or incomplete data required for the submission of the five-yearcurrent budget information and three-year projection required by this section. (C) The department and the auditor of state, in their joint adoption of rules under division (A) of this section, shall not require a board of education to submit its five-year projection of operational revenues and expenditures prior to the thirtieth day of November of any fiscal year. (D) Beginning with submissions required in for fiscal year 2024 2026 and for each fiscal year in which a submission is required under this section thereafter, the department and the auditor shall label the projections regarding property tax allocation in the projection as "state share of local property taxes.state reimbursement for property tax credits. (D) A school district may submit to the county budget commission the most recent projection prepared pursuant to this section with its tax budget as required by section 5705.28 of the Revised Code or other information as allowed by section 5705.281 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.40. Any appropriation ordinance or measure may be amended or supplemented, provided that such amendment or supplement shall comply with all provisions of law governing the taxing authority in making an original appropriation and that no appropriation for any purpose shall be reduced below an amount sufficient to cover all unliquidated and outstanding contracts or obligations certified from or against the appropriation. Transfers may be made by resolution or ordinance from one appropriation item to another, except that a board of county commissioners shall, at the request of the county board of elections, adopt a resolution to transfer funds from one appropriation item of the board of elections to another appropriation item of the board of elections unless the board of county commissioners determines that the transfer is sought for the purpose of providing employee bonuses or salary increases other than increases necessary to reimburse employees for overtime worked. At the close of each fiscal year, the unencumbered balance of each appropriation shall revert to the respective fund from which it was appropriated and shall be subject to future appropriations, provided that funds unexpended at the end of such fiscal year previously appropriated for the payment of obligations unliquidated and outstanding, or previously appropriated pursuant to section 321.261 of the Revised Code for the collection of delinquent taxes, need not be reappropriated, but such unexpended funds shall not be included by any budget-making body or board or any county budget commission in estimating the balance available for the purposes of the next or any succeeding fiscal year. The annual appropriation measure, or an amendment or supplement thereto, may contain an appropriation for contingencies not to exceed the amount authorized by section 5705.29 of the Revised Code and in the case of a school district may also include a voluntary contingency reserve balance in the amount authorized by such section. By a two-thirds vote of all members of the taxing authority of a subdivision or taxing unit, expenditures may be authorized in pursuance of such contingency appropriation or voluntary contingency reserve balance for any lawful purpose for which public funds may be expended, if such purpose could not have reasonably been foreseen at the time of the adoption of the appropriation measure or, in the case of a voluntary contingency reserve balance, if the board of education requests payment of any portion of such balance. Sec. 5705.412. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying contract" means any agreement for the expenditure of money under which aggregate payments from the funds included in the school district's five-year three-year forecast under section 5705.391 of the Revised Code will exceed the lesser of the following amounts: (1) Five hundred thousand dollars; (2) One per cent of the total revenue to be credited in the current fiscal year to the district's general fund, as specified in the district's most recent certificate of estimated resources certified under section 5705.36 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) Notwithstanding section 5705.41 of the Revised Code, no school district shall adopt any appropriation measure, make any qualifying contract, or increase during any school year any wage or salary schedule unless there is attached thereto a certificate, signed as required by this section, that the school district has in effect the authorization to levy taxes including the renewal or replacement of existing levies which, when combined with the estimated revenue from all other sources available to the district at the time of certification, are sufficient to provide the operating revenues necessary to enable the district to maintain all personnel and programs for all the days set forth in its adopted school calendars for the current fiscal year and for a number of days in succeeding fiscal years equal to the number of days instruction was held or is scheduled for the current fiscal year, as follows: (a) A certificate attached to an appropriation measure under this section shall cover only the fiscal year in which the appropriation measure is effective and shall not consider the renewal or replacement of an existing levy as the authority to levy taxes that are subject to appropriation in the current fiscal year unless the renewal or replacement levy has been approved by the electors and is subject to appropriation in the current fiscal year. (b) A certificate attached, in accordance with this section, to any qualifying contract shall cover the term of the contract. (c) A certificate attached under this section to a wage or salary schedule shall cover the term of the schedule. If the board of education has not adopted a school calendar for the school year beginning on the first day of the fiscal year in which a certificate is required, the certificate attached to an appropriation measure shall include the number of days on which instruction was held in the preceding fiscal year and other certificates required under this section shall include that number of days for the fiscal year in which the certificate is required and any succeeding fiscal years that the certificate must cover. The certificate shall be signed by the treasurer and president of the board of education and the superintendent of the school district, unless the district is in a state of fiscal emergency declared under Chapter 3316. of the Revised Code. In that case, the certificate shall be signed by a member of the district's financial planning and supervision commission who is designated by the commission for this purpose. (2) In lieu of the certificate required under division (B) of this section, an alternative certificate stating the following may be attached: (a) The contract is a multi-year contract for materials, equipment, or nonpayroll services essential to the education program of the district; (b) The multi-year contract demonstrates savings over the duration of the contract as compared to costs that otherwise would have been demonstrated in a single year contract, and the terms will allow the district to reduce the deficit it is currently facing in future years as demonstrated in its five-year three-year forecast adopted in accordance with section 5705.391 of the Revised Code. The certificate shall be signed by the treasurer and president of the board of education and the superintendent of the school district, unless the district is in a state of fiscal emergency declared under Chapter 3316. of the Revised Code. In that case, the certificate shall be signed by a member of the district's financial planning and supervision commission who is designated by the commission for this purpose. (C) Every qualifying contract made or wage or salary schedule adopted or put into effect without such a certificate shall be void, and no payment of any amount due thereon shall be made. (D) The department of education and workforce and the auditor of state jointly shall adopt rules governing the methods by which treasurers, presidents of boards of education, superintendents, and members of financial planning and supervision commissions shall estimate revenue and determine whether such revenue is sufficient to provide necessary operating revenue for the purpose of making certifications required by this section. (E) The auditor of state shall be responsible for determining whether school districts are in compliance with this section. At the time a school district is audited pursuant to section 117.11 of the Revised Code, the auditor of state shall review each certificate issued under this section since the district's last audit, and the appropriation measure, contract, or wage and salary schedule to which such certificate was attached. If the auditor of state determines that a school district has not complied with this section with respect to any qualifying contract or wage or salary schedule, the auditor of state shall notify the prosecuting attorney for the county, the city director of law, or other chief law officer of the school district. That officer may file a civil action in any court of appropriate jurisdiction to seek a declaration that the contract or wage or salary schedule is void, to recover for the school district from the payee the amount of payments already made under it, or both, except that the officer shall not seek to recover payments made under any collective bargaining agreement entered into under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. If the officer does not file such an action within one hundred twenty days after receiving notice of noncompliance from the auditor of state, any taxpayer may institute the action in the taxpayer's own name on behalf of the school district. (F) This section does not apply to any contract or increase in any wage or salary schedule that is necessary in order to enable a board of education to comply with division (B) of section 3317.13 of the Revised Code, provided the contract or increase does not exceed the amount required to be paid to be in compliance with such division. (G) Any officer, employee, or other person who expends or authorizes the expenditure of any public funds or authorizes or executes any contract or schedule contrary to this section, expends or authorizes the expenditure of any public funds on the void contract or schedule, or issues a certificate under this section which contains any false statements is liable to the school district for the full amount paid from the district's funds on the contract or schedule. The officer, employee, or other person is jointly and severally liable in person and upon any official bond that the officer, employee, or other person has given to the school district to the extent of any payments on the void claim, not to exceed ten thousand dollars. However, no officer, employee, or other person shall be liable for a mistaken estimate of available resources made in good faith and based upon reasonable grounds. If an officer, employee, or other person is found to have complied with rules jointly adopted by the department of education and workforce and the auditor of state under this section governing methods by which revenue shall be estimated and determined sufficient to provide necessary operating revenue for the purpose of making certifications required by this section, the officer, employee, or other person shall not be liable under this section if the estimates and determinations made according to those rules do not, in fact, conform with actual revenue. The prosecuting attorney of the county, the city director of law, or other chief law officer of the district shall enforce this liability by civil action brought in any court of appropriate jurisdiction in the name of and on behalf of the school district. If the prosecuting attorney, city director of law, or other chief law officer of the district fails, upon the written request of any taxpayer, to institute action for the enforcement of the liability, the attorney general, or the taxpayer in the taxpayer's own name, may institute the action on behalf of the subdivision. (H) This section does not require the attachment of an additional certificate beyond that required by section 5705.41 of the Revised Code for current payrolls of, or contracts of employment with, any employees or officers of the school district. This section does not require the attachment of a certificate to a temporary appropriation measure if all of the following apply: (1) The amount appropriated does not exceed twenty-five per cent of the total amount from all sources available for expenditure from any fund during the preceding fiscal year; (2) The measure will not be in effect on or after the thirtieth day following the earliest date on which the district may pass an annual appropriation measure; (3) An amended official certificate of estimated resources for the current year, if required, has not been certified to the board of education under division (B) of section 5705.36 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5705.55. (A) The board of directors of a lake facilities authority, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may at any time declare by resolution that the amount of taxes which may be raised within the ten-mill limitation by levies on the current tax duplicate will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the necessary requirements of the authority, that it is necessary to levy a tax in excess of such limitation for any of the purposes specified in divisions (A), (B), (F), and (H) of section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, and that the question of such additional tax levy shall be submitted by the board to the electors residing within the boundaries of the impacted lake district on the day of a primary or general election. The resolution shall conform to section 5705.19 of the Revised Code, except that the tax levy may be in effect for no more than five years, as set forth in the resolution, unless the levy is for the payment of debt charges, and the total number of mills levied for each dollar of taxable valuation that may be levied under this section for any tax year shall not exceed one mill. If the levy is for the payment of debt charges, the levy shall be for the life of the bond indebtedness. The resolution shall specify the date of holding the election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after the adoption and certification of the resolution to the board of elections. The resolution shall not include a levy on the current tax list and duplicate unless the election is to be held at or prior to the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the current tax year. The resolution shall be certified to the board of elections of the proper county or counties not less than ninety days before the date of the election. The resolution shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided in the notice of election. Section 5705.25 of the Revised Code shall govern the arrangements for the submission of such question and other matters concerning the election, to which that section refers, except that the election shall be held on the date specified in the resolution. If a majority of the electors voting on the question so submitted in an election vote in favor of the levy, the board of directors may forthwith make the necessary levy within the boundaries of the impacted lake district at the additional rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation on the tax list, for the purpose stated in the resolution. The tax levy shall be included in the next annual tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. (B) The form of the ballot in an election held on the question of levying a tax proposed pursuant to this section shall be as follows or in any other form acceptable to the secretary of state: "A tax for the benefit of (name of lake facilities authority) __________ for the purpose of __________, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, at a rate not exceeding _________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $____________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for ____________ (life of indebtedness or number of years the levy is to run). FOR THE TAX LEVIES AGAINST THE TAX LEVIES " If the levy is for the payment of debt charges, the form of the ballot shall be modified by omitting the phrase ", that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually." (C) On approval of the levy, notes may be issued in anticipation of the collection of the proceeds of the tax levy, other than the proceeds to be received for the payment of bond debt charges, in the amount and manner and at the times as are provided in section 5705.193 of the Revised Code, for the issuance of notes by a county in anticipation of the proceeds of a tax levy. The lake facilities authority may borrow money in anticipation of the collection of current revenues as provided in section 133.10 of the Revised Code. (D) If a tax is levied under this section in a tax year, no other taxing authority of a subdivision or taxing unit, including a port authority, may levy a tax on property in the impacted lake district in the same tax year if the purpose of the levy is substantially the same as the purpose for which the lake facilities authority of the impacted lake district was created. Sec. 5705.60. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying fixed-sum levy" means a tax levied on property at whatever rate is required to produce a specified amount of tax money, including a tax levied under section 5705.199 of the Revised Code, but not including a tax levied in excess of the ten-mill limitation to pay debt charges. (B) Each year, the tax commissioner shall determine by what amount, if any, the rate of a qualifying fixed sum levy must be changed for the levy to produce the levy's specified amount of money for the current tax year. The tax commissioner shall certify the amount determined for each fixed-sum levy to the appropriate county auditor by the first day of September. (C) Unless a different rate is required by section 5705.34 of the Revised Code, each county auditor to whom a rate change is certified under division (B) of this section shall apply the adjusted rate for the current tax year. Sec. 5709.081. (A) Real and tangible personal property owned by a political subdivision that is a public recreational facility for athletic events shall be exempt from taxation if all of the following apply: (1) The property is controlled and managed by a political subdivision or a county-related corporation or by a similar corporation under the direct control of a political subdivision and whose members and trustees are chosen or appointed by the subdivision; (2) All revenues and receipts derived by the subdivision or corporation that controls and manages the property, after deducting amounts needed to pay necessary expenses for the operation and management of the property, accrue to the political subdivision owning the property; (3) The property is not occupied and used for more than seven days in any calendar month by any private entity for profit or for more than a total of fifteen days in any calendar month by all such private entities for profit; (4) The property is under the direction and control of the political subdivision or managing corporation whenever it is being used by a private entity for profit; (5) The primary user or users of the property, if such a primary user exists, are controlled and managed by the political subdivision or corporation that controls and manages the property. (B) Tangible personal property, and all buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements of any kind to the land, that are constructed or, in the case of personal property, acquired after March 2, 1992, and are part of or used in a public recreational facility used by a major league professional athletic team or a class A to class AAA minor league affiliate of a major league baseball team for a significant portion of its home schedule, and land acquired by a political subdivision in 1999 for such purposes or originally leased from a political subdivision, such political subdivision qualifying as such pursuant to division (H) of this section, in 1998 for such purposes, are declared to be public property used for a public purpose and are exempt from taxation, if all of the following apply: (1) Such property, or the land upon which such property is located if such land was originally leased in 1998 from a political subdivision that qualifies as such pursuant to division (H) of this section, is owned by one either of the following: (a) One or more political subdivisions or by a , which may include a new community authority as defined in section 349.01 of the Revised Code; (b) A corporation controlled by such a subdivision or subdivisions;. (2) Such property was or is any of the following: (a) Constructed or, in the case of personal property, acquired pursuant to an agreement with a municipal corporation to implement a development, redevelopment, or renewal plan for an area declared by the municipal corporation to be a slum or blighted area, as those terms are defined in section 725.01 of the Revised Code; (b) Financed in whole or in part with public obligations as defined in section 5709.76 of the Revised Code or otherwise paid for in whole or in part by one or more political subdivisions; (c) An improvement or addition to property defined in division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section. (3) Such property is controlled and managed by either of the following: (a) One or more of the political subdivisions or the corporation that owns it; (b) A designee, tenant, or agent of such political subdivision or subdivisions or corporation pursuant to a management, lease, or similar written agreement. (4) The primary user or users of such property, if a primary user or primary users exist, either: (a) Are controlled and managed by one or more of the political subdivisions or the corporation that owns the property; or (b) Operate under leases, licenses, management agreements, or similar arrangements with, and providing for the payment of rents, revenues, or other remuneration to, one or more of the political subdivisions or the corporation that owns the property. (5) Any residual cash accrues to the political subdivision or subdivisions that own the property or that control the corporation that owns the property, and is used for the public purposes of the subdivision or subdivisions. As used in division (B)(5) of this section, "residual cash" means any revenue and receipts derived from the property by the political subdivision or subdivisions or corporation that owns the property and that are available for unencumbered use by the political subdivision or subdivisions or corporation, after deducting amounts needed to make necessary expenditures, pay debt service, and provide for working capital related to the ownership, management, operation, and use of the property, including payments of taxes on the taxable part of the public recreational facility, contractually obligated payments or deposits into reserves or otherwise, and service payments under section 307.699 of the Revised Code. (C) The exemption provided in division (B) of this section also applies to both of the following: (1) The property during its construction or, in the case of tangible personal property, acquisition during the construction period, if the owner meets the condition of division (B)(1) of this section and has agreements that provide for the satisfaction of all other conditions of division (B) of this section upon the completion of the construction; (2) Any improvement or addition made after March 2, 1992, to a public recreational facility that was constructed before March 2, 1992, as long as all other conditions in division (B) of this section are met. (D) A corporation that owns property exempt from taxation under division (B) of this section is a public body for the purposes of section 121.22 of the Revised Code. The corporation's records are public records for the purposes of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, except records related to matters set forth in division (G) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code and records related to negotiations that are not yet completed for financing, leases, or other agreements. (E) The exemption under division (B) of this section applies to property that is owned by the political subdivision or subdivisions or the corporation that owns the public recreational facility. Tangible personal property owned by users, managers, or lessees of the facility is taxable when used in the public recreational facility. (F) All real property constituting a public recreational facility, including the land on which the facility is situated, that is owned by a municipal corporation and used primarily by an independent professional minor league baseball team for a significant portion of its home schedule is declared to be public property used for a public purpose, and is exempt from taxation, if the facility is constructed in 2008 or thereafter, the team operates at the facility under a lease, license, management agreement, or similar arrangement with the municipal corporation that requires the team to pay rent, revenue, or other remuneration to the municipal corporation, and any residual cash, as defined in division (B)(5) of this section, that accrues to the municipal corporation is used for the public purposes of the municipal corporation. For the purposes of this division, an independent professional minor league baseball team is a baseball team that employs professional players and that is a member of an established league composed of teams that are not affiliated with a constituent member club of the association known as major league baseball. (G) Nothing in this section or in any other section of the Revised Code prohibits or otherwise precludes an agreement between a political subdivision, or a corporation controlled by a political subdivision, that owns or operates a public recreational facility that is exempted from taxation under division (A), (B), or (F) of this section and the board of education of a school district or the legislative authority of a municipal corporation, or both, in which all or a part of that facility is located, providing for payments to the school district or municipal corporation, or both, in lieu of taxes that otherwise would be charged against real and tangible personal property exempted from taxation under this section, for a period of time and under such terms and conditions as the legislative authority of the political subdivision and the board of education or municipal legislative authority, or both, may agree, which agreements are hereby specifically authorized. (H) As used in this section, "political subdivision" includes the state or an agency of the state if the city, local, or exempted village school district in which the property is situated expressly consents to exempting the property from taxation. Sec. 5709.212. (A) With Except for applications filed for an industrial water pollution control facility, with every application for an exempt facility certificate filed pursuant to section 5709.21 of the Revised Code, the applicant shall pay a fee equal to one-half of one per cent of the total exempt facility project cost, not to exceed two thousand dollars. If the director of environmental protection is required to provide the opinion for an application for an air pollution control facility or noise pollution control facility, the fee shall be credited to the non-Title V clean air fund created in section 3704.035 of the Revised Code for use in administering section 5709.211 of the Revised Code, unless the application is for an industrial water pollution control facility. In such a case, the fee shall be credited to the surface water protection fund created in section 6111.038 of the Revised Code for use in administering section 5709.211 of the Revised Code. If the director of development or director of natural resources is required to provide the opinion for an application, the fee for each exempt facility application shall be credited to the exempt facility inspection fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, for appropriation to the department of development services agency or department of natural resources, as applicable, for use in administering section 5709.211 of the Revised Code. An applicant is not entitled to any tax exemption under section 5709.25 of the Revised Code until the fee required by this section is paid. The fee required by this section is not refundable, and is due with the application for an exempt facility certificate even if an exempt facility certificate ultimately is not issued or is withdrawn. Any application submitted without payment of the fee shall be deemed incomplete until the fee is paid. (B) The application fee imposed under division (A) of this section for a jointly owned facility shall be equal to one-half of one per cent of the total exempt facility project cost, not to exceed two thousand dollars for each facility that is the subject of the application. Sec. 5709.89. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Indebted subdivision" means a county, township, or municipal corporation that has accepted a residential development loan. (2) "Residential development loan" means a loan authorized under section 122.98 of the Revised Code. (B) The legislative authority of an indebted subdivision shall adopt a resolution or ordinance exempting from real property taxation improvements to each parcel of real property whose construction commenced as the result of infrastructure whose development, repair, or upgrade was funded by a residential development loan accepted by the subdivision. The resolution or ordinance shall be adopted and begin to apply in the same tax year in which such infrastructure is developed, repaired, or upgraded. The resolution or ordinance shall require the owner of the improvements exempted from taxation to make annual service payments in lieu of taxes to the county treasurer on or before the final dates for payment of real property taxes. Service payments in lieu of taxes required by a resolution or ordinance adopted under this section shall be charged and collected in the same manner and in the same amount as the real property taxes that would have been charged and payable against the improvements if not for the exemption. Service payment receipts shall be distributed at the same time and in the same manner as real property tax payments. The entire amount, however, shall be paid to the indebted subdivision. The county treasurer shall maintain a record of the service payments in lieu of taxes made from property in each indebted subdivision. The indebted subdivision shall use the payments solely to repay the residential development loan associated with the exempted improvements. An exemption from taxation under this section and the obligation to make service payments ends beginning for the tax year after the applicable residential development loan is fully repaid, including any applicable interest. The indebted subdivision shall notify the parcel's owner, the county auditor, and the county treasurer immediately after the loan is fully repaid of the tax year in which the exemption and payments are to end. Sec. 5709.92. (A) As used in this section: (1) "School district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district. (2) "Joint vocational school district" means a joint vocational school district created under section 3311.16 of the Revised Code, and includes a cooperative education school district created under section 3311.52 or 3311.521 of the Revised Code and a county school financing district created under section 3311.50 of the Revised Code. (3) "Total resources" means the sum of the amounts described in divisions (A)(3)(a) to (g) of this section less any reduction required under division (C)(3)(a) of this section. (a) The state education aid for fiscal year 2015; (b) The sum of the payments received in fiscal year 2015 for current expense levy losses under division (C)(3) of section 5727.85 and division (C)(12) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, excluding the portion of such payments attributable to levies for joint vocational school district purposes; (c) The sum of fixed-sum levy loss payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2015 under division (F)(1) of section 5727.85 and division (E)(1) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, for fixed-sum levies charged and payable for a purpose other than paying debt charges; (d) The district's taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for current expense purposes for tax year 2014, including taxes charged and payable from emergency levies charged and payable under sections section 5705.194 to 5705.197 of the Revised Code, excluding taxes levied for joint vocational school district purposes or levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code; (e) The amount certified for fiscal year 2015 under division (A)(2) of section 3317.08 of the Revised Code; (f) Distributions received during calendar year 2014 from taxes levied under section 718.09 of the Revised Code; (g) Distributions received during fiscal year 2015 from the gross casino revenue county student fund. (4)(a) "State education aid" for a school district means the sum of state amounts computed for the district under sections 3317.022 and 3317.0212 of the Revised Code after any amounts are added or subtracted under Section 263.240 of Am. Sub. H.B. 59 of the 130th general assembly, entitled "TRANSITIONAL AID FOR CITY, LOCAL, AND EXEMPTED VILLAGE SCHOOL DISTRICTS." (b) "State education aid" for a joint vocational district means the amount computed for the district under section 3317.16 of the Revised Code after any amounts are added or subtracted under Section 263.250 of Am. Sub. H.B. 59 of the 130th general assembly, entitled "TRANSITIONAL AID FOR JOINT VOCATIONAL SCHOOL DISTRICTS." (5) "Taxes charged and payable" means taxes charged and payable after the reduction required by section 319.301 of the Revised Code but before the reductions required by sections 319.302 and 323.152 of the Revised Code. (6) "Capacity quintile" means the capacity measure quintiles determined under division (B) of this section. (7) "Threshold per cent" means the following: (a) For a school district in the lowest capacity quintile, one per cent for fiscal year 2016 and two per cent for fiscal year 2017. (b) For a school district in the second lowest capacity quintile, one and one-fourth per cent for fiscal year 2016 and two and one-half per cent for fiscal year 2017. (c) For a school district in the third lowest capacity quintile, one and one-half per cent for fiscal year 2016 and three per cent for fiscal year 2017. (d) For a school district in the second highest capacity quintile, one and three-fourths per cent for fiscal year 2016 and three and one-half per cent for fiscal year 2017. (e) For a school district in the highest capacity quintile, two per cent for fiscal year 2016 and four per cent for fiscal year 2017. (f) For a joint vocational school district, two per cent for fiscal year 2016 and four per cent for fiscal year 2017. (8) "Current expense allocation" means the sum of the payments received by a school district or joint vocational school district in fiscal year 2015 for current expense levy losses under division (C)(3) of section 5727.85 and division (C)(12) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time, less any reduction required under division (C)(3)(b) of this section. (9) "Non-current expense allocation" means the sum of the payments received by a school district or joint vocational school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (C)(3)(c) of section 5727.85 and division (C)(12)(c) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, and levy losses in fiscal year 2015 under division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code as that section existed at that time attributable to levies for and payments received for losses on levies intended to generate money for maintenance of classroom facilities. (10) "Operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses" means the sum of payments received by a school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (E) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code, excluding levy losses for debt purposes. (11) "Operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses" means the sum of payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code, excluding levy losses for debt purposes. (12) "TPP fixed-sum debt levy losses" means the sum of payments received by a school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (E) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code for debt purposes. (13) "S.B. 3 fixed-sum debt levy losses" means the sum of payments received by the school district in fiscal year 2015 for levy losses under division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code for debt purposes. (14) "Qualifying levies" means qualifying levies described in section 5751.20 of the Revised Code as that section was in effect before July 1, 2015. (15) "Total taxable value" has the same meaning as in section 3317.02 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall rank all school districts in the order of districts' capacity measures determined under former section 3317.018 of the Revised Code from lowest to highest, and divide such ranking into quintiles, with the first quintile containing the twenty per cent of school districts having the lowest capacity measure and the fifth quintile containing the twenty per cent of school districts having the highest capacity measure. This calculation and ranking shall be performed once, in fiscal year 2016. (C)(1) In fiscal year 2016, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to the sum of the amounts described in divisions (C)(1)(a) or (b) and (C)(1)(c) of this section. In fiscal year 2017, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to the amount described in division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of this section. (a) If the ratio of the current expense allocation to total resources is equal to or less than the district's threshold percent, zero; (b) If the ratio of the current expense allocation to total resources is greater than the district's threshold per cent, the difference between the current expense allocation and the product of the threshold percentage and total resources; (c) For fiscal year 2016, the product of the non-current expense allocation multiplied by fifty per cent. (2) In fiscal year 2018 and subsequent fiscal years, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to the difference obtained by subtracting the amount described in division (C)(2)(b) of this section from the amount described in division (C)(2)(a) of this section, provided that such amount is greater than zero. (a) The sum of the payments received by the district under division (C)(1)(b) or (C)(2) of this section for the immediately preceding fiscal year; (b) One-sixteenth of one per cent of the average of the total taxable value of the district for tax years 2014, 2015, and 2016. (3)(a) "Total resources" used to compute payments under division (C)(1) of this section shall be reduced to the extent that payments distributed in fiscal year 2015 were attributable to levies no longer charged and payable for tax year 2014. (b) "Current expense allocation" used to compute payments under division (C)(1) of this section shall be reduced to the extent that the payments distributed in fiscal year 2015 were attributable to levies no longer charged and payable for tax year 2014. (4) The department of education and workforce shall report to each school district and joint vocational school district the apportionment of the payments under division (C)(1) of this section among the district's funds based on qualifying levies. (D)(1) Payments in the following amounts shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts in tax years 2016 through 2021: (a) In tax year 2016, the sum of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (b) In tax year 2017, the sum of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and eighty per cent of operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (c) In tax year 2018, the sum of eighty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and sixty per cent of its operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (d) In tax year 2019, the sum of sixty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and forty per cent of its operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (e) In tax year 2020, the sum of forty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses and twenty per cent of its operating S.B. 3 fixed-sum levy losses. (f) In tax year 2021, twenty per cent of the district's operating TPP fixed-sum levy losses. No payment shall be made under division (D)(1) of this section after tax year 2021. (2) Amounts are payable under division (D) of this section for fixed-sum levy losses only to the extent of such losses for qualifying levies that remain in effect for the current tax year. For this purpose, a qualifying levy levied under section 5705.194 or 5705.213 of the Revised Code remains in effect for the current tax year only if a tax levied under either of those sections is charged and payable for the current tax year for an annual sum at least equal to the annual sum levied by the board of education for tax year 2004 under those sections less the amount of the payment under this division. (E)(1) For fixed-sum levies for debt purposes, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to one hundred per cent of the district's fixed-sum levy loss determined under division (E) of section 5751.20 and division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015, and paid in tax year 2014. No payment shall be made for qualifying levies that are no longer charged and payable. (2) Beginning in 2016, by the thirty-first day of January of each year, the tax commissioner shall review the calculation of fixed-sum levy loss for debt purposes determined under division (E) of section 5751.20 and division (H) of section 5727.84 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015. If the commissioner determines that a fixed-sum levy that had been scheduled to be reimbursed in the current year is no longer charged and payable, a revised calculation for that year and all subsequent years shall be made. (F)(1) For taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation for debt purposes in tax year 1998 in the case of electric company tax value losses, and in tax year 1999 in the case of natural gas company tax value losses, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to one hundred per cent of the loss computed under division (D) of section 5727.85 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015, as if the tax were a fixed-rate levy, but those payments shall extend through fiscal year 2016. (2) For taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation for debt purposes in tax year 2005, payments shall be made to school districts and joint vocational school districts equal to one hundred per cent of the loss computed under division (D) of section 5751.21 of the Revised Code as in effect before July 1, 2015, as if the tax were a fixed-rate levy, but those payments shall extend through fiscal year 2018. (G) If all the territory of a school district or joint vocational school district is merged with another district, or if a part of the territory of a school district or joint vocational school district is transferred to an existing or newly created district, the department of education and workforce, in consultation with the tax commissioner, shall adjust the payments made under this section as follows: (1) For a merger of two or more districts, fixed-sum levy losses, total resources, current expense allocation, and non-current expense allocation of the successor district shall be the sum of such items for each of the districts involved in the merger. (2) If property is transferred from one district to a previously existing district, the amount of the total resources, current expense allocation, and non-current expense allocation that shall be transferred to the recipient district shall be an amount equal to the total resources, current expense allocation, and non-current expense allocation of the transferor district times a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of pupils being transferred to the recipient district, measured, in the case of a school district, by formula ADM as defined in section 3317.02of the Revised Code or, in the case of a joint vocational school district, by formula ADM as defined for a joint vocational school district in that section, and the denominator of which is the formula ADM of the transferor district. (3) After December 31, 2010, if property is transferred from one or more districts to a district that is newly created out of the transferred property, the newly created district shall be deemed not to have any total resources, current expense allocation, total allocation, or non-current expense allocation. (4) If the recipient district under division (G)(2) of this section or the newly created district under division (G)(3) of this section is assuming debt from one or more of the districts from which the property was transferred and any of the districts losing the property had fixed-sum levy losses, the department of education and workforce, in consultation with the tax commissioner, shall make an equitable division of the reimbursements for those losses. (H) The payments required by divisions (C), (D), (E), (F), and (I) of this section shall be distributed periodically to each school and joint vocational school district by the department of education and workforce unless otherwise provided for. Except as provided in division (D) of this section, if a levy that is a qualifying levy is not charged and payable in any year after 2014, payments to the school district or joint vocational school district shall be reduced to the extent that the payments distributed in fiscal year 2015 were attributable to the levy loss of that levy. (I) For fiscal years 2022 through 2026, if the total amount to be received under divisions (C) and (E) of this section by any school district that has a nuclear power plant located within its territory is less than the amount the district received under this section in fiscal year 2017, the district shall receive a supplemental payment equal to the difference between the amount to be received under those divisions for the fiscal year and the amount received under this section in fiscal year 2017. Sec. 5709.93. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Taxes charged and payable" means taxes charged and payable after the reduction required by section 319.301 of the Revised Code but before the reductions required by sections 319.302 and 323.152 of the Revised Code. (2) "Threshold per cent" means two per cent for fiscal year 2016; and, for fiscal year 2017 and thereafter, the sum of the prior year's threshold per cent plus two percentage points. (3) "Public library" means a county, municipal, school district, or township public library that receives the proceeds of a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code. (4) "Local taxing unit" means a subdivision or taxing unit, as defined in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code, a park district created under Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code, or a township park district established under section 511.23 of the Revised Code, but excludes school districts and joint vocational school districts. (5) "Municipal current expense allocation" means the sum of the payments received by a municipal corporation in calendar year 2014 for current expense levy losses under division (A)(1)(e)(ii) of section 5727.86 and division (A)(1)(c)(ii) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time. (6) "Current expense allocation" means the sum of the payments received by a local taxing unit or public library in calendar year 2014 for current expense levy losses under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time, less any reduction required under division (B)(2) of this section. (7) "TPP inside millage debt levy loss" means payments made to local taxing units in calendar year 2014 under division (A)(3) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as that section existed at that time. (8) "S.B. 3 inside millage debt levy loss" means payments made to local taxing units in calendar year 2014 under section (A)(4) of section 5727.86 of the Revised Code as that section existed at that time. (9) "Qualifying levy" means a levy for which payment was made in calendar year 2014 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and divisions (A)(1) and (2) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time. (10) "Total resources," in the case of county mental health and disability related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(10)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for mental health and developmental disability related functions in calendar year 2014 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for mental health and developmental disability related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014. (11) "Total resources," in the case of county senior services related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(11)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for senior services related functions in calendar year 2014 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for senior services related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014. (12) "Total resources," in the case of county children's services related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(12)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for children's services related functions in calendar year 2014 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for children's services related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014. (13) "Total resources," in the case of county public health related functions, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(13)(a) and (b) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for public health related functions in calendar year 2014 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) With respect to taxes levied by the county for public health related purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014. (14) "Total resources," in the case of all county functions not included in divisions (A)(10) to (13) of this section, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(14)(a) to (e) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county for all other purposes in calendar year 2014 under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) The county's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2015 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2014 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to taxes levied by the county for all other purposes, the taxes charged and payable for such purposes against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014, excluding taxes charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges; (d) The sum of the amounts distributed to the county in calendar year 2014 for the taxes levied pursuant to sections 5739.021 and 5741.021 of the Revised Code; (e) The sum of amounts distributed to the county from the gross casino revenue county fund from July 2014 through April 2015. (15) "Total resources," in the case of a municipal corporation, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(15)(a) to (h) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the municipal corporation in calendar year 2014 for current expense levy losses under division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) The municipal corporation's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2015 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2014 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) The sum of the amounts distributed to the municipal corporation in calendar year 2014 pursuant to section 5747.50 of the Revised Code; (d) With respect to taxes levied by the municipal corporation, the taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for municipal current expenses for tax year 2014; (e) The amount of admissions tax collected by the municipal corporation in calendar year 2013, or if such information has not yet been reported to the tax commissioner, in the most recent year before 2013 for which the municipal corporation has reported data to the commissioner; (f) The amount of income taxes collected by the municipal corporation in calendar year 2013 as certified to the tax commissioner under section 5747.50 of the Revised Code in 2013, or if such information has not yet been reported to the commissioner, in the most recent year before 2014 for which the municipal corporation has reported such data to the commissioner; (g) The sum of the amounts distributed to the municipal corporation from the gross casino revenue host city fund from July 2014 through April 2015; (h) The sum of the amounts distributed to the municipal corporation from the gross casino revenue county fund from July 2014 through April 2015. (16) "Total resources," in the case of a township, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(16)(a) to (c) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the township in calendar year 2014 pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 of the Revised Code and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time, excluding payments received for debt purposes; (b) The township's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2015 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2014 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to taxes levied by the township, the taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014 excluding taxes charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges or from levies imposed under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code. (17) "Total resources," in the case of a local taxing unit that is not a county, municipal corporation, township, or public library means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(17)(a) to (e) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the local taxing unit in calendar year 2014 pursuant to division (A)(1) of section 5727.86 of the Revised Code and division (A)(1) of section 5751.22 of the Revised Code as they existed at that time; (b) The local taxing unit's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2015 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2014 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to taxes levied by the local taxing unit, the taxes charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014 excluding taxes charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges or from a levy imposed under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code; (d) The amount received from the tax commissioner during calendar year 2014 for sales or use taxes authorized under sections 5739.023 and 5741.022 of the Revised Code; (e) For institutions of higher education receiving tax revenue from a local levy, as identified in section 3358.02 of the Revised Code, the final state share of instruction allocation for fiscal year 2014 as calculated by the chancellor of higher education and reported to the state controlling board. (18) "Total resources," in the case of a county, municipal corporation, school district, or township public library that receives the proceeds of a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code, means the sum of the amounts in divisions (A)(18)(a) to (d) of this section less any reduction required under division (B)(1) of this section. (a) The sum of the payments received by the county, municipal corporation, school district, or township public library in calendar year 2014 pursuant to sections 5727.86 and 5751.22 of the Revised Code, as they existed at that time, for fixed-rate levy losses attributable to a tax levied under section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for the benefit of the public library; (b) The public library's percentage share of county undivided local government fund allocations as certified to the tax commissioner for calendar year 2015 by the county auditor under division (J) of section 5747.51 of the Revised Code or division (F) of section 5747.53 of the Revised Code multiplied by the total amount actually distributed in calendar year 2014 from the county undivided local government fund; (c) With respect to a tax levied pursuant to section 5705.23 of the Revised Code for the benefit of the public library, the amount of such tax that is charged and payable against all property on the tax list of real and public utility property for tax year 2014 excluding any tax that is charged and payable for the purpose of paying debt charges; (d) The sum of the amounts distributed to the library district from the county public library fund in calendar year 2014, as reported to the tax commissioner by the county auditor. (19) "Municipal current expense property tax levies" means all property tax levies of a municipality, except those with the following levy names: library; airport resurfacing; bond or any levy name including the word "bond"; capital improvement or any levy name including the word "capital"; debt or any levy name including the word "debt"; equipment or any levy name including the word "equipment," unless the levy is for combined operating and equipment; employee termination fund; fire pension or any levy containing the word "pension," including police pensions; fireman's fund or any practically similar name; sinking fund; road improvements or any levy containing the word "road"; fire truck or apparatus; flood or any levy containing the word "flood"; conservancy district; county health; note retirement; sewage, or any levy containing the words "sewage" or "sewer"; park improvement; parkland acquisition; storm drain; street or any levy name containing the word "street"; lighting, or any levy name containing the word "lighting"; and water. (20) "Operating fixed-rate levy loss" means, in the case of local taxing units other than municipal corporations, fixed-rate levy losses of levies imposed for purposes other than paying debt charges or, in the case of municipal corporations, fixed-rate levy losses of municipal current expense property tax levies. (21)(a) "Qualifying municipal corporation" means a municipal corporation in the territory of which a qualifying end user is located. (b) "Qualifying end user" means an end user of at least seven million qualifying kilowatt hours of electricity annually. (c) "Qualifying kilowatt hours" means kilowatt hours of electricity generated by a renewable energy resource, as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code, using wind energy and the distribution of which is subject to the tax levied under section 5727.81 of the Revised Code for any measurement period beginning after June 30, 2015. (22) Any term used in this section has the same meaning as in section 5727.84 or 5751.20 of the Revised Code unless otherwise defined by this section. (B)(1) "Total resources" used to compute payments to be made under division (C) of this section shall be reduced to the extent that payments distributed in calendar year 2014 were attributable to levies no longer charged and payable. (2) "Current expense allocation" used to compute payments to be made under division (C) of this section shall be reduced to the extent that payments distributed in calendar year 2014 were attributable to levies no longer charged and payable. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the tax commissioner shall compute payments for operating fixed-rate levy losses of local taxing units and public libraries for fiscal year 2016 and each year thereafter as prescribed in divisions (C)(1)(a) and (b) of this section: (a) For public libraries and local taxing units other than municipal corporations: (i) If the ratio of current expense allocation to total resources is equal to or less than the threshold per cent, zero; (ii) If the ratio of current expense allocation to total resources is greater than the threshold per cent, the current expense allocation minus the product of total resources multiplied by the threshold per cent. (b) For municipal corporations: (i) If the ratio of the municipal current expense allocation to total resources is equal to or less than the threshold per cent, zero; (ii) If the ratio of the municipal current expense allocation to total resources is greater than the threshold per cent, the municipal current expense allocation minus the product of total resources multiplied by the threshold per cent. (2) For any local taxing unit or public library with operating fixed-rate levy losses greater than zero, the operating fixed-rate levy loss shall be allocated among all qualifying operating fixed-rate levies in proportion to each such levy's share of the payments received in tax year 2014. In fiscal year 2016 and thereafter, if a levy to which operating fixed-rate levy loss is allocated is no longer charged and payable, the payment to the local taxing unit or public library shall be reduced by the amount allocated to the levy that is no longer charged and payable. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, the tax commissioner shall make payments to local taxing units equal to the sum of TPP inside millage debt levy loss and S.B. 3 inside millage debt levy loss. No payment shall be made if the levy for which the levy loss is computed is not charged and payable for debt purposes in fiscal year 2016 or any year thereafter. (2) No payment shall be made for TPP inside millage debt levy loss in calendar year 2018 or thereafter. No payment shall be made for S.B.3 inside millage debt levy loss in calendar year 2017 or thereafter. (E) For a qualifying municipal corporation, the tax commissioner shall compute payments for fiscal year 2016 and each ensuing fiscal year in an amount equal to the amount of tax imposed under section 5727.81 of the Revised Code and paid on the basis of qualifying kilowatt hours of electricity distributed through the meter of a qualifying end user located in the municipal corporation for measurement periods ending in the preceding calendar year. The payment shall be computed regardless of whether the qualifying municipal corporation qualifies for a payment under any other division of this section for the fiscal year in which the payment is computed under this division. For the purposes of this division, the commissioner may require an electric distribution company distributing qualifying kilowatt hours or, if the end user is a self-assessing purchaser, the end user, to report to the commissioner the number of qualifying kilowatt hours distributed through the meter of the qualifying end user. (F)(1) The payments required to be made under divisions (C), (D), and (H) of this section shall be paid from the local government tangible property tax replacement general revenue fund to the county undivided income tax fund in the proper county treasury. Beginning in August 2015, one-half of the amount determined under each of those divisions shall be paid on or before the last day of August each year, and one-half shall be paid on or before the last day of February each year. Within thirty days after receipt of such payments, the county treasurer shall distribute amounts determined under this section to the proper local taxing unit or public library as if they had been levied and collected as taxes, and the local taxing unit or public library shall allocate the amounts so received among its funds in the same proportions as if those amounts had been levied and collected as taxes. (2) On or before the last day of August and of February of each fiscal year that follows a calendar year in which taxes are paid on the basis of qualifying kilowatt hours of electricity distributed through the meter of a qualifying end user located in a qualifying municipal corporation, one-half of the payment computed under division (E) of this section shall be paid from the local government tangible personal property tax replacement general revenue fund directly to the qualifying municipal corporation. The municipal corporation shall credit the payments to a special fund created for the purpose of providing grants or other financial assistance to the qualifying end user or to compensate the municipal corporation for municipal income tax or other tax credits or reductions as the legislative authority may grant to the qualifying end user. Such grants or other financial assistance may be provided for by ordinance or resolution of the legislative authority of the qualifying municipal corporation and may continue for as long as is provided by the ordinance or resolution. (G) If all or a part of the territories of two or more local taxing units are merged, or unincorporated territory of a township is annexed by a municipal corporation, the tax commissioner shall adjust the payments made under this section to each of the local taxing units in proportion to the square mileage of the merged or annexed territory as a percentage of the total square mileage of the jurisdiction from which the territory originated, or as otherwise provided by a written agreement between the legislative authorities of the local taxing units certified to the commissioner not later than the first day of June of the calendar year in which the payment is to be made. (H) For fiscal years 2022 through 2026, if the total amount to be received under division (C) of this section by a joint fire district that has a nuclear power plant located within its territory is less than the amount the district received under this section in fiscal year 2017, the district shall receive a supplemental payment equal to the difference between the amount to be received under that division for the fiscal year and the amount received under this section in fiscal year 2017. Sec. 5715.19. (A) As used in this section: "Member" has the same meaning as in section 1706.01 of the Revised Code. "Internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. "Interim period" means, for each county, the tax year to which section 5715.24 of the Revised Code applies and each subsequent tax year until the tax year in which that section applies again. "Legislative authority" means a board of county commissioners, a board of township trustees of any township with territory in the county, the board of education of any school district with territory in the county, or the legislative authority of a municipal corporation with territory in the county. "Original complaint" means a complaint filed under division (A) of this section. "Counter-complaint" means a complaint filed under division (B) of this section in response to an original complaint. "Third party complainant" means a complainant other than the property owner, the owner's spouse, a tenant authorized to file an original complaint, or any person acting on behalf of a property owner. "Third party complainant" does not include a legislative authority or a mayor of a municipal corporation, but does include the prosecuting attorney or treasurer of a county or any person acting on behalf of a legislative authority or mayor. For purposes of this section, a person is considered to be acting on behalf of a legislative authority or mayor if the person is an official or employee of the political subdivision or has been hired, contracted, or directed by such an official or employee to file a complaint or counter-complaint under this section on behalf of the political subdivision. (1) Subject to division (A)(2) of this section, a complaint against any of the following determinations for the current tax year shall be filed with the county auditor on or before the thirty-first day of March of the ensuing tax year or the date of closing of the collection for the first half of real and public utility property taxes for the current tax year, whichever is later: (a) Any classification made under section 5713.041 of the Revised Code; (b) Any determination made under section 5713.32 or 5713.35 of the Revised Code; (c) Any recoupment charge levied under section 5713.35 of the Revised Code; (d) The determination of the total valuation or assessment of any parcel that appears on the tax list, except parcels assessed by the tax commissioner pursuant to section 5727.06 of the Revised Code; (e) The determination of the total valuation of any parcel that appears on the agricultural land tax list, except parcels assessed by the tax commissioner pursuant to section 5727.06 of the Revised Code; (f) Any determination made under division (A) of section 319.302 of the Revised Code. If such a complaint is filed by mail or certified mail, the date of the United States postmark placed on the envelope or sender's receipt by the postal service shall be treated as the date of filing. A private meter postmark on an envelope is not a valid postmark for purposes of establishing whether a complaint has been timely filed. Subject to division (A)(6) of this section, any person owning taxable real property in the county or in a taxing district with territory in the county; such a person's spouse; a tenant of the property owner, if the property is classified as to use for tax purposes as commercial or industrial, the lease requires the tenant to pay the entire amount of taxes charged against the property, and the lease allows, or the property owner otherwise authorizes, the tenant to file such a complaint with respect to the property; an individual who is retained by such a person or tenant and who holds a designation from a professional assessment organization, such as the institute for professionals in taxation, the national council of property taxation, or the international association of assessing officers; a public accountant who holds a permit under section 4701.10 of the Revised Code, a general or residential real estate appraiser licensed or certified under Chapter 4763. of the Revised Code, or a real estate broker licensed under Chapter 4735. of the Revised Code, who is retained by such a person or tenant; if the person or tenant is a firm, company, association, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, an officer, a salaried employee, a partner, or a member of that person or tenant; if the person or tenant is a trust, a trustee of the trust; the prosecuting attorney or treasurer of the county; or the legislative authority of a subdivision or the mayor of a municipal corporation may file such a complaint regarding any such determination affecting any real property in the county, except that a person owning taxable real property in another county may file such a complaint only with regard to any such determination affecting real property in the county that is located in the same taxing district as that person's real property is located. The county auditor shall present to the county board of revision all complaints filed with the auditor. (2) No person, legislative authority, or officer shall file a complaint against the valuation or assessment of any parcel that appears on the tax list if it filed a complaint against the valuation or assessment of that parcel for any prior tax year in the same interim period, unless the person, legislative authority, or officer alleges that the valuation or assessment should be changed due to one or more of the following circumstances that occurred after the tax lien date for the tax year for which the prior complaint was filed and that the circumstances were not taken into consideration with respect to the prior complaint: (a) The property was sold in an arm's length transaction, as described in section 5713.03 of the Revised Code; (b) The property lost value due to some casualty; (c) Substantial improvement was added to the property; (d) An increase or decrease of at least fifteen per cent in the property's occupancy has had a substantial economic impact on the property. (3) If a county board of revision, the board of tax appeals, or any court dismisses a complaint filed under this section or section 5715.13 of the Revised Code for the reason that the act of filing the complaint was the unauthorized practice of law or the person filing the complaint was engaged in the unauthorized practice of law, the party affected by a decrease in valuation or the party's agent, or the person owning taxable real property in the county or in a taxing district with territory in the county, may refile the complaint, notwithstanding division (A)(2) of this section. (4)(a) No complaint filed under this section or section 5715.13 of the Revised Code shall be dismissed for the reason that the complaint fails to accurately identify the owner of the property that is the subject of the complaint. (b) If a complaint fails to accurately identify the owner of the property that is the subject of the complaint, the board of revision shall exercise due diligence to ensure the correct property owner is notified as required by divisions (B) and (C) of this section. (5) Notwithstanding division (A)(2) of this section, a person, legislative authority, or officer may file a complaint against the valuation or assessment of any parcel that appears on the tax list if it filed a complaint against the valuation or assessment of that parcel for any prior tax year in the same interim period if the person, legislative authority, or officer withdrew the complaint before the complaint was heard by the board. (6) The legislative authority of a subdivision, the mayor of a municipal corporation, or a third party complainant shall not file an original complaint with respect to property the subdivision or complainant does not own or lease unless both of the following conditions are met: (a) If the complaint is based on a determination described in division (A)(1)(d) or (e) of this section, the property was (i) sold all of the following requirements are met: (i) The complaint seeks an increase in the valuation of the property based upon the sale of the property in an arm's length transaction, as described in section 5713.03 of the Revised Code, before, but not after,. (ii) Either of the following conditions apply to that sale during the two years preceding the tax lien date for the tax year for which the complaint is to be filed, and (ii) the : (I) The sale is evidenced by a conveyance fee statement, attached to the complaint, that declares the value of the property conveyed pursuant to section 319.202 of the Revised Code and that was filed during those two years. (II) The sale is otherwise recorded in the office of the county recorder or similar government office during those two years. (iii) That sale price exceeds the true value of the property appearing on the tax list for that tax year by both ten per cent and the amount of the filing threshold determined under division (J) of this section;. (b) If the complaint is filed by a legislative authority or , mayor, or third party complainant acting on behalf of a legislative authority or mayor, the legislative authority or, in the case of a mayor, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, first adopts a resolution authorizing the filing of the original complaint at a public meeting of the legislative authority. (7) A resolution adopted under division (A)(6)(b) of this section shall include all of the following information: (a) Identification of the parcel or parcels that are the subject of the original complaint by street address, if available from online records of the county auditor, and by permanent parcel number; (b) The name of at least one of the record owners of the parcel or parcels; (c) The basis for the complaint under divisions (A)(1)(a) to (f) of this section relative to each parcel identified in the resolution; (d) The tax year for which the complaint will be filed, which shall be a year for which a complaint may be timely filed under this section at the time of the resolution's adoption. A legislative authority shall not adopt a resolution required under division (A)(6)(b) of this section that identifies more than one parcel under division (A)(7)(a) of this section, except that a single resolution may identify more than one parcel under that division if each parcel has the same record owner or the same record owners, as applicable. A legislative authority may adopt multiple resolutions required under division (A)(6)(b) of this section by a single vote, provided that the vote is separate from the question of whether to adopt any resolution that is not adopted under division (A)(6)(b) of this section. Before adopting a resolution required by division (A)(6)(b) of this section, the legislative authority shall mail a written notice to at least one of the record owners of the parcel or parcels identified in the resolution stating the intent of the legislative authority in adopting the resolution, the proposed date of adoption, and the basis for the complaint under divisions (A)(1)(a) to (f) of this section relative to each parcel identified in the resolution. The notice shall be sent by certified mail to the last known tax-mailing address of at least one of the record owners and, if different from that tax-mailing address, to the street address of the parcel or parcels identified in the resolution. Alternatively, if the legislative authority has record of an internet identifier of record associated with at least one of the record owners, the legislative authority may send the notice by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record. The notice shall be postmarked or, if sent by internet identifier of record, sent at least seven calendar days before the legislative authority adopts the resolution. A board of revision has jurisdiction to consider a complaint filed pursuant to a resolution adopted under division (A)(6)(b) of this section only if the legislative authority notifies the board of revision of the resolution in the manner prescribed in division (A)(8)(A)(8)(a) of this section. The failure to accurately identify the street address or the name of the record owners of the parcel in the resolution does not invalidate the resolution nor is it a cause for dismissal of the complaint. (8)(8)(a) A complaint form prescribed by a board of revision or the tax commissioner for the purpose of this section shall include a box that must be checked, when a legislative authority, mayor, or third party complainant acting on behalf of either files an original complaint, to indicate that a resolution authorizing the complaint was adopted in accordance with divisions (A)(6)(b) and (7) of this section and that notice was mailed or sent in accordance with division (A)(7) of this section before adoption of the resolution to at least one of the record owners of the property that is the subject of the complaint. (b) Any third party complainant shall submit, with the complaint, a sworn affidavit stating whether the third party complainant is or is not acting on behalf of a legislative authority or mayor. (B)(B)(1) Within thirty days after the last date such complaints may be filed, the auditor shall give notice of each complaint in which the stated amount of overvaluation, undervaluation, discriminatory valuation, illegal valuation, or incorrect determination is at least seventeen thousand five hundred dollars in taxable value to each property owner whose property is the subject of the complaint, if the complaint was not filed by the owner or the owner's spouse. A board of education, subject to this division; a property owner; the owner's spouse; a tenant of the owner, if that tenant would be eligible to file a complaint under division (A) of this section with respect to the property; an individual who is retained by such an owner or tenant and who holds a designation from a professional assessment organization, such as the institute for professionals in taxation, the national council of property taxation, or the international association of assessing officers; a public accountant who holds a permit under section 4701.10 of the Revised Code, a general or residential real estate appraiser licensed or certified under Chapter 4763. of the Revised Code, or a real estate broker licensed under Chapter 4735. of the Revised Code, who is retained by such an owner or tenant; or, if the owner or tenant is a firm, company, association, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or trust, an officer, a salaried employee, a partner, a member, or trustee of that owner or tenant, may file a counter-complaint in support of or objecting to the amount of alleged overvaluation, undervaluation, discriminatory valuation, illegal valuation, or incorrect determination stated in a previously filed original complaint or objecting to the current valuation. (2) A board of education may file a counter-complaint only if the original complaint (a) was filed by the owner of the property that is the subject of the complaint, a tenant of that property owner, or any person acting on behalf of such owner or tenant, and (b) states an amount of overvaluation, undervaluation, discriminatory valuation, illegal valuation, or incorrect determination of at least seventeen thousand five hundred dollars in taxable value. The board shall file the counter-complaint within thirty days after the original complaint is filed or after the last day such complaints may be filed, whichever is later, and any other person shall file the counter-complaint within thirty days after receiving the notice required under this division. (3) Upon the filing of a counter-complaint, the board of education, property owner, or tenant shall be made a party to the action. (C) Each board of revision shall notify any complainant and counter-complainant, and also the property owner, if the property owner's address is known, and the complaint is filed by one other than the property owner, not less than ten days prior to the hearing, either by certified mail or, if the board has record of an internet identifier of record associated with the owner, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record of the time and place the same will be heard. The board of revision shall hear and render its decision on an original complaint within one hundred eighty days after the last day such a complaint may be filed with the board under division (A)(1) of this section or, if a counter-complaint is filed, within one hundred eighty days after such filing. If the original complaint is filed by the legislative authority of a subdivision, the mayor of a municipal corporation with territory in the county, or a third party complainant, and if the board of revision has not rendered its decision on the complaint within one year after the date the complaint was filed, the board may dismiss the complaint. (D) The determination of any such original complaint or counter-complaint shall relate back to the date when the lien for taxes or recoupment charges for the current year attached or the date as of which liability for such year was determined. Liability for taxes and recoupment charges for such year and each succeeding year until the complaint is finally determined and for any penalty and interest for nonpayment thereof within the time required by law shall be based upon the determination, valuation, or assessment as finally determined. Each complaint shall state the amount of overvaluation, undervaluation, discriminatory valuation, illegal valuation, or incorrect classification or determination upon which the complaint is based. The treasurer shall accept any amount tendered as taxes or recoupment charge upon property concerning which a complaint is then pending, computed upon the claimed valuation as set forth in the complaint. Unless dismissal is required under division (C) of this section, if an original complaint or counter-complaint filed for the current year is not determined by the board within the time prescribed for such determination, the complaint and any proceedings in relation thereto shall be continued by the board as a valid complaint for any ensuing year until that original complaint or counter-complaint is finally determined by the board or upon any appeal from a decision of the board. In such case, the original complaint and counter-complaint shall continue in effect without further filing by the original taxpayer, the original taxpayer's assignee, or any other person or entity authorized to file a complaint under this section. (E) If a taxpayer files a complaint as to the classification, valuation, assessment, or any determination affecting the taxpayer's own property and tenders less than the full amount of taxes or recoupment charges as finally determined, an interest charge shall accrue as follows: (1) If the amount finally determined is less than the amount billed but more than the amount tendered, the taxpayer shall pay interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code, computed from the date that the taxes were due on the difference between the amount finally determined and the amount tendered. This interest charge shall be in lieu of any penalty or interest charge under section 323.121 of the Revised Code unless the taxpayer failed to file a complaint and tender an amount as taxes or recoupment charges within the time required by this section, in which case section 323.121 of the Revised Code applies. (2) If the amount of taxes finally determined is equal to or greater than the amount billed and more than the amount tendered, the taxpayer shall pay interest at the rate prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date the taxes were due on the difference between the amount finally determined and the amount tendered, such interest to be in lieu of any interest charge but in addition to any penalty prescribed by section 323.121 of the Revised Code. (F) Upon request of a complainant, the tax commissioner shall determine the common level of assessment of real property in the county for the year stated in the request that is not valued under section 5713.31 of the Revised Code, which common level of assessment shall be expressed as a percentage of true value and the common level of assessment of lands valued under such section, which common level of assessment shall also be expressed as a percentage of the current agricultural use value of such lands. Such determination shall be made on the basis of the most recent available sales ratio studies of the commissioner and such other factual data as the commissioner deems pertinent. (G) A complainant shall provide to the board of revision all information or evidence within the complainant's knowledge or possession that affects the real property that is the subject of the complaint. A complainant who fails to provide such information or evidence is precluded from introducing it on appeal to the board of tax appeals or the court of common pleas, except that the board of tax appeals or court may admit and consider the evidence if the complainant shows good cause for the complainant's failure to provide the information or evidence to the board of revision. (H) In case of the pendency of any proceeding in court based upon an alleged excessive, discriminatory, or illegal valuation or incorrect classification or determination, the taxpayer may tender to the treasurer an amount as taxes upon property computed upon the claimed valuation as set forth in the complaint to the court. The treasurer may accept the tender. If the tender is not accepted, no penalty shall be assessed because of the nonpayment of the full taxes assessed. (I) A legislative authority, or any person acting on behalf of a legislative authority, may not enter into a private payment agreement with respect to any complaint filed or contemplated under this section or section 5715.13 of the Revised Code, and any such agreement is void and unenforceable. As used in this division, "private payment agreement" means any type of agreement in which a property owner, a tenant authorized to file a complaint under division (A) of this section, or any person acting on behalf of a property owner or such a tenant agrees to make one or more payments to a subdivision in exchange for the legislative authority of that subdivision, or any person acting on behalf of that subdivision, doing any of the following: (1) Refraining from filing a complaint or counter-complaint under this section; (2) Dismissing a complaint or counter-complaint filed under this section by the legislative authority under this sectionor any person acting on behalf of the legislative authority; (3) Resolving a claim under this section by settlement agreement. A "private payment agreement" does not include any agreement to resolve a claim under this section pursuant to which an agreed-upon valuation for the property that is the subject of the claim is approved by the county auditor and reflected on the tax list, provided that agreement does not require any payments described in this division. (J) For the purpose of division (A)(6)(a) of this section, the filing threshold for tax year 2022 equals five hundred thousand dollars. For tax year 2023 and each tax year thereafter, the tax commissioner shall adjust the filing threshold used in that division by completing the following calculations in September of each year: (1) Determine the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce from the first day of January of the preceding year to the last day of December of the preceding year; (2) Multiply that percentage increase by the filing threshold for the current year; (3) Add the resulting product to the filing threshold for the current year; (4) Round the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of one thousand dollars. The commissioner shall certify the amount resulting from the adjustment to each county auditor not later than the first day of October each year. The certified amount applies to complaints filed for the tax year in which the amount is certified. The commissioner shall not make the adjustment for any tax year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the filing threshold for the current tax year. (K) Any person who knowingly makes a false statement in an affidavit furnished under division (A)(8)(b) of this section is guilty of falsification under division (A)(11) of section 2921.13 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5717.01. An appeal from a decision of a county board of revision may be taken to the board of tax appeals within thirty days after notice of the decision of the county board of revision is mailed as provided in division (A) of section 5715.20 of the Revised Code. Such an appeal may be taken by the county auditor, the tax commissioner, or any board, legislative authority, public official, or taxpayer authorized by section 5715.19 of the Revised Code to file complaints against valuations or assessments with the auditor, except that a subdivision that files an original complaint or counter-complaint under that section with respect to property the subdivision does not own or lease may not appeal the decision of the board of revision with respect to that original complaint or counter-complaintor the legislative authority or mayor of a subdivision may file such an appeal only if the subdivision owns or leases the property that is the subject of the board of revision's decision, and except that no such appeal may be taken by a third party complainant, as defined in that section. Such appeal shall be taken by the filing of a notice of appeal, in person or by certified mail, express mail, facsimile transmission, electronic transmission, or by authorized delivery service, with the board of tax appeals and with the county board of revision. If notice of appeal is filed by certified mail, express mail, or authorized delivery service as provided in section 5703.056 of the Revised Code, the date of the United States postmark placed on the sender's receipt by the postal service or the date of receipt recorded by the authorized delivery service shall be treated as the date of filing. If notice of appeal is filed by facsimile transmission or electronic transmission, the date and time the notice is received by the board shall be the date and time reflected on a timestamp provided by the board's electronic system, and the appeal shall be considered filed with the board on the date reflected on that timestamp. Any timestamp provided by another computer system or electronic submission device shall not affect the time and date the notice is received by the board. Upon receipt of such notice of appeal such county board of revision shall notify all persons thereof who were parties to the proceeding before such county board of revision by either certified mail or, if the board has record of an internet identifier of record associated with such a person, by ordinary mail and by that internet identifier of record, and shall file proof of such notice or, in the case of ordinary mail, an affidavit attesting that the board sent the notice with the board of tax appeals. The county board of revision shall thereupon certify to the board of tax appeals a transcript of the record of the proceedings of the county board of revision pertaining to the original complaint, and all evidence offered in connection therewith. Such appeal may be heard by the board of tax appeals at its offices in Columbus or in the county where the property is listed for taxation, or the board of tax appeals may cause its examiners to conduct such hearing and to report to it their findings for affirmation or rejection. An appeal may proceed pursuant to section 5703.021 of the Revised Code on the small claims docket if the appeal qualifies under that section. The board of tax appeals may order the appeal to be heard on the record and the evidence certified to it by the county board of revision, or it may order the hearing of additional evidence, and it may make such investigation concerning the appeal as it deems proper. As used in this section, "internet identifier of record" has the same meaning as in section 9.312 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5725.01. As used in sections 5725.01 to 5725.26 of the Revised Code: (A) "Financial institution" means: (1) A national bank organized and existing as a national bank association pursuant to the "National Bank Act," 12 U.S.C. 21; (2) A federal savings association or federal savings bank that is chartered under 12 U.S.C. 1464; (3) A bank, banking association, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank, or other banking institution that is incorporated or organized under the laws of any state; (4) Any corporation organized under 12 U.S.C. 611 to 631; (5) Any agency or branch of a foreign depository as defined in 12 U.S.C. 3101; (6) A company licensed as a small business investment company under the "Small Business Investment Act of 1958," 72 Stat. 689, 15 U.S.C. 66l, as amended; or (7) A company chartered under the "Farm Credit Act of 1933," 48 Stat. 257, 12 U.S.C. 1131(d), as amended. Corporations or institutions organized under the "Federal Farm Loan Act" and amendments thereto, insurance companies, and credit unions shall not be considered financial institutions or dealers in intangibles within the meaning of such sections. (B)(1)(B) "Dealer in intangibles" includes every person who keeps an office or other place of business in this state and engages at such office or other place in a business that consists primarily of lending money, or discounting, buying, or selling bills of exchange, drafts, acceptances, notes, mortgages, or other evidences of indebtedness, or of buying or selling bonds, stocks, or other investment securities, whether on the person's own account with a view to profit, or as agent or broker for others, with a view to profit or personal earnings. Dealer in intangibles excludes institutions used exclusively for charitable purposes, insurance companies, and financial institutions. The investment of funds as personal accumulations or as business reserves or working capital does not constitute engaging in a business within the meaning of this division; but a person who, having engaged in a business that consists primarily of lending money, or discounting, buying, or selling bills of exchange, drafts, acceptances, notes, mortgages, or other evidences of indebtedness on the person's own account, remains in business primarily for the purpose of realizing upon the assets of the business is deemed a dealer in intangibles, though not presently engaged in a business that consists primarily of lending money or discounting or buying such securities. (2) The tax commissioner shall adopt a rule defining "primarily" as that term is used in division (B)(1) of this section. (C) "Insurance company" includes every corporation, association, and society engaged in the business of insurance of any character, or engaged in the business of entering into contracts substantially amounting to insurance of any character, or of indemnifying or guaranteeing against loss or damage, or acting as surety on bonds or undertakings. "Insurance company" also includes any health insuring corporation as defined in section 1751.01 of the Revised Code. (D) "Domestic insurance company" includes every insurance company organized and existing under the laws of this state, and every unincorporated association and society formed under the laws of this state for the purpose of engaging in said business, except a company, association, or society that is an insurance holding company affiliate controlled by a nonresident affiliate and has risks in this state formerly written by its foreign affiliates in a total amount exceeding the risks outstanding on the taxpayer's latest annual report that arise from business initially written by it in this state; and excludes every foreign insurance company. As used in this division, terms defined in section 3901.32 of the Revised Code have the same meanings given to them in that section. (E) "Foreign insurance company" includes every insurance company organized or existing under the laws of any other state, territory, country, or the United States and every insurance holding company affiliate excepted under division (D) of this section. (F) "Credit union" means a nonprofit cooperative financial institution organized or chartered under the laws of this state, of another state, or of the United States. Sec. 5725.23. Taxes, interest, and penalties may be recovered from a delinquent domestic insurance company or person in an action brought in the name of the state in the court of common pleas of Franklin county or any county in which such company or person has an office or place of business, and such court shall have jurisdiction of such action regardless of the amount involved. The attorney general, on request of the superintendent of insurance or tax commissioner, shall institute such action in the court of common pleas of Franklin county or any other county the superintendent or commissioner directs. In any such action, it shall be sufficient to allege that the tax, interest, and penalty sought to be recovered stand charged on the tax list of domestic insurance company franchise taxes or intangible property taxes in the office of the treasurer of state and have been unpaid for a period of forty-five days after having been placed thereon. Sums recovered in any such action shall be paid into the state treasury and distributed as provided in section 5725.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5725.35. There is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by section 5725.18 of the Revised Code for an insurance company subject to that tax that holds the rights to a tax credit certificate issued under section 122.09 of the Revised Code. The credit shall equal the dollar amount indicated on the certificate. The credit shall be claimed in the calendar year specified in the certificate or the ensuing calendar year and in the order required under section 5725.98 of the Revised Code. If the credit exceeds the amount of tax otherwise due in that year, the company may carry forward the excess for not more than five ensuing years, but the amount of the excess credit claimed against the tax for any year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the next year. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the certificate was used to claim a credit under section 5726.62, 5729.18, or 5747.87 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5725.38. Terms used in this section have the same meanings as in section 122.84 of the Revised Code. There is allowed a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5725.18 of the Revised Code for a domestic insurance company that is issued, or to which is transferred, a tax credit certificate under section 122.84 of the Revised Code. The credit equals the amount stated on the certificate and may be claimed for the calendar year that includes the investment period that was the subject of the application for the certificate under that section or for the ensuing calendar year. For a credit issued during the July application round each year, the credit may also be claimed for the preceding calendar year. A taxpayer applying a credit for the preceding calendar year shall file an amended return or apply that amendment on the taxpayer's original return, for that year. The credit authorized in this section shall be claimed in the order required under section 5725.98 of the Revised Code. If the amount of a credit exceeds the tax otherwise due under section 5725.18 of the Revised Code after deducting all other credits preceding the credit in that order, the excess may be carried forward for not more than five ensuing calendar years. The amount of the excess credit claimed in any such year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the next calendar year. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the credit was claimed under section 5726.61, 5729.21, or 5747.86 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5726.03. (A)(1) Annually, on or before the fifteenth day of October, the reporting person for each taxpayer shall make a report in writing to the tax commissioner, in such form as the commissioner prescribes, and shall remit to the commissioner the amount of tax shown to be due on the report. The remittance shall be made payable to the treasurer of state. The commissioner shall make available, on the official internet web site of the department of taxation, copies of the forms prescribed by the commissioner for the purpose of making the annual report. (2) An annual report shall be signed by the president, vice-president, secretary, treasurer, general manager, superintendent, or managing agent in this state of the reporting person. (3) An annual report shall contain the facts, figures, computations, and attachments that result in the determination of the amount of tax due from a taxpayer under this chapter. (B)(1) In the case of a financial institution described in division (H)(1) of section 5726.01 of the Revised Code, the annual report filed for a taxable year shall list, and include information related to, each person includable in an FR Y-9 filed by the reporting person for that taxable year. (2) In the case of a financial institution described in division (H)(2) or (3) of section 5726.01 of the Revised Code, the annual report for a taxable year shall list, and include information related to, each person includable in a call report filed by the reporting person for that taxable year. (C)(1) The reporting person for a taxpayer shall remit each tax payment and, if required by the commissioner, file each annual or estimated tax report electronically. The commissioner may require reporting persons to use the Ohio business gateway as defined in section 718.01 of the Revised Code to file reports and remit the tax, or may provide another means for reporting persons to file and remit the tax electronically. (2) The payment of taxes as provided in division (C) of this section shall not affect a taxpayer's obligation to file an annual report required under division (A) of this section. (3) The reporting person for a taxpayer that is required to remit tax payments electronically under this section may apply to the tax commissioner, in the manner prescribed by the commissioner, to be excused from that requirement. The commissioner may excuse the taxpayer from the requirements of division (C) of this section for good cause. (4) If the reporting person for a taxpayer that is required to remit tax payments or file reports electronically under this section fails to do so, the commissioner may impose a penalty not to exceed the following: (a) For either of the first two reports the person so fails, five per cent of the amount of the payment that was required to be remitted; (b) For the third and any subsequent reports the person so fails, ten per cent of the amount of the payment that was required to be remitted. The penalty imposed under this section is in addition to any other penalty or charge imposed under this chapter and shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax levied under this chapter. A penalty may be collected by assessment in the manner prescribed by section 5726.20 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner may abate all or a portion of such a penalty and may adopt rules governing such abatements. Sec. 5726.20. (A) The tax commissioner may make an assessment, based on any information in the commissioner's possession, against any person that fails to file a return or report or pay any tax as required by this chapter. The reporting person for a taxpayer shall file the annual report required under section 5726.03 of the Revised Code and remit the tax imposed by this chapter. Each person included in the annual report of the taxpayer is jointly and severally liable for the tax imposed by this chapter and any penalties and interest thereon. If the reporting person fails, for any reason, to file and remit any tax, the amount due may be collected by assessment against the reporting person and against any or all other persons required to be included in the annual report of the taxpayer as provided in section 5703.90 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall make the assessment in the manner provided in this section. The commissioner shall give the person assessed written notice of the assessment as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on the manner in which to petition for reassessment and request a hearing with respect to the petition. (B) No assessment shall be made or issued against a person under this section more than four years after the later of the final date the report subject to assessment was required to be filed or the date such report was filed. Such time limit may be extended if both the person and the commissioner consent in writing to the extension or if an agreement waiving or extending the time limit has been entered into pursuant to section 122.171 of the Revised Code. Any such extension shall extend the four-year time limit prescribed in division (A) of section 5726.30 of the Revised Code for the same period of time. There shall be no bar or limit to an assessment against a person that fails to file a report subject to assessment as required by this chapter, or that files a fraudulent report. (C) Unless the person assessed, within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, files with the tax commissioner, either in person or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the person or the person's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment shall become final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the person assessed to the treasurer of state. A petition shall indicate the objections of the person assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If a petition for reassessment has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including any accrued interest, remains unpaid, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the person resides or has its principal place of business in this state, or in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas of Franklin county. (2) Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled, "special judgments for the financial institution tax" and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. (3) If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date the tax commissioner issues the assessment until the date the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (E) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax imposed by this chapter will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the person liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (D) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the person assessed or the person's authorized agent in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed shall be immediately due and payable, unless the person assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (C) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment shall not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (F) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all amounts the commissioner receives under this section. Such amounts shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax imposed by this chapter. (G) If the tax commissioner possesses information indicating that the amount of tax a taxpayer is required to pay under this chapter exceeds the amount the reporting person for the taxpayer paid, the tax commissioner may audit a sample of the taxpayer's gross receipts over a representative period of time to ascertain the amount of tax due, and may issue an assessment based on the audit. The tax commissioner shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the taxpayer in selecting a representative sample. The tax commissioner may apply a sampling method only if the commissioner has prescribed the method by rule. (H) If the whereabouts of a person subject to this chapter is not known to the tax commissioner, the secretary of state is hereby deemed to be that person's agent for purposes of service of process or notice of any assessment, action, or proceedings instituted in this state against the person under this chapter. Such process or notice shall be served on such person by the commissioner or by an agent of the commissioner by leaving a true and attested copy of the process or notice at the office of the secretary of state at least fifteen days before the return day of such process or notice, and by sending a copy of the process or notice to such person by ordinary mail, with an endorsement thereon of the service upon the secretary of state, addressed to such person at the person's last known address. Sec. 5726.61. Terms used in this section have the same meanings as in section 122.84 of the Revised Code. A taxpayer may claim a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed under section 5726.02 of the Revised Code for each person included in the annual report of the taxpayer to whom a certificate is issued under section 122.84 of the Revised Code or is transferred pursuant to that section. The credit equals the amount stated on the certificate and may be claimed for the taxable year that aligns with the calendar year that includes the investment period that was the subject of the application for the certificate under that section or for the ensuing calendar year. For a credit issued during the July application round each year, the credit may also be claimed for the preceding taxable year. A taxpayer applying a credit for the preceding taxable year shall file an amended report or apply that amendment on the taxpayer's original report, for that year. The credit authorized in this section shall be claimed in the order required under section 5726.98 of the Revised Code. If the amount of a credit exceeds the tax otherwise due under section 5726.02 of the Revised Code after deducting all other credits preceding the credit in that order, the excess may be carried forward for not more than five ensuing taxable years. The amount of the excess credit claimed in any such year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the next taxable year. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the credit was claimed under section 5725.38, 5729.21, or 5747.86 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5726.62. A taxpayer may claim a nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed under this chapter for each person included in the annual report of the taxpayer that holds the rights to a tax credit certificate that is issued on or after the effective date of this section under section 122.09 of the Revised Code. The credit shall equal the dollar amount indicated on the certificate and may be claimed for the taxable year that aligns with the calendar year specified in the certificate or with the ensuing calendar year and in the order required under section 5726.98 of the Revised Code. If the credit amount exceeds the tax otherwise due under section 5726.02 of the Revised Code after deducting all other credits preceding the credit in the order prescribed in section 5726.98 of the Revised Code, the excess may be carried forward for not more than five ensuing taxable years, but the amount of the excess credit claimed against the tax for any year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the next year. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the certificate was used to claim a credit under section 5725.35, 5729.18, or 5747.87 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5726.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for calculating the amount of tax due under section 5726.02 of the Revised Code, a taxpayer shall claim any credits to which the taxpayer is entitled under this chapter in the following order: The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) of section 5726.50 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for purchases of qualified low-income community investments under section 5726.54 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for transformational mixed use development tax credit certificate holders under section 5726.62 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for qualified research expenses under section 5726.56 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for qualifying dealer in intangibles taxes under section 5726.57 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under section 5726.58 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit under section 5726.60 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable welcome home Ohio (WHO) program credit under section 122.633 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable opportunity zone investment credit under section 5726.61 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit for rehabilitating an historic building under section 5726.52 of the Revised Code; The refundable job retention or job creation credit under division (A) of section 5726.50 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit under section 5726.53 of the Revised Code for losses on loans made under the Ohio venture capital program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical production credit under section 5726.55 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit for film and theater capital improvement projects under section 5726.59 of the Revised Code. (B) For any credit except the refundable credits enumerated in this section, the amount of the credit for a taxable year shall not exceed the tax due after allowing for any other credit that precedes it in the order required under this section. Any excess amount of a particular credit may be carried forward if authorized under the section creating that credit. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow a taxpayer to claim, directly or indirectly, a credit more than once for a taxable year. Sec. 5727.111. As used in this section, "convert" means to switch fuel input from one energy source to another and "repower" means to replace enough of the original taxable production equipment to make an original production facility equivalent to a new facility, such that at least eighty per cent of the true value of the taxable production equipment is derived from new taxable production equipment installed as part of the replacement project. The taxable property of each public utility, except a railroad company, and of each interexchange telecommunications company shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value: (A) In the case of a rural electric company, one of the following: (1) Fifty per cent in the case of its taxable transmission and distribution property or energy conversion equipment first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2027; (2) Seven per cent in the case of its taxable production or and energy conversion equipment first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2027 and thereafter or any other taxable production equipment that is either converted or repowered; (3) Twenty-five per cent in the case of all its other taxable property. (B) In the case of a telephone or telegraph company, twenty-five per cent for taxable property first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 1995 or thereafter for tax years before tax year 2007, and pursuant to division (H) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code for tax year 2007 and thereafter, and the following for all other taxable property: (1) For tax years prior to 2005, eighty-eight per cent; (2) For tax year 2005, sixty-seven per cent; (3) For tax year 2006, forty-six per cent; (4) For tax year 2007 and thereafter, pursuant to division (H) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code. (C) Twenty-five per cent in the case of (1) a natural gas company or (2) a water-works company for taxable property first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2017 and thereafter. (D) Eighty-eight per cent in the case of a water-works company for taxable property first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2017, or a heating company. (E) In the case of an electric company, one of the following: (1) Eighty-five per cent in the case of its taxable transmission and distribution property and energy conversion equipment first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2027; (2) Twenty-five per cent in the case of its other taxable transmission and distribution property; (3) Seven per cent in the case of its taxable production and energy conversion equipment first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2027 and thereafter or any other taxable production equipment that is either converted or repowered; (4) Twenty-four per cent in the case of all its other taxable property. (F)(1) Twenty-five per cent in the case of an interexchange telecommunications company for tax years before tax year 2007; (2) Pursuant to division (H) of section 5711.22 of the Revised Code for tax year 2007 and thereafter. (G) Twenty-five per cent in the case of a water transportation company. (H) In the case of an energy company, one of the following: (1) Eighty-five per cent in the case of its taxable transmission and distribution property first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2027; (2) Twenty-five per cent in the case of its other taxable transmission and distribution property; (3) Seven per cent in the case of its taxable production or and energy conversion equipment first subject to taxation in this state for tax year 2027 and thereafter or any other taxable production equipment that is either converted or repowered; (4) Twenty-four per cent in the case of its other taxable production equipment; (5) Eighty-five per cent in the case of all its other taxable property. (I) In the case of a pipeline company, one of the following: (1) Eighty-eight per cent of its taxable property first subject to taxation in this state before tax year 2027; (2) Twenty-five per cent in the case of all its other taxable property. Sec. 5727.26. (A) The tax commissioner may make an assessment, based on any information in the commissioner's possession, against any natural gas company or combined company that fails to file a return or pay any tax, interest, or additional charge as required by sections 5727.24 to 5727.29 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall give the company assessed written notice of the assessment as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. A penalty of up to fifteen per cent may be added to all amounts assessed under this section. The tax commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of the penalty. (B) Unless the company assessed, within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, files with the tax commissioner, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition signed by the company's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the company assessed to the commissioner. The petition shall indicate the objections of the company assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If a petition for reassessment has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including accrued interest, remains unpaid, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the natural gas company's or combined company's principal place of business is located, or in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately on the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter judgment for the state against the company assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled, "special judgments for the public utility excise tax on natural gas and combined companies," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the company liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (C) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the company assessed or the company's authorized agent in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the company assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (B) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (E) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all amounts that the tax commissioner receives under this section, and such amounts shall be considered revenue arising from the tax imposed by section 5727.24 of the Revised Code. (F) No assessment shall be made or issued against a natural gas company or combined company for the tax imposed by section 5727.24 of the Revised Code more than four years after the return date for the period in which the tax was reported, or more than four years after the return for the period was filed, whichever is later. Sec. 5727.38. On or before the first Monday of November, annually, the tax commissioner may assess an excise tax against a public utility subject to the excise tax under section 5727.30 of the Revised Code. The tax shall be computed by multiplying the taxable gross receipts as determined by the commissioner under section 5727.33 of the Revised Code by six and three-fourths per cent in the case of pipe-line companies, and four and three-fourths per cent in the case of all other companies. The minimum tax for any such company for owning property or doing business in this state shall be fifty dollars. The assessment shall be mailed to the taxpayerserved on the public utility in the manner prescribed by section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5727.42. (A) The tax commissioner shall collect the excise tax imposed by section 5727.30 of the Revised Code and the taxpayer shall pay all taxes and any penalties thereon. Payments of the tax may be made by mail, in person, electronically if required to do so by section 5727.311 of the Revised Code, or by any other means authorized by the commissioner. The commissioner may adopt rules concerning the methods and timeliness of payment. (B) Each tax assessment issued pursuant to this section shall separately reflect the taxes and any penalty due, and any other information considered necessary. The commissioner shall mail the assessment to the taxpayer, and the mailing of it shall be prima-facie evidence of receipt thereof by the taxpayerThe assessment shall be served on the taxpayer in the manner prescribed by section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. (C) The commissioner shall refund taxes levied and payments made for the tax imposed by section 5727.30 of the Revised Code as provided in this section, but no refund shall be made to a taxpayer having a delinquent claim certified pursuant to this section that remains unpaid. The commissioner may consult the attorney general regarding such claims. (D) After receiving any excise tax annual statement for the tax imposed by section 5727.30 of the Revised Code, the commissioner shall: (1) Ascertain the difference between the total taxes owed and the sum of all payments made for that year. (2) If the difference is a deficiency, the commissioner shall issue an assessment. (3) If the difference is an excess, the commissioner shall issue a refund of that amount to the taxpayer. If the amount of the refund is less than that claimed by the taxpayer, the taxpayer, within sixty days of the issuance of the refund, may provide to the commissioner additional information to support the claim or may request a hearing. Upon receiving such information or request within that time, the commissioner shall follow the same procedures set forth in divisions (C) and (D) of section 5703.70 of the Revised Code for the determination of refund applications. If the taxpayer has a deficiency for one tax year and an excess for another tax year, or any combination thereof for more than two years, the commissioner may determine the net result and, depending on such result, proceed to issue an assessment or certify a refund. (E) If a taxpayer fails to pay the amount of taxes required to be paid, or fails to make an estimated payment on or before the due date prescribed in division (B) of section 5727.31 of the Revised Code, the commissioner shall impose a penalty in the amount of fifteen per cent of the unpaid amount, and the commissioner shall issue an assessment for the unpaid amount and penalty. Unless a timely petition for reassessment is filed under section 5727.47 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall proceed to collect the delinquent taxes and penalties thereon in the manner prescribed by law and notify the commissioner of all collections. (F) If a taxpayer entitled to a refund under this section is indebted to the state for any tax or fee administered by the tax commissioner, or any charge, penalty, or interest arising from such a tax or fee, the amount refundable may be applied in satisfaction of that debt. If the amount refundable is less than the amount of the debt, it may be applied in partial satisfaction of the debt. If the amount refundable is greater than the amount of the debt, the amount remaining after satisfaction of the debt shall be refunded. Sec. 5727.47. (A) Notice of each assessment certified or issued pursuant to section 5727.23 or 5727.38 of the Revised Code shall be mailed to the public utility, and its mailing shall be prima-facie evidence of its receipt by the public utility to which it is addressedserved on the public utility or public utility property lessor in the manner prescribed by section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the tax commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. If a public utility objects to such an assessment, it may file with the commissioner, either personally or by certified mail, within sixty days after the mailing of the notice of assessment a written petition for reassessment signed by the utility's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts. The date the commissioner receives the petition shall be considered the date of filing. The petition shall indicate the utility's objections, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. In the case of a petition seeking a reduction in taxable value filed with respect to an assessment certified under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code, the petitioner shall state in the petition the total amount of reduction in taxable value sought by the petitioner. If the petitioner objects to the percentage of true value at which taxable property is assessed by the commissioner, the petitioner shall state in the petition the total amount of reduction in taxable value sought both with and without regard to the objection pertaining to the percentage of true value at which its taxable property is assessed. If a petitioner objects to the commissioner's apportionment of the taxable value of the petitioner's taxable property, the petitioner shall distinctly state in the petition that the petitioner objects to the commissioner's apportionment, and, within forty-five days after filing the petition for reassessment, shall submit the petitioner's proposed apportionment of the taxable value of its taxable property among taxing districts. If a petitioner that objects to the commissioner's apportionment fails to state its objections to that apportionment in its petition for reassessment or fails to submit its proposed apportionment within forty-five days after filing the petition for reassessment, the commissioner shall dismiss the petitioner's objection to the commissioner's apportionment, and the taxable value of the petitioner's taxable property, subject to any adjustment to taxable value pursuant to the petition or appeal, shall be apportioned in the manner used by the commissioner in the preliminary or amended preliminary assessment certified under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code. If an additional objection seeking a reduction in taxable value in excess of the reduction stated in the original petition is properly and timely raised with respect to an assessment issued under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code, the petitioner shall state the total amount of the reduction in taxable value sought in the additional objection both with and without regard to any reduction in taxable value pertaining to the percentage of true value at which taxable property is assessed. If a petitioner fails to state the reduction in taxable value sought in the original petition or in additional objections properly raised after the petition is filed, the commissioner shall notify the petitioner of the failure in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. If the petitioner fails to notify the commissioner in writing of the reduction in taxable value sought in the petition or in an additional objection within thirty days after receiving the commissioner's notice, the commissioner shall dismiss the petition or the additional objection in which that reduction is sought. (B)(1) Subject to divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section, a public utility filing a petition for reassessment regarding an assessment certified or issued under section 5727.23 or 5727.38 of the Revised Code shall pay the tax with respect to the assessment objected to as required by law. The acceptance of any tax payment by the tax commissioner or any county treasurer shall not prejudice any claim for taxes on final determination by the commissioner or final decision by the board of tax appeals or any court. (2) If a public utility properly and timely files a petition for reassessment regarding an assessment certified under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code, the petitioner shall pay the tax as prescribed by divisions (B)(2)(a), (b), and (c) of this section: (a) If the petitioner does not object to the commissioner's apportionment of the taxable value of the petitioner's taxable property, the petitioner is not required to pay the part of the tax otherwise due on the taxable value that the petitioner seeks to have reduced, subject to division (B)(2)(c) of this section. (b) If the petitioner objects to the commissioner's apportionment of the taxable value of the petitioner's taxable property, the petitioner is not required to pay the tax otherwise due on the part of the taxable value apportioned to any taxing district that the petitioner objects to, subject to division (B)(2)(c) of this section. If, pursuant to division (A) of this section, the petitioner has, in a proper and timely manner, apportioned taxable value to a taxing district to which the commissioner did not apportion the petitioner's taxable value, the petitioner shall pay the tax due on the taxable value that the petitioner has apportioned to the taxing district, subject to division (B)(2)(c) of this section. (c) If a petitioner objects to the percentage of true value at which taxable property is assessed by the commissioner, the petitioner shall pay the tax due on the basis of the percentage of true value at which the public utility's taxable property is assessed by the commissioner. In any case, the petitioner's payment of tax shall not be less than the amount of tax due based on the taxable value reflected on the last appeal notice issued by the commissioner under division (C) of this section. Until the county auditor receives notification under division (E) of this section and proceeds under section 5727.471 of the Revised Code to issue any refund that is found to be due, the county auditor shall not issue a refund for any increase in the reduction in taxable value that is sought by a petitioner later than forty-five days after the petitioner files the original petition as required under division (A) of this section. (3) Any part of the tax that, under division (B)(2)(a) or (b) of this section, is not paid shall be collected upon receipt of the notification as provided in section 5727.471 of the Revised Code with interest thereon computed in the same manner as interest is computed under division (E) of section 5715.19 of the Revised Code, subject to any correction of the assessment by the commissioner under division (E) of this section or the final judgment of the board of tax appeals or a court to which the board's final judgment is appealed. The penalty imposed under section 323.121 of the Revised Code shall apply only to the unpaid portion of the tax if the petitioner's tax payment is less than the amount of tax due based on the taxable value reflected on the last appeal notice issued by the commissioner under division (C) of this section. (C) Upon receipt of a properly filed petition for reassessment with respect to an assessment certified under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall notify the treasurer of state or the auditor of each county to which the assessment objected to has been certified. In the case of a petition with respect to an assessment certified under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code, the commissioner shall issue an appeal notice within thirty days after receiving the amount of the taxable value reduction and apportionment changes sought by the petitioner in the original petition or in any additional objections properly and timely raised by the petitioner. The appeal notice shall indicate the amount of the reduction in taxable value sought in the petition or in the additional objections and the extent to which the reduction in taxable value and any change in apportionment requested by the petitioner would affect the commissioner's apportionment of the taxable value among taxing districts in the county as shown in the assessment. If a petitioner is seeking a reduction in taxable value on the basis of a lower percentage of true value than the percentage at which the commissioner assessed the petitioner's taxable property, the appeal notice shall indicate the reduction in taxable value sought by the petitioner without regard to the reduction sought on the basis of the lower percentage and shall indicate that the petitioner is required to pay tax on the reduced taxable value determined without regard to the reduction sought on the basis of a lower percentage of true value, as provided under division (B)(2)(c) of this section. The appeal notice shall include a statement that the reduced taxable value and the apportionment indicated in the notice are not final and are subject to adjustment by the commissioner or by the board of tax appeals or a court on appeal. If the commissioner finds an error in the appeal notice, the commissioner may amend the notice, but the notice is only for informational and tax payment purposes; the notice is not subject to appeal by any person. The commissioner also shall mail provide a copy of the appeal notice to the petitioner. Upon the request of a taxing authority, the county auditor may disclose to the taxing authority the extent to which a reduction in taxable value sought by a petitioner would affect the apportionment of taxable value to the taxing district or districts under the taxing authority's jurisdiction, but such a disclosure does not constitute a notice required by law to be given for the purpose of section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. (D) If the petitioner requests a hearing on the petition, the tax commissioner shall assign a time and place for the hearing on the petition and notify the petitioner of such time and place, but the commissioner may continue the hearing from time to time as necessary. (E) The tax commissioner may make corrections to the assessment as the commissioner finds proper. The commissioner shall serve a copy of the commissioner's final determination on the petitioner in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. The commissioner's decision in the matter shall be final, subject to appeal under section 5717.02 of the Revised Code. With respect to a final determination issued for an assessment certified under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code, the commissioner also shall transmit a copy of the final determination to the applicable county auditor. In the absence of any further appeal, or when a decision of the board of tax appeals or of any court to which the decision has been appealed becomes final, the commissioner shall notify the public utility and, as appropriate, shall proceed under section 5727.42 of the Revised Code, or notify the applicable county auditor, who shall proceed under section 5727.471 of the Revised Code. The notification made under this division is not subject to further appeal. (F) On appeal, no adjustment shall be made in the tax commissioner's assessment certified under section 5727.23 of the Revised Code that reduces the taxable value of a petitioner's taxable property by an amount that exceeds the reduction sought by the petitioner in its petition for reassessment or in any additional objections properly and timely raised after the petition is filed with the commissioner. Sec. 5727.48. The tax commissioner, on application by a public utility, may extend to the a public utility a further specified time, not to exceed thirty days, within which to file any report or statement required by this chapter to be filed with the commissioner, except reports required by sections 5727.24 to 5727.29 of the Revised Code. A public utility must file such an application, in writing, with the commissioner shall request this extension, in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner, on or before the date that the report or statement is otherwise required to be filed. Sec. 5727.89. (A) The tax commissioner may make an assessment, based on any information in the commissioner's possession, against any natural gas distribution company, electric distribution company, self-assessing purchaser, or qualified end user that fails to file a return or pay any tax, interest, or additional charge as required by sections 5727.80 to 5727.95 of the Revised Code. When information in the possession of the tax commissioner indicates that a person liable for the tax imposed by section 5727.81 or 5727.811 of the Revised Code has not paid the full amount of tax due, the commissioner may audit a representative sample of the person's business and may issue an assessment based on the audit. The commissioner shall give the person assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. The tax commissioner may issue an assessment for which the tax imposed by section 5727.81 or 5727.811 of the Revised Code was due and unpaid on the date the person was informed by an agent of the tax commissioner of an investigation or audit of the person. Any payment of the tax for the period covered by the assessment, after the person is so informed, shall be credited against the assessment. A penalty of up to fifteen per cent may be added to all amounts assessed under this section. The commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of penalties. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including accrued interest, remains unpaid, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the party assessed resides or in which the party's business is conducted. If the party assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for the distribution excise taxes," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issues the assessment until the day the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax imposed by section 5727.81 or 5727.811 of the Revised Code will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the person liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (C) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the party assessed or the party's legal representative within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the party assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (B) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (E) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state, and when paid shall be considered as revenue arising from the taxes imposed by sections 5727.81 and 5727.811 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5728.10. (A) If any person required to file a fuel use tax return by sections 5728.01 to 5728.14 of the Revised Code, fails to file the return within the time prescribed by those sections, files an incomplete return, files an incorrect return, or fails to remit the full amount of the tax due for the period covered by the return, the tax commissioner may make an assessment against the person, based upon any information in the commissioner's possession, for the period for which the tax was due. No assessment shall be made against any person for any tax imposed by this chapter more than four years after the return date for the period for which the tax was due or more than four years after the return for the period was filed, whichever is later. This section does not bar an assessment against any person who fails to file a fuel use tax return as required by this chapter, or who files a fraudulent fuel use tax return. A penalty of up to fifteen per cent may be added to the amount of every assessment made pursuant to this section. The commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of penalties added to assessments made under this section. The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment, signed by the party assessed, or by the party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the party's place of business is located or the county in which the party assessed resides. If the party maintains no office in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state of Ohio against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state fuel use tax," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid into the state treasury in the same manner as the revenues deriving from the taxes imposed by section 5728.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5729.10. If a company fails to pay the tax levied by section 5729.03 of the Revised Code, or to make any partial payment thereof as required by law after a statement thereof has been made and mailed to it, or if the annual statement required by law to be made by it is false or incorrect, the superintendent of insurance may revoke the license of such company doing business in this state. Upon failure to pay the tax or to make partial payment thereof according to law, the superintendent treasurer of state shall certify that fact to the attorney general, who shall thereupon begin an action against the company in the court of common pleas of Franklin county, or any other county hethe attorney general elects, to recover the amount of the tax. If such company ceases to do business in this state, it shall thereupon make a report to the superintendent of the gross amount of premiums not theretofore reported as provided in section 5729.02 or 5729.04 of the Revised Code received by it from policies covering risks within this state prior to such discontinuance of business, after deducting return premiums and considerations received for reinsurance not theretofore so reported, and shall forthwith pay to the superintendent treasurer of state a like per cent of tax thereon. Sec. 5729.18. There is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by section 5729.03 of the Revised Code for an insurance company subject to that tax that holds the rights to a tax credit certificate issued under section 122.09 of the Revised Code. The credit shall equal the dollar amount indicated on the certificate or the ensuing calendar year. The credit shall be claimed in the calendar year specified in the certificate and in the order required under section 5729.98 of the Revised Code. If the credit exceeds the amount of tax otherwise due in that year, the company may carry forward the excess for not more than five ensuing years, but the amount of the excess credit claimed against the tax for any year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the next year. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the certificate was used to claim a credit under section 5725.35, 5726.62, or 5747.87 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5729.21. Terms used in this section have the same meanings as in section 122.84 of the Revised Code. There is allowed a nonrefunable nonrefundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5729.03 of the Revised Code for a foreign insurance company that is issued, or to which is transferred, a tax credit certificate under section 122.84 of the Revised Code. The credit equals the amount stated on the certificate and may be claimed for the calendar year that includes the investment period that was the subject of the application for the certificate under that section or for the ensuing calendar year. For a credit issued during the July application round each year, the credit may also be claimed for the preceding calendar year. A taxpayer applying a credit for the preceding calendar year shall file an amended return or apply that amendment on the taxpayer's original return, for that year. The credit authorized in this section shall be claimed in the order required under section 5729.98 of the Revised Code. If the amount of a credit exceeds the tax otherwise due under section 5729.03 of the Revised Code after deducting all other credits preceding the credit in that order, the excess may be carried forward for not more than five ensuing calendar years. The amount of the excess credit claimed in any such year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the next calendar year. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the credit was claimed under section 5725.38, 5726.61, or 5747.86 of the Revised Code. A foreign insurance company shall not be required to pay any additional tax levied under section 5729.06 of the Revised Code as a result of claiming the tax credit authorized by this section. Sec. 5735.12. (A) Any person required by this chapter to file reports or pay the tax levied by this chapter who fails to do so within the time prescribed may be liable for an additional charge not exceeding the greater of ten per cent of the person's tax liability for that month or fifty dollars. The tax commissioner may remit all or a portion of the additional charge and may adopt rules relating to the remission of all or a portion of the charge. If any person required by this chapter to file reports or pay the taxes, interest, or additional charge levied by this chapter fails to file the report, files an incomplete or incorrect report, or fails to remit the full amount of the tax, interest, or additional charge due for the period covered by the report, the commissioner may make an assessment against the person based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. No assessment shall be made against any motor fuel dealer for taxes imposed by this chapter more than four years after the date on which the report on which the assessment was based was due or was filed, whichever is later. This section does not bar an assessment against any motor fuel dealer who fails to file a report required by section 5735.06 of the Revised Code, or who files a fraudulent motor fuel tax report. A penalty of up to fifteen per cent may be added to the amount of every assessment made under this section. The commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of penalties added to assessments made under this section. The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment in writing, signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the party assessed resides or in which the business of the party assessed is conducted. If the party assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state motor fuel tax," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state, and when paid shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax imposed by this chapter. (E) If the tax commissioner determines that the commissioner has erroneously refunded motor fuel tax to any person, the commissioner may make an assessment against the person for recovery of the erroneously refunded tax. Sec. 5736.09. (A) The tax commissioner may make an assessment, based on any information in the commissioner's possession, against any person that fails to file a return or pay any tax amounts as required by this chapter. The commissioner shall give the person assessed written notice of the assessment as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on the manner in which to petition for reassessment and request a hearing with respect to the petition. (B) Unless the person assessed, within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, files with the commissioner, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition signed by the person or the person's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the person assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the person assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If a petition for reassessment has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including accrued interest, remains unpaid, a certified copy of the commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the person resides or has its principal place of business in this state, or in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas of Franklin county. (2) Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled, "special judgments for the petroleum activity tax" and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. (3) If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) If the commissioner believes that collection of the tax will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the person liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (C) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the person assessed or the person's authorized agent in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the person assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (B) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (E) The commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all amounts the commissioner receives under this section, and such amounts shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax imposed under this chapter. (F) Except as otherwise provided in this division, no assessment shall be made or issued against a taxpayer for the tax amounts imposed under this chapter more than four years after the due date for the filing of the return or application for the tax period for which the tax amount was reported, or more than four years after the return or application for the tax period was filed, whichever is later. The time limit may be extended if both the taxpayer and the commissioner consent in writing to the extension or enter into an agreement waiving or extending the time limit. Any such extension shall extend the four-year time limit in division (A) of section 5736.08 of the Revised Code for the same period of time. Nothing in this division bars an assessment against a taxpayer that fails to file a return required by this chapter or that files a fraudulent return. (G) If the commissioner possesses information that indicates that the amount of tax a taxpayer is required to pay under this chapter exceeds the amount the taxpayer paid, the commissioner may audit a sample of the taxpayer's calculated gross receipts over a representative period of time to ascertain the amount of tax due, and may issue an assessment based on the audit. The commissioner shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the taxpayer in selecting a representative sample. The commissioner may apply a sampling method only if the commissioner has prescribed the method by rule. (H) If the whereabouts of a person subject to this chapter is not known to the commissioner, the commissioner shall follow the procedures under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5739.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Person" includes individuals, receivers, assignees, trustees in bankruptcy, estates, firms, partnerships, associations, joint-stock companies, joint ventures, clubs, societies, corporations, the state and its political subdivisions, and combinations of individuals of any form. (B) "Sale" and "selling" include all of the following transactions for a consideration in any manner, whether absolutely or conditionally, whether for a price or rental, in money or by exchange, and by any means whatsoever: (1) All transactions by which title or possession, or both, of tangible personal property, is or is to be transferred, or a license to use or consume tangible personal property is or is to be granted; (2) All transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests; (3) All transactions by which: (a) An item of tangible personal property is or is to be repaired, except property, the purchase of which would not be subject to the tax imposed by section 5739.02 of the Revised Code; (b) An item of tangible personal property is or is to be installed, except property, the purchase of which would not be subject to the tax imposed by section 5739.02 of the Revised Code or property that is or is to be incorporated into and will become a part of a production, transmission, transportation, or distribution system for the delivery of a public utility service; (c) The service of washing, cleaning, waxing, polishing, or painting a motor vehicle is or is to be furnished; (d) Laundry and dry cleaning services are or are to be provided; (e) Automatic data processing, computer services, or electronic information services are or are to be provided for use in business when the true object of the transaction is the receipt by the consumer of automatic data processing, computer services, or electronic information services rather than the receipt of personal or professional services to which automatic data processing, computer services, or electronic information services are incidental or supplemental. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, such transactions that occur between members of an affiliated group are not sales. An "affiliated group" means two or more persons related in such a way that one person owns or controls the business operation of another member of the group. In the case of corporations with stock, one corporation owns or controls another if it owns more than fifty per cent of the other corporation's common stock with voting rights. (f) Telecommunications service, including prepaid calling service, prepaid wireless calling service, or ancillary service, is or is to be provided, but not including coin-operated telephone service; (g) Landscaping and lawn care service is or is to be provided; (h) Private investigation and security service is or is to be provided; (i) Information services or tangible personal property is provided or ordered by means of a nine hundred telephone call; (j) Building maintenance and janitorial service is or is to be provided; (k) Exterminating service is or is to be provided; (l) Physical fitness facility service is or is to be provided; (m) Recreation and sports club service is or is to be provided; (n) Satellite broadcasting service is or is to be provided; (o) Personal care service is or is to be provided to an individual. As used in this division, "personal care service" includes skin care, the application of cosmetics, manicuring, pedicuring, hair removal, tattooing, body piercing, tanning, massage, and other similar services. "Personal care service" does not include a service provided by or on the order of a licensed physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, certified nurse practitioner, or chiropractor, or the cutting, coloring, or styling of an individual's hair. (p) The transportation of persons by motor vehicle or aircraft is or is to be provided, when the transportation is entirely within this state, except for transportation provided by an ambulance service, by a transit bus, as defined in section 5735.01 of the Revised Code, and transportation provided by a citizen of the United States holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under 49 U.S.C. 41102; (q) Motor vehicle towing service is or is to be provided. As used in this division, "motor vehicle towing service" means the towing or conveyance of a wrecked, disabled, or illegally parked motor vehicle. (r) Snow removal service is or is to be provided. As used in this division, "snow removal service" means the removal of snow by any mechanized means, but does not include the providing of such service by a person that has less than five thousand dollars in sales of such service during the calendar year. (s) Electronic publishing service is or is to be provided to a consumer for use in business, except that such transactions occurring between members of an affiliated group, as defined in division (B)(3)(e) of this section, are not sales. (4) All transactions by which printed, imprinted, overprinted, lithographic, multilithic, blueprinted, photostatic, or other productions or reproductions of written or graphic matter are or are to be furnished or transferred; (5) The production or fabrication of tangible personal property for a consideration for consumers who furnish either directly or indirectly the materials used in the production of fabrication work; and include the furnishing, preparing, or serving for a consideration of any tangible personal property consumed on the premises of the person furnishing, preparing, or serving such tangible personal property. Except as provided in section 5739.03 of the Revised Code, a construction contract pursuant to which tangible personal property is or is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement on and becoming a part of real property is not a sale of such tangible personal property. The construction contractor is the consumer of such tangible personal property, provided that the sale and installation of carpeting, the sale and installation of agricultural land tile, the sale and erection or installation of portable grain bins, or the provision of landscaping and lawn care service and the transfer of property as part of such service is never a construction contract. As used in division (B)(5) of this section: (a) "Agricultural land tile" means fired clay or concrete tile, or flexible or rigid perforated plastic pipe or tubing, incorporated or to be incorporated into a subsurface drainage system appurtenant to land used or to be used primarily in production by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. The term does not include such materials when they are or are to be incorporated into a drainage system appurtenant to a building or structure even if the building or structure is used or to be used in such production. (b) "Portable grain bin" means a structure that is used or to be used by a person engaged in farming or agriculture to shelter the person's grain and that is designed to be disassembled without significant damage to its component parts. (6) All transactions in which all of the shares of stock of a closely held corporation are transferred, or an ownership interest in a pass-through entity, as defined in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code, is transferred, if the corporation or pass-through entity is not engaging in business and its entire assets consist of boats, planes, motor vehicles, or other tangible personal property operated primarily for the use and enjoyment of the shareholders or owners; (7) All transactions in which a warranty, maintenance or service contract, or similar agreement by which the vendor of the warranty, contract, or agreement agrees to repair or maintain the tangible personal property of the consumer is or is to be provided; (8) The transfer of copyrighted motion picture films used solely for advertising purposes, except that the transfer of such films for exhibition purposes is not a sale; (9) All transactions by which tangible personal property is or is to be stored, except such property that the consumer of the storage holds for sale in the regular course of business; (10) All transactions in which "guaranteed auto protection" is provided whereby a person promises to pay to the consumer the difference between the amount the consumer receives from motor vehicle insurance and the amount the consumer owes to a person holding title to or a lien on the consumer's motor vehicle in the event the consumer's motor vehicle suffers a total loss under the terms of the motor vehicle insurance policy or is stolen and not recovered, if the protection and its price are included in the purchase or lease agreement; (11)(a) Except as provided in division (B)(11)(b) of this section, all transactions by which health care services are paid for, reimbursed, provided, delivered, arranged for, or otherwise made available by a medicaid health insuring corporation pursuant to the corporation's contract with the state. (b) If the centers for medicare and medicaid services of the United States department of health and human services determines that the taxation of transactions described in division (B)(11)(a) of this section constitutes an impermissible health care-related tax under the "Social Security Act," section 1903(w), 42 U.S.C. 1396b(w), and regulations adopted thereunder, the medicaid director shall notify the tax commissioner of that determination. Beginning with the first day of the month following that notification, the transactions described in division (B)(11)(a) of this section are not sales for the purposes of this chapter or Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner shall order that the collection of taxes under sections 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, 5739.026, 5741.02, 5741.021, 5741.022, and 5741.023 of the Revised Code shall cease for transactions occurring on or after that date. (12) All transactions by which a specified digital product is provided for permanent use or less than permanent use, regardless of whether continued payment is required. (13) All transactions by a delivery network company for the company's delivery network services, provided the company has a waiver issued under section 5741.072 of the Revised Code. Except as provided in this section, "sale" and "selling" do not include transfers of interest in leased property where the original lessee and the terms of the original lease agreement remain unchanged, or professional, insurance, or personal service transactions that involve the transfer of tangible personal property as an inconsequential element, for which no separate charges are made. (C) "Vendor" means the person providing the service or by whom the transfer effected or license given by a sale is or is to be made or given and, for sales described in division (B)(3)(i) of this section, the telecommunications service vendor that provides the nine hundred telephone service; if two or more persons are engaged in business at the same place of business under a single trade name in which all collections on account of sales by each are made, such persons shall constitute a single vendor. Physicians, certified nurse-midwives, clinical nurse specialists, certified nurse practitioners, dentists, hospitals, and veterinarians who are engaged in selling tangible personal property as received from others, such as eyeglasses, mouthwashes, dentifrices, or similar articles, are vendors. Veterinarians who are engaged in transferring to others for a consideration drugs, the dispensing of which does not require an order of a licensed veterinarian, physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner under federal law, are vendors. The operator of any peer-to-peer car sharing program shall be considered to be the vendor. (D)(1) "Consumer" means the person for whom the service is provided, to whom the transfer effected or license given by a sale is or is to be made or given, to whom the service described in division (B)(3)(f) or (i) of this section is charged, or to whom the admission is granted. (2) Physicians, certified nurse-midwives, clinical nurse specialists, certified nurse practitioners, dentists, hospitals, and blood banks operated by nonprofit institutions and persons licensed to practice veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry are consumers of all tangible personal property and services purchased by them in connection with the practice of medicine, dentistry, the rendition of hospital or blood bank service, or the practice of veterinary medicine, surgery, and dentistry. In addition to being consumers of drugs administered by them or by their assistants according to their direction, veterinarians also are consumers of drugs that under federal law may be dispensed only by or upon the order of a licensed veterinarian, physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner, when transferred by them to others for a consideration to provide treatment to animals as directed by the veterinarian. (3) A person who performs a facility management, or similar service contract for a contractee is a consumer of all tangible personal property and services purchased for use in connection with the performance of such contract, regardless of whether title to any such property vests in the contractee. The purchase of such property and services is not subject to the exception for resale under division (E) of this section. (4)(a) In the case of a person who purchases printed matter for the purpose of distributing it or having it distributed to the public or to a designated segment of the public, free of charge, that person is the consumer of that printed matter, and the purchase of that printed matter for that purpose is a sale. (b) In the case of a person who produces, rather than purchases, printed matter for the purpose of distributing it or having it distributed to the public or to a designated segment of the public, free of charge, that person is the consumer of all tangible personal property and services purchased for use or consumption in the production of that printed matter. That person is not entitled to claim exemption under division (B)(42)(f) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code for any material incorporated into the printed matter or any equipment, supplies, or services primarily used to produce the printed matter. (c) The distribution of printed matter to the public or to a designated segment of the public, free of charge, is not a sale to the members of the public to whom the printed matter is distributed or to any persons who purchase space in the printed matter for advertising or other purposes. (5) A person who makes sales of any of the services listed in division (B)(3) of this section is the consumer of any tangible personal property used in performing the service. The purchase of that property is not subject to the resale exception under division (E) of this section. (6) A person who engages in highway transportation for hire is the consumer of all packaging materials purchased by that person and used in performing the service, except for packaging materials sold by such person in a transaction separate from the service. (7) In the case of a transaction for health care services under division (B)(11) of this section, a medicaid health insuring corporation is the consumer of such services. The purchase of such services by a medicaid health insuring corporation is not subject to the exception for resale under division (E) of this section or to the exemptions provided under divisions (B)(12), (18), (19), and (22) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code. (E) "Retail sale" and "sales at retail" include all sales, except those in which the purpose of the consumer is to resell the thing transferred or benefit of the service provided, by a person engaging in business, in the form in which the same is, or is to be, received by the person. (F) "Business" includes any activity engaged in by any person with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect. "Business" does not include the activity of a person in managing and investing the person's own funds. (G) "Engaging in business" means commencing, conducting, or continuing in business, and liquidating a business when the liquidator thereof holds itself out to the public as conducting such business. Making a casual sale is not engaging in business. (H)(1)(a) "Price," except as provided in divisions (H)(2), (3), and (4) of this section, means the total amount of consideration, including cash, credit, property, and services, for which tangible personal property or services are sold, leased, or rented, valued in money, whether received in money or otherwise, without any deduction for any of the following: (i) The vendor's cost of the property sold; (ii) The cost of materials used, labor or service costs, interest, losses, all costs of transportation to the vendor, all taxes imposed on the vendor, including the tax imposed under Chapter 5751. of the Revised Code, and any other expense of the vendor; (iii) Charges by the vendor for any services necessary to complete the sale; (iv) Delivery charges. As used in this division, "delivery charges" means charges by the vendor for preparation and delivery to a location designated by the consumer of tangible personal property or a service, including transportation, shipping, postage, handling, crating, and packing. (v) Installation charges; (vi) Credit for any trade-in. (b) "Price" includes consideration received by the vendor from a third party, if the vendor actually receives the consideration from a party other than the consumer, and the consideration is directly related to a price reduction or discount on the sale; the vendor has an obligation to pass the price reduction or discount through to the consumer; the amount of the consideration attributable to the sale is fixed and determinable by the vendor at the time of the sale of the item to the consumer; and one of the following criteria is met: (i) The consumer presents a coupon, certificate, or other document to the vendor to claim a price reduction or discount where the coupon, certificate, or document is authorized, distributed, or granted by a third party with the understanding that the third party will reimburse any vendor to whom the coupon, certificate, or document is presented; (ii) The consumer identifies the consumer's self to the seller as a member of a group or organization entitled to a price reduction or discount. A preferred customer card that is available to any patron does not constitute membership in such a group or organization. (iii) The price reduction or discount is identified as a third party price reduction or discount on the invoice received by the consumer, or on a coupon, certificate, or other document presented by the consumer. (c) "Price" does not include any of the following: (i) Discounts, including cash, term, or coupons that are not reimbursed by a third party that are allowed by a vendor and taken by a consumer on a sale; (ii) Interest, financing, and carrying charges from credit extended on the sale of tangible personal property or services, if the amount is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the purchaser; (iii) Any taxes legally imposed directly on the consumer that are separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given to the consumer. For the purpose of this division, the tax imposed under Chapter 5751. of the Revised Code is not a tax directly on the consumer, even if the tax or a portion thereof is separately stated. (iv) Notwithstanding divisions (H)(1)(b)(i) to (iii) of this section, any discount allowed by an automobile manufacturer to its employee, or to the employee of a supplier, on the purchase of a new motor vehicle from a new motor vehicle dealer in this state. (v) The dollar value of a gift card that is not sold by a vendor or purchased by a consumer and that is redeemed by the consumer in purchasing tangible personal property or services if the vendor is not reimbursed and does not receive compensation from a third party to cover all or part of the gift card value. For the purposes of this division, a gift card is not sold by a vendor or purchased by a consumer if it is distributed pursuant to an awards, loyalty, or promotional program. Past and present purchases of tangible personal property or services by the consumer shall not be treated as consideration exchanged for a gift card. (2) In the case of a sale of any new motor vehicle by a new motor vehicle dealer, as defined in section 4517.01 of the Revised Code, in which another motor vehicle is accepted by the dealer as part of the consideration received, "price" has the same meaning as in division (H)(1) of this section, reduced by the credit afforded the consumer by the dealer for the motor vehicle received in trade. (3) In the case of a sale of any watercraft or outboard motor by a watercraft dealer licensed in accordance with section 1547.543 of the Revised Code, in which another watercraft, watercraft and trailer, or outboard motor is accepted by the dealer as part of the consideration received, "price" has the same meaning as in division (H)(1) of this section, reduced by the credit afforded the consumer by the dealer for the watercraft, watercraft and trailer, or outboard motor received in trade. As used in this division, "watercraft" includes an outdrive unit attached to the watercraft. (4) In the case of transactions for health care services under division (B)(11) of this section, "price" means the amount of managed care premiums received each month by a medicaid health insuring corporation. (I) "Receipts" means the total amount of the prices of the sales of vendors, provided that the dollar value of gift cards distributed pursuant to an awards, loyalty, or promotional program, and cash discounts allowed and taken on sales at the time they are consummated are not included, minus any amount deducted as a bad debt pursuant to section 5739.121 of the Revised Code. "Receipts" does not include the sale price of property returned or services rejected by consumers when the full sale price and tax are refunded either in cash or by credit. (J) "Place of business" means any location at which a person engages in business. (K) "Premises" includes any real property or portion thereof upon which any person engages in selling tangible personal property at retail or making retail sales and also includes any real property or portion thereof designated for, or devoted to, use in conjunction with the business engaged in by such person. (L) "Casual sale" means a sale of an item of tangible personal property, in person or online, that was obtained by the person making the sale, through purchase or otherwise, for the person's own use and was previously subject to any state's taxing jurisdiction on its sale or use, and includes such items acquired for the seller's use that are sold by an auctioneer employed directly by the person for such purpose, provided the location of such sales is not the auctioneer's physical permanent place of business. As used in this division, "permanent place of business" includes any physical location where such auctioneer has conducted more than two auctions during the year. (M) "Hotel" means every establishment kept, used, maintained, advertised, or held out to the public to be a place where sleeping accommodations are offered to guests, in which five or more rooms are used for the accommodation of such guests, whether the rooms are in one or several structures, except as otherwise provided in section 5739.091 of the Revised Code. (N) "Transient guests" means persons occupying a room or rooms for sleeping accommodations for less than thirty consecutive days. (O) "Making retail sales" means the effecting of transactions wherein one party is obligated to pay the price and the other party is obligated to provide a service or to transfer title to or possession of the item sold. "Making retail sales" does not include the preliminary acts of promoting or soliciting the retail sales, other than the distribution of printed matter which displays or describes and prices the item offered for sale, nor does it include delivery of a predetermined quantity of tangible personal property or transportation of property or personnel to or from a place where a service is performed. (P) "Used directly in the rendition of a public utility service" means that property that is to be incorporated into and will become a part of the consumer's production, transmission, transportation, or distribution system and that retains its classification as tangible personal property after such incorporation; fuel or power used in the production, transmission, transportation, or distribution system; and tangible personal property used in the repair and maintenance of the production, transmission, transportation, or distribution system, including only such motor vehicles as are specially designed and equipped for such use. Tangible personal property and services used primarily in providing highway transportation for hire are not used directly in the rendition of a public utility service. In this definition, "public utility" includes a citizen of the United States holding, and required to hold, a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under 49 U.S.C. 41102. (Q) "Refining" means removing or separating a desirable product from raw or contaminated materials by distillation or physical, mechanical, or chemical processes. (R) "Assembly" and "assembling" mean attaching or fitting together parts to form a product, but do not include packaging a product. (S) "Manufacturing operation" means a process in which materials are changed, converted, or transformed into a different state or form from which they previously existed and includes refining materials, assembling parts, and preparing raw materials and parts by mixing, measuring, blending, or otherwise committing such materials or parts to the manufacturing process. "Manufacturing operation" does not include packaging. (T) "Fiscal officer" means, with respect to a regional transit authority, the secretary-treasurer thereof, and with respect to a county that is a transit authority, the fiscal officer of the county transit board if one is appointed pursuant to section 306.03 of the Revised Code or the county auditor if the board of county commissioners operates the county transit system. (U) "Transit authority" means a regional transit authority created pursuant to section 306.31 of the Revised Code or a county in which a county transit system is created pursuant to section 306.01 of the Revised Code. For the purposes of this chapter, a transit authority must extend to at least the entire area of a single county. A transit authority that includes territory in more than one county must include all the area of the most populous county that is a part of such transit authority. County population shall be measured by the most recent census taken by the United States census bureau. (V) "Legislative authority" means, with respect to a regional transit authority, the board of trustees thereof, and with respect to a county that is a transit authority, the board of county commissioners. (W) "Territory of the transit authority" means all of the area included within the territorial boundaries of a transit authority as they from time to time exist. Such territorial boundaries must at all times include all the area of a single county or all the area of the most populous county that is a part of such transit authority. County population shall be measured by the most recent census taken by the United States census bureau. (X) "Providing a service" means providing or furnishing anything described in division (B)(3) of this section for consideration. (Y)(1)(a) "Automatic data processing" means processing of others' data, including keypunching or similar data entry services together with verification thereof, or providing access to computer equipment for the purpose of processing data. (b) "Computer services" means providing services consisting of specifying computer hardware configurations and evaluating technical processing characteristics, computer programming, and training of computer programmers and operators, provided in conjunction with and to support the sale, lease, or operation of taxable computer equipment or systems. (c) "Electronic information services" means providing access to computer equipment by means of telecommunications equipment for the purpose of either of the following: (i) Examining or acquiring data stored in or accessible to the computer equipment; (ii) Placing data into the computer equipment to be retrieved by designated recipients with access to the computer equipment. "Electronic information services" does not include electronic publishing. (d) "Automatic data processing, computer services, or electronic information services" shall not include personal or professional services. (2) As used in divisions (B)(3)(e) and (Y)(1) of this section, "personal and professional services" means all services other than automatic data processing, computer services, or electronic information services, including but not limited to: (a) Accounting and legal services such as advice on tax matters, asset management, budgetary matters, quality control, information security, and auditing and any other situation where the service provider receives data or information and studies, alters, analyzes, interprets, or adjusts such material; (b) Analyzing business policies and procedures; (c) Identifying management information needs; (d) Feasibility studies, including economic and technical analysis of existing or potential computer hardware or software needs and alternatives; (e) Designing policies, procedures, and custom software for collecting business information, and determining how data should be summarized, sequenced, formatted, processed, controlled, and reported so that it will be meaningful to management; (f) Developing policies and procedures that document how business events and transactions are to be authorized, executed, and controlled; (g) Testing of business procedures; (h) Training personnel in business procedure applications; (i) Providing credit information to users of such information by a consumer reporting agency, as defined in the "Fair Credit Reporting Act," 84 Stat. 1114, 1129 (1970), 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f), or as hereafter amended, including but not limited to gathering, organizing, analyzing, recording, and furnishing such information by any oral, written, graphic, or electronic medium; (j) Providing debt collection services by any oral, written, graphic, or electronic means; (k) Providing digital advertising services; (l) Providing services to electronically file any federal, state, or local individual income tax return, report, or other related document or schedule with a federal, state, or local government entity or to electronically remit a payment of any such individual income tax to such an entity. For the purpose of this division, "individual income tax" does not include federal, state, or local taxes withheld by an employer from an employee's compensation. The services listed in divisions (Y)(2)(a) to (l) of this section are not automatic data processing or computer services. (Z) "Highway transportation for hire" means the transportation of personal property belonging to others for consideration by any of the following: (1) The holder of a permit or certificate issued by this state or the United States authorizing the holder to engage in transportation of personal property belonging to others for consideration over or on highways, roadways, streets, or any similar public thoroughfare; (2) A person who engages in the transportation of personal property belonging to others for consideration over or on highways, roadways, streets, or any similar public thoroughfare but who could not have engaged in such transportation on December 11, 1985, unless the person was the holder of a permit or certificate of the types described in division (Z)(1) of this section; (3) A person who leases a motor vehicle to and operates it for a person described by division (Z)(1) or (2) of this section. "Highway transportation for hire" does not include delivery network services. (AA)(1) "Telecommunications service" means the electronic transmission, conveyance, or routing of voice, data, audio, video, or any other information or signals to a point, or between or among points. "Telecommunications service" includes such transmission, conveyance, or routing in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, code, or protocol of the content for purposes of transmission, conveyance, or routing without regard to whether the service is referred to as voice-over internet protocol service or is classified by the federal communications commission as enhanced or value-added. "Telecommunications service" does not include any of the following: (a) Data processing and information services that allow data to be generated, acquired, stored, processed, or retrieved and delivered by an electronic transmission to a consumer where the consumer's primary purpose for the underlying transaction is the processed data or information; (b) Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer's premises; (c) Tangible personal property; (d) Advertising, including directory advertising; (e) Billing and collection services provided to third parties; (f) Internet access service; (g) Radio and television audio and video programming services, regardless of the medium, including the furnishing of transmission, conveyance, and routing of such services by the programming service provider. Radio and television audio and video programming services include, but are not limited to, cable service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. 522(6), and audio and video programming services delivered by commercial mobile radio service providers, as defined in 47 C.F.R. 20.3; (h) Ancillary service; (i) Digital products delivered electronically, including software, music, video, reading materials, or ring tones. (2) "Ancillary service" means a service that is associated with or incidental to the provision of telecommunications service, including conference bridging service, detailed telecommunications billing service, directory assistance, vertical service, and voice mail service. As used in this division: (a) "Conference bridging service" means an ancillary service that links two or more participants of an audio or video conference call, including providing a telephone number. "Conference bridging service" does not include telecommunications services used to reach the conference bridge. (b) "Detailed telecommunications billing service" means an ancillary service of separately stating information pertaining to individual calls on a customer's billing statement. (c) "Directory assistance" means an ancillary service of providing telephone number or address information. (d) "Vertical service" means an ancillary service that is offered in connection with one or more telecommunications services, which offers advanced calling features that allow customers to identify callers and manage multiple calls and call connections, including conference bridging service. (e) "Voice mail service" means an ancillary service that enables the customer to store, send, or receive recorded messages. "Voice mail service" does not include any vertical services that the customer may be required to have in order to utilize the voice mail service. (3) "900 service" means an inbound toll telecommunications service purchased by a subscriber that allows the subscriber's customers to call in to the subscriber's prerecorded announcement or live service, and which is typically marketed under the name "900 service" and any subsequent numbers designated by the federal communications commission. "900 service" does not include the charge for collection services provided by the seller of the telecommunications service to the subscriber, or services or products sold by the subscriber to the subscriber's customer. (4) "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and which enables the origination of calls using an access number or authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount. (5) "Prepaid wireless calling service" means a telecommunications service that provides the right to utilize mobile telecommunications service as well as other non-telecommunications services, including the download of digital products delivered electronically, and content and ancillary services, that must be paid for in advance and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount. (6) "Value-added non-voice data service" means a telecommunications service in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, content, code, or protocol of the information or data primarily for a purpose other than transmission, conveyance, or routing. (7) "Coin-operated telephone service" means a telecommunications service paid for by inserting money into a telephone accepting direct deposits of money to operate. (8) "Customer" has the same meaning as in section 5739.034 of the Revised Code. (BB) "Laundry and dry cleaning services" means removing soil or dirt from towels, linens, articles of clothing, or other fabric items that belong to others and supplying towels, linens, articles of clothing, or other fabric items. "Laundry and dry cleaning services" does not include the provision of self-service facilities for use by consumers to remove soil or dirt from towels, linens, articles of clothing, or other fabric items. (CC) "Magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications" means magazines containing at least twenty-four pages, at least twenty-five per cent editorial content, issued at regular intervals four or more times a year, and circulated without charge to the recipient, provided that such magazines are not owned or controlled by individuals or business concerns which conduct such publications as an auxiliary to, and essentially for the advancement of the main business or calling of, those who own or control them. (DD) "Landscaping and lawn care service" means the services of planting, seeding, sodding, removing, cutting, trimming, pruning, mulching, aerating, applying chemicals, watering, fertilizing, and providing similar services to establish, promote, or control the growth of trees, shrubs, flowers, grass, ground cover, and other flora, or otherwise maintaining a lawn or landscape grown or maintained by the owner for ornamentation or other nonagricultural purpose. However, "landscaping and lawn care service" does not include the providing of such services by a person who has less than five thousand dollars in sales of such services during the calendar year. (EE) "Private investigation and security service" means the performance of any activity for which the provider of such service is required to be licensed pursuant to Chapter 4749. of the Revised Code, or would be required to be so licensed in performing such services in this state, and also includes the services of conducting polygraph examinations and of monitoring or overseeing the activities on or in, or the condition of, the consumer's home, business, or other facility by means of electronic or similar monitoring devices. "Private investigation and security service" does not include special duty services provided by off-duty police officers, deputy sheriffs, and other peace officers regularly employed by the state or a political subdivision. (FF) "Information services" means providing conversation, giving consultation or advice, playing or making a voice or other recording, making or keeping a record of the number of callers, and any other service provided to a consumer by means of a nine hundred telephone call, except when the nine hundred telephone call is the means by which the consumer makes a contribution to a recognized charity. (GG) "Research and development" means designing, creating, or formulating new or enhanced products, equipment, or manufacturing processes, and also means conducting scientific or technological inquiry and experimentation in the physical sciences with the goal of increasing scientific knowledge which may reveal the bases for new or enhanced products, equipment, or manufacturing processes. (HH) "Qualified research and development equipment" means either of the following: (1) Capitalized tangible personal property, and leased personal property that would be capitalized if purchased, used by a person primarily to perform research and development; (2) Any tangible personal property used by a megaproject operator primarily to perform research and development at the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code during the period that the megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority under division (D) of that section that remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated. "Qualified research and development equipment" does not include tangible personal property primarily used in testing, as defined in division (A)(4) of section 5739.011 of the Revised Code, or used for recording or storing test results, unless such property is primarily used by the consumer in testing the product, equipment, or manufacturing process being created, designed, or formulated by the consumer in the research and development activity or in recording or storing such test results. (II) "Building maintenance and janitorial service" means cleaning the interior or exterior of a building and any tangible personal property located therein or thereon, including any services incidental to such cleaning for which no separate charge is made. However, "building maintenance and janitorial service" does not include the providing of such service by a person who has less than five thousand dollars in sales of such service during the calendar year. As used in this division, "cleaning" does not include sanitation services necessary for an establishment described in 21 U.S.C. 608 to comply with rules and regulations adopted pursuant to that section. (JJ) "Exterminating service" means eradicating or attempting to eradicate vermin infestations from a building or structure, or the area surrounding a building or structure, and includes activities to inspect, detect, or prevent vermin infestation of a building or structure. (KK) "Physical fitness facility service" means all transactions by which a membership is granted, maintained, or renewed, including initiation fees, membership dues, renewal fees, monthly minimum fees, and other similar fees and dues, by a physical fitness facility such as an athletic club, health spa, or gymnasium, which entitles the member to use the facility for physical exercise. (LL) "Recreation and sports club service" means all transactions by which a membership is granted, maintained, or renewed, including initiation fees, membership dues, renewal fees, monthly minimum fees, and other similar fees and dues, by a recreation and sports club, which entitles the member to use the facilities of the organization. "Recreation and sports club" means an organization that has ownership of, or controls or leases on a continuing, long-term basis, the facilities used by its members and includes an aviation club, gun or shooting club, yacht club, card club, swimming club, tennis club, golf club, country club, riding club, amateur sports club, or similar organization. (MM) "Livestock" means farm animals commonly raised for food, food production, or other agricultural purposes, including, but not limited to, cattle, sheep, goats, swine, poultry, and captive deer. "Livestock" does not include invertebrates, amphibians, reptiles, domestic pets, animals for use in laboratories or for exhibition, or other animals not commonly raised for food or food production. (NN) "Livestock structure" means a building or structure used exclusively for the housing, raising, feeding, or sheltering of livestock, and includes feed storage or handling structures and structures for livestock waste handling. (OO) "Horticulture" means the growing, cultivation, and production of flowers, fruits, herbs, vegetables, sod, mushrooms, and nursery stock. As used in this division, "nursery stock" has the same meaning as in section 927.51 of the Revised Code. (PP) "Horticulture structure" means a building or structure used exclusively for the commercial growing, raising, or overwintering of horticultural products, and includes the area used for stocking, storing, and packing horticultural products when done in conjunction with the production of those products. (QQ) "Newspaper" means an unbound publication bearing a title or name that is regularly published, at least as frequently as biweekly, and distributed from a fixed place of business to the public in a specific geographic area, and that contains a substantial amount of news matter of international, national, or local events of interest to the general public. (RR)(1) "Feminine hygiene products" means tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups, sanitary napkins, and other similar tangible personal property designed for feminine hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle, but does not include grooming and hygiene products. (2) "Grooming and hygiene products" means soaps and cleaning solutions, shampoo, toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, and sun tan lotions and screens, regardless of whether any of these products are over-the-counter drugs. (3) "Over-the-counter drugs" means a drug that contains a label that identifies the product as a drug as required by 21 C.F.R. 201.66, which label includes a drug facts panel or a statement of the active ingredients with a list of those ingredients contained in the compound, substance, or preparation. (SS)(1) "Lease" or "rental" means any transfer of the possession or control of tangible personal property for a fixed or indefinite term, for consideration. "Lease" or "rental" includes future options to purchase or extend, and agreements described in 26 U.S.C. 7701(h)(1) covering motor vehicles and trailers where the amount of consideration may be increased or decreased by reference to the amount realized upon the sale or disposition of the property. "Lease" or "rental" does not include: (a) A transfer of possession or control of tangible personal property under a security agreement or a deferred payment plan that requires the transfer of title upon completion of the required payments; (b) A transfer of possession or control of tangible personal property under an agreement that requires the transfer of title upon completion of required payments and payment of an option price that does not exceed the greater of one hundred dollars or one per cent of the total required payments; (c) Providing tangible personal property along with an operator for a fixed or indefinite period of time, if the operator is necessary for the property to perform as designed. For purposes of this division, the operator must do more than maintain, inspect, or set up the tangible personal property. (2) "Lease" and "rental," as defined in division (SS) of this section, shall not apply to leases or rentals that exist before June 26, 2003. (3) "Lease" and "rental" have the same meaning as in division (SS)(1) of this section regardless of whether a transaction is characterized as a lease or rental under generally accepted accounting principles, the Internal Revenue Code, Title XIII of the Revised Code, or other federal, state, or local laws. (TT) "Mobile telecommunications service" has the same meaning as in the "Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act," Pub. L. No. 106-252, 114 Stat. 631 (2000), 4 U.S.C.A. 124(7), as amended, and, on and after August 1, 2003, includes related fees and ancillary services, including universal service fees, detailed billing service, directory assistance, service initiation, voice mail service, and vertical services, such as caller ID and three-way calling. (UU) "Certified service provider" has the same meaning as in section 5740.01 of the Revised Code. (VV) "Satellite broadcasting service" means the distribution or broadcasting of programming or services by satellite directly to the subscriber's receiving equipment without the use of ground receiving or distribution equipment, except the subscriber's receiving equipment or equipment used in the uplink process to the satellite, and includes all service and rental charges, premium channels or other special services, installation and repair service charges, and any other charges having any connection with the provision of the satellite broadcasting service. (WW) "Tangible personal property" means personal property that can be seen, weighed, measured, felt, or touched, or that is in any other manner perceptible to the senses. For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code, "tangible personal property" includes motor vehicles, electricity, water, gas, steam, and prewritten computer software. (XX) "Municipal gas utility" means a municipal corporation that owns or operates a system for the distribution of natural gas. (YY) "Computer" means an electronic device that accepts information in digital or similar form and manipulates it for a result based on a sequence of instructions. (ZZ) "Computer software" means a set of coded instructions designed to cause a computer or automatic data processing equipment to perform a task. (AAA) "Delivered electronically" means delivery of computer software from the seller to the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media. (BBB) "Prewritten computer software" means computer software, including prewritten upgrades, that is not designed and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser. The combining of two or more prewritten computer software programs or prewritten portions thereof does not cause the combination to be other than prewritten computer software. "Prewritten computer software" includes software designed and developed by the author or other creator to the specifications of a specific purchaser when it is sold to a person other than the purchaser. If a person modifies or enhances computer software of which the person is not the author or creator, the person shall be deemed to be the author or creator only of such person's modifications or enhancements. Prewritten computer software or a prewritten portion thereof that is modified or enhanced to any degree, where such modification or enhancement is designed and developed to the specifications of a specific purchaser, remains prewritten computer software; provided, however, that where there is a reasonable, separately stated charge or an invoice or other statement of the price given to the purchaser for the modification or enhancement, the modification or enhancement shall not constitute prewritten computer software. (CCC)(1) "Food" means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for their taste or nutritional value. "Food" does not include alcoholic beverages, dietary supplements, soft drinks, or tobacco. (2) As used in division (CCC)(1) of this section: (a) "Dietary supplements" means any product, other than tobacco, that is intended to supplement the diet and that is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, softgel, gelcap, or liquid form, or, if not intended for ingestion in such a form, is not represented as conventional food for use as a sole item of a meal or of the diet; that is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the "supplement facts" box found on the label, as required by 21 C.F.R. 101.36; and that contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: (i) A vitamin; (ii) A mineral; (iii) An herb or other botanical; (iv) An amino acid; (v) A dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; (vi) A concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of any ingredient described in divisions (CCC)(2)(a)(i) to (v) of this section. (b) "Soft drinks" means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. "Soft drinks" does not include beverages that contain milk or milk products, soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes, or that contains greater than fifty per cent vegetable or fruit juice by volume. (DDD) "Drug" means a compound, substance, or preparation, and any component of a compound, substance, or preparation, other than food, dietary supplements, or alcoholic beverages that is recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official national formulary, and supplements to them; is intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease; or is intended to affect the structure or any function of the body. (EEE) "Prescription" means an order, formula, or recipe issued in any form of oral, written, electronic, or other means of transmission by a duly licensed practitioner authorized by the laws of this state to issue a prescription. (FFF) "Durable medical equipment" means equipment, including repair and replacement parts for such equipment, that can withstand repeated use, is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose, generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury, and is not worn in or on the body. "Durable medical equipment" does not include mobility enhancing equipment. (GGG) "Mobility enhancing equipment" means equipment, including repair and replacement parts for such equipment, that is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the ability to move from one place to another and is appropriate for use either in a home or a motor vehicle, that is not generally used by persons with normal mobility, and that does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer. "Mobility enhancing equipment" does not include durable medical equipment. (HHH) "Prosthetic device" means a replacement, corrective, or supportive device, including repair and replacement parts for the device, worn on or in the human body to artificially replace a missing portion of the body, prevent or correct physical deformity or malfunction, or support a weak or deformed portion of the body. As used in this division, before July 1, 2019, "prosthetic device" does not include corrective eyeglasses, contact lenses, or dental prosthesis. On or after July 1, 2019, "prosthetic device" does not include dental prosthesis but does include corrective eyeglasses or contact lenses. (III)(1) "Fractional aircraft ownership program" means a program in which persons within an affiliated group sell and manage fractional ownership program aircraft, provided that at least one hundred airworthy aircraft are operated in the program and the program meets all of the following criteria: (a) Management services are provided by at least one program manager within an affiliated group on behalf of the fractional owners. (b) Each program aircraft is owned or possessed by at least one fractional owner. (c) Each fractional owner owns or possesses at least a one-sixteenth interest in at least one fixed-wing program aircraft. (d) A dry-lease aircraft interchange arrangement is in effect among all of the fractional owners. (e) Multi-year program agreements are in effect regarding the fractional ownership, management services, and dry-lease aircraft interchange arrangement aspects of the program. (2) As used in division (III)(1) of this section: (a) "Affiliated group" has the same meaning as in division (B)(3)(e) of this section. (b) "Fractional owner" means a person that owns or possesses at least a one-sixteenth interest in a program aircraft and has entered into the agreements described in division (III)(1)(e) of this section. (c) "Fractional ownership program aircraft" or "program aircraft" means a turbojet aircraft that is owned or possessed by a fractional owner and that has been included in a dry-lease aircraft interchange arrangement and agreement under divisions (III)(1)(d) and (e) of this section, or an aircraft a program manager owns or possesses primarily for use in a fractional aircraft ownership program. (d) "Management services" means administrative and aviation support services furnished under a fractional aircraft ownership program in accordance with a management services agreement under division (III)(1)(e) of this section, and offered by the program manager to the fractional owners, including, at a minimum, the establishment and implementation of safety guidelines; the coordination of the scheduling of the program aircraft and crews; program aircraft maintenance; program aircraft insurance; crew training for crews employed, furnished, or contracted by the program manager or the fractional owner; the satisfaction of record-keeping requirements; and the development and use of an operations manual and a maintenance manual for the fractional aircraft ownership program. (e) "Program manager" means the person that offers management services to fractional owners pursuant to a management services agreement under division (III)(1)(e) of this section. (JJJ) "Electronic publishing" means providing access to one or more of the following primarily for business customers, including the federal government or a state government or a political subdivision thereof, to conduct research: news; business, financial, legal, consumer, or credit materials; editorials, columns, reader commentary, or features; photos or images; archival or research material; legal notices, identity verification, or public records; scientific, educational, instructional, technical, professional, trade, or other literary materials; or other similar information which has been gathered and made available by the provider to the consumer in an electronic format. Providing electronic publishing includes the functions necessary for the acquisition, formatting, editing, storage, and dissemination of data or information that is the subject of a sale. (KKK) "Medicaid health insuring corporation" means a health insuring corporation that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 1751. of the Revised Code and is under contract with the department of medicaid pursuant to section 5167.10 of the Revised Code. (LLL) "Managed care premium" means any premium, capitation, or other payment a medicaid health insuring corporation receives for providing or arranging for the provision of health care services to its members or enrollees residing in this state. (MMM) "Captive deer" means deer and other cervidae that have been legally acquired, or their offspring, that are privately owned for agricultural or farming purposes. (NNN) "Gift card" means a document, card, certificate, or other record, whether tangible or intangible, that may be redeemed by a consumer for a dollar value when making a purchase of tangible personal property or services. (OOO) "Specified digital product" means an electronically transferred digital audiovisual work, digital audio work, or digital book. As used in division (OOO) of this section: (1) "Digital audiovisual work" means a series of related images that, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any. (2) "Digital audio work" means a work that results from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including digitized sound files that are downloaded onto a device and that may be used to alert the customer with respect to a communication. (3) "Digital book" means a work that is generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as a book. (4) "Electronically transferred" means obtained by the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media. (PPP) "Digital advertising services" means providing access, by means of telecommunications equipment, to computer equipment that is used to enter, upload, download, review, manipulate, store, add, or delete data for the purpose of electronically displaying, delivering, placing, or transferring promotional advertisements to potential customers about products or services or about industry or business brands. (QQQ) "Peer-to-peer car sharing program" has the same meaning as in section 4516.01 of the Revised Code. (RRR) "Megaproject" and "megaproject operator" have the same meanings as in section 122.17 of the Revised Code. (SSS)(1) "Diaper" means an absorbent garment worn by humans who are incapable of, or have difficulty, controlling their bladder or bowel movements. (2) "Children's diaper" means a diaper marketed to be worn by children. (3) "Adult diaper" means a diaper other than a children's diaper. (TTT) "Sales tax holiday" means three or more dates on which sales of all eligible tangible personal property are exempt from the taxes levied under sections 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, 5739.026, 5741.02, 5741.021, 5741.022, and 5741.023 of the Revised Code. (UUU) "Eligible tangible personal property" means any item of tangible personal property that meets both of the following requirements: (1) The price of the item does not exceed five hundred dollars; (2) The item is not a watercraft or outboard motor required to be titled pursuant to Chapter 1548. of the Revised Code, a motor vehicle, an alcoholic beverage, tobacco, a vapor product as defined in section 5743.01 of the Revised Code, or an item that contains marijuana as defined in section 3796.01 of the Revised Code. (VVV) "Alcoholic beverages" means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one per cent or more of alcohol by volume. (WWW) "Tobacco" means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco. (XXX)(1) "Delivery network company" means a person that operates a business platform, including a web site or mobile application, to facilitate delivery network services. (2) "Delivery network courier" means an individual connected to a consumer through a delivery network company and who provides delivery network services to that consumer. (3) "Delivery network services" means both of the following when performed as part of a single transaction: (a) Pickup of a local product by a delivery network courier from a local merchant that is not under common ownership or control of the delivery network company through which the transaction was initiated, and which may include selection, collection, and purchase of the local product; (b) Delivery by the delivery network courier of that local product to a location designated by the consumer that is not more than seventy-five miles from the local merchant's place of business where the pickup described in division (XXX)(3)(a) of this section occurs. (4) "Local merchant" means a person engaged in selling local products from a temporary or fixed place of business in this state, including a kitchen, restaurant, grocery store, retail store, or convenience store. (5) "Local product" means any tangible personal property, including food, but excluding freight, mail, or a package to which postage is affixed. Sec. 5739.011. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Manufacturer" means a person who is engaged in manufacturing, processing, assembling, or refining a product for sale and, solely for the purposes of division (B)(12) of this section, a person who meets all the qualifications of that division. (2) "Manufacturing facility" means a single location where a manufacturing operation is conducted, including locations consisting of one or more buildings or structures in a contiguous area owned or controlled by the manufacturer. (3) "Materials handling" means the movement of the product being or to be manufactured, during which movement the product is not undergoing any substantial change or alteration in its state or form. (4) "Testing" means a process or procedure to identify the properties or assure the quality of a material or product. (5) "Completed product" means a manufactured item that is in the form and condition as it will be sold by the manufacturer. An item is completed when all processes that change or alter its state or form or enhance its value are finished, even though the item subsequently will be tested to ensure its quality or be packaged for storage or shipment. (6) "Continuous manufacturing operation" means the process in which raw materials or components are moved through the steps whereby manufacturing occurs. Materials handling of raw materials or parts from the point of receipt or preproduction storage or of a completed product, to or from storage, to or from packaging, or to the place from which the completed product will be shipped, is not a part of a continuous manufacturing operation. (7) "Food" has the same meaning as in section 3717.01 of the Revised Code. (B) For purposes of division (B)(42)(g)(B)(42)(f) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the "thing transferred" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (1) Production machinery and equipment that act upon the product or machinery and equipment that treat the materials or parts in preparation for the manufacturing operation; (2) Materials handling equipment that moves the product through a continuous manufacturing operation; equipment that temporarily stores the product during the manufacturing operation; or, excluding motor vehicles licensed to operate on public highways, equipment used in intraplant or interplant transfers of work in process where the plant or plants between which such transfers occur are manufacturing facilities operated by the same person; (3) Catalysts, solvents, water, acids, oil, and similar consumables that interact with the product and that are an integral part of the manufacturing operation; (4) Machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property used during the manufacturing operation that control, physically support, produce power for, lubricate, or are otherwise necessary for the functioning of production machinery and equipment and the continuation of the manufacturing operation; (5) Machinery, equipment, fuel, power, material, parts, and other tangible personal property used to manufacture machinery, equipment, or other tangible personal property used in manufacturing a product for sale; (6) Machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property used by a manufacturer to test raw materials, the product being manufactured, or the completed product; (7) Machinery and equipment used to handle or temporarily store scrap that is intended to be reused in the manufacturing operation at the same manufacturing facility; (8) Coke, gas, water, steam, and similar substances used in the manufacturing operation; machinery and equipment used for, and fuel consumed in, producing or extracting those substances; machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property used to treat, filter, pump, or otherwise make the substance suitable for use in the manufacturing operation; and machinery and equipment used for, and fuel consumed in, producing electricity for use in the manufacturing operation; (9) Machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property used to transport or transmit electricity, coke, gas, water, steam, or similar substances used in the manufacturing operation from the point of generation, if produced by the manufacturer, or from the point where the substance enters the manufacturing facility, if purchased by the manufacturer, to the manufacturing operation; (10) Machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property that treats, filters, cools, refines, or otherwise renders water, steam, acid, oil, solvents, or similar substances used in the manufacturing operation reusable, provided that the substances are intended for reuse and not for disposal, sale, or transportation from the manufacturing facility; (11) Parts, components, and repair and installation services for items described in division (B) of this section; (12) Machinery and equipment, detergents, supplies, solvents, and any other tangible personal property located at a manufacturing facility that are used in the process of removing soil, dirt, or other contaminants from, or otherwise preparing in a suitable condition for use, towels, linens, articles of clothing, floor mats, mop heads, or other similar items, to be supplied to a consumer as part of laundry and dry cleaning services, only when the towels, linens, articles of clothing, floor mats, mop heads, or other similar items belong to the provider of the services; (13) Equipment and supplies used to clean processing equipment that is part of a continuous manufacturing operation to produce food for human consumption. (C) For purposes of division (B)(42)(g)(B)(42)(f) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the "thing transferred" does not include any of the following: (1) Tangible personal property used in administrative, personnel, security, inventory control, record-keeping, ordering, billing, or similar functions; (2) Tangible personal property used in storing raw materials or parts prior to the commencement of the manufacturing operation or used to handle or store a completed product, including storage that actively maintains a completed product in a marketable state or form; (3) Tangible personal property used to handle or store scrap or waste intended for disposal, sale, or other disposition, other than reuse in the manufacturing operation at the same manufacturing facility; (4) Tangible personal property that is or is to be incorporated into realty; (5) Machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property used for ventilation, dust or gas collection, humidity or temperature regulation, or similar environmental control, except machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property that totally regulates the environment in a special and limited area of the manufacturing facility where the regulation is essential for production to occur; (6) Tangible personal property used for the protection and safety of workers, unless the property is attached to or incorporated into machinery and equipment used in a continuous manufacturing operation; (7) Tangible personal property used to store fuel, water, solvents, acid, oil, or similar items consumed in the manufacturing operation; (8) Except as provided in division (B)(13) of this section, machinery, equipment, and other tangible personal property used to clean, repair, or maintain real or personal property in the manufacturing facility; (9) Motor vehicles registered for operation on public highways. (D) For purposes of division (B)(42)(g)(B)(42)(f) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, if the "thing transferred" is a machine used by a manufacturer in both a taxable and an exempt manner, it shall be totally taxable or totally exempt from taxation based upon its quantified primary use. If the "things transferred" are fungibles, they shall be taxed based upon the proportion of the fungibles used in a taxable manner. Sec. 5739.02. For the purpose of providing revenue with which to meet the needs of the state, for the use of the general revenue fund of the state, for the purpose of securing a thorough and efficient system of common schools throughout the state, for the purpose of affording revenues, in addition to those from general property taxes, permitted under constitutional limitations, and from other sources, for the support of local governmental functions, and for the purpose of reimbursing the state for the expense of administering this chapter, an excise tax is hereby levied on each retail sale made in this state. (A)(1) The tax shall be collected as provided in section 5739.025 of the Revised Code. The rate of the tax shall be five and three-fourths per cent. The tax applies and is collectible when the sale is made, regardless of the time when the price is paid or delivered. (2) In the case of the lease or rental, with a fixed term of more than thirty days or an indefinite term with a minimum period of more than thirty days, of any motor vehicles designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of not more than one ton, watercraft, outboard motor, or aircraft, or of any tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles designed by the manufacturer to carry a load of more than one ton, to be used by the lessee or renter primarily for business purposes, the tax shall be collected by the vendor at the time the lease or rental is consummated and shall be calculated by the vendor on the basis of the total amount to be paid by the lessee or renter under the lease agreement. If the total amount of the consideration for the lease or rental includes amounts that are not calculated at the time the lease or rental is executed, the tax shall be calculated and collected by the vendor at the time such amounts are billed to the lessee or renter. In the case of an open-end lease or rental, the tax shall be calculated by the vendor on the basis of the total amount to be paid during the initial fixed term of the lease or rental, and for each subsequent renewal period as it comes due. As used in this division, "motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, and "watercraft" includes an outdrive unit attached to the watercraft. A lease with a renewal clause and a termination penalty or similar provision that applies if the renewal clause is not exercised is presumed to be a sham transaction. In such a case, the tax shall be calculated and paid on the basis of the entire length of the lease period, including any renewal periods, until the termination penalty or similar provision no longer applies. The taxpayer shall bear the burden, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the transaction or series of transactions is not a sham transaction. (3) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, in the case of a sale, the price of which consists in whole or in part of the lease or rental of tangible personal property, the tax shall be measured by the installments of that lease or rental. (4) In the case of a sale of a physical fitness facility service or recreation and sports club service, the price of which consists in whole or in part of a membership for the receipt of the benefit of the service, the tax applicable to the sale shall be measured by the installments thereof. (B) The tax does not apply to the following: (1) Sales to the state or any of its political subdivisions, or to any other state or its political subdivisions if the laws of that state exempt from taxation sales made to this state and its political subdivisions including either of the following: (a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or temporary structures, including material and equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its political subdivisions take title to, or permanent or temporary possession of, such tangible personal property for use by the state or any of its political subdivisions, including for use by the general public thereof; (b) Sales of services by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its political subdivisions, including the general public thereof, receive the benefit of such services. As used in divisions (B)(1)(a) and (b) of this section, "temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, and pavement. (2) Sales of food for human consumption off the premises where sold; (3) Sales of food sold to students only in a cafeteria, dormitory, fraternity, or sorority maintained in a private, public, or parochial school, college, or university; (4) Sales of newspapers and sales or transfers of magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications; (5) The furnishing, preparing, or serving of meals without charge by an employer to an employee provided the employer records the meals as part compensation for services performed or work done; (6)(a) Sales of motor fuel upon receipt, use, distribution, or sale of which in this state a tax is imposed by the law of this state, but this exemption shall not apply to the sale of motor fuel on which a refund of the tax is allowable under division (A) of section 5735.14 of the Revised Code; and the tax commissioner may deduct the amount of tax levied by this section applicable to the price of motor fuel when granting a refund of motor fuel tax pursuant to division (A) of section 5735.14 of the Revised Code and shall cause the amount deducted to be paid into the general revenue fund of this state; (b) Sales of motor fuel other than that described in division (B)(6)(a) of this section and used for powering a refrigeration unit on a vehicle other than one used primarily to provide comfort to the operator or occupants of the vehicle. (7) Sales of natural gas by a natural gas company or municipal gas utility, of water by a water-works company, or of steam by a heating company, if in each case the thing sold is delivered to consumers through pipes or conduits, and all sales of communications services by a telegraph company, all terms as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code, and sales of electricity delivered through wires; (8) Casual sales by a person, or auctioneer employed directly by the person to conduct such sales, except as to such sales of motor vehicles, watercraft or outboard motors required to be titled under section 1548.06 of the Revised Code, watercraft documented with the United States coast guard, snowmobiles, and all-purpose vehicles as defined in section 4519.01 of the Revised Code; (9)(a) Sales of services or tangible personal property, other than motor vehicles, mobile homes, and manufactured homes, by churches, organizations exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or nonprofit organizations operated exclusively for charitable purposes as defined in division (B)(12) of this section, provided that the number of days on which such tangible personal property or services, other than items never subject to the tax, are sold does not exceed six in any calendar year, except as otherwise provided in division (B)(9)(b) of this section. If the number of days on which such sales are made exceeds six in any calendar year, the church or organization shall be considered to be engaged in business and all subsequent sales by it shall be subject to the tax. In counting the number of days, all sales by groups within a church or within an organization shall be considered to be sales of that church or organization. (b) The limitation on the number of days on which tax-exempt sales may be made by a church or organization under division (B)(9)(a) of this section does not apply to sales made by student clubs and other groups of students of a primary or secondary school, or a parent-teacher association, booster group, or similar organization that raises money to support or fund curricular or extracurricular activities of a primary or secondary school. (c) Divisions (B)(9)(a) and (b) of this section do not apply to sales by a noncommercial educational radio or television broadcasting station. (10) Sales not within the taxing power of this state under the Constitution or laws of the United States or the Constitution of this state including either of the following: (a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or temporary structures, including material and equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the United States takes title to, or permanent or temporary possession of, such tangible personal property for use by the United States including for use by the general public thereof; (b) Sales of services by construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the United States, including the general public thereof, receives the benefit of such services. As used in divisions (B)(10)(a) and (b) of this section, "temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, and pavement. (11) Except for transactions that are sales under division (B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, the transportation of persons or property, unless the transportation is by a private investigation and security service; (12) Sales of tangible personal property or services to churches, to organizations exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and to any other nonprofit organizations operated exclusively for charitable purposes in this state, no part of the net income of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, and no substantial part of the activities of which consists of carrying on propaganda or otherwise attempting to influence legislation; sales to offices administering one or more homes for the aged or one or more hospital facilities exempt under section 140.08 of the Revised Code; and sales to organizations described in division (D) of section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. "Charitable purposes" means the relief of poverty; the improvement of health through the alleviation of illness, disease, or injury; the operation of an organization exclusively for the provision of professional, laundry, printing, and purchasing services to hospitals or charitable institutions; the operation of a home for the aged, as defined in section 5701.13 of the Revised Code; the operation of a radio or television broadcasting station that is licensed by the federal communications commission as a noncommercial educational radio or television station; the operation of a nonprofit animal adoption service or a county humane society; the promotion of education by an institution of learning that maintains a faculty of qualified instructors, teaches regular continuous courses of study, and confers a recognized diploma upon completion of a specific curriculum; the operation of a parent-teacher association, booster group, or similar organization primarily engaged in the promotion and support of the curricular or extracurricular activities of a primary or secondary school; the operation of a community or area center in which presentations in music, dramatics, the arts, and related fields are made in order to foster public interest and education therein; the production of performances in music, dramatics, and the arts; or the promotion of education by an organization engaged in carrying on research in, or the dissemination of, scientific and technological knowledge and information primarily for the public. Nothing in this division shall be deemed to exempt sales to any organization for use in the operation or carrying on of a trade or business, or sales to a home for the aged for use in the operation of independent living facilities as defined in division (A) of section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. (13) Building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property under a construction contract with this state or a political subdivision of this state, or with the United States government or any of its agencies; building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property that are accepted for ownership by this state or any of its political subdivisions, or by the United States government or any of its agencies at the time of completion of the structures or improvements; building and construction materials sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a horticulture structure or livestock structure for a person engaged in the business of horticulture or producing livestock; building materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into a house of public worship or religious education, or a building used exclusively for charitable purposes under a construction contract with an organization whose purpose is as described in division (B)(12) of this section; building materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into a building under a construction contract with an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 when the building is to be used exclusively for the organization's exempt purposes; tangible personal property sold for incorporation into the construction of a sports facility under section 307.696 of the Revised Code; building and construction materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into real property outside this state if such materials and services, when sold to a construction contractor in the state in which the real property is located for incorporation into real property in that state, would be exempt from a tax on sales levied by that state; building and construction materials for incorporation into a transportation facility pursuant to a public-private agreement entered into under sections 5501.70 to 5501.83 of the Revised Code; until one calendar year after the construction of a convention center that qualifies for property tax exemption under section 5709.084 of the Revised Code is completed, building and construction materials and services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation into the real property comprising that convention center; and building and construction materials sold for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property that is used primarily as, or primarily in support of, a manufacturing facility or research and development facility and that is to be owned by a megaproject operator upon completion and located at the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated. This division does not apply to building and construction materials and services sold to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or improvement to real property under a construction contract with a port authority if the contract is subject to section 4582.72 of the Revised Code but approval from the appropriate board of county commissioners, as required by that section, has not been obtained. (14) Sales of ships or vessels or rail rolling stock used or to be used principally in interstate or foreign commerce, and repairs, alterations, fuel, and lubricants for such ships or vessels or rail rolling stock; (15) Sales to persons primarily engaged in any of the activities mentioned in division (B)(42)(a), (g)(f), or (h)(g) of this section, to persons engaged in making retail sales, or to persons who purchase for sale from a manufacturer tangible personal property that was produced by the manufacturer in accordance with specific designs provided by the purchaser, of packages, including material, labels, and parts for packages, and of machinery, equipment, and material for use primarily in packaging tangible personal property produced for sale, including any machinery, equipment, and supplies used to make labels or packages, to prepare packages or products for labeling, or to label packages or products, by or on the order of the person doing the packaging, or sold at retail. "Packages" includes bags, baskets, cartons, crates, boxes, cans, bottles, bindings, wrappings, and other similar devices and containers, but does not include motor vehicles or bulk tanks, trailers, or similar devices attached to motor vehicles. "Packaging" means placing in a package. Division (B)(15) of this section does not apply to persons engaged in highway transportation for hire. (16) Sales of food to persons using supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits to purchase the food. As used in this division, "food" has the same meaning as in 7 U.S.C. 2012 and federal regulations adopted pursuant to the Food and Nutrition Act of 2008. (17) Sales to persons engaged in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture, of tangible personal property for use or consumption primarily in the production by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture of other tangible personal property for use or consumption primarily in the production of tangible personal property for sale by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture; or material and parts for incorporation into any such tangible personal property for use or consumption in production; and of tangible personal property for such use or consumption in the conditioning or holding of products produced by and for such use, consumption, or sale by persons engaged in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture, except where such property is incorporated into real property; (18) Sales of drugs for a human being that may be dispensed only pursuant to a prescription; insulin as recognized in the official United States pharmacopoeia; urine and blood testing materials when used by diabetics or persons with hypoglycemia to test for glucose or acetone; hypodermic syringes and needles when used by diabetics for insulin injections; epoetin alfa when purchased for use in the treatment of persons with medical disease; hospital beds when purchased by hospitals, nursing homes, or other medical facilities; and medical oxygen and medical oxygen-dispensing equipment when purchased by hospitals, nursing homes, or other medical facilities; (19) Sales of prosthetic devices, durable medical equipment for home use, or mobility enhancing equipment, when made pursuant to a prescription and when such devices or equipment are for use by a human being. (20) Sales of emergency and fire protection vehicles and equipment to nonprofit organizations for use solely in providing fire protection and emergency services, including trauma care and emergency medical services, for political subdivisions of the state; (21) Sales of tangible personal property manufactured in this state, if sold by the manufacturer in this state to a retailer for use in the retail business of the retailer outside of this state and if possession is taken from the manufacturer by the purchaser within this state for the sole purpose of immediately removing the same from this state in a vehicle owned by the purchaser; (22) Sales of services provided by the state or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities, institutions, or authorities, or by governmental entities of the state or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities, institutions, or authorities; (23) Sales of motor vehicles to nonresidents of this state under the circumstances described in division (B) of section 5739.029 of the Revised Code; (24) Sales to persons engaged in the preparation of eggs for sale of tangible personal property used or consumed directly in such preparation, including such tangible personal property used for cleaning, sanitizing, preserving, grading, sorting, and classifying by size; packages, including material and parts for packages, and machinery, equipment, and material for use in packaging eggs for sale; and handling and transportation equipment and parts therefor, except motor vehicles licensed to operate on public highways, used in intraplant or interplant transfers or shipment of eggs in the process of preparation for sale, when the plant or plants within or between which such transfers or shipments occur are operated by the same person. "Packages" includes containers, cases, baskets, flats, fillers, filler flats, cartons, closure materials, labels, and labeling materials, and "packaging" means placing therein. (25)(a) Sales of water to a consumer for residential use; (b) Sales of water by a nonprofit corporation engaged exclusively in the treatment, distribution, and sale of water to consumers, if such water is delivered to consumers through pipes or tubing. (26) Fees charged for inspection or reinspection of motor vehicles under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code; (27) Sales to persons licensed to conduct a food service operation pursuant to section 3717.43 of the Revised Code, of tangible personal property primarily used directly for the following: (a) To prepare food for human consumption for sale; (b) To preserve food that has been or will be prepared for human consumption for sale by the food service operator, not including tangible personal property used to display food for selection by the consumer; (c) To clean tangible personal property used to prepare or serve food for human consumption for sale. (28) Sales of animals by nonprofit animal adoption services or county humane societies; (29) Sales of services to a corporation described in division (A) of section 5709.72 of the Revised Code, and sales of tangible personal property that qualifies for exemption from taxation under section 5709.72 of the Revised Code; (30) Sales and installation of agricultural land tile, as defined in division (B)(5)(a) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (31) Sales and erection or installation of portable grain bins, as defined in division (B)(5)(b) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (32) The sale, lease, repair, and maintenance of, parts for, or items attached to or incorporated in, motor vehicles that are primarily used for transporting tangible personal property belonging to others by a person engaged in highway transportation for hire, except for packages and packaging used for the transportation of tangible personal property; (33) Sales to the state headquarters of any veterans' organization in this state that is either incorporated and issued a charter by the congress of the United States or is recognized by the United States veterans administration, for use by the headquarters; (34) Sales to a telecommunications service vendor, mobile telecommunications service vendor, or satellite broadcasting service vendor of tangible personal property and services used directly and primarily in transmitting, receiving, switching, or recording any interactive, one- or two-way electromagnetic communications, including voice, image, data, and information, through the use of any medium, including, but not limited to, poles, wires, cables, switching equipment, computers, and record storage devices and media, and component parts for the tangible personal property. The exemption provided in this division shall be in lieu of all other exemptions under division (B)(42)(a) or (n) of this section to which the vendor may otherwise be entitled, based upon the use of the thing purchased in providing the telecommunications, mobile telecommunications, or satellite broadcasting service. (35)(a) Sales where the purpose of the consumer is to use or consume the things transferred in making retail sales and consisting of newspaper inserts, catalogues, coupons, flyers, gift certificates, or other advertising material that prices and describes tangible personal property offered for retail sale. (b) Sales to direct marketing vendors of preliminary materials such as photographs, artwork, and typesetting that will be used in printing advertising material; and of printed matter that offers free merchandise or chances to win sweepstake prizes and that is mailed to potential customers with advertising material described in division (B)(35)(a) of this section; (c) Sales of equipment such as telephones, computers, facsimile machines, and similar tangible personal property primarily used to accept orders for direct marketing retail sales. (d) Sales of automatic food vending machines that preserve food with a shelf life of forty-five days or less by refrigeration and dispense it to the consumer. For purposes of division (B)(35) of this section, "direct marketing" means the method of selling where consumers order tangible personal property by United States mail, delivery service, or telecommunication and the vendor delivers or ships the tangible personal property sold to the consumer from a warehouse, catalogue distribution center, or similar fulfillment facility by means of the United States mail, delivery service, or common carrier(35) Sales of strollers meant for transporting children from infancy to about thirty-six months of age that meet the United States consumer product safety commission safety standard for carriages and strollers under 16 C.F.R. 1227.2. (36) Sales to a person engaged in the business of horticulture or producing livestock of materials to be incorporated into a horticulture structure or livestock structure; (37) Sales of personal computers, computer monitors, computer keyboards, modems, and other peripheral computer equipment to an individual who is licensed or certified to teach in an elementary or a secondary school in this state for use by that individual in preparation for teaching elementary or secondary school students; (38) Sales of tangible personal property that is not required to be registered or licensed under the laws of this state to a citizen of a foreign nation that is not a citizen of the United States, provided the property is delivered to a person in this state that is not a related member of the purchaser, is physically present in this state for the sole purpose of temporary storage and package consolidation, and is subsequently delivered to the purchaser at a delivery address in a foreign nation. As used in division (B)(38) of this section, "related member" has the same meaning as in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code, and "temporary storage" means the storage of tangible personal property for a period of not more than sixty days. (39) Sales of used manufactured homes and used mobile homes, as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code, made on or after January 1, 2000; (40) Sales of tangible personal property and services to a provider of electricity used or consumed directly and primarily in generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity for use by others, including property that is or is to be incorporated into and will become a part of the consumer's production, transmission, or distribution system and that retains its classification as tangible personal property after incorporation; fuel or power used in the production, transmission, or distribution of electricity; energy conversion equipment as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; and tangible personal property and services used in the repair and maintenance of the production, transmission, or distribution system, including only those motor vehicles as are specially designed and equipped for such use. The exemption provided in this division shall be in lieu of all other exemptions in division (B)(42)(a) or (n)(m) of this section to which a provider of electricity may otherwise be entitled based on the use of the tangible personal property or service purchased in generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity. (41) Sales to a person providing services under division (B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code of tangible personal property and services used directly and primarily in providing taxable services under that section. (42) Sales where the purpose of the purchaser is to do any of the following: (a) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or a part into tangible personal property to be produced for sale by manufacturing, assembling, processing, or refining; or to use or consume the thing transferred directly in producing tangible personal property for sale by mining, including, without limitation, the extraction from the earth of all substances that are classed geologically as minerals, or directly in the rendition of a public utility service, except that the sales tax levied by this section shall be collected upon all meals, drinks, and food for human consumption sold when transporting persons. This paragraph does not exempt from "retail sale" or "sales at retail" the sale of tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property. (b) To hold the thing transferred as security for the performance of an obligation of the vendor; (c) To resell, hold, use, or consume the thing transferred as evidence of a contract of insurance; (d) To use or consume the thing directly in commercial fishing; (e) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or a part into, or to use or consume the thing transferred directly in the production of, magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications; (f) To use or consume the thing transferred in the production and preparation in suitable condition for market and sale of printed, imprinted, overprinted, lithographic, multilithic, blueprinted, photostatic, or other productions or reproductions of written or graphic matter; (g) To use the thing transferred, as described in section 5739.011 of the Revised Code, primarily in a manufacturing operation to produce tangible personal property for sale; (h)(g) To use the benefit of a warranty, maintenance or service contract, or similar agreement, as described in division (B)(7) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, to repair or maintain tangible personal property, if all of the property that is the subject of the warranty, contract, or agreement would not be subject to the tax imposed by this section; (i)(h) To use the thing transferred as qualified research and development equipment; (j)(i) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in storing, transporting, mailing, or otherwise handling purchased sales inventory in a warehouse, distribution center, or similar facility when the inventory is primarily distributed outside this state to retail stores of the person who owns or controls the warehouse, distribution center, or similar facility, to retail stores of an affiliated group of which that person is a member, or by means of direct marketing. This division does not apply to motor vehicles registered for operation on the public highways. As used in this division, "affiliated group" has the same meaning as in division (B)(3)(e) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code and "direct marketing" has the same meaning as in division (B)(35) of this sectionmeans the method of selling where consumers order tangible personal property by United States mail, delivery service, or telecommunication and the vendor delivers or ships the tangible personal property sold to the consumer from a warehouse, catalogue distribution center, or similar fulfillment facility by means of the United States mail, delivery service, or common carrier. (k)(j) To use or consume the thing transferred to fulfill a contractual obligation incurred by a warrantor pursuant to a warranty provided as a part of the price of the tangible personal property sold or by a vendor of a warranty, maintenance or service contract, or similar agreement the provision of which is defined as a sale under division (B)(7) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code; (l)(k) To use or consume the thing transferred in the production of a newspaper for distribution to the public; (m)(l) To use tangible personal property to perform a service listed in division (B)(3) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, if the property is or is to be permanently transferred to the consumer of the service as an integral part of the performance of the service; (n)(m) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in producing tangible personal property for sale by farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. Persons engaged in rendering farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture services for others are deemed engaged primarily in farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. This paragraph does not exempt from "retail sale" or "sales at retail" the sale of tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property. (o) To use or consume the thing transferred in acquiring, formatting, editing, storing, and disseminating data or information by electronic publishing; (p) To provide the thing transferred to the owner or lessee of a motor vehicle that is being repaired or serviced, if the thing transferred is a rented motor vehicle and the purchaser is reimbursed for the cost of the rented motor vehicle by a manufacturer, warrantor, or provider of a maintenance, service, or other similar contract or agreement, with respect to the motor vehicle that is being repaired or serviced; (q) (n) To use or consume the thing transferred directly in production of crude oil and natural gas for sale. Persons engaged in rendering production services for others are deemed engaged in production. As used in division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(n) of this section, "production" means operations and tangible personal property directly used to expose and evaluate an underground reservoir that may contain hydrocarbon resources, prepare the wellbore for production, and lift and control all substances yielded by the reservoir to the surface of the earth. (i) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(n) of this section, the "thing transferred" includes, but is not limited to, any of the following: (I) Services provided in the construction of permanent access roads, services provided in the construction of the well site, and services provided in the construction of temporary impoundments; (II) Equipment and rigging used for the specific purpose of creating with integrity a wellbore pathway to underground reservoirs; (III) Drilling and workover services used to work within a subsurface wellbore, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (IV) Casing, tubulars, and float and centralizing equipment; (V) Trailers to which production equipment is attached; (VI) Well completion services, including cementing of casing, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (VII) Wireline evaluation, mud logging, and perforation services, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services; (VIII) Reservoir stimulation, hydraulic fracturing, and acidizing services, and tangible personal property directly used in providing such services, including all material pumped downhole; (IX) Pressure pumping equipment; (X) Artificial lift systems equipment; (XI) Wellhead equipment and well site equipment used to separate, stabilize, and control hydrocarbon phases and produced water; (XII) Tangible personal property directly used to control production equipment. (ii) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(n) of this section, the "thing transferred" does not include any of the following: (I) Tangible personal property used primarily in the exploration and production of any mineral resource regulated under Chapter 1509. of the Revised Code other than oil or gas; (II) Tangible personal property used primarily in storing, holding, or delivering solutions or chemicals used in well stimulation as defined in section 1509.01 of the Revised Code; (III) Tangible personal property used primarily in preparing, installing, or reclaiming foundations for drilling or pumping equipment or well stimulation material tanks; (IV) Tangible personal property used primarily in transporting, delivering, or removing equipment to or from the well site or storing such equipment before its use at the well site; (V) Tangible personal property used primarily in gathering operations occurring off the well site, including gathering pipelines transporting hydrocarbon gas or liquids away from a crude oil or natural gas production facility; (VI) Tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real property; (VII) Well site fencing, lighting, or security systems; (VIII) Communication devices or services; (IX) Office supplies; (X) Trailers used as offices or lodging; (XI) Motor vehicles of any kind; (XII) Tangible personal property used primarily for the storage of drilling byproducts and fuel not used for production; (XIII) Tangible personal property used primarily as a safety device; (XIV) Data collection or monitoring devices; (XV) Access ladders, stairs, or platforms attached to storage tanks. The enumeration of tangible personal property in division (B)(42)(q)(ii)(B)(42)(n)(ii) of this section is not intended to be exhaustive, and any tangible personal property not so enumerated shall not necessarily be construed to be a "thing transferred" for the purposes of division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(n) of this section. The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules under sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code that the commissioner deems necessary to administer division (B)(42)(q)(B)(42)(n) of this section. As used in division (B)(42) of this section, "thing" includes all transactions included in divisions (B)(3)(a), (b), and (e) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code. (43) Sales conducted through a coin operated device that activates vacuum equipment or equipment that dispenses water, whether or not in combination with soap or other cleaning agents or wax, to the consumer for the consumer's use on the premises in washing, cleaning, or waxing a motor vehicle, provided no other personal property or personal service is provided as part of the transaction. (44) Sales of replacement and modification parts for engines, airframes, instruments, and interiors in, and paint for, aircraft used primarily in a fractional aircraft ownership program, and sales of services for the repair, modification, and maintenance of such aircraft, and machinery, equipment, and supplies primarily used to provide those services. (45) Sales of telecommunications service that is used directly and primarily to perform the functions of a call center. As used in this division, "call center" means any physical location where telephone calls are placed or received in high volume for the purpose of making sales, marketing, customer service, technical support, or other specialized business activity, and that employs at least fifty individuals that engage in call center activities on a full-time basis, or sufficient individuals to fill fifty full-time equivalent positionsThe fee imposed by section 3743.22 of the Revised Code, if it is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given by the vendor to the consumer for a retail sale made in this state. (46) Sales by a telecommunications service vendor of 900 service to a subscriber. This division does not apply to information services. (47) Sales of value-added non-voice data service. This division does not apply to any similar service that is not otherwise a telecommunications service. (48) Sales of feminine hygiene products. (49) Sales of materials, parts, equipment, or engines used in the repair or maintenance of aircraft or avionics systems of such aircraft, and sales of repair, remodeling, replacement, or maintenance services in this state performed on aircraft or on an aircraft's avionics, engine, or component materials or parts. As used in division (B)(49) of this section, "aircraft" means aircraft of more than six thousand pounds maximum certified takeoff weight or used exclusively in general aviation. (50) Sales of full flight simulators that are used for pilot or flight-crew training, sales of repair or replacement parts or components, and sales of repair or maintenance services for such full flight simulators. "Full flight simulator" means a replica of a specific type, or make, model, and series of aircraft cockpit. It includes the assemblage of equipment and computer programs necessary to represent aircraft operations in ground and flight conditions, a visual system providing an out-of-the-cockpit view, and a system that provides cues at least equivalent to those of a three-degree-of-freedom motion system, and has the full range of capabilities of the systems installed in the device as described in appendices A and B of part 60 of chapter 1 of title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (51) Any transfer or lease of tangible personal property between the state and JobsOhio in accordance with section 4313.02 of the Revised Code. (52)(a) Sales to a qualifying corporation. (b) As used in division (B)(52) of this section: (i) "Qualifying corporation" means a nonprofit corporation organized in this state that leases from an eligible county land, buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements to the land that are part of or used in a public recreational facility used by a major league professional athletic team or a class A to class AAA minor league affiliate of a major league professional athletic team for a significant portion of the team's home schedule, provided the following apply: (I) The facility is leased from the eligible county pursuant to a lease that requires substantially all of the revenue from the operation of the business or activity conducted by the nonprofit corporation at the facility in excess of operating costs, capital expenditures, and reserves to be paid to the eligible county at least once per calendar year. (II) Upon dissolution and liquidation of the nonprofit corporation, all of its net assets are distributable to the board of commissioners of the eligible county from which the corporation leases the facility. (ii) "Eligible county" has the same meaning as in section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (53) Sales to or by a cable service provider, video service provider, or radio or television broadcast station regulated by the federal government of cable service or programming, video service or programming, audio service or programming, or electronically transferred digital audiovisual or audio work. As used in division (B)(53) of this section, "cable service" and "cable service provider" have the same meanings as in section 1332.01 of the Revised Code, and "video service," "video service provider," and "video programming" have the same meanings as in section 1332.21 of the Revised Code. (54) Sales of a digital audio work electronically transferred for delivery through use of a machine, such as a juke box, that does all of the following: (a) Accepts direct payments to operate; (b) Automatically plays a selected digital audio work for a single play upon receipt of a payment described in division (B)(54)(a) of this section; (c) Operates exclusively for the purpose of playing digital audio works in a commercial establishment. (55)(a) Sales of the following occurring on the first Friday of August and the following Saturday and Sunday of any year, except in 2024 or any subsequent year in which a sales tax holiday is held pursuant to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code: (i) An item of clothing, the price of which is seventy-five dollars or less; (ii) An item of school supplies, the price of which is twenty dollars or less; (iii) An item of school instructional material, the price of which is twenty dollars or less. (b) As used in division (B)(55) of this section: (i) "Clothing" means all human wearing apparel suitable for general use. "Clothing" includes, but is not limited to, aprons, household and shop; athletic supporters; baby receiving blankets; bathing suits and caps; beach capes and coats; belts and suspenders; boots; coats and jackets; costumes; diapers, children and adult, including disposable diapers; earmuffs; footlets; formal wear; garters and garter belts; girdles; gloves and mittens for general use; hats and caps; hosiery; insoles for shoes; lab coats; neckties; overshoes; pantyhose; rainwear; rubber pants; sandals; scarves; shoes and shoe laces; slippers; sneakers; socks and stockings; steel-toed shoes; underwear; uniforms, athletic and nonathletic; and wedding apparel. "Clothing" does not include items purchased for use in a trade or business; clothing accessories or equipment; protective equipment; sports or recreational equipment; belt buckles sold separately; costume masks sold separately; patches and emblems sold separately; sewing equipment and supplies including, but not limited to, knitting needles, patterns, pins, scissors, sewing machines, sewing needles, tape measures, and thimbles; and sewing materials that become part of "clothing" including, but not limited to, buttons, fabric, lace, thread, yarn, and zippers. (ii) "School supplies" means items commonly used by a student in a course of study. "School supplies" includes only the following items: binders; book bags; calculators; cellophane tape; blackboard chalk; compasses; composition books; crayons; erasers; folders, expandable, pocket, plastic, and manila; glue, paste, and paste sticks; highlighters; index cards; index card boxes; legal pads; lunch boxes; markers; notebooks; paper, loose-leaf ruled notebook paper, copy paper, graph paper, tracing paper, manila paper, colored paper, poster board, and construction paper; pencil boxes and other school supply boxes; pencil sharpeners; pencils; pens; protractors; rulers; scissors; and writing tablets. "School supplies" does not include any item purchased for use in a trade or business. (iii) "School instructional material" means written material commonly used by a student in a course of study as a reference and to learn the subject being taught. "School instructional material" includes only the following items: reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks, and workbooks. "School instructional material" does not include any material purchased for use in a trade or business. (56)(a) Sales of adult diapers or incontinence underpads sold pursuant to a prescription, for the benefit of a medicaid recipient with a diagnosis of incontinence, and by a medicaid provider that maintains a valid provider agreement under section 5164.30 of the Revised Code with the department of medicaid, provided that the medicaid program covers diapers or incontinence underpads as an incontinence garment. (b) As used in division (B)(56)(a) of this section, "incontinence underpad" means an absorbent product, not worn on the body, designed to protect furniture or other tangible personal property from soiling or damage due to human incontinence. (57) Sales of investment metal bullion and investment coins. "Investment metal bullion" means any bullion described in section 408(m)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, regardless of whether that bullion is in the physical possession of a trustee. "Investment coin" means any coin composed primarily of gold, silver, platinum, or palladium. (58) Sales of tangible personal property used primarily for any of the following purposes by a megaproject operator at the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated: (a) To store, transmit, convey, distribute, recycle, circulate, or clean water, steam, or other gases used in or produced as a result of manufacturing activity, including items that support or aid in the operation of such property; (b) To clean or prepare inventory, at any stage of storage or production, or equipment used in a manufacturing activity, including chemicals, solvents, catalysts, soaps, and other items that support or aid in the operation of property; (c) To regulate, treat, filter, condition, improve, clean, maintain, or monitor environmental conditions within areas where manufacturing activities take place; (d) To handle, transport, or convey inventory during production or manufacturing. (59) Documentary services charges imposed pursuant to section 4517.261 or 4781.24 of the Revised Code. (60) Sales of children's diapers. (61) Sales of therapeutic or preventative creams and wipes marketed primarily for use on the skin of children. (62) Sales of a child restraint device or booster seat that meets the national highway traffic safety administration standard for child restraint systems under 49 C.F.R. 571.213. (63) Sales of cribs intended to provide sleeping accommodations for children that comply with the United States consumer product safety commission's safety standard for full-size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1219 or the commission's safety standard for non-full-size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1220. (64) Sales of strollers meant for transporting children from infancy to about thirty-six months of age that meet the United States consumer product safety commission safety standard for carriages and strollers under 16 C.F.R. 1227.2. (65) The fee imposed by section 3743.22 of the Revised Code, if it is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, or similar document given by the vendor to the consumer for a retail sale made in this state. (66) Sales of eligible tangible personal property occurring during the period of a sales tax holiday held pursuant to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code. (C) For the purpose of the proper administration of this chapter, and to prevent the evasion of the tax, it is presumed that all sales made in this state are subject to the tax until the contrary is established. (D) The tax collected by the vendor from the consumer under this chapter is not part of the price, but is a tax collection for the benefit of the state, and of counties levying an additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.021 or 5739.026 of the Revised Code and of transit authorities levying an additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.023 of the Revised Code. Except for the discount authorized under section 5739.12 of the Revised Code and the effects of any rounding pursuant to section 5703.055 of the Revised Code, no person other than the state or such a county or transit authority shall derive any benefit from the collection or payment of the tax levied by this section or section 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5739.03. (A) Except as provided in section 5739.05 or section 5739.051 of the Revised Code, the tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code shall be paid by the consumer to the vendor, and each vendor shall collect from the consumer, as a trustee for the state of Ohio, the full and exact amount of the tax payable on each taxable sale, in the manner and at the times provided as follows: (1) If the price is, at or prior to the provision of the service or the delivery of possession of the thing sold to the consumer, paid in currency passed from hand to hand by the consumer or the consumer's agent to the vendor or the vendor's agent, the vendor or the vendor's agent shall collect the tax with and at the same time as the price; (2) If the price is otherwise paid or to be paid, the vendor or the vendor's agent shall, at or prior to the provision of the service or the delivery of possession of the thing sold to the consumer, charge the tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code to the account of the consumer, which amount shall be collected by the vendor from the consumer in addition to the price. Such sale shall be reported on and the amount of the tax applicable thereto shall be remitted with the return for the period in which the sale is made, and the amount of the tax shall become a legal charge in favor of the vendor and against the consumer. (B)(1)(a) If any sale is claimed to be exempt under division (E) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code or under section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, with the exception of divisions (B)(1) to (11), (28), (48), (55), (59), or (66)(62) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the consumer must provide to the vendor, and the vendor must obtain from the consumer, a certificate specifying the reason that the sale is not legally subject to the tax. The certificate shall be in such form, and shall be provided either in a hard copy form or electronic form, as the tax commissioner prescribes. (b) A vendor that obtains a fully completed exemption certificate from a consumer is relieved of liability for collecting and remitting tax on any sale covered by that certificate. If it is determined the exemption was improperly claimed, the consumer shall be liable for any tax due on that sale under section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 or Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code. Relief under this division from liability does not apply to any of the following: (i) A vendor that fraudulently fails to collect tax; (ii) A vendor that solicits consumers to participate in the unlawful claim of an exemption; (iii) A vendor that accepts an exemption certificate from a consumer that claims an exemption based on who purchases or who sells property or a service, when the subject of the transaction sought to be covered by the exemption certificate is actually received by the consumer at a location operated by the vendor in this state, and this state has posted to its web site an exemption certificate form that clearly and affirmatively indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in this state; (iv) A vendor that accepts an exemption certificate from a consumer who claims a multiple points of use exemption under division (D) of section 5739.033 of the Revised Code, if the item purchased is tangible personal property, other than prewritten computer software. (2) The vendor shall maintain records, including exemption certificates, of all sales on which a consumer has claimed an exemption, and provide them to the tax commissioner on request. (3) The tax commissioner may establish an identification system whereby the commissioner issues an identification number to a consumer that is exempt from payment of the tax. The consumer must present the number to the vendor, if any sale is claimed to be exempt as provided in this section. (4) If no certificate is provided or obtained within ninety days after the date on which such sale is consummated, it shall be presumed that the tax applies. Failure to have so provided or obtained a certificate shall not preclude a vendor, within one hundred twenty days after the tax commissioner gives written notice of intent to levy an assessment, from either establishing that the sale is not subject to the tax, or obtaining, in good faith, a fully completed exemption certificate. (5) Certificates need not be obtained nor provided where the identity of the consumer is such that the transaction is never subject to the tax imposed or where the item of tangible personal property sold or the service provided is never subject to the tax imposed, regardless of use, or when the sale is in interstate commerce. (6) If a transaction is claimed to be exempt under division (B)(13) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the contractor shall obtain certification of the claimed exemption from the contractee. This certification shall be in addition to an exemption certificate provided by the contractor to the vendor. A contractee that provides a certification under this division shall be deemed to be the consumer of all items purchased by the contractor under the claim of exemption, if it is subsequently determined that the exemption is not properly claimed. The certification shall be in such form as the tax commissioner prescribes. (7) If a transaction is claimed to be exempt under division (B)(13) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the person that leases a sports facility, as defined in section 307.696 of the Revised Code, wholly owned by a county may provide and sign, on behalf of the county, an exemption certificate required under this section for that exemption. (C) As used in this division, "contractee" means a person who seeks to enter or enters into a contract or agreement with a contractor or vendor for the construction of real property or for the sale and installation onto real property of tangible personal property. Any contractor or vendor may request from any contractee a certification of what portion of the property to be transferred under such contract or agreement is to be incorporated into the realty and what portion will retain its status as tangible personal property after installation is completed. The contractor or vendor shall request the certification by certified mail delivered to the contractee, return receipt requested. Upon receipt of such request and prior to entering into the contract or agreement, the contractee shall provide to the contractor or vendor a certification sufficiently detailed to enable the contractor or vendor to ascertain the resulting classification of all materials purchased or fabricated by the contractor or vendor and transferred to the contractee. This requirement applies to a contractee regardless of whether the contractee holds a direct payment permit under section 5739.031 of the Revised Code or provides to the contractor or vendor an exemption certificate as provided under this section. For the purposes of the taxes levied by this chapter and Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code, the contractor or vendor may in good faith rely on the contractee's certification. Notwithstanding division (B) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, if the tax commissioner determines that certain property certified by the contractee as tangible personal property pursuant to this division is, in fact, real property, the contractee shall be considered to be the consumer of all materials so incorporated into that real property and shall be liable for the applicable tax, and the contractor or vendor shall be excused from any liability on those materials. If a contractee fails to provide such certification upon the request of the contractor or vendor, the contractor or vendor shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code without the certification. If the tax commissioner determines that such compliance has been performed in good faith and that certain property treated as tangible personal property by the contractor or vendor is, in fact, real property, the contractee shall be considered to be the consumer of all materials so incorporated into that real property and shall be liable for the applicable tax, and the construction contractor or vendor shall be excused from any liability on those materials. This division does not apply to any contract or agreement where the tax commissioner determines as a fact that a certification under this division was made solely on the decision or advice of the contractor or vendor. (D) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, whenever the total rate of tax imposed under this chapter is increased after the date after a construction contract is entered into, the contractee shall reimburse the construction contractor for any additional tax paid on tangible property consumed or services received pursuant to the contract. (E) A vendor who files a petition for reassessment contesting the assessment of tax on sales for which the vendor obtained no valid exemption certificates and for which the vendor failed to establish that the sales were properly not subject to the tax during the one-hundred-twenty-day period allowed under division (B) of this section, may present to the tax commissioner additional evidence to prove that the sales were properly subject to a claim of exception or exemption. The vendor shall file such evidence within ninety days of the receipt by the vendor of the notice of assessment, except that, upon application and for reasonable cause, the period for submitting such evidence shall be extended thirty days. The commissioner shall consider such additional evidence in reaching the final determination on the assessment and petition for reassessment. (F) Whenever a vendor refunds the price, minus any separately stated delivery charge, of an item of tangible personal property on which the tax imposed under this chapter has been paid, the vendor shall also refund the amount of tax paid, minus the amount of tax attributable to the delivery charge. Sec. 5739.07. (A) When, pursuant to this chapter, a vendor has paid taxes to the tax commissioner or the commissioner's agent, the commissioner shall refund to the vendor the amount of taxes paid, and any penalties assessed with respect to such taxes, if the vendor has refunded to the consumer the full amount of taxes the consumer paid illegally or erroneously or if the vendor has illegally or erroneously billed the consumer but has not collected the taxes from the consumer. (B) When, pursuant to this chapter, a consumer has paid taxes directly to the tax commissioner or the commissioner's agent, and the payment or assessment was illegal or erroneous, the commissioner shall refund to the consumer the full amount of illegal or erroneous taxes paid and any penalties assessed with respect to such taxes. (C) The commissioner shall refund to the consumer amounts paid illegally or erroneously to a vendor only if: (1) The commissioner has not refunded the tax to the vendor and the vendor has not refunded the tax to the consumer; or (2) The consumer has received a refund from a manufacturer or other person, other than the vendor, of the full purchase price, but not the tax, paid to the vendor in settlement of a complaint by the consumer about the property or service purchased. The commissioner may require the consumer to obtain or the vendor to provide a written statement confirming that the vendor has not refunded the tax to the consumer and has not filed an application for refund of the tax with the commissioner. (D) Subject to division (E) of this section, an application for refund shall be filed with the tax commissioner on the form prescribed by the commissioner within four years from the date of the illegal or erroneous payment, unless the vendor or consumer waives the time limitation under division (A)(3) of section 5739.16 of the Revised Code. If the time limitation is waived, the refund application period shall be extended for the same period as the waiver. (E) An application for refund shall be filed in accordance with division (D) of this section unless a person is subject to an assessment that is subject to the time limit of division (B) of section 5703.58 of the Revised Code for amounts not reported and paid between the four-year time limit described in division (D) of this section and the seven-year limit described in division (B) of section 5703.58 of the Revised Code, in which case the person may file an application within six months after the date the assessment is issued. Any refund allowed under this division shall not exceed the amount of the assessment due for the same period. (F) On the filing of an application for a refund, the commissioner shall determine the amount of refund to which the applicant is entitled. If the amount is not less than that claimed, the commissioner shall certify that amount to the director of budget and management and the treasurer of state for payment from the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised Code. If the amount is less than that claimed, the commissioner shall proceed in accordance with section 5703.70 of the Revised Code. (G) When a refund is granted under this section, it shall include interest thereon as provided by section 5739.132 of the Revised Code, except that no such interest shall be granted when a refund is granted for illegal or erroneous payments made pursuant to a direct payment permit issued under section 5739.031 of the Revised Code or division (I) of section 122.175 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5739.09. (A)(1) A board of county commissioners may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, levy an excise tax not to exceed three per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The board shall establish all regulations necessary to provide for the administration and allocation of the tax. The regulations may prescribe the time for payment of the tax, and may provide for the imposition of a penalty or interest, or both, for late payments, provided that the penalty does not exceed ten per cent of the amount of tax due, and the rate at which interest accrues does not exceed the rate per annum prescribed pursuant to section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the regulations shall provide, after deducting the real and actual costs of administering the tax, for the return to each municipal corporation or township that does not levy an excise tax on the transactions, a uniform percentage of the tax collected in the municipal corporation or in the unincorporated portion of the township from each transaction, not to exceed thirty-three and one-third per cent. Except as provided in this section, the remainder of the revenue arising from the tax shall be deposited in a separate fund and shall be spent either (a) to make contributions to the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the county, including a pledge and contribution of any portion of the remainder pursuant to an agreement authorized by section 307.678 or 307.695 of the Revised Code or (b) to pay, if authorized in the regulations, for public safety services in a resort area designated under section 5739.101 of the Revised Code. (2) If the board of county commissioners of an eligible county as defined in section 307.678 or 307.695 of the Revised Code adopts a resolution amending a resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide that revenue from the tax shall be used by the board as described in either division (D) of section 307.678 or division (H) of section 307.695 of the Revised Code, the remainder of the revenue shall be used as described in the resolution making that amendment. (3) Except as provided in division (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), (H), (I), (J), (K), or (Q) of this section, on and after May 10, 1994, a board of county commissioners may not levy an excise tax pursuant to division (A) of this section in any municipal corporation or township located wholly or partly within the county that has in effect an ordinance or resolution levying an excise tax pursuant to division (B) of section 5739.08 of the Revised Code. (4) The board of a county that has levied a tax under division (M) of this section may, by resolution adopted within ninety days after July 15, 1985, by a majority of the members of the board, amend the resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide for a portion of that tax to be pledged and contributed in accordance with an agreement entered into under section 307.695 of the Revised Code. A tax, any revenue from which is pledged pursuant to such an agreement, shall remain in effect at the rate at which it is imposed for the duration of the period for which the revenue from the tax has been so pledged. (5) The board of county commissioners of an eligible county as defined in section 307.695 of the Revised Code may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, amend a resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide that the revenue from the tax shall be used by the board as described in division (H) of section 307.695 of the Revised Code, in which case the tax shall remain in effect at the rate at which it was imposed for the duration of any agreement entered into by the board under section 307.695 of the Revised Code, the duration during which any securities issued by the board under that section are outstanding, or the duration of the period during which the board owns a project as defined in section 307.695 of the Revised Code, whichever duration is longest. (6) The board of county commissioners of an eligible county as defined in section 307.678 of the Revised Code may, by resolution, amend a resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide that revenue from the tax, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars each year, may be used as described in division (E) of section 307.678 of the Revised Code. (7) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, the board of county commissioners of a county described in division (H)(1) of this section may, by resolution, amend a resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide that all or a portion of the revenue from the tax, including any revenue otherwise required to be returned to townships or municipal corporations under that division, may be used or pledged for the payment of debt service on securities issued to pay the costs of constructing, operating, and maintaining sports facilities described in division (H)(2) of this section. (8) The board of county commissioners of a county described in division (I) of this section may, by resolution, amend a resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide that all or a portion of the revenue from the tax may be used for the purposes described in section 307.679 of the Revised Code. (B) A board of county commissioners that levies an excise tax under division (A) of this section on June 30, 1997, at a rate of three per cent, and that has pledged revenue from the tax to an agreement entered into under section 307.695 of the Revised Code or, in the case of the board of county commissioners of an eligible county as defined in section 307.695 of the Revised Code, has amended a resolution levying a tax under division (M) of this section to provide that proceeds from the tax shall be used by the board as described in division (H) of section 307.695 of the Revised Code, may, at any time by a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, amend the resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide for an increase in the rate of that tax up to seven per cent on each transaction; to provide that revenue from the increase in the rate shall be used as described in division (H) of section 307.695 of the Revised Code or be spent solely to make contributions to the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the county to be used specifically for promotion, advertising, and marketing of the region in which the county is located; and to provide that the rate in excess of the three per cent levied under division (A) of this section shall remain in effect at the rate at which it is imposed for the duration of the period during which any agreement is in effect that was entered into under section 307.695 of the Revised Code by the board of county commissioners levying a tax under division (A) of this section, the duration of the period during which any securities issued by the board under division (I) of section 307.695 of the Revised Code are outstanding, or the duration of the period during which the board owns a project as defined in section 307.695 of the Revised Code, whichever duration is longest. The amendment also shall provide that no portion of that revenue need be returned to townships or municipal corporations as would otherwise be required under division (A) of this section. (C)(1) As used in division (C) of this section, "cost" and "facility" have the same meanings as in section 351.01 of the Revised Code, and "convention center" has the same meaning as in section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (2) A board of county commissioners that levies a tax under division (A) of this section on March 18, 1999, at a rate of three per cent may, by resolution adopted not later than forty-five days after March 18, 1999, amend the resolution levying the tax to provide for all of the following: (a) That the rate of the tax shall be increased by not more than an additional four per cent on each transaction; (b) That all of the revenue from the increase in the rate shall be pledged and contributed to a convention facilities authority established by the board of county commissioners under Chapter 351. of the Revised Code on or before November 15, 1998, and used to pay costs of constructing, maintaining, operating, and promoting a facility in the county, including paying bonds, or notes issued in anticipation of bonds, as provided by that chapter; (c) That no portion of the revenue arising from the increase in rate need be returned to municipal corporations or townships as otherwise required under division (A) of this section; (d) That the increase in rate shall not be subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law while any bonds, or notes in anticipation of bonds, issued by the authority under Chapter 351. of the Revised Code to which the revenue is pledged, remain outstanding in accordance with their terms, unless provision is made by law or by the board of county commissioners for an adequate substitute therefor that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures the bonds. (3) Division (C) of this section does not apply to the board of county commissioners of any county in which a convention center or facility exists or is being constructed on November 15, 1998, or of any county in which a convention facilities authority levies a tax pursuant to section 351.021 of the Revised Code on that date. (D)(1) As used in division (D) of this section, "cost" has the same meaning as in section 351.01 of the Revised Code, and "convention center" has the same meaning as in section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (2) A board of county commissioners that levies a tax under division (A) of this section on June 30, 2002, at a rate of three per cent may, by resolution adopted not later than September 30, 2002, amend the resolution levying the tax to provide for all of the following: (a) That the rate of the tax shall be increased by not more than an additional three and one-half per cent on each transaction; (b) That all of the revenue from the increase in rate shall be pledged and contributed to a convention facilities authority established by the board of county commissioners under Chapter 351. of the Revised Code on or before May 15, 2002, and be used to pay costs of constructing, expanding, maintaining, operating, or promoting a convention center in the county, including paying bonds, or notes issued in anticipation of bonds, as provided by that chapter; (c) That no portion of the revenue arising from the increase in rate need be returned to municipal corporations or townships as otherwise required under division (A) of this section; (d) That the increase in rate shall not be subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law while any bonds, or notes in anticipation of bonds, issued by the authority under Chapter 351. of the Revised Code to which the revenue is pledged, remain outstanding in accordance with their terms, unless provision is made by law or by the board of county commissioners for an adequate substitute therefor that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures the bonds. (3) Any board of county commissioners that, pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section, has amended a resolution levying the tax authorized by division (A) of this section may further amend the resolution to provide that the revenue referred to in division (D)(2)(b) of this section shall be pledged and contributed both to a convention facilities authority to pay the costs of constructing, expanding, maintaining, or operating one or more convention centers in the county, including paying bonds, or notes issued in anticipation of bonds, as provided in Chapter 351. of the Revised Code, and to a convention and visitors' bureau to pay the costs of promoting one or more convention centers in the county. (4) A county having a population of seven hundred thousand or less may not levy the increased rate described in division (D)(2) of this section on or after the first day of the first month beginning after the effective date of this amendment. (E)(1) As used in division (E) of this section: (a) "Port authority" means a port authority created under Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code. (b) "Port authority military-use facility" means port authority facilities on which or adjacent to which is located an installation of the armed forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof, or the national guard and at least part of which is made available for use, for consideration, by the armed forces of the United States, a reserve component thereof, or the national guard. (2) For the purpose of contributing revenue to pay operating expenses of a port authority that operates a port authority military-use facility, the board of county commissioners of a county that created, participated in the creation of, or has joined such a port authority may do one or both of the following: (a) Amend a resolution previously adopted under division (A) of this section to designate some or all of the revenue from the tax levied under the resolution to be used for that purpose, notwithstanding that division; (b) Amend a resolution previously adopted under division (A) of this section to increase the rate of the tax by not more than an additional two per cent and use the revenue from the increase exclusively for that purpose. (3) If a board of county commissioners amends a resolution to increase the rate of a tax as authorized in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, the board also may amend the resolution to specify that the increase in rate of the tax does not apply to "hotels," as otherwise defined in section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, having fewer rooms used for the accommodation of guests than a number of rooms specified by the board. (F)(1) A board of county commissioners of a county organized under a county charter adopted pursuant to Article X, Section 3, Ohio Constitution, and that levies an excise tax under division (A) of this section at a rate of three per cent and levies an additional excise tax under division (O) of this section at a rate of one and one-half per cent may, by resolution adopted not later than January 1, 2008, by a majority of the members of the board, amend the resolution levying a tax under division (A) of this section to provide for an increase in the rate of that tax by not more than an additional one per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. Notwithstanding divisions (A) and (O) of this section, the resolution shall provide that all of the revenue from the increase in rate, after deducting the real and actual costs of administering the tax, shall be used to pay the costs of improving, expanding, equipping, financing, or operating a convention center by a convention and visitors' bureau in the county. (2) The increase in rate shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution, not to exceed ten years, and may be extended for an additional period of time not to exceed ten years thereafter by a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board. (3) The increase in rate shall be subject to the regulations adopted under division (A) of this section, except that the resolution may provide that no portion of the revenue from the increase in the rate shall be returned to townships or municipal corporations as would otherwise be required under that division. (G)(1) Division (G) of this section applies only to a county with a population greater than sixty-five thousand and less than seventy thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census and in which, on December 31, 2006, an excise tax is levied under division (A) of this section at a rate not less than and not greater than three per cent, and in which the most recent increase in the rate of that tax was enacted or took effect in November 1984. (2) The board of county commissioners of a county to which division (G) of this section applies, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, may increase the rate of the tax by not more than one per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The increase in rate shall be for the purpose of paying expenses deemed necessary by the convention and visitors' bureau operating in the county to promote travel and tourism. (3) The increase in rate shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution, not to exceed twenty years, provided that the increase in rate may not continue beyond the time when the purpose for which the increase is levied ceases to exist. If revenue from the increase in rate is pledged to the payment of debt charges on securities, the increase in rate is not subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law for so long as the securities are outstanding, unless provision is made by law or by the board of county commissioners for an adequate substitute for that revenue that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures payment of the debt charges. (4) The increase in rate shall be subject to the regulations adopted under division (A) of this section, except that the resolution may provide that no portion of the revenue from the increase in the rate shall be returned to townships or municipal corporations as would otherwise be required under division (A) of this section. (5) A resolution adopted under division (G) of this section is subject to referendum under sections 305.31 to 305.99 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) Division (H) of this section applies only to a county satisfying all of the following: (a) The population of the county is greater than one hundred seventy-five thousand and less than two hundred twenty-five thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census. (b) An amusement park with an average yearly attendance in excess of two million guests is located in the county. (c) On December 31, 2014, an excise tax was levied in the county under division (A) of this section at a rate of three per cent. (2) The board of county commissioners of a county to which division (H) of this section applies, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, may increase the rate of the tax by not more than one per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The increase in rate shall be used to pay the costs of constructing and maintaining facilities owned by the county or by a port authority created under Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code, and designed to host sporting events and expenses deemed necessary by the convention and visitors' bureau operating in the county to promote travel and tourism with reference to the sports facilities, and to pay or pledge to the payment of debt service on securities issued to pay the costs of constructing, operating, and maintaining the sports facilities. (3) The increase in rate shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution. If revenue from the increase in rate is pledged to the payment of debt charges on securities, the increase in rate is not subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law for so long as the securities are outstanding, unless provision is made by law or by the board of county commissioners for an adequate substitute for that revenue that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures payment of the debt charges. (4) The increase in rate shall be subject to the regulations adopted under division (A) of this section, except that the resolution may provide that no portion of the revenue from the increase in the rate shall be returned to townships or municipal corporations as would otherwise be required under division (A) of this section. (I)(1) The board of county commissioners of a county with a population greater than seventy-five thousand and less than seventy-eight thousand, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board not later than October 15, 2015, may increase the rate of the tax by not more than one per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The increase in rate shall be for the purposes described in section 307.679 of the Revised Code or for the promotion of travel and tourism in the county, including travel and tourism to sports facilities. (2) The increase in rate shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution and as necessary to fulfill the county's obligations under a cooperative agreement entered into under section 307.679 of the Revised Code. If the resolution is adopted by the board before September 29, 2015, but after that enactment becomes law, the increase in rate shall become effective beginning on September 29, 2015. If revenue from the increase in rate is pledged to the payment of debt charges on securities, or to substitute for other revenues pledged to the payment of such debt, the increase in rate is not subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law for so long as the securities are outstanding, unless provision is made by law or by the board of county commissioners for an adequate substitute for that revenue that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures payment of the debt charges. (3) The increase in rate shall be subject to the regulations adopted under division (A) of this section, except that no portion of the revenue from the increase in the rate shall be returned to townships or municipal corporations as would otherwise be required under division (A) of this section. (J)(1) Division (J) of this section applies only to counties satisfying either of the following: (a) A county that, on July 1, 2015, does not levy an excise tax under division (A) of this section and that has a population of at least thirty-nine thousand but not more than forty thousand according to the 2010 federal decennial census; (b) A county that, on July 1, 2015, levies an excise tax under division (A) of this section at a rate of three per cent and that has a population of at least seventy-one thousand but not more than seventy-five thousand according to 2010 federal decennial census. (2) The board of county commissioners of a county to which division (J) of this section applies, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, may levy an excise tax at a rate not to exceed three per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, equipping, or repairing permanent improvements, as defined in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (3) If the board does not levy a tax under division (A) of this section, the board shall establish regulations necessary to provide for the administration of the tax, which may prescribe the time for payment of the tax and the imposition of penalty or interest subject to the limitations on penalty and interest provided in division (A) of this section. No portion of the revenue shall be returned to townships or municipal corporations in the county unless otherwise provided by resolution of the board. (4) The tax shall apply throughout the territory of the county, including in any township or municipal corporation levying an excise tax under division (A) or (B) of section 5739.08 of the Revised Code. The levy of the tax is subject to referendum as provided under section 305.31 of the Revised Code. (5) The tax shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution. If revenue from the increase in rate is pledged to the payment of debt charges on securities, the increase in rate is not subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law for so long as the securities are outstanding unless provision is made by law or by the board for an adequate substitute for that revenue that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures payment of the debt charges. (K)(1) The board of county commissioners of an eligible county, as defined in section 307.678 of the Revised Code, that levies an excise tax under division (A) of this section on July 1, 2017, at a rate of three per cent may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, amend the resolution levying the tax to increase the rate of the tax by not more than an additional three per cent on each transaction. (2) No portion of the revenue shall be returned to townships or municipal corporations in the county unless otherwise provided by resolution of the board. Otherwise, the revenue from the increase in the rate shall be distributed and used in the same manner described under division (A) of this section or distributed or used to provide credit enhancement facilities as authorized under section 307.678 of the Revised Code. (3) The increase in rate shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution. If revenue from the increase in rate is pledged to the payment of debt charges on securities, the increase in rate is not subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law for so long as the securities are outstanding unless provision is made by law or by the board for an adequate substitute for that revenue that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures payment of the debt charges. (L)(1) As used in division (L) of this section: (a) "Eligible county" means a county that has a population greater than one hundred ninety thousand and less than two hundred thousand according to the 2010 federal decennial census and that levies an excise tax under division (A) of this section at a rate of three per cent. (b) "Professional sports facility" means a sports facility that is intended to house major or minor league professional athletic teams, including a stadium, together with all parking facilities, walkways, and other auxiliary facilities, real and personal property, property rights, easements, and interests that may be appropriate for, or used in connection with, the operation of the facility. (2) Subject to division (L)(3) of this section, the board of county commissioners of an eligible county, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, may increase the rate of the tax by not more than one per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. Revenue from the increase in rate shall be used for the purposes of paying the costs of constructing, improving, and maintaining a professional sports facility in the county and paying expenses considered necessary by the convention and visitors' bureau operating in the county to promote travel and tourism with respect to that professional sports facility. The tax shall take effect only after the convention and visitors' bureau enters into a contract for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of a professional sports facility that is or will be located on property acquired, in whole or in part, with revenue from the increased rate, and thereafter shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution. If revenue from the increase in rate is pledged to the payment of debt charges on securities, the increase in rate is not subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law for so long as the securities are outstanding, unless a provision is made by law or by the board of county commissioners for an adequate substitute for that revenue that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures payment of the debt charges. The increase in rate shall be subject to the regulations adopted under division (A) of this section, except that the resolution may provide that no portion of the revenue from the increase in the rate shall be returned to townships or municipal corporations as would otherwise be required under division (A) of this section. (3) If, on December 31, 2019, the convention and visitors' bureau has not entered into a contract for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of a professional sports facility that is or will be located on property acquired, in whole or in part, with revenue from the increased rate, the authority to levy the tax under division (L)(2) of this section is hereby repealed on that date. (M)(1) For the purposes described in section 307.695 of the Revised Code and to cover the costs of administering the tax, a board of county commissioners of a county where a tax imposed under division (A) of this section is in effect may, by resolution adopted within ninety days after July 15, 1985, by a majority of the members of the board, levy an additional excise tax not to exceed three per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The tax authorized by division (M) of this section shall be in addition to any tax that is levied pursuant to divisions (A) to (L) of this section, but it shall not apply to transactions subject to a tax levied by a municipal corporation or township pursuant to section 5739.08 of the Revised Code. (2) The board shall establish all regulations necessary to provide for the administration and allocation of the tax. The regulations may prescribe the time for payment of the tax, and may provide for the imposition of a penalty or interest, or both, for late payments, provided that the penalty does not exceed ten per cent of the amount of tax due, and the rate at which interest accrues does not exceed the rate per annum prescribed pursuant to section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. (3) All revenues arising from the tax shall be expended in accordance with section 307.695 of the Revised Code. The board of county commissioners of an eligible county as defined in section 307.695 of the Revised Code may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, amend the resolution levying a tax under this division to provide that the revenue from the tax shall be used by the board as described in division (H) of section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (4) A tax imposed under this division shall remain in effect at the rate at which it is imposed for the duration of the period during which any agreement entered into by the board under section 307.695 of the Revised Code is in effect, the duration of the period during which any securities issued by the board under division (I) of section 307.695 of the Revised Code are outstanding, or the duration of the period during which the board owns a project as defined in section 307.695 of the Revised Code, whichever duration is longest. (N)(1) For the purpose of providing contributions under division (B)(1) of section 307.671 of the Revised Code to enable the acquisition, construction, and equipping of a port authority educational and cultural facility in the county and, to the extent provided for in the cooperative agreement authorized by that section, for the purpose of paying debt service charges on bonds, or notes in anticipation of bonds, described in division (B)(1)(b) of that section, a board of county commissioners, by resolution adopted within ninety days after December 22, 1992, by a majority of the members of the board, may levy an additional excise tax not to exceed one and one-half per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The excise tax authorized by division (N) of this section shall be in addition to any tax that is levied pursuant to divisions (A) to (M) of this section, to any excise tax levied pursuant to section 5739.08 of the Revised Code, and to any excise tax levied pursuant to section 351.021 of the Revised Code. (2) The board of county commissioners shall establish all regulations necessary to provide for the administration and allocation of the tax that are not inconsistent with this section or section 307.671 of the Revised Code. The regulations may prescribe the time for payment of the tax, and may provide for the imposition of a penalty or interest, or both, for late payments, provided that the penalty does not exceed ten per cent of the amount of tax due, and the rate at which interest accrues does not exceed the rate per annum prescribed pursuant to section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. (3) All revenues arising from the tax shall be expended in accordance with section 307.671 of the Revised Code and division (N) of this section. The levy of a tax imposed under division (N) of this section may not commence prior to the first day of the month next following the execution of the cooperative agreement authorized by section 307.671 of the Revised Code by all parties to that agreement. (4) The tax shall remain in effect at the rate at which it is imposed for the period of time described in division (C) of section 307.671 of the Revised Code for which the revenue from the tax has been pledged by the county to the corporation pursuant to that section, but, to any extent provided for in the cooperative agreement, for no lesser period than the period of time required for payment of the debt service charges on bonds, or notes in anticipation of bonds, described in division (B)(1)(b) of that section. (O)(1) For the purpose of paying the costs of acquiring, constructing, equipping, and improving a municipal educational and cultural facility, including debt service charges on bonds provided for in division (B) of section 307.672 of the Revised Code, and for any additional purposes determined by the county in the resolution levying the tax or amendments to the resolution, including subsequent amendments providing for paying costs of acquiring, constructing, renovating, rehabilitating, equipping, and improving a port authority educational and cultural performing arts facility, as defined in section 307.674 of the Revised Code, and including debt service charges on bonds provided for in division (B) of section 307.674 of the Revised Code, the legislative authority of a county, by resolution adopted within ninety days after June 30, 1993, by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, may levy an additional excise tax not to exceed one and one-half per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The excise tax authorized by division (O) of this section shall be in addition to any tax that is levied pursuant to divisions (A) to (N) of this section, to any excise tax levied pursuant to section 5739.08 of the Revised Code, and to any excise tax levied pursuant to section 351.021 of the Revised Code. (2) The legislative authority of the county shall establish all regulations necessary to provide for the administration and allocation of the tax. The regulations may prescribe the time for payment of the tax, and may provide for the imposition of a penalty or interest, or both, for late payments, provided that the penalty does not exceed ten per cent of the amount of tax due, and the rate at which interest accrues does not exceed the rate per annum prescribed pursuant to section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. (3) All revenues arising from the tax shall be expended in accordance with section 307.672 of the Revised Code and this division. The levy of a tax imposed under this division shall not commence prior to the first day of the month next following the execution of the cooperative agreement authorized by section 307.672 of the Revised Code by all parties to that agreement. The tax shall remain in effect at the rate at which it is imposed for the period of time determined by the legislative authority of the county. That period of time shall not exceed fifteen years, except that the legislative authority of a county with a population of less than two hundred fifty thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census, by resolution adopted by a majority of its members before the original tax or any extension thereof expires, may extend the duration of the tax for an additional period of time. The additional period of time by which a legislative authority extends a tax levied under division (O) of this section shall not exceed fifteen years. (P)(1) The legislative authority of a county that has levied a tax under division (O) of this section may, by resolution adopted within one hundred eighty days after January 4, 2001, by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, amend the resolution levying a tax under that division to provide for the use of the proceeds of that tax, to the extent that it is no longer needed for its original purpose as determined by the parties to a cooperative agreement amendment pursuant to division (D) of section 307.672 of the Revised Code, to pay costs of acquiring, constructing, renovating, rehabilitating, equipping, and improving a port authority educational and cultural performing arts facility, including debt service charges on bonds provided for in division (B) of section 307.674 of the Revised Code, and to pay all obligations under any guaranty agreements, reimbursement agreements, or other credit enhancement agreements described in division (C) of section 307.674 of the Revised Code. (2) The resolution may also provide for the extension of the tax at the same rate for the longer of the period of time determined by the legislative authority of the county, but not to exceed an additional twenty-five years, or the period of time required to pay all debt service charges on bonds provided for in division (B) of section 307.672 of the Revised Code and on port authority revenue bonds provided for in division (B) of section 307.674 of the Revised Code. (3) All revenues arising from the amendment and extension of the tax shall be expended in accordance with section 307.674 of the Revised Code and divisions (O) and (P) of this section. (Q)(1) As used in division (Q) of this section: (a) "Convention facilities authority" has the same meaning as in section 351.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Convention center" has the same meaning as in section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (2) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of division (N) of this section, the legislative authority of a county with a population of one million or more according to the most recent federal decennial census that has levied a tax under division (N) of this section may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, provide for the extension of such levy and may provide that the proceeds of that tax, to the extent that they are no longer needed for their original purpose as defined by a cooperative agreement entered into under section 307.671 of the Revised Code, shall be deposited into the county general revenue fund. The resolution shall provide for the extension of the tax at a rate not to exceed the rate specified in division (N) of this section for a period of time determined by the legislative authority of the county, but not to exceed an additional forty years. (3) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one million or more that has levied a tax under division (A) of this section may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, increase the rate of the tax levied by such county under division (A) of this section to a rate not to exceed five per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of division (A) of this section, the resolution may provide that all collections resulting from the rate levied in excess of three per cent, after deducting the real and actual costs of administering the tax, shall be deposited in the county general fund. (4) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one million or more that has levied a tax under division (A) of this section may, by resolution adopted on or before August 30, 2004, by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, provide that all or a portion of the proceeds of the tax levied under division (A) of this section, after deducting the real and actual costs of administering the tax and the amounts required to be returned to townships and municipal corporations with respect to the first three per cent levied under division (A) of this section, shall be deposited in the county general fund, provided that such proceeds shall be used to satisfy any pledges made in connection with an agreement entered into under section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (5) No amount collected from a tax levied, extended, or required to be deposited in the county general fund under division (Q) of this section shall be contributed to a convention facilities authority, corporation, or other entity created after July 1, 2003, for the principal purpose of constructing, improving, expanding, equipping, financing, or operating a convention center unless the mayor of the municipal corporation in which the convention center is to be operated by that convention facilities authority, corporation, or other entity has consented to the creation of that convention facilities authority, corporation, or entity. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of section 351.04 of the Revised Code, if a tax is levied by a county under division (Q) of this section, the board of county commissioners of that county may determine the manner of selection, the qualifications, the number, and terms of office of the members of the board of directors of any convention facilities authority, corporation, or other entity described in division (Q)(5) of this section. (6)(a) No amount collected from a tax levied, extended, or required to be deposited in the county general fund under division (Q) of this section may be used for any purpose other than paying the direct and indirect costs of constructing, improving, expanding, equipping, financing, or operating a convention center and for the real and actual costs of administering the tax, unless, prior to the adoption of the resolution of the legislative authority of the county authorizing the levy, extension, increase, or deposit, the county and the mayor of the most populous municipal corporation in that county have entered into an agreement as to the use of such amounts, provided that such agreement has been approved by a majority of the mayors of the other municipal corporations in that county. The agreement shall provide that the amounts to be used for purposes other than paying the convention center or administrative costs described in division (Q)(6)(a) of this section be used only for the direct and indirect costs of capital improvements, including the financing of capital improvements, except that the agreement may subsequently be amended by the parties that have entered into that agreement to authorize such amounts to instead be used for any costs related to the promotion or support of tourism or tourism-related programs. (b) If the county in which the tax is levied has an association of mayors and city managers, the approval of that association of an agreement described in division (Q)(6)(a) of this section shall be considered to be the approval of the majority of the mayors of the other municipal corporations for purposes of that division. (7) Each year, the auditor of state shall conduct an audit of the uses of any amounts collected from taxes levied, extended, or deposited under division (Q) of this section and shall prepare a report of the auditor of state's findings. The auditor of state shall submit the report to the legislative authority of the county that has levied, extended, or deposited the tax, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the leaders of the minority parties of the house of representatives and the senate. (R)(1) As used in division (R) of this section: (a) "Convention facilities authority" has the same meaning as in section 351.01 of the Revised Code. (b) "Convention center" has the same meaning as in section 307.695 of the Revised Code. (2) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of division (N) of this section, the legislative authority of a county with a population of one million two hundred thousand or more according to the most recent federal decennial census or the most recent annual population estimate published or released by the United States census bureau at the time the resolution is adopted placing the levy on the ballot, that has levied a tax under division (N) of this section may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, provide for the extension of such levy and may provide that the proceeds of that tax, to the extent that the proceeds are no longer needed for their original purpose as defined by a cooperative agreement entered into under section 307.671 of the Revised Code and after deducting the real and actual costs of administering the tax, shall be used for paying the direct and indirect costs of constructing, improving, expanding, equipping, financing, or operating a convention center. The resolution shall provide for the extension of the tax at a rate not to exceed the rate specified in division (N) of this section for a period of time determined by the legislative authority of the county, but not to exceed an additional forty years. (3) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one million two hundred thousand or more that has levied a tax under division (A) of this section may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, increase the rate of the tax levied by such county under division (A) of this section to a rate not to exceed five per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of division (A) of this section, the resolution shall provide that all collections resulting from the rate levied in excess of three per cent, after deducting the real and actual costs of administering the tax, shall be used for paying the direct and indirect costs of constructing, improving, expanding, equipping, financing, or operating a convention center. (4) The legislative authority of a county with a population of one million two hundred thousand or more that has levied a tax under division (A) of this section may, by resolution adopted on or before July 1, 2008, by a majority of the members of the legislative authority, provide that all or a portion of the proceeds of the tax levied under division (A) of this section, after deducting the real and actual costs of administering the tax and the amounts required to be returned to townships and municipal corporations with respect to the first three per cent levied under division (A) of this section, shall be used to satisfy any pledges made in connection with an agreement entered into under section 307.695 of the Revised Code or shall otherwise be used for paying the direct and indirect costs of constructing, improving, expanding, equipping, financing, or operating a convention center. (5) Any amount collected from a tax levied or extended under division (R) of this section may be contributed to a convention facilities authority created before July 1, 2005, but no amount collected from a tax levied or extended under division (R) of this section may be contributed to a convention facilities authority, corporation, or other entity created after July 1, 2005, unless the mayor of the municipal corporation in which the convention center is to be operated by that convention facilities authority, corporation, or other entity has consented to the creation of that convention facilities authority, corporation, or entity. (S) As used in division (S) of this section, "soldiers' memorial" means a memorial constructed and funded under Chapter 345. of the Revised Code. The board of county commissioners of a county with a population between one hundred three thousand and one hundred seven thousand according to the most recent federal decennial census, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board within six months after September 15, 2014, may levy a tax not to exceed three per cent on transactions by which a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. The purpose of the tax shall be to pay the costs of expanding, maintaining, or operating a soldiers' memorial and the costs of administering the tax. All revenue arising from the tax shall be credited to one or more special funds in the county treasury and shall be spent solely for the purposes of paying those costs. The board of county commissioners shall adopt all rules necessary to provide for the administration of the tax subject to the same limitations on imposing penalty or interest under division (A) of this section. (T) As used in division (T) of this section: (1) "Eligible county" means a county in which a county agricultural society or independent agricultural society is organized under section 1711.01 or 1711.02 of the Revised Code, provided the agricultural society owns a facility or site in the county at which an annual harness horse race is conducted where one-day attendance equals at least forty thousand attendees. (2) "Permanent improvements," "debt charges," and "financing costs" have the same meanings as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Costs of permanent improvements" include all costs allowed in section 133.15 of the Revised Code. A board of county commissioners of an eligible county, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, may levy an excise tax at the rate of up to three per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests for the purpose of paying the costs of permanent improvements at sites at which one or more agricultural societies conduct fairs or exhibits, including paying financing costs and debt charges on bonds, or notes in anticipation of bonds, paying the costs of maintaining or operating such permanent improvements, and paying the costs of administering the tax. A resolution adopted under division (T) of this section, other than a resolution that only extends the period of time for which the tax is levied, shall direct the board of elections to submit the question of the proposed lodging tax to the electors of the county at a special election held on the date specified by the board in the resolution, provided that the election occurs not less than ninety days after a certified copy of the resolution is transmitted to the board of elections. A resolution submitted to the electors under division (T) of this section shall not go into effect unless it is approved by a majority of those voting upon it. The resolution takes effect on the date the board of county commissioners receives notification from the board of elections of an affirmative vote. The tax shall remain in effect for the period specified in the resolution, not to exceed five years, and may be extended for an additional period of years that is at least the number of years required for payment of the debt charges on bonds or notes in anticipation of bonds authorized under this division but not in excess of fifteen years thereafter by a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board. A resolution extending the period of time for which the tax is in effect is not subject to approval of the electors of the county, but is subject to referendum under sections 305.31 to 305.99 of the Revised Code. All revenue arising from the tax shall be credited to one or more special funds in the county treasury and shall be spent solely for the purposes of paying the costs of such permanent improvements, including paying financing costs and debt charges on bonds, or notes in anticipation of bonds, and maintaining or operating the improvements. Revenue allocated for the use of a county agricultural society may be credited to the county agricultural society fund created in section 1711.16 of the Revised Code upon appropriation by the board. If revenue is credited to that fund, it shall be expended only as provided in that section. The board of county commissioners shall adopt all rules necessary to provide for the administration of the tax. The rules may prescribe the time for payment of the tax, and may provide for the imposition or penalty or interest, or both, for late payments, provided that the penalty does not exceed ten per cent of the amount of tax due, and the rate at which interest accrues does not exceed the rate per annum prescribed in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. The board of county commissioners may issue bonds, or notes in anticipation thereof, pursuant to Chapter 133. of the Revised Code, for the purpose of paying the costs of permanent improvements as authorized in this division and pledge the revenue arising from the tax for that purpose. The board of county commissioners may pledge or contribute the revenue arising from the tax levied under this division to a port authority created under Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code, and the port authority may issue bonds, or notes in anticipation thereof, pursuant to that chapter, for the purpose of paying the costs of permanent improvements as authorized in this division. (U) As used in division (U) of this section, "eligible county" means a county in which a tax is levied under division (A) of this section at a rate of three per cent and whose territory includes a part of Lake Erie the shoreline of which represents at least fifty per cent of the linear length of the county's border with other counties of this state. The board of county commissioners of an eligible county that has entered into an agreement with a port authority in the county under section 4582.56 of the Revised Code may levy an additional lodging tax on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests for the purpose of financing lakeshore improvement projects constructed or financed by the port authority under that section. The resolution levying the tax shall specify the purpose of the tax, the rate of the tax, which shall not exceed two per cent, and the number of years the tax will be levied or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time. The tax shall be administered pursuant to the regulations adopted by the board under division (A) of this section, except that all the proceeds of the tax levied under this division shall be pledged to the payment of the costs, including debt charges, of lakeshore improvements undertaken by a port authority pursuant to the agreement under section 4582.56 of the Revised Code. No revenue from the tax may be used to pay the current expenses of the port authority. A resolution levying a tax under division (U) of this section is subject to referendum under sections 305.31 to 305.41 and 305.99 of the Revised Code. (V)(1) As used in division (V) of this section: (a) "Tourism development district" means a district designated by a municipal corporation under section 715.014 of the Revised Code or by a township under section 503.56 of the Revised Code. (b) "Lodging tax" means a tax levied pursuant to this section or section 5739.08 of the Revised Code. (c) "Tourism development district lodging tax proceeds" means all proceeds of a lodging tax derived from transactions by which lodging by a hotel located in a tourism development district is or is to be provided to transient guests. (d) "Eligible county" has the same meaning as in section 307.678 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, the board of county commissioners, board of township trustees, or legislative authority of any county, township, or municipal corporation that levies a lodging tax on September 29, 2017, and in which any part of a tourism development district is located on or after that date shall amend the ordinance or resolution levying the tax to require either of the following: (i) In the case of a tax levied by a county, that all tourism development district lodging tax proceeds from that tax be used exclusively to foster and develop tourism in the tourism development district; (ii) In the case of a tax levied by a township or municipal corporation, that all tourism development district lodging tax proceeds from that tax be used exclusively to foster and develop tourism in the tourism development district. (b) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, any ordinance or resolution levying a lodging tax adopted on or after September 29, 2017, by a county, township, or municipal corporation in which any part of a tourism development district is located on or after that date shall require that all tourism development district lodging tax proceeds from that tax be used exclusively to foster and develop tourism in the tourism development district. (c) A county shall not use any of the proceeds described in division (V)(2)(a)(i) or (V)(2)(b) of this section unless the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the county approves the manner in which such proceeds are used to foster and develop tourism in the tourism development district. Upon obtaining such approval, the county may pay such proceeds to the bureau to use for the agreed-upon purpose. A municipal corporation or township shall not use any of the proceeds described in division (V)(2)(a)(ii) or (V)(2)(b) of this section unless the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the municipal corporation or township approves the manner in which such proceeds are used to foster and develop tourism in the tourism development district. Upon obtaining such approval, the municipal corporation or township may pay such proceeds to the bureau to use for the agreed-upon purpose. (3)(a) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, the board of county commissioners of an eligible county that levies a lodging tax on March 23, 2018, may amend the resolution levying that tax to require that all or a portion of the proceeds of that tax otherwise required to be spent solely to make contributions to the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the county shall be used to foster and develop tourism in a tourism development district. (b) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, the board of county commissioners of an eligible county that adopts a resolution levying a lodging tax on or after March 23, 2018, may require that all or a portion of the proceeds of that tax otherwise required to be spent solely to make contributions to the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the county pursuant to division (A) of this section shall be used to foster and develop tourism in a tourism development district. (c) A county shall not use any of the proceeds in the manner described in division (V)(3)(a) or (b) of this section unless the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the county approves the manner in which such proceeds are used to foster and develop tourism in the tourism development district. Upon obtaining such approval, the county may pay such proceeds to the bureau to use for the agreed upon purpose. (W)(1) As used in division (W) of this section: (a) "Eligible county" means a county with a population greater than three hundred thousand and less than three hundred fifty thousand that levies a tax under division (A) of this section at a rate of three per cent; (b) "Cost" and "facility" have the same meanings as in section 351.01 of the Revised Code. (2) A board of county commissioners of an eligible county, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board, may levy an excise tax at the rate of up to three per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. All of the revenue from the tax shall be used to pay the costs of administering the tax or pledged and contributed to a convention facilities authority established by the board of county commissioners under Chapter 351. of the Revised Code and used by the authority to pay the cost of constructing a facility in the county, including paying bonds, or notes issued in anticipation of bonds, as provided by that chapter, or paying the expenses of maintaining, operating, or promoting such a facility. No portion of the revenue arising from the tax need be returned to municipal corporations or townships as required for taxes levied under division (A) of this section. (3) A resolution adopted under division (W) of this section shall direct the board of elections to submit the question of the proposed lodging tax to the electors of the county at a special election held on the date specified by the board in the resolution, provided that the election occurs not less than ninety days after a certified copy of the resolution is transmitted to the board of elections. A resolution submitted to the electors under division (W) of this section shall not go into effect unless it is approved by a majority of those voting upon it. The resolution takes effect on the date the board of county commissioners receives notification from the board of elections of an affirmative vote. (4) Once the tax is approved by the electors of the county pursuant to division (W)(3) of this section, it shall not be subject to diminution by initiative or referendum or by law while any bonds, or notes in anticipation of bonds, issued by the authority under Chapter 351. of the Revised Code to which the revenue is pledged, remain outstanding in accordance with their terms, unless provision is made by law or by the board of county commissioners for an adequate substitute therefore that is satisfactory to the trustee if a trust agreement secures the bonds. (5) The tax authorized by division (W) of this section shall be in addition to any other tax that is levied pursuant to this section. (X)(1) As used in division (X) of this section: (a) "Convention facilities authority," "cost," and "facility" have the same meanings as in section 351.01 of the Revised Code, except that "facility" does not include a "sports facility," as that term is defined in that section, other than a facility intended to house a major league soccer team. (b) "Eligible county" means a county with a population greater than eight hundred thousand but less than one million that levies a tax under division (A) of this section. (c) "Port authority" means a port authority created under Chapter 4582. of the Revised Code. (2) A board of county commissioners or the legislative authority of an eligible county may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board or legislative authority, levy an excise tax at a rate not to exceed one per cent on transactions by which lodging by a hotel is or is to be furnished to transient guests. All revenue arising from the tax shall be used to pay the costs of administering the tax or pledged and contributed to the convention and visitors' bureau operating within the applicable eligible county, a convention facilities authority within the applicable eligible county, or a port authority and used by the convention and visitors' bureau, the convention facilities authority, or the port authority to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, renovating, expanding, maintaining, or operating one or more facilities in the county, including paying bonds, or notes issued in anticipation of bonds, or paying the expenses of maintaining, operating, or promoting one or more facilities. No portion of the revenue arising from the tax need be returned to municipal corporations or townships as required for taxes levied under division (A) of this section. (3) The tax authorized by division (X) of this section shall be in addition to any other tax that is levied pursuant to this section. (4) Any board of county commissioners of an eligible county that, pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section, has amended a resolution levying the tax authorized by division (A) of this section may further amend the resolution to provide that all or a portion of the revenue referred to in division (D)(2)(b) of this section and division (A) of this section may be pledged and contributed to pay the costs of acquiring, constructing, renovating, expanding, maintaining, or operating one or more facilities in the county, including paying bonds, or notes issued in anticipation of bonds, or paying the expenses of maintaining, operating, or promoting one or more facilities. (Y) For the purpose of contributing revenue to pay for public safety services in a resort area designated under section 5739.101 of the Revised Code, a board of county commissioners may amend a resolution adopted under division (A) of this section to increase the rate of the tax by not more than an additional one per cent, so long as the total tax rate levied under this section by that county does not exceed five per cent. The revenue from that increase shall be used exclusively to pay for public safety services in the resort area. Sec. 5739.092. (A) Except as provided in division (B) or (C) of this section, money collected by a county and distributed under section 5739.09 of the Revised Code to a convention and visitors' bureau in existence as of June 30, 2013, except for any such money pledged, as of that date, to the payment of debt service charges on bonds, notes, securities, or lease agreements, shall be used solely for tourism sales, marketing and promotion, and their associated costs, including operational and administrative costs of the bureau, sales and marketing, and maintenance of the physical bureau structure. (B) A convention and visitors' bureau that has entered into an agreement under section 307.678 of the Revised Code may use revenue it receives from a tax levied under division (A) of section 5739.09 of the Revised Code as described in division (E) of section 307.678 of the Revised Code. (C) The convention and visitors' bureau of a county with a population of less than one hundred thousand and annual receipts from one or more taxes levied pursuant to section 5739.09 of the Revised Code in excess of five hundred thousand dollars, may, in addition to the purposes specified in division (A) of this section, spend revenue from a tax levied under section 5739.09 of the Revised Code to pay the costs of public safety services, an economic development project, or an infrastructure project, provided the services or project impact tourism. Sec. 5739.101. (A) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation, by ordinance or resolution, or of a township, by resolution, may declare the municipal corporation or township to be a resort area for the purposes of this section, if all of the following criteria are met: (1) According to statistics published by the federal government based on data compiled during the most recent decennial census of the United States, at least sixty-two per cent of total housing units in the municipal corporation or township are classified as "for seasonal, recreational, or occasional use"; (2) Entertainment and recreation facilities are provided within the municipal corporation or township that are primarily intended to provide seasonal leisure time activities for persons other than permanent residents of the municipal corporation or township; (3) The municipal corporation or township experiences seasonal peaks of employment and demand for government services as a direct result of the seasonal population increase. (B) For the purpose of providing revenue for its general fund, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township, in its ordinance or resolution declaring itself a resort area under this section, may levy a tax on the privilege of engaging in the business of either of the following: (1) Making sales in the municipal corporation or township, whether wholesale or retail, but including sales of food only to the extent such sales are subject to the tax levied under section 5739.02 of the Revised Code; (2) Intrastate transportation of passengers or property primarily to or from the municipal corporation or township by a railroad, watercraft, or motor vehicle subject to regulation by the public utilities commission, except not including transportation of passengers as part of a tour or cruise in which the passengers will stay in the municipal corporation or township for no more than one hour. The tax is imposed upon and shall be paid by the person making the sales or transporting the passengers or property. The Except as provided in division (G) of this section, the rate of the tax shall be one-half, one, or one and one-half per cent of the person's gross receipts derived from making the sales or transporting the passengers or property to or from the municipal corporation or township. (C) For the purpose of fostering and developing tourism in a tourism development district designated under section 503.56 or 715.014 of the Revised Code, the legislative authority of a municipal corporation or township, by ordinance or resolution adopted on or before December 31, 2020, may levy a tax on the privilege of engaging in the business of making sales in the tourism development district, whether wholesale or retail, but including sales of food only to the extent such sales are subject to the tax levied under section 5739.02 of the Revised Code. The tax is imposed upon and shall be paid by the person making the sales. The rate of the tax shall be one-half, one, one and one-half, or two per cent of the person's gross receipts derived from making the sales in the tourism development district. (D) A tax levied under division (B) or (C) of this section shall take effect on the first day of the month that begins at least sixty days after the effective date of the ordinance or resolution by which it is levied. The legislative authority shall certify copies of the ordinance or resolution to the tax commissioner and treasurer of state within five days after its adoption. In addition, one time each week during the two weeks following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the legislative authority shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipal corporation or township, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, a notice explaining the tax and stating the rate of the tax, the date it will take effect, and that persons subject to the tax must register with the tax commissioner under section 5739.103 of the Revised Code. (E) No more than once a year, and subject to the rates prescribed in division (B) or (C) of this section, the legislative authority of the municipal corporation or township, by ordinance or resolution, may increase or decrease the rate of a tax levied under this section. The legislative authority, by ordinance or resolution, at any time may repeal such a tax. The legislative authority shall certify to the tax commissioner and treasurer of state copies of the ordinance or resolution repealing or changing the rate of the tax within five days after its adoption. In addition, one time each week during the two weeks following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the legislative authority shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipal corporation or township, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, notice of the repeal or change. (F) A person may separately or proportionately bill or invoice a tax levied pursuant to division (B) or (C) of this section to another person. (G) The legislative authority of a municipal corporation, by ordinance or resolution, or of a township, by resolution, may increase the rate of the tax levied under division (B) of this section to two or two and one-half per cent with the approval of a majority of the electors of the municipal corporation or township voting on the question at a general or special election. The municipal corporation or township shall certify a copy of the ordinance or resolution to the tax commissioner within five days after its adoption. In addition, one time each week during the two weeks following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the legislative authority shall cause to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipal corporation or township, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, a notice explaining the tax and stating the current rate of the tax, what the rate would be if subject to the proposed increase, and the date it will take effect, if approved by electors. The legislative authority of the municipal corporation or township shall file with the board of elections at least ninety days before the day of the election a copy of the ordinance or resolution, which shall specify the date the election is to be held and directs the board of elections to conduct the election. The ballot shall be in the following form: "Shall the rate of a resort area tax levied by ____ (name of municipal corporation or township) from ___% to ___% be passed? For the resort area tax increase Against the resort area tax increase " A tax levied under division (G) of this section takes effect on the first day of the calendar quarter that begins at least sixty-five days after the date the tax commissioner receives notice of the affirmative vote. Sec. 5739.12. (A)(1) Each person who has or is required to have a vendor's license, on or before the twenty-third day of each month, shall make and file a return for the preceding month in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, and shall pay the tax shown on the return to be due. The return shall be filed electronically using the Ohio business gateway, as defined in section 718.01 of the Revised Code, the Ohio telefile system, or any other electronic means prescribed by the commissioner. Payment of the tax shown on the return to be due shall be made electronically in a manner approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may require a vendor that operates from multiple locations or has multiple vendor's licenses to report all tax liabilities on one consolidated return. The return shall show the amount of tax due from the vendor to the state for the period covered by the return and such other information as the commissioner deems necessary for the proper administration of this chapter. The commissioner may extend the time for making and filing returns and paying the tax, and may require that the return for the last month of any annual or semiannual period, as determined by the commissioner, be a reconciliation return detailing the vendor's sales activity for the preceding annual or semiannual period. The reconciliation return shall be filed by the last day of the month following the last month of the annual or semiannual period. The commissioner may remit all or any part of amounts or penalties that may become due under this chapter and may adopt rules relating thereto. Such return shall be filed electronically as directed by the tax commissioner, and payment of the amount of tax shown to be due thereon, after deduction of any discount provided for under this section, shall be made electronically in a manner approved by the tax commissioner. (2) Any person required to file returns and make payments electronically under division (A)(1) of this section may apply to the tax commissioner on a form prescribed by the commissioner to be excused from that requirement. For good cause shown, the commissioner may excuse the person from that requirement and may permit the person to file the returns and make the payments required by this section by nonelectronic means. (B)(1) If the return is filed and the amount of tax shown thereon to be due is paid on or before the date such return is required to be filed, the vendor shall be entitled to a discount of three-fourths of one per cent of the amount shown to be due on the return. The amount of the discount on the basis of sales other than the sales, including leases, of motor vehicles shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars per vendor's license for each month covered by the return. (2) A vendor that has selected a certified service provider as its agent shall not be entitled to the discount if the certified service provider receives a monetary allowance pursuant to section 5739.06 of the Revised Code for performing the vendor's sales and use tax functions in this state. Amounts paid to the clerk of courts pursuant to section 4505.06 of the Revised Code shall be subject to the applicable discount. The discount shall be in consideration for prompt payment to the clerk of courts and for other services performed by the vendor in the collection of the tax. (C)(1) Upon application to the tax commissioner, a vendor who is required to file monthly returns may be relieved of the requirement to report and pay the actual tax due, provided that the vendor agrees to remit to the commissioner payment of not less than an amount determined by the commissioner to be the average monthly tax liability of the vendor, based upon a review of the returns or other information pertaining to such vendor for a period of not less than six months nor more than two years immediately preceding the filing of the application. Vendors who agree to the above conditions shall make and file an annual or semiannual reconciliation return, as prescribed by the commissioner. The reconciliation return shall be filed electronically as directed by the tax commissioner, and payment of the amount of tax shown to be due thereon, after deduction of any discount provided in this section, shall be made electronically in a manner approved by the commissioner. Failure of a vendor to comply with any of the above conditions may result in immediate reinstatement of the requirement of reporting and paying the actual tax liability on each monthly return, and the commissioner may at the commissioner's discretion deny the vendor the right to report and pay based upon the average monthly liability for a period not to exceed two years. The amount ascertained by the commissioner to be the average monthly tax liability of a vendor may be adjusted, based upon a review of the returns or other information pertaining to the vendor for a period of not less than six months nor more than two years preceding such adjustment. (2) The commissioner may authorize vendors whose tax liability is not such as to merit monthly returns, as ascertained by the commissioner upon the basis of administrative costs to the state, to make and file returns at less frequent intervals. When returns are filed at less frequent intervals in accordance with such authorization, the vendor shall be allowed the discount provided in this section in consideration for prompt payment with the return, provided the return is filed and payment is made of the amount of tax shown to be due thereon, at the time specified by the commissioner, but a vendor that has selected a certified service provider as its agent shall not be entitled to the discount. (D) Any vendor who fails to file a return or to pay the full amount of the tax shown on the return to be due in the manner prescribed under this section and the rules of the commissioner may, for each such return, be required to forfeit and pay into the state treasury an additional charge not exceeding fifty dollars or ten per cent of the tax required to be paid for the reporting period, whichever is greater, as revenue arising from the tax imposed by this chapter, and such sum may be collected by assessment in the manner provided in section 5739.13 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may remit all or a portion of the additional charge and may adopt rules relating to the imposition and remission of the additional charge. (E) If the amount required to be collected by a vendor from consumers is in excess of the applicable percentage of the vendor's receipts from sales that are taxable under section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, or in the case of sales subject to a tax levied pursuant to section 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code, in excess of the percentage equal to the aggregate rate of such taxes and the tax levied by section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, such excess shall be remitted along with the remittance of the amount of tax due under section 5739.10 of the Revised Code. (F) The commissioner, if the commissioner deems it necessary in order to insure the payment of the tax imposed by this chapter, may require returns and payments to be made for other than monthly periods. (G) Any vendor required to file a return and pay the tax under this section whose total payment for a year equals or exceeds the amount shown in division (A) of section 5739.122 of the Revised Code is subject to the accelerated tax payment requirements in divisions (B) and (C) of that section. For a vendor that operates from multiple locations or has multiple vendor's licenses, in determining whether the vendor's total payment equals or exceeds the amount shown in division (A) of that section, the vendor's total payment amount shall be the amount of the vendor's total tax liability for the previous calendar year for all of the vendor's locations or licenses. Sec. 5739.13. (A) If any vendor collects the tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code, and fails to remit the tax to the state as prescribed, or on the sale of a motor vehicle, watercraft, or outboard motor required to be titled, fails to remit payment to a clerk of a court of common pleas as provided in section 1548.06 or 4505.06 of the Revised Code, the vendor shall be personally liable for any tax collected and not remitted. The tax commissioner may make an assessment against such vendor based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. If any vendor fails to collect the tax or any consumer fails to pay the tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code, on any transaction subject to the tax, the vendor or consumer shall be personally liable for the amount of the tax applicable to the transaction. The commissioner may make an assessment against either the vendor or consumer, as the facts may require, based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. An assessment against a vendor when the tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code has not been collected or paid, shall not discharge the purchaser's or consumer's liability to reimburse the vendor for the tax applicable to such transaction. An assessment issued against either, pursuant to this section, shall not be considered an election of remedies, nor a bar to an assessment against the other for the tax applicable to the same transaction, provided that no assessment shall be issued against any person for the tax due on a particular transaction if the tax on that transaction actually has been paid by another. The commissioner may make an assessment against any vendor who fails to file a return or remit the proper amount of tax required by this chapter, or against any consumer who fails to pay the proper amount of tax required by this chapter. When information in the possession of the commissioner indicates that the amount required to be collected or paid under this chapter is greater than the amount remitted by the vendor or paid by the consumer, the commissioner may audit a sample of the vendor's sales or the consumer's purchases for a representative period, to ascertain the per cent of exempt or taxable transactions or the effective tax rate and may issue an assessment based on the audit. The commissioner shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the vendor or consumer in selecting a representative sample. The commissioner may make an assessment, based on any information in the commissioner's possession, against any person who fails to file a return or remit the proper amount of tax required by section 5739.102 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may issue an assessment on any transaction for which any tax imposed under this chapter or Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code was due and unpaid on the date the vendor or consumer was informed by an agent of the tax commissioner of an investigation or audit. If the vendor or consumer remits any payment of the tax for the period covered by the assessment after the vendor or consumer was informed of the investigation or audit, the payment shall be credited against the amount of the assessment. The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment, signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due from the party assessed and payable to the treasurer of state and remitted to the tax commissioner. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the place of business of the party assessed is located or the county in which the party assessed resides. If the party assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state, county, and transit authority retail sales tax" or, if appropriate, "special judgments for resort area excise tax," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment except as otherwise provided in this chapter. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the date the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issues the assessment until the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by issuing an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state, and when paid shall be considered as revenue arising from the taxes imposed by or pursuant to sections 5739.01 to 5739.31 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5739.132. (A) If a tax, fee, or charge due under this chapter or Chapter 128. or 5741. of the Revised Code is not paid on or before the day the payment is required to be paid, interest shall accrue on the unpaid tax, fee, or charge at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax, fee, or charge was required to be paid until the tax, fee, or charge is paid or until the day an assessment is issued under section 5739.13 or 5739.15 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax, fee, or charge, and may be collected by assessment. (B) Interest (B)(1) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section, interest shall be allowed and paid on any refund granted pursuant to section 128.47, 5739.07, or 5741.10 of the Revised Code from the date of the overpayment. The interest shall be computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. (2) No interest shall be allowed or paid on a refund of a tax levied pursuant to section 5739.021, 5739.026, 5741.021, or 5741.023 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5739.31. (A)(1) No person shall engage in the business of selling at retail or sell at retail incidental to any other regularly conducted business without having a license therefor, as required by sections 5739.01 to 5739.31 of the Revised Code. (2) No person shall engage in the business of selling at retail as a transient vendor, as defined in section 5739.17 of the Revised Code, without first having obtained a license as required by that section. (B) No person shall continue to engage in the business of selling at retail or sell at retail incidental to any other regularly conducted business after the license issued to that person pursuant to section 5739.17 of the Revised Code has been suspended by the tax commissioner under division (B)(2) of section 5739.30 of the Revised Code, nor shall any person obtain a new license from the any county auditor or the tax commissioner while such suspension is in effect. If a corporation's license has been suspended, none of its officers, or employees having control or supervision of or charged with the responsibility of filing returns and making payments of tax due, shall obtain a license from the any county auditor or the tax commissioner during the period of such suspension. The tax commissioner may cancel any licenses granted while the suspension is in effect. Sec. 5743.021. (A) As used in this section, "qualifying regional arts and cultural district" means a regional arts and cultural district created under section 3381.04 of the Revised Code in a county having that either has a population of one million two hundred thousand or more according to the 2000 federal decennial censusat least eight hundred thousand or has adopted a charter under Ohio Constitution, Article X, Section 3. (B) For one or more of the purposes for which a tax may be levied under section 3381.16 of the Revised Code and for the purposes of paying the expenses of administering the tax and the expenses charged by a board of elections to hold an election on a question submitted under this section, the board of county commissioners of a county that has within its territorial boundaries a qualifying regional arts and cultural district may levy a tax on the sale of cigarettes sold for resale at retail in the county composing the district computed on each cigarette sold. The rate of the tax, when added to the rate of any other tax concurrently levied by the board under this section, shall equal one of the following: (1) If the tax begins to apply before May 1, 2023, up to fifteen mills per cigarette; (2) If the tax begins to apply on or after the first day of the first month after the effective date of this amendmentMay 1, 2023, the rate, in mills per cigarette, specified in the resolution levying the tax. Only one sale of the same article shall be used in computing the amount of tax due. The tax may be levied for any number of years not exceeding ten years. The tax shall be levied pursuant to a resolution of the board of county commissioners approved by a majority of the electors in the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The resolution shall specify the rate of the tax, the number of years the tax will be levied, and the purposes for which the tax is levied. The election may be held on the date of a general, primary, or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. If approved by the electors, the tax shall take effect on the first day of the month specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. A copy of the resolution levying the tax shall be certified to the tax commissioner at least sixty days prior to the date on which the tax is to become effective. A board of county commissioners may adopt a resolution under this division proposing to replace a tax levied under division (B)(1) of this section with a tax levied under division (B)(2) of this section. Such a resolution shall state, in addition to other information required under this division, that the existing levy or levies terminate upon the passage of the replacement levy. The failure of the electors to approve a replacement levy does not terminate the existing levy or levies. (C)(1) The form of the ballot in an election held to propose a tax under division (B)(1) of this section shall be as follows, or in any other form acceptable to the secretary of state: "For the purpose of __________ (insert the purpose or purposes of the tax), shall an excise tax be levied throughout __________ County for the benefit of the ___________ (name of the qualifying regional arts and cultural district) on the sale of cigarettes at wholesale at the rate of ____ mills per cigarette for _____ years? For the tax Against the tax " (2) The form of the ballot in an election held to propose a tax under division (B)(2) of this section shall be as follows, or in any other form acceptable to the secretary of state: "For the purpose of __________ (insert the purpose or purposes of the tax), shall an excise tax be levied throughout __________ County for the benefit of the ___________ (name of the qualifying regional arts and cultural district) on the sale of cigarettes at wholesale at the rate of ____ mills per cigarette for _____ years? For the tax Against the tax " " If the resolution of the board of county commissioners provides that an existing levy or levies will be terminated upon the passage of a replacement levy, the ballot must, for each levy that will be terminated, include a statement that: "An existing tax of ___ mills (stating the millage of the existing tax) per cigarette, having ___ years remaining, will be terminated and replaced upon the passage of this tax." (D) All money arising from taxes levied on behalf of each district under this section and section 5743.321 of the Revised Code shall be credited as follows: (1) To the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised Code, amounts equal to the refunds from each tax levied under this section and section 5743.321 of the Revised Code and certified by the tax commissioner pursuant to section 5743.05 of the Revised Code; (2) Following the crediting of amounts pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section: (a) To the permissive tax distribution fund created under section 4301.423 of the Revised Code, an amount equal to ninety-eight per cent of the remainder collected; (b) To the local excise tax administrative fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, an amount equal to two per cent of such remainder, for use by the tax commissioner in defraying costs incurred in administering the tax. On or before the tenth day of each month, the tax commissioner shall distribute the amount credited to the permissive tax distribution fund during the preceding month by providing for payment of the appropriate amount to the county treasurer of the county in which the tax is levied. (E) No tax shall be levied under divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section during the same month. Sec. 5743.024. (A) For the purposes of section 307.696 of the Revised Code, to pay the expenses of administering the tax, and to pay any or all of the charge the board of elections makes against the county to hold the election on the question of levying the tax, or for such purposes and to provide revenues to the county for permanent improvements, the board of county commissioners may levy a tax on sales of cigarettes sold for resale at retail in the county. The tax shall not exceed two and twenty-five hundredths of a mill per cigarette, and shall be computed on each cigarette sold. The tax may be levied for any number of years not exceeding twenty. Only one sale of the same article shall be used in computing the amount of tax due. The tax shall be levied pursuant to a resolution of the county commissioners approved by a majority of the electors in the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The resolution shall specify the rate of the tax, the number of years the tax will be levied, and the purposes for which the tax is levied. Such election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. If approved by the electors, the tax shall take effect on the first day of the month specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. A copy of the resolution levying the tax shall be certified to the tax commissioner at least sixty days prior to the date on which the tax is to become effective. A resolution under this section may be joined on the ballot as a single question with a resolution adopted under section 307.697 or 4301.421 of the Revised Code to levy a tax for the same purposes and for the purpose of paying the expenses of administering the tax. The form of the ballot in an election held pursuant to this section shall be as prescribed in section 307.697 of the Revised Code. (B) All money arising from each county's taxes levied under this section and section 5743.323 of the Revised Code shall be credited as follows: (1) To the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised Code, amounts equal to the refunds from each tax levied under this section certified by the tax commissioner pursuant to section 5743.05 of the Revised Code; (2) Following the crediting of amounts pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section: (a) To the permissive tax distribution fund created by division (B)(1) of section 4301.423 of the Revised Code, an amount equal to ninety-eight per cent of the remainder collected; (b) To the local excise tax administrative fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, an amount equal to two per cent of such remainder, for use by the tax commissioner in defraying costs incurred in administering the tax. On or before the tenth day of each month, the tax commissioner shall distribute the amount credited to the permissive tax distribution fund during the preceding month by providing for payment of the appropriate amount to the county treasurer of each county levying the tax. (C) The board of county commissioners of a county in which a tax is imposed under this section on the effective date of the amendment of this section by H.B. 59 of the 130th general assembly, September 29, 2013, may levy a tax for the purpose of section 307.673 of the Revised Code regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement authorized under that section has been entered into prior to the day the resolution adopted under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section is adopted, for the purpose of reimbursing a county for costs incurred in the construction of a sports facility pursuant to an agreement entered into by the county under section 307.696 of the Revised Code, or for the purpose of paying the costs of capital repairs of and improvements to a sports facility. The tax shall be levied and approved in one of the manners prescribed by division (C)(1) or (2) of this section. (1) The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners not later than forty-five days after July 19, 1995. A board of county commissioners approving a tax under division (C)(1) of this section may approve a tax under division (D)(1) of section 307.697 or division (B)(1) of section 4301.421 of the Revised Code at the same time. Subject to the resolution being submitted to a referendum under sections 305.31 to 305.41 of the Revised Code, the resolution shall take effect immediately, but the tax levied pursuant to the resolution shall not be levied prior to the day following the last day that any tax previously levied pursuant to this division may be levied. (2) The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the board of county commissioners not later than September 1, 2015, and approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately upon adopting a resolution under division (C)(2) of this section. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as prescribed by division (C) of section 307.697 of the Revised Code, except that the phrase "paying not more than one-half of the costs of providing a sports facility together with related redevelopment and economic development projects" shall be replaced by the phrase "paying the costs of constructing, renovating, improving, or repairing a sports facility and reimbursing a county for costs incurred by the county in the construction of a sports facility," and the phrase ", beginning __________ (here insert the earliest date the tax would take effect)" shall be appended after "years." A board of county commissioners submitting the question of a tax under division (C)(2) of this section may submit the question of a tax under division (D)(2) of section 307.697 or division (B)(2) of section 4301.421 of the Revised Code as a single question, and the form of the ballot shall include each of the proposed taxes. If approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the tax shall take effect on the day specified on the ballot, which shall not be earlier than the day following the last day that any tax previously levied pursuant to this division may be levied. The rate of a tax levied pursuant to division (C)(1) or (2) of this section shall not exceed the rate specified in division (A) of this section. A tax levied pursuant to division (C)(1) or (2) of this section may be levied for any number of years not exceeding twenty. A board of county commissioners adopting a resolution under this division shall certify a copy of the resolution to the tax commissioner immediately upon adoption of the resolution. (D) The board of county commissioners of a county whose population is greater than one million one hundred thousand but less than one million three hundred thousand may levy a tax under this division for the purpose of section 307.673 of the Revised Code regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement authorized under that section has been entered into prior to the day the resolution adopted under division (D) of this section is adopted, for the purpose of reimbursing a county for costs incurred in the construction of a sports facility pursuant to an agreement entered into by the county under section 307.696 of the Revised Code, or for the purpose of paying the costs of constructing, equipping, furnishing, maintaining, renovating, improving, or repairing a sports facility. The tax may be levied for any number of years or for a continuing period of time. The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of county commissioners and approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately upon adopting a resolution under division (D) of this section. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as follows: "For the purpose of ______ (state the purpose or purposes), shall an excise tax be levied by __________ county at the rate of ______ mills per cigarette on the sale of cigarettes at wholesale in the county for ____ (number of years or a continuing period of time), the tax beginning on __________ (the earliest date the tax would take effect)? Yes No " A board of county commissioners submitting the question of a tax under division (D) of this section may submit the question of a tax under section 5743.511, division (E) of section 307.697, or division (C) of section 4301.421 of the Revised Code, or all, as a single question, provided that each tax is for the same purpose and period of time and the form of the ballot states the rate of each of the proposed taxes. If approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the tax shall take effect on the date specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. The tax levied under division (D) of this section may be approved and take effect before the expiration of the tax levied under division (C) of this section. The tax levied under division (D) of this section shall supersede and replace any tax levied under division (C) of this section, and the tax levied under division (C) of this section shall no longer be levied once the tax levied under division (D) of this section takes effect. The rate of tax levied pursuant to division (D) shall be imposed at a rate not to exceed four and one-half mills per each cigarette sold for resale at retail in the county. The tax levied pursuant to division (D) of this section shall be in addition to the tax imposed by section 5743.02 of the Revised Code. Only one sale of the same article shall be used in computing, reporting, and paying the amount of tax due. A board of county commissioners adopting a resolution under division (D) of this section shall certify a copy of the resolution to the tax commissioner immediately upon adoption of the resolution. (E) No tax shall be levied under division (A) of this section on or after September 23, 2008. This division does not apply to a tax levied under division (C) or (D) of this section, and does not prevent the collection of any tax levied under this section before September 23, 2008, so long as that tax remains effective. Sec. 5743.081. (A) If any wholesale dealer or retail dealer fails to pay the tax levied under section 5743.02, 5743.021, 5743.024, or 5743.026 of the Revised Code as required by sections 5743.01 to 5743.20 of the Revised Code, and by the rules of the tax commissioner, or fails to collect the tax from the purchaser or consumer, the commissioner may make an assessment against the wholesale or retail dealer based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. The commissioner may make an assessment against any wholesale or retail dealer who fails to file a return required by section 5743.03 or 5743.025 of the Revised Code. No assessment shall be made against any wholesale or retail dealer for any taxes imposed under section 5743.02, 5743.021, 5743.024, or 5743.026 of the Revised Code more than three years after the last day of the calendar month that immediately follows the monthly period prescribed in section 5743.03 of the Revised Code in which the sale was made, or more than three years after the return for the month in which the sale was made is filed, whichever is later. This section does not bar an assessment against any wholesale or retail dealer who fails to file a return as required by section 5743.025 or 5743.03 of the Revised Code, or who files a fraudulent return. A penalty of up to thirty per cent may be added to the amount of every assessment made under this section. The commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of penalties added to assessments made under this section. The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. The notice shall specify separately any portion of the assessment that represents a county tax. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the wholesale or retail dealer's place of business is located or the county in which the party assessed resides. If the party assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the commissioner's entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state cigarette sales tax," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment, except as otherwise provided in sections 5743.01 to 5743.20 of the Revised Code. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state, and when paid shall be considered as revenue arising from the taxes imposed by sections 5743.01 to 5743.20 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5743.323. (A) For the purposes of section 307.696 of the Revised Code and to pay the expenses of levying the tax or for such purposes and to provide revenues to the county for permanent improvements, the board of county commissioners of a county that levies a tax under division (A) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code shall by resolution adopted by a majority of the board levy a tax at the same rate on the use, consumption, or storage for consumption of cigarettes by consumers in the county, provided that the tax shall not apply if the tax levied by division (A) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code has been paid. The tax shall take effect on the date that a tax levied under division (A) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code takes effect, and shall remain in effect as long as the tax levied under such division remains effective. No tax shall be levied under division (A) of this section on or after September 23, 2008. This paragraph does not prevent the collection of any tax levied under this section before that date so long as that tax remains effective. (B) For the purposes of section 307.696 of the Revised Code and to pay the expenses of levying the tax or for such purposes and to provide revenues to the county for permanent improvements, the board of county commissioners of a county that levies a tax under division (C) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code shall by resolution adopted by a majority of the board levy a tax at the same rate on the use, consumption, or storage for consumption of cigarettes by consumers in the county, provided that the tax shall not apply if the tax levied by division (C) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code has been paid. The tax shall take effect on the date that a tax levied under division (C) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code takes effect, and shall remain in effect as long as the tax levied under such division remains effective. (C) For the purposes set forth in division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code and to pay the expenses of levying the tax or for such purposes and to provide revenues to the county for permanent improvements, the board of county commissioners of a county that levies a tax under division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code shall adopt a resolution levying a tax at the same rate, on the use, consumption, or storage for consumption of cigarettes by consumers in the county, provided that the tax shall not apply if the tax levied by division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code has been paid. The tax levied by division (C) of this section shall take effect on the date that a tax levied under division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code takes effect, and shall remain in effect as long as the tax levied under division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code remains effective. The tax levied under division (C) of this section shall be in addition to the tax levied under section 5743.32 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5743.511. The board of county commissioners of a county whose population is greater than one million one hundred thousand but less than one million three hundred thousand may levy a tax under this section for the purpose of section 307.673 of the Revised Code regardless of whether or not the cooperative agreement authorized under that section has been entered into prior to the day the resolution adopted under this section is adopted, for the purpose of reimbursing a county for costs incurred in the construction of a sports facility pursuant to an agreement entered into by the county under section 307.696 of the Revised Code, or for the purpose of paying the costs of constructing, equipping, furnishing, maintaining, renovating, improving, or repairing a sports facility. The tax may be levied for any number of years or for a continuing period of time. The tax may be levied pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of county commissioners and approved by a majority of the electors of the county voting on the question of levying the tax. The board of county commissioners shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections immediately upon adopting a resolution under this section. The election may be held on the date of a general or special election held not sooner than ninety days after the date the board certifies its resolution to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as follows: "For the purpose of ______ (state the purpose or purposes), shall an excise tax be levied by __________ county at the rate of ______ per cent of the price of other tobacco products (aside from little cigars) sold at wholesale in the county, _____ per cent of the price of little cigars sold at wholesale in the county, and ____ cents per vapor volume of vapor products sold at wholesale in the county, for ____ (number of years or a continuing period of time), the tax beginning on __________ (the earliest date the tax would take effect)? Yes No " A board of county commissioners submitting the question of a tax under this section may submit the question of a tax under division (E) of section 307.697, division (C) of section 4301.421, or division (D) of section 5743.024 of the Revised Code, or all, as a single question, provided that each tax is for the same purpose and period of time and the form of the ballot states the rate of each of the proposed taxes. If approved by a majority of electors voting on the question, the tax shall take effect on the date specified in the resolution but not sooner than the first day of the month that is at least sixty days after the certification of the election results by the board of elections. The rate of tax levied pursuant to this section shall be imposed as follows: (A) At a rate not to exceed eighty-five hundredths per cent of the wholesale price of other tobacco products, aside from little cigars, received by a distributor in the county, sold by a manufacturer to a retail dealer located in the county, or delivered to a consumer in the county for storage, use, or other consumption; (B) At a rate not to exceed one and eighty-five hundredths per cent of the wholesale price of little cigars received by a distributor in the county, sold by a manufacturer to a retail dealer located in the county, or delivered to a consumer in the county for storage, use, or other consumption; (C) At a rate not to exceed one-twentieth of one cent multiplied by the vapor volume of vapor products the first time such products are received by a vapor distributor in the county or when vapor products are delivered to a consumer in the county for storage, use, or other consumption. Only one sale of the same article shall be used in computing, reporting, and paying the amount of tax due. The tax levied under this section shall be in addition to the tax levied under section 5743.51 of the Revised Code. A board of county commissioners adopting a resolution under this section shall certify a copy of the resolution to the tax commissioner immediately upon adoption of the resolution. Sec. 5743.52. (A) Each distributor of tobacco products or vapor distributor subject to the tax levied by section 5743.51 or 5743.511 of the Revised Code, on or before the twenty-third day of each month, shall file with the tax commissioner a return for the preceding month showing any information the tax commissioner finds necessary for the proper administration of this chapter, together with remittance of the tax due. The return and payment of the tax required by this section shall be filed and made electronically on or before the twenty-third day of the month following the reporting period. If the return is filed and the amount of tax shown on the return to be due is paid on or before the date the return is required to be filed, the distributor or vapor distributor is entitled to a discount equal to two and five-tenths per cent of the amount shown on the return to be due. (B) Any person who fails to timely file the return and make payment of taxes as required under this section, section 5743.62, or section 5743.63 of the Revised Code may be required to pay an additional charge not exceeding the greater of fifty dollars or ten per cent of the tax due. Any additional charge imposed under this section may be collected by assessment as provided in section 5743.56 of the Revised Code. (C) If any tax due is not paid timely in accordance with this section or section 5743.62 or 5743.63 of the Revised Code, the person liable for the tax shall pay interest, calculated at the rate per annum as prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code, from the date the tax payment was due to the date of payment or to the date an assessment is issued under section 5743.56 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. The commissioner may collect such interest by assessment pursuant to section 5743.56 of the Revised Code. (D) The commissioner may authorize the filing of returns and the payment of the tax required by this section, section 5743.62, or section 5743.63 of the Revised Code for periods longer than a calendar month. (E) The commissioner may order any taxpayer to file with the commissioner security to the satisfaction of the commissioner conditioned upon filing the return and paying the taxes required under this section, section 5743.62, or section 5743.63 of the Revised Code if the commissioner believes that the collection of the tax may be in jeopardy. Sec. 5743.521. In addition to the return required by section 5743.52 of the Revised Code, each retail dealer of tobacco products or vapor products in a county in which a tax is levied under section 5743.511 of the Revised Code shall, within thirty days after the date on which the tax takes effect, make and file a return, on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner, showing the total number of tobacco products or vapor products which such retail dealer had on hand as of the beginning of business on the date on which the tax takes effect and such other information as the commissioner deems necessary for the administration of that section. Each such retail dealer shall deliver the return together with a remittance of the additional amount of tax due on the tobacco products or the vapor products shown on such return to the commissioner. Any retail dealer of tobacco products or vapor products who fails to file a return under this section shall, for each day the retail dealer so fails, forfeit and pay into the state treasury the sum of one dollar as revenue arising from the tax imposed by section 5743.511 of the Revised Code, and such sum may be collected by assessment in the manner provided in section 5743.56 of the Revised Code. For thirty days after the effective date of a tax imposed by section 5743.511 of the Revised Code, a retail dealer may possess for sale or sell in the county in which the tax is levied tobacco products or vapor products if the tax has or will be paid. Sec. 5743.54. (A) Each distributor of tobacco products and each vapor distributor of vapor products shall maintain complete and accurate records of all purchases and sales of tobacco products or vapor products, and shall procure and retain all invoices, bills of lading, and other documents relating to the purchases and sales of those products. The distributor or vapor distributor shall keep open records and documents during business hours for the inspection of the tax commissioner, and shall preserve them for a period of three years from the date the return was due or was filed, whichever is later, unless the commissioner, in writing, consents to their destruction within that period, or orders that they be kept for a longer period of time. (B)(1) Each distributor of tobacco products and each vapor distributor of vapor products subject to the tax levied by section 5743.51 or 5743.511 of the Revised Code shall mark on the invoices of tobacco products or vapor products sold that the tax levied by that section has been paid and shall indicate the distributor's or vapor distributor's account number as assigned by the commissioner. (2) Each vapor distributor subject to the tax imposed by section 5743.51 of the Revised Code shall mark on all invoices the total weight of the vapor product, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one gram, if the vapor product is not sold in liquid form. If the vapor product is sold in liquid form, the invoice shall instead indicate the total volume of the vapor product, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one milliliter. (C) No person shall make a false entry upon any invoice or record upon which an entry is required by this section and no person shall present any false entry for the inspection of the commissioner with the intent to evade the tax levied under section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5743.55. Whenever the tax commissioner discovers any tobacco products or vapor products, subject to the tax levied under section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code upon which the tax has not been paid or the commissioner has reason to believe the tax is being avoided, the commissioner may seize and take possession of the tobacco products or vapor products, which, upon seizure, shall be forfeited to the state. Within a reasonable time after seizure, the commissioner may sell the forfeited products. From the proceeds of this sale, the commissioner shall pay the costs incurred in the seizure and sale, and any proceeds remaining after the sale shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax. The seizure and sale shall not relieve any person from the fine or imprisonment provided for violation of sections 5743.51 to 5743.66 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall make the sale where it is most convenient and economical, but may order the destruction of the forfeited products if the quantity or quality is not sufficient to warrant their sale. Sec. 5743.56. (A) Any person required to pay the tax imposed by section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code is personally liable for the tax. The tax commissioner may make an assessment, based upon any information in the commissioner's possession, against any person who fails to file a return or pay any tax, interest, or additional charge as required by this chapter. The commissioner shall give the person assessed written notice of such assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) When the information in the possession of the tax commissioner indicates that a person liable for the tax imposed by section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code has not paid the full amount of tax due, the commissioner may audit a representative sample of the person's business and may issue an assessment based on such audit. (C) A penalty of up to fifteen per cent may be added to all amounts assessed under this section. The tax commissioner may adopt rules providing for the imposition and remission of such penalties. (D) Unless the person assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the person assessed or that person's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the person assessed to the treasurer of state. A petition shall indicate the objections of the person assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (E) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including accrued interest, remains unpaid, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the person assessed resides or in which the person assessed conducts business. If the person assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state tobacco products tax," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment is issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by issuing an assessment under this section. (F) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the person liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (E) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the person assessed or the legal representative of the person assessed, as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code, within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the person assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (D) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (G) All money collected by the tax commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state as revenue arising from the tax imposed by sections 5743.51, 5743.62, and 5743.63 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5743.57. (A) If any corporation, limited liability company, or business trust required to file returns pursuant to section 5743.52, 5743.62, or 5743.63 of the Revised Code fails to remit to the state any tax due under section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code, any of its employees having control or supervision of or charged with the responsibility of filing returns and making payments, and any of its officers, members, managers, trustees, or other persons who are responsible for the execution of the corporation's, limited liability company's, or business trust's fiscal responsibilities, is personally liable for the failure to remit the tax. The dissolution, termination, or bankruptcy of the corporation, limited liability company, or business trust does not discharge a responsible person's liability for the corporation's, limited liability company's, or business trust's failure to remit the tax due. The tax commissioner may assess a responsible person under section 5743.56 of the Revised Code. (B) Except for assessments against responsible persons under division (A) of this section, no assessment of the tax imposed by section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code shall be made by the tax commissioner more than three years after the date on which the return for the period assessed was due or was filed, whichever date is later. This section does not bar an assessment when any of the following occurs: (1) The person assessed failed to file a return required by section 5743.52, 5743.62, or 5743.63 of the Revised Code; (2) The person assessed knowingly filed a false or fraudulent return; (3) The person assessed and the tax commissioner have waived in writing the time limitation. Sec. 5743.59. (A) No retail dealer of tobacco products or vapor products shall have in the retail dealer's possession tobacco products or vapor products on which the tax imposed by section 5743.51 and, if applicable, section 5743.511 of the Revised Code has not been paid unless the retail dealer is licensed under section 5743.61 of the Revised Code. Payment may be evidenced by invoices from distributors or vapor distributors stating the tax has been paid. (B) The tax commissioner may inspect any place where tobacco products or vapor products subject to the tax levied under section 5743.51 or 5743.511 of the Revised Code are sold or stored. (C) No person shall prevent or hinder the commissioner from making a full inspection of any place where tobacco products or vapor products subject to the tax imposed by section 5743.51 or 5743.511 of the Revised Code are sold or stored, or prevent or hinder the full inspection of invoices, books, or records required to be kept by section 5743.54 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5743.60. No person shall prepare for shipment, ship, transport, deliver, prepare for distribution, or distribute tobacco products or vapor products, or otherwise engage or participate in the business of distributing tobacco products or vapor products, with the intent to avoid payment of the tax levied by section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code, when the wholesale price of the tobacco products or, in the case of a tax levied under section 5743.511, 5743.621, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code, the vapor products exceeds three hundred dollars, or when the vapor volume of the vapor products exceeds five hundred milliliters or five hundred grams, as applicable, during any twelve-month period. Sec. 5743.62. (A) To provide revenue for the general revenue fund of the state, an excise tax is hereby levied on the seller of tobacco products or vapor products in this state at one of the following rates: (1) For tobacco products other than little cigars or premium cigars, seventeen per cent of the wholesale price of the tobacco product whenever the tobacco product is delivered to a consumer in this state for the storage, use, or other consumption of such tobacco products. (2) For little cigars, thirty-seven per cent of the wholesale price of the little cigars whenever the little cigars are delivered to a consumer in this state for the storage, use, or other consumption of the little cigars. (3) For premium cigars, whenever the premium cigars are delivered to a consumer in this state for the storage, use, or other consumption of the premium cigars, the lesser of seventeen per cent of the wholesale price of such premium cigars or the maximum tax amount per each such premium cigar. (4) For vapor products, one cent multiplied by the vapor volume of vapor products when the vapor products are delivered to a consumer in this state for the storage, use, or other consumption of the vapor products. The tax imposed by this section applies only to sellers having substantial nexus with this state, as defined in section 5741.01 of the Revised Code. (B) A seller of tobacco products or vapor products who has substantial nexus with this state as defined in section 5741.01 of the Revised Code shall register with the tax commissioner and supply any information concerning the seller's contacts with this state as may be required by the tax commissioner. A seller who does not have substantial nexus with this state may voluntarily register with the tax commissioner. A seller who voluntarily registers with the tax commissioner is entitled to the same benefits and is subject to the same duties and requirements as a seller required to be registered with the tax commissioner under this division. (C) Each seller of tobacco products or vapor products subject to the tax levied by this section or section 5743.621 of the Revised Code, on or before the twenty-third day of each month, shall file with the tax commissioner a return for the preceding month showing any information the tax commissioner finds necessary for the proper administration of sections 5743.51 to 5743.66 of the Revised Code, together with remittance of the tax due, payable to the treasurer of state. The return and payment of the tax required by this section shall be filed in such a manner that it is received by the tax commissioner on or before the twenty-third day of the month following the reporting period. If the return is filed and the amount of the tax shown on the return to be due is paid on or before the date the return is required to be filed, the seller is entitled to a discount equal to two and five-tenths per cent of the amount shown on the return to be due. (D) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all money received from the tax levied by this section, and the treasurer shall credit the amount to the general revenue fund. (E) Each seller of tobacco products or vapor products subject to the tax levied by this section or section 5743.621 of the Revised Code shall mark on the invoices of tobacco products or vapor products sold that the tax levied by that section has been paid and shall indicate the seller's account number as assigned by the tax commissioner. Sec. 5743.621. For the same purposes for which it levies a tax under section 5743.511 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners of a county that levies a tax under that section shall adopt a resolution levying a tax at the same rate on the sellers of tobacco products or vapor products, as applicable, whenever the tobacco product or vapor product is delivered to a consumer in the county in which that tax is levied for the storage, use, or other consumption of such product. The tax shall take effect on the date that the tax levied under section 5743.511 of the Revised Code takes effect, and shall remain in effect as long as the tax levied under that section remains in effect. The tax imposed by this section applies only to sellers having substantial nexus with this state, as defined in section 5741.01 of the Revised Code. The tax levied under this section shall be in addition to the tax levied under section 5743.62 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5743.63. (A) To provide revenue for the general revenue fund of the state, an excise tax is hereby levied on the storage, use, or other consumption of tobacco products or vapor products at one of the following rates: (1) For tobacco products other than little cigars or premium cigars, seventeen per cent of the wholesale price of the tobacco product. (2) For little cigars, thirty-seven per cent of the wholesale price of the little cigars. (3) For premium cigars, the lesser of seventeen per cent of the wholesale price of the premium cigars or the maximum tax amount per each premium cigar. (4) For vapor products, one cent multiplied by the vapor volume of the vapor products. The tax levied under division (A) of this section is imposed only if the tax has not been paid by the seller as provided in section 5743.62 of the Revised Code, or by the distributor or vapor distributor as provided in section 5743.51 of the Revised Code. (B) Each person subject to the tax levied by this section or section 5743.631 of the Revised Code, on or before the twenty-third day of each month, shall file with the tax commissioner a return for the preceding month showing any information the commissioner finds necessary for the proper administration of sections 5743.51 to 5743.66 of the Revised Code, together with remittance of the tax due, payable to the treasurer of state. The return and payment of the tax required by this section shall be filed in such a manner that it is received by the commissioner on or before the twenty-third day of the month following the reporting period. (C) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all money received from the tax levied by this section, and the treasurer shall credit the amount to the general revenue fund. Sec. 5743.631. For the same purposes for which it levies a tax under section 5743.511 of the Revised Code, the board of county commissioners of a county that levies a tax under that section shall adopt a resolution levying a tax at the same rate on the use, consumption, or storage for consumption of tobacco products or vapor products, as applicable, by consumers in the county in which that tax is levied. The tax shall take effect on the date that the tax levied under section 5743.511 of the Revised Code takes effect and shall remain in effect as long as the tax levied under that section remains effective. The tax levied under this section is imposed only if the tax has not been paid by the seller as provided in section 5743.621 of the Revised Code, or by the distributor or vapor distributor as provided in section 5743.511 of the Revised Code. The tax levied under this section shall be in addition to the tax levied under section 5743.63 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5743.64. No person shall transport within this state tobacco products that have a wholesale value in excess of three hundred dollars, or vapor products with a vapor volume in excess of five hundred milliliters or five hundred grams, as applicable, unless the person has obtained consent to transport the tobacco products or vapor products from the tax commissioner prior to transportation. The consent is not required if the applicable tax levied under section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code has been paid or will be paid by the distributor, vapor distributor, or seller. Application for the consent shall be in the form prescribed by the commissioner. Every person transporting tobacco products or vapor products with the department's consent shall have the consent with the person while transporting or possessing the tobacco products or vapor products within this state and shall produce the consent upon request of any law enforcement officer or authorized agent of the tax commissioner. Any person transporting tobacco products or vapor products without the consent required by this section shall be subject to the provisions of sections 5743.51 to 5743.66 of the Revised Code, including the tax imposed by section 5743.51, 5743.511, 5743.62, or 5743.621, 5743.63, or 5743.631 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5745.03. (A) For each taxable year, each taxpayer shall file an annual report with the tax commissioner not later than the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the end of the taxpayer's taxable year, and shall remit with that report the amount of tax due as shown on the report less the amount paid for the year under section 5745.04 of the Revised Code. The remittance shall be made in the form prescribed by the commissioner. If the amount payable with the report exceeds one thousand dollars, the taxpayer shall remit the any amount due with the report electronically in a manner prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner shall credit ninety-eight and one-half per cent of such remittances to the municipal income tax fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury, and credit the remainder to the municipal income tax administrative fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. (B) Any taxpayer that has been granted an extension for filing a federal income tax return may request shall automatically receive an extension for filing the return required under this section by filing with the tax commissioner a copy of the taxpayer's request for the federal filing extension. The request shall be filed not later than the last day for filing the return as required under division (A) of this section. If such a request is properly and timely filed, and the commissioner shall extend the last day for filing the return required under this section for the same period for which the federal filing extension was granted. The commissioner may deny the filing extension request only if the taxpayer fails to timely file the request, fails to file a copy of the federal extension request, owes past due taxes, interest, or penalty under this chapter, or has failed to file a required report or other document for a prior taxable yearto the fifteenth day of the eleventh month after the last day of the taxable year to which the return relates. The granting of an extension under this section does not extend the last day for paying taxes without penalty pursuant to this chapter unless the commissioner extends the payment date. (C) A taxpayer that has not requested or received an extension for filing the taxpayer's federal income tax return may request that the commissioner grant the taxpayer a seven-month extension of the date for filing the taxpayer's tax return. If the commissioner receives the request on or before the date the tax return is due, the commissioner shall grant the taxpayer's extension request. (D) The annual report shall include statements of the following facts as of the last day of the taxpayer's taxable year: (1) The name of the taxpayer; (2) The name of the state or country under the laws of which it is incorporated; (3) The location of its principal office in this state and, in the case of a taxpayer organized under the laws of another state, the principal place of business in this state and the name and address of the officer or agent of the taxpayer in charge of the business conducted in this state; (4) The names of the president, secretary, treasurer, and statutory agent in this state, with the post-office address of each; (5)(2) The date on which the taxpayer's taxable year begins and ends; (6)(3) The taxpayer's federal taxable income during the taxpayer's taxable year; (7)(4) Any other information the tax commissioner requires for the proper administration of this chapter. (D)(E) The tax commissioner may require any reports required under this chapter to be filed in an electronic format. (E)(F) A municipal corporation may not require a taxpayer required to file a report under this section to file a report of the taxpayer's income, but a municipal corporation may require a taxpayer to report to the municipal corporation the value of the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property situated in the municipal corporation, compensation paid by the taxpayer to its employees in the municipal corporation, and sales made in the municipal corporation by the taxpayer, to the extent necessary for the municipal corporation to compute the taxpayer's municipal property, payroll, and sales factors for the municipal corporation. (F)(G) On or before the thirty-first day of January each year, each municipal corporation imposing a tax on income shall certify to the tax commissioner the rate of the tax in effect on the first day of January of that year. If any municipal corporation fails to certify its income tax rate as required by this division, the commissioner shall notify the director of budget and management, who, upon receiving such notification, shall withhold from each payment made to the municipal corporation under section 5745.05 of the Revised Code fifty per cent of the amount of the payment otherwise due the municipal corporation under that section as computed on the basis of the tax rate most recently certified until the municipal corporation certifies the tax rate in effect on the first day of January of that year. The tax rate used to determine the tax payable to a municipal corporation under this section for a taxpayer's taxable year shall be the tax rate in effect in a municipal corporation on the first day of January in that taxable year. If a taxpayer's taxable year is for a period less than twelve months that does not include the first day of January, the tax rate used to determine the tax payable to a municipal corporation under this section for the taxpayer's taxable year shall be the tax rate in effect in a municipal corporation on the first day of January in the preceding taxable year. Sec. 5745.04. (A) As used in this section, "combined tax liability" means the total of a taxpayer's income tax liabilities to all municipal corporations in this state for a taxable year. (B) Each taxpayer shall file a declaration of estimated tax report with, and remit estimated taxes to, the tax commissioner, payable to the treasurer of state, at the times and in the amounts prescribed in divisions (B)(1) to (4) of this section. The first taxable year a taxpayer is subject to this chapter, the estimated taxes the taxpayer is required to remit under this section shall be based solely on the current taxable year and not on the liability for the preceding taxable year. (1) Not less than twenty-five per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or twenty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (2) Not less than fifty per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or forty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (3) Not less than seventy-five per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or sixty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (4) Not less than one hundred per cent of the combined tax liability for the preceding taxable year or eighty per cent of the combined tax liability for the current taxable year shall have been remitted not later than the fifteenth day of the twelfth month after the end of the preceding taxable year. (C) Each taxpayer shall report on the declaration of estimated tax report the portion of the remittance that the taxpayer estimates that it owes to each municipal corporation for the taxable year. (D) Upon receiving a declaration of estimated tax report and remittance of estimated taxes under this section, the tax commissioner shall credit ninety-eight and one-half per cent of the remittance to the municipal income tax fund and credit the remainder to the municipal income tax administrative fund. (E) If any remittance of estimated taxes is for one thousand dollars or more, the The taxpayer shall make the remittance of estimated taxes electronically as prescribed by section 5745.041 of the Revised Code. (F) Notwithstanding section 5745.08 or 5745.09 of the Revised Code, no penalty or interest shall be imposed on a taxpayer if the declaration of estimated tax report is properly filed, and the estimated tax is paid, within the time prescribed by division (B) of this section. Sec. 5745.09. (A) In case of any underpayment of the estimated tax under section 5745.04 of the Revised Code, there shall be added the tax commissioner may add to the tax an amount determined at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment for the period of underpayment. (B) The amount of the underpayment shall be the excess of division (B)(1) over division (B)(2) of this section: (1) The amount of the estimated tax payment that would be required to be paid for the taxable year if the total estimated tax were equal to the total tax shown to be due on the annual report, or if no report was filed, the tax for such year; (2) The amount, if any, of the estimated tax paid on or before the last day prescribed for such payment. (C) The period of the underpayment shall run from the date the estimated tax payment was required to be made to the date on which such payment is made. For purposes of this section, a payment of estimated tax on any payment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent such payment exceeds the amount of the payment presently due. (D) All amounts collected under this section shall be considered as taxes collected under this chapter and shall be credited and distributed to municipal corporations in the same proportions as the taxpayer's taxes are distributed for the reporting period under section 5745.05 of the Revised Code or, if the taxpayer has filed the annual report for the year under section 5745.03 of the Revised Code, in the amounts found to be due to such municipal corporations on the basis of the annual report. Sec. 5745.12. (A) If any taxpayer required to file a report under this chapter fails to file the report within the time prescribed, files an incorrect report, or fails to remit the full amount of the tax due for the period covered by the report, the tax commissioner may make an assessment against the taxpayer for any deficiency for the period for which the report or tax is due, based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. The tax commissioner shall not make or issue an assessment against a taxpayer more than three years after the later of the final date the report subject to assessment was required to be filed or the date the report was filed. Such time limit may be extended if both the taxpayer and the commissioner consent in writing to the extension. Any such extension shall extend the three-year time limit in section 5745.11 of the Revised Code for the same period of time. There shall be no bar or limit to an assessment against a taxpayer that fails to file a report subject to assessment as required by this chapter, or that files a fraudulent report. The commissioner shall give the taxpayer assessed written notice of the assessment as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the taxpayer assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the authorized agent of the taxpayer assessed having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the taxpayer to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the taxpayer's objections, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the taxpayer has an office or place of business in this state, the county in which the taxpayer's statutory agent is located, or Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment against the taxpayer assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for municipal income taxes," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by issuing an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected under this section shall be credited and distributed to the municipal corporation to which the money is owed based on the assessment issued under this section. (E) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax imposed by this chapter will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the taxpayer liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (C) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the taxpayer assessed or the taxpayer's legal representative in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the taxpayer assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (B) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (F) Notwithstanding the fact that a petition for reassessment is pending, the taxpayer may pay all or a portion of the assessment that is the subject of the petition. The acceptance of a payment by the treasurer of state does not prejudice any claim for refund upon final determination of the petition. If upon final determination of the petition an error in the assessment is corrected by the tax commissioner, upon petition so filed or pursuant to a decision of the board of tax appeals or any court to which the determination or decision has been appealed, so that the amount due from the taxpayer under the corrected assessment is less than the portion paid, there shall be issued to the taxpayer, its assigns, or legal representative a refund in the amount of the overpayment as provided by section 5745.11 of the Revised Code, with interest on that amount as provided by section 5745.11 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.01. Except as otherwise expressly provided or clearly appearing from the context, any term used in this chapter that is not otherwise defined in this section has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes or if not used in a comparable context in those laws, has the same meaning as in section 5733.40 of the Revised Code. Any reference in this chapter to the Internal Revenue Code includes other laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes. As used in this chapter: (A) "Adjusted gross income" or "Ohio adjusted gross income" means federal adjusted gross income, as defined and used in the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted as provided in this section: (1) Add interest or dividends on obligations or securities of any state or of any political subdivision or authority of any state, other than this state and its subdivisions and authorities. (2) Add interest or dividends on obligations of any authority, commission, instrumentality, territory, or possession of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from federal income taxes but not from state income taxes. (3) Deduct interest or dividends on obligations of the United States and its territories and possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are included in federal adjusted gross income but exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the United States. (4) Deduct disability and survivor's benefits to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income. (5) Deduct the following, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income: (a) Benefits under Title II of the Social Security Act and tier 1 railroad retirement; (b) Railroad retirement benefits, other than tier 1 railroad retirement benefits, to the extent such amounts are exempt from state taxation under federal law. (6) Deduct the amount of wages and salaries, if any, not otherwise allowable as a deduction but that would have been allowable as a deduction in computing federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year, had the work opportunity tax credit allowed and determined under sections 38, 51, and 52 of the Internal Revenue Code not been in effect. (7) Deduct any interest or interest equivalent on public obligations and purchase obligations to the extent that the interest or interest equivalent is included in federal adjusted gross income. (8) Add any loss or deduct any gain resulting from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of public obligations to the extent that the loss has been deducted or the gain has been included in computing federal adjusted gross income. (9) Deduct or add amounts, as provided under section 5747.70 of the Revised Code, related to contributions made to or tuition units purchased under a qualified tuition program established pursuant to section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. (10)(a) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise allowable as a deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer paid during the taxable year for medical care insurance and qualified long-term care insurance for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and dependents. No deduction for medical care insurance under division (A)(10)(a) of this section shall be allowed either to any taxpayer who is eligible to participate in any subsidized health plan maintained by any employer of the taxpayer or of the taxpayer's spouse, or to any taxpayer who is entitled to, or on application would be entitled to, benefits under part A of Title XVIII of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C. 301, as amended. For the purposes of division (A)(10)(a) of this section, "subsidized health plan" means a health plan for which the employer pays any portion of the plan's cost. The deduction allowed under division (A)(10)(a) of this section shall be the net of any related premium refunds, related premium reimbursements, or related insurance premium dividends received during the taxable year. (b) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income during the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer paid during the taxable year, not compensated for by any insurance or otherwise, for medical care of the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and dependents, to the extent the expenses exceed seven and one-half per cent of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income. (c) For purposes of division (A)(10) of this section, "medical care" has the meaning given in section 213 of the Internal Revenue Code, subject to the special rules, limitations, and exclusions set forth therein, and "qualified long-term care" has the same meaning given in section 7702B(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. Solely for purposes of division (A)(10)(a) of this section, "dependent" includes a person who otherwise would be a "qualifying relative" and thus a "dependent" under section 152 of the Internal Revenue Code but for the fact that the person fails to meet the income and support limitations under section 152(d)(1)(B) and (C) of the Internal Revenue Code. (11)(a) Deduct any amount included in federal adjusted gross income solely because the amount represents a reimbursement or refund of expenses that in any year the taxpayer had deducted as an itemized deduction pursuant to section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable United States department of the treasury regulations. The deduction otherwise allowed under division (A)(11)(a) of this section shall be reduced to the extent the reimbursement is attributable to an amount the taxpayer deducted under this section in any taxable year. (b) Add any amount not otherwise included in Ohio adjusted gross income for any taxable year to the extent that the amount is attributable to the recovery during the taxable year of any amount deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income in any taxable year. (12) Deduct any portion of the deduction described in section 1341(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for repaying previously reported income received under a claim of right, that meets both of the following requirements: (a) It is allowable for repayment of an item that was included in the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for a prior taxable year and did not qualify for a credit under division (A) or (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code for that year; (b) It does not otherwise reduce the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the current or any other taxable year. (13) Deduct an amount equal to the deposits made to, and net investment earnings of, a medical savings account during the taxable year, in accordance with section 3924.66 of the Revised Code. The deduction allowed by division (A)(13) of this section does not apply to medical savings account deposits and earnings otherwise deducted or excluded for the current or any other taxable year from the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income. (14)(a) Add an amount equal to the funds withdrawn from a medical savings account during the taxable year, and the net investment earnings on those funds, when the funds withdrawn were used for any purpose other than to reimburse an account holder for, or to pay, eligible medical expenses, in accordance with section 3924.66 of the Revised Code; (b) Add the amounts distributed from a medical savings account under division (A)(2) of section 3924.68 of the Revised Code during the taxable year. (15) Add any amount claimed as a credit under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code to the extent that such amount satisfies either of the following: (a) The amount was deducted or excluded from the computation of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income as required to be reported for the taxpayer's taxable year under the Internal Revenue Code; (b) The amount resulted in a reduction of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income as required to be reported for any of the taxpayer's taxable years under the Internal Revenue Code. (16) Deduct the amount contributed by the taxpayer to an individual development account program established by a county department of job and family services pursuant to sections 329.11 to 329.14 of the Revised Code for the purpose of matching funds deposited by program participants. On request of the tax commissioner, the taxpayer shall provide any information that, in the tax commissioner's opinion, is necessary to establish the amount deducted under division (A)(16) of this section. (17)(a)(i) Subject to divisions (A)(17)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this section, add five-sixths of the amount of depreciation expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, including the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive share of the amount of depreciation expense allowed by that subsection to a pass-through entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect ownership interest. (ii) Subject to divisions (A)(17)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this section, add five-sixths of the amount of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense, including the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive share of the amount of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense allowed to any pass-through entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect ownership interest. (iii) Subject to division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, for taxable years beginning in 2012 or thereafter, if the increase in income taxes withheld by the taxpayer is equal to or greater than ten per cent of income taxes withheld by the taxpayer during the taxpayer's immediately preceding taxable year, "two-thirds" shall be substituted for "five-sixths" for the purpose of divisions (A)(17)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section. (iv) Subject to division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, for taxable years beginning in 2012 or thereafter, a taxpayer is not required to add an amount under division (A)(17) of this section if the increase in income taxes withheld by the taxpayer and by any pass-through entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect ownership interest is equal to or greater than the sum of (I) the amount of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense and (II) the amount of depreciation expense allowed to the taxpayer by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, and including the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive shares of such amounts allowed to any such pass-through entities. (v) If a taxpayer directly or indirectly incurs a net operating loss for the taxable year for federal income tax purposes, to the extent such loss resulted from depreciation expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code and by qualifying section 179 depreciation expense, "the entire" shall be substituted for "five-sixths of the" for the purpose of divisions (A)(17)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section. The tax commissioner, under procedures established by the commissioner, may waive the add-backs related to a pass-through entity if the taxpayer owns, directly or indirectly, less than five per cent of the pass-through entity. (b) Nothing in division (A)(17) of this section shall be construed to adjust or modify the adjusted basis of any asset. (c) To the extent the add-back required under division (A)(17)(a) of this section is attributable to property generating nonbusiness income or loss allocated under section 5747.20 of the Revised Code, the add-back shall be sitused to the same location as the nonbusiness income or loss generated by the property for the purpose of determining the credit under division (A) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code. Otherwise, the add-back shall be apportioned, subject to one or more of the four alternative methods of apportionment enumerated in section 5747.21 of the Revised Code. (d) For the purposes of division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, net operating loss carryback and carryforward shall not include the allowance of any net operating loss deduction carryback or carryforward to the taxable year to the extent such loss resulted from depreciation allowed by section 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code and by the qualifying section 179 depreciation expense amount. (e) For the purposes of divisions (A)(17) and (18) of this section: (i) "Income taxes withheld" means the total amount withheld and remitted under sections 5747.06 and 5747.07 of the Revised Code by an employer during the employer's taxable year. (ii) "Increase in income taxes withheld" means the amount by which the amount of income taxes withheld by an employer during the employer's current taxable year exceeds the amount of income taxes withheld by that employer during the employer's immediately preceding taxable year. (iii) "Qualifying section 179 depreciation expense" means the difference between (I) the amount of depreciation expense directly or indirectly allowed to a taxpayer under section 179 of the Internal Revised Code, and (II) the amount of depreciation expense directly or indirectly allowed to the taxpayer under section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code as that section existed on December 31, 2002. (18)(a) If the taxpayer was required to add an amount under division (A)(17)(a) of this section for a taxable year, deduct one of the following: (i) One-fifth of the amount so added for each of the five succeeding taxable years if the amount so added was five-sixths of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense or depreciation expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code; (ii) One-half of the amount so added for each of the two succeeding taxable years if the amount so added was two-thirds of such depreciation expense; (iii) One-sixth of the amount so added for each of the six succeeding taxable years if the entire amount of such depreciation expense was so added. (b) If the amount deducted under division (A)(18)(a) of this section is attributable to an add-back allocated under division (A)(17)(c) of this section, the amount deducted shall be sitused to the same location. Otherwise, the add-back deduction shall be apportioned using the apportionment factors for the taxable year in which the deduction is taken, subject to one or more of the four alternative methods of apportionment enumerated in section 5747.21 of the Revised Code. (c) No deduction is available under division (A)(18)(a) of this section with regard to any depreciation allowed by section 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code and by the qualifying section 179 depreciation expense amount to the extent that such depreciation results in or increases a federal net operating loss carryback or carryforward. If no such deduction is available for a taxable year, the taxpayer may carry forward the amount not deducted in such taxable year to the next taxable year and add that amount to any deduction otherwise available under division (A)(18)(a) of this section for that next taxable year. The carryforward of amounts not so deducted shall continue until the entire addition required by division (A)(17)(a) of this section has been deducted. (19) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the taxable year as reimbursement for life insurance premiums under section 5919.31 of the Revised Code. (20) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the taxable year as a death benefit paid by the adjutant general under section 5919.33 of the Revised Code. (21) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income and not otherwise allowable as a deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, military pay and allowances received by the taxpayer during the taxable year for active duty service in the United States army, air force, navy, marine corps, or coast guard armed services of the United States, as defined in section 5907.01 of the Revised Code, or reserve components thereof or the national guard. The deduction may not be claimed for military pay and allowances received by the taxpayer while the taxpayer is stationed in this state. (22) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise allowable as a deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year and not otherwise compensated for by any other source, the amount of qualified organ donation expenses incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed ten thousand dollars. A taxpayer may deduct qualified organ donation expenses only once for all taxable years beginning with taxable years beginning in 2007. For the purposes of division (A)(22) of this section: (a) "Human organ" means all or any portion of a human liver, pancreas, kidney, intestine, or lung, and any portion of human bone marrow. (b) "Qualified organ donation expenses" means travel expenses, lodging expenses, and wages and salary forgone by a taxpayer in connection with the taxpayer's donation, while living, of one or more of the taxpayer's human organs to another human being. (23) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts received by the taxpayer as retired personnel pay for service in the uniformed services or reserve components thereof, or the national guard, or received by the surviving spouse or former spouse of such a taxpayer under the survivor benefit plan on account of such a taxpayer's death. If the taxpayer receives income on account of retirement paid under the federal civil service retirement system or federal employees retirement system, or under any successor retirement program enacted by the congress of the United States that is established and maintained for retired employees of the United States government, and such retirement income is based, in whole or in part, on credit for the taxpayer's uniformed service, the deduction allowed under this division shall include only that portion of such retirement income that is attributable to the taxpayer's uniformed service, to the extent that portion of such retirement income is otherwise included in federal adjusted gross income and is not otherwise deducted under this section. Any amount deducted under division (A)(23) of this section is not included in a taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the purposes of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code. No amount may be deducted under division (A)(23) of this section on the basis of which a credit was claimed under section 5747.055 of the Revised Code. (24) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the taxable year from the military injury relief fund created in section 5902.05 of the Revised Code. (25) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received as a veterans bonus during the taxable year from the Ohio department of veterans services as authorized by Section 2r of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. (26) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, any income derived from a transfer agreement or from the enterprise transferred under that agreement under section 4313.02 of the Revised Code. (27) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, Ohio college opportunity or federal Pell grant amounts received by the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse or dependent pursuant to section 3333.122 of the Revised Code or 20 U.S.C. 1070a, et seq., and used to pay room or board furnished by the educational institution for which the grant was awarded at the institution's facilities, including meal plans administered by the institution. For the purposes of this division, receipt of a grant includes the distribution of a grant directly to an educational institution and the crediting of the grant to the enrollee's account with the institution. (28) Deduct from the portion of an individual's federal adjusted gross income that is business income, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year, one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars for each spouse if spouses file separate returns under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code or two hundred fifty thousand dollars for all other individuals. (29) Deduct, as provided under section 5747.78 of the Revised Code, contributions to ABLE savings accounts made in accordance with sections 113.50 to 113.56 of the Revised Code. (30)(a) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income during the taxable year, all of the following: (i) Compensation paid to a qualifying employee described in division (A)(14)(a) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code to the extent such compensation is for disaster work conducted in this state during a disaster response period pursuant to a qualifying solicitation received by the employee's employer; (ii) Compensation paid to a qualifying employee described in division (A)(14)(b) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code to the extent such compensation is for disaster work conducted in this state by the employee during the disaster response period on critical infrastructure owned or used by the employee's employer; (iii) Income received by an out-of-state disaster business for disaster work conducted in this state during a disaster response period, or, if the out-of-state disaster business is a pass-through entity, a taxpayer's distributive share of the pass-through entity's income from the business conducting disaster work in this state during a disaster response period, if, in either case, the disaster work is conducted pursuant to a qualifying solicitation received by the business. (b) All terms used in division (A)(30) of this section have the same meanings as in section 5703.94 of the Revised Code. (31) For a taxpayer who is a qualifying Ohio educator, deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the lesser of two three hundred fifty dollars or the amount of expenses described in subsections (a)(2)(D)(i) and (ii) of section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code paid or incurred by the taxpayer during the taxpayer's taxable year in excess of the amount the taxpayer is authorized to deduct for that taxable year under subsection (a)(2)(D) of that section. (32) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts received by the taxpayer as a disability severance payment, computed under 10 U.S.C. 1212, following discharge or release under honorable conditions from the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 5907.01 of the Revised Code. (33) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal adjusted gross income or Ohio adjusted gross income, amounts not subject to tax due to an agreement entered into under division (A)(2) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code. (34) Deduct amounts as provided under section 5747.79 of the Revised Code related to the taxpayer's qualifying capital gains and deductible payroll. To the extent a qualifying capital gain described under division (A)(34) of this section is business income, the taxpayer shall deduct those gains under this division before deducting any such gains under division (A)(28) of this section. (35)(a) For taxable years beginning in or after 2026, deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year: (i) One hundred per cent of the capital gain received by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a qualifying interest in an Ohio venture capital operating company attributable to the company's investments in Ohio businesses during the period for which the company was an Ohio venture operating company; and (ii) Fifty per cent of the capital gain received by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a qualifying interest in an Ohio venture capital operating company attributable to the company's investments in all other businesses during the period for which the company was an Ohio venture operating company. (b) Add amounts previously deducted by the taxpayer under division (A)(35)(a) of this section if the director of development certifies to the tax commissioner that the requirements for the deduction were not met. (c) All terms used in division (A)(35) of this section have the same meanings as in section 122.851 of the Revised Code. (d) To the extent a capital gain described in division (A)(35)(a) of this section is business income, the taxpayer shall apply that division before applying division (A)(28) of this section. (36) Add, to the extent not otherwise included in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for any taxable year, the taxpayer's proportionate share of the amount of the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and paid by an electing pass-through entity for the taxable year. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, the portion of the addition required by division (A)(36) of this section related to the apportioned business income of the pass-through entity shall be considered business income under division (B) of this section. Such addition is eligible for the deduction in division (A)(28) of this section, subject to the applicable dollar limitations, and the tax rate prescribed by division (A)(4)(a) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. The taxpayer shall provide, upon request of the tax commissioner, any documentation necessary to verify the portion of the addition that is business income under this division. (37) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts delivered to a qualifying institution pursuant to section 3333.128 of the Revised Code for the benefit of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse or dependent. (38) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts received under the Ohio adoption grant program pursuant to section 5101.191 5180.451 of the Revised Code. (39) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, income attributable to amounts provided to a taxpayer for any of the purposes for which an exclusion would have been authorized under section 139 of the Internal Revenue Code if the train derailment near the city of East Palestine on February 3, 2023, had been a qualified disaster pursuant to that section, or to compensate for lost business resulting from that derailment, if such amounts are provided by any of the following: (a) A federal, state, or local government agency; (b) A railroad company, as that term is defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; (c) Any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of a railroad company or any related person. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the derailment is not required to meet the definition of a "qualified disaster" pursuant to section 139 of the Internal Revenue Code to qualify for the deduction under this section. (40) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, income attributable to loan repayments on behalf of the taxpayer under the rural practice incentive program under section 3333.135 of the Revised Code. (41) Add any income taxes deducted in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income to the extent the income taxes were derived from income subject to a tax levied in another state or the District of Columbia when such tax was enacted for purposes of complying with internal revenue service notice 2020-75. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, the portion of the addition required by division (A)(41) of this section related to the apportioned business income of the pass-through entity shall be considered business income under division (B) of this section. Such addition is eligible for the deduction in division (A)(28) of this section, subject to the applicable dollar limitations, and the tax rate prescribed by division (A)(4)(a) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. The taxpayer shall provide, upon request of the tax commissioner, any documentation necessary to verify the portion of the addition that is business income under this division. (42) Deduct amounts contributed to a homeownership savings account and calculated pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. (43) If the taxpayer is the account owner, add the amount of funds withdrawn from a homeownership savings account not used for eligible expenses, regardless of who deposited those funds of a homeownership savings account, upon withdrawal or transfer of funds from the account, or closure of the account containing funds that are not used for eligible expenses, add the amount of such funds not used for an eligible expense. The addition required under this division shall not exceed the sum of the amounts deducted by the taxpayer for such account under division (A)(42) of this section in any taxable year and the amount of any funds deposited in the account by a contributor other than the account owner. As used in division (A)(43) of this section, "homeownership savings account," "contributor," "account owner," and "eligible expenses" have the same meanings as in section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. (44) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income during the taxable year, up to seven hundred fifty dollars of contributions the taxpayer makes to a pregnancy resource center that meets the criteria in division (B) of section 5101.804 of the Revised Code. (B) "Business income" means income, including gain or loss, arising from transactions, activities, and sources in the regular course of a trade or business and includes income, gain, or loss from real property, tangible property, and intangible property if the acquisition, rental, management, and disposition of the property constitute integral parts of the regular course of a trade or business operation. "Business income" includes income, including gain or loss, from a partial or complete liquidation of a business, including, but not limited to, gain or loss from the sale or other disposition of goodwill or the sale of an equity or ownership interest in a business. As used in this division, the "sale of an equity or ownership interest in a business" means sales to which either or both of the following apply: (1) The sale is treated for federal income tax purposes as the sale of assets. (2) The seller materially participated, as described in 26 C.F.R. 1.469-5T, in the activities of the business during the taxable year in which the sale occurs or during any of the five preceding taxable years. (C) "Nonbusiness income" means all income other than business income and may include, but is not limited to, compensation, rents and royalties from real or tangible personal property, capital gains, interest, dividends and distributions, patent or copyright royalties, or lottery winnings, prizes, and awards. (D) "Compensation" means any form of remuneration paid to an employee for personal services. (E) "Fiduciary" means a guardian, trustee, executor, administrator, receiver, conservator, or any other person acting in any fiduciary capacity for any individual, trust, or estate. (F) "Fiscal year" means an accounting period of twelve months ending on the last day of any month other than December. (G) "Individual" means any natural person. (H) "Internal Revenue Code" means the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 1, as amended. (I) "Resident" means any of the following: (1) An individual who is domiciled in this state, subject to section 5747.24 of the Revised Code; (2) The estate of a decedent who at the time of death was domiciled in this state. The domicile tests of section 5747.24 of the Revised Code are not controlling for purposes of division (I)(2) of this section. (3) A trust that, in whole or part, resides in this state. If only part of a trust resides in this state, the trust is a resident only with respect to that part. For the purposes of division (I)(3) of this section: (a) A trust resides in this state for the trust's current taxable year to the extent, as described in division (I)(3)(d) of this section, that the trust consists directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, of assets, net of any related liabilities, that were transferred, or caused to be transferred, directly or indirectly, to the trust by any of the following: (i) A person, a court, or a governmental entity or instrumentality on account of the death of a decedent, but only if the trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(i) or (ii) of this section; (ii) A person who was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter when the person directly or indirectly transferred assets to an irrevocable trust, but only if at least one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter during all or some portion of the trust's current taxable year; (iii) A person who was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter when the trust document or instrument or part of the trust document or instrument became irrevocable, but only if at least one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is a resident domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter during all or some portion of the trust's current taxable year. If a trust document or instrument became irrevocable upon the death of a person who at the time of death was domiciled in this state for purposes of this chapter, that person is a person described in division (I)(3)(a)(iii) of this section. (b) A trust is irrevocable to the extent that the transferor is not considered to be the owner of the net assets of the trust under sections 671 to 678 of the Internal Revenue Code. (c) With respect to a trust other than a charitable lead trust, "qualifying beneficiary" has the same meaning as "potential current beneficiary" as defined in section 1361(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, and with respect to a charitable lead trust "qualifying beneficiary" is any current, future, or contingent beneficiary, but with respect to any trust "qualifying beneficiary" excludes a person or a governmental entity or instrumentality to any of which a contribution would qualify for the charitable deduction under section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code. (d) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(a) of this section, the extent to which a trust consists directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, of assets, net of any related liabilities, that were transferred directly or indirectly, in whole or part, to the trust by any of the sources enumerated in that division shall be ascertained by multiplying the fair market value of the trust's assets, net of related liabilities, by the qualifying ratio, which shall be computed as follows: (i) The first time the trust receives assets, the numerator of the qualifying ratio is the fair market value of those assets at that time, net of any related liabilities, from sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section. The denominator of the qualifying ratio is the fair market value of all the trust's assets at that time, net of any related liabilities. (ii) Each subsequent time the trust receives assets, a revised qualifying ratio shall be computed. The numerator of the revised qualifying ratio is the sum of (1) the fair market value of the trust's assets immediately prior to the subsequent transfer, net of any related liabilities, multiplied by the qualifying ratio last computed without regard to the subsequent transfer, and (2) the fair market value of the subsequently transferred assets at the time transferred, net of any related liabilities, from sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section. The denominator of the revised qualifying ratio is the fair market value of all the trust's assets immediately after the subsequent transfer, net of any related liabilities. (iii) Whether a transfer to the trust is by or from any of the sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section shall be ascertained without regard to the domicile of the trust's beneficiaries. (e) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(a)(i) of this section: (i) A trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(i) of this section if the trust is a testamentary trust and the testator of that testamentary trust was domiciled in this state at the time of the testator's death for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code. (ii) A trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(ii) of this section if the transfer is a qualifying transfer described in any of divisions (I)(3)(f)(i) to (vi) of this section, the trust is an irrevocable inter vivos trust, and at least one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is domiciled in this state for purposes of this chapter during all or some portion of the trust's current taxable year. (f) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(e)(ii) of this section, a "qualifying transfer" is a transfer of assets, net of any related liabilities, directly or indirectly to a trust, if the transfer is described in any of the following: (i) The transfer is made to a trust, created by the decedent before the decedent's death and while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter, and, prior to the death of the decedent, the trust became irrevocable while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter. (ii) The transfer is made to a trust to which the decedent, prior to the decedent's death, had directly or indirectly transferred assets, net of any related liabilities, while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter, and prior to the death of the decedent the trust became irrevocable while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter. (iii) The transfer is made on account of a contractual relationship existing directly or indirectly between the transferor and either the decedent or the estate of the decedent at any time prior to the date of the decedent's death, and the decedent was domiciled in this state at the time of death for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code. (iv) The transfer is made to a trust on account of a contractual relationship existing directly or indirectly between the transferor and another person who at the time of the decedent's death was domiciled in this state for purposes of this chapter. (v) The transfer is made to a trust on account of the will of a testator who was domiciled in this state at the time of the testator's death for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code. (vi) The transfer is made to a trust created by or caused to be created by a court, and the trust was directly or indirectly created in connection with or as a result of the death of an individual who, for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code, was domiciled in this state at the time of the individual's death. (g) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to ascertain the part of a trust residing in this state. (J) "Nonresident" means an individual or estate that is not a resident. An individual who is a resident for only part of a taxable year is a nonresident for the remainder of that taxable year. (K) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (L) "Return" means the notifications and reports required to be filed pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of reporting the tax due and includes declarations of estimated tax when so required. (M) "Taxable year" means the calendar year or the taxpayer's fiscal year ending during the calendar year, or fractional part thereof, upon which the adjusted gross income is calculated pursuant to this chapter. (N) "Taxpayer" means any person subject to the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code or any pass-through entity that makes the election under division (D) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code. (O) "Dependents" means one of the following: (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2026, dependents as defined in the Internal Revenue Code; (2) For all other taxable years, dependents as defined in the Internal Revenue Code and as claimed in the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the taxable year or which the taxpayer would have been permitted to claim had the taxpayer filed a federal income tax return. (P) "Principal county of employment" means, in the case of a nonresident, the county within the state in which a taxpayer performs services for an employer or, if those services are performed in more than one county, the county in which the major portion of the services are performed. (Q) As used in sections 5747.50 to 5747.55 of the Revised Code: (1) "Subdivision" means any county, municipal corporation, park district, or township. (2) "Essential local government purposes" includes all functions that any subdivision is required by general law to exercise, including like functions that are exercised under a charter adopted pursuant to the Ohio Constitution. (R) "Overpayment" means any amount already paid that exceeds the figure determined to be the correct amount of the tax. (S) "Taxable income" or "Ohio taxable income" applies only to estates and trusts, and means federal taxable income, as defined and used in the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted as follows: (1) Add interest or dividends, net of ordinary, necessary, and reasonable expenses not deducted in computing federal taxable income, on obligations or securities of any state or of any political subdivision or authority of any state, other than this state and its subdivisions and authorities, but only to the extent that such net amount is not otherwise includible in Ohio taxable income and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or (b) of this section: (a) The net amount is not attributable to the S portion of an electing small business trust and has not been distributed to beneficiaries for the taxable year; (b) The net amount is attributable to the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year. (2) Add interest or dividends, net of ordinary, necessary, and reasonable expenses not deducted in computing federal taxable income, on obligations of any authority, commission, instrumentality, territory, or possession of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from federal income taxes but not from state income taxes, but only to the extent that such net amount is not otherwise includible in Ohio taxable income and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or (b) of this section; (3) Add the amount of personal exemption allowed to the estate pursuant to section 642(b) of the Internal Revenue Code; (4) Deduct interest or dividends, net of related expenses deducted in computing federal taxable income, on obligations of the United States and its territories and possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from state taxes under the laws of the United States, but only to the extent that such amount is included in federal taxable income and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or (b) of this section; (5) Deduct the amount of wages and salaries, if any, not otherwise allowable as a deduction but that would have been allowable as a deduction in computing federal taxable income for the taxable year, had the work opportunity tax credit allowed under sections 38, 51, and 52 of the Internal Revenue Code not been in effect, but only to the extent such amount relates either to income included in federal taxable income for the taxable year or to income of the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year; (6) Deduct any interest or interest equivalent, net of related expenses deducted in computing federal taxable income, on public obligations and purchase obligations, but only to the extent that such net amount relates either to income included in federal taxable income for the taxable year or to income of the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year; (7) Add any loss or deduct any gain resulting from sale, exchange, or other disposition of public obligations to the extent that such loss has been deducted or such gain has been included in computing either federal taxable income or income of the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year; (8) Except in the case of the final return of an estate, add any amount deducted by the taxpayer on both its Ohio estate tax return pursuant to section 5731.14 of the Revised Code, and on its federal income tax return in determining federal taxable income; (9)(a) Deduct any amount included in federal taxable income solely because the amount represents a reimbursement or refund of expenses that in a previous year the decedent had deducted as an itemized deduction pursuant to section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable treasury regulations. The deduction otherwise allowed under division (S)(9)(a) of this section shall be reduced to the extent the reimbursement is attributable to an amount the taxpayer or decedent deducted under this section in any taxable year. (b) Add any amount not otherwise included in Ohio taxable income for any taxable year to the extent that the amount is attributable to the recovery during the taxable year of any amount deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio taxable income in any taxable year, but only to the extent such amount has not been distributed to beneficiaries for the taxable year. (10) Deduct any portion of the deduction described in section 1341(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for repaying previously reported income received under a claim of right, that meets both of the following requirements: (a) It is allowable for repayment of an item that was included in the taxpayer's taxable income or the decedent's adjusted gross income for a prior taxable year and did not qualify for a credit under division (A) or (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code for that year. (b) It does not otherwise reduce the taxpayer's taxable income or the decedent's adjusted gross income for the current or any other taxable year. (11) Add any amount claimed as a credit under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code to the extent that the amount satisfies either of the following: (a) The amount was deducted or excluded from the computation of the taxpayer's federal taxable income as required to be reported for the taxpayer's taxable year under the Internal Revenue Code; (b) The amount resulted in a reduction in the taxpayer's federal taxable income as required to be reported for any of the taxpayer's taxable years under the Internal Revenue Code. (12) Deduct any amount, net of related expenses deducted in computing federal taxable income, that a trust is required to report as farm income on its federal income tax return, but only if the assets of the trust include at least ten acres of land satisfying the definition of "land devoted exclusively to agricultural use" under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the land is valued for tax purposes as such land under sections 5713.30 to 5713.38 of the Revised Code. If the trust is a pass-through entity investor, section 5747.231 of the Revised Code applies in ascertaining if the trust is eligible to claim the deduction provided by division (S)(12) of this section in connection with the pass-through entity's farm income. Except for farm income attributable to the S portion of an electing small business trust, the deduction provided by division (S)(12) of this section is allowed only to the extent that the trust has not distributed such farm income. (13) Add the net amount of income described in section 641(c) of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent that amount is not included in federal taxable income. (14) Deduct Add or deduct the amount the taxpayer would be required to add or deduct under division (A)(18)(A)(17) or (18) of this section if the taxpayer's Ohio taxable income were was computed in the same manner as an individual's Ohio adjusted gross income is computed under this section. (15) Add, to the extent not otherwise included in computing taxable income or Ohio taxable income for any taxable year, the taxpayer's proportionate share of the amount of the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and paid by an electing pass-through entity for the taxable year. (16) Add any income taxes deducted in computing federal taxable income or Ohio taxable income to the extent the income taxes were derived from income subject to a tax levied in another state or the District of Columbia when such tax was enacted for purposes of complying with internal revenue service notice 2020-75. (T) "School district income" and "school district income tax" have the same meanings as in section 5748.01 of the Revised Code. (U) As used in divisions (A)(7), (A)(8), (S)(6), and (S)(7) of this section, "public obligations," "purchase obligations," and "interest or interest equivalent" have the same meanings as in section 5709.76 of the Revised Code. (V) "Limited liability company" means any limited liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, or the laws of any other state. (W) "Pass-through entity investor" means any person who, during any portion of a taxable year of a pass-through entity, is a partner, member, shareholder, or equity investor in that pass-through entity. (X) "Banking day" has the same meaning as in section 1304.01 of the Revised Code. (Y) "Month" means a calendar month. (Z) "Quarter" means the first three months, the second three months, the third three months, or the last three months of the taxpayer's taxable year. (AA)(1) "Modified business income" means the business income included in a trust's Ohio taxable income after such taxable income is first reduced by the qualifying trust amount, if any. (2) "Qualifying trust amount" of a trust means capital gains and losses from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of equity or ownership interests in, or debt obligations of, a qualifying investee to the extent included in the trust's Ohio taxable income, but only if the following requirements are satisfied: (a) The book value of the qualifying investee's physical assets in this state and everywhere, as of the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or loss, is available to the trust. (b) The requirements of section 5747.011 of the Revised Code are satisfied for the trust's taxable year in which the trust recognizes the gain or loss. Any gain or loss that is not a qualifying trust amount is modified business income, qualifying investment income, or modified nonbusiness income, as the case may be. (3) "Modified nonbusiness income" means a trust's Ohio taxable income other than modified business income, other than the qualifying trust amount, and other than qualifying investment income, as defined in section 5747.012 of the Revised Code, to the extent such qualifying investment income is not otherwise part of modified business income. (4) "Modified Ohio taxable income" applies only to trusts, and means the sum of the amounts described in divisions (AA)(4)(a) to (c) of this section: (a) The fraction, calculated under section 5747.013, and applying section 5747.231 of the Revised Code, multiplied by the sum of the following amounts: (i) The trust's modified business income; (ii) The trust's qualifying investment income, as defined in section 5747.012 of the Revised Code, but only to the extent the qualifying investment income does not otherwise constitute modified business income and does not otherwise constitute a qualifying trust amount. (b) The qualifying trust amount multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the book value of the qualifying investee's physical assets in this state on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the day on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount, and the denominator of which is the sum of the book value of the qualifying investee's total physical assets everywhere on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the day on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount. If, for a taxable year, the trust recognizes a qualifying trust amount with respect to more than one qualifying investee, the amount described in division (AA)(4)(b) of this section shall equal the sum of the products so computed for each such qualifying investee. (c)(i) With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3)(d) of this section, its modified nonbusiness income. (ii) With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is not a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3)(d) of this section, the amount of its modified nonbusiness income satisfying the descriptions in divisions (B)(2) to (5) of section 5747.20 of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (AA)(4)(c)(ii) of this section. With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is not a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3)(d) of this section, the trust's portion of modified nonbusiness income recognized from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of a debt interest in or equity interest in a section 5747.212 entity, as defined in section 5747.212 of the Revised Code, without regard to division (A) of that section, shall not be allocated to this state in accordance with section 5747.20 of the Revised Code but shall be apportioned to this state in accordance with division (B) of section 5747.212 of the Revised Code without regard to division (A) of that section. If the allocation and apportionment of a trust's income under divisions (AA)(4)(a) and (c) of this section do not fairly represent the modified Ohio taxable income of the trust in this state, the alternative methods described in division (C) of section 5747.21 of the Revised Code may be applied in the manner and to the same extent provided in that section. (5)(a) Except as set forth in division (AA)(5)(b) of this section, "qualifying investee" means a person in which a trust has an equity or ownership interest, or a person or unit of government the debt obligations of either of which are owned by a trust. For the purposes of division (AA)(2)(a) of this section and for the purpose of computing the fraction described in division (AA)(4)(b) of this section, all of the following apply: (i) If the qualifying investee is a member of a qualifying controlled group on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or loss, then "qualifying investee" includes all persons in the qualifying controlled group on such last day. (ii) If the qualifying investee, or if the qualifying investee and any members of the qualifying controlled group of which the qualifying investee is a member on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or loss, separately or cumulatively own, directly or indirectly, on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount, more than fifty per cent of the equity of a pass-through entity, then the qualifying investee and the other members are deemed to own the proportionate share of the pass-through entity's physical assets which the pass-through entity directly or indirectly owns on the last day of the pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year ending within or with the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount. (iii) For the purposes of division (AA)(5)(a)(iii) of this section, "upper level pass-through entity" means a pass-through entity directly or indirectly owning any equity of another pass-through entity, and "lower level pass-through entity" means that other pass-through entity. An upper level pass-through entity, whether or not it is also a qualifying investee, is deemed to own, on the last day of the upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year, the proportionate share of the lower level pass-through entity's physical assets that the lower level pass-through entity directly or indirectly owns on the last day of the lower level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year ending within or with the last day of the upper level pass-through entity's fiscal or calendar year. If the upper level pass-through entity directly and indirectly owns less than fifty per cent of the equity of the lower level pass-through entity on each day of the upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year in which or with which ends the calendar or fiscal year of the lower level pass-through entity and if, based upon clear and convincing evidence, complete information about the location and cost of the physical assets of the lower pass-through entity is not available to the upper level pass-through entity, then solely for purposes of ascertaining if a gain or loss constitutes a qualifying trust amount, the upper level pass-through entity shall be deemed as owning no equity of the lower level pass-through entity for each day during the upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year in which or with which ends the lower level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year. Nothing in division (AA)(5)(a)(iii) of this section shall be construed to provide for any deduction or exclusion in computing any trust's Ohio taxable income. (b) With respect to a trust that is not a resident for the taxable year and with respect to a part of a trust that is not a resident for the taxable year, "qualifying investee" for that taxable year does not include a C corporation if both of the following apply: (i) During the taxable year the trust or part of the trust recognizes a gain or loss from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of equity or ownership interests in, or debt obligations of, the C corporation. (ii) Such gain or loss constitutes nonbusiness income. (6) "Available" means information is such that a person is able to learn of the information by the due date plus extensions, if any, for filing the return for the taxable year in which the trust recognizes the gain or loss. (BB) "Qualifying controlled group" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (CC) "Related member" has the same meaning as in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code. (DD)(1) For the purposes of division (DD) of this section: (a) "Qualifying person" means any person other than a qualifying corporation. (b) "Qualifying corporation" means any person classified for federal income tax purposes as an association taxable as a corporation, except either of the following: (i) A corporation that has made an election under subchapter S, chapter one, subtitle A, of the Internal Revenue Code for its taxable year ending within, or on the last day of, the investor's taxable year; (ii) A subsidiary that is wholly owned by any corporation that has made an election under subchapter S, chapter one, subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code for its taxable year ending within, or on the last day of, the investor's taxable year. (2) For the purposes of this chapter, unless expressly stated otherwise, no qualifying person indirectly owns any asset directly or indirectly owned by any qualifying corporation. (EE) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 5751. of the Revised Code: (1) "Trust" does not include a qualified pre-income tax trust. (2) A "qualified pre-income tax trust" is any pre-income tax trust that makes a qualifying pre-income tax trust election as described in division (EE)(3) of this section. (3) A "qualifying pre-income tax trust election" is an election by a pre-income tax trust to subject to the tax imposed by section 5751.02 of the Revised Code the pre-income tax trust and all pass-through entities of which the trust owns or controls, directly, indirectly, or constructively through related interests, five per cent or more of the ownership or equity interests. The trustee shall notify the tax commissioner in writing of the election on or before April 15, 2006. The election, if timely made, shall be effective on and after January 1, 2006, and shall apply for all tax periods and tax years until revoked by the trustee of the trust. (4) A "pre-income tax trust" is a trust that satisfies all of the following requirements: (a) The document or instrument creating the trust was executed by the grantor before January 1, 1972; (b) The trust became irrevocable upon the creation of the trust; and (c) The grantor was domiciled in this state at the time the trust was created. (FF) "Uniformed services" means all of the following: (1) "Armed forces of the United States" as defined in section 5907.01 of the Revised Code; (2) The commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration; (3) The commissioned corps of the public health service. (GG) "Taxable business income" means the amount by which an individual's business income that is included in federal adjusted gross income exceeds the amount of business income the individual is authorized to deduct under division (A)(28) of this section for the taxable year. (HH) "Employer" does not include a franchisor with respect to the franchisor's relationship with a franchisee or an employee of a franchisee, unless the franchisor agrees to assume that role in writing or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the franchisor exercises a type or degree of control over the franchisee or the franchisee's employees that is not customarily exercised by a franchisor for the purpose of protecting the franchisor's trademark, brand, or both. For purposes of this division, "franchisor" and "franchisee" have the same meanings as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1. (II) "Modified adjusted gross income" means Ohio adjusted gross income plus any amount deducted under divisions (A)(28) and (34) of this section for the taxable year. (JJ) "Qualifying Ohio educator" means an individual who, for a taxable year, qualifies as an eligible educator, as that term is defined in section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, and who holds a certificate, license, or permit described in Chapter 3319. or section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Professional employer organization," "professional employer organization agreement," and "professional employer organization reporting entity" have the same meanings as in section 4125.01 of the Revised Code. (LL) "Alternate employer organization" and "alternate employer organization agreement" have the same meanings as in section 4133.01 of the Revised Code. (MM) "Casino gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code, "lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code, "sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code, and "video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.02. (A) For the purpose of providing revenue for the support of schools and local government functions, to provide relief to property taxpayers, to provide revenue for the general revenue fund, and to meet the expenses of administering the tax levied by this chapter, there is hereby levied on every individual, trust, and estate residing in or earning or receiving income in this state, on every individual, trust, and estate earning or receiving lottery winnings, prizes, or awards pursuant to Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, on every individual, trust, and estate earning or receiving winnings on casino or sports gaming, and on every individual, trust, and estate otherwise having nexus with or in this state under the Constitution of the United States, an annual tax measured as prescribed in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of this section. (1) In the case of trusts, the tax imposed by this section shall be measured by modified Ohio taxable income under division (D)(C) of this section and levied in the same amount as the tax is imposed on estates as prescribed in division (A)(2) of this section. (2) In the case of estates, the tax imposed by this section shall be measured by Ohio taxable income. The If the estate has not more than twenty-six thousand fifty dollars of such income, the tax shall be levied on such income at the rate of 1.38462% for the first twenty-six thousand fifty dollars of such income and, for taxable years beginning in 2024, 1.31287% for taxable years beginning in 2025, and 1.27448% for taxable years beginning in 2026 and thereafter. If the estate has income in excess of that amount, the tax shall be levied at the same rates prescribed in division (A)(3) of this section for individuals. (3) In the case of individuals, the tax imposed by this section on income other than taxable business income shall be measured by Ohio adjusted gross income, less taxable business income and less an exemption for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and each dependent as provided in section 5747.025 of the Revised Code. If the balance thus obtained is equal to or less than twenty-six thousand fifty dollars, no tax shall be imposed on that balance. If the balance thus obtained is greater than twenty-six thousand fifty dollars, the tax is hereby levied as follows: (a) For taxable years beginning in 2023: 1 2 A OHIO ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS TAXABLE BUSINESS INCOME AND EXEMPTIONS (INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (ESTATES) TAX B More than $26,050 but not more than $100,000 $360.69 plus 2.75% of the amount in excess of $26,050 C More than $100,000 but not more than $115,300 $2,394.32 plus 3.688% of the amount in excess of $100,000 D More than $115,300 $2,958.58 plus 3.75% of the amount in excess of $115,300 (b) For taxable years beginning in 2024 and thereafter: 1 2 A OHIO ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS TAXABLE BUSINESS INCOME AND EXEMPTIONS (INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (ESTATES) TAX B More than $26,050 but not more than $100,000 $360.69 plus 2.75% of the amount in excess of $26,050 C More than $100,000 $2,394.32 plus 3.5% of the amount in excess of $100,000 (b) For taxable years beginning in 2025: 1 2 A OHIO ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME LESS TAXABLE BUSINESS INCOME AND EXEMPTIONS (INDIVIDUALS) OR MODIFIED OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (TRUSTS) OR OHIO TAXABLE INCOME (ESTATES) TAX B More than $26,050 but not more than $100,000 $342.00 plus 2.75% of the amount in excess of $26,050 C More than $100,000 $2,394.32 plus 3.125% of the amount in excess of $100,000 (c) For taxable years beginning in 2026 and thereafter, $332.00 plus 2.75% of the amount in excess of $26,050. (4)(a) In the case of individuals, the tax imposed by this section on taxable business income shall equal three per cent of the result obtained by subtracting any amount allowed under division (A)(4)(b) of this section from the individual's taxable business income. (b) If the exemptions allowed to an individual under division (A)(3) of this section exceed the taxpayer's Ohio adjusted gross income less taxable business income, the excess shall be deducted from taxable business income before computing the tax under division (A)(4)(a) of this section. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this division, in August of each year, the tax commissioner shall make a new adjustment to the income amounts prescribed in divisions (A)(2) and (3) of this section by multiplying the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator computed that year under section 5747.025 of the Revised Code by each of the income amounts resulting from the adjustment under this division in the preceding year, adding the resulting product to the corresponding income amount resulting from the adjustment in the preceding year, and rounding the resulting sum to the nearest multiple of fifty dollars. The tax commissioner also shall recompute each of the tax dollar amounts to the extent necessary to reflect the new adjustment of the income amounts. To recompute the tax dollar amount corresponding to the lowest tax rate in division (A)(3) of this section, the commissioner shall multiply the tax rate prescribed in division (A)(2) of this section by the income amount specified in that division and as adjusted according to this paragraph. The rates of taxation shall not be adjusted. The adjusted amounts apply to taxable years beginning in the calendar year in which the adjustments are made and to taxable years beginning in each ensuing calendar year until a calendar year in which a new adjustment is made pursuant to this division. The tax commissioner shall not make a new adjustment in any year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the amount resulting from the adjustment in the preceding year. (B) If the director of budget and management makes a certification to the tax commissioner under division (B) of section 131.44 of the Revised Code, the amount of tax as determined under divisions (A)(1) to (3) of this section shall be reduced by the percentage prescribed in that certification for taxable years beginning in the calendar year in which that certification is made. (C)(1)(B)(1) The tax imposed by this section on a trust shall be computed by multiplying the Ohio modified taxable income of the trust by the rates prescribed by division (A) of this section. (2) A resident trust may claim a credit against the tax computed under division (C)(B) of this section equal to the lesser of (a) the tax paid to another state or the District of Columbia on the resident trust's modified nonbusiness income, other than the portion of the resident trust's nonbusiness income that is qualifying investment income as defined in section 5747.012 of the Revised Code, or (b) the effective tax rate, based on modified Ohio taxable income, multiplied by the resident trust's modified nonbusiness income other than the portion of the resident trust's nonbusiness income that is qualifying investment income. The credit applies before any other applicable credits. (3) Any credit authorized against the tax imposed by this section applies to a trust subject to division (C)(B) of this section only if the trust otherwise qualifies for the credit. To the extent that the trust distributes income for the taxable year for which a credit is available to the trust, the credit shall be shared by the trust and its beneficiaries. The tax commissioner and the trust shall be guided by applicable regulations of the United States treasury regarding the sharing of credits. (D)(C) For the purposes of this section, "trust" means any trust described in Subchapter J of Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, excluding trusts that are not irrevocable as defined in division (I)(3)(b) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code and that have no modified Ohio taxable income for the taxable year, charitable remainder trusts, qualified funeral trusts and preneed funeral contract trusts established pursuant to sections 4717.31 to 4717.38 of the Revised Code that are not qualified funeral trusts, endowment and perpetual care trusts, qualified settlement trusts and funds, designated settlement trusts and funds, and trusts exempted from taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. (E)(D) Nothing in division (A)(3) of this section shall prohibit an individual with an Ohio adjusted gross income, less taxable business income and exemptions, of twenty-six thousand fifty dollars or less from filing a return under this chapter to receive a refund of taxes withheld or to claim any refundable credit allowed under this chapter. Sec. 5747.021. In addition to the tax levied under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner shall charge the tax imposed on the school district income of an individual or estate by a school district under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code by multiplying the rate certified to be charged under such chapter by the taxpayer's school district income with respect to that district. Sec. 5747.025. (A) The personal exemption for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and each dependent shall be one of the following amounts, provided the taxpayer's modified adjusted gross income is less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars for taxable years beginning in 2025 or five hundred thousand dollars for taxable years beginning in 2026 or thereafter: (1) Two thousand three hundred fifty dollars if the taxpayer's modified adjusted gross income for the taxable year as shown on an individual or joint annual return is less than or equal to forty thousand dollars; (2) Two thousand one hundred dollars if the taxpayer's modified adjusted gross income for the taxable year as shown on an individual or joint annual return is greater than forty thousand dollars but less than or equal to eighty thousand dollars; (3) One thousand eight hundred fifty dollars if the taxpayer's modified adjusted gross income for the taxable year as shown on an individual or joint annual return is greater than eighty thousand dollars. (B) For taxable years beginning in 2020 and thereafter, the personal exemption amounts prescribed in division (A) of this section shall be adjusted each year in the manner prescribed in division (C) of this section. In the case of an individual with respect to whom an exemption under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code is allowable to another taxpayer for a taxable year beginning in the calendar year in which the individual's taxable year begins, the exemption amount applicable to such individual for such individual's taxable year shall be zero. (C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, in August of each year, the tax commissioner shall determine the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator determined by the bureau of economic analysis of the United States department of commerce from the first day of January of the preceding calendar year to the last day of December of the preceding year, and make a new adjustment to the personal exemption amount for taxable years beginning in the current calendar year by multiplying that amount by the percentage increase in the gross domestic product deflator for that period; adding the resulting product to the personal exemption amount for taxable years beginning in the preceding calendar year; and rounding the resulting sum upward to the nearest multiple of fifty dollars. The adjusted amount applies to taxable years beginning in the calendar year in which the adjustment is made and to taxable years beginning in each ensuing calendar year until a calendar year in which a new adjustment is made pursuant to this division. The commissioner shall not make a new adjustment in any calendar year in which the amount resulting from the adjustment would be less than the amount resulting from the adjustment in the preceding calendar year. Sec. 5747.05. As used in this section, "income tax" includes both a tax on net income and a tax measured by net income. The following credits shall be allowed against the aggregate income tax liability imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code on individuals and estates: (A)(1) The amount of tax otherwise due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code on such portion of the combined adjusted gross income and taxable business income of any nonresident taxpayer that is not allocable or apportionable to this state pursuant to sections 5747.20 to 5747.23 of the Revised Code. The credit provided under this division shall not exceed the total tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. (2) The tax commissioner may enter into an agreement with the taxing authorities of any state or of the District of Columbia that imposes an income tax to provide that compensation paid in this state to a nonresident taxpayer shall not be subject to the tax levied in section 5747.02 of the Revised Code so long as compensation paid in such other state or in the District of Columbia to a resident taxpayer shall likewise not be subject to the income tax of such other state or of the District of Columbia. (B) The lesser of division (B)(1) or (2) of this section: (1) The aggregate amount of tax otherwise due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code on such portion of the combined adjusted gross income and taxable business income of a resident taxpayer that in another state or in the District of Columbia is subjected to an income tax. The credit provided under division (B)(1) of this section shall not exceed the total tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. (2) The amount of income tax liability to another state or the District of Columbia on the portion of the combined adjusted gross income and taxable business income of a resident taxpayer that in another state or in the District of Columbia is subjected to an income tax. The credit provided under division (B)(2) of this section shall not exceed the total amount of tax otherwise due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. (3) For the purpose of divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, a resident taxpayer's combined adjusted gross income and taxable business income that is subject to an income tax levied in another state or in the District of Columbia includes income that is subject to either (a) a tax similar to the tax imposed by division (D)(1)(a) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code or (b) a tax enacted for purposes of complying with internal revenue service notice 2020-75. In computing a resident taxpayer's income tax paid or accrued to another state or the District of Columbia, the deduction authorized by division (A)(28) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code shall first be deducted against business income apportioned to this state. (4) If the credit provided under division (B) of this section is affected by a change in either the portion of the combined adjusted gross income and taxable business income of a resident taxpayer subjected to an income tax in another state or the District of Columbia or the amount of income tax liability that has been paid to another state or the District of Columbia, the taxpayer shall report the change to the tax commissioner within ninety days of the change in such form as the commissioner requires. (a) In the case of an underpayment, the report shall be accompanied by payment of any additional tax due as a result of the reduction in credit together with interest on the additional tax and is a return subject to assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code solely for the purpose of assessing any additional tax due under this division, together with any applicable penalty and interest. It shall not reopen the computation of the taxpayer's tax liability under this chapter from a previously filed return no longer subject to assessment except to the extent that such liability is affected by an adjustment to the credit allowed by division (B) of this section. (b) In the case of an overpayment, an application for refund may be filed under this division within the ninety-day period prescribed for filing the report even if it is beyond the period prescribed in section 5747.11 of the Revised Code if it otherwise conforms to the requirements of such section. An application filed under this division shall only claim refund of overpayments resulting from an adjustment to the credit allowed by division (B) of this section unless it is also filed within the time prescribed in section 5747.11 of the Revised Code. It shall not reopen the computation of the taxpayer's tax liability except to the extent that such liability is affected by an adjustment to the credit allowed by division (B) of this section. (5) No credit shall be allowed under division (B) of this section: (a) For income tax paid or accrued to another state or to the District of Columbia if the taxpayer, when computing federal adjusted gross income, has directly or indirectly deducted, or was required to directly or indirectly deduct, the amount of that income tax; Division (B)(5)(a) of this section does not apply to income taxes included in the computation of Ohio adjusted gross income under division (A)(41) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code and not deducted from Ohio adjusted gross income under division (A)(28) of that section or to income taxes included in Ohio taxable income under division (S)(16) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (b) For compensation that is not subject to the income tax of another state or the District of Columbia as the result of an agreement entered into by the tax commissioner under division (A)(3) of this section; or (c) For income tax paid or accrued to another state or the District of Columbia if the taxpayer fails to furnish such proof as the tax commissioner shall require that such income tax liability has been paid. (C) An individual who is a resident for part of a taxable year and a nonresident for the remainder of the taxable year is allowed the credits under divisions (A) and (B) of this section in accordance with rules prescribed by the tax commissioner. In no event shall the same income be subject to both credits. (D) The credit allowed under division (A) of this section shall be calculated based upon the amount of tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code after subtracting any other credits that precede the credit under that division in the order required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. The credit allowed under division (B) of this section shall be calculated based upon the amount of tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code after subtracting any other credits that precede the credit under that division in the order required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) On a joint return filed by a husband and wife, each of whom had adjusted gross income of at least five hundred dollars, exclusive of interest, dividends and distributions, royalties, rent, and capital gains, a credit equal to the lesser of six hundred fifty dollars or the percentage shown in column B that corresponds with the taxpayer's modified adjusted gross income, less exemptions for the taxable year, of the total amount of tax due after allowing for any other credit that precedes this credit as required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code, subject to division (E)(2) of this section: 1 2 A A. B. B IF THE MODIFIED ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME, LESS EXEMPTIONS, FOR THE TAX YEAR IS: THE CREDIT FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR IS: C $25,000 or less 20% D More than $25,000 but not more than $50,000 15% E More than $50,000 but not more than $75,000 10% F More than $75,000 5% (2) The credit shall be claimed in the order required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. No taxpayer shall claim this credit unless the taxpayer's modified adjusted gross income is less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars for taxable years beginning in 2025 or less than five hundred thousand dollars for taxable years beginning in 2026 or thereafter. (F) No claim for credit under this section shall be allowed unless the claimant furnishes such supporting information as the tax commissioner prescribes by rules. Sec. 5747.062. As used in this section, "transferee" : "Transferee" has the same meaning as in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code, and "recipient" . "Recipient" includes a transferee. "Lottery prize award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except that "lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (A)(1) Before making any other deduction required by Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, the state lottery commission shall deduct and withhold an amount equal to four three and one-eighth per cent for calendar year 2025, after the effective date of this amendment, and two and three-quarters per cent for calendar year 2026 and thereafter of the payment from each lottery prize award payment that is of an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. (2) On or before the tenth day of each month, the state lottery commission, and each transferee required to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of the Revised Code, shall file a return and remit to the tax commissioner all amounts deducted and withheld pursuant to this section during the preceding month. (3) On or before the thirty-first day of January of each year, the state lottery commission, and each transferee required to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of the Revised Code, shall file with the commissioner an annual return, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, indicating the total amount deducted and withheld pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code during the preceding calendar year. At the time of filing that return, the state lottery commission or transferee shall remit any amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year that was not previously remitted. (4) The state lottery commission, and each transferee required to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of the Revised Code, shall issue to each person with respect to whom tax has been deducted and withheld by the commission or transferee pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code during the preceding calendar year, an information return in the form prescribed by the commissioner. (B)(1) Division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to persons classified for federal income tax purposes as associations taxable as corporations. Amounts withheld pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code shall be allowed as a credit against payment of the tax imposed pursuant to section 5747.02 of the Revised Code upon the lottery prize award recipient, upon a beneficiary of such a recipient, or upon any investor in such a recipient if the recipient is a pass-through entity or disregarded entity, and shall be treated as taxes paid by the recipient, beneficiary, or investor for purposes of section 5747.09 of the Revised Code. The credit is available to the recipient, beneficiary, or investor even if the commission or transferee does not remit to the tax commissioner the amount withheld. (2) Division (B)(2) of this section applies only to persons classified for federal income tax purposes as associations taxable as corporations. Amounts withheld pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code shall be treated as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5733.06 of the Revised Code for the tax year immediately following the date on which those amounts are deducted and withheld, upon the lottery prize award recipient, upon a beneficiary of such a recipient, or upon an investor in such a recipient if the recipient is a pass-through entity or disregarded entity, and shall be treated as paid by the recipient, beneficiary, or investor on the date on which those amounts are deducted and withheld. The credit is a refundable credit and shall be claimed in the order required under section 5733.98 of the Revised Code. The credit is available to the recipient, beneficiary, or investor even if the commission or transferee does not remit to the tax commissioner the amount withheld. (3) Nothing in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall be construed to allow more than one person to claim the credit for any portion of each amount deducted and withheld. (C) Failure of the commission or any transferee to deduct and withhold the required amounts from lottery prize awards or to remit amounts withheld as required by this section and section 3770.072 of the Revised Code shall not relieve a taxpayer described in division (B) of this section from liability for the tax imposed by section 5733.06 or 5747.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.063. The requirements imposed under this section are in addition to the municipal income tax withholding requirements under section 718.031 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "sports gaming proprietor" and "sports gaming facility" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. (A)(1) If Subject to division (F) of this section, if a person's winnings from casino gaming or from sports gaming are an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall deduct and withhold Ohio income tax from the person's winnings at a rate of four three and one-eighth per cent for calendar year 2025, after the effective date of this amendment, and two and three-quarters per cent for calendar year 2026 and thereafter of the amount won. A person's amount of winnings from casino gaming shall be determined each time the person exchanges amounts won in tokens, chips, casino credit, or other prepaid representations of value for cash or a cash equivalent. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall issue, to a person from whose winnings an amount has been deducted and withheld, a receipt for the amount deducted and withheld, and also shall obtain from the person additional information that will be necessary for the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor to prepare the returns required by this section. (2) If a person's winnings from casino gaming or sports gaming require reporting to the internal revenue service under division (A)(1) of this section, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor also shall require the person to state in writing, under penalty of falsification, whether the person is in default under a support order. (B) Amounts deducted and withheld by a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor are held in trust for the benefit of the state. (1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file a return electronically with the tax commissioner identifying the persons from whose winnings amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the preceding calendar month, the amount of the winnings from which each such amount was withheld, the type of casino gaming or sports gaming that resulted in such winnings, and any other information required by the tax commissioner. With the return, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically to the commissioner all the amounts deducted and withheld during the preceding month. (2)(a) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall maintain a record of each written statement provided under division (A)(2) of this section in which a person admits to being in default under a support order. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall make these records available to the director of job and family services upon request. (b) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall maintain copies of receipts issued under division (A)(1) of this section and of written statements provided under division (A)(2) of this section and shall make these copies available to the tax commissioner upon request. (c) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall maintain the information described in divisions (B)(2)(a) and (b) of this section in accordance with section 5747.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted pursuant thereto. (3) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file an annual return electronically with the tax commissioner indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If the identity of a person and the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person were omitted on a monthly return, that information shall be indicated on the annual return. (4)(a) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor who fails to file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld is personally liable for the amount deducted and withheld and not remitted. The commissioner may impose a penalty up to one thousand dollars if a return is filed late, if amounts deducted and withheld are remitted late, if a return is not filed, or if amounts deducted and withheld are not remitted. Interest accrues on past due amounts deducted and withheld at the rate prescribed in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may collect past due amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon by assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code as if they were income taxes collected by an employer. (b) If a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor sells the casino facility or sports gaming facility, or otherwise quits the casino or sports gaming business, the amounts deducted and withheld and any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The successor shall withhold an amount of the purchase money that is sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor casino operator or sports gaming proprietor produces either a receipt from the commissioner showing that the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid or a certificate from the commissioner indicating that no amounts deducted and withheld or penalties and interest thereon are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable for payment of the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon, up to the amount of the purchase money. (C)(1) (C) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall issue an information return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The information return shall show the total amount deducted from the person's winnings by the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor during the preceding calendar year. (2) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall provide to the commissioner a copy of each information return issued under division (C)(1) of this section for the preceding calendar year. The commissioner may require that the copies be transmitted electronically. (D) Amounts deducted and withheld shall be allowed as a credit against payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and shall be treated as taxes paid for purposes of section 5747.09 of the Revised Code. This division applies only to the person for whom the amount is deducted and withheld. (E) The failure of a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's winnings does not relieve the person from liability for the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code with respect to those winnings. And compliance with this section does not relieve a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor or a person who has winnings from casino gaming or sports gaming from compliance with relevant provisions of federal tax laws. (F) A sports gaming proprietor that offers lottery sports gaming through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code shall not withhold amounts under this section from winnings from wagers placed through that terminal. The state lottery commission shall withhold amounts from those winnings under section 5747.062 of the Revised Code. (G) The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the receipt and returns required by this section. The director of job and family services shall prescribe the form of the statement required by this section. (G)(H) The commissioner may adopt rules that are necessary to administer this section. Sec. 5747.064. The requirements imposed under this section are in addition to the municipal income tax withholding requirements under section 718.031 of the Revised Code. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Video lottery terminal" , "video lottery sales agent" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 3770.10 of the Revised Code. (2) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code. (B) If a person's prize award from a video lottery terminal or from lottery sports gaming offered in a video lottery terminal facility is an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, the video lottery sales agent shall deduct and withhold Ohio income tax from the person's prize award at a rate of four three and one-eighth per cent for calendar year 2025, after the effective date of this amendment, and two and three-quarters per cent for calendar year 2026 and thereafter of the amount won. The video lottery sales agent shall issue, to a person from whose prize award an amount has been deducted or withheld, a receipt for the amount deducted and withheld, and also shall obtain from the person additional information that will be necessary for the video lottery sales agent to prepare the returns required by this section. (C) Amounts deducted and withheld by a video lottery sales agent are held in trust for the benefit of the state. (1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the video lottery sales agent shall file a return electronically with the tax commissioner identifying the persons from whose prize awards amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the preceding month, the amount of the prize award from which each such amount was withheld, and any other information required by the commissioner. With the return, the video lottery sales agent shall remit electronically to the commissioner all the amounts deducted and withheld during the preceding month. (2) A video lottery sales agent shall maintain a record of all receipts issued under division (B) of this section and shall make those records available to the commissioner upon request. Such records shall be maintained in accordance with section 5747.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted pursuant thereto. (3) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a video lottery sales agent shall file an annual return electronically with the tax commissioner indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The video lottery sales agent shall remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If the identity of a person and the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person were omitted on a monthly return, that information shall be indicated on the annual return. (4)(a) A video lottery sales agent who fails to file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld is personally liable for the amount deducted and withheld and not remitted. The commissioner may impose a penalty of up to one thousand dollars if a return is filed late, if amounts deducted and withheld are remitted late, if a return is not filed, or if amounts deducted and withheld are not remitted. Interest accrues on past due amounts deducted and withheld at the rate prescribed in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may collect past due amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon by assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code as if they were income taxes collected by an employer. (b) If a video lottery sales agent ceases to operate video lottery terminals, the amounts deducted and withheld and any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. A successor of the video lottery sales agent that purchases the video lottery terminals from the agent shall withhold an amount of the purchase money that is sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor video lottery sales agent produces either a receipt from the tax commissioner showing that the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid or a certificate from the commissioner indicating that no amounts deducted and withheld or penalties and interest thereon are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable for payment of the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon, up to the amount of the purchase money. (D)(1)(D) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a video lottery sales agent shall issue an information return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The information return shall show the total amount deducted from the person's prize award by the video lottery sales agent during the preceding year. (2) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a lottery sales agent shall provide to the tax commissioner a copy of each information return issued under division (D)(1) of this section for the preceding calendar year. The commissioner may require that such copies be transmitted electronically. (E) Amounts deducted and withheld shall be allowed as a credit against payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and shall be treated as taxes paid for purposes of section 5747.09 of the Revised Code. This division applies only to the person for whom the amount is deducted and withheld. (F) The failure of a video lottery sales agent to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's prize award does not relieve the person from liability for the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code with respect to that income. Compliance with this section does not relieve a video lottery sales agent or a person who has a prize award from compliance with relevant provisions of federal tax laws. (G) The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the receipt and returns required by this section and may promulgate any rules necessary to administer the section. Sec. 5747.07. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Partial weekly withholding period" means a period during which an employer directly, indirectly, or constructively pays compensation to, or credits compensation to the benefit of, an employee, and that consists of a consecutive Saturday, Sunday, Monday, and Tuesday or a consecutive Wednesday, Thursday, and Friday. There are two partial weekly withholding periods each week, except that a partial weekly withholding period cannot extend from one calendar year into the next calendar year; if the first day of January falls on a day other than Saturday or Wednesday, the partial weekly withholding period ends on the thirty-first day of December and there are three partial weekly withholding periods during that week. (2) "Undeposited taxes" means the taxes an employer is required to deduct and withhold from an employee's compensation pursuant to section 5747.06 of the Revised Code that have not been remitted to the tax commissioner pursuant to this section or section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (3) A "week" begins on Saturday and concludes at the end of the following Friday. (4) "Professional employer organization," "professional employer organization agreement," and "professional employer organization reporting entity" have the same meanings as in section 4125.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Alternate employer organization" and "alternate employer organization agreement" have the same meanings as in section 4133.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Client employer" has the same meaning as in section 4125.01 of the Revised Code in the context of a professional employer organization or a professional employer organization reporting entity, or the same meaning as in section 4133.01 of the Revised Code in the context of an alternate employer organization. (B) Except as provided in divisions (C) and (D) of this section and in division (A) of section 5747.072 of the Revised Code, every employer required to deduct and withhold any amount under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code shall file a return and shall pay the amount required by law as follows: (1) An employer who accumulates or is required to accumulate undeposited taxes of one hundred thousand dollars or more during a partial weekly withholding period shall make the payment of the undeposited taxes by the close of the first banking day after the day on which the accumulation reaches one hundred thousand dollars. If required under division (I) of this section, the payment shall be made electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (2) Except as required by division (B)(1) of this section, an employer whose actual or required payments under this section were at least eighty-four thousand dollars during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of June of the preceding calendar year shall make the payment of undeposited taxes within three banking days after the close of a partial weekly withholding period during which the employer was required to deduct and withhold any amount under this chapter. If required under division (I) of this section, the payment shall be made electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (3) Except as required by divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section, if an employer's actual or required payments were more than two thousand dollars during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of June of the preceding calendar year, the employer shall make the payment of undeposited taxes for each month during which they were required to be withheld no later than fifteen days following the last day of that month. The employer shall file the return prescribed by the tax commissioner with the payment. (4) Except as required by divisions (B)(1), (2), and (3) of this section, an employer shall make the payment of undeposited taxes for each calendar quarter during which they were required to be withheld no later than the last day of the month following the last day of March, June, September, and December each year. The employer shall file the return prescribed by the tax commissioner with the payment. (C) The return and payment schedules prescribed by divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to the return and payment of undeposited school district income taxes arising from taxes levied pursuant to Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. Undeposited school district income taxes shall be returned and paid pursuant to divisions (B)(3) and (4) of this section, as applicable. (D)(1) The requirements of division (B) of this section are met if the amount paid is not less than ninety-five per cent of the actual tax withheld or required to be withheld for the prior quarterly, monthly, or partial weekly withholding period, and the underpayment is not due to willful neglect. Any underpayment of withheld tax shall be paid within thirty days of the date on which the withheld tax was due without regard to division (D)(1) of this section. An employer described in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall make the payment electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (2) If the tax commissioner believes that quarterly or monthly payments would result in a delay that might jeopardize the remittance of withholding payments, the commissioner may order that the payments be made weekly, or more frequently if necessary, and the payments shall be made no later than three banking days following the close of the period for which the jeopardy order is made. An order requiring weekly or more frequent payments shall be delivered to the employer in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code and remains in effect until the commissioner notifies the employer to the contrary. (3) If compelling circumstances exist concerning the remittance of undeposited taxes, the commissioner may order the employer to make payments under any of the payment schedules under division (B) of this section. The order shall be delivered to the employer in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code and shall remain in effect until the commissioner notifies the employer to the contrary. For purposes of division (D)(3) of this section, "compelling circumstances" exist if either or both of the following are true: (a) Based upon annualization of payments made or required to be made during the preceding calendar year and during the current calendar year, the employer would be required for the next calendar year to make payments under division (B)(2) of this section. (b) Based upon annualization of payments made or required to be made during the current calendar year, the employer would be required for the next calendar year to make payments under division (B)(2) of this section. (E)(1) In addition to other returns required to be filed and payments required to be made under this section, every employer required to deduct and withhold taxes shall file, not later than the thirty-first day of January of each year, an annual return covering, but not limited to, both the aggregate amount deducted and withheld and the aggregate amount required to be deducted and withheld during the entire preceding year for the tax imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and for each tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. At the time of filing that return, the employer shall pay over any amounts of undeposited taxes for the preceding year, whether actually deducted and withheld or required to be deducted and withheld, that have not been previously paid. The employer shall make the annual report, to each employee and to the tax commissioner, of the compensation paid and each tax withheld, as the commissioner by rule may prescribe. (2) Each employer required to deduct and withhold any tax is liable for the payment of that amount required to be deducted and withheld, whether or not the tax has in fact been withheld, unless the failure to withhold was based upon the employer's good faith in reliance upon the statement of the employee as to liability, and the amount shall be deemed to be a special fund in trust for the general revenue fund. (F) Each employer shall file with the employer's annual return the following items of information on employees for whom withholding is required under section 5747.06 of the Revised Code: (1) The full name of each employee, the employee's address, the employee's school district of residence, and in the case of a nonresident employee, the employee's principal county of employment; (2) The social security number of each employee; (3) The total amount of compensation paid before any deductions to each employee for the period for which the annual return is made; (4) The amount of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and the amount of each tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code withheld from the compensation of the employee for the period for which the annual return is made. The commissioner may extend upon good cause the period for filing any notice or return required to be filed under this section and may adopt rules relating to extensions of time. If the extension results in an extension of time for the payment of the amounts withheld with respect to which the return is filed, the employer shall pay, at the time the amount withheld is paid, an amount of interest computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code on that amount withheld, from the day that amount was originally required to be paid to the day of actual payment or to the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. (5) In addition to all other interest charges and penalties imposed, all amounts of taxes withheld or required to be withheld and remaining unpaid after the day the amounts are required to be paid shall bear interest from the date prescribed for payment at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code on the amount unpaid, in addition to the amount withheld, until paid or until the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. (G) An employee of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust having control or supervision of or charged with the responsibility of filing the report and making payment, or an officer, member, manager, or trustee of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust who is responsible for the execution of the corporation's, limited liability company's, or business trust's fiscal responsibilities, shall be personally liable for failure to file the report or pay the tax due as required by this section. The dissolution, termination, or bankruptcy of a corporation, limited liability company, or business trust does not discharge a responsible officer's, member's, manager's, employee's, or trustee's liability for a failure of the corporation, limited liability company, or business trust to file returns or pay tax due. (H) If an employer required to deduct and withhold income tax from compensation and to pay that tax to the state under sections 5747.06 and 5747.07 of the Revised Code sells the employer's business or stock of merchandise or quits the employer's business, the taxes required to be deducted and withheld and paid to the state pursuant to those sections prior to that time, together with any interest and penalties imposed on those taxes, become due and payable immediately, and that person shall make a final return within fifteen days after the date of selling or quitting business. The employer's successor shall withhold a sufficient amount of the purchase money to cover the amount of the taxes, interest, and penalties due and unpaid, until the former owner produces a receipt from the tax commissioner showing that the taxes, interest, and penalties have been paid or a certificate indicating that no such taxes are due. If the purchaser of the business or stock of merchandise fails to withhold purchase money, the purchaser shall be personally liable for the payment of the taxes, interest, and penalties accrued and unpaid during the operation of the business by the former owner. If the amount of taxes, interest, and penalties outstanding at the time of the purchase exceeds the total purchase money, the tax commissioner in the commissioner's discretion may adjust the liability of the seller or the responsibility of the purchaser to pay that liability to maximize the collection of withholding tax revenue. (I) An employer whose actual or required payments under this section exceeded eighty-four thousand dollars during the twelve-month period ending on the thirtieth day of June of the preceding calendar year shall make all payments required by this section for the year electronically under section 5747.072 of the Revised Code. (J)(1) Every professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, and alternate employer organization shall file a report with the tax commissioner within thirty days after commencing business in this state that includes all of the following information: (a) The name, address, number the employer receives from the secretary of state to do business in this state, if applicable, and federal employer identification number of each client employer of the organization or entity; (b) The date that each client employer became a client of the organization or entity; (c) The names and mailing addresses of the chief executive officer and the chief financial officer of each client employer for taxation of the client employer. (2) Beginning with the calendar quarter ending after a professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization files the report required under division (J)(1) of this section, and every calendar quarter thereafter, the organization or entity shall file an updated report with the tax commissioner. The organization or entity shall file the updated report not later than the last day of the month following the end of the calendar quarter and shall include all of the following information in the report: (a) If an entity became a client employer of the professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization at any time during the calendar quarter, all of the information required under division (J)(1) of this section for each new client employer; (b) If an entity terminated the professional employer organization agreement or the alternate employer organization agreement between the entity and the professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization, as applicable, at any time during the calendar quarter, the information described in division (J)(1)(a) of this section for that entity, the date during the calendar quarter that the entity ceased being a client of the organization or reporting entity, if applicable, or the date the entity ceased business operations in this state, if applicable; (c) If the name or mailing address of the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer of a client employer has changed since the professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization previously submitted a report under division (J)(1) or (2) of this section, the updated name or mailing address, or both, of the chief executive officer or the chief financial officer, as applicable; (d) If none of the events described in divisions (J)(2)(a) to (c) of this section occurred during the calendar quarter, a statement of that fact. Sec. 5747.071. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Retirement system" means the public employees retirement system, state teachers retirement system, school employees retirement system, Ohio police and fire pension fund, state highway patrol retirement system, and any municipal retirement system. (2) "Retirement plan" means a person, other than a retirement system, that manages a group or individual retirement account, fund, or plan. (3) "Benefits" means all annuities, allowances, pensions, and other benefits paid by a retirement system or retirement plan. (3)(4) "Recipient" means any person receiving benefits from a retirement system or retirement plan. (B) Any recipient may request the recipient's retirement system or retirement plan to deduct and withhold from the recipient's benefits an amount during the calendar year reasonably estimated to be equal to the tax due from the recipient under this chapter and Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code for the year with respect to the recipient's benefits from the retirement system or retirement plan that are included in the recipient's adjusted gross income. The request shall be made pursuant to an application filed with the retirement system or retirement plan, on a form the system or plan shall supply, and shall include the an estimate of from the recipient of the amount of state income taxes that will be due in the ensuing calendar year with respect to the benefits from the retirement system or retirement plan. (C) A retirement system or retirement plan with which an application is filed under this section, commencing with the calendar year following the year in which the application is filed, shall withhold from the benefits of the recipient an amount that equals for the calendar year, the amount of taxes that the recipient estimated would be due for the year. The amount to be withheld for a calendar year shall be apportioned throughout the calendar year. (D) A recipient may submit an amended application to increase or decrease the amount that will be withheld by the retirement system or retirement plan in an ensuing year. (E) A retirement system or retirement plan that withholds a portion of the benefits of a recipient under this section shall file returns and pay the amounts withheld in accordance with the requirements of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner may collect from a retirement plan past due amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon by assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code as if those amounts were income taxes collected by an employer. (F) Every retirement system or retirement plan required to deduct and withhold tax from benefits pursuant to this section shall furnish to the recipient, with respect to the benefits paid to the recipient during the calendar year, on or before the thirty-first day of January of the succeeding year, a written statement showing the amount of benefits deducted and withheld as state income tax, any amount deducted and withheld as school district income tax for each applicable school district, and such other information as the tax commissioner requires. (G) A retirement system or, in the case of a retirement plan, the tax commissioner may adopt rules governing withholding under this section. Sec. 5747.073. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Bulk filer" means a payroll service provider or similar entity that is registered with the tax commissioner to submit employer withholding tax returns in accordance with this section. (2) "Payroll service provider" means a third party that assists an employer with payroll administration and state employer withholding tax obligations. A payroll service provider may include a professional employer organization or alternate employer organization. (3) "Client company" means an employer on whose behalf a bulk filer agrees to submit employer withholding returns in accordance with this section. (B)(1) An employer may elect to use a bulk filer to comply with its state and school district income tax withholding obligations under this chapter. (2)(a) Within five days after becoming a client company, the employer shall notify the tax commissioner, in a format prescribed by the commissioner, of the name of the approved bulk filer it is electing to use and the taxes the bulk filer will be remitting on its behalf. (b) When using a bulk filer, the client company shall maintain all registrations required by the tax commissioner related to electronic filing and payment of the amounts described in divisions (A) and (E) of section 5747.06 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The tax commissioner shall approve each bulk filer before the bulk filer can file withholding tax returns on behalf of client companies. The commissioner shall prescribe guidelines and conditions of participation in the bulk file program that include standards of conduct, software tests, and file formats. (2) The commissioner shall maintain a list of approved bulk filers on the department of taxation's official web site. Such information is not prohibited from disclosure under section 5703.21 of the Revised Code. (3) Each bulk filer shall comply with all requirements of law pertaining to employers maintaining an office or transacting business in this state and paying compensation to an employee who is a taxpayer. (4) A bulk filer that is not a professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization shall file a report in the same manner and frequency as required of a professional employer organization, professional employer organization reporting entity, or alternate employer organization under division (J) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code. For purposes of this division, "client company" shall be substituted for "client employer" wherever "client employer" appears in that division. (D) All returns, reports, and payments filed or remitted by a bulk filer shall be made through an electronic means as prescribed by the tax commissioner, regardless of the bulk filer's number of client companies, or the number of returns, reports, or payments being filed or remitted. The bulk filer shall register for and maintain all accounts needed to electronically make such filings and payments. (E)(1) A bulk filer's authorization under this section is valid until either of the following events occurs: (a) The bulk filer dissolves, loses its existence as the result of a merger, or otherwise ceases business; (b) The authorization is rescinded or suspended by the tax commissioner for failure to meet the guidelines and conditions of participation in the bulk file program, including any guidelines or conditions established or modified after the bulk filer receives its authorization. (2) A bulk filer shall notify its client companies within five days after the bulk filer's authorization is rescinded, suspended, or is otherwise no longer valid or active. If an entity no longer meets the requirements to be a bulk filer, the client companies of the former bulk filer shall immediately resume their state and school district withholding filing and payment obligations under this chapter. (F)(1) The tax commissioner may collect past due amounts from a bulk filer, including penalties and interest thereon, by assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code as if the amounts were taxes collected by an employer. (2) A bulk filer is subject to all applicable penalties under Title LVII of the Revised Code as if the bulk filer were the client company. (3) Notwithstanding the commissioner's authority under division (F)(1) of this section, a client company remains subject to assessment if its bulk filer fails to timely file all returns or reports, or to timely remit any payment, on the client company's behalf. The use of a bulk filer does not abrogate the ability of the commissioner to hold employees, officers, members, managers, or trustees of the client company personally liable under division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code. (4) Any liability assessed against both a bulk filer and a client company shall be joint and several. (5) A client company is not responsible for filings or amounts that a bulk filer fails to make or remit on behalf of another client company. (6) A bulk filer is subject to division (H) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code as if it were an employer subject to that section. (G) A bulk filer may file a refund application pursuant to section 5747.11 of the Revised Code on behalf of one or more of its client companies. Sec. 5747.08. An annual return with respect to the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and each tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code shall be made by every taxpayer for any taxable year for which the taxpayer is liable for the tax imposed by that section or under that chapter, unless the total credits allowed under division (E) of section 5747.05 and divisions (F) and (G) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code for the year are equal to or exceed the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, in which case no return shall be required unless the taxpayer is liable for a tax imposed pursuant to Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. (A) If an individual is deceased, any return or notice required of that individual under this chapter shall be made and filed by that decedent's executor, administrator, or other person charged with the property of that decedent. (B) If an individual is unable to make a return or notice required by this chapter, the return or notice required of that individual shall be made and filed by the individual's duly authorized agent, guardian, conservator, fiduciary, or other person charged with the care of the person or property of that individual. (C) Returns or notices required of an estate or a trust shall be made and filed by the fiduciary of the estate or trust. (D)(1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(1)(b) of this section, any pass-through entity may file a single return on behalf of one or more of the entity's investors other than an investor that is a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. The single return shall set forth the name, address, and social security number or other identifying number of each of those pass-through entity investors and shall indicate the distributive share of each of those pass-through entity investor's income taxable in this state in accordance with sections 5747.20 to 5747.231 of the Revised Code. Such pass-through entity investors for whom the pass-through entity elects to file a single return are not entitled to the exemption or credit provided for by sections 5747.02 and 5747.022 of the Revised Code; shall calculate the tax before business credits at the highest rate of tax set forth in section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for the taxable year for which the return is filed; and are entitled to only their distributive share of the business credits as defined in division (D)(2) of this section. A single check drawn by the pass-through entity shall accompany the return in full payment of the tax due, as shown on the single return, for such investors, other than investors who are persons subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. (b)(i) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a single return any investor that is a trust to the extent that any direct or indirect current, future, or contingent beneficiary of the trust is a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. (ii) A pass-through entity shall not include in such a single return any investor that is itself a pass-through entity to the extent that any direct or indirect investor in the second pass-through entity is a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. (c) Except as provided by division (L) of this section, nothing in division (D) of this section precludes the tax commissioner from requiring such investors to file the return and make the payment of taxes and related interest, penalty, and interest penalty required by this section or section 5747.02, 5747.09, or 5747.15 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (D) of this section precludes such an investor from filing the annual return under this section, utilizing the refundable credit equal to the investor's proportionate share of the tax paid by the pass-through entity on behalf of the investor under division (I) of this section, and making the payment of taxes imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (D) of this section shall be construed to provide to such an investor or pass-through entity any additional deduction or credit, other than the credit provided by division (I) of this section, solely on account of the entity's filing a return in accordance with this section. Such a pass-through entity also shall make the filing and payment of estimated taxes on behalf of the pass-through entity investors other than an investor that is a person subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.06 of the Revised Code. (2) For the purposes of this section, "business credits" means the credits listed in section 5747.98 of the Revised Code excluding the following credits: (a) The retirement income credit under division (B) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; (b) The senior citizen credit under division (F) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; (c) The lump sum distribution credit under division (G) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; (d) The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of the Revised Code; (e) The lump sum retirement income credit under division (C) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; (f) The lump sum retirement income credit under division (D) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; (g) The lump sum retirement income credit under division (E) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code; (h) The credit for displaced workers who pay for job training under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; (i) The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under section 5747.022 of the Revised Code; (j) The joint filing credit under division (E) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; (k) The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; (l) The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; (m) The earned income tax credit under section 5747.71 of the Revised Code; (n) The lead abatement credit under section 5747.26 of the Revised Code; (o) The credit for education expenses under section 5747.72 of the Revised Code; (p) The credit for tuition paid to a nonchartered nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the Revised Code. (3) The election provided for under division (D) of this section applies only to the taxable year for which the election is made by the pass-through entity. Unless the tax commissioner provides otherwise, this election, once made, is binding and irrevocable for the taxable year for which the election is made. Nothing in this division shall be construed to provide for any deduction or credit that would not be allowable if a nonresident pass-through entity investor were to file an annual return. (4) If a pass-through entity makes the election provided for under division (D) of this section, the pass-through entity shall be liable for any additional taxes, interest, interest penalty, or penalties imposed by this chapter if the tax commissioner finds that the single return does not reflect the correct tax due by the pass-through entity investors covered by that return. Nothing in this division shall be construed to limit or alter the liability, if any, imposed on pass-through entity investors for unpaid or underpaid taxes, interest, interest penalty, or penalties as a result of the pass-through entity's making the election provided for under division (D) of this section. For the purposes of division (D) of this section, "correct tax due" means the tax that would have been paid by the pass-through entity had the single return been filed in a manner reflecting the commissioner's findings. Nothing in division (D) of this section shall be construed to make or hold a pass-through entity liable for tax attributable to a pass-through entity investor's income from a source other than the pass-through entity electing to file the single return. (E) If a husband and wife file a joint federal income tax return for a taxable year, they shall file a joint return under this section for that taxable year, and their liabilities are joint and several, but, if the federal income tax liability of either spouse is determined on a separate federal income tax return, they shall file separate returns under this section. If either spouse is not required to file a federal income tax return and either or both are required to file a return pursuant to this chapter, they may elect to file separate or joint returns, and, pursuant to that election, their liabilities are separate or joint and several. If a husband and wife file separate returns pursuant to this chapter, each must claim the taxpayer's own exemption, but not both, as authorized under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code on the taxpayer's own return. (F) Each return or notice required to be filed under this section shall contain the signature of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's duly authorized agent and of the person who prepared the return for the taxpayer, and shall include the taxpayer's social security number. Each return shall be verified by a declaration under the penalties of perjury. The tax commissioner shall prescribe the form that the signature and declaration shall take. (G) Each return or notice required to be filed under this section shall be made and filed as required by section 5747.04 of the Revised Code, on or before the fifteenth day of April of each year, on forms that the tax commissioner shall prescribe, together with remittance made payable to the treasurer of state in the combined amount of the state and all school district income taxes shown to be due on the form. Upon good cause shown, the commissioner may extend the period for filing any notice or return required to be filed under this section and may adopt rules relating to extensions. If the extension results in an extension of time for the payment of any state or school district income tax liability with respect to which the return is filed, the taxpayer shall pay at the time the tax liability is paid an amount of interest computed at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code on that liability from the time that payment is due without extension to the time of actual payment. Except as provided in section 5747.132 of the Revised Code, in addition to all other interest charges and penalties, all taxes imposed under this chapter or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and remaining unpaid after they become due, except combined amounts due of one dollar or less, bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code until paid or until the day an assessment is issued under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code, whichever occurs first. If the commissioner considers it necessary in order to ensure the payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code or any tax imposed under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code, the commissioner may require returns and payments to be made otherwise than as provided in this section. To the extent that any provision in this division conflicts with any provision in section 5747.026 of the Revised Code, the provision in that section prevails. (H) The amounts withheld pursuant to section 5747.06, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of the Revised Code shall be allowed to the ultimate recipient of the income as credits against payment of the appropriate taxes imposed on the ultimate recipient by section 5747.02 and under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code. As used in this division, "ultimate recipient" means the person who is required to report income from which amounts are withheld pursuant to section 5747.06, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.065, or 5747.071 of the Revised Code on the annual return required to be filed under this section. (I) If a pass-through entity elects to file a single return under division (D) of this section and if any investor is required to file the annual return and make the payment of taxes required by this chapter on account of the investor's other income that is not included in a single return filed by a pass-through entity or any other investor elects to file the annual return, the investor is entitled to a refundable credit equal to the investor's proportionate share of the lesser of the tax due or the tax paid by the pass-through entity on behalf of the investor. The investor shall claim the credit for the investor's taxable year in which or with which ends the taxable year of the pass-through entity. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow any credit provided in this chapter to be claimed more than once. For the purpose of computing any interest, penalty, or interest penalty, the investor shall be deemed to have paid the refundable credit provided by this division on the day that the pass-through entity paid the estimated tax or the tax giving rise to the credit. (J) The tax commissioner shall ensure that each return required to be filed under this section includes a box that the taxpayer may check to authorize a paid tax preparer who prepared the return to communicate with the department of taxation about matters pertaining to the return. The return or instructions accompanying the return shall indicate that by checking the box the taxpayer authorizes the department of taxation to contact the preparer concerning questions that arise during the processing of the return and authorizes the preparer only to provide the department with information that is missing from the return, to contact the department for information about the processing of the return or the status of the taxpayer's refund or payments, and to respond to notices about mathematical errors, offsets, or return preparation that the taxpayer has received from the department and has shown to the preparer. (K) The tax commissioner shall permit individual taxpayers to instruct the department of taxation to cause any refund of overpaid taxes to be deposited directly into a checking account, savings account, or an individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity, or preexisting college savings plan or program account offered by the Ohio tuition trust authority under Chapter 3334. of the Revised Code, as designated by the taxpayer, when the taxpayer files the annual return required by this section electronically. (L) If, for the taxable year, a nonresident or trust that is the owner of an electing pass-through entity, as defined in section 5747.38 of the Revised Code, does not have Ohio adjusted gross income or, in the case of a trust, modified Ohio taxable income other than from one or more electing pass-through entities, the nonresident or trust shall not be required to file an annual return under this section. Nothing in this division precludes such an owner from filing the annual return under this section, utilizing the refundable credit under section 5747.39 of the Revised Code equal to the owner's proportionate share of the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and paid by the electing pass-through entity, and making the payment of taxes imposed under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. (M) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to administer this section. Sec. 5747.09. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that the taxpayer estimates to be the taxpayer's combined tax liability under this chapter and Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code for the current taxable year. (2) "Tax liability" means the total taxes due for the taxable year, after allowing any credit to which the taxpayer is entitled, but prior to applying any estimated tax payment, withholding payment, or refund from another tax year. (3) "Taxes paid" include payments of estimated taxes made under division (C) of this section, taxes withheld from the taxpayer's compensation, and tax refunds applied by the taxpayer in payment of estimated taxes. (4) "Required installment" means a payment equal to twenty-five per cent of the lesser of the following: (a) Ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (b) One hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of a taxpayer for the preceding taxable year. Division (A)(4)(b) of this section applies only if the taxpayer filed a return under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code for the preceding taxable year and if the preceding taxable year was a twelve-month taxable year. (B) Every taxpayer shall make declaration of estimated taxes for the current taxable year, in the form that the tax commissioner shall prescribe, if the amount payable as estimated taxes, less the amount to be withheld from the taxpayer's compensation, is more than five hundred dollars. For purposes of this section, taxes withheld from compensation shall be considered as paid in equal amounts on each payment date unless the taxpayer establishes the dates on which all amounts were actually withheld, in which case the amounts withheld shall be considered as paid on the dates on which the amounts were actually withheld. Taxpayers filing joint returns pursuant to section 5747.08 of the Revised Code shall file joint declarations of estimated taxes. A taxpayer may amend a declaration under rules prescribed by the commissioner. A taxpayer having a taxable year of less than twelve months shall make a declaration under rules prescribed by the commissioner. The declaration of estimated taxes for an individual under a disability shall be made and filed by the person who is required to file the income tax return. The declaration of estimated taxes shall be filed on or before the fifteenth day of April of each year or on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the taxpayer becomes subject to tax for the first time. Taxpayers reporting on a fiscal year basis shall file a declaration on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of each fiscal year or period. The declaration shall be filed upon a form prescribed by the commissioner and furnished by or obtainable from the commissioner. The original declaration or any subsequent amendment may be increased or decreased on or before any subsequent quarterly payment day as provided in this section. (C) The required portion of the tax liability for the taxable year that shall be paid through estimated taxes made payable to the treasurer of state, including the application of tax refunds to estimated taxes, and withholding on or before the applicable payment date shall be as follows: (1) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (2) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the beginning of the taxable year, forty-five per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (3) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the beginning of the taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (4) On or before the fifteenth day of the first month of the following taxable year, ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year. When an amended return has been filed, the unpaid balance shown due on the amended return shall be paid in equal installments on or before the remaining payment dates. On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month of the year following that for which the declaration or amended declaration was filed, an annual return shall be filed and any balance which may be due shall be paid with the return in accordance with section 5747.08 of the Revised Code. (D) In the case of any underpayment of estimated taxes, an interest penalty shall may be added to the taxes for the tax year at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment for the period of underpayment, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (E) of this section. The amount of the underpayment shall be determined as follows: (1) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (2) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (3) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (4) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. The period of the underpayment shall run from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the date on which the payment is made. For purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently required to be paid to avoid any penalty. The tax commissioner may abate, in whole or in part, the interest penalty imposed under division (D) of this section. Any such penalty imposed shall be in lieu of any other interest charge or penalty imposed for failure to file an estimated return and make estimated payments as required by this section. (E) An underpayment of estimated taxes determined under division (D) of this section shall be due to reasonable cause and the interest penalty imposed by this section shall not be added to the taxes for the tax year if either of the following apply: (1) The amount of tax that was paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during the year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due; (2) The amount of tax that was paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the taxpayer for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the taxpayer filed a return under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code for that year. The tax commissioner may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of taxpayers after finding that the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. Sec. 5747.10. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Audited partnership" means a partnership subject to an examination by the internal revenue service pursuant to subchapter C, chapter 63, subtitle F of the Internal Revenue Code resulting in a federal adjustment. (2)(a) "Direct investor" means a partner or other investor that holds a direct interest in a pass-through entity. (b) "Indirect investor" means a partner or other investor that holds an interest in a pass-through entity that itself holds an interest, directly or through another indirect partner or other investor, in a pass-through entity. (3) "Exempt partner" means a partner that is neither a pass-through entity nor a person subject to the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. (4) "Federal adjustment" means a change to an item or amount required to be determined under the Internal Revenue Code that directly or indirectly affects a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and that results from an action or examination by the internal revenue service, or from the filing of an amended federal tax return, a claim for a federal tax refund, or an administrative adjustment request filed by a partnership under section 6227 of the Internal Revenue Code. (5) "Federal adjustments return" means the form or other document prescribed by the tax commissioner for use by a taxpayer in reporting final federal adjustments. (6) "State partnership representative" means either of the following: (a) The person who served as the partnership's representative for federal income tax purposes, pursuant to section 6223(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, during the corresponding federal partnership audit; (b) The person designated, on a form prescribed by the tax commissioner, to serve as the partnership's representative during the state partnership audit. The commissioner may establish reasonable qualifications and procedures for a person to be designated as a state partnership representative under this division. (7) A federal adjustment is "final" or "agreed to or finally determined for federal income tax purposes" on any of the following: (a) The day after which the period for appeal of a federal assessment has expired; (b) The date on a refund check issued by the internal revenue service; or (c) For agreements required to be signed by the internal revenue service and the taxpayer or audited partnership, the date on which the last party signed the agreement. (B)(1) If any of the facts, figures, computations, or attachments required in a taxpayer's annual return to determine the tax charged by this chapter or Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code must be altered as the result of a final federal adjustment, and the federal adjustment is not required to be reported under division (C) of this section, the taxpayer shall file an amended return with the tax commissioner in such form as the commissioner requires. The amended return shall be filed not later than ninety days after the federal adjustment has been agreed to or finally determined for federal income tax purposes. (2) "One hundred eighty" shall be substituted for "ninety" in divisions (B)(1) and (E)(1) of this section if, for any taxable year, the final federal adjustment results from taxes paid by the taxpayer on an amount described in division (A)(32) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (C) Except for adjustments required to be reported for federal purposes pursuant to section 6225(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and adjustments that are taken into account on a federal amended return or similar report filed pursuant to section 6225(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, partnerships and partners shall report final federal adjustments and make payments as required under division (C) of this section. (1) With respect to an action required or permitted to be taken by a partnership under this section, and any petition for reassessment or appeal to the board of tax appeals or any court with respect to such an action, the state partnership representative shall have the sole authority to act on behalf of the audited partnership, and the partnership's direct and indirect investors shall be bound by those actions. (2) Unless an audited partnership makes the election under division (C)(3) of this section: (a) The audited partnership, through its state partnership representative, shall do all of the following within ninety days after the federal adjustment is final: (i) File a federal adjustments return with the tax commissioner, including a copy of the notifications provided under division (C)(2)(a)(ii) of this section; (ii) Notify each of its direct investors, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, of the investor's distributive share of the final federal adjustments; (iii) File an amended tax return on behalf of its nonresident direct investors and pay any additional tax that would have been due under sections 5733.41 and 5747.41, or division (D) of section 5747.08, of the Revised Code with respect to those direct investors had the final federal adjustments been reported properly on the original filing. (b) Each direct investor that is subject to the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code shall file an original or amended tax return to include the investor's distributive share of the adjustments reported to the direct investor under division (C)(2)(a) of this section, and pay any additional tax due, within ninety days after the audited partnership files its federal adjustments return with the commissioner. (c)(i) Each direct and indirect investor of an audited partnership that is a pass-through entity and all investors in such a pass-through entity that are subject to the filing and payment requirements of Chapters 5733. and 5747. of the Revised Code are subject to the reporting and payment requirements of division (C)(2) or, upon a timely election, division (C)(3) of this section. (ii) Such direct and indirect investors shall make the required returns and payments within ninety days after the deadline for filing and furnishing statements under section 6226(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable treasury regulations. (3) If an audited partnership makes the election under this division, the audited partnership, through its state partnership representative, shall do all of the following within ninety days after all federal adjustments are final: (a) File a federal adjustments return with the tax commissioner indicating the partnership has made the election under division (C)(3) of this section; (b) Pay the amount of combined additional tax due under division (D)(2) of this section, calculated by multiplying the highest rate of tax set forth in section 5747.02 of the Revised Code by the sum of the following: (i) The distributive shares of the final federal adjustments that are allocable or apportionable to this state of each investor who is a nonresident taxpayer or pass-through entity; (ii) The distributive share of the final federal adjustments for each investor who is a resident taxpayer. (c) Notify each of its direct investors, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, of the investor's distributive share of the final federal adjustments and the amount paid on their behalf pursuant to division (C)(3)(b) of this section. (4)(a) A direct investor of an audited partnership is not required to file an amended return or pay tax otherwise due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code if the audited partnership properly reports and pays the tax under division (C)(3) of this section. (b)(i) Nothing in division (C) of this section precludes a direct or indirect investor in the audited partnership from filing a return to report the investor's share of the final federal adjustments. Such an investor who files a return and reports the income related to the final federal adjustments is entitled to a refundable credit for taxes paid by the audited partnership under division (C)(3)(b) of this section. The credit shall be computed and claimed in the same manner as the credit allowed under division (I) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code. (ii) Notwithstanding division (C)(4)(b)(i) of this section, an exempt partner, whether a direct or indirect investor, may file an application for refund of its proportionate share of the amounts erroneously paid by the audited partnership pursuant to division (C)(3)(b) of this section on the exempt partner's behalf. (5) Upon request by an audited partnership, the tax commissioner may agree, in writing, to allow an alternative method of reporting and payment than required by division (C)(2) or (3) of this section. The request must be submitted to the commissioner in writing before the applicable deadline for filing a return under division (C)(2)(a) or (3) of this section. The commissioner's decision on whether to enter into an agreement under this division is not subject to further administrative review or appeal. (6) Nothing in division (C) of this section precludes either of the following: (a) A resident taxpayer from filing a return to claim the credit under division (B) of section 5747.05 or division (D)(2)(B)(2) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code based upon any amounts paid by the audited partnership on such investor's behalf to another state. (b) The tax commissioner from issuing an assessment under this chapter against any direct or indirect investor for taxes due from the investor if an audited partnership, or direct and indirect investor of an audited partnership that is a pass-through entity, fails to timely file any return or remit any payment required by this section or underreports income or underpays tax on behalf of an indirect investor who is a resident taxpayer. (D) In the case of an underpayment, and unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the tax commissioner: (1) The taxpayer's amended return shall be accompanied by payment of any combined additional tax due together with interest thereon. An amended return required by this section is a return subject to assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code for the purpose of assessing any additional tax due under this section, together with any applicable penalty and interest. It shall not reopen those facts, figures, computations, or attachments from a previously filed return no longer subject to assessment that are not affected, either directly or indirectly, by the final federal adjustment to the taxpayer's federal income tax return. (2) The audited partnership's federal adjustments return shall be accompanied by payment of any combined additional tax due together with interest thereon. The federal adjustments return required by this section is a return subject to assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code for the purpose of assessing any additional tax due under this section, together with any applicable penalty and interest. It shall not reopen those facts, figures, computations, or attachments from a previously filed return no longer subject to assessment that are not affected, either directly or indirectly, by the final federal adjustment. (3) The tax commissioner may accept estimated payments of the tax arising from pending federal adjustments before the date for filing a federal adjustments return. The commissioner may adopt rules for the payment of such estimated taxes. (E) In the case of an overpayment, and unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the tax commissioner: (1) A taxpayer may file an application for refund under this division within the ninety-day period prescribed for filing the amended return even if it is filed beyond the period prescribed in section 5747.11 of the Revised Code if it otherwise conforms to the requirements of such section. An application filed under this division shall claim refund of overpayments resulting from alterations to only those facts, figures, computations, or attachments required in the taxpayer's annual return that are affected, either directly or indirectly, by the final federal adjustment to the taxpayer's federal income tax return unless it is also filed within the time prescribed in section 5747.11 of the Revised Code. It shall not reopen those facts, figures, computations, or attachments that are not affected, either directly or indirectly, by the adjustment to the taxpayer's federal income tax return. (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, an audited partnership may file an application for a refund under this division within the ninety-day period prescribed for filing the federal adjustments return, even if it is filed beyond the period prescribed by section 5747.11 of the Revised Code, if it otherwise conforms to the requirements of that section. An application filed under this division may claim a refund of overpayments resulting only from final federal adjustments unless it is also filed within the time prescribed by section 5747.11 of the Revised Code. It shall not reopen those facts, figures, computations, or attachments that are not affected, either directly or indirectly, by the federal adjustment. (b) An audited partnership may not file an application for refund under division (E) of this section based on final federal adjustments described in section 6225(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code. (3) Any refund granted to a pass-through entity filing an application for refund under division (E) of this section shall be reduced by amounts previously claimed as a credit under section 5747.059 or division (I) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code by the pass-through entity's direct or indirect investors. (F) Excluding the deadline in division (C)(2)(c)(ii) of this section, an audited partnership, or a direct or indirect investor of an audited partnership that is a pass-through entity, may automatically extend the deadline for reporting, payments, and refunds under this section by sixty days if the entity has ten thousand or more direct investors and notifies the commissioner of such extension, in writing, before the unextended deadline. Sec. 5747.124. (A) As used in this section, "judgment creditor" excludes all state and federal agencies, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions. (B) If a person entitled to a refund under this chapter is a judgment debtor indebted to a judgment creditor, as defined in section 2716.01 of the Revised Code, the amount refundable shall be subject to an order of garnishment of property, other than personal earnings, issued under sections 2716.11 and 2716.13 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of such an order, the tax commissioner shall pay the amount of the refund not already paid to the person entitled to the refund to the clerk of court that issued the order, unless otherwise payable in accordance with section 5747.12, 5747.121, 5747.122, or 5747.123 of the Revised Code, provided all of the following are true: (1) The judgment creditor has made reasonable efforts to collect the debt before submitting the garnishment order to the tax commissioners; (2) The principal balance of the judgment, excluding interest and post-judgment fees, is greater than two hundred fifty dollars; (3) The judgment underlying the garnishment order was issued not less than one and not more than seven years before it is submitted to the tax commissioner. (C) Any order of garnishment submitted under this section shall be satisfied after overdue child support subject to section 5747.121 of the Revised Code and debts described in division (A) of section 5747.12 of the Revised Code. (D) If the amount refundable is less than the amount stated on the order of garnishment, it may be applied in partial satisfaction of that amount. If the amount refundable is greater than the amount stated on the order, the amount remaining after satisfaction of the order shall be refunded. (E) The tax commissioner shall charge each respective judgment creditor a fee of fifteen dollars for the commissioner's cost in applying refunds to satisfy an order of garnishment. (F) If the tax commissioner receives multiple orders of garnishment of property, other than personal earnings for amounts owed by the same person, the commissioner shall satisfy the orders in the sequence they were received. (G) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules to apportion the amount of a tax return available to satisfy an order of garnishment in the case of persons filing a joint return who do not jointly owe the debt or certified claim. Sec. 5747.13. (A) If any employer collects the tax imposed by section 5747.02 or under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code and fails to remit the tax as required by law, or fails to collect the tax, the employer is personally liable for any amount collected that the employer fails to remit, or any amount that the employer fails to collect. If any taxpayer fails to file a return or fails to pay the tax imposed by section 5747.02 or under Chapter 5748. of the Revised Code, the taxpayer is personally liable for the amount of the tax. If any employer, taxpayer, qualifying entity, or electing pass-through entity required to file a return under this chapter fails to file the return within the time prescribed, files an incorrect return, fails to remit the full amount of the taxes due for the period covered by the return, or fails to remit any additional tax due as a result of a reduction in the amount of the credit allowed under division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code together with interest on the additional tax within the time prescribed by that division, the tax commissioner may make an assessment against any person liable for any deficiency for the period for which the return is or taxes are due, based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. An assessment issued against either the employer or the taxpayer pursuant to this section shall not be considered an election of remedies or a bar to an assessment against the other for failure to report or pay the same tax. No assessment shall be issued against any person if the tax actually has been paid by another. No assessment shall be made or issued against an employer, a taxpayer, a qualifying entity, or an electing pass-through entity more than four years after the final date the return subject to assessment was required to be filed or the date the return was filed, whichever is later. However, the commissioner may assess any balance due as the result of a reduction in the credit allowed under division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code, including applicable penalty and interest, within four years of the date on which the taxpayer reports a change in either the portion of the taxpayer's adjusted gross income subjected to an income tax or tax measured by income in another state or the District of Columbia, or the amount of liability for an income tax or tax measured by income to another state or the District of Columbia, as required by division (B)(4) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code. Such time limits may be extended if both the employer, taxpayer, qualifying entity, or electing pass-through entity and the commissioner consent in writing to the extension or if an agreement waiving or extending the time limits has been entered into pursuant to section 122.171 of the Revised Code. Any such extension shall extend the four-year time limit in division (B) of section 5747.11 of the Revised Code for the same period of time. There shall be no bar or limit to an assessment against an employer for taxes withheld from employees and not remitted to the state, against an employer, a taxpayer, a qualifying entity, or an electing pass-through entity that fails to file a return subject to assessment as required by this chapter, or against an employer, a taxpayer, a qualifying entity, or an electing pass-through entity that files a fraudulent return. The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of the assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the tax commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment, signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the commissioner with remittance made payable to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the employer's, taxpayer's, qualifying entity's, or electing pass-through entity's place of business is located or the county in which the party assessed resides. If the party assessed is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment shall be filed by the clerk in one of two loose-leaf books, one entitled "special judgments for state and school district income taxes," and the other entitled "special judgments for qualifying entity and electing pass-through entity taxes." The judgment shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected under this section shall be considered as revenue arising from the taxes imposed by this chapter or Chapter 5733. or 5748. of the Revised Code, as appropriate. (E) If the party assessed files a petition for reassessment under division (B) of this section, the person, on or before the last day the petition may be filed, shall pay the assessed amount, including assessed interest and assessed penalties, if any of the following conditions exists: (1) The person files a tax return reporting Ohio adjusted gross income, less the exemptions allowed by section 5747.025 of the Revised Code, in an amount less than one cent, and the reported amount is not based on the computations required under division (A) of section 5747.01 or section 5747.025 of the Revised Code. (2) The person files a tax return that the tax commissioner determines to be incomplete, false, fraudulent, or frivolous. (3) The person fails to file a tax return, and the basis for this failure is not either of the following: (a) An assertion that the person has no nexus with this state; (b) The computations required under division (A) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code or the application of credits allowed under this chapter has the result that the person's tax liability is less than one dollar and one cent. (F) Notwithstanding the fact that a petition for reassessment is pending, the petitioner may pay all or a portion of the assessment that is the subject of the petition. The acceptance of a payment by the treasurer of state does not prejudice any claim for refund upon final determination of the petition. If upon final determination of the petition an error in the assessment is corrected by the tax commissioner, upon petition so filed or pursuant to a decision of the board of tax appeals or any court to which the determination or decision has been appealed, so that the amount due from the party assessed under the corrected assessment is less than the portion paid, there shall be issued to the petitioner or to the petitioner's assigns or legal representative a refund in the amount of the overpayment as provided by section 5747.11 of the Revised Code, with interest on that amount as provided by such section, subject to section 5747.12 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.38. (A) As used in this section and section 5747.39 of the Revised Code and in other sections of Chapter 5747. of the Revised Code in the context of the tax imposed under this section: (1) "Electing pass-through entity" means a qualifying pass-through entity that elects to be subject to the tax levied under this section for a taxable year pursuant to division (C) of this section. (2) "Owner" means a person that is a partner, member, shareholder, or investor in an electing pass-through entity for any portion of the taxable year. (3) "Income" means the sum of owners' distributive shares of the income, gain, expense, or loss of an electing pass-through entity for the taxable year, as reported for federal income tax purposes. (4) "Qualifying taxable income" means the sum of the following: (a) The portion of an electing pass-through entity's income that is business income, subject to the applicable adjustments in divisions (A)(2) to (7) of section 5733.40 of the Revised Code, multiplied by the fraction described in division (B)(1) of that section; (b) The portion of the electing pass-through entity's income that is nonbusiness income allocated to this state under section 5747.20 of the Revised Code. (B) For the same purposes for which the tax is levied under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, a tax is hereby levied on each electing pass-through entity on the entity's qualifying taxable income for the taxable year, at the following rates: (1) For an electing pass-through entity's taxable year that begins in 2022, five per cent; (2) For an electing pass-through entity's taxable year that begins in 2023 and in any year thereafter, the rate equal to the tax rate imposed on taxable business income under division (A)(4)(a) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code applicable to that taxable year. (C) A pass-through entity that is not a disregarded entity, as defined in section 5733.01 of the Revised Code, may elect to be subject to the tax levied under this section by filing with the tax commissioner a form prescribed by the commissioner making such election on or before the deadline to file the return under section 5747.42 of the Revised Code for the taxable year. Such election applies only to the taxable year for which the election is made and is, once made, irrevocable for that year. (D) The Except as otherwise provided in this division, the tax levied under this section shall be calculated without regard to any deductions or credits otherwise permitted to be claimed by an owner of the electing pass-through entity in computing the owner's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. In calculating its tax due under this section, an electing pass-through entity may claim the refundable credits authorized under section 5747.059 or 5747.39 of the Revised Code or division (I) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code if that credit is available to one or more of the entity's owners as if the entity were the owner or owners. (E) The tax levied under this section is intended to comply with the provisions of internal revenue service notice 2020-75 in which such tax paid by an electing pass-through entity is deductible to the entity for federal income tax purposes. (F) The tax commissioner shall adopt rules to administer the tax levied under this section. Such rules shall include a description of how the adjustments to income under divisions (A)(36) and (S)(15) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code and the credit under section 5747.39 of the Revised Code apply to direct or indirect owners of an electing pass-through entity based on various ownership structures. Any rule adopted under this section is not a regulatory restriction for the purpose of section 121.95 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.39. There is hereby allowed a refundable credit against a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for a taxpayer who is an owner of an electing pass-through entity. The credit shall equal the owner's proportionate share of the lesser of the tax levied due or paid under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code remitted by the owner's for the taxable year of the electing pass-through entity for that ends in the the taxable year of the taxpayer. The credit shall be claimed for the taxpayer's taxable year that includes the last day of the electing pass-through entity's taxable year for which the tax levied under that section was paid and in the order required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. If the credit exceeds the aggregate amount of tax otherwise due, the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer. The tax commissioner may request that a taxpayer claiming a credit under this section furnish information as is necessary to support the claim for the credit under this section, and no credit shall be allowed unless the requested information is provided. Sec. 5747.40. Any term used in sections 5747.40 to 5747.43 of the Revised Code has the same meaning as defined in section 5733.40 of the Revised Code. The purpose of sections 5747.40 to 5747.43 of the Revised Code is to complement and to reinforce the tax levied under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. Those sections do not apply to a pass-through entity if all of the investors of the pass-through entity are resident taxpayers for the purposes of this chapter for the entire qualifying taxable year of the pass-through entity, or to a trust if all of the beneficiaries of the trust are resident taxpayers for the purposes of this chapter for the entire qualifying taxable year of the trust, except that sections 5747.42 and 5747.43 of the Revised Code apply to all pass-through entities that elect to be subject to the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.43. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that a qualifying entity or electing pass-through entity estimates to be the sum of its liability under sections 5733.41 and 5747.41 or section 5747.38 of the Revised Code for its current qualifying taxable year or taxable year, as applicable. (2) "Tax liability" means the total of the taxes and withholding taxes due under sections 5733.41 and 5747.41 of the Revised Code or the tax due under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code for the applicable taxable year prior to applying any estimated tax payment or refund from another year. (3) "Taxes paid" includes payments of estimated taxes made under division (C) of this section and tax refunds applied by the qualifying entity or electing pass-through entity in payment of estimated taxes. (4) "Required installment" means a payment equal to twenty-five per cent of the lesser of the following: (a) Ninety per cent of the tax liability for the qualifying taxable year; (b) One hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of a qualifying entity or an electing pass-through entity for the preceding taxable year. Division (A)(4)(b) of this section applies only if the entity filed a return under section 5747.42 of the Revised Code for the preceding taxable year and if the preceding taxable year was a twelve-month taxable year. (B) In addition to the return required to be filed pursuant to section 5747.42 of the Revised Code, each qualifying entity or electing pass-through entity that is subject to the tax imposed under section 5733.41 and to the withholding tax imposed by section 5747.41 of the Revised Code or that is subject to the tax imposed under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code shall file an estimated tax return and pay a portion of the entity's tax liability for its taxable year. The portion of those taxes required to be paid, and the last day prescribed for payment thereof, shall be as prescribed by divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of this section: (1) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month following after the last day of the first quarter of beginning of the entity's taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year; (2) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month following after the last day of the second quarter of beginning of the entity's taxable year, forty-five per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year; (3) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month following after the last day of the third quarter of beginning of the entity's taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year; (4) On or before the fifteenth day of the first month following of the last day of the fourth quarter of the entity's following taxable year, ninety per cent of the entity's estimated tax liability for that taxable year. Payments of estimated taxes shall be made payable to the treasurer of state. (C) If a payment of estimated taxes is not paid in the full amount required under division (B) of this section, a penalty shall may be added to the taxes charged for the qualifying taxable year or taxable year, as applicable, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (D) of this section. The penalty shall accrue at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the day the payment is made. The amount of the underpayment upon which the penalty shall accrue shall be determined as follows: (1) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (2) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (3) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (4) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, the required installment less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. For the purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of a previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently required to be paid to avoid any penalty. The tax commissioner may abate, in whole or in part, the penalty imposed under division (C) of this section. Any such penalty is in lieu of any other interest charge or penalty imposed for failure to file a declaration of estimated tax report and make estimated payments as required by this section. (D) An underpayment of estimated taxes determined under division (C) of this section is due to reasonable cause if any of the following apply: (1) The amount of tax that was paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during that year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due; (2) The amount of tax liability that was paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year; (3) The amount of tax liability that was paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the entity for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the entity filed a return under section 5747.42 of the Revised Code for that year. (E)(1) Divisions (B) and (C) of this section do not apply for a taxable year if either of the following applies to the entity: (a) For the immediately preceding taxable year, the entity computes in good faith and in a reasonable manner that the sum of its adjusted qualifying amounts or its qualifying taxable income, as applicable, is ten thousand dollars or less. (b) For the taxable year the entity computes in good faith and in a reasonable manner that the sum of its adjusted qualifying amounts or its qualifying taxable income, as applicable, is ten thousand dollars or less. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of Title LVII of the Revised Code to the contrary, the entity shall establish by a preponderance of the evidence that its computation of the adjusted qualifying amounts or qualifying taxable income, as applicable, for the immediately preceding taxable year and the taxable year was, in fact, made in good faith and in a reasonable manner. (F) The tax commissioner may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of qualifying entities if the commissioner finds the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. (G) Estimated taxes paid by a qualifying entity or an electing pass-through entity may be applied to satisfy the entity's tax liability under section 5733.41, 5747.38, or 5747.41 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section authorizes such an entity to apply estimated taxes paid against more than one tax. Sec. 5747.502. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Traffic law photo-monitoring device" has the same meaning as in section 4511.092 of the Revised Code. (2) "School zone" has the same meaning as in section 4511.21 of the Revised Code. (3) "Transportation district" means a territorial district established by the director of transportation under section 5501.14 of the Revised Code. (4) "District deputy director" means the person appointed and assigned by the director of transportation under section 5501.14 of the Revised Code to administer the activities of a transportation district. (5) "Gross amount" means the entire amount of traffic camera fines and fees paid by a driver. (6) "Local government fund adjustment" or "LGF adjustment" means the sum of: (a) The gross amount of all traffic camera fines collected by a local authority during the preceding fiscal year, as reported under division (B)(1) of this section, if such a report is required; plus (b) The residual adjustment computed for the local authority under division (B)(4) of this section, if such an adjustment applies. (7) "Local government fund payments" or "LGF payments" means the payments a local authority would receive under sections 5747.503, 5747.51, and 5747.53, and division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code, as applicable, if not for the reductions required by divisions (C) and (D) of this section. (8) "Residual adjustment" means the most recent LGF adjustment computed for a local authority under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section minus the sum of the reductions applied after that computation under division (C) of this section to the local authority's LGF payments. (9) "Traffic camera fines" means civil fines for any violation of any local ordinance or resolution that are based upon evidence recorded by a traffic law photo-monitoring device. (10) "Qualifying village" has the same meaning as in section 5747.503 of the Revised Code. (11) "Local authority" means a municipal corporation, county, or township. (B)(1) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of July, any local authority that directly or indirectly collected traffic camera fines during the preceding fiscal year shall file a report with the tax commissioner that includes a detailed statement of the gross amount of all traffic camera fines the local authority collected during that period and the gross amount of such fines that the local authority collected for violations that occurred within a school zone. (2) Annually, on or before the tenth day of August, and except as otherwise provided in this division, the commissioner shall compute a local government fund adjustment for each local authority that files a report under division (B)(1) of this section or with respect to which a residual adjustment applies. Subject to division (B)(3) of this section, the LGF adjustment shall be used by the commissioner to determine the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section for each of the next twelve months, starting with the month in which the LGF adjustment is computed. After those twelve months, the LGF adjustment ceases to apply and, if an LGF adjustment continues to be required, the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section shall be determined based on an updated LGF adjustment computed under this division. After the effective date of this amendment, no LGF adjustment shall be calculated for a county or township prohibited from operating a traffic law photo-monitoring device by section 4511.093 of the Revised Code. An LGF adjustment that applies to a county or township on the effective date of this amendment ceases to apply as of that date. (3) Upon receipt of a report described by division (B)(1) of this section that is not timely filed, the commissioner shall do both of the following: (a) If one or more payments to the local authority has been withheld under division (D) of this section because of the local authority's failure to file the report, notify the county auditor and county treasurer of the appropriate county that the report has been received and that, subject to division (C) of this section, payments to the local authority from the undivided local government fund are to resume. (b) Compute the local authority's LGF adjustment using the information in the report. An LGF adjustment computed under this division shall be used by the commissioner to determine the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section starting with the next required reduction. The LGF adjustment ceases to apply on the thirty-first day of the ensuing July, following which, if an LGF adjustment continues to be required, the amount of the reductions required under division (C) of this section shall be determined based on an updated LGF adjustment computed under division (B)(2) of this section. (4) Annually, on or before the tenth day of August, the commissioner shall compute a residual adjustment for each local authority whose LGF adjustment for the preceding year exceeds the amount by which the local authority's LGF payments were reduced during that year under division (C) of this section. The residual adjustment shall be used to compute the LGF adjustment for the ensuing year under division (B)(2) of this section. (C) The commissioner shall do the following, as applicable, respecting any local authority to which an LGF adjustment computed under division (B) of this section applies: (1) If the local authority is a municipal corporation with a population of one thousand or more, reduce payments to the municipal corporation under division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment. If one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment exceeds the amount of money the municipal corporation would otherwise receive under division (C) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code, the commissioner also shall reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the excess, or (b) the amount of the payment the municipal corporation would otherwise receive from the fund under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code. (2) If the local authority is a township or qualifying village, reduce the supplemental payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code by the lesser of one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment, or the amount of money the township or qualifying village would otherwise receive under that section. If one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment exceeds the amount of money the township or qualifying village would otherwise receive under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code, the commissioner also shall reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the excess, or (b) the amount of the payment the township or qualifying village would otherwise receive from the fund under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code. (3) If the local authority is a county, reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the LGF adjustment, or (b) the amount of the payment the county would otherwise receive from the fund under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code. (4) For any local authority, on or before the tenth day of each month a reduction is made under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, make a payment to the local authority in an amount equal to the lesser of (a) one-twelfth of the gross amount of traffic camera fines the local authority collected in the preceding fiscal year for violations that occurred within a school zone, as indicated on the report filed by the local authority pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, or (b) the amount by which the local authority's LGF payments were reduced that month pursuant to division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. Payments received by a local authority under this division shall be used by the local authority for school safety purposes. (D) Upon discovery, based on information in the commissioner's possession, that a local authority required to file a report under division (B)(1) of this section has failed to do so, the commissioner shall do the following, as applicable: (1) If the local authority is a municipal corporation with a population of one thousand or more, cease providing for payments to the municipal corporation under section 5747.50 of the Revised Code beginning with the next required payment and until such time as the report is received by the commissioner; (2) If the local authority is a township or qualifying village, reduce the supplemental payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under section 5747.503 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the amount of such payments the local authority would otherwise receive under that section, beginning with the next required payment and until such time as the report is received by the commissioner; (3) For any local authority, reduce payments to the appropriate county undivided local government fund under division (B) of section 5747.50 of the Revised Code by an amount equal to the amount of such payments the local authority would otherwise receive under section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code, beginning with the next required payment and until such time as the report is received by the commissioner; (4) For any local authority, notify the county auditor and county treasurer that such payments are to cease until the commissioner notifies the auditor and treasurer under division (E) of this section that the payments are to resume. (E) The commissioner shall notify the county auditor and county treasurer on or before the day the commissioner first reduces a county undivided local government fund payment to that county under division (C) of this section. The notice shall include the full amount of the reduction, a list of the local authorities to which the reduction applies, and the amount of reduction attributed to each such local authority. The commissioner shall send an updated notice to the county auditor and county treasurer any time the amount the reduction attributed to any local authority changes. A county treasurer that receives a notice from the commissioner under this division or division (B)(3)(a) or (D)(4) of this section shall reduce, cease, or resume payments from the undivided local government fund to the local authority that is the subject of the notice as specified by the commissioner in the notice. Unless otherwise specified in the notice, the payments shall be reduced, ceased, or resumed beginning with the next required payment. (F)(F)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the Ohio highway and transportation safety fund. On or before the tenth day of each month, the commissioner shall deposit in the fund an amount equal to the total amount by which payments to local authorities were reduced or ceased under division (C) or (D) of this section minus the total amount of payments made under division (C)(4) of this section. The Except as provided in division (F)(2) of this section, the amount deposited with respect to a local authority shall be credited to an account to be created in the fund for the transportation district in which that local authority is located. If the local authority is located within more than one transportation district, the amount credited to the account of each such transportation district shall be prorated on the basis of the number of centerline miles of public roads and highways in both the local authority and the respective districts. Amounts credited to a transportation district's account shall be used by the department of transportation and the district deputy director exclusively to enhance public safety on public roads and highways within that transportation district. (2) Notwithstanding division (F)(1) of this section, in fiscal year 2026, six million dollars of the amount in the Ohio highway and transportation safety fund, including any account thereof, shall be used for rail development infrastructure projects pursuant to an appropriation made by the general assembly. The amounts credited to each account of a transportation district pursuant to division (F)(1) of this section shall be reduced in the same proportion that the amount deposited in each account is of the total fund balance. Sec. 5747.51. (A) On or before the twenty-fifth day of July of each year, the tax commissioner shall make and certify to the county auditor of each county an estimate of the amount of the local government fund to be allocated to the undivided local government fund of each county for the ensuing calendar year, adjusting the total as required to account for subdivisions receiving local government funds under section 5747.502 of the Revised Code. (B) At each annual regular session of the county budget commission convened pursuant to section 5705.27 of the Revised Code, each auditor shall present to the commission the certificate of the commissioner, the annual tax budget and estimates, and the records showing the action of the commission in its last preceding regular session. The commission, after extending to the representatives of each subdivision an opportunity to be heard, under oath administered by any member of the commission, and considering all the facts and information presented to it by the auditor, shall determine the amount of the undivided local government fund needed by and to be apportioned to each subdivision for current operating expenses, as shown in the tax budget of the subdivision. This determination shall be made pursuant to divisions (C) to (I) of this section, unless the commission has provided for a formula pursuant to section 5747.53 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall reduce the amount of funds from the undivided local government fund to a subdivision required to receive reduced funds under section 5747.502 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section prevents the budget commission, for the purpose of apportioning the undivided local government fund, from inquiring into the claimed needs of any subdivision as stated in its tax budget, or from adjusting claimed needs to reflect actual needs. For the purposes of this section, "current operating expenses" means the lawful expenditures of a subdivision, except those for permanent improvements and except payments for interest, sinking fund, and retirement of bonds, notes, and certificates of indebtedness of the subdivision. (C) The commission shall determine the combined total of the estimated expenditures, including transfers, from the general fund and any special funds other than special funds established for road and bridge; street construction, maintenance, and repair; state highway improvement; and gas, water, sewer, and electric public utilities operated by a subdivision, as shown in the subdivision's tax budget for the ensuing calendar year. (D) From the combined total of expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section, the commission shall deduct the following expenditures, if included in these funds in the tax budget: (1) Expenditures for permanent improvements as defined in division (E) of section 5705.01 of the Revised Code; (2) In the case of counties and townships, transfers to the road and bridge fund, and in the case of municipalities, transfers to the street construction, maintenance, and repair fund and the state highway improvement fund; (3) Expenditures for the payment of debt charges; (4) Expenditures for the payment of judgments. (E) In addition to the deductions made pursuant to division (D) of this section, revenues accruing to the general fund and any special fund considered under division (C) of this section from the following sources shall be deducted from the combined total of expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section: (1) Taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation, as defined in section 5705.02 of the Revised Code; (2) The budget commission allocation of estimated county public library fund revenues to be distributed pursuant to section 5747.48 of the Revised Code; (3) Estimated unencumbered balances as shown on the tax budget as of the thirty-first day of December of the current year in the general fund, but not any estimated balance in any special fund considered in division (C) of this section; (4) Revenue, including transfers, shown in the general fund and any special funds other than special funds established for road and bridge; street construction, maintenance, and repair; state highway improvement; and gas, water, sewer, and electric public utilities, from all other sources except those that a subdivision receives from an additional tax or service charge voted by its electorate or receives from special assessment or revenue bond collection. For the purposes of this division, where the charter of a municipal corporation prohibits the levy of an income tax, an income tax levied by the legislative authority of such municipal corporation pursuant to an amendment of the charter of that municipal corporation to authorize such a levy represents an additional tax voted by the electorate of that municipal corporation. For the purposes of this division, any measure adopted by a board of county commissioners pursuant to section 322.02, 4504.02, or 5739.021 of the Revised Code, including those measures upheld by the electorate in a referendum conducted pursuant to section 322.021, 4504.021, or 5739.022 of the Revised Code, shall not be considered an additional tax voted by the electorate. Subject to division (F) of section 5705.29 of the Revised Code, money Money in a reserve balance account established by a county, township, or municipal corporation under section 5705.13 of the Revised Code shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. Money in a reserve balance account established by a township under section 5705.132 of the Revised Code shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. If a county, township, or municipal corporation has created and maintains a nonexpendable trust fund under section 5705.131 of the Revised Code, the principal of the fund, and any additions to the principal arising from sources other than the reinvestment of investment earnings arising from such a fund, shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. Only investment earnings arising from investment of the principal or investment of such additions to principal may be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under those divisions. (F) The total expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section, less the deductions authorized in divisions (D) and (E) of this section, shall be known as the "relative need" of the subdivision, for the purposes of this section. (G) The budget commission shall total the relative need of all participating subdivisions in the county, and shall compute a relative need factor by dividing the total estimate of the undivided local government fund by the total relative need of all participating subdivisions. (H) The relative need of each subdivision shall be multiplied by the relative need factor to determine the proportionate share of the subdivision in the undivided local government fund of the county; provided, that the maximum proportionate share of a county shall not exceed the following maximum percentages of the total estimate of the undivided local government fund governed by the relationship of the percentage of the population of the county that resides within municipal corporations within the county to the total population of the county as reported in the reports on population in Ohio by the department of development as of the twentieth day of July of the year in which the tax budget is filed with the budget commission: 1 2 A Percentage of municipal population within the county: Percentage share of the county shall not exceed: B Less than forty-one per cent Sixty per cent C Forty-one per cent or more but less than eighty-one per cent Fifty per cent D Eighty-one per cent or more Thirty per cent Where the proportionate share of the county exceeds the limitations established in this division, the budget commission shall adjust the proportionate shares determined pursuant to this division so that the proportionate share of the county does not exceed these limitations, and it shall increase the proportionate shares of all other subdivisions on a pro rata basis. In counties having a population of less than one hundred thousand, not less than ten per cent shall be distributed to the townships therein. (I) The proportionate share of each subdivision in the undivided local government fund determined pursuant to division (H) of this section for any calendar year shall not be less than the product of the average of the percentages of the undivided local government fund of the county as apportioned to that subdivision for the calendar years 1968, 1969, and 1970, multiplied by the total amount of the undivided local government fund of the county apportioned pursuant to former section 5739.23 of the Revised Code for the calendar year 1970. For the purposes of this division, the total apportioned amount for the calendar year 1970 shall be the amount actually allocated to the county in 1970 from the state collected intangible tax as levied by section 5707.03 of the Revised Code and distributed pursuant to section 5725.24 of the Revised Code, plus the amount received by the county in the calendar year 1970 pursuant to division (B)(1) of former section 5739.21 of the Revised Code, and distributed pursuant to former section 5739.22 of the Revised Code. If the total amount of the undivided local government fund for any calendar year is less than the amount of the undivided local government fund apportioned pursuant to former section 5739.23 of the Revised Code for the calendar year 1970, the minimum amount guaranteed to each subdivision for that calendar year pursuant to this division shall be reduced on a basis proportionate to the amount by which the amount of the undivided local government fund for that calendar year is less than the amount of the undivided local government fund apportioned for the calendar year 1970. (J) On the basis of such apportionment, the county auditor shall compute the percentage share of each such subdivision in the undivided local government fund and shall at the same time certify to the tax commissioner the percentage share of the county as a subdivision. No payment shall be made from the undivided local government fund, except in accordance with such percentage shares. Within ten days after the budget commission has made its apportionment, whether conducted pursuant to section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code, the auditor shall publish a list of the subdivisions and the amount each is to receive from the undivided local government fund and the percentage share of each subdivision, in a newspaper or newspapers of countywide circulation, and send a copy of such allocation to the tax commissioner. The county auditor shall also send a copy of such allocation by ordinary or electronic mail to the fiscal officer of each subdivision entitled to participate in the allocation of the undivided local government fund of the county. This copy shall constitute the official notice of the commission action referred to in section 5705.37 of the Revised Code. All money received into the treasury of a subdivision from the undivided local government fund in a county treasury shall be paid into the general fund and used for the current operating expenses of the subdivision. If a municipal corporation maintains a municipal university, such municipal university, when the board of trustees so requests the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, shall participate in the money apportioned to such municipal corporation from the total local government fund, however created and constituted, in such amount as requested by the board of trustees, provided such sum does not exceed nine per cent of the total amount paid to the municipal corporation. If any public official fails to maintain the records required by sections 5747.50 to 5747.55 of the Revised Code or by the rules issued by the tax commissioner, the auditor of state, or the treasurer of state pursuant to such sections, or fails to comply with any law relating to the enforcement of such sections, the local government fund money allocated to the county may be withheld until such time as the public official has complied with such sections or such law or the rules issued pursuant thereto. Sec. 5747.72. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Qualifying taxpayer" means a taxpayer that is an individual with a dependent who is a qualifying student. (2) "Qualifying student" means a student who is exempt from the compulsory attendance law for the purpose of home education under section 3321.042 of the Revised Code for the school year. (3) "Education expenses" means expenses or fees for any of the following items used directly for home education of a qualifying student: books, supplementary materials, supplies, computer software, applications, or subscriptions. "Education expenses" does not include expenses or fees for computers or similar electronic devices or accessories thereto. "Education expenses" does not include any expenses paid from a scholarship account authorized by section 3310.24 of the Revised Code. (B) There is hereby allowed a nonrefundable credit against a qualifying taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code equal to the lesser of two hundred fifty dollars multiplied by the number of the taxpayer's qualifying students or the amount of education expenses incurred by the taxpayer in the taxable year for the benefit of one or more of the taxpayer's qualifying students. The credit shall be claimed in the order required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner may request that a qualifying taxpayer claiming a credit under this section furnish information as is necessary to support the claim for the credit under this section, and no credit shall be allowed unless the requested information is provided. Sec. 5747.85. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Homeownership savings account" and "program period" have the same meanings as in section 135.70 of the Revised Code. (2) "Account owner" means "eligible participant" as defined by section 135.70 of the Revised Code. (3) "Contributor" means the account owner or a parent, spouse, sibling, stepparent, or grandparent of the account owner who deposits funds into the homeownership savings account. (4) "Lifetime contribution limit" means twenty-five thousand dollars of contributions per contributor per homeownership savings account. If an account owner opens one or more additional homeownership savings accounts, a contributor's lifetime contribution limit for the additional accounts shall be reduced by any contributions previously made by the contributor to an account owned by that account owner. (5) "Eligible expenses" means unreimbursed expenses paid by the account owner for home purchase costs for the account owner's primary residence and account fees imposed on the account owner. (6) "Primary residence" means a homestead located in this state that is or will be the account owner's principal place of residence at the time the eligible expenses are incurred and for which the account owner receives or will receive a reduction in real property taxes or manufactured home taxes under division (B)(B)(2) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code. (7) "Homestead" means a homestead, as defined in section 323.151 of the Revised Code, or a manufactured or mobile home that is owned and occupied as a home by an individual whose domicile is in this state and upon which the manufactured home tax is assessed pursuant to division (D)(2) of section 4503.06 of the Revised Code. (8) "Home purchase costs" means "eligible home costs" as defined in section 135.70 of the Revised Code. (9) "Employer contribution" means the amount an employer contributes to a homeownership savings account. (B) In computing Ohio adjusted gross income, a deduction from federal adjusted gross income is allowed to a contributor for amounts contributed to a homeownership savings account to the extent that the amounts contributed have not already been deducted in computing the contributor's federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year. The deduction shall equal the amount of contributions made by the taxpayer and, if filing a joint return, the taxpayer's spouse, except that the deduction shall not exceed, for any taxable year, ten thousand dollars for spouses filing a joint return or five thousand dollars for all other taxpayers for each homeownership savings account to which contributions are made. If a taxpayer files a joint return, the deduction amount attributable to contributions made by each spouse shall not exceed five thousand dollars for each homeownership savings account to which contributions are made. A contributor is not entitled to a deduction under this section to the extent the deduction causes the contributor to exceed the lifetime contribution limit. No deduction is allowed under this section for the transfer of funds from one homeownership savings account to another homeownership savings account. (C) In computing Ohio adjusted gross income, a deduction from federal adjusted gross income is allowed to an account owner for the following items: (1) Interest earned on a homeownership savings account to the extent the interest has not been otherwise deducted or excluded in computing an account owner's federal or Ohio adjusted gross income. (2) Employer contributions made by an employer to an account owner's homeownership savings account to the extent the employer contributions have not been otherwise deducted or excluded in computing an account owner's federal or Ohio adjusted gross income. (D) The tax commissioner may request that a taxpayer claiming a deduction calculated under division (B) or (C) of this section furnish information necessary to support the claim for the deduction under this section, and no deduction shall be allowed unless the requested information is provided. (E) No deduction is permitted under division (B) or (C) of this section for contributions made or interest earned after the conclusion of a homeownership savings account's program period. (F) The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to administer this section. Sec. 5747.86. Terms used in this section have the same meanings as in section 122.84 of the Revised Code. There is hereby allowed a nonrefundable credit against a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for a taxpayer who is issued, or to whom is transferred, a tax credit certificate under section 122.84 of the Revised Code. The credit equals the amount stated on the certificate and may be claimed for the taxable year that includes the first day of the investment period that was the subject of the application for the certificate under that section or for the ensuing taxable year. For a credit issued during the July application round each year, the credit may also be claimed for the preceding taxable year. A taxpayer applying a credit for the preceding taxable year shall file an amended return or apply that amendment on the taxpayer's original return, for that year. If the certificate is held by a pass-through entity, any taxpayer that is a direct or indirect investor in the pass-through entity on the last day of the entity's qualifying taxable year may claim the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive share of the credit against the taxpayer's aggregate amount of tax levied under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. The credit shall be claimed in the order required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. If the credit exceeds the taxpayer's aggregate tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for that taxable year after allowing for credits that precede the credit under this section in that order, such excess shall be allowed as a credit in each of the ensuing five taxable years, but the amount of any excess credit allowed in any such taxable year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the ensuing taxable year. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the credit was claimed under section 5725.38, 5726.61, or 5729.21 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.87. There is allowed a nonrefundable credit against a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for a taxpayer who holds the rights to a tax credit certificate that is issued on or after the effective date of this section under section 122.09 of the Revised Code. The credit equals the amount stated on the certificate and may be claimed for the taxable year ending in the calendar year specified in the certificate or in the ensuing calendar year. The credit shall be claimed in the order required under section 5747.98 of the Revised Code. If the credit exceeds the taxpayer's aggregate tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code for that taxable year after allowing for credits that precede the credit under this section in that order, the excess may be carried forward for five ensuing taxable years, but the amount of any excess credit allowed in any such taxable year shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the ensuing taxable year. Nothing in this section limits or disallows pass-through treatment of the credit if the person holding the rights to a tax credit certificate is a pass-through entity. No credit shall be claimed under this section to the extent the certificate was used to claim a credit under section 5725.35, 5726.62, or 5729.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for calculating a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, a taxpayer shall claim any credits to which the taxpayer is entitled in the following order: Either the retirement income credit under division (B) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum retirement income credits under divisions (C), (D), and (E) of that section; Either the senior citizen credit under division (F) of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum distribution credit under division (G) of that section; The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of the Revised Code; The credit for displaced workers who pay for job training under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; The campaign contribution credit under section 5747.29 of the Revised Code; The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under section 5747.022 of the Revised Code; The joint filing credit under division (G)(E) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; The earned income credit under section 5747.71 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for education expenses under section 5747.72 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for donations to scholarship granting organizations under section 5747.73 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for tuition paid to a nonchartered nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable vocational job credit under section 5747.057 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) of section 5747.058 of the Revised Code; The enterprise zone credit under section 5709.66 of the Revised Code; The credit for beginning farmers who participate in a financial management program under division (B) of section 5747.77 of the Revised Code; The credit for commercial vehicle operator training expenses under section 5747.82 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable welcome home Ohio (WHO) program credit under section 122.633 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for transformational mixed use development tax credit certificate holders under section 5747.87 of the Revised Code; The credit for selling or renting agricultural assets to beginning farmers under division (A) of section 5747.77 of the Revised Code; The credit for purchases of qualifying grape production property under section 5747.28 of the Revised Code; The small business investment credit under section 5747.81 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable lead abatement credit under section 5747.26 of the Revised Code; The opportunity zone investment credit under section 5747.86 of the Revised Code; The enterprise zone credits under section 5709.65 of the Revised Code; The research and development credit under section 5747.331 of the Revised Code; The credit for rehabilitating a historic building under section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under section 5747.83 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit under section 5747.84 of the Revised Code; The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical production credit under section 5747.66 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit for film and theater capital improvement projects under section 5747.67 of the Revised Code; The refundable jobs creation credit or job retention credit under division (A) of section 5747.058 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit for taxes paid by a qualifying entity granted under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code; The refundable credits for taxes paid by a qualifying pass-through entity granted under division (I) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit under section 5747.80 of the Revised Code for losses on loans made to the Ohio venture capital program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit for rehabilitating a historic building under section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit under section 5747.39 of the Revised Code for taxes levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code paid by an electing pass-through entity. (B) For any credit, except the refundable credits enumerated in this section and the credit granted under division (H) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, the amount of the credit for a taxable year shall not exceed the taxpayer's aggregate amount of tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, after allowing for any other credit that precedes it in the order required under this section. Any excess amount of a particular credit may be carried forward if authorized under the section creating that credit. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow a taxpayer to claim, directly or indirectly, a credit more than once for a taxable year. Sec. 5748.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "School district income tax" means an income tax adopted under one of the following: (1) Former section 5748.03 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to its repeal by Amended Substitute House Bill No. 291 of the 115th general assembly; (2) Section 5748.03 of the Revised Code as enacted in Substitute Senate Bill No. 28 of the 118th general assembly; (3) Section 5748.08 of the Revised Code as enacted in Amended Substitute Senate Bill No. 17 of the 122nd general assembly; (4) Section 5748.021 of the Revised Code; (5) Section 5748.081 of the Revised Code; (6) Section 5748.09 of the Revised Code. (B) "Individual" means an individual subject to the tax levied by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. (C) "Estate" means an estate subject to the tax levied by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code"The county auditor's market" and "estimated effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. (D) "Taxable year" means a taxable year as defined in division (M) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (E) "Taxable income" means: (1) In the case of an individual, one of the following, as specified in the resolution imposing the tax: (a)(1) Modified adjusted gross income for the taxable year, as defined in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code, less the exemptions provided by section 5747.025 of the Revised Code; (b)(2) Wages, salaries, tips, and other employee compensation to the extent included in modified adjusted gross income as defined in section 5747.01 of the Revised Code, and net earnings from self-employment, as defined in section 1402(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, to the extent included in modified adjusted gross income. (2) In the case of an estate, taxable income for the taxable year as defined in division (S) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Resident" of the school district means: (1) An an individual who is a resident of this state as defined in division (I) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code during all or a portion of the taxable year and who, during all or a portion of such period of state residency, is domiciled in the school district or lives in and maintains a permanent place of abode in the school district; (2) An estate of a decedent who, at the time of death, was domiciled in the school district. (G) "School district income" means: (1) With respect to an individual, the portion of the taxable income of an individual that is received by the individual during the portion of the taxable year that the individual is a resident of the school district and the school district income tax is in effect in that school district. An individual may have school district income with respect to more than one school district. (2) With respect to an estate, the taxable income of the estate for the portion of the taxable year that the school district income tax is in effect in that school district. (H) "Taxpayer" means an individual or estate having school district income upon which a school district income tax is imposed. (I) "School district purposes" means any of the purposes for which a tax may be levied pursuant to division (A) of section 5705.21 of the Revised Code, including the combined purposes authorized by section 5705.217 of the Revised Code. (J) "The county auditor's appraised value" and "effective rate" have the same meanings as in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5748.02. (A) The board of education of any school district, except a joint vocational school district, may declare, by resolution, the necessity of raising annually a specified amount of money for school district purposes. The resolution shall specify whether the income that is to be subject to the tax is taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and division (E)(1) or (2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code or taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. A copy of the resolution shall be certified to the tax commissioner no later than one hundred days prior to the date of the election at which the board intends to propose a levy under this section. Upon receipt of the copy of the resolution, the tax commissioner shall estimate both of the following: (1) The property tax rate that would have to be imposed in the current year by the district to produce an equivalent amount of money; (2) The income tax rate that would have had to have been in effect for the current year to produce an equivalent amount of money from a school district income tax. Within ten days of receiving the copy of the board's resolution, the commissioner shall prepare these estimates and certify them to the board. Upon receipt of the certification, the board may adopt a resolution proposing an income tax under division (B) of this section at the estimated rate contained in the certification rounded to the nearest one-fourth of one per cent. The commissioner's certification applies only to the board's proposal to levy an income tax at the election for which the board requested the certification. If the board intends to submit a proposal to levy an income tax at any other election, it shall request another certification for that election in the manner prescribed in this division. (B)(1) Upon the receipt of a certification from the tax commissioner under division (A) of this section, a majority of the members of a board of education may adopt a resolution proposing the levy of an annual tax for school district purposes on school district income. The proposed levy may be for a continuing period of time or for a specified number of years. The resolution shall set forth the purpose for which the tax is to be imposed, the rate of the tax, which shall be the rate set forth in the commissioner's certification rounded to the nearest one-fourth of one per cent, the number of years the tax will be levied or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time, the date on which the tax shall take effect, which shall be the first day of January of any year following the year in which the question is submitted, and the date of the election at which the proposal shall be submitted to the electors of the district, which shall be on the date of a primary, general, or special election the date of which is consistent with section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall specify whether the income that is to be subject to the tax is taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and division (E)(1) or (2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code or taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. The specification shall be the same as the specification in the resolution adopted and certified under division (A) of this section. If the tax is to be levied for current expenses and permanent improvements, the resolution shall apportion the annual rate of the tax. The apportionment may be the same or different for each year the tax is levied, but the respective portions of the rate actually levied each year for current expenses and for permanent improvements shall be limited by the apportionment. If the board of education currently imposes an income tax pursuant to this chapter that is due to expire and a question is submitted under this section for a proposed income tax to take effect upon the expiration of the existing tax, the board may specify in the resolution that the proposed tax renews the expiring tax. Two or more expiring income taxes may be renewed under this paragraph if the taxes are due to expire on the same date. If the tax rate being proposed is no higher than the total tax rate imposed by the expiring tax or taxes, the resolution may state that the proposed tax is not an additional income tax. (2) A board of education adopting a resolution under division (B)(1) of this section proposing a school district income tax for a continuing period of time and limited to the purpose of current expenses may propose in that resolution to reduce the rate or rates of one or more of the school district's property taxes levied for a continuing period of time in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of current expenses. The reduction in the rate of a property tax may be any amount, not exceeding the rate at which the tax is authorized to be levied. The reduction in the rate of a tax shall first take effect for the tax year that includes the day on which the school district income tax first takes effect, and shall continue for each tax year that both the school district income tax and the property tax levy are in effect. In addition to the matters required to be set forth in the resolution under division (B)(1) of this section, a resolution containing a proposal to reduce the rate of one or more property taxes shall state for each such tax the maximum rate at which it currently may be levied and the maximum rate at which the tax could be levied after the proposed reduction, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, and that the tax is levied for a continuing period of time. A board proposing to reduce the rate of one or more property taxes under division (B)(2) of this section shall comply with division (B) of section 5705.03 of the Revised Code. In addition to the amounts required in division (B)(2) of that section, the county auditor shall certify to the board the levy's effective rate for both the last year before the levy's proposed reduction and the first year that the reduction applies, both expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. If a board of education proposes to reduce the rate of one or more property taxes under division (B)(2) of this section, the board, when it makes the certification required under division (A) of this section, shall designate the specific levy or levies to be reduced, the maximum rate at which each levy currently is authorized to be levied, and the rate by which each levy is proposed to be reduced. The tax commissioner, when making the certification to the board under division (A) of this section, also shall certify the reduction in the total effective tax rate for current expenses for each class of property that would have resulted if the proposed reduction in the rate or rates had been in effect the previous tax year. As used in this paragraph, "effective tax rate" has the same meaning as in section 323.08 of the Revised Code. (C) A resolution adopted under division (B) of this section shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Immediately after its adoption and at least ninety days prior to the election at which the question will appear on the ballot, a copy of the resolution and, if applicable, the county auditor's certifications under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code shall be certified to the board of elections of the proper county, which shall submit the proposal to the electors on the date specified in the resolution. The board of education shall send to the tax commissioner a copy of the resolution certified to the board of elections. The form of the ballot shall be as provided in section 5748.03 of the Revised Code. Publication of notice of the election shall be made in a newspaper of general circulation in the county once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice shall contain the time and place of the election and the question to be submitted to the electors. The question covered by the resolution shall be submitted as a separate proposition, but may be printed on the same ballot with any other proposition submitted at the same election, other than the election of officers. (D) No board of education shall submit the question of a tax on school district income to the electors of the district more than twice in any calendar year. If a board submits the question twice in any calendar year, one of the elections on the question shall be held on the date of the general election. (E)(1) No board of education may submit to the electors of the district the question of a tax on school district income on the taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b)(E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code if that tax would be in addition to an existing tax on the taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and (2)division (E)(1) of that section. (2) No board of education may submit to the electors of the district the question of a tax on school district income on the taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and (2) division (E)(1) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code if that tax would be in addition to an existing tax on the taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b)(E)(2) of that section. Sec. 5748.021. A board of education that levies a tax under section 5748.02 of the Revised Code on the school district income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (G) and (E)(1)(a) and (2)(E)(1) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code may declare, at any time, by a resolution adopted by a majority of its members, the necessity of raising annually a specified amount of money for school district purposes by replacing the existing tax with a tax on the school district income of individuals as defined in divisions (G)(1)(G) and (E)(1)(b)(E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code. The specified amount of money to be raised annually may be the same as, or more or less than, the amount of money raised annually by the existing tax. The board shall certify a copy of the resolution to the tax commissioner not later than the eighty-fifth day before the date of the election at which the board intends to propose the replacement to the electors of the school district. Not later than the tenth day after receiving the resolution, the tax commissioner shall estimate the tax rate that would be required in the school district annually to raise the amount of money specified in the resolution. The tax commissioner shall certify the estimate to the board. Upon receipt of the tax commissioner's estimate, the board may propose, by a resolution adopted by a majority of its members, to replace the existing tax on the school district income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (G) and (E)(1)(a) and (2)(E)(1) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code with the levy of an annual tax on the school district income of individuals as defined in divisions (G)(1)(G) and (E)(1)(b) (E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code. In the resolution, the board shall specify the rate of the replacement tax, whether the replacement tax is to be levied for a specified number of years or for a continuing time, the specific school district purposes for which the replacement tax is to be levied, the date on which the replacement tax will begin to be levied, the date of the election at which the question of the replacement is to be submitted to the electors of the school district, that the existing tax will cease to be levied and the replacement tax will begin to be levied if the replacement is approved by a majority of the electors voting on the replacement, and that if the replacement is not approved by a majority of the electors voting on the replacement the existing tax will remain in effect under its original authority for the remainder of its previously approved term. The resolution goes into immediate effect upon its adoption. Publication of the resolution is not necessary, and the information that will be provided in the notice of election is sufficient notice. At least seventy-five days before the date of the election at which the question of the replacement will be submitted to the electors of the school district, the board shall certify a copy of the resolution to the board of elections. The board of education shall send to the tax commissioner a copy of the resolution certified to the board of elections. The replacement tax shall have the same specific school district purposes as the existing tax, and its rate shall be the same as the tax commissioner's estimate rounded to the nearest one-fourth of one per cent. The replacement tax shall begin to be levied on the first day of January of the year following the year in which the question of the replacement is submitted to and approved by the electors of the school district or on the first day of January of a later year, as specified in the resolution. The date of the election shall be the date of an otherwise scheduled primary, general, or special election. The board of elections shall make arrangements to submit the question of the replacement to the electors of the school district on the date specified in the resolution. The board of elections shall publish notice of the election on the question of the replacement in one newspaper of general circulation in the school district once a week for four consecutive weeks or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code. The notice shall set forth the question to be submitted to the electors and the time and place of the election thereon. The question shall be submitted to the electors of the school district as a separate proposition, but may be printed on the same ballot with other propositions that are submitted at the same election, other than the election of officers. The form of the ballot shall be substantially as follows: "Shall the existing tax of _____ (state the rate) on the school district income of individuals and estates imposed by _____ (state the name of the school district) be replaced by a tax of _____ (state the rate) on the earned income of individuals residing in the school district for _____ (state the number of years the tax is to be in effect or that it will be in effect for a continuing time), beginning _____ (state the date the new tax will take effect), for the purpose of _____ (state the specific school district purposes of the tax)? If the new tax is not approved, the existing tax will remain in effect under its original authority, for the remainder of its previously approved term. For replacing the existing tax with the new tax Against replacing the existing tax with the new tax " The board of elections shall conduct and canvass the election in the same manner as regular elections in the school district for the election of county officers. The board shall certify the results of the election to the board of education and to the tax commissioner. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote in favor of the replacement, the existing tax shall cease to be levied, and the replacement tax shall begin to be levied, on the date specified in the ballot question. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote against the replacement, the existing tax shall continue to be levied under its original authority, for the remainder of its previously approved term. A board of education may not submit the question of replacing a tax more than twice in a calendar year. If a board submits the question more than once, one of the elections at which the question is submitted shall be on the date of a general election. If a board of education later intends to renew a replacement tax levied under this section, it shall repeat the procedure outlined in this section to do so, the replacement tax then being levied being the "existing tax" and the renewed replacement tax being the "replacement tax." Sec. 5748.03. (A) The form of the ballot on a question submitted to the electors under section 5748.02 of the Revised Code shall be as follows: "Shall an annual income tax of _______ (state the proposed rate of tax) on the school district income of individuals and of estates be imposed by _______ (state the name of the school district), for _______ (state the number of years the tax would be levied, or that it would be levied for a continuing period of time), beginning _______ (state the date the tax would first take effect), for the purpose of ______ (state the purpose of the tax)? FOR THE TAX AGAINST THE TAX " (B)(1) If the question submitted to electors proposes a school district income tax only on the taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b)(E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be modified by stating that the tax is to be levied on the "earned income of individuals residing in the school district" in lieu of the "school district income of individuals and of estates." (2) If the question submitted to electors proposes to renew one or more expiring income tax levies, the ballot shall be modified by adding the following language immediately after the name of the school district that would impose the tax: "to renew an income tax (or income taxes) expiring at the end of ________ (state the last year the existing income tax or taxes may be levied)." (3) If the question includes a proposal under division (B)(2) of section 5748.02 of the Revised Code to reduce the rate of one or more school district property taxes, the ballot shall state that the purpose of the school district income tax is for current expenses, and the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding the following language immediately after the statement of the purpose of the proposed income tax: ", and shall the rate of an existing tax on property, currently levied for the purpose of current expenses at the rate of _______ mills, be REDUCED to _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to a reduction from $_______ (effective rate) to $_______ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, the reduction continuing until any such time as the income tax is repealed." In lieu of "for the tax" and "against the tax," the phrases "for the issue" and "against the issue," respectively, shall be used. If a board of education proposes a reduction in the rates of more than one tax, the ballot language shall be modified accordingly to express the rates at which those taxes currently are levied and the rates to which the taxes will be reduced. (C) The board of elections shall certify the results of the election to the board of education and to the tax commissioner. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote in favor of it, the income tax, the applicable provisions of Chapter 5747. of the Revised Code, and the reduction in the rate or rates of existing property taxes if the question included such a reduction shall take effect on the date specified in the resolution. If the question approved by the voters includes a reduction in the rate of a school district property tax, the board of education shall not levy the tax at a rate greater than the rate to which the tax is reduced, unless the school district income tax is repealed in an election under section 5748.04 of the Revised Code. (D) If the rate at which a property tax is levied and collected is reduced pursuant to a question approved under this section, the tax commissioner shall compute the percentage required to be computed for that tax under division (D) of section 319.301 of the Revised Code each year the rate is reduced as if the tax had been levied in the preceding year at the rate at which it has been reduced. If the rate of a property tax increases due to the repeal of the school district income tax pursuant to section 5748.04 of the Revised Code, the tax commissioner, for the first year for which the rate increases, shall compute the percentage as if the tax in the preceding year had been levied at the rate at which the tax was authorized to be levied prior to any rate reduction. Sec. 5748.04. (A) The question of the repeal of a school district income tax levied for more than five years may be initiated not more than once in any five-year period by filing with the board of elections of the appropriate counties not later than ninety days before the general election in any year after the year in which it is approved by the electors a petition requesting that an election be held on the question. The petition shall be signed by qualified electors residing in the school district levying the income tax equal in number to ten per cent of those voting for governor at the most recent gubernatorial election. The board of elections shall determine whether the petition is valid, and if it so determines, it shall do both all of the following: (1) Submit the question to the electors of the district at the next general election; (2) Send a copy of the petition to the tax commissioner; (3) If the rate of one or more property tax levies was reduced for the duration of the income tax levy pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 5748.02 of the Revised Code, request that the county auditor certify to the board, in the same manner as required for a tax levy under section 5705.03 of the Revised Code, an estimate of the levies' annual collections for the first year in which the levies are increased, rounded to the nearest dollar, and the levies' effective rates for the year before the proposed increase and the levies' effective rates for the first year that the increase applies, both of which shall be expressed in dollars, rounded to the nearest dollar, for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value. The county auditor shall certify such information to the board of elections within ten days after receiving the board's request. If a school district is located in more than one county, the county auditor shall obtain from the county auditor of each other county in which the district is located the tax valuation applicable to the portion of the district in that county. The election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections for county offices in the county. Notice of the election shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, the board of elections shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice shall state the time and place of the election and the question to be submitted to the electors. The form of the ballot cast at the election shall be as follows: "Shall the annual income tax of _____ per cent, currently levied on the school district income of individuals and estates by __________ (state the name of the school district) for the purpose of __________ (state purpose of the tax), be repealed? For repeal of the income tax Against repeal of the income tax " (B)(1) If the tax is imposed on taxable income as defined in division (E)(1)(b)(E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be modified by stating that the tax currently is levied on the "earned income of individuals residing in the school district" in lieu of the "school district income of individuals and estates." (2) If the rate of one or more property tax levies was reduced for the duration of the income tax levy pursuant to division (B)(2) of section 5748.02 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding the following language immediately after "repealed": ", and shall the rate of an existing tax on property for the purpose of current expenses, which rate was reduced for the duration of the income tax, be INCREASED from _____ mills to _____ mills for each $1 of taxable value which amounts to an increase from $_____ (effective rate) to $_____ (effective rate) for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, that the county auditor estimates will collect $_____ annually, beginning in _____ (state the first year for which the rate of the property tax will increase)." In lieu of "for repeal of the income tax" and "against repeal of the income tax," the phrases "for the issue" and "against the issue," respectively, shall be substituted. (3) If the rate of more than one property tax was reduced for the duration of the income tax, the ballot language shall be modified accordingly to express the rates at which those taxes currently are levied and the rates to which the taxes would be increased. (C) The question covered by the petition shall be submitted as a separate proposition, but it may be printed on the same ballot with any other proposition submitted at the same election other than the election of officers. If a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question vote in favor of it, the result shall be certified immediately after the canvass by the board of elections to the board of education of the school district and the tax commissioner, who shall thereupon, after the current year, cease to levy the tax, except that if notes have been issued pursuant to section 5748.05 of the Revised Code the tax commissioner shall continue to levy and collect under authority of the election authorizing the levy an annual amount, rounded upward to the nearest one-fourth of one per cent, as will be sufficient to pay the debt charges on the notes as they fall due. (D) If a school district income tax repealed pursuant to this section was approved in conjunction with a reduction in the rate of one or more school district property taxes as provided in division (B)(2) of section 5748.02 of the Revised Code, then each such property tax may be levied after the current year at the rate at which it could be levied prior to the reduction, subject to any adjustments required by the county budget commission pursuant to Chapter 5705. of the Revised Code. Upon the repeal of a school district income tax under this section, the board of education may resume levying a property tax, the rate of which has been reduced pursuant to a question approved under section 5748.02 of the Revised Code, at the rate the board originally was authorized to levy the tax. A reduction in the rate of a property tax under section 5748.02 of the Revised Code is a reduction in the rate at which a board of education may levy that tax only for the period during which a school district income tax is levied prior to any repeal pursuant to this section. The resumption of the authority to levy the tax upon such a repeal does not constitute a tax levied in excess of the one per cent limitation prescribed by Section 2 of Article XII, Ohio Constitution, or in excess of the ten-mill limitation. (E) This section does not apply to school district income tax levies that are levied for five or fewer years. Sec. 5748.08. (A) The board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, at any time by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that it may be necessary for the school district to do all of the following: (1) Raise a specified amount of money for school district purposes by levying an annual tax on school district income; (2) Issue general obligation bonds for permanent improvements, stating in the resolution the necessity and purpose of the bond issue and the amount, approximate date, estimated rate of interest, and maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (3) Levy a tax outside the ten-mill limitation to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities; (4) Submit the question of the school district income tax and bond issue to the electors of the district at a special election. The resolution shall specify whether the income that is to be subject to the tax is taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and division (E)(1) or (2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code or taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. On adoption of the resolution, the board shall certify a copy of it to the tax commissioner and the county auditor no later than one hundred five days prior to the date of the special election at which the board intends to propose the income tax and bond issue. Not later than ten days of receipt of the resolution, the tax commissioner, in the same manner as required by division (A) of section 5748.02 of the Revised Code, shall estimate the rates designated in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of that section and certify them to the board. Not later than ten days of receipt of the resolution, the county auditor shall estimate and certify to the board the average annual property tax rate required throughout the stated maturity of the bonds to pay debt charges on the bonds, in the same manner as under division (C) of section 133.18 of the Revised Code. (B) On receipt of the tax commissioner's and county auditor's certifications prepared under division (A) of this section, the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may adopt a resolution proposing for a specified number of years or for a continuing period of time the levy of an annual tax for school district purposes on school district income and declaring that the amount of taxes that can be raised within the ten-mill limitation will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district; that it is necessary to issue general obligation bonds of the school district for specified permanent improvements and to levy an additional tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation to pay the debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities; and that the question of the bonds and taxes shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after certification of the resolution to the board of elections, and the date of which shall be consistent with section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall specify all of the following: (1) The purpose for which the school district income tax is to be imposed and the rate of the tax, which shall be the rate set forth in the tax commissioner's certification rounded to the nearest one-fourth of one per cent; (2) Whether the income that is to be subject to the tax is taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and division (E)(1) or (2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code or taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. The specification shall be the same as the specification in the resolution adopted and certified under division (A) of this section. (3) The number of years the tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (4) The date on which the tax shall take effect, which shall be the first day of January of any year following the year in which the question is submitted; (5) The amount of the estimated average annual property tax levy, expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value, as certified by the county auditor under division (A) of this section. (C) A resolution adopted under division (B) of this section shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Immediately after its adoption and at least ninety days prior to the election at which the question will appear on the ballot, the board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution, along with copies of the auditor's estimate and its resolution under division (A) of this section, to the board of elections of the proper county. The board of education shall send to the tax commissioner a copy of the resolution adopted under division (B) of this section and certified to the board of elections. The board of elections shall make the arrangements for the submission of the question to the electors of the school district, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in the district for the election of county officers. The resolution shall be put before the electors as one ballot question, with a majority vote indicating approval of the school district income tax, the bond issue, and the levy to pay debt charges on the bonds and any anticipatory securities. The board of elections shall publish the notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, it also shall post notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice of election shall state all of the following: (1) The questions to be submitted to the electors; (2) The rate of the school district income tax; (3) The principal amount of the proposed bond issue; (4) The permanent improvements for which the bonds are to be issued; (5) The maximum number of years over which the principal of the bonds may be paid; (6) The estimated additional average annual property tax rate to pay the debt charges on the bonds, as certified by the county auditor, and expressed in mills for each one dollar of taxable value and in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value; (7) The time and place of the special election. (D) The form of the ballot on a question submitted to the electors under this section shall be as follows: "Shall the ________ school district be authorized to do both of the following: (1) Impose an annual income tax of ______ (state the proposed rate of tax) on the school district income of individuals and of estates, for ________ (state the number of years the tax would be levied, or that it would be levied for a continuing period of time), beginning ________ (state the date the tax would first take effect), for the purpose of ________ (state the purpose of the tax)? (2) Issue bonds for the purpose of _______ in the principal amount of $______, to be repaid annually over a maximum period of _______ years, and levy a property tax outside the ten-mill limitation estimated by the county auditor to average over the bond repayment period _______ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_______ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, to pay the annual debt charges on the bonds, and to pay debt charges on any notes issued in anticipation of those bonds? FOR THE INCOME TAX AND BOND ISSUE AGAINST THE INCOME TAX AND BOND ISSUE " (E) If the question submitted to electors proposes a school district income tax only on the taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b)(E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be modified by stating that the tax is to be levied on the "earned income of individuals residing in the school district" in lieu of the "school district income of individuals and of estates." (F) The board of elections promptly shall certify the results of the election to the tax commissioner and the county auditor of the county in which the school district is located. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote in favor of it, the income tax and the applicable provisions of Chapter 5747. of the Revised Code shall take effect on the date specified in the resolution, and the board of education may proceed with issuance of the bonds and with the levy and collection of the property taxes to pay debt charges on the bonds, at the additional rate or any lesser rate in excess of the ten-mill limitation. Any securities issued by the board of education under this section are Chapter 133. securities, as that term is defined in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (G) After approval of a question under this section, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the school district income tax in accordance with section 5748.05 of the Revised Code. Any anticipation notes under this division shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (H) The question of repeal of a school district income tax levied for more than five years may be initiated and submitted in accordance with section 5748.04 of the Revised Code. (I) No board of education shall submit a question under this section to the electors of the school district more than twice in any calendar year. If a board submits the question twice in any calendar year, one of the elections on the question shall be held on the date of the general election. Sec. 5748.081. A board of education of a school district that, under divisions (A)(1), (D)(1), and (E) of section 5748.08 or under section 5748.09 of the Revised Code, levies a tax on the school district income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (G) and (E)(1)(a) and (2) (E)(1) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code may replace that tax with a tax on the school district income of individuals as defined in divisions (G)(1)(G) and (E)(1)(b) (E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code by following the procedure outlined in, and subject to the conditions specified in, section 5748.021 of the Revised Code, as if the existing tax levied under section 5748.08 or 5748.09 were levied under section 5748.02 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner and the board of elections shall perform duties in response to the actions of the board of education under this section as directed in section 5748.021 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5748.09. (A) The board of education of a city, local, or exempted village school district, at any time before the effective date of this amendment by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may declare by resolution that it may be necessary for the school district to do all of the following: (1) Raise a specified amount of money for school district purposes by levying an annual tax on school district income; (2) Levy an additional property tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the district, stating in the resolution the amount of money to be raised each year for such purpose; (3) Submit the question of the school district income tax and property tax to the electors of the district at a special election. The resolution shall specify whether the income that is to be subject to the tax is taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and division (E)(1) or (2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code or taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. On adoption of the resolution, the board shall certify a copy of it to the tax commissioner and the county auditor not later than one hundred days prior to the date of the special election at which the board intends to propose the income tax and property tax. Not later than ten days after receipt of the resolution, the tax commissioner, in the same manner as required by division (A) of section 5748.02 of the Revised Code, shall estimate the rates designated in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of that section and certify them to the board. Not later than ten days after receipt of the resolution, the county auditor, in the same manner as required by section 5705.195 of the Revised Code, shall make the calculation specified in that section and certify it to the board. (B) On receipt of the tax commissioner's and county auditor's certifications prepared under division (A) of this section, the board of education of the city, local, or exempted village school district, by a vote of two-thirds of all its members, may adopt a resolution declaring that the amount of taxes that can be raised by all tax levies the district is authorized to impose, when combined with state and federal revenues, will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district, and that it is therefore necessary to levy, for a specified number of years or for a continuing period of time, an annual tax for school district purposes on school district income, and to levy, for a specified number of years not exceeding ten or for a continuing period of time, an additional property tax in excess of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the district, and declaring that the question of the school district income tax and property tax shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election, which shall not be earlier than ninety days after certification of the resolution to the board of elections, and the date of which shall be consistent with section 3501.01 of the Revised Code. The resolution shall specify all of the following: (1) The purpose for which the school district income tax is to be imposed and the rate of the tax, which shall be the rate set forth in the tax commissioner's certification rounded to the nearest one-fourth of one per cent; (2) Whether the income that is to be subject to the tax is taxable income of individuals and estates as defined in divisions (E)(1)(a) and division (E)(1) or (2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code or taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b) of that section. The specification shall be the same as the specification in the resolution adopted and certified under division (A) of this section. (3) The number of years the school district income tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (4) The date on which the school district income tax shall take effect, which shall be the first day of January of any year following the year in which the question is submitted; (5) The amount of money it is necessary to raise for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the district for each year the property tax is to be imposed; (6) The number of years the property tax will be levied, or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (7) The tax list upon which the property tax shall be first levied, which may be the current year's tax list; (8) The amount of the average tax levy, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, estimated by the county auditor under division (A) of this section. (C) A resolution adopted under division (B) of this section shall go into immediate effect upon its passage, and no publication of the resolution shall be necessary other than that provided for in the notice of election. Immediately after its adoption and at least ninety days prior to the election at which the question will appear on the ballot, the board of education shall certify a copy of the resolution, along with copies of the county auditor's certification and the resolution under division (A) of this section, to the board of elections of the proper county. The board of education shall send to the tax commissioner a copy of the resolution adopted under division (B) of this section and certified to the board of elections. The board of education shall make the arrangements for the submission of the question to the electors of the school district, and the election shall be conducted, canvassed, and certified in the same manner as regular elections in the district for the election of county officers. The resolution shall be put before the electors as one ballot question, with a majority vote indicating approval of the school district income tax and the property tax. The board of elections shall publish the notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district once a week for two consecutive weeks, or as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, prior to the election. If the board of elections operates and maintains a web site, also the board shall also post the notice of the election on its web site for thirty days prior to the election. The notice of the election shall state all of the following: (1) The questions to be submitted to the electors as a single ballot question; (2) The rate of the school district income tax; (3) The number of years the school district income tax will be levied or that it will be levied for a continuing period of time; (4) The annual proceeds of the proposed property tax levy for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the district; (5) The number of years during which the property tax levy shall be levied, or that it shall be levied for a continuing period of time; (6) The estimated average additional tax rate of the property tax, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, outside the limitation imposed by Section 2 of Article XII, Ohio Constitution, as certified by the county auditor; (7) The time and place of the special election. (D) The form of the ballot on a question submitted to the electors under this section shall be as follows: "Shall the _____ school district be authorized to do both of the following: (1) Impose an annual income tax of ______ (state the proposed rate of tax) on the school district income of individuals and of estates, for ________ (state the number of years the tax would be levied, or that it would be levied for a continuing period of time), beginning ________ (state the date the tax would first take effect), for the purpose of ________ (state the purpose of the tax)? (2) Impose a property tax levy outside of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the district in the sum of $__________________ (here insert annual amount the levy is to produce), estimated by the county auditor to average ________________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $________________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for ______________ (state the number of years the tax is to be imposed or that it will be imposed for a continuing period of time), commencing in __________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year ____________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)? FOR THE INCOME TAX AND PROPERTY TAX AGAINST THE INCOME TAX AND PROPERTY TAX " If the question submitted to electors proposes a school district income tax only on the taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b) (E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be modified by stating that the tax is to be levied on the "earned income of individuals residing in the school district" in lieu of the "school district income of individuals and of estates." (E) The board of elections promptly shall certify the results of the election to the tax commissioner and the county auditor of the county in which the school district is located. If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote in favor of it: (1) The income tax and the applicable provisions of Chapter 5747. of the Revised Code shall take effect on the date specified in the resolution. (2) The board of education of the school district may make the additional property tax levy necessary to raise the amount specified on the ballot for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the district. The property tax levy shall be included in the next tax budget that is certified to the county budget commission. (F)(1) After approval of a question under this section, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the school district income tax in accordance with section 5748.05 of the Revised Code. Any anticipation notes under this division shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (2) After the approval of a question under this section and prior to the time when the first tax collection from the property tax levy can be made, the board of education may anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the levy and issue anticipation notes in an amount not exceeding the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. Any anticipation notes under this division shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (G)(1) The question of repeal of a school district income tax levied for more than five years may be initiated and submitted in accordance with section 5748.04 of the Revised Code. (2) A property tax levy for a continuing period of time may be reduced in the manner provided under section 5705.261 of the Revised Code. (H) No board of education shall submit a question under this section to the electors of the school district more than twice in any calendar year. If a board submits the question twice in any calendar year, one of the elections on the question shall be held on the date of the general election. (I) If the electors of the school district approve a question under this section, and if the last calendar year the school district income tax is in effect and the last calendar year of collection of the property tax are the same, the board of education of the school district may propose, before the effective date of this amendment, to submit under this section the combined question of a school district income tax to take effect upon the expiration of the existing income tax and a property tax to be first collected in the calendar year after the calendar year of last collection of the existing property tax, and specify in the resolutions adopted under this section that the proposed taxes would renew the existing taxes. The form of the ballot on a question submitted to the electors under division (I) of this section shall be as follows: "Shall the ________ school district be authorized to do both of the following: (1) Impose an annual income tax of _______ (state the proposed rate of tax) on the school district income of individuals and of estates to renew an income tax expiring at the end of _______ (state the last year the existing income tax may be levied) for _______ (state the number of years the tax would be levied, or that it would be levied for a continuing period of time), beginning _______ (state the date the tax would first take effect), for the purpose of _______ (state the purpose of the tax)? (2) Impose a property tax levy renewing an existing levy outside of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of providing for the necessary requirements of the district in the sum of $___________________ (here insert annual amount the levy is to produce), estimated by the county auditor to average _________________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $_________________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for _____________ (state the number of years the tax is to be imposed or that it will be imposed for a continuing period of time), commencing in ___________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year ____________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)? FOR THE INCOME TAX AND PROPERTY TAX AGAINST THE INCOME TAX AND PROPERTY TAX " If the question submitted to electors proposes a school district income tax only on the taxable income of individuals as defined in division (E)(1)(b)(E)(2) of section 5748.01 of the Revised Code, the form of the ballot shall be modified by stating that the tax is to be levied on the "earned income of individuals residing in the school district" in lieu of the "school district income of individuals and of estates." (J)(1) If the electors of the school district approve a question under this section, and if the last calendar year the school district income tax is in effect and the last calendar year in which the property tax is collected are the same, the board of education of the school district may propose, before the effective date of this amendment, to submit under this section the combined question of all of the following: (a) The renewal of the school district income tax levied under this section, to take effect upon the expiration of the existing income tax; (b) The renewal of the property tax levied under this section, to be levied beginning in the tax year after the tax year in which the existing property tax expires; (c) The renewal of a property tax levied under section 5705.194 of the Revised Code, regardless of the year it expires, to be levied beginning in the same tax year that the tax described in division (J)(1)(b) of this section is first levied. If the combined question is approved, the existing tax levied under section 5705.194 of the Revised Code may not be levied for the first tax year the renewal tax is levied or any following tax year. (2) In its resolution to be submitted to the tax commissioner and county auditor, the board of education shall include, in addition to the applicable requirements of division (A) of this section, a declaration of the necessity for the renewal of the property tax levied under section 5705.194 of the Revised Code, the purpose of the tax as specified under that section, and the necessity of the submission of the question of the renewal of the school district income tax and both property taxes to the electors of the district at a special election. Not later than ten days after receipt of the resolution, the county auditor shall make a separate calculation and certification with respect to the renewal tax described in division (J)(1)(c) of this section in the same manner as required by section 5705.195 of the Revised Code. In its resolution adopted upon receipt of the commissioner's and county auditor's certifications, the board of education shall include, in addition to the applicable requirements of division (B) of this section, a declaration that the amount of taxes that can be raised by all tax levies the district is authorized to impose, when combined with state and federal revenues, will be insufficient to provide an adequate amount for the present and future requirements of the school district, and that it is therefore necessary to renew the existing property tax being levied in excess of the ten-mill limitation under section 5705.194 of the Revised Code for the purpose as specified in that section, for a specified number of years not exceeding ten or for a continuing period of time, and that the question of the renewal of the school district income tax and of both property taxes shall be submitted to the electors of the school district at a special election as described in division (B) of this section. With respect to the renewal tax described in division (J)(1)(c) of this section, the resolution shall specify the amount of money it is necessary to raise for the specified purpose for each calendar year the millage is to be imposed, the tax year that tax is to be first levied, and the estimated rate of that tax, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, as certified by the county auditor. (3) In addition to the requirements of division (C) of this section, the notice of election shall separately state, with respect to the renewal tax described in division (J)(1)(c) of this section, the annual proceeds of the proposed levy for the specified purpose; the number of years the proposed tax will be levied, or that it shall be levied for a continuing period of time; and the estimated rate of the proposed levy, expressed in dollars for each one hundred thousand dollars of the county auditor's appraised market value as well as in mills for each one dollar of taxable value, as certified by the county auditor. (4) The form of the ballot on a question submitted to the electors under division (J) of this section shall be identical to the form of the ballot prescribed in division (I) of this section, except that the following shall be added after the third paragraph and in place of the voting box: "(3) Impose a property tax levy renewing an existing levy outside of the ten-mill limitation for the purpose of __________ (here insert purpose of levy as specified in section 5705.194 of the Revised Code and determined by the board of education) in the sum of $ __________ (here insert annual amount the levy is to produce), estimated by the county auditor to average __________ mills for each $1 of taxable value, which amounts to $__________ for each $100,000 of the county auditor's appraised market value, for __________ (state the number of years the tax is to be imposed or that it will be imposed for a continuing period of time), commencing in ___________ (first year the tax is to be levied), first due in calendar year ____________ (first calendar year in which the tax shall be due)? FOR THE INCOME TAX AND PROPERTY TAXES AGAINST THE INCOME TAX AND PROPERTY TAXES " If the existing property tax being levied under section 5705.194 of the Revised Code is scheduled to expire in a tax year different from that of the existing property tax being levied under this section, the form of the ballot shall be modified by adding the following statement at the end of the paragraph prescribed in this division: "If approved, any remaining tax years on the existing levy will not be levied after tax year _________ (last tax year the tax will be levied), last due in _________ (last calendar year in which the tax shall be due)." (5) If a majority of the electors voting on the question submitted under division (J) of this section vote in favor of it, the board of education of the school district may, in addition to any other authorization in the Revised Code and prior to the time when the first tax collection from the renewal tax levy can be made, anticipate a fraction of the proceeds of the renewal levy described in division (J)(1)(c) of this section and issue anticipation notes in an amount not exceeding the total estimated proceeds of the levy to be collected during the first year of the levy. Any such anticipation notes shall be issued as provided in section 133.24 of the Revised Code, shall have principal payments during each year after the year of their issuance over a period not to exceed five years, and may have a principal payment in the year of their issuance. (K) The question of a renewal levy under division (I) or (J) of this section shall not be placed on the ballot unless the question is submitted on a date on which a special election may be held under section 3501.01 of the Revised Code, except for the first Tuesday after the first Monday in August, during the last year the existing property tax levy described in division (J)(1)(b) of this section may be extended on the real and public utility property tax list and duplicate, or at any election held in the ensuing year. The failure by the electors to approve the question of a renewal levy under division (I) or (J) of this section does not terminate the authority previously granted by the electors to levy the taxes proposed to be renewed for their previously approved duration. (L) If the electors of the school district approve a question under this section, the board of education of the school district may propose to renew any of the existing taxes as individual ballot questions in accordance with section 5748.02 of the Revised Code, for the school district income tax, or section 5705.194 of the Revised Code, for the property tax or taxes. Sec. 5749.02. (A) For the purpose of providing revenue to administer the state's coal mining and reclamation regulatory program, to meet the environmental and resource management needs of this state, and to reclaim land affected by mining, an excise tax is hereby levied on the privilege of engaging in the severance of natural resources from the soil or water of this state. The tax shall be imposed upon the severer at the rates prescribed by this section: (1) Ten Eight cents per ton of coal; (2) Four cents per ton of salt; (3) Two cents per ton of limestone or dolomite; (4) Two cents per ton of sand and gravel; (5) Ten cents per barrel of oil; (6) Two and one-half cents per thousand cubic feet of natural gas; (7) One cent per ton of clay, sandstone or conglomerate, shale, gypsum, or quartzite; (8) Except as otherwise provided in this division or in rules adopted by the reclamation forfeiture fund advisory board under section 1513.182 of the Revised Code, an additional fourteen cents per ton of coal produced from an area under a coal mining and reclamation permit issued under Chapter 1513. of the Revised Code for which the performance security is provided under division (C)(2) of section 1513.08 of the Revised Code. Beginning July 1, 2007, if at the end of a fiscal biennium the balance of the reclamation forfeiture fund created in section 1513.18 of the Revised Code is equal to or greater than ten million dollars, the rate levied shall be twelve cents per ton. Beginning July 1, 2007, if at the end of a fiscal biennium the balance of the fund is at least five million dollars, but less than ten million dollars, the rate levied shall be fourteen cents per ton. Beginning July 1, 2007, if at the end of a fiscal biennium the balance of the fund is less than five million dollars, the rate levied shall be sixteen cents per ton. Beginning July 1, 2009, not later than thirty days after the close of a fiscal biennium, the chief of the division of mineral resources management shall certify to the tax commissioner the amount of the balance of the reclamation forfeiture fund as of the close of the fiscal biennium. Any necessary adjustment of the rate levied shall take effect on the first day of the following January and shall remain in effect during the calendar biennium that begins on that date. (9) An additional one and two-tenths cents per ton of coal mined by surface mining methods. (B) After the director of budget and management transfers money from the severance tax receipts fund as required in division (H) of section 5749.06 of the Revised Code, money remaining in the severance tax receipts fund, except for money in the fund from the amounts due under section 1509.50 of the Revised Code, shall be credited as follows: (1) All of the moneys in the fund from the tax levied in division (A)(1) of this section shall be credited to the mining regulation and safety fund created in section 1513.30 of the Revised Code. (2) The money in the fund from the tax levied in division (A)(2) of this section shall be credited to the mining regulation and safety fund. (3) Of the moneys in the fund from the tax levied in divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section, seven and five-tenths per cent shall be credited to the geological mapping fund and the remainder shall be credited to the mining regulation and safety fund created in section 1513.30 of the Revised Code. (4) Of the moneys in the fund from the tax levied in divisions (A)(5) and (6) of this section, ninety per cent shall be credited to the oil and gas well fund and ten per cent shall be credited to the geological mapping fund. (5) All of the moneys in the fund from the tax levied in division (A)(7) of this section shall be credited to the mining regulation and safety fund. (6) All of the moneys in the fund from the tax levied in division (A)(8) of this section shall be credited to the reclamation forfeiture fund. (7) All of the moneys in the fund from the tax levied in division (A)(9) of this section shall be credited to the mining regulation and safety fund. (C) When, at the close of any fiscal year, the chief finds that the balance of the reclamation forfeiture fund, plus the estimated revenues from the tax levied by division (A)(8) of this section for the remainder of the calendar year that includes the close of the fiscal year, are sufficient to complete the reclamation of all lands for which the performance security has been provided under division (C)(2) of section 1513.08 of the Revised Code, the purposes for which the tax under division (A)(8) of this section is levied shall be deemed accomplished at the end of that calendar year. The chief, within thirty days after the close of the fiscal year, shall certify those findings to the tax commissioner, and the tax levied under division (A)(8) of this section shall cease to be imposed for the subsequent calendar year after the last day of that calendar year on coal produced under a coal mining and reclamation permit issued under Chapter 1513. of the Revised Code if the permittee has made tax payments under division (A)(8) of this section during each of the preceding five full calendar years. Not later than thirty days after the close of a fiscal year, the chief shall certify to the tax commissioner the identity of any permittees who accordingly no longer are required to pay the tax levied under division (A)(8) of this section for the subsequent calendar year. Sec. 5749.07. (A) If any severer required by this chapter to make and file returns and pay the tax levied by section 5749.02 of the Revised Code, or any severer or owner liable for the amounts due under section 1509.50 of the Revised Code, fails to make such return or pay such tax or amounts, the tax commissioner may make an assessment against the severer or owner based upon any information in the commissioner's possession. No assessment shall be made or issued against any severer for any tax imposed by section 5749.02 of the Revised Code or against any severer or owner for any amount due under section 1509.50 of the Revised Code more than four years after the return was due or was filed, whichever is later. This section does not bar an assessment against a severer or owner who fails to file a return as required by this chapter, or who files a fraudulent return. The commissioner shall give the party assessed written notice of such assessment in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on how to petition for reassessment and request a hearing on the petition. (B) Unless the party assessed files with the commissioner within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition for reassessment signed by the party assessed or that party's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the party assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the party assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If the petition has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment remains unpaid, including accrued interest, a certified copy of the commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the party assessed resides or in which the party's business is conducted. If the party assessed maintains no place of business in this state and is not a resident of this state, the certified copy of the entry may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county. Immediately upon the filing of such entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the party assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled "special judgments for state severance tax," and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon the request of the commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment is issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due or amounts due under section 1509.50 of the Revised Code shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) All money collected by the commissioner under this section shall be paid to the treasurer of state, and when paid shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax imposed by section 5749.02 of the Revised Code and the amount due under section 1509.50 of the Revised Code, as applicable. Sec. 5751.02. (A) For the purpose of funding the needs of this state and its local governments, there is hereby levied a commercial activity tax on each person with taxable gross receipts for the privilege of doing business in this state. For the purposes of this chapter, "doing business" means engaging in any activity, whether legal or illegal, that is conducted for, or results in, gain, profit, or income, at any time during a calendar year. Persons on which the commercial activity tax is levied include, but are not limited to, persons with substantial nexus with this state. The tax imposed under this section is not a transactional tax and is not subject to Public Law No. 86-272, 73 Stat. 555. The tax imposed under this section is in addition to any other taxes or fees imposed under the Revised Code. The tax levied under this section is imposed on the person receiving the gross receipts and is not a tax imposed directly on a purchaser. The tax imposed by this section is an annual privilege tax for the calendar year that contains all tax periods in the calendar year. A taxpayer is subject to the annual privilege tax for doing business during any portion of such calendar year. (B) The tax imposed by this section is a tax on the taxpayer and shall not be billed or invoiced to another person. Even if the tax or any portion thereof is billed or invoiced and separately stated, such amounts remain part of the price for purposes of the sales and use taxes levied under Chapters 5739. and 5741. of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (B) of this section prohibits: (1) A person from including in the price charged for a good or service an amount sufficient to recover the tax imposed by this section; or (2) A lessor from including an amount sufficient to recover the tax imposed by this section in a lease payment charged, or from including such an amount on a billing or invoice pursuant to the terms of a written lease agreement providing for the recovery of the lessor's tax costs. The recovery of such costs shall be based on an estimate of the total tax cost of the lessor during the tax period, as the tax liability of the lessor cannot be calculated until the end of that period. (C)(1) The commercial activities tax receipts fund is hereby created in the state treasury and shall consist of money arising from the tax imposed under this chapter. Sixty-five one-hundredths of one per cent of the money credited to that fund shall be credited to the revenue enhancement fund and shall be used to defray the costs incurred by the department of taxation in administering the tax imposed by this chapter and in implementing tax reform measures. The remainder of the money in the commercial activities tax receipts fund shall first be credited to the funds fund described in division (C)(2) of this section, as provided in that division, and the remainder shall be credited to the general revenue fund. (2) Not later than the twentieth day of February, May, August, and November of each year, the commissioner shall provide for payment of the following amounts from the commercial activities tax receipts fund: (a) To to the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund, of an amount that bears the same ratio to the balance in the commercial activities tax receipts fund that (a) the taxable gross receipts attributed to motor fuel used for propelling vehicles on public highways as indicated by returns filed by the tenth day of that month for a liability that is due and payable on or after July 1, 2013, for a tax period ending before July 1, 2014, bears to (b) all taxable gross receipts as indicated by those returns for such liabilities; (b) To the school district tangible property tax replacement fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of making the payments described in section 5709.92 of the Revised Code, an amount necessary to make those payments; (c) To the local government tangible property tax replacement fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of making the payments described in section 5709.93 of the Revised Code, an amount necessary to make those payments. (D)(1) On or after the first day of June of each year, the director of budget and management may transfer any balance in the school district tangible property tax replacement fund to the general revenue fund. (2) On or after the first day of June of each year, the director of budget and management may transfer any balance in the local government tangible property tax replacement fund to the general revenue fund. (E)(1)(D)(1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund. (2) On or before the fifteenth day of June of each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2015, the director of the Ohio public works commission shall certify to the director of budget and management the amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund in the current fiscal year on bonds issued to finance or assist in the financing of the cost of local subdivision public infrastructure capital improvement projects, as provided for in Sections 2k, 2m, 2p, and 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, that are attributable to costs for construction, reconstruction, maintenance, or repair of public highways and bridges and other statutory highway purposes. That certification shall allocate the total amount of debt service paid from the general revenue fund and attributable to those costs in the current fiscal year according to the applicable section of the Ohio Constitution under which the bonds were originally issued. (3) On or before the thirtieth day of June of each fiscal year beginning with fiscal year 2015, the director of budget and management shall determine an amount up to but not exceeding the amount certified under division (E)(2)(D)(2) of this section and shall reserve that amount from the cash balance in the petroleum activity tax public highways fund or the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund for transfer to the general revenue fund at times and in amounts to be determined by the director. The director shall transfer the cash balance in the petroleum activity tax public highways fund or the commercial activity tax motor fuel receipts fund in excess of the amount so reserved to the highway operating fund on or before the thirtieth day of June of the current fiscal year. Sec. 5751.09. (A) The tax commissioner may make an assessment, based on any information in the commissioner's possession, against any person that fails to file a return or pay any tax as required by this chapter. The commissioner shall give the person assessed written notice of the assessment as provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the commissioner shall provide instructions on the manner in which to petition for reassessment and request a hearing with respect to the petition. The commissioner shall send any assessments against consolidated elected taxpayer and combined taxpayer groups under section 5751.011 or 5751.012 of the Revised Code to the taxpayer's reporting person. The reporting person shall notify all members of the group of the assessment and all outstanding taxes, interest, and penalties for which the assessment is issued. (B) Unless the person assessed, within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, files with the tax commissioner, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition signed by the person or the person's authorized agent having knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the person assessed to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the objections of the person assessed, but additional objections may be raised in writing if received by the commissioner prior to the date shown on the final determination. If a petition for reassessment has been properly filed, the commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including accrued interest, remains unpaid, a certified copy of the tax commissioner's entry making the assessment final may be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas in the county in which the person resides or has its principal place of business in this state, or in the office of the clerk of court of common pleas of Franklin county. (2) Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled, "special judgments for the commercial activity tax" and shall have the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution shall apply to sales made under the judgment. (3) If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issues the assessment until it is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (D) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the person liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of the jeopardy assessment, the commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (C) of this section. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the person assessed or the person's authorized agent in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days of the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the person assessed files a petition for reassessment in accordance with division (B) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the commissioner and in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (E) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all amounts the commissioner receives under this section, and such amounts shall be considered as revenue arising from the tax imposed under this chapter. (F) Except as otherwise provided in this division, no assessment shall be made or issued against a taxpayer for the tax imposed under this chapter more than four years after the due date for the filing of the return for the tax period for which the tax was reported, or more than four years after the return for the tax period was filed, whichever is later. The time limit may be extended if both the taxpayer and the commissioner consent in writing to the extension or enter into an agreement waiving or extending the time limit. Any such extension shall extend the four-year time limit in division (A) of section 5751.08 of the Revised Code for the same period of time. Nothing in this division bars an assessment against a taxpayer that fails to file a return required by this chapter or that files a fraudulent return. (G) If the tax commissioner possesses information that indicates that the amount of tax a taxpayer is required to pay under this chapter exceeds the amount the taxpayer paid, the tax commissioner may audit a sample of the taxpayer's gross receipts over a representative period of time to ascertain the amount of tax due, and may issue an assessment based on the audit. The tax commissioner shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the taxpayer in selecting a representative sample. The tax commissioner may apply a sampling method only if the commissioner has prescribed the method by rule. (H) If the whereabouts of a person subject to this chapter is not known to the tax commissioner, the commissioner shall follow the procedures under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5751.53. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Net income" and "taxable year" have the same meanings as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (2) "Franchise tax year" means "tax year" as defined in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (3) "Deductible temporary differences" and "taxable temporary differences" have the same meanings as those terms have for purposes of paragraph 13 of the statement of financial accounting standards, number 109. (4) "Qualifying taxpayer" means a taxpayer under this chapter that has a qualifying Ohio net operating loss carryforward equal to or greater than the qualifying amount. (5) "Qualifying Ohio net operating loss carryforward" means an Ohio net operating loss carryforward that the taxpayer could deduct in whole or in part for franchise tax year 2006 under section 5733.04 of the Revised Code but for the application of division (H) of this section. A qualifying Ohio net operating loss carryforward shall not exceed the amount of loss carryforward from franchise tax year 2005 as reported by the taxpayer either on a franchise tax report for franchise tax year 2005 pursuant to section 5733.02 of the Revised Code or on an amended franchise tax report prepared in good faith for such year and filed before July 1, 2006. (6) "Disallowed Ohio net operating loss carryforward" means the lesser of the amounts described in division (A)(6)(a) or (b) of this section, but the amounts described in divisions (A)(6)(a) and (b) of this section shall each be reduced by the qualifying amount. (a) The qualifying taxpayer's qualifying Ohio net operating loss carryforward; (b) The Ohio net operating loss carryforward amount that the qualifying taxpayer used to compute the related deferred tax asset reflected on its books and records on the last day of its taxable year ending in 2004, adjusted for return to accrual, but this amount shall be reduced by the qualifying related valuation allowance amount. For the purposes of this section, the "qualifying related valuation allowance amount" is the amount of Ohio net operating loss reflected in the qualifying taxpayer's computation of the valuation allowance account, as shown on its books and records on the last day of its taxable year ending in 2004, with respect to the deferred tax asset relating to its Ohio net operating loss carryforward amount. (7) "Other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state" is the product of (a) the amount of other net deferred tax items and (b) the fraction described in division (B)(2) of section 5733.05 for the qualifying taxpayer's franchise tax year 2005. (8)(a) Subject to divisions (A)(8)(b) to (d) of this section, the "amount of other net deferred tax items" is the difference between (i) the qualifying taxpayer's deductible temporary differences, net of related valuation allowance amounts, shown on the qualifying taxpayer's books and records on the last day of its taxable year ending in 2004, and (ii) the qualifying taxpayer's taxable temporary differences as shown on those books and records on that date. The amount of other net deferred tax items may be less than zero. (b) For the purposes of computing the amount of the qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items described in division (A)(8)(a) of this section, any credit carryforward allowed under Chapter 5733. of the Revised Code shall be excluded from the amount of deductible temporary differences to the extent such credit carryforward amount, net of any related valuation allowance amount, is otherwise included in the qualifying taxpayer's deductible temporary differences, net of related valuation allowance amounts, shown on the qualifying taxpayer's books and records on the last day of the qualifying taxpayer's taxable year ending in 2004. (c) No portion of the disallowed Ohio net operating loss carryforward shall be included in the computation of the amount of the qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items described in division (A)(8)(a) of this section. (d) In no event shall the amount of other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state exceed twenty-five per cent of the qualifying Ohio net operating loss carryforward. (9) "Amortizable amount" means: (a) If the qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state is equal to or greater than zero, eight per cent of the sum of the qualifying taxpayer's disallowed Ohio net operating loss carryforward and the qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state; (b) If the amount of the qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state is less than zero and if the absolute value of the amount of qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state is less than the qualifying taxpayer's disallowed net operating loss, eight per cent of the difference between the qualifying taxpayer's disallowed net operating loss carryforward and the absolute value of the qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state; (c) If the amount of the qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state is less than zero and if the absolute value of the amount of qualifying taxpayer's other net deferred tax items apportioned to this state is equal to or greater than the qualifying taxpayer's disallowed net operating loss, zero. (10) "Books and records" means the qualifying taxpayer's books, records, and all other information, all of which the qualifying taxpayer maintains and uses to prepare and issue its financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. (11)(a) Except as modified by division (A)(11)(b) of this section, "qualifying amount" means fifty million dollars per person. (b) If for franchise tax year 2005 the person was a member of a combined franchise tax report, as provided by section 5733.052 of the Revised Code, the "qualifying amount" is, in the aggregate, fifty million dollars for all members of that combined franchise tax report, and for purposes of divisions (A)(6)(a) and (b) of this section, those members shall allocate to each member any portion of the fifty million dollar amount. The total amount allocated to the members who are qualifying taxpayers shall equal fifty million dollars. (B) For each calendar period beginning prior to January 1, 2030, there is hereby allowed a nonrefundable tax credit against the tax levied each year by this chapter on each qualifying taxpayer, on each consolidated elected taxpayer having one or more qualifying taxpayers as a member, and on each combined taxpayer having one or more qualifying taxpayers as a member. The credit shall be claimed in the order specified in section 5751.98 of the Revised Code and is allowed only to reduce the first one-half of any tax remaining after allowance of the credits that precede it in section 5751.98 of the Revised Code. No credit under division (B) of this section shall be allowed against the second one-half of such remaining tax. Except as otherwise limited by divisions (C) and (D) of this section, the maximum amount of the nonrefundable credit that may be used against the first one-half of the remaining tax for each calendar year is as follows: (1) For calendar year 2010, ten per cent of the amortizable amount; (2) For calendar year 2011, twenty per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (3) For calendar year 2012, thirty per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (4) For calendar year 2013, forty per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (5) For calendar year 2014, fifty per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (6) For calendar year 2015, sixty per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (7) For calendar year 2016, seventy per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (8) For calendar year 2017, eighty per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (9) For calendar year 2018, ninety per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts previously used; (10) For each of calendar years 2019 through 2029, one hundred per cent of the amortizable amount, less all amounts used in all previous years. In no event shall the cumulative credit used for calendar years 2010 through 2029 claimed under this section exceed one hundred per cent of the amortizable amount. (C)(1) Except as otherwise set forth in division (C)(2) of this section(C) For tax periods beginning January 1, 2030, and thereafter, a refundable nonrefundable credit is allowed in calendar year 2030 for any portion of the qualifying taxpayer's amortizable amount that is not used in accordance with division (B) of this section against the tax levied by this chapter on all taxpayers. The credit shall be claimed in the order prescribed in section 5751.98 of the Revised Code and shall not exceed the tax due after allowance of any other credits that precede it in that order. The balance of the qualifying taxpayer's amortizable amount may be carried forward until fully used, provided that the amount of the credit claimed against the tax for any tax period shall be deducted from the balance carried forward to the next period. (2) Division (C)(1) of this section shall not apply and no refundable credit shall be available to any person if during any portion of the calendar year 2030 the person is not subject to the tax imposed by this chapter. (D) Not later than June 30, 2006, each qualifying taxpayer, consolidated elected taxpayer, or combined taxpayer that will claim for any year the credit allowed in divisions (B) and (C) of this section shall file with the tax commissioner a report setting forth the amortizable amount available to such taxpayer and all other related information that the commissioner, by rule, requires. If the taxpayer does not timely file the report or fails to provide timely all information required by this division, the taxpayer is precluded from claiming any credit amounts described in divisions (B) and (C) of this section. Unless extended by mutual consent, the tax commissioner may, until June 30, 2010, audit the accuracy of the amortizable amount available to each taxpayer that will claim the credit, and adjust the amortizable amount or, if appropriate, issue any assessment or final determination, as applicable, necessary to correct any errors found upon audit. (E) For the purpose of calculating the amortizable amount, if the tax commissioner ascertains that any portion of that amount is the result of a sham transaction as described in section 5703.56 of the Revised Code, the commissioner shall reduce the amortizable amount by two times the adjustment. (F) If one entity transfers all or a portion of its assets and equity to another entity as part of an entity organization or reorganization or subsequent entity organization or reorganization for which no gain or loss is recognized in whole or in part for federal income tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code, the credits allowed by this section shall be computed in a manner consistent with that used to compute the portion, if any, of federal net operating losses allowed to the respective entities under the Internal Revenue Code. The tax commissioner may prescribe forms or rules for making the computations required by this division. (G)(1) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, no person shall pledge, collateralize, hypothecate, assign, convey, sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any or all tax credits, or any portion of any or all tax credits allowed under this section. (2) No credit allowed under this section is subject to execution, attachment, lien, levy, or other judicial proceeding. (H)(1)(a) Except as set forth in division (H)(1)(b) of this section and notwithstanding division (I)(1) of section 5733.04 of the Revised Code to the contrary, each person timely and fully complying with the reporting requirements set forth in division (D) of this section shall not claim, and shall not be entitled to claim, any deduction or adjustment for any Ohio net operating loss carried forward to any one or more franchise tax years after franchise tax year 2005. (b) Division (H)(1)(a) of this section applies only to the portion of the Ohio net operating loss represented by the disallowed Ohio net operating loss carryforward. (2) Notwithstanding division (I) of section 5733.04 of the Revised Code to the contrary, with respect to all franchise tax years after franchise tax year 2005, each person timely and fully complying with the reporting requirements set forth in division (D) of this section shall not claim, and shall not be entitled to claim, any deduction, exclusion, or adjustment with respect to deductible temporary differences reflected on the person's books and records on the last day of its taxable year ending in 2004. (3)(a) Except as set forth in division (H)(3)(b) of this section and notwithstanding division (I) of section 5733.04 of the Revised Code to the contrary, with respect to all franchise tax years after franchise tax year 2005, each person timely and fully complying with the reporting requirements set forth in division (D) of this section shall exclude from Ohio net income all taxable temporary differences reflected on the person's books and records on the last day of its taxable year ending in 2004. (b) In no event shall the exclusion provided by division (H)(3)(a) of this section for any franchise tax year exceed the amount of the taxable temporary differences otherwise included in Ohio net income for that year. (4) Divisions (H)(2) and (3) of this section shall apply only to the extent such items were used in the calculations of the credit provided by this section. Sec. 5751.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for calculating the amount of tax due under this chapter, a taxpayer shall claim any credits to which it is entitled in the following order: The nonrefundable jobs retention credit under division (B) of section 5751.50 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for qualified research expenses under division (B) of section 5751.51 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for a borrower's qualified research and development loan payments under division (B) of section 5751.52 of the Revised Code; The nonrefundable credit for calendar years 2010 to 2029 for unused net operating losses under division (B) of section 5751.53 of the Revised Code; The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical production credit under section 5751.54 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit for film and theater capital improvement projects under section 5751.55 of the Revised Code; The refundable jobs creation credit or job retention credit under division (A) of section 5751.50 of the Revised Code; The refundable credit for calendar year 2030 for unused net operating losses under division (C) of section 5751.53 of the Revised Code. (B) For any credit except the refundable credits enumerated in this section, the amount of the credit for a tax period shall not exceed the tax due after allowing for any other credit that precedes it in the order required under this section. Any excess amount of a particular credit may be carried forward if authorized under the section creating the credit. Sec. 5753.031. (A) For the purpose of receiving and distributing, and accounting for, revenue received from the tax levied by section 5753.021 of the Revised Code and from fines imposed under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, the following funds are created in the state treasury: (1) The sports gaming revenue fund; (2) The sports gaming tax administration fund, which the tax commissioner shall use to defray the costs incurred in administering the tax levied by section 5753.021 of the Revised Code; (3) The sports gaming profits education fund, which shall be used for the support of public and nonpublic education for students in grades kindergarten through twelve as determined in appropriations made by the general assembly. (4) The problem sports gaming fund. (B)(1) All of the following shall be deposited into the sports gaming revenue fund: (a) All money collected from the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the Revised Code; (b) The remainder of the fees described in division (G)(2) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code, after the Ohio casino control commission deposits the required amount in the sports gaming profits veterans fund under that division; (c) Unclaimed winnings collected under division (F) of section 3775.10 of the Revised Code; (d) Any fines collected under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code. (2) All other fees collected under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code shall be deposited into the casino control commission fund created under section 5753.03 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) From the sports gaming revenue fund, the director of budget and management shall transfer as needed to the tax refund fund amounts equal to the refunds certified by the tax commissioner under section 5753.06 of the Revised Code and attributable to the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. (2) Not later than the fifteenth day of each month, the director of budget and management shall transfer from the sports gaming revenue fund to the sports gaming tax administration fund the amount necessary to reimburse the department of taxation's actual expenses incurred in administering the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. (3) Of the amount in the sports gaming revenue fund remaining after making the transfers required by divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section, the director of budget and management shall transfer, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of each calendar quarter, amounts to each fund as follows: (a) Ninety-eight per cent to the sports gaming profits education fund; (b) Two per cent to the problem sports gaming fund. (D) All interest Interest generated by the following funds created under this section shall be credited back to them: (1) The sports gaming revenue fund; (2) The sports gaming tax administration fund; (3) The problem sports gaming fund. Sec. 5753.07. (A)(1) The tax commissioner may issue an assessment, based on any information in the tax commissioner's possession, against a taxpayer who fails to pay the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code or to file a return under section 5753.04 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner shall give the taxpayer written notice of the assessment under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the tax commissioner shall include instructions on how to petition for reassessment and on how to request a hearing with respect to the petition. (2) Unless the taxpayer, within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, files with the tax commissioner, either personally or by certified mail, a written petition signed by the taxpayer, or by the taxpayer's authorized agent who has knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the taxpayer to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the taxpayer's objections to the assessment. Additional objections may be raised in writing if they are received by the tax commissioner before the date shown on the final determination. (3) If a petition for reassessment has been properly filed, the tax commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (4) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including penalties and accrued interest, remains unpaid, the tax commissioner may file a certified copy of the entry making the assessment final in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county or in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of the county in which the taxpayer resides, the taxpayer's casino facility or sports gaming facility is located, or the taxpayer's principal place of business in this state is located. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the taxpayer assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled, "special judgments for the gross casino revenue tax and sports gaming receipts tax." The judgment has the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution apply to sales made under the judgment. (5) If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issued the assessment until the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code, as applicable, and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (B) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the taxpayer that is liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of a jeopardy assessment, the tax commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (A)(4) of this section, and the clerk shall proceed as directed in that division. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the taxpayer or the taxpayer's authorized agent under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days after the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the taxpayer assessed files a petition for reassessment under division (A)(2) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the tax commissioner that is in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. If a petition for reassessment has been filed, and if satisfactory security has been provided, the tax commissioner shall proceed under division (A)(3) of this section. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the tax commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (C) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all amounts the tax commissioner receives under this section, and the amounts forwarded shall be treated as if they were revenue arising from the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, no assessment shall be issued against a taxpayer for the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code more than four years after the due date for filing the return for the tax period for which the tax was reported, or more than four years after the return for the tax period was filed, whichever is later. This division does not bar an assessment against a taxpayer who fails to file a return as required by section 5753.04 of the Revised Code or who files a fraudulent return, or when the taxpayer and the tax commissioner waive in writing the time limitation. (E) If the tax commissioner possesses information that indicates that the amount of tax a taxpayer is liable to pay under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code exceeds the amount the taxpayer paid, the tax commissioner may audit a sample of the taxpayer's gross casino revenue or sports gaming receipts, as applicable, over a representative period of time to ascertain the amount of tax due, and may issue an assessment based on the audit. The tax commissioner shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the taxpayer in selecting a representative sample. The tax commissioner may apply a sampling method only if the tax commissioner has prescribed the method by rule. (F) If the whereabouts of a taxpayer who is liable for the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code are unknown to the tax commissioner, the tax commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5907.11. (A) The superintendent of the Ohio veterans' homes, with the approval of the director of veterans services, may establish a local fund for each veterans' home to be used for the entertainment and welfare of the residents of the home. Each fund shall be designated as the residents' benefit fund and shall be operated for the exclusive benefit of the residents of the associated home. Each fund shall receive all revenue from the sale of commissary items at the associated home and shall receive all moneys received as donations by the associated home from any source. (B) The superintendent, subject to the approval of the director, shall establish rules for the operation of the residents' benefit funds. Sec. 5907.17. (A) As used in this section, "physician""clinician" means an individual authorized under Chapter 4731. of the Revised Code to practice medicine and surgery or osteopathic medicine and surgeryany of the following: (1) An advanced practice registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, physician, physician's assistant, or registered nurse as defined in section 4723.01 of the Revised Code; (2) An individual registered in the state nurse aide registry pursuant to section 3721.32 of the Revised Code; (3) Any Ohio veterans' home employee who is a licensed medical professional in this state and is not exempt from a student loan repayment program under a union contract or other law. (B) The department of veterans services may establish a physician clinician recruitment program under which the department agrees to repay all or part of the principal and interest of a governmental or other educational loan incurred by a physician clinician who agrees to provide services to institutions under the department's administration. (C) A physician clinician is eligible to participate in the recruitment program if the physician attended a medical or osteopathic medical school that was, at the time of attendance, either located in the United States and accredited by the liaison committee on medical education or the American osteopathic association or located outside the United States and acknowledged by the world health organization and verified by a member state of that organization as operating within that state's jurisdictionclinician meets all of the following requirements: (1) The clinician is licensed in this state by the appropriate licensing authority and works in that discipline at an Ohio veterans' home; (2) The clinician has worked at an Ohio veterans' home for at least one year; (3) The clinician has not been subject to formal discipline while employed by an Ohio veterans' home; (4) The clinician provides evidence sufficient for the director of veterans services, or the director's designee, to determine that the clinician attended a school or medical program accredited by a national or regional accrediting organization; (5) The clinician agrees to the contract terms subject to division (D) of this section and any rules adopted under division (E) of this section. (D) The department and each physician clinician it recruits shall enter into a contract that includes all of the following terms: (1) The physician clinician agrees to maintain appropriate licensure and provide a specified scope of medical or osteopathic medical health care services for a specified number of hours per week and for a specified number of years of one or more years to patients residents of one or more specified institutions administered by the departmentthe Ohio veterans' homes. (2) The department agrees to repay all or a specified portion of the principal and interest of a governmental or other educational loan taken by the physician clinician for the following expenses if the physician clinician meets the service obligation agreed to and the expenses were incurred while the physician clinician was enrolled in, for up to a maximum of four years, a school or medical program accredited by a national or regional accrediting organizationthat qualifies the physician to participate in the program: (a) Tuition; (b) Other educational expenses for specific purposes, including fees, books, and laboratory expenses, in amounts determined to be reasonable in accordance with rules adopted under division (E) of this section; (c) Room and board, in an amount determined to be reasonable in accordance with rules adopted under division (E) of this section. (3) The physician clinician agrees to pay the department a specified amount, which shall be not less than the amount already paid by the department pursuant to its agreement, as damages if the physician clinician fails to complete the service obligation agreed to or fails to comply with other specified terms of the contract. The contract may vary the amount of damages based on the portion of the physician's clinician's service obligation that remains uncompleted as determined by the department. (4) Other terms agreed upon by the parties. (E) The department shall adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish all of the following: (1) Criteria for designating institutions for which physicians clinicians will be recruited; (2) Criteria for selecting physicians clinicians for participation in the program; (3) Criteria for determining the portion of a physician's clinician's loan that the department will agree to repay; (4) Criteria for determining reasonable amounts of the expenses described in divisions (D)(2)(b) and (c) of this section; (5) Procedures for monitoring compliance by physicians clinicians with the terms of their contracts; and (6) Any other criteria or procedures necessary to implement the program. (F) The director or the director's designee may allocate funds among clinicians recruited under the program for any purpose the director or director's designee considers necessary to best serve clinician staffing needs, including department eligibility for benefits from incentive programs from federal or other entities, in consideration of maximizing the overall benefit to the Ohio veterans' homes. Sec. 5923.30. Whenever it is ascertained by the adjutant general or the auditor of state that any officer of the organized militia is unable to properly account for the property or moneys in his the officer's possession he, the adjutant general shall give immediate notice thereof to the attorney general for action against such officer and his bondsmenthe officer's bonder, and the attorney general shall bring such action. Sec. 6101.53. To maintain, operate, and preserve the reservoirs, ditches, drains, dams, levies, canals, sewers, pumping stations, treatment and disposal works, or other properties or improvements acquired or made pursuant to this chapter, to strengthen, repair, and restore the same, when needed, and to defray the current expenses of the conservancy district, the board of directors of the district may, upon the substantial completion of the improvements and on or before the thirtieth day of September in each year thereafter, levy an assessment upon each tract or parcel of land and upon each public corporation within the district, subject to assessments under this chapter, to be known as a conservancy maintenance assessment. No assessment shall be made with respect to works and improvements acquired or constructed for the purpose of providing a water supply for domestic, industrial, and public use within the district, when the water supply can be metered or measured when furnished to persons or public corporations. If the district, for the benefit of one or more persons or political subdivisions, provides a water supply that recharges underground aquifers and thereby replenishes wells or provides a source of water for new wells, or increases the natural low flow of a stream used for water supply, or creates an impoundment, in such a way that the augmented use of water cannot be metered or measured for individual or public consumption, the board may make a maintenance assessment against benefited property and public corporations in the same manner provided in this section for maintenance of other properties or improvements. The maintenance assessment shall be apportioned upon the basis of the total appraisal of benefits accruing for original and subsequent construction, shall not exceed one per cent of the total appraisal of benefits in any one year unless the court by its order authorizes an assessment of a larger percentage, shall not be less than two dollars, and shall be certified to the county auditor of each county in which lands of the district are located in the conservancy assessment record but in a separate column in like manner and at the same time as the annual installment of the assessment levied under section 6101.48 of the Revised Code is certified, under the heading maintenance assessment. The auditor shall certify the same to the county treasurer of the county at the same time that the auditor certifies the annual installment of the assessments levied under that section, and the sum of the levies for any tract or public corporation may be certified as a single item. The treasurer shall demand and collect the maintenance assessment and make return of it, and shall be liable for the same penalties for failure to do so as are provided for the annual installment of the assessment levied under section 6101.48 of the Revised Code. The amount of the maintenance assessment paid by any parcel of land or public corporation shall not be credited against the benefits assessed against the parcel of land or public corporation, but the maintenance assessment shall be in addition to any assessment that has been or can be levied under section 6101.48 of the Revised Code. To maintain, operate, and preserve the works and improvements of the district acquired or constructed for the purpose of providing a water supply, to strengthen, repair, and restore the same, and to defray the current expenses of the district for this purpose, the board may impose rates for the sale of water to public corporations and persons within the district. The rates to be charged for the water shall be fixed and adjusted by the board at intervals of not less than one year, so that the income thus produced will be adequate to provide a maintenance fund for the purpose of water supply. Contracts for supplying water to public corporations and persons shall be entered into before the service is rendered by the district. Contracts shall specify the maximum quantity of water to be furnished to the public corporation or person, and the quantity shall be fixed so as equitably to distribute the supply. Preference shall be given to water supply furnished to public corporations for domestic and public uses. Bills for water supplied to public corporations shall be rendered at regular intervals and shall be payable from the waterworks fund of the public corporation or, if it is not sufficient, from the general fund. For tax years 2020 to 2024, qualifying real property, as defined in section 727.031 of the Revised Code, is exempt from special assessments levied under this section, provided no delinquent special assessments and related interest and penalties are levied or assessed against any property owned by the owner and operator of the qualifying real property for that tax year. Sec. 6101.54. Whenever the owners or representatives of twenty-five per cent or more of the acreage or value of the lands in a conservancy district or the board of directors of a conservancy district file a petition with the clerk of the court having jurisdiction in the original case, stating that there has been a material change in the values of the property in the district or additional benefits are being derived from the works and the improvements of the district since the last previous appraisal of benefits, and praying for a readjustment of the appraisal of benefits for the purpose of making a more equitable basis for the levy of the maintenance assessment under section 6101.53 of the Revised Code, the clerk shall give notice of the filing and of a hearing of the petition by publication. Upon hearing of the petition, if the court finds there has been a material change in the values of property in the district, or that additional benefits are derived from the works and improvements of the district, or both, since the last previous appraisal of benefits, the court shall order that there be a readjustment of the appraisal of benefits for the purpose of providing a basis upon which to levy the maintenance assessment of the district. The court then shall direct the board of appraisers of the conservancy district to make the readjustment in the manner provided in this chapter, and the board shall make its report. The same proceedings shall be had on it, as nearly as may be, as are provided in this chapter for the appraisal of benefits accruing for original construction. In making the readjustment of the appraisal of benefits, the readjusted appraisal shall not be limited to the aggregate amount of or to the benefits or properties or persons listed in the original or any previous appraisal of benefits, and, after the making of the readjustment, the limitation of the annual maintenance assessment to one per cent of the total appraised benefits, but not less than two dollars, shall apply to the amount of the benefits as readjusted. There shall be no readjustment of benefits more often than once in six years. Sec. 6101.55. The board of directors of a conservancy district shall each year after the original assessment has been levied determine, order, and levy the annual levy, which shall include all assessments, or installments of assessments, together with interest, levied under this chapter, which become due in the ensuing year. The annual levy shall be due and be collected at the same time that state and county taxes are due and collected. After bonds have been sold, in the determination of an annual levy, the rate of interest upon the unpaid installments of an assessment shall be the rate borne by the bonds that have been issued and sold pursuant to the assessment. The annual levy shall be recorded in the conservancy assessment record, shall be signed and certified by the president of the board and by the secretary of the conservancy district not later than the thirtieth day of September each year, and shall thereafter become a permanent record in the office of the district. The certificate of the annual levy shall be substantially as set forth in section 6101.84 of the Revised Code. Then shall follow both of the following: (A) The descriptions of the property opposite the names of the owners; (B) The total amount of the annual levy on each piece of property and on each public corporation for the account of all funds and the amount of each item making up the total. The form of the annual levy portion of the conservancy assessment record as prescribed in this section may be modified with the approval of the auditor of statecourt. The certificate of the annual levy and the annual levy portion of the conservancy assessment record shall be named " Assessment Record of ________________ District, _________________ County, Ohio." One copy of that part of the assessment record affecting lands and public corporations in any county shall be forwarded to the county auditor of that county. The auditor of each county shall set up as a charge upon the county treasurer the total amount of assessments levied as shown by the assessment record, and shall certify the record as other tax records to the county treasurer of the county. The treasurer shall collect the amount according to law. The assessment record shall be the treasurer's warrant and authority to demand and receive the assessments due in the county as found in the record. In the event of any failure of the board to determine and order an annual levy for the purpose of paying the interest and principal of any bonds pursuant to this chapter, the auditor of the county in which the lands and public corporations subject to the assessments are situated shall make and complete a levy of the special assessments necessary for the purpose against the lands and public corporations in the district, and each piece of property in that county against which benefits have been appraised. Any assessment so made and completed by the auditor shall be made and completed by the auditor in the manner provided for the making and completion of an assessment by the board, and shall have the same effect as a levy of assessments determined and ordered by the board. Sec. 6111.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Pollution" means the placing of any sewage, sludge, sludge materials, industrial waste, or other wastes in any waters of the state. (B) "Sewage" means any liquid waste containing sludge, sludge materials, or animal or vegetable matter in suspension or solution, and may include household wastes as commonly discharged from residences and from commercial, institutional, or similar facilities. (C) "Industrial waste" means any liquid, gaseous, or solid waste substance resulting from any process of industry, manufacture, trade, or business, or from the development, processing, or recovery of any natural resource, together with such sewage as is present. (D) "Other wastes" means garbage, refuse, decayed wood, sawdust, shavings, bark, and other wood debris, lime, sand, ashes, offal, night soil, oil, tar, coal dust, dredged or fill material, or silt, other substances that are not sewage, sludge, sludge materials, or industrial waste, and any other "pollutants" or "toxic pollutants" as defined in the Federal Water Pollution Control Act that are not sewage, sludge, sludge materials, or industrial waste. (E) "Sewerage system" means pipelines or conduits, pumping stations, and force mains, and all other constructions, devices, appurtenances, and facilities used for collecting or conducting water-borne sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes to a point of disposal or treatment, but does not include plumbing fixtures, building drains and subdrains, building sewers, and building storm sewers. (F) "Treatment works" means any plant, disposal field, lagoon, dam, pumping station, building sewer connected directly to treatment works, incinerator, or other works used for the purpose of treating, stabilizing, blending, composting, or holding sewage, sludge, sludge materials, industrial waste, or other wastes, except as otherwise defined. (G) "Disposal system" means a system for disposing of sewage, sludge, sludge materials, industrial waste, or other wastes and includes sewerage systems and treatment works. (H) "Waters of the state" means all streams, lakes, ponds, marshes, watercourses, waterways, wells, springs, irrigation systems, drainage systems, and other bodies or accumulations of water, surface and underground, natural or artificial, regardless of the depth of the strata in which underground water is located, that are situated wholly or partly within, or border upon, this state, or are within its jurisdiction, except those private waters that do not combine or effect a junction with natural surface or underground waters. "Waters of the state" does not include an ephemeral feature for which the United States army corps of engineers lacks the authority to issue a permit under 33 U.S.C. 1344. (I) "Person" means the state, any municipal corporation, any other political subdivision of the state, any person as defined in section 1.59 of the Revised Code, any interstate body created by compact, or the federal government or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof. (J) "Industrial water pollution control facility" means any disposal system or any treatment works, pretreatment works, appliance, equipment, machinery, pipeline or conduit, pumping station, force main, or installation constructed, used, or placed in operation primarily for the purpose of collecting or conducting industrial waste to a point of disposal or treatment; reducing, controlling, or eliminating water pollution caused by industrial waste; or reducing, controlling, or eliminating the discharge into a disposal system of industrial waste or what would be industrial waste if discharged into the waters of the state. (K) "Schedule of compliance" means a schedule of remedial measures including an enforceable sequence of actions or operations leading to compliance with standards and rules adopted under sections 6111.041 and 6111.042 of the Revised Code or compliance with terms and conditions of permits set under division (J) of section 6111.03 of the Revised Code. (L) "Federal Water Pollution Control Act" means the "Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972," 86 Stat. 886, 33 U.S.C.A. 1251, as amended by the "Clean Water Act of 1977," 91 Stat. 1566, 33 U.S.C.A. 1251, and all other amendments to that act. (M) "Historically channelized watercourse" means the portion of a watercourse on which an improvement, as defined in divisions (C)(2) to (4) of section 6131.01 of the Revised Code, was constructed pursuant to Chapter 940., 6131., or 6133. of the Revised Code or a similar state law that preceded any of those chapters and authorized such an improvement. (N) "Sludge" means sewage sludge and a solid, semi-solid, or liquid residue that is generated from an industrial wastewater treatment process and that is applied to land for agronomic benefit. "Sludge" does not include ash generated during the firing of sludge in a sludge incinerator, grit and screening generated during preliminary treatment of sewage in a treatment works, animal manure, residue generated during treatment of animal manure, or domestic septage. (O) "Sludge materials" means solid, semi-solid, or liquid materials derived from sludge and includes products from a treatment works that result from the treatment, blending, or composting of sludge. (P) "Storage of sludge" means the placement of sludge on land on which the sludge remains for not longer than two years, but does not include the placement of sludge on land for treatment. (Q) "Sludge disposal program" means any program used by an entity that begins with the generation of sludge and includes treatment or disposal of the sludge, as "treatment" and "disposal" are defined in division (Y)(X) of section 3745.11 of the Revised Code. (R) "Agronomic benefit" means any process that promotes or enhances plant growth and includes, but is not limited to, a process that increases soil fertility and moisture retention. (S) "Sludge management" means the use, storage, treatment, or disposal of, and management practices related to, sludge and sludge materials. (T) "Sludge management permit" means a permit for sludge management that is issued under division (J) of section 6111.03 of the Revised Code. (U) "Sewage sludge" has the same meaning as in division (Y)(X) of section 3745.11 of the Revised Code. (V) "Ephemeral feature" means surface water flowing or pooling only in direct response to precipitation, such as rain or snow. "Ephemeral feature" does not include a wetland, as defined in section 6111.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 6111.04. (A) Both of the following apply except as otherwise provided in division (A) or (F) of this section: (1) No person shall cause pollution or place or cause to be placed any sewage, sludge, sludge materials, industrial waste, or other wastes in a location where they cause pollution of any waters of the state. (2) Such an action prohibited under division (A)(1) of this section is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. Divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply if the person causing pollution or placing or causing to be placed wastes in a location in which they cause pollution of any waters of the state holds a valid, unexpired permit, or renewal of a permit, governing the causing or placement as provided in sections 6111.01 to 6111.08 of the Revised Code or if the person's application for renewal of such a permit is pending. (B) If the director of environmental protection administers a sludge management program pursuant to division (R) of section 6111.03 of the Revised Code, both of the following apply except as otherwise provided in division (B) or (F) of this section: (1) No person, in the course of sludge management, shall place on land located in the state or release into the air of the state any sludge or sludge materials. (2) An action prohibited under division (B)(1) of this section is hereby declared to be a public nuisance. Divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply if the person placing or releasing the sludge or sludge materials holds a valid, unexpired permit, or renewal of a permit, governing the placement or release as provided in sections 6111.01 to 6111.08 of the Revised Code or if the person's application for renewal of such a permit is pending. (C) No person to whom a permit has been issued shall place or discharge, or cause to be placed or discharged, in any waters of the state any sewage, sludge, sludge materials, industrial waste, or other wastes in excess of the permissive discharges specified under an existing permit without first receiving a permit from the director to do so. (D) No person to whom a sludge management permit has been issued shall place on the land or release into the air of the state any sludge or sludge materials in excess of the permissive amounts specified under the existing sludge management permit without first receiving a modification of the existing sludge management permit or a new sludge management permit to do so from the director. (E) The director may require the submission of plans, specifications, and other information that the director considers relevant in connection with the issuance of permits. (F) This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) Waters used in washing sand, gravel, other aggregates, or mineral products when the washing and the ultimate disposal of the water used in the washing, including any sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes contained in the waters, are entirely confined to the land under the control of the person engaged in the recovery and processing of the sand, gravel, other aggregates, or mineral products and do not result in the pollution of waters of the state; (2) Water, gas, or other material injected into a well to facilitate, or that is incidental to, the production of oil, gas, artificial brine, or water derived in association with oil or gas production and disposed of in a well, in compliance with a permit issued under Chapter 1509. of the Revised Code, or sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes injected into a well in compliance with an injection well operating permit. Division (F)(2) of this section does not authorize, without a permit, any discharge that is prohibited by, or for which a permit is required by, regulation of the United States environmental protection agency. (3) Application of any materials to land for agricultural purposes or runoff of the materials from that application or pollution by residual farm products, manure, or soil sediment, including attached substances, resulting from farming, silvicultural, or earthmoving activities regulated by Chapter 307. or 939. of the Revised Code. Division (F)(3) of this section does not authorize, without a permit, any discharge that is prohibited by, or for which a permit is required by, the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or regulations adopted under it. As used in division (F)(3) of this section, "residual farm products" and "manure" have the same meanings as in section 939.01 of the Revised Code. (4) The excrement of domestic and farm animals defecated on land or runoff therefrom into any waters of the state. Division (F)(4) of this section does not authorize, without a permit, any discharge that is prohibited by, or for which a permit is required by, the Federal Water Pollution Control Act or regulations adopted under it. (5) On and after the date on which the United States environmental protection agency approves the NPDES program submitted by the director of agriculture under section 903.08 of the Revised Code, any discharge that is within the scope of the approved NPDES program submitted by the director of agriculture; (6) The discharge of sewage, industrial waste, or other wastes into a sewerage system tributary to a treatment works. Division (F)(6) of this section does not authorize any discharge into a publicly owned treatment works in violation of a pretreatment program applicable to the publicly owned treatment works or any discharge to a privately owned treatment works in violation of any permit conditions established in accordance with 40 C.F.R. 122.44(m). (7) A household sewage treatment system or a small flow on-site sewage treatment system, as applicable, as defined in section 3718.01 of the Revised Code that is installed in compliance with Chapter 3718. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. Division (F)(7) of this section does not authorize, without a permit, any discharge that is prohibited by, or for which a permit is required by, regulation of the United States environmental protection agency. (8) Exceptional quality sludge generated outside of this state and contained in bags or other containers not greater than one hundred pounds in capacity. As used in division (F)(8) of this section, "exceptional quality sludge" has the same meaning as in division (Y)(X) of section 3745.11 of the Revised Code. (G) The holder of a permit issued under section 402 (a) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act need not obtain a permit for a discharge authorized by the permit until its expiration date. Except as otherwise provided in this division, the director of environmental protection shall administer and enforce those permits within this state and may modify their terms and conditions in accordance with division (J) of section 6111.03 of the Revised Code. On and after the date on which the United States environmental protection agency approves the NPDES program submitted by the director of agriculture under section 903.08 of the Revised Code, the director of agriculture shall administer and enforce those permits within this state that are issued for any discharge that is within the scope of the approved NPDES program submitted by the director of agriculture. Section 101.02. That existing sections 3.15, 9.03, 9.07, 9.239, 9.24, 9.27, 9.28, 9.312, 9.331, 9.334, 9.35, 9.67, 9.681, 9.821, 101.30, 101.352, 101.53, 101.63, 101.65, 101.82, 101.83, 101.84, 102.02, 103.05, 103.051, 103.13, 103.412, 103.414, 103.65, 103.73, 106.02, 106.021, 106.023, 106.024, 106.031, 107.03, 107.032, 107.033, 107.12, 109.02, 109.71, 109.73, 109.77, 109.803, 111.15, 111.27, 113.05, 113.13, 113.40, 113.51, 113.53, 113.78, 117.11, 117.38, 117.44, 117.56, 119.03, 119.04, 120.06, 120.08, 121.02, 121.03, 121.085, 121.22, 121.35, 121.36, 121.37, 121.93, 121.931, 121.95, 121.951, 121.953, 122.09, 122.14, 122.175, 122.1710, 122.41, 122.42, 122.47, 122.49, 122.53, 122.571, 122.59, 122.631, 122.632, 122.633, 122.6510, 122.6511, 122.6512, 122.66, 122.67, 122.68, 122.681, 122.69, 122.70, 122.701, 122.702, 122.84, 122.85, 122.86, 123.10, 123.28, 123.281, 124.02, 124.07, 124.135, 124.1310, 124.1312, 124.152, 124.385, 125.01, 125.041, 125.071, 125.11, 125.111, 125.13, 125.183, 125.31, 125.42, 125.58, 125.95, 126.24, 126.42, 126.60, 126.62, 127.12, 127.13, 127.16, 128.021, 128.41, 128.46, 128.54, 131.01, 131.02, 131.35, 131.43, 131.50, 131.51, 133.18, 135.01, 135.03, 135.143, 135.18, 135.35, 135.70, 135.71, 141.04, 145.012, 145.054, 145.055, 145.09, 145.091, 145.99, 148.01, 148.02, 148.04, 148.041, 148.042, 148.05, 148.10, 149.011, 149.10, 149.30, 149.3010, 149.311, 149.38, 149.43, 153.01, 153.07, 153.08, 153.09, 153.12, 153.13, 153.14, 153.501, 153.502, 153.54, 153.59, 153.63, 153.693, 155.33, 155.34, 163.01, 164.01, 164.05, 164.06, 164.08, 164.14, 165.04, 166.01, 166.02, 166.03, 166.08, 166.12, 166.17, 169.01, 169.05, 169.08, 169.13, 173.38, 173.381, 173.391, 173.50, 173.525, 175.16, 175.17, 303.12, 305.021, 305.03, 306.32, 306.322, 306.43, 307.05, 307.673, 307.696, 307.697, 307.86, 307.985, 308.13, 311.14, 317.20, 319.04, 319.202, 319.301, 319.302, 321.03, 323.131, 323.152, 323.153, 323.155, 323.156, 323.158, 323.611, 325.18, 325.25, 340.01, 340.011, 340.02, 340.021, 340.022, 340.03, 340.032, 340.034, 340.036, 340.037, 340.04, 340.041, 340.05, 340.07, 340.08, 340.09, 340.12, 340.13, 340.16, 345.01, 345.03, 345.04, 349.01, 355.04, 501.09, 501.11, 504.14, 505.24, 505.37, 505.48, 505.481, 507.09, 507.12, 511.28, 511.34, 513.18, 519.12, 523.06, 703.331, 703.34, 717.051, 718.01, 718.031, 718.05, 718.12, 718.13, 718.19, 718.85, 718.88, 718.90, 718.91, 731.14, 731.141, 731.29, 733.81, 735.05, 742.043, 742.044, 742.99, 749.31, 755.181, 901.43, 904.02, 904.04, 905.32, 905.57, 907.13, 907.14, 909.01, 909.02, 909.07, 909.08, 909.09, 909.13, 911.02, 913.23, 915.16, 915.24, 921.01, 921.02, 921.06, 921.09, 921.11, 921.12, 921.13, 921.14, 921.16, 921.23, 921.24, 923.42, 923.44, 923.51, 924.01, 924.30, 924.51, 927.53, 928.02, 928.03, 928.04, 935.06, 935.07, 935.09, 935.10, 935.16, 935.17, 935.20, 935.24, 943.04, 943.16, 943.26, 943.99, 956.07, 956.10, 956.13, 956.16, 956.18, 956.21, 956.22, 956.23, 1311.04, 1311.252, 1317.05, 1317.06, 1321.21, 1347.08, 1509.02, 1509.07, 1509.071, 1509.13, 1509.36, 1509.38, 1517.11, 1531.01, 1533.10, 1533.11, 1533.111, 1533.13, 1533.131, 1533.32, 1545.041, 1545.21, 1546.04, 1547.54, 1548.06, 1561.13, 1561.16, 1561.23, 1561.46, 1561.48, 1701.04, 1701.07, 1703.041, 1707.01, 1707.14, 1707.47, 1711.30, 1713.03, 1901.123, 1901.26, 1907.143, 1907.24, 2101.11, 2101.16, 2108.34, 2151.27, 2151.311, 2151.316, 2151.356, 2151.3527, 2151.416, 2151.4115, 2151.421, 2151.423, 2151.424, 2151.45, 2151.451, 2151.452, 2151.453, 2152.26, 2303.12, 2303.201, 2303.26, 2307.66, 2329.66, 2501.16, 2743.03, 2907.15, 2913.401, 2915.01, 2917.211, 2919.171, 2919.19, 2921.13, 2921.36, 2921.41, 2925.14, 2933.32, 2949.12, 2951.041, 2953.32, 2967.14, 2967.18, 2967.26, 2967.271, 2967.28, 2969.13, 2981.02, 3101.08, 3105.171, 3105.63, 3107.01, 3107.012, 3107.031, 3107.033, 3107.034, 3107.062, 3107.063, 3107.064, 3107.065, 3107.38, 3107.391, 3109.14, 3109.171, 3109.172, 3109.173, 3109.178, 3115.201, 3119.01, 3121.441, 3123.89, 3123.90, 3301.01, 3301.02, 3301.03, 3301.06, 3301.071, 3301.074, 3301.079, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0723, 3301.0727, 3301.136, 3301.17, 3301.541, 3301.57, 3302.03, 3302.034, 3302.20, 3302.42, 3305.05, 3305.053, 3307.044, 3307.05, 3307.06, 3307.07, 3307.073, 3307.074, 3307.10, 3307.11, 3307.27, 3307.99, 3309.073, 3309.074, 3309.47, 3309.99, 3310.033, 3310.41, 3310.51, 3310.52, 3310.58, 3310.64, 3311.053, 3311.50, 3313.27, 3313.413, 3313.46, 3313.489, 3313.5313, 3313.603, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6013, 3313.6022, 3313.6028, 3313.618, 3313.6113, 3313.6114, 3313.64, 3313.753, 3313.90, 3313.975, 3313.98, 3314.011, 3314.013, 3314.015, 3314.016, 3314.017, 3314.02, 3314.021, 3314.03, 3314.034, 3314.038, 3314.05, 3314.07, 3314.08, 3314.19, 3314.191, 3314.261, 3314.29, 3314.35, 3314.351, 3314.36, 3314.361, 3314.381, 3314.382, 3315.18, 3315.181, 3316.031, 3316.041, 3316.043, 3316.06, 3316.08, 3316.16, 3317.01, 3317.011, 3317.012, 3317.014, 3317.016, 3317.017, 3317.018, 3317.019, 3317.0110, 3317.02, 3317.021, 3317.022, 3317.024, 3317.026, 3317.0212, 3317.0213, 3317.0215, 3317.0217, 3317.03, 3317.035, 3317.051, 3317.06, 3317.11, 3317.16, 3317.161, 3317.162, 3317.163, 3317.20, 3317.201, 3317.22, 3317.25, 3318.01, 3318.032, 3318.051, 3318.06, 3318.061, 3318.062, 3318.063, 3318.12, 3318.361, 3318.40, 3318.45, 3318.48, 3319.073, 3319.088, 3319.111, 3319.223, 3319.236, 3319.263, 3319.29, 3319.301, 3319.311, 3319.51, 3320.04, 3321.16, 3321.19, 3321.22, 3323.32, 3325.08, 3325.16, 3325.17, 3326.11, 3326.44, 3326.51, 3327.017, 3327.08, 3327.10, 3328.16, 3328.24, 3332.081, 3333.04, 3333.041, 3333.129, 3333.13, 3333.131, 3333.132, 3333.133, 3333.134, 3333.135, 3333.164, 3333.24, 3333.374, 3334.11, 3335.39, 3339.06, 3344.07, 3345.06, 3345.382, 3345.48, 3345.591, 3345.71, 3345.74, 3345.75, 3352.16, 3354.19, 3358.08, 3358.11, 3364.07, 3365.15, 3375.15, 3375.22, 3375.30, 3375.39, 3375.92, 3379.03, 3379.12, 3381.03, 3381.11, 3381.17, 3501.01, 3501.02, 3501.05, 3501.12, 3501.17, 3501.28, 3505.03, 3505.04, 3505.06, 3505.33, 3505.38, 3513.04, 3513.05, 3513.052, 3513.10, 3513.19, 3517.01, 3517.08, 3517.081, 3517.092, 3517.10, 3517.102, 3517.103, 3517.104, 3517.108, 3517.109, 3517.1012, 3517.11, 3517.121, 3517.13, 3517.152, 3517.153, 3517.154, 3517.155, 3517.157, 3517.20, 3517.21, 3517.22, 3517.23, 3517.992, 3517.993, 3701.021, 3701.033, 3701.045, 3701.511, 3701.65, 3701.79, 3701.841, 3704.01, 3704.03, 3704.031, 3704.09, 3704.111, 3704.14, 3705.126, 3705.16, 3705.17, 3706.01, 3709.15, 3715.021, 3717.071, 3718.02, 3718.04, 3719.04, 3721.32, 3728.01, 3734.021, 3734.05, 3734.57, 3734.79, 3734.901, 3734.904, 3734.907, 3735.67, 3735.671, 3737.83, 3738.01, 3738.02, 3738.03, 3738.04, 3738.05, 3738.06, 3738.07, 3738.08, 3738.09, 3742.32, 3742.50, 3743.04, 3743.06, 3743.17, 3743.19, 3743.25, 3743.60, 3743.61, 3743.63, 3743.65, 3745.11, 3745.21, 3748.13, 3750.02, 3769.088, 3770.071, 3770.072, 3770.073, 3770.10, 3770.12, 3770.121, 3770.13, 3770.25, 3772.02, 3775.16, 3780.02, 3780.03, 3780.06, 3780.10, 3780.24, 3780.26, 3780.30, 3781.10, 3781.102, 3781.1011, 3901.90, 3902.70, 3905.426, 3905.72, 3923.443, 3951.03, 3959.01, 3959.111, 4112.055, 4117.08, 4117.10, 4141.01, 4141.02, 4141.162, 4141.23, 4141.281, 4141.29, 4141.33, 4141.56, 4141.60, 4301.12, 4301.19, 4301.30, 4301.421, 4303.181, 4303.183, 4303.204, 4303.2011, 4303.233, 4305.131, 4501.027, 4501.21, 4501.29, 4501.30, 4501.302, 4503.038, 4503.06, 4503.0610, 4503.0611, 4503.10, 4503.102, 4503.29, 4503.41, 4503.579, 4503.91, 4505.07, 4505.09, 4506.01, 4506.05, 4506.07, 4506.13, 4506.131, 4506.14, 4507.061, 4507.08, 4507.09, 4507.21, 4507.40, 4507.53, 4508.02, 4509.06, 4509.07, 4509.101, 4509.70, 4511.01, 4511.75, 4511.76, 4511.77, 4511.771, 4511.78, 4517.01, 4517.52, 4517.60, 4519.59, 4582.024, 4582.26, 4701.01, 4701.04, 4701.16, 4707.024, 4723.28, 4723.483, 4723.4811, 4725.48, 4729.01, 4729.49, 4729.52, 4729.53, 4729.54, 4729.541, 4729.56, 4729.561, 4729.60, 4729.80, 4729.901, 4729.902, 4729.921, 4730.25, 4730.433, 4730.437, 4730.99, 4731.22, 4731.2210, 4731.92, 4731.96, 4731.99, 4735.01, 4735.06, 4735.09, 4735.55, 4735.56, 4735.80, 4740.06, 4741.04, 4743.05, 4743.10, 4749.01, 4751.20, 4751.24, 4751.25, 4758.01, 4758.02, 4758.03, 4758.10, 4758.13, 4758.20, 4758.22, 4758.221, 4758.23, 4758.24, 4758.27, 4758.30, 4758.31, 4758.35, 4758.36, 4758.39, 4758.40, 4758.41, 4758.42, 4758.43, 4758.44, 4758.45, 4758.52, 4758.54, 4758.55, 4758.56, 4758.57, 4758.59, 4758.99, 4759.07, 4759.99, 4760.13, 4760.99, 4761.09, 4761.99, 4762.13, 4762.99, 4765.11, 4765.55, 4767.10, 4772.20, 4772.21, 4772.23, 4772.99, 4774.13, 4774.99, 4778.14, 4778.99, 4785.041, 4903.10, 4905.311, 4906.07, 4911.18, 4921.01, 4923.01, 4927.01, 4928.05, 4928.06, 4928.102, 4928.34, 4928.43, 4928.51, 4928.52, 4928.53, 4928.54, 4928.542, 4928.543, 4928.544, 4928.55, 4928.56, 4928.58, 4928.61, 4928.62, 4928.63, 4928.66, 4928.75, 4928.86, 4981.02, 5101.101, 5101.13, 5101.131, 5101.132, 5101.133, 5101.134, 5101.135, 5101.136, 5101.137, 5101.14, 5101.141, 5101.142, 5101.144, 5101.145, 5101.146, 5101.147, 5101.148, 5101.149, 5101.1410, 5101.1411, 5101.1412, 5101.1413, 5101.1414, 5101.1415, 5101.1416, 5101.1417, 5101.1418, 5101.15, 5101.19, 5101.191, 5101.192, 5101.193, 5101.194, 5101.211, 5101.212, 5101.215, 5101.222, 5101.242, 5101.26, 5101.272, 5101.273, 5101.28, 5101.30, 5101.33, 5101.34, 5101.341, 5101.342, 5101.343, 5101.35, 5101.351, 5101.38, 5101.461, 5101.542, 5101.76, 5101.77, 5101.78, 5101.80, 5101.801, 5101.802, 5101.804, 5101.805, 5101.85, 5101.851, 5101.853, 5101.854, 5101.855, 5101.856, 5101.88, 5101.881, 5101.884, 5101.885, 5101.886, 5101.887, 5101.889, 5101.8811, 5101.8812, 5101.89, 5101.891, 5101.892, 5101.893, 5101.894, 5101.895, 5101.897, 5101.899, 5101.98, 5101.99, 5103.02, 5103.021, 5103.0329, 5103.15, 5103.155, 5103.18, 5103.30, 5103.32, 5103.41, 5104.01, 5104.12, 5104.29, 5104.30, 5104.32, 5104.34, 5104.36, 5104.37, 5104.38, 5104.41, 5104.50, 5104.99, 5117.07, 5117.12, 5119.01, 5119.011, 5119.04, 5119.05, 5119.051, 5119.06, 5119.07, 5119.08, 5119.091, 5119.10, 5119.11, 5119.14, 5119.141, 5119.15, 5119.161, 5119.17, 5119.18, 5119.181, 5119.182, 5119.184, 5119.185, 5119.186, 5119.187, 5119.188, 5119.19, 5119.20, 5119.201, 5119.21, 5119.22, 5119.221, 5119.23, 5119.24, 5119.25, 5119.27, 5119.28, 5119.29, 5119.30, 5119.31, 5119.311, 5119.32, 5119.33, 5119.331, 5119.332, 5119.333, 5119.334, 5119.34, 5119.342, 5119.343, 5119.35, 5119.36, 5119.362, 5119.363, 5119.364, 5119.365, 5119.366, 5119.367, 5119.368, 5119.37, 5119.371, 5119.38, 5119.39, 5119.391, 5119.392, 5119.393, 5119.394, 5119.395, 5119.397, 5119.40, 5119.41, 5119.42, 5119.421, 5119.43, 5119.431, 5119.44, 5119.45, 5119.46, 5119.47, 5119.48, 5119.49, 5119.50, 5119.51, 5119.52, 5119.54, 5119.55, 5119.56, 5119.60, 5119.61, 5119.71, 5119.82, 5119.85, 5119.89, 5119.90, 5119.99, 5120.034, 5120.035, 5120.16, 5120.173, 5120.21, 5120.51, 5121.30, 5121.32, 5121.33, 5121.34, 5121.41, 5121.43, 5122.01, 5122.03, 5122.10, 5122.15, 5122.20, 5122.21, 5122.23, 5122.26, 5122.27, 5122.31, 5122.32, 5122.33, 5122.341, 5122.36, 5122.44, 5122.45, 5122.46, 5122.47, 5123.081, 5123.16, 5123.168, 5123.169, 5123.191, 5123.41, 5123.42, 5123.47, 5124.15, 5139.05, 5139.08, 5139.12, 5139.14, 5139.34, 5145.162, 5153.10, 5153.122, 5153.16, 5153.163, 5160.37, 5162.13, 5162.132, 5162.133, 5162.134, 5162.136, 5162.1310, 5162.70, 5162.82, 5163.03, 5163.091, 5163.093, 5163.094, 5163.098, 5163.30, 5163.33, 5165.19, 5165.192, 5165.26, 5166.03, 5167.01, 5167.03, 5167.123, 5167.24, 5168.08, 5168.11, 5168.22, 5168.25, 5168.90, 5180.14, 5180.17, 5180.20, 5180.21, 5180.22, 5180.40, 5310.06, 5310.47, 5323.02, 5501.91, 5502.262, 5502.29, 5502.30, 5502.41, 5503.02, 5505.045, 5505.046, 5505.99, 5525.03, 5537.01, 5537.02, 5537.03, 5537.27, 5540.02, 5595.02, 5701.11, 5703.052, 5703.19, 5703.21, 5703.37, 5703.70, 5705.01, 5705.03, 5705.12, 5705.121, 5705.13, 5705.131, 5705.132, 5705.14, 5705.194, 5705.199, 5705.21, 5705.212, 5705.213, 5705.215, 5705.217, 5705.218, 5705.219, 5705.2111, 5705.2114, 5705.221, 5705.222, 5705.233, 5705.25, 5705.251, 5705.261, 5705.27, 5705.28, 5705.29, 5705.30, 5705.31, 5705.314, 5705.32, 5705.321, 5705.35, 5705.36, 5705.37, 5705.38, 5705.391, 5705.40, 5705.412, 5705.55, 5709.081, 5709.212, 5709.92, 5709.93, 5715.19, 5717.01, 5725.01, 5725.23, 5725.35, 5725.38, 5726.03, 5726.20, 5726.61, 5726.98, 5727.111, 5727.26, 5727.38, 5727.42, 5727.47, 5727.48, 5727.89, 5728.10, 5729.10, 5729.18, 5729.21, 5735.12, 5736.09, 5739.01, 5739.011, 5739.02, 5739.03, 5739.07, 5739.09, 5739.092, 5739.101, 5739.12, 5739.13, 5739.132, 5739.31, 5743.021, 5743.024, 5743.081, 5743.323, 5743.52, 5743.54, 5743.55, 5743.56, 5743.57, 5743.59, 5743.60, 5743.62, 5743.63, 5743.64, 5745.03, 5745.04, 5745.09, 5745.12, 5747.01, 5747.02, 5747.021, 5747.025, 5747.05, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5747.064, 5747.07, 5747.071, 5747.08, 5747.09, 5747.10, 5747.13, 5747.38, 5747.39, 5747.40, 5747.43, 5747.502, 5747.51, 5747.72, 5747.85, 5747.86, 5747.98, 5748.01, 5748.02, 5748.021, 5748.03, 5748.04, 5748.08, 5748.081, 5748.09, 5749.02, 5749.07, 5751.02, 5751.09, 5751.53, 5751.98, 5753.031, 5753.07, 5907.11, 5907.17, 5923.30, 6101.53, 6101.54, 6101.55, 6111.01, and 6111.04 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 105.01. That sections 9.47, 101.38, 103.053, 103.054, 103.24, 103.41, 103.411, 103.413, 103.415, 103.71, 103.72, 103.74, 103.75, 103.76, 103.77, 103.78, 103.79, 113.06, 117.113, 117.251, 117.441, 117.51, 122.451, 122.55, 122.56, 122.561, 122.57, 122.852, 125.181, 125.36, 125.38, 125.43, 125.49, 125.51, 125.56, 125.65, 125.76, 125.95, 128.412, 135.144, 501.03, 904.06, 905.56, 935.25, 956.181, 1561.18, 1561.21, 1561.22, 2919.1910, 3313.905, 3314.50, 3317.0218, 3317.071, 3321.191, 3333.0415, 3333.303, 3333.373, 3333.801, 3354.24, 3379.10, 3513.254, 3513.255, 3513.256, 3513.259, 3517.14, 3517.151, 3517.156, 3517.99, 3517.991, 3701.0212, 3701.051, 3780.18, 3780.19, 3780.22, 3780.23, 4115.31, 4115.32, 4115.33, 4115.34, 4115.35, 4115.36, 4729.551, 4758.18, 4758.241, 4758.50, 4928.57, 4928.581, 4928.582, 4928.583, 5104.08, 5123.352, 5160.23, 5163.05, 5165.261, 5166.45, 5180.23, 5180.24, 5180.34, 5310.05, 5310.06, 5310.07, 5310.08, 5310.09, 5310.10, 5310.11, 5310.12, 5310.13, 5310.14, 5537.24, 5705.195, 5705.196, 5705.197, 5726.59, 5747.67, 5751.55, 5902.06, and 5902.20 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 105.05. That sections 103.60, 107.034, 113.78, 3313.902, 3314.38, 3317.036, 3317.23, 3317.231, 3317.24, 3345.86, 5705.192, 5739.071, 5747.29, and 5747.75 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed, as of the dates specified below in the sections prefixed with number 105. Section 105.20. That section 107.034 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed, effective July 1, 2026. Section 105.30. That section 113.78 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed, effective July 1, 2026. Section 105.40. That section 103.60 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed, effective December 31, 2025. Section 105.50. That section 5739.071 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed, effective January 1, 2026. Section 105.60. That section 5747.29 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed, effective January 1, 2026. Section 105.70. That section 5705.192 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed, effective January 1, 2026. Section 105.80. That sections 3313.902, 3314.38, 3317.036, 3317.23, 3317.231, 3317.24, and 3345.86 are hereby repealed, effective July 1, 2026. Section 105.90. That section 5747.75 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed, effective January 1, 2026. Section 107.10. That Section 733.61 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly) be amended to codify it as section 3313.6033 of the Revised Code to read as follows: Sec. 733.61 3313.6033. (A) Notwithstanding section 3319.236 of the Revised Code, for the 2019-2020 school year through the 2024-2025 school year only, a school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code may permit an individual who holds a valid educator license in any of grades kindergarten through twelve to teach a computer science course if, prior to teaching the coursein the last five years, the individual completes has completed a professional development program approved by the district superintendent or school principal that provides content knowledge specific to the course the individual will teach. To continue teaching computer science under this section, an individual shall complete the professional development program every five years in accordance with the educator licensure recertification process. The superintendent or principal shall approve any professional development program endorsed by the organization that creates and administers the national Advanced Placement advanced placement examinations as appropriate for the course the individual will teach. (B) Nothing in this section shall permit an individual described in division (A) of this section to teach a computer science course in a school district or school other than the school district or school that employed the individual at the time the individual completed the professional development program required by that division. (C) Beginning July 1, 2025, a school district or public school shall permit an individual to teach a computer science course only in accordance with section 3319.236 of the Revised Code. (D) Notwithstanding section 3301.012 of the Revised Code, as used in this section, "computer science course" means any course that is reported in the education management information system established under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code as a computer science course. Section 107.11. That existing Section 733.61 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly) is hereby repealed. Section 125.10. The amendment by this act of section 4785.041 of the Revised Code does not supersede the repeal of that section on April 3, 2033, as prescribed by Sections 4 and 5 of H.B. 107 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 201.10. APPROPRIATIONS Except as otherwise provided in this act, all appropriation items in this act are appropriated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund that are not otherwise appropriated. For all appropriations made in this act, the amounts in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and the amounts in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. Section 203.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ACC ACCOUNTANCY BOARD OF OHIO B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4J80 889601 CPA Education Assistance $260,000 $275,000 D 4K90 889609 Operating Expenses $1,359,075 $1,400,531 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,619,075 $1,675,531 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,619,075 $1,675,531 Section 205.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ADJ ADJUTANT GENERAL B General Revenue Fund C GRF 745401 Ohio Military Reserve $56,162 $56,162 D GRF 745404 Air National Guard $2,406,436 $2,689,830 E GRF 745407 National Guard Benefits $174,000 $174,000 F GRF 745409 Central Administration $3,585,342 $3,684,085 G GRF 745499 Army National Guard $5,402,863 $6,082,457 H GRF 745503 Ohio Cyber Reserve $1,151,000 $1,151,000 I GRF 745504 Ohio Cyber Range $2,650,000 $2,650,000 J GRF 745505 State Active Duty $70,000 $70,000 K General Revenue Fund Total $15,495,803 $16,557,534 L Dedicated Purpose Fund Group M 5340 745612 Property Operations Management $682,195 $682,292 N 5360 745620 Camp Perry and Buckeye Inn Operations $1,064,057 $1,074,431 O 5370 745604 Ohio National Guard Facilities Maintenance $60,131 $60,131 P 5U80 745613 Community Match Armories $349,965 $349,965 Q Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $2,156,348 $2,166,819 R Federal Fund Group S 3420 745616 Army National Guard Service Agreement $24,076,820 $24,316,615 T 3E80 745628 Air National Guard Operations and Maintenance $18,934,892 $19,380,313 U 3R80 745603 Counter Drug Operations $26,606 $26,606 V Federal Fund Group Total $43,038,318 $43,723,534 W TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $60,690,469 $62,447,887 Section 205.20. NATIONAL GUARD BENEFITS The foregoing appropriation item 745407, National Guard Benefits, shall be used for purposes of sections 5919.31 and 5919.33 of the Revised Code, and for administrative costs of the associated programs. If necessary, in order to pay benefits in a timely manner pursuant to sections 5919.31 and 5919.33 of the Revised Code, the Adjutant General may request that the Director of Budget and Management transfer appropriation from any appropriation item used by the Adjutant General to appropriation item 745407, National Guard Benefits. Such amounts are hereby appropriated. The Adjutant General may subsequently seek Controlling Board approval to restore the appropriation in the appropriation item from which such a transfer was made. For active duty members of the Ohio National Guard who died after October 7, 2001, while performing active duty, the death benefit, pursuant to section 5919.33 of the Revised Code, shall be paid to the beneficiary or beneficiaries designated on the member's Service members' Group Life Insurance Policy. OHIO CYBER RESERVE The foregoing appropriation item 745503, Ohio Cyber Reserve, shall be used for purposes of providing support for the administration of the Ohio Cyber Reserve, a civilian cyber reserve force that is part of the Ohio organized militia, capable of being expanded and trained to educate and protect all levels of state government, critical infrastructure, and the citizens of this state from cyber attacks and incidences under sections 5922.01, 5922.02, and 5922.08 of the Revised Code, as well as for the purpose of paying expenses related to cyber state active duty of members of the Ohio Cyber Reserve, in accordance with a proclamation or order of the Governor. Expenses include, but are not limited to, the cost of equipment, supplies, and services, as determined by the Adjutant General. OHIO CYBER RANGE The foregoing appropriation item 745504, Ohio Cyber Range, shall be used by the Adjutant General's Department to establish and maintain the cyber range for purposes of providing cyber training and education to K-12 students, higher education students, members of the Ohio National Guard, federal employees, and state and local government employees, and provide for emergency preparedness exercises and trainings. The Adjutant General's Department, in conjunction and collaboration with the Department of Administrative Services, the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Higher Education, and the Department of Education and Workforce shall establish and maintain a cyber range. The Adjutant General's Department may work with federal agencies to assist in accomplishing this objective. The state agencies identified in this paragraph may procure any necessary goods and services including, but not limited to, contracted services, hardware, networking services, maintenance costs, and the training and management costs of a cyber range. These state agencies shall determine the amount of funds each agency will contribute from available funds and appropriations enacted herein in order to establish and maintain a cyber range. STATE ACTIVE DUTY The foregoing appropriation item 745505, State Active Duty, shall be used for the purpose of paying expenses related to state active duty of members of the Ohio organized militia, not including the civilian cyber security reserve forces, in accordance with a proclamation or order of the Governor. Expenses include, but are not limited to, cost of equipment, supplies, and services, as determined by the Adjutant General. Section 207.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DAS DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 100413 EDCS Lease Rental Payments $9,300,000 $9,300,000 D GRF 100414 MARCS Lease Rental Payments $6,450,000 $6,450,000 E GRF 100415 OAKS Lease Rental Payments $2,450,000 $2,450,000 F GRF 100416 STARS Lease Rental Payments $1,100,000 $1,100,000 G GRF 100447 Administrative Buildings Lease Rental Bond Payments $45,500,000 $60,500,000 H GRF 100456 State IT Services $978,412 $1,512,297 I GRF 100459 Ohio Business Gateway $14,325,421 $14,368,107 J GRF 100469 Aronoff Center Building Maintenance $222,000 $222,000 K GRF 130321 State Agency Support Services $28,000,000 $28,000,000 L General Revenue Fund Total $108,325,833 $123,902,404 M Dedicated Purpose Fund Group N 4K90 100673 Ohio Professionals Licensing System $7,175,727 $7,439,069 O 5AB1 100674 Next Generation 9-1-1 $3,500,000 $0 P 5L70 100610 Professional Development $2,013,841 $2,014,854 Q 5NM0 100663 9-1-1 Program $956,663 $980,078 R 5V60 100619 Employee Educational Development $1,234,461 $1,268,484 S 7093 100675 Next Generation 9-1-1 $13,469,622 $14,804,264 T Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $28,350,314 $26,506,749 U Internal Service Activity Fund Group V 1120 100616 DAS Administration $14,683,912 $15,113,177 W 1170 100644 General Services Division - Operating $23,091,398 $22,574,348 X 1220 100637 Fleet Management $25,449,633 $22,866,905 Y 1250 100622 Human Resources Division - Operating $26,081,909 $26,319,177 Z 1250 100657 Benefits Communication $620,036 $628,275 AA 1300 100606 Risk Management Reserve $24,015,458 $24,051,115 AB 1320 100631 DAS Building Management $53,101,399 $54,715,341 AC 1330 100607 IT Services Delivery $194,935,390 $197,374,206 AD 2100 100612 State Printing $31,450,162 $32,512,922 AE 2290 100630 IT Governance $40,176,321 $40,741,507 AF 2290 100640 Consolidated IT Purchases $28,265,838 $28,265,838 AG 4270 100602 Investment Recovery $1,835,187 $1,891,267 AH 4N60 100617 Major IT Purchases $3,984,131 $3,984,131 AI 5C20 100605 MARCS Administration $35,336,608 $35,689,974 AJ 5EB0 100635 OAKS Support Organization $101,832,561 $104,303,226 AK 5EB0 100656 OAKS Updates and Developments $11,427,405 $11,403,567 AL 5KZ0 100659 Building Improvement $2,276,705 $2,777,458 AM 5LJ0 100661 IT Development $12,839,922 $12,839,922 AN 5PC0 100665 Enterprise Applications $14,160,852 $14,244,654 AO 5WU0 100672 Ohio Benefits $151,980,462 $0 AP Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $797,545,289 $652,297,010 AQ Fiduciary Fund Group AR 5UH0 100670 Enterprise Transactions $1,590,000 $1,640,000 AS Fiduciary Fund Group Total $1,590,000 $1,640,000 AT TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $935,811,436 $804,346,163 Section 207.20. EDCS LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 100413, EDCS Lease Rental Payments, shall be used to make payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Chapter 125. of the Revised Code, as supplemented by Section 701.10 of H.B. 529 of the 132nd General Assembly, as amended by Section 601.10 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly, and other prior acts of the General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the Enterprise Data Center Solutions (EDCS) information technology initiative. MULTI-AGENCY RADIO COMMUNICATION SYSTEM LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 100414, MARCS Lease Rental Payments, shall be used to make payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Chapter 125. of the Revised Code, as supplemented by Section 701.10 of Sub. H.B. 497 of the 130th General Assembly and other prior acts of the General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the Multi-Agency Radio Communications System (MARCS) upgrade. OHIO ADMINISTRATIVE KNOWLEDGE SYSTEM LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 100415, OAKS Lease Rental Payments, shall be used to make payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Chapter 125. of the Revised Code, as supplemented by Section 701.10 of H.B. 529 of the 132nd General Assembly and other prior acts of the General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the Ohio Administrative Knowledge System (OAKS). STATE TAXATION ACCOUNTING AND REVENUE SYSTEM LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 100416, STARS Lease Rental Payments, shall be used to make payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Chapter 125. of the Revised Code, as supplemented by Section 701.30 of H.B. 529 of the 132nd General Assembly and other prior acts of the General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the State Taxation Accounting and Revenue System (STARS). ADMINISTRATIVE BUILDINGS LEASE RENTAL BOND PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 100447, Administrative Buildings Lease Rental Bond Payments, shall be used to meet all payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, by the Department of Administrative Services pursuant to leases and agreements under Chapters 152. and 154. of the Revised Code. These appropriations are the source of funds pledged for bond service charges on related obligations issued under Chapters 152. and 154. of the Revised Code. DAS - BUILDING OPERATING PAYMENTS AND BUILDING MANAGEMENT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 130321, State Agency Support Services, may be used to provide funding for the cost of property appraisals or building studies that the Department of Administrative Services may be required to obtain for property that is being sold by the state or property under consideration to be renovated or purchased by the state. Notwithstanding section 125.28 of the Revised Code, the foregoing appropriation item 130321, State Agency Support Services, also may be used to pay the operating expenses of state facilities maintained by the Department of Administrative Services that are not billed to building tenants, other costs associated with the Voinovich Center in Youngstown, Ohio, or costs of repairing vehicles donated pursuant to section 125.13 of the Revised Code. These expenses may include, but are not limited to, the costs for vacant space and space undergoing renovation, and the rent expenses of tenants that are relocated because of building renovations. These payments may be processed by the Department of Administrative Services through intrastate transfer vouchers and placed into the Building Management Fund (Fund 1320). At least once per year, the portion of appropriation item 130321, State Agency Support Services, that is not used for the regular expenses of the appropriation item may be processed by the Department of Administrative Services through intrastate transfer voucher and placed in the Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0). Section 207.30. PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT FUND Of the foregoing appropriation item 100610, Professional Development, up to $1,400,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to make payments from the Professional Development Fund (Fund 5L70) under section 124.182 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 100610, Professional Development, up to $1,200,000 during the FY 2026-FY 2027 biennium may be used by the Director of Administrative Services for the creation, staffing, and administration of the Ohio Digital Academy. The Ohio Digital Academy shall exist to generate high-tech workforce capacity and serve the state of Ohio in advanced technology and cybersecurity needs. The goals of the Ohio Digital Academy shall be to educate, train, and subsequently employ analysts in completing boot camps, certifications, or degree programs in cybersecurity, coding, software engineering, user experience designers, and related fields. In consultation with CyberOhio, the Department of Administrative Services shall have full authority to select qualified candidates for the Ohio Digital Academy. Candidates shall be subject to all applicable background checks and if selected, shall be required to commit to three years of service with the state of Ohio. Ohio Digital Academy candidates may be placed in an unclassified, administrative staff position pursuant to division (A)(30) of section 124.11 of the Revised Code for which the Director of Administrative Services is hereby given specific authority to set compensation, or with other public or private employers identified by the Department with which a partnership agreement has been established. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department may use the foregoing appropriation to reimburse selected students' tuition expenses for coursework, certification achieved, or other necessary expenses, prior to acceptance in the program, which is directly attributable to the targeted skills of the program if completed within one year prior to the effective date of this section. Upon hiring, candidates shall also be eligible for reimbursement of costs for continuing education or certification at the discretion of the Director to support the development of specialized skills in the areas of information technology and cybersecurity. Each candidate shall be responsible for any tax implications associated with the tuition. The Department reserves the right to recover all or a portion of funds provided to an Ohio Digital Academy participant who fails to complete the agreed upon three years of service commitment to the state. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Department of Administrative Services may select and enter into a subgrant agreement with a regionally accredited Ohio institution of higher education with demonstrated significant coursework and programming in cybersecurity to serve as a Digital Analyst Training Academy (D.A.T.A.) Center. The Center shall be responsible for paying for costs associated with the work of the Ohio Digital Academy as designated by the Department of Administrative Services. On behalf of the Center, the selected institution shall do all the following: (A) Provide necessary educational coursework or training for the selected students' successful completion of a certificate or degree program as prescribed by the Department of Administrative Services at no cost to the selected students; (B) Administer weekly professional development programs for students in an academic setting; (C) Prepare analysts for summer mandatory recruit training as prescribed by the Department of Administrative Services; (D) Coordinate and manage summer scenarios; (E) Submit a quarterly report to the Department of Administrative Services that contains detailed information on the amount of grant funds expended for the aforementioned purposes; (F) Submit an annual report to the Department of Administrative Services of all achievements, including a status report of all expenditures, number of students enrolled by program area, number of students graduated or certifications achieved by program area, program expansion opportunities, and projected costs to continue operating the Center. Additional Centers may be added over the biennium subject to the approval of the Director of Administrative Services. 9-1-1 PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 100663, 9-1-1 Program, shall be used by the Department of Administrative Services to pay the administrative and educational costs of the Statewide Emergency Services Internet Protocol Network program. EMPLOYEE EDUCATIONAL DEVELOPMENT The foregoing appropriation item 100619, Employee Educational Development, shall be used to make payments from the Employee Educational Development Fund (Fund 5V60) under section 124.86 of the Revised Code. The fund shall be used to pay the costs of administering educational programs under existing collective bargaining agreements with District 1199, the Health Care and Social Service Union, Service Employees International Union; State Council of Professional Educators; Ohio Education Association and National Education Association; the Fraternal Order of Police State of Ohio, Unit 2 Association; and the Ohio State Troopers Association, Units 1 and 15. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 207.40. GENERAL SERVICE CHARGES The Department of Administrative Services, with the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, shall establish charges for recovering the costs of administering the programs funded by the General Services Fund (Fund 1170) and the State Printing Fund (Fund 2100). COLLECTIVE BARGAINING ARBITRATION EXPENSES The Department of Administrative Services may seek reimbursement from state agencies for the actual costs and expenses the Department incurs in the collective bargaining arbitration process. The reimbursements shall be processed through intrastate transfer vouchers and credited to the Human Resources Services Fund (Fund 1250). RISK MANAGEMENT RESERVE The foregoing appropriation item 100606, Risk Management Reserve, shall be used to make payments from the Risk Management Reserve Fund (Fund 1300) pursuant to section 9.823 of the Revised Code. CONSOLIDATED IT PURCHASES The foregoing appropriation item 100640, Consolidated IT Purchases, shall be used by the Department of Administrative Services acting as the purchasing agent for one or more government entities under the authority of division (G) of section 125.18 of the Revised Code to make information technology purchases at a lower aggregate cost than each individual government entity could have obtained independently for that information technology purchase. INVESTMENT RECOVERY FUND Notwithstanding division (B) of section 125.14 of the Revised Code, cash balances in the Investment Recovery Fund (Fund 4270) may be used to support the operating expenses of the Federal Surplus Operating Program created in sections 125.84 to 125.90 of the Revised Code. MAJOR IT PURCHASES CHARGES Upon the request of the Director of Administrative Services, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $2,000,000 cash in each fiscal year of the amount collected for statewide indirect costs attributable to debt service paid for the enterprise data center solutions project from the General Revenue Fund to the Major Information Technology Purchases Fund (Fund 4N60). MARCS ADMINISTRATION Of the foregoing appropriation item 100605, MARCS Administration, $10,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to reduce MARCS subscriber fees paid by villages, municipal corporations, townships, counties, and regional public safety and first response agencies. PROFESSIONS LICENSING SYSTEM The foregoing appropriation item, 100673, Ohio Professionals Licensing System, shall be used to purchase the equipment, products, and services necessary to update and maintain an automated licensing system for the professional licensing boards. The Department of Administrative Services shall establish charges for recovering the costs of ongoing maintenance of the system that are not otherwise recovered under section 125.18 of the Revised Code. The charges shall be proportionate to each benefiting state agency, board, or commission's use of the system. For agencies, boards, or commissions whose operations are not funded by appropriations from the Occupational Licensing and Regulatory Fund (Fund 4K90), the Director of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management these entities' proportionate charges for use of the state's enterprise electronic licensing system. The Director of Budget and Management shall transfer cash equaling the certified amounts from these entities' respective operating funds into the Occupational Licensing and Regulatory Fund (Fund 4K90). On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the State Board of Education shall consult with the Department of Administrative Services on the utilization of the Ohio Professional Licensing System. As part of this consultation, the State Board of Education shall consider opportunities to reduce the number of license and certification types. Section 207.45. BUILDING IMPROVEMENT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 100659, Building Improvement, shall be used to make payments from the Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) for major maintenance or improvements required in facilities maintained by the Department of Administrative Services. The Department of Administrative Services shall conduct or contract for regular assessments of these buildings and may maintain a cash balance in Fund 5KZ0 equal to the cost of the repairs and improvements that are recommended to occur within the next five years, with the following exception described below. Upon request of the Director of Administrative Services, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from Fund 5KZ0 to the Building Management Fund (Fund 1320) to pay costs of operating and maintaining facilities managed by the Department of Administrative Services that are not charged to tenants during the same fiscal year. Should the cash balance in Fund 1320 be determined to be sufficient, the Director of Administrative Services may request that the Director of Budget and Management transfer cash from Fund 1320 to Fund 5KZ0 in an amount equal to the initial cash transfer made under this section. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT The foregoing appropriation item 100661, IT Development, shall be used by the Department of Administrative Services to pay the costs of modernizing the state's information technology management and investment practices away from a limited, agency-specific focus in favor of a statewide methodology supporting development of enterprise solutions. This appropriation item may be used to pay the costs of enterprise information technology initiatives affecting state agencies or their customers. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Administrative Services, with the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, may charge state agencies an information technology development assessment based on state agencies' information technology expenditures or other methodology and may assess fees or charges to entities that are not state agencies to offset the cost of specific technology events or services. The revenue from these assessments, fees, or charges shall be deposited into the Information Technology Development Fund (Fund 5LJ0), which is hereby created. ENTERPRISE APPLICATIONS The foregoing appropriation item 100665, Enterprise Applications, shall be used for the operation and management of information technology applications that support state agencies' objectives. Charges billed to benefiting agencies shall be deposited to the credit of the Enterprise Applications Fund (Fund 5PC0). Section 207.50. ENTERPRISE IT STRATEGY IMPLEMENTATION The Director of Administrative Services shall determine and implement strategies that benefit the enterprise by improving efficiency, reducing costs, or enhancing capacity of information technology (IT) services. Such improvements and efficiencies may result in the consolidation and transfer of such services. As determined to be necessary for successful implementation of this section and notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Administrative Services may request the Director of Budget and Management to consolidate or transfer IT-specific budget authority between agencies or within an agency as necessary to implement enterprise IT cost containment strategies and related efficiencies. Once the Director of Budget and Management is satisfied that the proposed initiative is cost advantageous to the enterprise, the Director of Budget and Management may request Controlling Board approval to transfer appropriations, funds, and cash to implement the proposed initiative. The establishment of any new fund or additional appropriation as a result of this section shall also be subject to Controlling Board approval. The Director of Budget and Management and the Director of Administrative Services may transfer any employees, assets, and liabilities, including, but not limited to, records, contracts, and agreements in order to facilitate the improvements determined in accordance with this section. Section 209.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AGE DEPARTMENT OF AGING B General Revenue Fund C GRF 490321 Operating Expenses $1,944,405 $2,033,308 D GRF 490410 Long-Term Care Ombudsman $3,117,148 $3,122,195 E GRF 490411 Senior Community Services $11,257,903 $11,295,146 F GRF 490414 Alzheimer's and Other Dementia Respite $4,300,000 $4,300,000 G GRF 490510 Community Projects $485,000 $0 H GRF 656423 Long-Term Care Budget – State $5,222,431 $5,339,477 I General Revenue Fund Total $26,326,887 $26,090,126 J Dedicated Purpose Fund Group K 4800 490606 Senior Community Outreach and Education $150,000 $150,000 L 4C40 490609 Regional Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program $1,000,000 $1,000,000 M 5BA0 490620 Long-Term Care Quality Initiatives $12,417,919 $12,417,919 N 5K90 490613 Long-Term Care Consumers Guide $1,770,000 $1,780,000 O 5MT0 490627 Board of Executives of Long-Term Services and Supports $850,000 $875,000 P 5T40 656625 Health Care Grants - State $695,940 $695,939 Q 5W10 490616 Resident Services Coordinator Program $262,500 $262,500 R Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $17,146,359 $17,181,358 S Federal Fund Group T 3220 490618 Federal Aging Grants $10,500,000 $10,500,000 U 3C40 656623 Long-Term Care Budget - Federal $7,462,626 $7,979,625 V 3M40 490612 Federal Independence Services $66,495,000 $69,820,000 W Federal Fund Group Total $84,457,626 $88,299,625 X TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $127,930,872 $131,571,109 Section 209.20. LONG-TERM CARE Pursuant to an interagency agreement, the Department of Medicaid may designate the Department of Aging to perform assessments under section 5165.04 of the Revised Code. The Department of Aging shall provide long-term care consultations under section 173.42 of the Revised Code to assist individuals in planning for their long-term health care needs. The Department of Aging shall administer the Medicaid waiver-funded PASSPORT Home Care Program, the Assisted Living Program, and PACE as delegated by the Department of Medicaid in an interagency agreement. PERFORMANCE-BASED REIMBURSEMENT In order to improve health outcomes among populations served by PASSPORT administrative agencies, the Department of Aging, through rules adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may design and utilize a payment method for PASSPORT administrative agency operations that includes a pay-for-performance incentive component that is earned by a PASSPORT administrative agency when defined consumer and policy outcomes are achieved. Prior to filing with the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review, as provided in section 119.03 of the Revised Code, a proposed rule related to a payment method that includes a pay-for-performance incentive component, the Department shall submit a report to the Legislative Service Commission outlining the payment method. Section 209.30. MYCARE OHIO The authority of the Office of the State Long-Term Care Ombudsman as described in sections 173.14 to 173.28 of the Revised Code extends to MyCare Ohio during the period of the federal financial alignment demonstration program. SENIOR COMMUNITY SERVICES Of the foregoing appropriation item 490411, Senior Community Services, $150,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Iconnect Program, administered by the Neighborhood Centers Association in Richland, Medina, Lorain, and Cuyahoga Counties. The remainder of appropriation item 490411, Senior Community Services, may be used for programs, services, and activities designated by the Department of Aging, including, but not limited to, home-delivered meals, congregate dining, transportation, personal care, respite, adult day services, home maintenance and chores, minor home modification, case management, evidence-based disease prevention and health promotion, and information assistance. Funds may also be used to provide grants to community organizations to support and expand older adult programming. Services priority shall be given to low-income, high-need persons, and/or persons with a cognitive impairment who are sixty years of age or over. The Department shall not use any of these funds for administrative expenses. COMMUNITY PROJECTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 490510, Community Projects, $285,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to Jewish Family Services to support Ohio's Holocaust survivors. Of the foregoing appropriation item 490510, Community Projects, $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to the Benjamin Rose Institute on Aging. These funds shall be used to provide services to disadvantaged seniors that address food insecurity, mental health, and financial literacy. BOARD OF EXECUTIVES OF LONG-TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS The foregoing appropriation item 490627, Board of Executives of Long-Term Services and Supports, may be used by the Board of Executives of Long-Term Services and Supports to administer and enforce Chapter 4751. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under it. Section 211.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AGR DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 700401 Animal Health Programs $8,683,000 $8,893,400 D GRF 700403 Dairy Division $1,569,000 $1,613,000 E GRF 700406 Consumer Protection Lab $1,880,000 $1,906,000 F GRF 700407 Food Safety $1,705,000 $1,752,000 G GRF 700410 Plant Industry $542,000 $594,000 H GRF 700412 Weights and Measures $825,000 $849,000 I GRF 700415 Poultry Inspection $1,597,500 $1,619,500 J GRF 700418 Livestock Regulation Program $1,600,000 $1,649,000 K GRF 700424 Livestock Testing and Inspections $135,000 $138,000 L GRF 700426 Dangerous Animals and Emergency Management $708,000 $716,000 M GRF 700427 High Volume Breeder Kennel Control $1,545,000 $1,553,000 N GRF 700428 Soil and Water Division $4,679,000 $4,857,000 O GRF 700499 Meat Inspection Program - State Share $8,080,000 $8,304,000 P GRF 700501 County Agricultural Societies $1,130,000 $630,000 Q GRF 700509 Soil and Water District Support $12,527,000 $12,533,000 R GRF 700511 Ride Inspection $779,000 $801,000 S GRF 700674 Plant Testing $247,000 $218,000 T General Revenue Fund Total $48,231,500 $48,625,900 U Dedicated Purpose Fund Group V 4900 700651 License Plates - Sustainable Agriculture $16,800 $16,800 W 4940 700612 Agricultural Commodity Marketing Program $125,000 $125,000 X 4960 700626 Ohio Grape Industries $1,200,000 $1,200,000 Y 4970 700627 Grain Warehouse Program $500,000 $500,000 Z 4C90 700605 Commercial Feed and Seed $2,273,000 $2,329,000 AA 4D20 700609 Auction Education $53,000 $54,000 AB 4E40 700606 Utility Radiological Safety $136,000 $142,000 AC 4P70 700610 Food Safety Inspection $1,353,000 $1,396,000 AD 4R00 700636 Ohio Proud Marketing $25,000 $25,000 AE 4R20 700637 Dairy Industry Inspection $1,751,000 $1,787,000 AF 4T60 700611 Poultry and Meat Inspection $113,500 $117,000 AG 5780 700620 Ride Inspection $1,245,000 $1,273,000 AH 5B80 700629 Auctioneers $230,000 $236,000 AI 5BV0 700660 Heidelberg Water Quality Lab $275,000 $275,000 AJ 5BV0 700661 Soil and Water Districts $10,507,000 $10,509,000 AK 5FC0 700648 Plant Pest Program $1,200,000 $1,200,000 AL 5H20 700608 Metrology Lab and Scale Certification $1,194,000 $1,240,000 AM 5L80 700604 Livestock Management Program $186,800 $189,800 AN 5MR0 700658 Commercial Dog Breeding $450,000 $465,000 AO 5MS0 700659 Animal and Consumer Protection $8,400 $8,400 AP 5QW0 700653 Watershed Assistance $857,000 $832,000 AQ 5WJ0 700671 Hemp Program $367,000 $375,000 AR 6520 700634 Animal, Consumer, and ATL Labs $8,483,900 $8,328,800 AS 6690 700635 Pesticide, Fertilizer, and Lime Inspection Program $4,533,000 $4,649,000 AT 6H20 700670 H2Ohio $53,600,000 $53,600,000 AU Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $90,683,400 $90,872,800 AV Internal Service Activity Fund Group AW 5DA0 700644 Laboratory Administration Support $1,300,000 $1,339,000 AX 5GH0 700655 Administrative Support $7,614,000 $7,990,000 AY Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $8,914,000 $9,329,000 AZ Capital Projects Fund Group BA 7057 700632 Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Operating $512,000 $515,000 BB Capital Projects Fund Group Total $512,000 $515,000 BC Federal Fund Group BD 3260 700618 Meat Inspection Program - Federal Share $5,891,000 $6,133,000 BE 3360 700617 Ohio Farm Loan - Revolving $317,000 $200,000 BF 3820 700601 Federal Cooperative Contracts $11,612,000 $9,669,000 BG 3J40 700607 Federal Administrative Programs $2,000,000 $2,055,000 BH 3R20 700614 Federal Plant Industry $6,843,000 $7,189,000 BI Federal Fund Group Total $26,663,000 $25,246,000 BJ TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $175,003,900 $174,588,700 Section 211.20. COUNTY AGRICULTURAL SOCIETIES Of the foregoing appropriation item 700501, County Agricultural Societies, up to $380,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to reimburse county and independent agricultural societies for expenses related to Junior Fair activities. Of the foregoing appropriation item 700501, County Agricultural Societies, up to $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Future Farmers of America, urban agriculture, and agriculture literacy programs around the state. Of the foregoing appropriation item 700501, County Agricultural Societies, $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to support the construction of the Mercer County Fairgrounds Grand Events Center. SUPPORT FOR SOIL AND WATER DISTRICTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 700509, Soil and Water District Support, $4,200,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support county soil and water conservation districts in priority regions as defined by the director of Agriculture, for staffing costs and to assist in soil testing and nutrient management plan development, including manure transformation and manure conversion technologies, enhanced filter strips, water management, and H2Ohio Program support. SOIL AND WATER DISTRICTS In addition to state payments to soil and water conservation districts authorized by section 940.15 of the Revised Code, the Department of Agriculture may use appropriation item 700661, Soil and Water Districts, to pay any soil and water conservation district an annual amount not to exceed $40,000 upon receipt of a request and justification from the district and approval by the Ohio Soil and Water Conservation Commission. The county auditor shall credit the payments to the special fund established under section 940.12 of the Revised Code for use by the local soil and water conservation district. The amounts received by each district shall be expended for the purposes of the district. H2OHIO FUND The Department of Agriculture shall establish programs to assist in reducing total phosphorus, dissolved reactive phosphorus, sediment, and other nutrients in the Western Lake Erie Basin and other critical regions in the state as defined by the Director of Agriculture. The foregoing appropriation item 700670, H2Ohio, shall be used to support the programs described above, which may include, but not be limited to, the following: (1) equipment for subsurface placement of nutrients into the soil; (2) equipment for nutrient placement based on geographic information system data; (3) soil testing; (4) implementation of variable rate technology; (5) equipment implementing manure transformation and manure conversion technologies; (6) tributary monitoring; (7) best management practices recognized to reduce nutrients; (8) a revolving loan program; and (9) matching funds for the Conservation Reserve Enhancement Program. CLEAN OHIO AGRICULTURAL EASEMENT OPERATING EXPENSES The foregoing appropriation item 700632, Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Operating, shall be used by the Department of Agriculture in administering Clean Ohio Agricultural Easement Fund (Fund 7057) projects pursuant to sections 901.21, 901.22, and 5301.67 to 5301.70 of the Revised Code. Section 213.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AIR AIR QUALITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4Z90 898602 Small Business Ombudsman $246,000 $248,000 D 5700 898601 Operating Expenses $3,600,000 $4,300,000 E 5A00 898603 Small Business Assistance $150,000 $225,000 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $3,996,000 $4,773,000 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $3,996,000 $4,773,000 Section 213.20. REIMBURSEMENT TO AIR QUALITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY TRUST ACCOUNT Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Air Quality Development Authority may reimburse the Air Quality Development Authority trust account established under section 3706.10 of the Revised Code from all operating funds of the agency for expenses pertaining to the administration and shared costs incurred by the Air Quality Development Authority in the execution of responsibilities as prescribed in Chapter 3706. of the Revised Code. The reimbursement shall occur in accordance with an administrative cost recovery plan approved by the Air Quality Development Authority Board. Section 215.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ARC ARCHITECTS BOARDS B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 891609 Operating $674,000 $690,001 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $674,000 $690,001 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $674,000 $690,001 Section 217.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ART OHIO ARTS COUNCIL B General Revenue Fund C GRF 370321 Operating Expenses $3,172,595 $3,243,201 D GRF 370502 State Program Subsidies $23,538,000 $23,538,000 E General Revenue Fund Total $26,710,595 $26,781,201 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group G 4600 370602 Arts Council Program Support $345,000 $345,000 H 4B70 370603 Percent For Art Acquisitions $165,000 $0 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $510,000 $345,000 J Federal Fund Group K 3140 370601 Federal Support $1,350,000 $1,350,000 L Federal Fund Group Total $1,350,000 $1,350,000 M TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $28,570,595 $28,476,201 Section 217.20. FEDERAL SUPPORT Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the foregoing appropriation item 370601, Federal Support, shall be used by the Ohio Arts Council for subsidies only, and not for its administrative costs, unless the Council is required to use a portion of the funds for administrative costs under conditions of the federal grant. Section 219.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ATH ATHLETIC COMMISSION B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 175609 Operating Expenses $367,022 $371,995 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $367,022 $371,995 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $367,022 $371,995 Section 221.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AGO ATTORNEY GENERAL B General Revenue Fund C GRF 055321 Operating Expenses $97,290,225 $97,290,225 D GRF 055405 Law-Related Education $68,000 $68,000 E GRF 055406 BCIRS Lease Rental Payments $2,450,000 $2,450,000 F GRF 055411 County Sheriffs' Pay Supplement $1,111,257 $1,130,685 G GRF 055415 County Prosecutors' Pay Supplement $1,476,937 $1,502,753 H GRF 055431 Drug Abuse Response Team Grants $0 $1,500,000 I GRF 055432 Drug Testing Equipment $964,000 $964,000 J GRF 055434 Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force $500,000 $500,000 K GRF 055441 Victims of Crime $6,700,000 $5,700,000 L GRF 055446 Cyber Crime Division $1,000,000 $1,000,000 M GRF 055501 Rape Crisis Centers $15,300,000 $15,300,000 N GRF 055502 School Safety Training Grants $10,000,000 $10,000,000 O GRF 055504 Domestic Violence Programs $10,000,000 $10,000,000 P GRF 055505 Pike County Capital Case $600,000 $0 Q GRF 055509 Law Enforcement Training $30,000,000 $35,000,000 R General Revenue Fund Total $177,460,419 $182,405,663 S Dedicated Purpose Fund Group T 1060 055612 Attorney General Operating $63,216,225 $64,034,683 U 4020 055616 Victims of Crime $11,500,000 $12,000,000 V 4170 055621 Domestic Violence Shelter $25,000 $25,000 W 4180 055615 Charitable Foundations $11,500,000 $11,000,000 X 4190 055623 Claims Section $77,520,063 $86,393,854 Y 4190 055668 Collections System Lease Rental Payments $4,165,000 $4,165,000 Z 4200 055603 Attorney General Antitrust $1,500,000 $0 AA 4210 055617 Police Officers' Training Academy Fee $3,555,387 $3,528,018 AB 4L60 055606 DARE Programs $2,308,099 $2,310,841 AC 4Y70 055608 Title Defect Recision $1,032,267 $1,038,534 AD 4Z20 055609 BCI Asset Forfeiture and Cost Reimbursement $2,000,000 $2,000,000 AE 5900 055633 Peace Officer Private Security Training $101,306 $103,330 AF 5A90 055618 Telemarketing Fraud Enforcement $10,000 $10,000 AG 5LR0 055655 Peace Officer Training - Casino $7,726,217 $8,183,287 AH 5TL0 055659 Organized Crime Law Enforcement Trust $100,000 $100,000 AI 5TZ0 055610 Drug Abuse Response Team Grants $1,800,000 $0 AJ 5TZ0 055614 Narcotics Task Forces $500,000 $500,000 AK 5VL0 055435 Stop Bullying License Plate $2,500 $2,500 AL 6310 055637 Consumer Protection Enforcement $10,500,000 $11,000,000 AM 6590 055641 Solid and Hazardous Waste Background Investigations $359,895 $367,319 AN U087 055402 Tobacco Settlement Oversight, Administration, and Enforcement $2,500,000 $2,500,000 AO Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $201,921,959 $209,262,366 AP Internal Service Activity Fund Group AQ 1950 055660 Workers' Compensation Section $9,570,750 $9,905,726 AR Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $9,570,750 $9,905,726 AS Holding Account Fund Group AT 5BY1 055674 Charitable Law Distributions $750,000 $750,000 AU R004 055631 General Holding Account $1,000,000 $1,000,000 AV R005 055632 Antitrust Settlements $1,000,000 $1,000,000 AW R018 055630 Consumer Frauds $1,000,000 $1,000,000 AX R042 055601 Organized Crime Commission Distributions $750,000 $750,000 AY R054 055650 Collection Payment Redistribution $4,500,000 $4,500,000 AZ Holding Account Fund Group Total $9,000,000 $9,000,000 BA Federal Fund Group BB 3060 055620 Medicaid Fraud Control $17,059,070 $17,887,905 BC 3830 055634 Crime Victims Assistance $40,000,000 $40,000,000 BD 3E50 055638 Attorney General Pass-Through Funds $8,020,999 $8,020,999 BE 3FV0 055656 Crime Victim Compensation $7,200,000 $7,400,000 BF 3R60 055613 Attorney General Federal Funds $5,500,000 $5,500,000 BG Federal Fund Group Total $77,780,069 $78,808,904 BH TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $475,733,197 $489,382,659 Section 221.20. OHIO CENTER FOR THE FUTURE OF FORENSIC SCIENCE Of the foregoing appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, $650,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for the Ohio Center for the Future of Forensic Science at Bowling Green State University. The purpose of the Center shall be to foster forensic science research techniques (BCI Eminent Scholar) and to create professional training opportunities to students (BCI Scholars) in the forensic science fields. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, $100,000 in each fiscal year may be used by the Attorney General for the purpose of providing funding to domestic violence programs as defined in section 109.46 of the Revised Code. BUREAU OF CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION RECORDS SYSTEM (BCIRS) LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 055406, BCIRS Lease Rental Payments, shall be used for payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into pursuant to Section 701.40 of S.B. 310 of the 131st General Assembly and other prior acts of the General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the BCIRS. COUNTY SHERIFFS' PAY SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 055411, County Sheriffs' Pay Supplement, shall be used for the purpose of supplementing the annual compensation of county sheriffs as required by section 325.06 of the Revised Code. At the request of the Attorney General, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer appropriation from appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, to appropriation item 055411, County Sheriffs' Pay Supplement. Any appropriation so transferred shall be used to supplement the annual compensation of county sheriffs as required by section 325.06 of the Revised Code. COUNTY PROSECUTORS' PAY SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 055415, County Prosecutors' Pay Supplement, shall be used for the purpose of supplementing the annual compensation of certain county prosecutors as required by section 325.111 of the Revised Code. At the request of the Attorney General, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer appropriation from appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, to appropriation item 055415, County Prosecutors' Pay Supplement. Any appropriation so transferred shall be used to supplement the annual compensation of county prosecutors as required by section 325.111 of the Revised Code. DRUG ABUSE RESPONSE TEAM GRANT PROGRAM The Attorney General shall maintain the Drug Abuse Response Team Grant Program for the purpose of replicating or expanding successful law enforcement programs that address the opioid epidemic similar to the Drug Abuse Response Team established by the Lucas County Sheriff's Department, and the Quick Response Teams established in Colerain Township's Department of Public Safety in Hamilton County and Summit County. Any grants awarded by this grant program may include requirements for private or nonprofit matching support. The foregoing appropriation items 055431, Drug Abuse Response Team Grants, and 055610, Drug Abuse Response Team Grants, shall be used by the Attorney General to fund grants to law enforcement or other government agencies; the primary purpose of the grants shall be to replicate or expand successful law enforcement programs that address the opioid epidemic similar to the Drug Abuse Response Team established by the Lucas County Sheriff's Department and the Quick Response Teams established in Colerain Township's Department of Public Safety in Hamilton County and Summit County. Each recipient of a grant under this program shall, within six months of the end date of the grant, submit a written report describing the outcomes that resulted from the grant to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. DRUG TESTING EQUIPMENT The foregoing appropriation item 055432, Drug Testing Equipment, shall be used to purchase, operate, and maintain drug testing equipment for the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Investigation. INTERNET CRIMES AGAINST CHILDREN TASK FORCE The foregoing appropriation item 055434, Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force, shall be used by the Attorney General in support of the Ohio Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force for the purposes described in section 195.02 of the Revised Code. VICTIMS OF CRIME The foregoing appropriation item 055441, Victims of Crime, shall be allocated to the Crime Victim Services Section. Prior to using the funds from this appropriation item, the Attorney General shall, to the extent possible, first use funds related to the federal Victims of Crime Act. CLEVELAND RAPE CRISIS CENTER Of the foregoing appropriation item 055501, Rape Crisis Centers, $300,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Cleveland Rape Crisis Center to provide services for at-risk youth through the Cleveland Rape Crisis Center Human Trafficking Drop-in Center. SCHOOL SAFETY TRAINING GRANTS (A) The foregoing appropriation item 055502, School Safety Training Grants, shall be used by the Attorney General, in consultation with the Director of Education and Workforce and the Director of Behavioral Health, solely to make grants to public and chartered nonpublic schools, educational service centers, local law enforcement agencies, and schools operated by county boards of developmental disabilities administering special education services programs pursuant to section 5126.05 of the Revised Code for school safety and school climate programs and training. (B) The use of the grants includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (1) The support of school resource officer certification training; (2) Any type of active shooter and school safety training or equipment; (3) All grade level type educational resources; (4) Training to identify and assist students with mental health issues; (5) School supplies or equipment related to school safety or for implementing the school's safety plan; (6) Any other training, supplies, services, or equipment related to school safety. (C) The schools, educational service centers, and county boards shall work or contract with the county sheriff's office or a local police department in whose jurisdiction they are located to develop the programs and training described in divisions (B)(1), (2), (3), (5), and (6) of this section. Any grant awarded directly to a local law enforcement agency, or to a nonprofit or charitable law enforcement training organization on the law enforcement agency's behalf, shall not be used to fund a similar request made by a school located within the jurisdiction of the local law enforcement agency. (D) The Attorney General is authorized to make payments directly to school or law enforcement nonprofit or charitable training organizations on behalf of any public and chartered nonpublic schools, educational service centers, local law enforcement agencies, and schools operated by county boards of developmental disabilities administering special education services. (E) As used in this section, "public school" means any school operated by a school district board of education, any community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and any STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE PROGRAMS The foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, shall be used by the Attorney General for the purpose of funding domestic violence programs as defined in section 109.46 of the Revised Code. FINDING MY CHILDHOOD AGAIN PILOT PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, $300,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Battered Women's Shelter of Summit and Medina counties for expenses related to the creation and implementation of a pilot program called "Finding my Childhood Again." BATTERED WOMEN'S SHELTER Of the foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Battered Women's Shelter of Summit and Medina counties for the cost of operating the commercial kitchen located at its Market Street Facility, and $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Battered Women's Shelter of Portage County. TRANSPORTATION GRANTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 055504, Domestic Violence Programs, $25,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be provided as grants to Ohio domestic violence shelters to buy transportation vouchers, ridesharing credits, or gas cards for eligible clients. The Attorney General shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of the grant program. PIKE COUNTY CAPITAL CASE An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 055505, Pike County Capital Case, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 055505, Pike County Capital Case, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING The foregoing appropriation item 055509, Law Enforcement Training, shall be used by the Attorney General for state funding of the training of peace officers and troopers that is required under section 109.803 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 055509, Law Enforcement Training, the Attorney General may use up to $150,000 in each fiscal year for administrative expenses associated with the program, including curriculum development. ATTORNEY GENERAL COLLECTIONS SYSTEM LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 055668, Collections System Lease Rental Payments, shall be used to make payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Section 701.10 of S.B. 310 of the 133rd General Assembly or Section 709.01 of H.B. 687 of the 134th General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the Attorney General New Collection System. NARCOTICS TASK FORCES The foregoing appropriation item 055614, Narcotics Task Forces, shall be used to support narcotics task forces funded by the Attorney General. WORKERS' COMPENSATION SECTION The Workers' Compensation Fund (Fund 1950) is entitled to receive quarterly payments from the Bureau of Workers' Compensation and the Ohio Industrial Commission to fund legal services provided to the Bureau of Workers' Compensation and the Ohio Industrial Commission during the fiscal year. In addition, the Bureau of Workers' Compensation shall transfer payments for the support of the Workers' Compensation Fraud Unit. All amounts shall be mutually agreed upon by the Attorney General, the Bureau of Workers' Compensation, and the Ohio Industrial Commission. GENERAL HOLDING ACCOUNT The foregoing appropriation item 055631, General Holding Account, shall be used to distribute moneys under the terms of relevant court orders or other settlements received in a variety of cases involving the Office of the Attorney General. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. ANTITRUST SETTLEMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 055632, Antitrust Settlements, shall be used to distribute moneys under the terms of relevant court orders or other out-of-court settlements in antitrust cases or antitrust matters involving the Office of the Attorney General. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. CHARITABLE SETTLEMENT HOLDING ACCOUNT The foregoing appropriation item 055674, Charitable Settlement Holding Account, shall be used to distribute money in the Charitable Settlements Holding Account Fund (Fund 5BY1), which is created in the state treasury, under the terms of relevant court orders or other settlements received in the charitable law cases involving the Office of the Attorney General. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Attorney General shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of cash receipts related to settlements received in charitable law cases and credited to the General Holding Account (Fund R004). The Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the amounts certified to the Charitable Settlements Holding Account Fund (Fund 5BY1). CONSUMER FRAUDS The foregoing appropriation item 055630, Consumer Frauds, shall be used for distribution of moneys from court-ordered judgments against sellers in actions brought by the Office of the Attorney General under sections 1334.08 and 4549.48 and division (B) of section 1345.07 of the Revised Code. These moneys shall be used to provide restitution to consumers victimized by the fraud that generated the court-ordered judgments. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. ORGANIZED CRIME COMMISSION DISTRIBUTIONS The foregoing appropriation item 055601, Organized Crime Commission Distributions, shall be used by the Organized Crime Investigations Commission, as provided by section 177.011 of the Revised Code, to reimburse political subdivisions for the expenses the political subdivisions incur when their law enforcement officers participate in an organized crime task force and to support the operations of the retail theft task force. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. COLLECTION PAYMENT REDISTRIBUTION The foregoing appropriation item 055650, Collection Payment Redistribution, shall be used for the purpose of allocating the revenue where debtors mistakenly paid the client agencies instead of the Attorney General's Collections Enforcement Section. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, the amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 221.30. On January 15, 2027, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Attorney General shall certify and remit to the Director of Budget and Management the balance of all proceeds received by the state under the settlement agreement in State of Ohio v. McKesson Corp., Case No. CVH20180055 (C.P. Madison Co., settlement agreement of October 7, 2021). Upon certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall remit the amounts certified to the Targeted Addiction Assistance Fund (Fund 5TZ0), created in section 126.67 of the Revised Code. Section 221.40. OHIO COURTS NETWORK Of the foregoing appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses, $4,505,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to fund an initiative by the Attorney General to facilitate the exchange of information and warehousing of data by and between Ohio courts and other justice system partners through the maintenance of an Ohio Courts Network. Courts and the clerks of the court of common pleas, whether elected or appointed, located in counties with a population of not more than 125,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census, are eligible for funding under the initiative. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall cancel any existing encumbrances against appropriation item 005409, Ohio Courts Technology Initiative, used by the Supreme Court of Ohio, and reestablish them against appropriation item 055321, Operating Expenses. The reestablished encumbrance amounts are hereby appropriated. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court of Ohio and the Attorney General, or their designees, shall facilitate the transfer of management and administration of any outstanding grants and all necessary program records or files from the Supreme Court to the Attorney General. Section 223.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A AUD AUDITOR OF STATE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 070401 Audit Management and Services $20,067,887 $16,035,566 D GRF 070402 Performance Audits $3,505,464 $3,257,092 E GRF 070403 Fiscal Distress Technical Assistance $650,000 $650,000 F GRF 070404 Fraud/Corruption Audits and Investigations $4,915,927 $5,534,546 G GRF 070412 Local Government Audit Support $21,000,000 $23,250,000 H General Revenue Fund Total $50,139,278 $48,727,204 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group J 1090 070601 Public Audit Expense - Intrastate $13,737,026 $13,914,164 K 4220 070602 Public Audit Expense - Local Government $33,000,000 $33,000,000 L 5840 070603 Training Program $250,000 $250,000 M 5JZ0 070606 Auditor's Innovation Fund $300,000 $300,000 N 5VP0 070611 Local Government Audit Support Fund $21,000,000 $23,250,000 O 6750 070605 Uniform Accounting Network $7,306,872 $6,804,086 P Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $75,593,898 $77,518,250 Q TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $125,733,176 $126,245,454 Section 223.20. AUDIT MANAGEMENT AND SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 070401, Audit Management and Services, shall be used pursuant to section 117.13 of the Revised Code to support costs of the Auditor of State that are not recovered through charges to local governments and state entities, including costs that cannot be recovered from audit clients under federal indirect cost allocation guidelines. This appropriation item also shall be used to cover costs of the Local Government Services Section that are not charged to clients. Of the foregoing appropriation item 070401, Audit Management and Services, $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to conduct an audit in accordance with Section 751.170 of this act. PERFORMANCE AUDITS The foregoing appropriation item 070402, Performance Audits, shall be used pursuant to section 117.13 of the Revised Code to support costs of the Auditor of State related to the provision of performance audits for local governments, school districts, state agencies, and colleges and universities that are not recovered through charges to those entities, including costs that cannot be recovered from audit clients under federal indirect cost allocation guidelines. Of the foregoing appropriation item 070402, Performance Audits, up to $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to conduct a performance audit of indigent defense services within Ohio. The performance audit shall review the challenges of the delivery of indigent defense services, including, but not limited to, the costs, accounting, and payment processes of the Office of the Public Defender and at least five counties that represent each of the various indigent defense delivery methods in the state. The audit shall be completed and a report submitted to the President and Minority Leader of the Senate and to the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives by January 1, 2027. FISCAL DISTRESS TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item 070403, Fiscal Distress Technical Assistance, shall be used to support costs of the Auditor of State responsibilities under Chapters 118., 3316., and 3345. of the Revised Code to provide services to local governments, schools, or colleges and universities in, or at risk of entering, a state of fiscal caution, watch, or emergency. LOCAL GOVERNMENT AUDIT SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 070412, Local Government Audit Support, shall be used pursuant to section 117.13 of the Revised Code to support costs of the Auditor of State that are not recovered through charges to local governments, including costs that cannot be recovered from audit clients under federal indirect cost allocation guidelines. LOCAL GOVERNMENT AUDIT SUPPORT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 070611, Local Government Audit Support Fund, shall be used pursuant to section 117.131 of the Revised Code to offset costs of audits that would otherwise be charged to local public offices in the absence of the fund. Section 229.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A OBM OFFICE OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT B General Revenue Fund C GRF 042321 Operating Expenses $4,400,000 $4,592,000 D GRF 042435 Gubernatorial Transition $0 $250,000 E General Revenue Fund Total $4,400,000 $4,842,000 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group G 5AY1 042509 One Time Strategic Community Investments $2,000,000 $0 H Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $2,000,000 $0 I Internal Service Activity Fund Group J 1050 042603 Financial Management $27,744,976 $28,843,309 K Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $27,744,976 $28,843,309 L Fiduciary Fund Group M 5EH0 042604 Forgery Recovery $30,000 $30,000 N Fiduciary Fund Group Total $30,000 $30,000 O TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $34,174,976 $33,715,309 Section 229.30. ONE TIME STRATEGIC COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, shall be used by the Office of Budget and Management to provide grants for the projects listed in this section in the amounts listed. Prior to disbursing a grant to a recipient, the Office of Budget and Management shall enter into a grant agreement with the recipient. As part of the grant agreement, the recipient shall agree to complete a final report, in a form and manner to be prescribed by the Office of Budget and Management, detailing how the recipient used the grant and submit the report to the Office of Budget and Management. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. 1 2 A Project Amount B Say Yes Cleveland $750,000 C University Circle $250,000 D Cleveland Neighborhood Progress for the Middle Neighborhood Investment Project $500,000 E Great Lakes Science Center $500,000 AUDIT COSTS All centralized audit costs associated with either Single Audit Schedules or financial statements prepared in conformance with generally accepted accounting principles for the state shall be paid from the foregoing appropriation item 042603, Financial Management. Costs associated with the audit of the Auditor of State shall be paid from the foregoing appropriation item 042321, Operating Expenses. SHARED SERVICES CENTER The foregoing appropriation item 042603, Financial Management, shall be used by the Director of Budget and Management to support the Shared Services program pursuant to division (D) of section 126.21 of the Revised Code. The Director of Budget and Management shall include the recovery of costs to operate the Shared Services program in the accounting and budgeting services payroll rate and through direct charges using intrastate transfer vouchers billed to agencies for services rendered using a methodology determined by the Director of Budget and Management. Such cost recovery revenues shall be deposited to the credit of the Accounting and Budgeting Fund (Fund 1050). INTERNAL AUDIT The Director of Budget and Management shall include the recovery of costs to operate the Internal Audit Program pursuant to section 126.45 of the Revised Code in the accounting and budgeting services payroll rate using a methodology determined by the Director of Budget and Management. Such cost recovery revenues shall be deposited to the credit of Fund 1050. FORGERY RECOVERY The foregoing appropriation item 042604, Forgery Recovery, shall be used to reissue warrants that have been certified as forgeries by the rightful recipient as determined by the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Investigation and the Treasurer of State. Upon receipt of funds to cover the reissuance of the warrant, the Director of Budget and Management shall reissue a state warrant of the same amount. Any additional amounts needed to reissue warrants backed by the receipt of funds are hereby appropriated. Section 229.40. CULTURAL, SPORTS, AND MAJOR SPORTS FACILITIES PERFORMANCE GRANTS On January 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, of the unclaimed funds and interest that escheat to the state under division (I) of section 169.08 of the Revised Code, the Director of Commerce shall remit $1,000,000,000 to the state treasury for deposit into the Ohio Cultural and Sports Facility Performance Grant Fund (Fund 5CY1). Notwithstanding section 123.282 or division (I)(4) of section 169.08 of the Revised Code, the remaining portion of the unclaimed funds and interest that escheat to the state on January 1, 2026, shall be deposited into the Ohio Escheatment Fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. After January 1, 2026, unclaimed funds and interest that escheat to the state shall be deposited into the Ohio Cultural and Sports Facility Performance Grant Fund (Fund 5CY1) in accordance with section 123.282 and division (I)(4) of section 169.08 of the Revised Code. There is hereby appropriated $1,000,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 to appropriation item 042428, Cultural, Sports, and Major Sports Facilities Performance Grants, from revenues received in the Ohio Cultural and Sports Facility Performance Grant Fund (Fund 5CY1). The Office of Budget and Management shall use $600,000,000 from appropriation item 042428, Cultural, Sports, and Major Sports Facilities Performance Grants, to support construction of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project pursuant to section 123.281 of the Revised Code that is associated with a Brook Park economic development project, except that no performance grants from appropriation item 042428, Cultural, Sports, and Major Sports Facilities Performance Grants, shall be disbursed prior to February 1, 2026. Given that the Brook Park economic development project, which is to be located in the territorial boundary of a transformational major sports facility mixed-use project district, will be under construction in calendar years 2026, 2027, and 2028, the General Assembly establishes, in accordance with section 123.28 of the Revised Code, that the base professional sports franchise state tax revenues will be realized and offset by the actual revenues generated each of those years through the continuing economic activity and state taxes levied and realized under Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code at the stadium in Cleveland. As a result, the simultaneous economic activity and state tax revenues levied and realized under Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code in the district each of those three years will exceed the base professional sports franchise state tax revenues. Thus, for that three-year period only, the General Assembly establishes, in accordance with section 123.28 of the Revised Code, that the incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues generated during each of those years equal the state taxes levied and realized under Chapters 5739., 5741., 5747., and 5751. of the Revised Code for the construction of, and the purchasing of or leasing of materials and items used in the construction of, the project. For calendar year 2029 and beyond, the base professional sports franchise state tax revenues and the incremental major sports facility mixed-use project district state tax revenues shall be determined as provided in section 123.28 of the Revised Code. Further, nothing in this section modifies, changes, or otherwise alters the four-year target amounts described under division (H)(5)(a) of section 123.281 of the Revised Code. The Office of Budget and Management shall use $400,000,000 from appropriation item 042428, Cultural, Sports, and Major Sports Facilities Performance Grants, to support construction or renovation of an Ohio cultural or sports facility under section 123.283 of the Revised Code. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 042428, Cultural, Sports, and Major Sports Facilities Performance Grants, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item in fiscal year 2027. Section 231.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CSR CAPITOL SQUARE REVIEW AND ADVISORY BOARD B General Revenue Fund C GRF 874321 Operating Expenses $7,003,530 $7,212,135 D GRF 874400 Statehouse Facility Improvements $6,000,000 $0 E General Revenue Fund Total $13,003,530 $7,212,135 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group G 2080 874601 Underground Parking Garage Operations $4,245,906 $4,245,906 H 4G50 874603 Capitol Square Education Center and Arts $6,000 $6,000 I 5AN1 874608 Capitol Square Improvements $1,927,921 $0 J Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $6,179,827 $4,251,906 K Internal Service Activity Fund Group L 4S70 874602 Statehouse Gift Shop/Events $1,000,000 $1,000,000 M Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $1,000,000 $1,000,000 N TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $20,183,357 $12,464,041 Section 231.20. OPERATING EXPENSES Of the foregoing appropriation item 874321, Operating Expenses, up to $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to display inside the Statehouse borrowed or purchased United States, Ohio, or Ohio military flags that have historical significance to the state of Ohio. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 874321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated for fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item 874321, Operating Expenses, for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 874321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated for fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item 874321, Operating Expenses, for fiscal year 2027. STATEHOUSE FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 874400, Statehouse Facility Improvements, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated for fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item 874400, Statehouse Facility Improvements, for fiscal year 2027. CAPITOL SQUARE IMPROVEMENTS On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 874608, Capitol Square Improvements, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated for fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby appropriated to the same appropriation item 874608, Capitol Square Improvements, for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 874608, Capitol Square Improvements, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated for fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby appropriated to the same appropriation item 874608, Capitol Square Improvements, for fiscal year 2027. UNDERGROUND PARKING GARAGE FUND Notwithstanding division (G) of section 105.41 of the Revised Code and any other provision to the contrary, moneys in the Underground Parking Garage Fund (Fund 2080) may be used for personnel and operating costs related to the operations of the Statehouse and the Statehouse Underground Parking Garage. HOUSE AND SENATE PARKING REIMBURSEMENT On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $500,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Underground Parking Garage Fund (Fund 2080). The amounts transferred under this section shall be used to reimburse the Capitol Square Review and Advisory Board for legislative parking costs. UNDERGROUND PARKING GARAGE FUND TRANSFER On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $1,000,000 cash from the Underground Parking Garage Fund (Fund 2080) to the Statehouse Gift Shop/Events Fund (Fund 4S70). The amount transferred under this section shall be used for personnel and operating costs related to the operations of the Statehouse Gift Shop and events. Section 233.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A SCR STATE BOARD OF CAREER COLLEGES AND SCHOOLS B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 233601 Operating Expenses $581,189 $593,979 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $581,189 $593,979 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $581,189 $593,979 Section 235.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CAC CASINO CONTROL COMMISSION B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5HS0 955321 Operating Expenses $17,855,928 $18,849,195 D 5NU0 955601 Casino Commission Enforcement $156,680 $200,547 E 5YR0 955602 Problem Sports Gaming $3,500,000 $3,500,000 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $21,512,608 $22,549,742 G TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $21,512,608 $22,549,742 Section 237.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CDP CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY PROFESSIONALS BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 930609 Operating Expenses $1,337,144 $1,487,262 D 5CF1 930600 Peer Support Program $292,500 $30,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,629,644 $1,517,262 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,629,644 $1,517,262 Section 239.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CHR STATE CHIROPRACTIC BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 878609 Operating Expenses $625,713 $639,017 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $625,713 $639,017 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $625,713 $639,017 Section 241.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CIV OHIO CIVIL RIGHTS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 876321 Operating Expenses $7,464,880 $7,763,235 D General Revenue Fund Total $7,464,880 $7,763,235 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 2170 876604 Operations Support $5,000 $5,000 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $5,000 $5,000 H Federal Fund Group I 3340 876601 Federal Programs $3,614,239 $3,676,006 J Federal Fund Group Total $3,614,239 $3,676,006 K TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $11,084,119 $11,444,241 Section 243.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A COM DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4B20 800631 Real Estate Appraisal Recovery $35,000 $35,000 D 4H90 800608 Cemeteries $326,349 $332,990 E 4X20 800619 Financial Institutions $2,129,695 $2,138,176 F 5430 800602 Unclaimed Funds - Operating $17,777,906 $17,249,752 G 5430 800625 Unclaimed Funds - Claims $90,000,000 $90,000,000 H 5440 800612 Banks $11,467,455 $11,775,392 I 5460 800610 Fire Marshal $30,366,505 $31,171,353 J 5460 800639 Fire Department Grants $15,515,000 $7,515,000 K 5480 800611 Real Estate Recovery $50,000 $50,000 L 5490 800614 Real Estate $7,808,917 $8,014,934 M 5500 800617 Securities $9,782,453 $10,204,710 N 5520 800604 Credit Union $5,194,284 $4,831,282 O 5530 800607 Consumer Finance $6,440,712 $7,215,971 P 5560 800615 Industrial Compliance $33,508,390 $33,692,610 Q 5BG1 800659 Fireworks Fee Firefighter Training $3,000,000 $3,000,000 R 5F10 800635 Small Government Fire Departments $600,000 $600,000 S 5FW0 800616 Financial Literacy Education $150,000 $150,000 T 5GK0 800609 Securities Investor Education/Enforcement $742,863 $542,863 U 5HV0 800641 Cigarette Enforcement $27,324 $27,324 V 5LC0 800644 Liquor JobsOhio Extraordinary Allowance $200,000 $200,000 W 5LN0 800645 Liquor Operating Services $18,105,130 $18,371,853 X 5LP0 800646 Liquor Regulatory Operating Expenses $17,782,397 $17,681,629 Y 5SJ0 800648 Volunteer Peace Officers' Dependent Fund $50,000 $50,000 Z 5SY0 800650 Medical Marijuana Control Program $21,339,688 $21,180,201 AA 5TZ0 800661 Drug Addiction Partnership $10,000,000 $10,000,000 AB 5VD0 800653 Real Estate Home Inspector Recovery $10,000 $10,000 AC 5X60 800623 Video Service $429,981 $441,076 AD 5XK0 800657 Ohio Investor Recovery $2,500,000 $2,500,000 AE 6530 800629 UST Registration/Permit Fee $2,813,369 $2,824,398 AF Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $308,153,418 $301,806,514 AG Internal Service Activity Fund Group AH 1630 800620 Division of Administration $11,532,983 $11,239,902 AI 1630 800637 Information Technology $12,728,427 $13,134,526 AJ Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $24,261,410 $24,374,428 AK Federal Fund Group AL 3480 800622 Underground Storage Tanks $779,620 $779,620 AM 3480 800624 Leaking Underground Storage Tanks $1,899,016 $1,899,016 AN Federal Fund Group Total $2,678,636 $2,678,636 AO TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $335,093,464 $328,859,578 Section 243.20. UNCLAIMED FUNDS - OPERATING Of the foregoing appropriation item 800602, Unclaimed Funds - Operating, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Division of Unclaimed Funds to use technologies, outreach, advertising, and other direct or indirect methods to locate and notify owners of unclaimed funds, or persons with an established right to ownership of unclaimed funds, and assist them with filing claims to those unclaimed funds. UNCLAIMED FUNDS PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 800625, Unclaimed Funds-Claims, shall be used to pay claims under section 169.08 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Commerce that additional appropriation amounts are necessary to make such payments, the Director of Commerce may request that the Director of Budget and Management approve such increases. Any approved increases are hereby appropriated. DIVISION OF REAL ESTATE AND PROFESSIONAL LICENSING The foregoing appropriation item 800631, Real Estate Appraisal Recovery, shall be used to pay settlements, judgments, and court orders under section 4763.16 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Commerce that additional appropriation amounts are necessary to make such payments, the Director of Commerce may request that the Director of Budget and Management approve such increases. Any approved increases are hereby appropriated. The foregoing appropriation item 800611, Real Estate Recovery, shall be used to pay settlements, judgments, and court orders under section 4735.12 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Commerce that additional appropriation amounts are necessary to make such payments, the Director of Commerce may request that the Director of Budget and Management approve such increases. Any approved increases are hereby appropriated. The foregoing appropriation item 800653, Real Estate Home Inspector Recovery, shall be used to pay settlements, judgments, and court orders under section 4764.21 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Commerce that additional appropriation amounts are necessary to make such payments, the Director of Commerce may request that the Director of Budget and Management approve such increases. Any approved increases are hereby appropriated. FIRE DEPARTMENT GRANTS (A) The foregoing appropriation item 800639, Fire Department Grants, shall be used to make annual grants to the following eligible recipients: volunteer fire departments, fire departments that serve one or more small municipalities or small townships, joint fire districts comprised of fire departments that primarily serve small municipalities or small townships, local units of government responsible for such fire departments, and local units of government responsible for the provision of fire protection services for small municipalities or small townships. For the purposes of these grants, a private fire company, as that phrase is defined in section 9.60 of the Revised Code, that is providing fire protection services under a contract to a political subdivision of the state, is an additional eligible recipient for a training grant. Eligible recipients that consist of small municipalities or small townships that all intend to contract with the same fire department or private fire company for fire protection services may jointly apply and be considered for a grant. If a joint applicant is awarded a grant, the State Fire Marshal shall, if feasible, proportionately award the grant and any equipment purchased with grant funds to each of the joint applicants based upon each applicant's contribution to and demonstrated need for fire protection services. For the purpose of this grant program, an eligible recipient or any firefighting entity that is contracted to serve an eligible recipient may only file, be listed as joint applicant, or be designated as a service provider on one grant application per fiscal year. If the grant awarded to joint applicants is an equipment grant and the equipment to be purchased cannot be readily distributed or possessed by multiple recipients, each of the joint applicants shall be awarded by the State Fire Marshal an ownership interest in the equipment so purchased in proportion to each applicant's contribution to and demonstrated need for fire protection services. The joint applicants shall then mutually agree on how the equipment is to be maintained, operated, stored, or disposed of. If, for any reason, the joint applicants cannot agree as to how jointly owned equipment is to be maintained, operated, stored, or disposed of or any of the joint applicants no longer maintain a contract with the same fire protection service provider as the other applicants, then the joint applicants shall, with the assistance of the State Fire Marshal, mutually agree as to how the jointly owned equipment is to be maintained, operated, stored, disposed of, or owned. If the joint applicants cannot agree how the grant equipment is to be maintained, operated, stored, disposed of, or owned, the State Fire Marshal may, in its discretion, require all of the equipment acquired by the joint applicants with grant funds to be returned to the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal may then award the returned equipment to any eligible recipients. For this paragraph only, an "equipment grant" also includes a MARCS Grant. (B) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the grants shall be used by recipients to purchase firefighting or rescue equipment or gear or similar items, to provide full or partial reimbursement for the documented costs of firefighter training, or, at the discretion of the State Fire Marshal, to cover fire department costs for providing fire protection services in that grant recipient's jurisdiction. (1) Of the foregoing appropriation item 800639, Fire Department Grants, up to $1,300,000 per fiscal year may be used to pay for the State Fire Marshal's costs of providing firefighter I certification classes or other firefighter classes approved by the State Fire Marshal at no cost to selected students attending the Ohio Fire Academy or other class providers approved by the State Fire Marshal. The State Fire Marshal may establish the qualifications and selection processes for students to attend such classes by written policy, and such students shall be considered eligible recipients of fire department grants for the purposes of this portion of the grant program. (2) Of the foregoing appropriation item 800639, Fire Department Grants, up to $4,000,000 in each fiscal year may be used for MARCS Grants. MARCS Grants may be used for the payment of user access fees by the eligible recipient to cover costs for accessing MARCS. (3) Of the foregoing appropriation item 800639, Fire Department Grants, $30,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to support volunteer firefighter training programs at the Northwestern Ohio Volunteer Firemen's Association Fire School. For purposes of this section, a MARCS Grant is a grant for systems, equipment, or services that are a part of, integrated into, or otherwise interoperable with the Multi-Agency Radio Communication System (MARCS) operated by the state. MARCS Grant awards may be up to $50,000 in each fiscal year per eligible recipient. Each eligible recipient may apply, as a separate entity or as a part of a joint application, for only one MARCS Grant per fiscal year. The State Fire Marshal may give a preference to MARCS Grants that will enhance the overall interoperability and effectiveness of emergency communication networks in the geographic region that includes and that is adjacent to the applicant. Eligible recipients that are or were awarded fire department grants that are not MARCS Grants may also apply for and receive MARCS Grants in accordance with criteria for the awarding of grant funds established by the State Fire Marshal. (4) Grant awards for firefighting or rescue equipment or gear or for fire department costs of providing fire protection services shall be up to $15,000 per fiscal year, or up to $25,000 per fiscal year if an eligible entity serves a jurisdiction in which the Governor declared a natural disaster during the preceding or current fiscal year in which the grant was awarded. In addition to any grant funds awarded for rescue equipment or gear, or for fire department costs associated with the provision of fire protection services, an eligible entity may receive a grant for up to $15,000 per fiscal year for full or partial reimbursement of the documented costs of firefighter training. For each fiscal year, the State Fire Marshal shall determine the total amounts to be allocated for each eligible purpose. (5) Of the foregoing appropriation item 800639, Fire Department Grants, $8,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to issue grants to small county volunteer fire departments located within counties having a total population that is 70,000 or lower as of the most recent decennial census. Small county volunteer fire department grants may be up to $50,000per recipient. Grant awards are to be used for firefighting or rescue equipment or gear, or for fire department costs associated with the provision of fire protection services. (C) The grants shall be administered by the State Fire Marshal in accordance with rules the State Fire Marshal adopts as part of the state fire code adopted pursuant to section 3737.82 of the Revised Code that are necessary for the administration and operation of the grant program. The rules may further define the entities eligible to receive grants and establish criteria for the awarding and expenditure of grant funds, including methods the State Fire Marshal may use to verify the proper use of grant funds or to obtain reimbursement for or the return of equipment for improperly used grant funds. To the extent consistent with this section and until the rules are updated, the existing rules in the state fire code adopted pursuant to section 3737.82 of the Revised Code for fire department grants under this section apply to MARCS Grants. Any amounts in appropriation item 800639, Fire Department Grants, in excess of the amount allocated for these grants may be used for the administration of the grant program. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE OHIO HIGHWAY AND TRANSPORTATION SAFETY FUND TO THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL FUND On July 1, 2025 or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $8,000,000 cash from the Ohio Highway and Transportation Safety Fund (Fund 5XI0) to the State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460). Section 243.30. CASH TRANSFERS TO DIVISION OF REAL ESTATE OPERATING FUND If the Real Estate Recovery Fund (Fund 5480) cash balance exceeds $250,000 during the biennium ending June 30, 2027, the Director of Budget and Management, upon the written request of the Director of Commerce, and subject to Controlling Board approval, may transfer cash from Fund 5480 to the Division of Real Estate Operating Fund (Fund 5490), such that the amount available in Fund 5480 is not less than $250,000. If the Real Estate Appraiser Recovery Fund (Fund 4B20) cash balance exceeds $200,000 during the biennium ending June 30, 2027, the Director of Budget and Management, upon the written request of the Director of Commerce, and subject to Controlling Board approval, may transfer cash from Fund 4B20 to the Division of Real Estate Operating Fund (Fund 5490), such that the amount available in Fund 4B20 is not less than $200,000. CASH TRANSFERS TO SMALL GOVERNMENT FIRE DEPARTMENT SERVICES REVOLVING LOAN FUND Upon the written request of the Director of Commerce, the Director of Budget and Management, subject to Controlling Board approval, may transfer up to $600,000 in cash from the State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) to the Small Government Fire Department Services Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 5F10) during the biennium ending June 30, 2027. CASH TRANSFERS TO THE OHIO INVESTOR RECOVERY FUND Upon the written request of the Director of Commerce, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $2,500,000 in each fiscal year from the Division of Securities Fund (Fund 5500) to the Ohio Investor Recovery Fund (Fund 5XK0) during the biennium ending June 30, 2027. The Director of Commerce may request the transfer of cash in addition to the $2,500,000, and the Director of Budget and Management may transfer additional cash in an amount agreed upon with the Director of Commerce, if sufficient cash is available in Fund 5500. An amount equal to the additional cash transferred under this section is hereby appropriated to appropriation item 800657, Ohio Investor Recovery. The foregoing appropriation item 800657, Ohio Investor Recovery, shall be used by the Department of Commerce pursuant to section 1707.47 of the Revised Code to provide restitution assistance to victims who: (1) are identified in a final administrative order issued by the Division of Securities or a final court order in a civil or criminal proceeding initiated by the Division as a purchaser damaged by a sale or contract for sale made in violation of Chapter 1707. of the Revised Code; and (2) have not received the full amount of any restitution ordered in a final order before the application for restitution assistance is due. CASH TRANSFERS TO THE OHIO FINANCIAL LITERACY EDUCATION FUND Upon the written request of the Director of Commerce, the Director of Budget and Management, at least once every three months, may transfer cash equal to five per cent of all charges, penalties, and forfeitures received into the Consumer Finance Fund (Fund 5530) to the Financial Literacy Education Fund (Fund 5FW0) created under section 121.085 of the Revised Code. MEDICAL MARIJUANA CONTROL PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 800650, Medical Marijuana Control Program, at least $5,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Division of Cannabis Control to regulate adult-use marijuana. DRUG ADDICTION PARTNERSHIP The foregoing appropriation item 800661, Drug Addiction Partnership, shall be used to establish a public-private partnership with a statewide nonprofit corporation to develop and implement cannabis and related drug misuse prevention, education, and public awareness initiatives in accordance with section 3780.37 of the Revised Code. The Division of Cannabis Control shall submit an annual report to the General Assembly detailing program activities, use of funds, and measurable outcomes resulting from the public-private partnership. CLAIMING UNCLAIMED FUNDS FOR THE STATE OF OHIO AND POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS OF THE STATE (A) Notwithstanding Chapter 169. of the Revised Code, or any law to the contrary, the Treasurer of State, in consultation with the Director of Commerce and Director of Budget and Management, may claim unclaimed funds in the name of the state and not otherwise attributable to an administrative department as defined in section 121.02 of the Revised Code. All unclaimed funds pursuant to this division shall be credited to the General Revenue Fund. (B) Notwithstanding Chapter 169. of the Revised Code or any law to the contrary, the treasurer of any political subdivision within the state, in consultation with the Director of Commerce and Director of Budget and Management, may claim unclaimed funds in the name of the political subdivision or otherwise attributable to the political subdivision. All unclaimed funds claimed pursuant to this division shall be credited to the appropriate fund of the political subdivision. (C) Notwithstanding divisions (A) and (B) of this section, any person claiming a property interest in the unclaimed funds may file a claim with the Director of Commerce. Upon providing sufficient proof of the validity of the person's claim, the Director may, in the Director's discretion, pay the claim less any expenses and costs incurred by the state or political subdivision in securing full ownership of the unclaimed funds. If payment has been made to a claim, no action thereafter may be maintained by any other claimant against the state or political subdivision of or on account of the payment of the claim. Section 245.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A OCC OFFICE OF CONSUMERS' COUNSEL B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5F50 053601 Consumers' Counsel Operating $6,720,220 $6,972,030 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $6,720,220 $6,972,030 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $6,720,220 $6,972,030 Section 247.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CEB CONTROLLING BOARD B Internal Service Activity Fund Group C 5KM0 911614 Controlling Board Emergency Purposes/Contingencies $10,000,000 $10,000,000 D Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $10,000,000 $10,000,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $10,000,000 $10,000,000 Section 247.20. FEDERAL SHARE In transferring appropriations to or from appropriation items that have federal shares identified in this act, the Controlling Board shall add or subtract corresponding amounts of federal matching funds at the percentages indicated by the state and federal division of the appropriations in this act. Such changes are hereby appropriated. Section 249.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A COS COSMETOLOGY AND BARBER BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 879609 Operating Expenses $5,523,412 $5,841,066 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $5,523,412 $5,841,066 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,523,412 $5,841,066 Section 251.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CSW COUNSELOR, SOCIAL WORKER, AND MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPIST BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 899609 Operating Expenses $2,161,054 $2,291,375 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $2,161,054 $2,291,375 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,161,054 $2,291,375 Section 253.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CLA COURT OF CLAIMS B General Revenue Fund C GRF 015321 Operating Expenses $3,318,213 $3,468,684 D GRF 015403 Public Records Adjudication $1,145,161 $1,199,582 E General Revenue Fund Total $4,463,374 $4,668,266 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group G 5K20 015603 CLA Victims of Crime $622,100 $649,822 H 5TE0 015604 Public Records $2,800 $2,800 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $624,900 $652,622 J TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,088,274 $5,320,888 Section 255.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DEN STATE DENTAL BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 880609 Operating Expenses $2,281,030 $2,372,258 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $2,281,030 $2,372,258 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,281,030 $2,372,258 Section 257.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A BDP BOARD OF DEPOSIT B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4M20 974601 Board of Deposit $1,688,400 $1,688,400 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,688,400 $1,688,400 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,688,400 $1,688,400 Section 257.20. BOARD OF DEPOSIT EXPENSE FUND Upon receiving certification of expenses from the Treasurer of State, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer cash from the Investment Earnings Redistribution Fund (Fund 6080) to the Board of Deposit Expense Fund (Fund 4M20). The latter fund shall be used pursuant to section 135.02 of the Revised Code to pay for any and all necessary expenses of the Board of Deposit or for banking charges and fees required for the operation of the State of Ohio Regular Account. Section 259.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DEV DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENT B General Revenue Fund C GRF 195402 Coal Research and Development Program $175,000 $175,000 D GRF 195405 Minority Business Development $7,500,000 $8,500,000 E GRF 195406 Helping Ohioans Stay in Their Homes $4,000,000 $4,000,000 F GRF 195415 Business Development Services $3,864,894 $3,807,217 G GRF 195426 Redevelopment Assistance $1,125,000 $1,141,982 H GRF 195453 Technology Programs and Grants $859,360 $868,648 I GRF 195454 Small Business and Export Assistance $3,537,643 $3,807,014 J GRF 195455 Appalachia Assistance $12,680,362 $12,682,630 K GRF 195497 CDBG Operating Match $1,445,867 $1,473,181 L GRF 195499 BSD Federal Programs Match $13,441,064 $13,499,251 M GRF 1954A7 Residential Economic Development District Program $10,000,000 $15,000,000 N GRF 195503 Local Development Projects $2,405,000 $1,250,000 O GRF 195537 Ohio-Israel Agricultural Initiative $500,000 $500,000 P GRF 195553 Industry Sector Partnerships $5,000,000 $5,000,000 Q GRF 195556 TechCred Program $23,205,470 $24,207,322 R GRF 195595 Workforce Development Grants $400,000 $400,000 S GRF 195901 Coal Research and Development General Obligation Bond Debt Service $4,050,000 $2,525,000 T GRF 195905 Third Frontier Research and Development General Obligation Bond Debt Service $45,000,000 $45,000,000 U General Revenue Fund Total $139,189,660 $143,837,245 V Dedicated Purpose Fund Group W 4500 195624 Minority Business Bonding Program Administration $9,875 $9,875 X 4510 195649 Business Assistance Programs $3,000,000 $3,000,000 Y 4F20 195639 State Special Projects $500,000 $500,000 Z 4F20 195655 Workforce Development Programs $188,100 $188,100 AA 4F20 195699 Utility Community Assistance $686,947 $0 AB 4F20 1956B7 One-Time Emergency Projects $500,000 $0 AC 4W10 195646 Minority Business Enterprise Loan $2,000,000 $2,000,000 AD 5AI1 1956G9 Broadband Pole Replacement and Undergrounding Program $31,361,299 $0 AE 5AO0 1956H2 Priority Projects $17,000,000 $15,800,000 AF 5AP1 1956H3 Welcome Home Ohio Program $45,625,000 $45,625,000 AG 5CT1 1956B8 Residential Development Revolving Loan Program $100,000,000 $0 AH 5GT0 195550 Broadband Development Grants $2,800,000 $2,800,000 AI 5JR0 195635 Tax Incentives Operating $1,200,000 $1,200,000 AJ 5KP0 195645 Historic Rehabilitation Operating $1,800,000 $1,800,000 AK 5M40 195659 Low Income Energy Assistance (USF) $336,627,830 $0 AL 5M50 195660 Advanced Energy Loan Programs $8,932,168 $8,940,462 AM 5MH0 195644 SiteOhio Administration $5,000 $5,000 AN 5MJ0 195683 TourismOhio Administration $11,000,000 $11,000,000 AO 5UL0 195627 Brownfields Revolving Loan Program $1,750,000 $1,750,000 AP 5UY0 195496 Sports Events Grants $3,000,000 $3,000,000 AQ 5W60 195691 International Trade Cooperative Projects $50,000 $50,000 AR 5XH0 195632 Women Owned Business Loans $5,000,000 $5,000,000 AS 5XH0 195694 Micro-Loan $2,500,000 $2,500,000 AT 5XH0 1956I1 Minority Business Development Loan Administration $2,000,000 $2,000,000 AU 5YE0 1956A2 Brownfield Remediation $100,000,000 $100,000,000 AV 5YF0 1956A3 Demolition and Site Revitalization $21,500,000 $21,500,000 AW 6170 195654 Volume Cap Administration $40,000 $40,000 AX 6460 195638 Low- and Moderate-Income Housing Programs $64,402,825 $64,435,386 AY Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $763,479,044 $293,143,823 AZ Internal Service Activity Fund Group BA 1350 195684 Development Operations $15,263,246 $15,609,260 BB 6850 195636 Development Services Reimbursable Expenditures $250,000 $250,000 BC Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $15,513,246 $15,859,260 BD Facilities Establishment Fund Group BE 4Z60 195647 Rural Industrial Park Loan $5,000,000 $5,000,000 BF 5S90 195628 Capital Access Loan Program $1,000,000 $1,000,000 BG 7009 195664 Innovation Ohio $17,426,036 $0 BH 7010 195665 Research and Development $36,032,990 $0 BI 7037 195615 Facilities Establishment $10,000,000 $10,000,000 BJ Facilities Establishment Fund Group Total $69,459,026 $16,000,000 BK Bond Research and Development Fund Group BL 7011 195686 Third Frontier Tax Exempt - Operating $1,000,000 $1,000,000 BM 7011 195687 Third Frontier Research and Development Projects $1,000,000 $1,000,000 BN 7014 195620 Third Frontier Taxable - Operating $2,710,000 $2,710,000 BO 7014 195692 Research and Development Taxable Bond Projects $100,000,000 $20,000,000 BP Bond Research and Development Fund Group Total $104,710,000 $24,710,000 BQ Federal Fund Group BR 3080 195581 Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Capitalization Grant $2,500,000 $2,500,000 BS 3080 195602 Appalachian Regional Commission $7,500,000 $7,500,000 BT 3080 195603 Housing Assistance Programs $12,571,729 $12,576,756 BU 3080 195609 Small Business Administration Grants $5,550,000 $5,550,000 BV 3080 195618 Energy Grants $11,650,326 $11,661,160 BW 3080 195670 Home Weatherization Program $86,079,636 $0 BX 3080 195672 Manufacturing Extension Partnership $6,600,000 $6,600,000 BY 3080 195675 Procurement Technical Assistance $1,500,000 $1,500,000 BZ 3080 195696 State Trade and Export Promotion $500,000 $500,000 CA 3350 195610 Energy Programs $350,000 $350,000 CB 3AE0 195643 Workforce Development Initiatives $2,000,000 $2,000,000 CC 3FJ0 195626 Small Business Capital Access and Collateral Enhancement Program $2,000,000 $2,000,000 CD 3IC0 1956D9 Growth Capital Fund $3,250,000 $3,250,000 CE 3IC0 1956E1 Early-Stage Focus Fund $1,500,000 $1,500,000 CF 3IC0 1956E2 Community Development Financial Institution Loan Participation $10,000,000 $10,000,000 CG 3IC0 1956E3 Collateral Enhancement Program $6,000,000 $6,000,000 CH 3IC0 1956H5 State Small Business Credit Initiative Technical Assistance $1,500,000 $1,500,000 CI 3IF0 1956E4 Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment (BEAD) Program $793,000,000 $0 CJ 3IF0 1956E5 Broadband Digital Equity Acts Program $23,800,000 $476,000 CK 3IM0 195582 Home-Owner Managing Energy Savings Rebate Program $15,000,000 $15,000,000 CL 3IM0 195583 High-Efficiency Electric Home Rebate Program $15,000,000 $15,000,000 CM 3K80 195613 Community Development Block Grant $57,500,000 $57,500,000 CN 3K90 195611 Home Energy Assistance Block Grant $180,000,000 $0 CO 3K90 195614 HEAP Weatherization $44,000,000 $0 CP 3L00 195612 Community Services Block Grant $32,000,000 $0 CQ 3V10 195601 HOME Program $53,750,000 $53,750,000 CR Federal Fund Group Total $1,375,101,691 $216,713,916 CS TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,467,452,667 $710,264,244 Section 259.20. COAL RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 195402, Coal Research and Development Program, shall be used for the operating expenses of the Community Services Division in support of the Ohio Coal Development Office. MINORITY BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT The foregoing appropriation item 195405, Minority Business Development, shall be used to support the activities of the Minority Business Development Division, including providing grants to local nonprofit organizations to support economic development activities that promote minority business development, in conjunction with local organizations funded through appropriation item 195454, Small Business and Export Assistance. HELPING OHIOANS STAY IN THEIR HOMES The foregoing appropriation item 195406, Helping Ohioans Stay in their Homes, shall be granted to People Working Cooperatively for the Safe and Healthy at Home Initiative. BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 195415, Business Development Services, shall be used for the operating expenses of the Office of Strategic Business Investments and the regional economic development offices. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195415, Business Development Services, $1,550,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,450,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be allocated to Development Projects, Inc., for economic development programs and the creation of new jobs to leverage and support mission gains at Department of Defense and related facilities in Ohio by working with future base realignment and closure activities and ongoing Department of Defense efficiency and partnership initiatives, assisting efforts to secure Department of Defense support contracts for Ohio companies, assessing and supporting regional job and workforce development needs generated by the Department of Defense and the Ohio aerospace industry, promoting technology transfer to Ohio businesses, and for expanding job training and economic development programs in human performance and cyber security-related initiatives. REDEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item 195426, Redevelopment Assistance, shall be used to fund the costs of administering the energy, redevelopment, and other revitalization programs that may be implemented, and may be used to match federal grant funding. TECHNOLOGY PROGRAMS AND GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 195453, Technology Programs and Grants, shall be used for operating expenses incurred in administering the Ohio Third Frontier Programs and other technology focused programs that may be implemented. SMALL BUSINESS AND EXPORT ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item 195454, Small Business and Export Assistance, may be used to provide a range of business assistance, including grants to local organizations to support economic development activities that promote small business development, entrepreneurship, and exports of Ohio's goods and services, in conjunction with local organizations funded through appropriation item 195405, Minority Business Development. The foregoing appropriation item shall also be used as matching funds for grants from the United States Small Business Administration and other federal agencies, pursuant to Pub. L. No. 96-302 as amended by Pub. L. No. 98-395, and regulations and policy guidelines for the programs pursuant thereto. APPALACHIA ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, may be used for the administrative costs of planning and liaison activities for the Governor's Office of Appalachia, to provide financial assistance to projects in Ohio's Appalachian counties, to support four local development districts, and to pay dues for the Appalachian Regional Commission. These funds may be used to match federal funds from the Appalachian Regional Commission. Programs funded through the appropriation item shall be identified and recommended by the local development districts and approved by the Governor's Office of Appalachia. The Department of Development shall conduct compliance and regulatory review of the programs recommended by the local development districts. Moneys allocated under the appropriation item may be used to fund projects including, but not limited to, those designated by the local development districts as community investment and rapid response projects. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, in each fiscal year, $210,000 shall be allocated to the Ohio Valley Regional Development Commission, $210,000 shall be allocated to the Ohio Mid-Eastern Government Association, $210,000 shall be allocated to the Buckeye Hills Regional Council, and $210,000 shall be allocated to the Eastgate Regional Council of Governments. Local development districts receiving funding under this section shall use the funds for the implementation and administration of programs and duties under section 107.21 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, in each fiscal year, $1,000,000 shall be allocated to Ohio University's Voinovich School of Leadership and Public Service to work on behalf of the Mayor's Partnership for Progress. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to Shawnee State University to support its Civic and Culture Program for Appalachia. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, $375,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used in coordination with the Ohio History Connection to celebrate and recognize the Northwest Ordinance Commemoration. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $875,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used to support the Veterans and First Responders Appalachian Assistance Program. The Director of the Department of Development, in coordination with the Director of the Department of Veterans Services, shall set criteria for distributing funding under the Veterans and First Responders Appalachian Assistance Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Appalachian Ohio Manufacturers Coalition, to create a pilot program in Meigs, Athens, Morgan, Noble, Monroe, and Washington counties to reduce barriers of workforce reentry for individuals who have graduated from behavioral health recovery programs. The program shall be jointly developed and administered with the Appalachian Children Coalition, in consultation with the Director of the Ohio Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, $750,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Outdoor Recreation Council of Appalachia. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, $375,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to FosterHub in Hocking County. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, in each fiscal year, $250,000 shall be allocated to Integrated Services for Behavioral Health to support a behavioral health emergency pilot program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, in each fiscal year, $100,000 shall be allocated to the Tuscarawas County Commissioners for the Tuscarawas County Growth Initiative. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195455, Appalachia Assistance, in each fiscal year, $150,000 shall be allocated to the City of Athens for a southeast Ohio regional agricultural initiative. CDBG OPERATING MATCH The foregoing appropriation item 195497, CDBG Operating Match, shall be used as matching funds for grants from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development pursuant to the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974 and regulations and policy guidelines for the programs pursuant thereto. BSD FEDERAL PROGRAMS MATCH The foregoing appropriation item 195499, BSD Federal Programs Match, shall be used as matching funds for grants from the U.S. Department of Commerce, National Institute of Standards and Technology Manufacturing Extension Partnership Program and Department of Defense APEX Accelerator Program, and other federal agencies, pursuant to Pub. L. No. 96-302 as amended by Pub. L. No. 98-395, and regulations and policy guidelines for the programs pursuant thereto. The appropriation item shall also be used for operating expenses of the Business Services Division. RESIDENTIAL ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 1954A7, Residential Economic Development District Program , shall be used to issue grants to support workforce housing development under section 122.636 of the Revised Code. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 1954A7, Residential Economic Development District Program, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. LOCAL DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be granted to Baldwin Wallace University to expand the Northeast Ohio Flight Information Exchange (NEOFIX) and support development of flight information exchanges in other communities in Ohio. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be granted to the Mahoning Valley Scrappers for stadium maintenance and improvements. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be granted to NewBridge Cleveland Center for Arts and Technology to support at-risk adult learner healthcare professional certification and job placement. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be granted to Neighborhood Alliance to support the homeless shelter in Lorain County. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be granted to the city of Coshocton to design and construct a water line extension to serve the village of Warsaw and the River View School. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be granted to Freedom a la Cart to support workforce initiatives and programs for human trafficking survivors. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $85,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be granted to the Stark County Minority Business Association to support the development and operation of the Kirk Schuring Business Development Center and Innovation Hub. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $45,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used for the installation of baby boxes at local fire departments. Under this program, the Director of Development shall select one local fire department in each of Geauga, Lake, and Portage counties to grant $15,000 for the installation of baby boxes. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $15,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be granted to the Village of Grand River for sidewalk improvements and repairs. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195503, Local Development Projects, $10,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be granted to the Salem Worlds War Memorial Building Association to support the development of a job training center. OHIO-ISRAEL AGRICULTURAL INITIATIVE The foregoing appropriation item 195537, Ohio-Israel Agricultural Initiative, shall be used for the Ohio-Israel Agricultural Initiative. The appropriation shall not be used for travel and entertainment expenses incurred under the initiative. SECTOR PARTNERSHIP NETWORKS The foregoing appropriation item 195553, Industry Sector Partnerships, shall be used for the grant program described in section 122.179 of the Revised Code. TECHCRED PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 195556, TechCred Program, shall be used for the programs described under sections 122.178, 122.1710, 122.1712, and 122.1713 of the Revised Code. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT GRANTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 195595, Workforce Development Grants, $133,333 in each fiscal year shall be granted to Apollo Career and Technical Center to support the Ohio Oil and Gas Career Jumpstart Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195595, Workforce Development Grants, $133,333 in each fiscal year shall be granted to Mahoning Career and Technical Center to support the Ohio Oil and Gas Career Jumpstart Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 195595, Workforce Development Grants, $133,333 in each fiscal year shall be granted to Washington County Career Center to support the Ohio Oil and Gas Career Jumpstart Program. Section 259.25. COAL RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation line item 195901, Coal Research and Development General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on obligations issued under sections 151.01 and 151.07 of the Revised Code. THIRD FRONTIER RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 195905, Third Frontier Research and Development General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on obligations issued under sections 151.01 and 151.10 of the Revised Code. Section 259.30. BUSINESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS The foregoing appropriation item 195649, Business Assistance Programs, shall be used for administrative expenses associated with the operation of loan incentives. STATE SPECIAL PROJECTS The State Special Projects Fund (Fund 4F20), may be used for the deposit of private-sector funds from utility companies and for the deposit of other miscellaneous state funds. State moneys so deposited may also be used to match federal funding and to support programs of the Community Service Division and Business Services Division. ONE-TIME EMERGENCY PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation item 1956B7, One-Time Emergency Projects, shall be granted to Boardman Township to provide matching funds for the flood mitigation assistance grant awarded to the township by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE CONTROLLING BOARD EMERGENCY PURPOSES/CONTINGENCIES FUND TO THE STATE SPECIAL PROJECTS FUND On July 1 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to $500,000 cash from the Controlling Board Emergency Purposes/Contingencies Fund (Fund 5KM0) to the State Special Projects Fund (Fund 4F20). MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE LOAN The foregoing appropriation item 195646, Minority Business Enterprise Loan, shall be used for awards under the Minority Business Enterprise Loan Program and to cover operating expenses of the Minority Business Development Division. All repayments from the Minority Development Financing Advisory Board Loan Program shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the Minority Business Enterprise Loan Fund (Fund 4W10). BROADBAND POLE REPLACEMENT AND UNDERGROUNDING PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 1956G9, Broadband Pole Replacement and Undergrounding Program, shall be used by the Department of Development to support the Broadband Pole Replacement and Undergrounding Program under section 191.27 of the Revised Code. TRANSFER FROM THE BROADBAND POLE REPLACEMENT FUND TO THE OHIO RESIDENTIAL BROADBAND EXPANSION GRANT PROGRAM FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $3,600,000 cash from the Broadband Pole Replacement and Undergrounding Program Fund (Fund 5AI1) to the Ohio Residential Broadband Expansion Grant Program Fund (Fund 5GT0). PRIORITY PROJECTS (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $750,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Center on Appalachian Innovation at Marietta College. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $625,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Excellence Training Center at Youngstown State University. (C) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to continue support and expansion of the Clark County unmanned and general aviation STEM pilot programs in all Ohio counties. (D) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Ohio Aerospace Institute's Space Grant Consortium. (E) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to the Showers Family Foundation to support the high school education of students with multiple disabilities, including Autism and Down Syndrome, provided that a local match in the same amount is provided. (F) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the U.S. Route 30 expansion in Carroll, Stark, and Columbiana counties. (G) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $350,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Fairfield County Workforce Center to support pre-apprenticeship program costs, including those for instructors, certification exams, books, software licenses, and tools needed for students. (H) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to S.U.C.C.E.S.S. for Autism to expand an interprofessional pilot program for the purpose of training professionals in The S.U.C.C.E.S.S. Approach, a comprehensive neurodevelopmental learning model for all students. (I) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be granted to the Eastgate Regional Council of Governments to support the study and construction of an oil and natural gas pipeline within Ashtabula, Columbiana, Mahoning, and Trumbull counties. (J) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $175,000 in each fiscal year shall be granted to the Buckeye Lake Region Corporation to support community development. (K) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed to the Mid-East Career and Technology Centers for the purchase of CDL training simulators. (L) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be granted to the Ohio Life Sciences Foundation for workforce development projects. (M) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed to Southern State Community College for the Ohio Code-Scholar Program under section 3313.905 of the Revised Code, as reenacted by this act. (N) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, up to $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to provide public safety services at the Voices of America Country Music Festival in West Chester Township on the condition that a local match in the same amount is provided. (O) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support The Ohio State University East Side Dental Clinic. (P) Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, $10,450,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $9,550,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used for the U.S. Route 30 OARnet Broadband Extension project. This project shall include construction of a wholesale middle-mile network along Route 30 consisting of two sections from the preexisting OARnet backbone network and points-of-presence, one from the Canton area and the other from the Lima area, which will connect in Mansfield. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered portion of appropriation item 1956H2, Priority Projects, allocated for the U.S. Route 30 OARnet Broadband Extension project at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. WELCOME HOME OHIO PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 1956H3, Welcome Home Ohio Program, shall be used for grants under the Welcome Home Ohio Program established in sections 122.631 through 122.633 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H3, Welcome Home Ohio Program, $22,812,500 in each fiscal year shall be used to distribute grants to purchase residential property at foreclosure sales under section 122.631 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956H3, Welcome Home Ohio Program, $22,812,500 in each fiscal year shall be used to distribute grants to rehabilitate or construct residential property for income-restricted owners under section 122.632 of the Revised Code. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $50,000,000 cash from the Local Government Tangible Property Tax Replacement Fund (Fund 7081) to the Welcome Home Ohio Fund (Fund 5AP1). ADVANCED ENERGY LOAN PROGRAMS The foregoing appropriation item 195660, Advanced Energy Loan Programs, shall be used to provide financial assistance to customers for eligible advanced energy projects for residential, commercial, and industrial business, local government, educational institution, nonprofit, and agriculture customers. The appropriation item may be used to match federal grant funding and to pay for the program's administrative costs as provided in sections 4928.61 to 4928.63 of the Revised Code and rules adopted by the Director of Development. SPORTS EVENTS GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 195496, Sports Events Grants, shall be used for grants as described in sections 122.12 and 122.121 of the Revised Code. WOMEN OWNED BUSINESS LOAN The foregoing appropriation item 195632, Women Owned Business Loan, shall be used to operate the Women Owned Business Loan Program. MINORITY BUSINESS MICRO-LOAN The foregoing appropriation item 195694, Micro-Loan, shall be used to operate the Minority Business Micro-Loan Program. MBD LOAN ADMINISTRATION The foregoing appropriation item 1956I1, MBD Loan Administration, shall be used to operate the Women Owned Loan and Minority Business Micro-Loan Programs. TRANSFER FROM THE STATE SMALL BUSINESS CREDIT INITIATIVE FUND TO THE MBD FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer $4,000,000 cash from the State Small Business Credit Initiative Fund (Fund 3FJ0) to the MBD Financial Assistance Fund (Fund 5XH0). All repayments of loans issued under Fund 5XH0 shall be credited to the fund. Upon the completion of the original Collateral Enhancement Program, the Director of Development shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the remaining cash balance in the State Small Business Credit Initiative Fund (Fund 3FJ0). The Director of Budget and Management may transfer the certified amount from Fund 3FJ0 to the MBD Financial Assistance Fund (Fund 5XH0). ALL OHIO FUTURE FUND The foregoing appropriation item 195576, All Ohio Future Fund, shall be used for the purposes enumerated in section 126.62 of the Revised Code. BROWNFIELD REMEDIATION The foregoing appropriation item 1956A2, Brownfield Remediation, shall be used to award grants under the Brownfield Remediation Program as described in section 122.6511 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 1956A2, Brownfield Remediation, up to two and one-half percent in each fiscal year may be used to pay the administrative costs of the program. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $200,000,000 cash from the All Ohio Future Fund (Fund 5XM0) to the Brownfield Remediation Fund (Fund 5YE0). DEMOLITION AND SITE REVITALIZATION The appropriation item 1956A3, Demolition and Site Revitalization, shall be used to award grants and to pay associated administrative costs under the Building Demolition and Site Revitalization Program as described in section 122.6512 of the Revised Code. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 1956A3, Demolition and Site Revitalization, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $20,000,000 cash from the Local Government Tangible Property Tax Replacement Fund (Fund 7081) to the Building Demolition and Site Revitalization Fund (Fund 5YF0). VOLUME CAP ADMINISTRATION The foregoing appropriation item 195654, Volume Cap Administration, shall be used for expenses related to the administration of the Volume Cap Program. Revenues received by the Volume Cap Administration Fund (Fund 6170) shall consist of application fees, forfeited deposits, and interest earned from the custodial account held by the Treasurer of State. RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 1956B8, Residential Development Revolving Loan Program, shall be used to award loans under the Residential Development Loan Program as described in sections 122.98 and 122.981 of the Revised Code. The unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 1956B8, Residential Development Revolving Loan Program, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. Section 259.40. DEVELOPMENT OPERATIONS The Director of Development may assess offices of the department for the cost of central service operations. An assessment shall contain the characteristics of administrative ease and uniform application. A division's payments shall be credited to the Supportive Services Fund (Fund 1350) using an intrastate transfer voucher. DEVELOPMENT SERVICES REIMBURSABLE EXPENDITURES The foregoing appropriation item 195636, Development Services Reimbursable Expenditures, shall be used for reimbursable costs incurred by the department. Revenues to the General Reimbursement Fund (Fund 6850) shall consist of moneys charged for administrative costs that are not central service costs and repayments of loans, including the interest thereon, made from the Water and Sewer Fund (Fund 4440). Section 259.50. RURAL INDUSTRIAL PARK LOAN The foregoing appropriation item 195647, Rural Industrial Park Loan, shall be used to award loans under the Rural Industrial Park Loan Program established in section 122.24 of the Revised Code. Rural Industrial Park Loans awarded under the appropriation item shall not exceed $4,000,000. TRANSFER FROM THE RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT LOAN FUND TO THE BUSINESS ASSISTANCE FUND Notwithstanding Chapter 166. of the Revised Code, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $3,000,000 cash in each fiscal year from the Research and Development Loan Fund (Fund 7010) to the Business Assistance Fund (Fund 4510), subject to Controlling Board approval. CAPITAL ACCESS LOAN PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 195628, Capital Access Loan Program, shall be used for operating, program, and administrative expenses of the program. Capital Access Loan Program funds shall be used in accordance with section 122.603 of the Revised Code to assist participating financial institutions in making program loans to eligible businesses that face barriers in accessing working capital and obtaining fixed-asset financing. The Director of Budget and Management may transfer an amount not to exceed $1,000,000 cash in each fiscal year between the Minority Business Enterprise Loan Fund (Fund 4W10) and the Capital Access Loan Fund (Fund 5S90), subject to Controlling Board approval. FACILITIES ESTABLISHMENT The foregoing appropriation item 195615, Facilities Establishment, shall be used for the purposes of the Facilities Establishment Fund (Fund 7037) under Chapter 166. of the Revised Code. In the biennium ending June 30, 2027, notwithstanding section 127.14 and division (B) of section 131.35 of the Revised Code, the Controlling Board may authorize expenditures, in excess of the amount appropriated, but not to exceed the limitation set in division (E) of section 131.35 of the Revised Code, using the Facilities Establishment Fund (Fund 7037) for purposes consistent with Chapter 166. of the Revised Code. The amounts authorized by the Controlling Board are hereby appropriated. Section 259.60. THIRD FRONTIER OPERATING COSTS The foregoing appropriation items 195686, Third Frontier Tax Exempt Operating, and 195620, Third Frontier Taxable - Operating, shall be used for operating expenses incurred in administering projects pursuant to sections 184.10 to 184.20 of the Revised Code. Operating expenses paid from appropriation item 195686 shall be limited to the administration of projects funded from the Third Frontier Research and Development Fund (Fund 7011), and operating expenses paid from appropriation item 195620 shall be limited to the administration of projects funded from the Third Frontier Research and Development Taxable Bond Project Fund (Fund 7014). THIRD FRONTIER RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT TAXABLE AND TAX EXEMPT PROJECTS The foregoing appropriation items 195687, Third Frontier Research and Development Projects, and 195692, Research and Development Taxable Bond Projects, shall be used to fund selected projects, which may include internship programs. Eligible costs are those costs of research and development projects to which the proceeds of Fund 7011 and Fund 7014 are to be applied. TRANSFERS OF THIRD FRONTIER APPROPRIATIONS The Director of Budget and Management may approve written requests from the Director of Development for the transfer of appropriations between appropriation items 195687, Third Frontier Research and Development Projects, and 195692, Research and Development Taxable Bond Projects, based upon awards recommended by the Third Frontier Commission. In fiscal year 2026, the Director of Development may request that the Director of Budget and Management reappropriate any unexpended, unencumbered balances of the prior fiscal year's appropriation to the foregoing appropriation items 195687, Third Frontier Research and Development Projects, and 195692, Research and Development Taxable Bond Projects, for fiscal year 2026. The Director of Budget and Management may request additional information necessary for evaluating these requests, and the Director of Development shall provide the requested information to the Director of Budget and Management. Based on the information provided by the Director of Development, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine the amounts to be reappropriated, and those amounts are hereby reappropriated for fiscal year 2026. Section 259.70. BROADBAND EQUITY, ACCESS, AND DEPLOYMENT PROGRAM (BEAD) The foregoing appropriation item 1956E4, Broadband Equity, Access, and Deployment Program (BEAD), shall be used to build infrastructure that supports the adoption of high-speed internet. HEAP WEATHERIZATION Up to twenty-five per cent of the federal funds deposited to the credit of the Home Energy Assistance Block Grant Fund (Fund 3K90) may be expended from appropriation item 195614, HEAP Weatherization, to provide home weatherization services in the state as determined by the Director of Development. Section 261.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DDD DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 320411 Special Olympics $250,000 $250,000 D GRF 320412 Protective Services $3,200,000 $3,200,000 E GRF 320415 Developmental Disabilities Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments $27,500,000 $24,200,000 F GRF 322422 Multi System Youth $5,000,000 $5,000,000 G GRF 322423 Technology First $2,700,000 $2,700,000 H GRF 322508 Employment First Initiative $2,700,000 $2,700,000 I GRF 322509 Community Supports and Rental Assistance $1,265,000 $944,000 J GRF 322510 Best Buddies Ohio $100,000 $100,000 K GRF 653321 Medicaid Program Support - State $8,163,217 $8,300,000 L GRF 653407 Medicaid Services $1,127,127,000 $1,140,627,000 M General Revenue Fund Total $1,178,005,217 $1,188,021,000 N Dedicated Purpose Fund Group O 2210 322620 Supplement Service Trust $500,000 $500,000 P 4890 653632 Developmental Centers Direct Care Services $7,000,000 $7,000,000 Q 5DK0 322629 Capital Replacement Facilities $750,000 $750,000 R 5EV0 653627 Medicaid Program Support $2,540,000 $2,540,000 S 5GE0 320606 Central Office Operating Expenses $20,914,384 $21,180,026 T 5GE0 653606 ICF/IID and Waiver Match $60,000,000 $60,000,000 U 5H00 322619 Medicaid Repayment $900,000 $900,000 V 5S20 653622 Medicaid Administration and Oversight $36,000,000 $36,000,000 W 5Z10 653624 County Board Waiver Match $688,000,000 $752,000,000 X Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $816,604,384 $880,870,026 Y Internal Service Activity Fund Group Z 1520 653609 DC and Residential Facilities Operating Services $20,000,000 $20,000,000 AA Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $20,000,000 $20,000,000 AB Federal Fund Group AC 3250 322612 Community Social Service Programs $15,075,000 $15,075,000 AD 3A40 653654 Medicaid Services $3,385,530,510 $3,545,767,920 AE 3A40 653655 Medicaid Support $92,000,000 $97,000,000 AF 3A50 320613 Developmental Disabilities Council $3,369,230 $3,408,234 AG Federal Fund Group Total $3,495,974,740 $3,661,251,154 AH TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,510,584,341 $5,750,142,180 Section 261.20. SPECIAL OLYMPICS The foregoing appropriation item 320411, Special Olympics, shall be distributed by the Ohio Department of Developmental Disabilities to the Special Olympics of Ohio in support of the Ohio Special Olympics Summer Games. Section 261.30. DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES FACILITIES LEASE-RENTAL BOND PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 320415, Developmental Disabilities Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments, shall be used to meet all payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, by the Department of Developmental Disabilities pursuant to leases and agreements made under section 154.20 of the Revised Code. These appropriations are the source of funds pledged for bond service charges on related obligations issued under Chapter 154. of the Revised Code. Section 261.40. MULTI-SYSTEM YOUTH Of the foregoing appropriation item 322422, Multi-System Youth, a portion may be used to provide a subsidy to eligible county boards of developmental disabilities for the provision of respite services and other services and supports for youth with complex or multi-system needs to enable them to remain in their homes with their families or in their communities. The Director of Developmental Disabilities shall establish the total amount available for the subsidy, a formula for distributing the subsidy to eligible county boards, and the eligibility requirements county boards must satisfy to receive the subsidy. Section 261.50. TECHNOLOGY FIRST Of the foregoing appropriation item 322423, Technology First, a portion may be used to increase access and utilization of innovative technology for people with developmental disabilities in accordance with the Technology First Policy established in section 5123.025 of the Revised Code. Section 261.60. EMPLOYMENT FIRST INITIATIVE The foregoing appropriation item 322508, Employment First Initiative, shall be used to increase employment opportunities for individuals with developmental disabilities through the Employment First Initiative in accordance with section 5123.022 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item, 322508, Employment First Initiative, the Director of Developmental Disabilities shall transfer, in each fiscal year, to the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities Agency an amount agreed upon by the Director of Developmental Disabilities and the Executive Director of the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities Agency. The transfer shall be made via an intrastate transfer voucher. The transferred funds shall be used to support the Employment First Initiative. The Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities Agency shall use the funds transferred as state matching funds to obtain available federal grant dollars for vocational rehabilitation services. Any federal match dollars received by the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities Agency shall be used for the initiative. The Director of Developmental Disabilities and the Executive Director of the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities Agency shall enter into an interagency agreement in accordance with section 3304.181 of the Revised Code that will specify the responsibilities of each agency under the initiative. Under the interagency agreement, the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities Agency shall retain responsibility for eligibility determination, order of selection, plan approval, plan amendment, and release of vendor payments. The remainder of appropriation item 322508, Employment First Initiative, shall be used to develop a long-term, sustainable system that places individuals with developmental disabilities in community employment, as defined in section 5123.022 of the Revised Code. Section 261.61. ACHIEVEMENT CENTERS FOR CHILDREN Of the foregoing appropriation item 322509, Community Supports and Rental Assistance, $190,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Achievement Centers for Children to provide family support services and respite care for children with disabilities and their families. Section 261.62. HUDSON COMMUNITY LIVING Of the foregoing appropriation item 322509, Community Supports and Rental Assistance, $225,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $54,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed to Hudson Community Living to support maintenance and operations in serving adults with developmental disabilities. Section 261.70. COMMUNITY SUPPORTS AND RENTAL ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item 322509, Community Supports and Rental Assistance, may be used by the Director of Developmental Disabilities to provide funding to county boards of developmental disabilities for rental assistance to individuals with developmental disabilities receiving home and community-based services as defined in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code pursuant to section 5124.60 of the Revised Code or section 5124.69 of the Revised Code and individuals with developmental disabilities who enroll in a Medicaid waiver component providing home and community-based services after receiving preadmission counseling pursuant to section 5124.68 of the Revised Code. The Director shall establish the methodology for determining the amount and distribution of such funding. Section 261.72. FRIENDSHIP CIRCLE OF CLEVELAND Of the foregoing appropriation item 322509, Community Supports and Rental Assistance, $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to the Friendship Circle of Cleveland to provide family support services and respite care for children with disabilities and their families. Section 261.73. BEST BUDDIES OHIO The foregoing appropriation item 322510, Best Buddies Ohio, shall be provided to the Best Buddies Ohio program to support the delivery and expansion of skills-building services throughout Ohio schools and communities. Section 261.80. MEDICAID SERVICES (A) As used in this section: (1) "Home and community-based services" has the same meaning as in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "ICF/IID services" has the same meaning as in section 5124.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in section 5123.0416 of the Revised Code, the purposes for which the foregoing appropriation item 653407, Medicaid Services, shall be used include the following: (1) Home and community-based services; (2) ICF/IID services; and (3) Other programs as identified by the Director of Developmental Disabilities. Section 261.90. CENTRAL OFFICE OPERATING EXPENSES Of the foregoing appropriation item 320606, Central Office Operating Expenses, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to the Ohio Center for Autism and Low Incidence to establish a lifespan autism hub to support families and professionals. Section 261.100. COUNTY BOARD SHARE OF WAIVER SERVICES As used in this section, "home and community-based services" has the same meaning as in section 5123.01 of the Revised Code. The Director of Developmental Disabilities shall establish a methodology to be used in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 to estimate the quarterly amount each county board of developmental disabilities is to pay of the nonfederal share of home and community-based services that section 5126.0510 of the Revised Code requires county boards to pay. Each quarter, the Director shall submit to a county board written notice of the amount the county board is to pay for that quarter. The notice shall specify when the payment is due. Section 261.110. WITHHOLDING OF FUNDS OWED THE DEPARTMENT If a county board of developmental disabilities does not fully pay any amount owed to the Department of Developmental Disabilities by the due date established by the Department, the Director of Developmental Disabilities may withhold the amount the county board did not pay from any amounts due to the county board. The Director may use any appropriation item or fund used by the Department to transfer cash to any other fund used by the Department in an amount equal to the amount owed the Department that the county board did not pay. Transfers under this section shall be made using an intrastate transfer voucher. Section 261.120. ODODD INNOVATIVE PILOT PROJECTS (A) In fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the Director of Developmental Disabilities may authorize the continuation or implementation of one or more innovative pilot projects that, in the judgment of the Director, are likely to assist in promoting the objectives of Chapter 5123. or 5126. of the Revised Code. Subject to division (B) of this section and notwithstanding any provision of Chapters 5123. and 5126. of the Revised Code and any rule adopted under either chapter, a pilot project authorized by the Director may be continued or implemented in a manner inconsistent with one or more provisions of either chapter or one or more rules adopted under either chapter. Before authorizing a pilot program, the Director shall consult with entities interested in the issue of developmental disabilities, including the Ohio Provider Resource Association, Ohio Association of County Boards of Developmental Disabilities, Ohio Health Care Association/Ohio Centers for Intellectual Disabilities, the Values and Faith Alliance, and ARC of Ohio. (B) The Director may not authorize a pilot project to be implemented in a manner that would cause the state to be out of compliance with any requirements for a program funded in whole or in part with federal funds. Section 261.130. PAYMENT RATES FOR HOMEMAKER/PERSONAL CARE SERVICES PROVIDED TO QUALIFYING IO ENROLLEES (A) As used in this section: (1) "Converted facility" means an ICF/IID, or former ICF/IID, that converted some or all of its beds to providing home and community-based services under the IO Waiver pursuant to section 5124.60 of the Revised Code. (2) "Developmental center" and "ICF/IID" have the same meanings as in section 5124.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "IO Waiver" means the Medicaid waiver component, as defined in section 5166.01 of the Revised Code, known as Individual Options. (4) "Medicaid provider" has the same meaning as in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Public hospital" has the same meaning as in section 5122.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Qualifying IO enrollee" means an IO Waiver enrollee to whom all of the following apply: (a) The enrollee resided in a developmental center, converted facility, or public hospital immediately before enrolling in the IO Wavier. (b) The enrollee did not receive before July 1, 2011, routine homemaker/personal care services from the Medicaid provider that is to be paid the Medicaid rate authorized by this section for providing such services to the enrollee during the period specified in division (C) of this section. (c) The Director of Developmental Disabilities has determined that the enrollee's special circumstances (including the enrollee's diagnosis, service needs, or length of stay at the developmental center, converted facility, or public hospital) warrants paying the Medicaid rate authorized by this section. (B) The total Medicaid payment rate for each fifteen minutes of routine homemaker/personal care services that a Medicaid provider provides to a qualifying IO enrollee during the period specified in division (C) of this section shall be fifty-two cents higher than the Medicaid payment rate in effect on the day the services are provided for each fifteen minutes of routine homemaker/personal care services that a Medicaid provider provides to an IO enrollee who is not a qualifying IO enrollee. (C) Division (B) of this section applies to the first twelve months, consecutive or otherwise, that a Medicaid provider, during the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending July 1, 2027, provides routine homemaker/personal care services to a qualifying IO enrollee. (D) Of the foregoing appropriation items 653407, Medicaid Services, and 653654, Medicaid Services, portions shall be used to pay the Medicaid payment rate determined in accordance with this section for routine homemaker/personal care services provided to qualifying IO enrollees. Section 261.140. ICF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PAYMENTS Of the foregoing appropriation items 653407, Medicaid Services, and 653654, Medicaid Services, a portion of each appropriation item shall be used in fiscal year 2026 in accordance with this section and section 5124.15 of the Revised Code. The funds shall be used to maintain rates supporting the professional workforce development payment, as provided in division (A)(5)(c) of section 5124.15 of the Revised Code. Section 263.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A SBE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 210602 Operating Expenses $15,010,991 $15,519,872 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $15,010,991 $15,519,872 E Federal Fund Group F 3IS0 210601 Title II A/Supporting Effective Instruction $1,355,000 $1,355,000 G Federal Fund Group Total $1,355,000 $1,355,000 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $16,365,991 $16,874,872 Section 263.20. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION LICENSURE FUND TO THE OCCUPATIONAL LICENSING AND REGULATORY FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the cash balance in the State Board of Education Licensure Fund (Fund 4L20) to the Occupational Licensing and Regulatory Fund (Fund 4K90). Upon completion of the transfer, Fund 4L20 is hereby abolished. The Director shall cancel any existing encumbrances against appropriation item 210600, Operating Expenses, and reestablish them against appropriation item 210602, Operating Expenses. The reestablished encumbrance amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 265.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A EDU DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 200321 Operating Expenses $14,474,898 $15,054,312 D GRF 200416 Career Technical Education $2,500,000 $2,500,000 E GRF 200420 Information Technology Development and Support $4,231,479 $4,316,527 F GRF 200422 School Management Assistance $2,800,000 $2,800,000 G GRF 200424 Policy Analysis $500,000 $516,419 H GRF 200426 Ohio Educational Computer Network $18,994,000 $18,994,000 I GRF 200427 Academic Standards $5,535,410 $5,429,033 J GRF 200437 Student Assessment $50,609,125 $50,882,346 K GRF 200439 Accountability/Report Cards $7,369,440 $7,437,742 L GRF 200446 Education Management Information System $9,958,226 $10,325,278 M GRF 200448 Educator and Principal Preparation $2,663,493 $2,676,754 N GRF 200455 Community Schools and Choice Programs $4,370,165 $4,446,705 O GRF 200457 STEM Initiatives $500,000 $500,000 P GRF 200465 Education Technology Resources $2,893,949 $2,906,346 Q GRF 200478 Industry-Recognized Credentials High School Students $16,000,000 $16,000,000 R GRF 200502 Pupil Transportation $882,035,414 $959,429,701 S GRF 200505 School Meal Programs $13,163,000 $13,163,000 T GRF 200511 Auxiliary Services $170,292,963 $172,262,613 U GRF 200532 Nonpublic Administrative Cost Reimbursement $76,935,110 $77,824,960 V GRF 200540 Special Education Enhancements $193,272,426 $193,272,426 W GRF 200545 Career-Technical Education Enhancements $13,413,000 $13,413,000 X GRF 200550 Foundation Funding - All Students $8,457,598,772 $8,733,217,991 Y GRF 200566 Literacy Improvement $2,472,674 $2,500,000 Z GRF 200572 Adult Education Programs $9,348,399 $15,688,404 AA GRF 200574 Half-Mill Maintenance Equalization $6,420,640 $6,152,450 AB GRF 200576 Adaptive Sports Program $400,000 $400,000 AC GRF 200597 Program and Project Support $2,850,000 $2,750,000 AD General Revenue Fund Total $9,971,602,583 $10,334,860,007 AE Dedicated Purpose Fund Group AF 4520 200638 Charges and Reimbursements $1,500,000 $1,500,000 AG 5980 200659 Auxiliary Services Reimbursement $650,000 $650,000 AH 5H30 200687 School District Solvency Assistance $2,000,000 $2,000,000 AI 5KX0 200691 Ohio School Sponsorship Program $1,900,000 $1,900,000 AJ 5MM0 200677 Child Nutrition Refunds $550,000 $550,000 AK 5U20 200685 National Education Statistics $185,000 $185,000 AL 5VS0 200604 Foundation Funding - All Students $600,000,000 $600,000,000 AM 5YO0 200491 Public and Nonpublic Education Support $171,200,000 $171,200,000 AN 6200 200615 Educational Improvement Grants $600,000 $600,000 AO Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $778,585,000 $778,585,000 AP Internal Service Activity Fund Group AQ 1380 200606 Information Technology Development and Support $18,394,387 $18,597,721 AR 4R70 200695 Indirect Operational Support $9,944,311 $10,166,435 AS 4V70 200633 Interagency Program Support $3,000,000 $3,000,000 AT Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $31,338,698 $31,764,156 AU State Lottery Fund Group AV 7017 200413 School Bus Safety $10,000,000 $0 AW 7017 200612 Foundation Funding - All Students $1,436,583,202 $1,398,174,884 AX 7017 200614 Accelerate Great Schools $1,500,000 $1,500,000 AY 7017 200631 Quality Community and Independent STEM Schools Support $115,000,000 $125,000,000 AZ 7017 200684 Community School Facilities $90,155,000 $90,155,000 BA 7017 2006A7 Literacy Coaches $12,000,000 $12,000,000 BB State Lottery Fund Group Total $1,665,238,202 $1,626,829,884 BC Federal Fund Group BD 3120 2006A9 Aspire - Federal $0 $18,996,799 BE 3670 200607 School Food Services $13,379,350 $13,379,350 BF 3700 200624 Education of Exceptional Children $1,750,000 $1,750,000 BG 3AF0 657601 Schools Medicaid Administrative Claims $150,000 $150,000 BH 3EH0 200620 Migrant Education $1,700,000 $1,700,000 BI 3EJ0 200622 Homeless Children Education $4,823,000 $5,112,380 BJ 3GE0 200674 Summer Food Service Program $23,000,000 $23,000,000 BK 3GG0 200676 Fresh Fruit and Vegetable Program $5,500,000 $6,000,000 BL 3HF0 200649 Federal Education Grants $5,000,000 $5,000,000 BM 3HI0 200634 Student Support and Academic Enrichment $54,131,000 $50,604,930 BN 3HL0 200678 Comprehensive Literacy State Development Program $14,630,000 $14,630,000 BO 3L60 200617 Federal School Lunch $565,999,000 $595,000,000 BP 3L70 200618 Federal School Breakfast $195,000,000 $205,000,000 BQ 3L80 200619 Child/Adult Food Programs $116,000,000 $118,000,000 BR 3L90 200621 Career-Technical Education Basic Grant $56,680,000 $58,947,200 BS 3M00 200623 ESEA Title 1A $677,740,000 $698,072,200 BT 3M20 200680 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act $530,400,000 $541,008,000 BU 3Y20 200688 21st Century Community Learning Centers $47,940,000 $48,898,800 BV 3Y60 200635 Improving Teacher Quality $77,157,900 $78,701,058 BW 3Y70 200689 English Language Acquisition $13,728,000 $14,277,120 BX 3Y80 200639 Rural and Low Income Technical Assistance $3,300,000 $3,300,000 BY 3Z20 200690 State Assessments $11,500,000 $11,500,000 BZ 3Z30 200645 Consolidated Federal Grant Administration $15,000,000 $15,000,000 CA Federal Fund Group Total $2,434,508,250 $2,528,027,837 CB TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $14,881,272,733 $15,300,066,884 Section 265.20. CAREER-TECHNICAL EDUCATION A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 200416, Career-Technical Education, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to provide matching funds related to career-technical education under 20 U.S.C. 2321. Section 265.30. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT AND SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 200420, Information Technology Development and Support, shall be used to support the development and implementation of information technology solutions designed to improve the performance and services of the Department of Education and Workforce. Funds may be used for personnel, maintenance, and equipment costs related to the development and implementation of these technical system projects. Implementation of these systems shall allow the Department to provide greater levels of assistance to school districts and to provide more timely information to the public, including school districts, administrators, and legislators. Funds may also be used to support data-driven decision-making and differentiated instruction, as well as to communicate academic content standards and curriculum models to schools through web-based applications. Section 265.40. SCHOOL MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE The foregoing appropriation item 200422, School Management Assistance, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to provide fiscal technical assistance and inservice education for school district management personnel and to administer, monitor, and implement the fiscal caution, fiscal watch, and fiscal emergency provisions under Chapter 3316. of the Revised Code. Section 265.50. POLICY ANALYSIS The foregoing appropriation item 200424, Policy Analysis, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to support a system of administrative and statistical education information to be used for policy analysis. Staff supported by this appropriation shall administer the development of reports, analyses, and briefings regarding current trends in education practice, efficient and effective use of resources, and evaluation of programs to improve education results. A portion of these funds shall be used to maintain a longitudinal database to support the assessment of the impact of policies and programs on Ohio's education and workforce development systems. The research efforts supported by this appropriation item shall be used to supply information and analysis of data to and in consultation with the General Assembly and other state policymakers, including the Office of Budget and Management and the Legislative Service Commission. Section 265.60. OHIO EDUCATIONAL COMPUTER NETWORK The foregoing appropriation item 200426, Ohio Educational Computer Network, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to maintain a system of information technology throughout Ohio and to provide technical assistance for such a system. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200426, Ohio Educational Computer Network, up to $8,425,500 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department to support connection of all public school buildings and participating chartered nonpublic schools to the state's education network, to each other, and to the Internet. In each fiscal year, the Department shall use these funds to assist information technology centers or school districts with the operational costs associated with this connectivity. The Department shall develop a formula and guidelines for the distribution of these funds to information technology centers or individual school districts. As used in this section, "public school building" means a school building of any city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, any community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, any college preparatory boarding school established under Chapter 3328. of the Revised Code, any STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code, any educational service center building used for instructional purposes, the Ohio School for the Deaf and the Ohio State School for the Blind, high schools chartered by the Ohio Department of Youth Services, or high schools operated by Ohio Department of Rehabilitation and Corrections' Ohio Central School System. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200426, Ohio Educational Computer Network, up to $6,305,000 in each fiscal year shall be used, through a formula and guidelines devised by the Department, to support the activities of designated information technology centers, as defined by Department of Education and Workforce rules, to provide school districts and chartered nonpublic schools with computer-based student and teacher instructional and administrative information services, including approved computerized financial accounting, to ensure the effective operation of local automated administrative and instructional systems, and to monitor and support the quality of data submitted to the Department. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200426, Ohio Educational Computer Network, up to $1,650,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department to support cybersecurity initiatives led by the Management Council of the Ohio Computer Education Network in public and nonpublic schools. Efforts may include, but shall not be limited to, vulnerability management, security awareness training, multifactor authentication, and endpoint detection and response capabilities. In determining the specific cybersecurity programs and initiatives the foregoing appropriation item will support, the Department shall consult with the Governor's Cybersecurity Strategic Advisor. The remainder of appropriation item 200426, Ohio Educational Computer Network, shall be used to support the work of the development, maintenance, and operation of a network of uniform and compatible computer-based information systems as well as the teacher student linkage/roster verification process and systems to support electronic sharing of student records and transcripts between entities. This technical assistance shall include, but not be restricted to, development and maintenance of adequate computer software systems to support network activities. In order to improve the efficiency of network activities, the Department and information technology centers may jointly purchase equipment, materials, and services from funds provided under this appropriation for use by the network and, when considered practical by the Department, may utilize the services of appropriate state purchasing agencies. Section 265.70. ACADEMIC STANDARDS Of the foregoing appropriation item 200427, Academic Standards, up to $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to contract with experts in civics education and social studies to develop an integrated model curriculum that includes English language arts, social studies, and civics education. The model curriculum shall include support for content, instruction, and assessment. The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 200427, Academic Standards, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to develop and communicate to school districts academic content standards and curriculum models and to develop professional development programs and other tools on the new content standards and model curricula. Section 265.80. STUDENT ASSESSMENT Of the foregoing appropriation item 200437, Student Assessment, up to $622,713 in each fiscal year shall be used to reimburse a portion of the costs associated with Advanced Placement and College-Level Examination Program tests for low-income students, as determined by the Department. If the funds provided by the Department through this set-aside and federal funds are not sufficient to cover the costs of Advanced Placement, College-Level Examination, and International Baccalaureate tests for low-income students, school districts and other public schools shall pay the remainder of the costs using other funds. The remainder of appropriation item 200437, Student Assessment, shall be used to develop, field test, print, distribute, score, report results, and support other associated costs for the tests required under sections 3301.0710, 3301.0711, and 3301.0712 of the Revised Code and for similar purposes as required by section 3301.27 of the Revised Code. The funds may also be used to update and develop diagnostic assessments administered under sections 3301.079, 3301.0715, and 3313.608 of the Revised Code and to support readiness assessments for students in grades three and higher that assist districts and schools with identifying and benchmarking student progress. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE APPROPRIATION TRANSFERS FOR STUDENT ASSESSMENT In fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, if the Director of Education and Workforce determines that additional funds are needed to fully fund the requirements of sections 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, and 3301.27 of the Revised Code and this act for assessments of student performance, the Director may recommend to the Director of Budget and Management the reallocation of unexpended and unencumbered General Revenue Fund appropriations within the Department of Education and Workforce to appropriation item 200437, Student Assessment. If the Director of Budget and Management determines that such a reallocation is required, the Director, subject to Controlling Board approval, may transfer unexpended and unencumbered appropriations within the Department of Education and Workforce as necessary to appropriation item 200437, Student Assessment. Section 265.90. ACCOUNTABILITY/REPORT CARDS Of the foregoing appropriation item 200439, Accountability/Report Cards, a portion in each fiscal year shall be used to train district and regional specialists and district educators in the use of the value-added progress dimension and in the use of data as it relates to improving student achievement. This training may include teacher and administrator professional development in the use of data to improve instruction and student learning, and teacher and administrator training in understanding teacher value-added reports and how they can be used as a component in measuring teacher and administrator effectiveness. The remainder of appropriation item 200439, Accountability/Report Cards, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to incorporate a statewide value-added progress dimension into performance ratings for school districts and for the development of an accountability system that includes the preparation and distribution of school report cards, funding and expenditure accountability reports under sections 3302.03 and 3302.031 of the Revised Code, the development and maintenance of teacher value-added reports, the teacher student linkage/roster verification process, and the performance management section of the Department's web site required by section 3302.26 of the Revised Code. Section 265.100. EDUCATION MANAGEMENT INFORMATION SYSTEM The foregoing appropriation item 200446, Education Management Information System, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to maintain and improve the Education Management Information System (EMIS). Of the foregoing appropriation item 200446, Education Management Information System, up to $405,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support grants to information technology centers to provide professional development opportunities to district and school personnel related to the EMIS, with a focus placed on data submission and data quality. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200446, Education Management Information System, up to $950,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to designated information technology centers for costs relating to processing, storing, and transferring data for the effective operation of the EMIS. These costs may include, but are not limited to, personnel, hardware, software development, communications connectivity, professional development, and support services. The remainder of appropriation item 200446, Education Management Information System, shall be used to develop and support the data definitions and standards outlined in the EMIS guidelines adopted under section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code, to implement recommendations of the EMIS Advisory Council and the Director of Education and Workforce, to enhance data quality assurance practices, and to support responsibilities related to the school report cards prescribed by section 3302.03 of the Revised Code and value-added progress dimension calculations. Section 265.110. EDUCATOR AND PRINCIPAL PREPARATION (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 200448, Educator and Principal Preparation, up to $1,612,500 in each fiscal year shall be used, in consultation with the Department of Veterans Services, to support the Ohio Military Veteran Educators Program, which may do all of the following: (1) Administer a grant program for institutions of higher education to provide financial incentives and assistance for eligible military individuals, as defined in section 3319.285 of the Revised Code, to enroll in and complete an educator preparation program approved under section 3333.048 of the Revised Code; (2) Subsidize the costs for eligible military individuals associated with completing college coursework or professional development in pedagogy for the purpose of obtaining an alternative military educator license pursuant to section 3319.285 of the Revised Code or advancing to the professional license pursuant to section 3319.22 of the Revised Code; (3) Provide funds to public schools, educational service centers, and county boards of developmental disabilities to support activities to recruit eligible military individuals to work in public schools and support bonuses to public schools that hire eligible military individuals; (4) Reimburse public schools, educational service centers, and county boards of developmental disabilities that pay financial bonuses to eligible military individuals who complete at least one year of employment with the school; (5) In consultation with the Department of Veterans Services, establish and support the Governor's Ohio Military Veteran Educators Fellowship Pilot Program to recruit and train eligible military individuals to become licensed to teach in low-performing public schools. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 200448, Educator and Principal Preparation, up to $350,993 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $364,254 in fiscal year 2027 may be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to monitor and support Ohio's State System of Support, as defined by the Every Student Succeeds Act. (C) Of the foregoing appropriation item 200448, Educator and Principal Preparation, up to $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the SmartOhio Financial Literacy Program at the University of Cincinnati. (D) Of the foregoing appropriation item 200448, Educator and Principal Preparation, $200,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support selected school staff through the FASTER Saves Lives Program for the purpose of stopping active shooters and treating casualties. (E) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, awards under this section may be used by recipients for award-related expenses incurred for a period not to exceed two years from the date of the award. Section 265.120. COMMUNITY SCHOOLS AND CHOICE PROGRAMS The foregoing appropriation item 200455, Community Schools and Choice Programs, may be used by the Department of Education and Workforce for the oversight and support of community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, community school sponsors, and nonpublic schools; and the administration of school choice programs. The funds may be used to support the sponsor evaluation system in accordance with section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. Section 265.125. STEM INITIATIVES The foregoing appropriation item 200457, STEM Initiatives, shall be distributed to the Alliance for Working Together Foundation to support the expansion of STEAM to Career programming for youth and adult students. Section 265.130. EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY RESOURCES Of the foregoing appropriation item 200465, Education Technology Resources, up to $2,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for the Union Catalog and InfOhio Network and to support the provision of electronic resources with priority given to resources that support the teaching of state academic content standards in all public schools and resources in support of Ohio's Plan to Raise Literacy Achievement. The Department of Education and Workforce shall consider coordinating the allocation of these moneys with the efforts of Libraries Connect Ohio, whose members include OhioLINK, the Ohio Public Information Network, and the State Library of Ohio. Section 265.140. INDUSTRY-RECOGNIZED CREDENTIALS HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS City, local, and exempted village school districts, community schools, STEM schools, and joint vocational school districts shall inform students enrolled in career-technical education courses that lead to an industry-recognized credential about the opportunity to earn these credentials. The educating entity shall pay for the cost of the credential. The foregoing appropriation item 200478, Industry-Recognized Credentials High School Students, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce and the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation to operate the Innovative Workforce Incentive Program. The Office of Workforce Transformation shall maintain a list of credentials that qualify for the program. The Department of Education and Workforce shall pay each city, local, and exempted village school district, community school, STEM school, and joint vocational school district an amount equal to $725 for each qualifying credential a student attending the district or school earned in the school year preceding the fiscal year in which the funds are appropriated. If the amount appropriated is not sufficient, the Department shall prorate the amounts so that the aggregate amount appropriated is not exceeded. Section 265.150. PUPIL TRANSPORTATION Of the foregoing appropriation item 200502, Pupil Transportation, up to $1,088,930 in each fiscal year may be used by the Department of Education and Workforce for training prospective and experienced school bus drivers in accordance with training programs prescribed by the Department. A portion of these funds may also be used to pay for costs associated with the enrollment of bus drivers in the retained applicant fingerprint database. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200502, Pupil Transportation, up to $176,897,678 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $194,820,866 in fiscal year 2027 may be used by the Department for special education transportation reimbursements to school districts, educational service centers, and county boards of developmental disabilities for transportation operating costs as provided in divisions (C) and (F) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200502, Pupil Transportation, up to $450,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide rural transportation grants pursuant to the section of this act entitled "RURAL TRANSPORTATION GRANT PROGRAM." Of the foregoing appropriation item 200502, Pupil Transportation, up to $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Montgomery County Pupil Transportation Pilot Program established in Section 265.550 of H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly, as amended by this act. The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 200502, Pupil Transportation, shall be used to distribute the amounts calculated for transportation aid under division (A)(2) of section 3317.019 and divisions (E), (F), (G), (H), and (I) of section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code. PAYMENTS IN LIEU OF TRANSPORTATION For purposes of division (D) of section 3327.02 of the Revised Code, if a parent, guardian, or other person in charge of a pupil accepts an offer from a school district of payment in lieu of providing transportation for the pupil, the school district shall pay that parent, guardian, or other person an amount not less than fifty per cent and not more than the amount determined by the Department under division (C) of section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code for the most recent school year for which data is available. Payment may be prorated if the time period involved is only a part of the school year. Section 265.160. SCHOOL MEAL PROGRAMS (A) The foregoing appropriation item 200505, School Meal Programs, shall be used to support the reimbursements required by section 3301.91 of the Revised Code and provide matching funds to obtain federal funds for the school lunch program. (B) Any remaining appropriation after providing matching funds for the school lunch program may be used to do the following: (1) Partially reimburse school buildings within school districts that are required to have a school breakfast program under section 3313.813 of the Revised Code, at a rate decided by the Department; (2) Support the Summer EBT Program in coordination with the Department of Job and Family Services. Section 265.170. AUXILIARY SERVICES Of the foregoing appropriation item 200511, Auxiliary Services, up to $2,600,000 in each fiscal year may be used for payment of the College Credit Plus Program for nonpublic secondary school participants. The Department of Education and Workforce shall distribute these funds according to rule 3333-1-65.8 of the Administrative Code, adopted by the Department of Higher Education pursuant to division (A) of section 3365.071 of the Revised Code. The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 200511, Auxiliary Services, shall be used by the Department to make payments under division (E) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code to implement sections 3317.06 and 3317.062 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal year 2026, school districts or chartered nonpublic schools may use the auxiliary services funding provided under division (E) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code to provide diagnostic or therapeutic mental health services to students enrolled in chartered nonpublic schools at any time during the fiscal year. Section 265.180. NONPUBLIC ADMINISTRATIVE COST REIMBURSEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 200532, Nonpublic Administrative Cost Reimbursement, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce for the purpose of implementing section 3317.063 of the Revised Code. Payments made by the Department for this purpose shall not exceed four hundred seventy-five dollars per student for each school year. Section 265.190. SPECIAL EDUCATION ENHANCEMENTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 200540, Special Education Enhancements, up to $33,945,594 in each fiscal year shall be used to fund special education and related services at county boards of developmental disabilities for eligible students under section 3317.20 of the Revised Code and at institutions for eligible students under section 3317.201 of the Revised Code. If necessary, the Department of Education and Workforce shall proportionately reduce the amount calculated for each county board of developmental disabilities and institution so as not to exceed the amount appropriated in each fiscal year. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200540, Special Education Enhancements, up to $1,350,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for parent mentoring programs. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200540, Special Education Enhancements, up to $3,000,000 in each fiscal year may be used for school psychology interns. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200540, Special Education Enhancements, up to $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to build capacity to deliver a regional system of training, support, coordination, and direct service for secondary transition services for students with disabilities beginning at fourteen years of age. These special education enhancements shall support all students with disabilities, regardless of partner agency eligibility requirements, to provide stand-alone direct secondary transition services by school districts. Secondary transition services shall include, but not be limited to, job exploration counseling, work-based learning experiences, counseling on opportunities for enrollment in comprehensive transition or post-secondary educational programs at institutions of higher education, workplace readiness training to develop occupational skills, social skills and independent living skills, and instruction in self-advocacy. Regional training shall support the expansion of transition to work endorsement opportunities for middle school and secondary level special education intervention specialists in order to develop the necessary skills and competencies to meet the secondary transition needs of students with disabilities beginning at fourteen years of age. The remainder of appropriation item 200540, Special Education Enhancements, shall be distributed by the Department of Education and Workforce to school districts and institutions, as defined in section 3323.091 of the Revised Code, for preschool special education funding under section 3317.0213 of the Revised Code. The Department may reimburse school districts and institutions for services provided by instructional assistants, related services, as defined in rule 3301-51-11 of the Administrative Code, physical therapy services provided by a licensed physical therapist or physical therapist assistant under the supervision of a licensed physical therapist, as required under Chapter 4755. of the Revised Code and Chapter 4755-27 of the Administrative Code, and occupational therapy services provided by a licensed occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant under the supervision of a licensed occupational therapist, as required under Chapter 4755. of the Revised Code and Chapter 4755-7 of the Administrative Code. Nothing in this section authorizes occupational therapy assistants or physical therapist assistants to generate or manage their own caseloads. The Department shall require school districts that serve preschool special education students and either receive funds under the Early Childhood Education Grant Program established pursuant to section 5104.53 of the Revised Code or provide publicly funded child care as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, educational service centers, county boards of developmental disabilities, and institutions serving preschool children with disabilities to adhere to the Step Up to Quality Program established pursuant to section 5104.29 of the Revised Code. Section 265.200. CAREER-TECHNICAL EDUCATION ENHANCEMENTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, up to $5,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to pay career awareness and exploration funds pursuant to division (E) of section 3317.014 of the Revised Code. If the amount appropriated is not sufficient, the Department of Education and Workforce shall prorate the amounts so that the aggregate amount appropriated is not exceeded. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, up to $2,563,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to fund secondary career-technical education at institutions and Ohio Deaf and Blind Education Services using a grant-based methodology, notwithstanding section 3317.05 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, up to $4,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department to fund competitive grants to an entity in each of the JobsOhio regions to expand the number of students with access to career-technical education, to support and provide technical assistance to schools and districts in the provision and expansion of career-technical education, to provide mentoring and career planning and advising to students attending public and chartered nonpublic schools, and to support adults who have a high school diploma but have never enrolled in post-secondary education. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, awards under this paragraph may be used by recipients for award-related expenses according to guidelines established by the Department of Education and Workforce for a period not to exceed two years from the date of the award. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, up to $600,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department to enable students in agricultural programs to enroll in a fifth quarter of instruction based on the agricultural education model of delivering work-based learning through supervised agricultural experience. The Department shall determine eligibility criteria and the reporting process for the Agriculture 5th Quarter Project and shall fund as many programs as possible given the set-aside. The eligibility criteria developed by the Department shall allow these funds to support supervised agricultural experience that occurs anytime outside of the regular school day. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, up to $650,000 in each fiscal year may be used to support career planning and reporting through the OhioMeansJobs web site. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to prepare students for careers in culinary arts and restaurant management under the Ohio ProStart school restaurant program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Tech Corps to support career-connected rural computer science programming. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200545, Career-Technical Education Enhancements, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce in partnership with the Department of Higher Education to fund early childhood to post-secondary regional partnerships. The Department of Education and Workforce shall distribute grants to qualifying partnerships to support regional collaboration programs among early learning, primary and secondary school, post-secondary institution, and workforce partners that align educational resources with regional in-demand jobs and workforce skills. Grants shall be awarded using a formula to be determined by the Department of Education and Workforce. Section 265.210. FOUNDATION FUNDING - ALL STUDENTS Of the portion of the formula aid distributed to city, local, and exempted village school districts, joint vocational school districts, community schools, and STEM schools under this section, an amount in each fiscal year, as calculated by the Department of Education and Workforce, shall be used for the purposes of division (B) of section 3317.0215 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, an amount in each fiscal year shall be used to make additional aid payments to city, local, and exempted village school districts pursuant to the section of this act entitled "PERFORMANCE SUPPLEMENT." Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $5,733,404 in each fiscal year shall be used to fund gifted education at educational service centers. The Department shall distribute the funding through the unit-based funding methodology in place under division (L) of section 3317.024, division (E) of section 3317.05, and divisions (A), (B), and (C) of section 3317.053 of the Revised Code as they existed prior to fiscal year 2010. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $49,152,105 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $51,023,465 in fiscal year 2027 shall be reserved to fund the state reimbursement of educational service centers under section 3317.11 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $3,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to educational service centers for school improvement initiatives and for the provision of technical assistance to schools and districts consistent with requirements of section 3312.01 of the Revised Code. The Department may distribute these funds through a competitive grant process. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $7,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be reserved for payments under the section of this act entitled "POWER PLANT VALUATION ADJUSTMENT." If this amount is not sufficient, the Director of Education and Workforce may reallocate excess funds for other purposes supported by this appropriation item in order to fully pay the amounts required by that section, provided that the aggregate amount appropriated in appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, is not exceeded. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $10,400,000 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $10,800,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used to support the administration of state scholarship programs. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding – All Students, up to $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Cleveland Municipal School District to provide tutorial assistance as provided in division (B) of section 3313.979 of the Revised Code. The Cleveland Municipal School District shall report the use of these funds in the district's three-year continuous improvement plan as described in section 3302.04 of the Revised Code in a manner approved by the Department. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $3,500,000 in each fiscal year may be used for payment of the College Credit Plus Program for students instructed at home pursuant to section 3321.04 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, an amount shall be available in each fiscal year to be paid to joint vocational school districts in accordance with sections 3317.16 and 3317.162 of the Revised Code and the section of this act entitled "FORMULA TRANSITION SUPPLEMENT." Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $700,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department for a program to pay for educational services for youth who have been assigned by a juvenile court or other authorized agency to any of the facilities described in division (A) of the section of this act entitled "PRIVATE TREATMENT FACILITY PROJECT." Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, a portion may be used to pay college-preparatory boarding schools the per pupil boarding amount pursuant to section 3328.34 of the Revised Code. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Ohio STEM Learning Network to support the expansion of free STEM programming aligned to Ohio's STEM priorities, to create regional STEM supports targeting underserved student populations, and to support the Ohio STEM Committee's STEM school designation process. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department to support the Stay in the Game! Network and efforts to reduce chronic absenteeism. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, up to $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to make payments pursuant to the section of this act entitled "AIM HIGHER PILOT PROGRAM." The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, shall be used to distribute the amounts calculated for formula aid under division (A)(1) of section 3317.019 of the Revised Code, sections 3317.022 and 3317.22 of the Revised Code, and the sections of this act entitled "FORMULA TRANSITION SUPPLEMENT" and "FUNDING SUPPLEMENTS." Appropriation items 200502, Pupil Transportation, and 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, other than specific set-asides, are collectively used in each fiscal year to pay state formula aid obligations for school districts, community schools, STEM schools, college preparatory boarding schools, joint vocational school districts, and state scholarship programs under this act. The first priority of these appropriation items, with the exception of specific set-asides, is to fund state formula aid obligations. It may be necessary to reallocate funds among these appropriation items or use excess funds from other General Revenue Fund appropriation items in the Department of Education and Workforce's budget, including appropriation item 200903, Property Tax Reimbursement - Education, in each fiscal year in order to meet state formula aid obligations. If it is determined that it is necessary to transfer funds among these appropriation items or to transfer funds from other General Revenue Fund appropriations in the Department's budget to meet state formula aid obligations, the Director of Education and Workforce shall seek approval from the Director of Budget and Management to transfer funds as needed. The Director of Education and Workforce shall make payments, transfers, and deductions, as authorized by Title XXXIII of the Revised Code in amounts substantially equal to those made in the prior year, or otherwise, at the discretion of the Director, until at least the effective date of the amendments and enactments made to Title XXXIII of the Revised Code by this act. Any funds paid to districts or schools under this section shall be credited toward the annual funds calculated for the district or school after the changes made to Title XXXIII of the Revised Code in this act are effective. Upon the effective date of changes made to Title XXXIII of the Revised Code in this act, funds shall be calculated as an annual amount. Section 265.211. During fiscal year 2027, if the Treasurer of State certifies to the Director of Budget and Management amounts transferred to the General Revenue Fund pursuant to division (I) of section 3310.24 of the Revised Code, such amounts are hereby appropriated for fiscal year 2027 in appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students. Section 265.215. ECONOMICALLY DISADVANTAGED STUDENT AVERAGE DAILY MEMBERSHIP (A) As used in this section: (1) "Directly certified ADM" means the average daily membership of students enrolled in a district or school for a fiscal year who are certified as categorically eligible for free meals as described in 7 C.F.R. 245.6 or successor regulations, as determined by the Department of Education and Workforce. (2) "Qualifying public school" means any of the following: (a) A city, local, or exempted village school district; (b) A joint vocational school district; (c) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that is not a newly opened community school; (d) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (3) "Newly opened community school" means a community school that opens for the first time in fiscal year 2026 or 2027. (C) Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, for fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the average daily membership of economically disadvantaged students for a qualifying public school is the average daily membership of economically disadvantaged students certified or reported to the Department for fiscal year 2025 under section 3314.08, 3317.03, or 3326.32 of the Revised Code. The Department shall calculate disadvantaged pupil impact aid for each qualifying public school under section 3317.022, 3317.026, or 3317.16 of the Revised Code for fiscal years 2026 and 2027, as follows: (The qualifying public school's average daily membership of economically disadvantaged students X 0.75 for fiscal year 2026 or 0.65 for fiscal year 2027) + (The qualifying public school's directly certified ADM for the fiscal year X 0.25 for fiscal year 2026 or 0.35 for fiscal year 2027) (D) Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, for fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department shall calculate disadvantaged pupil impact aid for each newly opened community school under sections 3317.022 and 3317.026 of the Revised Code using the school's directly certified ADM for the fiscal year. Section 265.220. PHASE-IN PERCENTAGES For purposes of division (X)(1) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, the General Assembly has determined that the general phase-in percentage for fiscal year 2026 shall be 83.33 per cent and the general phase-in percentage for fiscal year 2027 shall be 100 per cent. For purposes of division (X)(2) of section 3317.02 of the Revised Code, the General Assembly has determined that the phase-in percentage for disadvantaged pupil impact aid for fiscal year 2026 shall be 83.33 per cent and the phase-in percentage for disadvantaged pupil impact aid for fiscal year 2027 shall be 100 per cent. Section 265.230. FORMULA TRANSITION SUPPLEMENT (A)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall pay a formula transition supplement to each city, local, and exempted village school district according to the following formula: (The district's funding base for fiscal year 2021) - (the district's payments for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated under sections 3317.019, 3317.022, and 3317.0212 of the Revised Code) If the computation made under division (A)(1) of this section for a fiscal year results in a negative number, the district's formula transition supplement for that fiscal year shall be zero. (2) For purposes of division (A)(1) of this section, a city, local, or exempted village school district's "funding base for fiscal year 2021" means the amount calculated as follows: (a) Compute the sum of the following: (i) The amount calculated for the district for fiscal year 2021 under division (A)(1) of Section 265.220 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly and before any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, issued on May 7, 2020, and Executive Order 2021-01D, issued on January 22, 2021; (ii) The amount calculated for the district for fiscal year 2021 under division (A)(2) of Section 265.220 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly before any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, issued on May 7, 2020, and Executive Order 2021-01D, issued on January 22, 2021; (iii) The amount calculated for the district for fiscal year 2021 under division (B) of Section 265.220 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly; (iv) The district's payments for fiscal year 2021 under divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), and (4) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed for payments for fiscal year 2021; (v) The district's payments for fiscal year 2021 under section 3317.0219 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021 and under Section 20 of S.B. 310 of the 133rd General Assembly. (b) Subtract from the amount calculated in division (A)(2)(a) of this section the sum of the following: (i) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code for fiscal year 2021 under divisions (C)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), and (g) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code and division (D) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code, as those divisions existed for deductions and payments for fiscal year 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.230 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly, before any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, issued on May 7, 2020, and Executive Order 2021-01D, issued on January 22, 2021; (ii) The payments deducted from the district and paid to a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code for fiscal year 2021, under divisions (A), (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), and (G) of section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as those divisions existed for deductions and payments for fiscal year 2021, in accordance with division (A) of Section 265.235 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly, before any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, issued on May 7, 2020, and Executive Order 2021-01D, issued on January 22, 2021; (iii) The payments deducted from the district for fiscal year 2021 under division (C) of section 3310.08 of the Revised Code as that division existed for deductions for fiscal year 2021, division (C)(2) of section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, as that division existed for deductions for fiscal year 2021, and section 3310.55 of the Revised Code as that section existed for deductions for fiscal year 2021 and, in the case of a pilot project school district as defined in section 3313.975 of the Revised Code, the funds deducted from the district for fiscal year 2021 under Section 265.210 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly to operate the pilot project scholarship program for fiscal year 2021 under sections 3313.974 to 3313.979 of the Revised Code; (iv) The payments subtracted from the district for fiscal year 2021 under divisions (B)(1), (2), and (3) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, as those divisions existed for subtractions from the district for fiscal year 2021. (B)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall pay a formula transition supplement to each joint vocational school district according to the following formula: (The district's funding base for fiscal year 2021) - (the district's payments for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated under sections 3317.16 and 3317.162 of the Revised Code) If the computation made under division (B)(1) of this section for a fiscal year results in a negative number, the district's formula transition supplement for that fiscal year shall be zero. (2) For purposes of division (B)(1) of this section, a joint vocational district's "funding base for fiscal year 2021" means the sum of the following: (a) The district's payments for fiscal year 2021 under Section 265.225 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly after any adjustments required under Section 265.227 of H.B. 166 of the 133rd General Assembly; (b) The district's payments for fiscal year 2021 under divisions (D)(1) and (2) of section 3313.981 of the Revised Code, as those divisions existed for payments for fiscal year 2021; (c) The district's payments for fiscal year 2021 under section 3317.163 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021 and under Section 20 of S.B. 310 of the 133rd General Assembly. (C)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall pay a formula transition supplement to each community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code according to the following formula: [(The school's funding base for fiscal year 2021 / the number of students enrolled in the school for fiscal year 2021) – (the sum of the school's payments under sections 3317.022 and 3317.0212 of the Revised Code for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated / the number of students enrolled in the school for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated)] X the number of students enrolled in the school for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated. If the computation made under division (C)(1) of this section for a fiscal year results in a negative number, the school's formula transition supplement for that fiscal year shall be zero. (2) For purposes of division (C)(1) of this section, a community school's "funding base for fiscal year 2021" means the sum of the following: (a) The amount calculated for the school for fiscal year 2021 under division (C)(1) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021, before any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, issued on May 7, 2020, and Executive Order 2021-01D, issued on January 22, 2021; (b) The amount calculated for the school for fiscal year 2021 under section 3314.085 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021; (c) The amount calculated for the school for fiscal year 2021 under division (D)(1) of section 3314.091 of the Revised Code as that division existed for payments for fiscal year 2021; (d) The amount calculated for the school for fiscal year 2021 under section 3314.088 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021 and under Section 20 of S.B. 310 of the 133rd General Assembly. (D)(1) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall pay a formula transition supplement to each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code according to the following formula: [(The school's funding base for fiscal year 2021 / the number of students enrolled in the school for fiscal year 2021) – (the school's payments for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code / the number of students enrolled in the school for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated)] X the number of students enrolled in the school for the fiscal year for which the supplement is calculated. If the computation made under division (D)(1) of this section for a fiscal year results in a negative number, the school's formula transition supplement for that fiscal year shall be zero. (2) For purposes of division (D)(1) of this section, a science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school's "funding base for fiscal year 2021" means the sum of the following: (a) The amount calculated for the school for fiscal year 2021 under section 3326.33 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021, before any funding reductions authorized by Executive Order 2020-19D, issued on May 7, 2020, and Executive Order 2021-01D, issued on January 22, 2021; (b) The amount calculated for the school for fiscal year 2021 under section 3326.41 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021; (c) The amount calculated for the school for fiscal year 2021 under section 3326.42 of the Revised Code as that section existed for payments for fiscal year 2021 and under Section 20 of S.B. 310 of the 133rd General Assembly. Section 265.237. FUNDING SUPPLEMENTS (A) As used in this section, "traditional school district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district. (B) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall pay each traditional school district an enrollment growth supplement, as follows: (1) The Department shall calculate an enrollment change percentage for the district for the fiscal year, as follows: (a) For fiscal year 2026, the percentage is calculated according to the following formula: (The district's enrolled ADM for fiscal year 2025 – the district's enrolled ADM for fiscal year 2022) / the district's enrolled ADM for fiscal year 2022 X 100% (b) For fiscal year 2027, the percentage is calculated according to the following formula: (The district's enrolled ADM for fiscal year 2026 – the district's enrolled ADM for fiscal year 2023) / the district's enrolled ADM for fiscal year 2023 X 100% (2) For fiscal year 2026, for a district that has an enrollment change percentage that is five per cent or higher for the fiscal year, the Department shall pay the district an amount equal to the product of the district's enrolled ADM for the fiscal year multiplied by $225. The Department shall not make a payment for fiscal year 2026 to a district that has an enrollment change percentage for the fiscal year that is less than five per cent. (3) For fiscal year 2027, for a district that has an enrollment change percentage that is three per cent or higher for the fiscal year, the Department shall pay the district an amount equal to the product of the district's enrolled ADM for the fiscal year multiplied by $250. The Department shall not make a payment for fiscal year 2027 to a district that has an enrollment change percentage for the fiscal year that is less than three per cent. (C) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department shall pay each traditional and joint vocational school district, community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code a base funding supplement that is equal to the product of the district's or school's enrolled ADM for the fiscal year multiplied by either of the following: (1) For fiscal year 2026, $27; (2) For fiscal year 2027, $40. Section 265.239. PERFORMANCE SUPPLEMENT (A) As used in this section, "traditional school district" means a city, local, or exempted village school district. (B) For fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall pay each traditional school district a per-pupil performance supplement, as follows: (1) The Department shall determine whether a district is eligible for the supplement based on whether the district received any of the following on the state report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code for the 2024-2025 school year for fiscal year 2026, or the 2025-2026 school year for fiscal year 2027: (a) An overall performance rating of four or more stars; (b) A performance rating of three or more stars for the Progress component; (c) A higher performance rating on the Progress component than the district received for that component on the state report card issued for the 2023-2024 school year for fiscal year 2026, or the 2024-2025 school year for fiscal year 2027. (2) The Department shall calculate and pay the supplement to an eligible district for a fiscal year, as follows: The district's enrolled ADM for the fiscal year X $13 X the greater of the number of stars the district received for either the overall performance rating or the performance rating for the Progress component on the state report card for the 2024-2025 school year for fiscal year 2026, or the 2025-2026 school year for fiscal year 2027 Section 265.240. POWER PLANT VALUATION ADJUSTMENT (A)(1) On or before May 15, 2026, the Tax Commissioner shall determine all of the following for each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district that has at least one power plant located within its territory: (a) Whether the taxable value of all utility tangible personal property subject to taxation by the district in tax year 2025 was less than the taxable value of such property during tax year 2017; (b) Whether the taxable value of all utility tangible personal property subject to taxation by the district in tax year 2025 was less than the taxable value of such property during tax year 2024. (2) If the decrease determined under division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section exceeds ten per cent and the overall change in utility tangible personal property subject to taxation is negative, the Tax Commissioner shall certify all of the following to the Department of Education and Workforce and the Office of Budget and Management: (a) The district's total taxable value for tax year 2025; (b) The change in taxes charged and payable on the district's total taxable value for tax year 2017 and tax year 2025; (c) The taxable value of the utility tangible personal property decrease, which shall be considered a change in valuation; (d) The change in taxes charged and payable on such change in taxable value calculated in the same manner as in division (A)(3) of section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (3) Upon receipt of a certification under division (A)(2) of this section, the Department of Education and Workforce shall replace the three-year average valuations that were used in computing the district's state education aid for fiscal year 2019 with the taxable value certified under division (A)(2)(a) of this section and shall recompute the district's state education aid for fiscal year 2019 without applying any funding limitations enacted by the General Assembly to the computation. The Department shall pay to the district an amount equal to the greater of the following: (a) The lesser of the following: (i) The positive difference between the district's state education aid for fiscal year 2019 prior to the recomputation under division (A)(3) of this section and the district's recomputed state education aid for fiscal year 2019; (ii) The absolute value of the amount certified under division (A)(2)(b) of this section. (b) The absolute value of the amount certified under division (A)(2)(b) of this section X 0.50. (B)(1) On or before May 15, 2027, the Tax Commissioner shall determine for each city, local, exempted village, and joint vocational school district that has at least one power plant located within its territory: (a) Whether the taxable value of all utility tangible personal property subject to taxation by the district in tax year 2026 was less than the taxable value of such property during tax year 2017; (b) Whether the taxable value of all utility tangible personal property subject to taxation by the district in tax year 2026 was less than the taxable value of such property during tax year 2025. (2) If the decrease determined under division (B)(1)(a) or (b) of this section exceeds ten per cent and the overall change in utility tangible personal property subject to taxation is negative, the Tax Commissioner shall certify all of the following to the Department of Education and Workforce and the Office of Budget and Management: (a) The district's total taxable value for tax year 2026; (b) The change in taxes charged and payable on the district's total taxable value for tax year 2017 and tax year 2026; (c) The taxable value of the utility tangible personal property decrease, which shall be considered a change in valuation; (d) The change in taxes charged and payable on such change in taxable value calculated in the same manner as in division (A)(3) of section 3317.021 of the Revised Code. (3) Upon receipt of a certification under division (B)(2) of this section, the Department of Education and Workforce shall replace the three-year average valuations that were used in computing the district's state education aid for fiscal year 2019 with the taxable value certified under division (B)(2)(a) of this section and shall recompute the district's state education aid for fiscal year 2019 without applying any funding limitations enacted by the General Assembly to the computation. The Department shall pay to the district an amount equal to the greater of the following: (a) The lesser of the following: (i) The positive difference between the district's state education aid for fiscal year 2019 prior to the recomputation under division (B)(3) of this section and the district's recomputed state education aid for fiscal year 2019; (ii) The absolute value of the amount certified under division (B)(2)(b) of this section. (b) The absolute value of the amount certified under division (B)(2)(b) of this section X 0.50. (C) The Department of Education and Workforce shall make payments under division (A)(3) of this section between June 1, 2026, and June 30, 2026, and the Department shall make payments under division (B)(3) of this section between June 1, 2027, and June 30, 2027. The Department shall not calculate or make payments under section 3317.028 of the Revised Code for fiscal years 2026 and 2027. Section 265.250. LITERACY IMPROVEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 200566, Literacy Improvement, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to support literacy activities to align state, local, and federal efforts in order to bolster all students' reading success. Funds may be distributed to educational service centers to establish and support regional literacy professional development teams consistent with section 3312.01 of the Revised Code. A portion of the funds may be used by the Department for program administration, monitoring, technical assistance, support, research, and evaluation. LITERACY COACHES The foregoing appropriation item 2006A7, Literacy Coaches, shall be used for coaches to provide literacy supports to school districts, community schools, and STEM schools with the lowest rates of proficiency in literacy based on their performance on the English language arts assessments prescribed under section 3301.0710 of the Revised Code. The coaches shall have training in the science of reading and evidence-based strategies for effective literacy instruction and intervention and shall implement Ohio's Coaching Model, as described in Ohio's Plan to Raise Literacy Achievement. The coaches shall be under the direction of the Department but shall not be employed by the Department. Section 265.260. ADULT EDUCATION PROGRAMS A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 200572, Adult Education Programs, shall be used to make payments in fiscal year 2027 under sections 3313.902, 3314.38, and 3345.86 of the Revised Code, as reenacted by this act effective July 1, 2026. Each career-technical planning district shall reimburse individuals taking a nationally recognized high school equivalency examination approved by the Department of Education and Workforce for the first time for application fees, examination fees, or both, in excess of $40, up to a maximum reimbursement per individual of $80. Each career-technical planning district shall designate a site or sites where individuals may register and take an approved examination. For each individual who registers for an approved examination, the career-technical planning district shall make available and offer career counseling services, including information on adult education programs that are available. A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 200572, Adult Education Programs, may be used to reimburse the Department of Youth Services and the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction for individuals in these facilities who have taken an approved examination for the first time. The amounts reimbursed shall not exceed the per-individual amounts reimbursed to other individuals under this section for an approved examination. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200572, Adult Education Programs, $6,322,267 shall be used to support the Aspire program in fiscal year 2027. The supported programs shall satisfy the state match and maintenance of effort requirements for the state-administered grant program. The funds may be used to support students that speak English as their second language. A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 200572, Adult Education Programs, may be used for program administration, technical assistance, support, research, and evaluation of adult education programs, including high school equivalency examinations approved by the Department of Education and Workforce. Section 265.270. HALF-MILL MAINTENANCE EQUALIZATION The foregoing appropriation item 200574, Half-Mill Maintenance Equalization, shall be used to make payments pursuant to section 3318.18 of the Revised Code. If the amount appropriated is not sufficient, the Department of Education and Workforce shall prorate the amounts so that the aggregate amount appropriated is not exceeded. ADAPTIVE SPORTS PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 200576, Adaptive Sports Program, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce, in collaboration with the Adaptive Sports Program of Ohio, to fund adaptive sports programs in school districts across the state for students with disabilities. Section 265.275. PROGRAM AND PROJECT SUPPORT Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $1,250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for purposes of the section of this act entitled "FINANCIAL LITERACY AND WORKFORCE READINESS PROGRAMMING INITIATIVE." Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $400,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Girl Scout Councils of Ohio to support the Trailblazers in Training: Preparing Girls for Tomorrow's Workforce program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the National Inventors Hall of Fame to expand STEM summer learning opportunities for students in grades kindergarten through six. Funds shall be used to support the enrollment of economically disadvantaged students at Camp Invention sites. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Stark Education Partnership to support the Stark County Career Connected Learning program. These funds shall be used to assist participating Stark County schools in providing career counselors or career champions for all students and for the purchase and implementation of YouScience career assessments. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed to the Ohio Valley Youth Network to support its Sycamore Youth Center Education Enrichment and Life Skills After Schools Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Shoes 4 the Shoeless to provide shoes and socks to children in need. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to The Legacy Project of Stark to support personnel, materials, and program expansion costs associated with its school-based mentoring program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 200597, Program and Project Support, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to The Music Settlement to support the Center for Music Initiative. Section 265.290. SCHOOL DISTRICT SOLVENCY ASSISTANCE (A) The foregoing appropriation item 200687, School District Solvency Assistance, shall be allocated to the School District Shared Resource Account and the Catastrophic Expenditures Account in amounts determined by the Director of Education and Workforce. These funds shall be used to provide assistance and grants to school districts to enable them to remain solvent under section 3316.20 of the Revised Code. Assistance and grants shall be subject to approval by the Controlling Board. Except as provided under division (C) of this section, any required reimbursements from school districts for solvency assistance shall be made to the appropriate account in the School District Solvency Assistance Fund (Fund 5H30). (B) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon the request of the Director of Education and Workforce and the approval of the Controlling Board, the Director of Budget and Management may make transfers to the School District Solvency Assistance Fund (Fund 5H30) from any fund used by the Department of Education and Workforce, the Lottery Profits Education Reserve Fund (Fund 7018), or the General Revenue Fund to maintain sufficient cash balances in Fund 5H30 in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. Any cash transferred is hereby appropriated. The transferred cash may be used by the Department to provide assistance and grants to school districts to enable them to remain solvent and to pay unforeseeable expenses of a temporary or emergency nature that the school district is unable to pay from existing resources. Section 265.300. FOUNDATION FUNDING - ALL STUDENTS The foregoing appropriation item 200604, Foundation Funding - All Students, shall be used in conjunction with appropriation items 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, and 200612, Foundation Funding - All Students, to distribute the amounts calculated for disadvantaged pupil impact aid under sections 3317.022 and 3317.16 of the Revised Code and the portions of the state share of the base cost calculated under those sections that are attributable to the staffing cost for the student wellness and success component of the base cost, as determined by the Department of Education and Workforce. Section 265.310. PUBLIC AND NONPUBLIC EDUCATION SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 200491, Public and Nonpublic Education Support, shall be used in conjunction with appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding – All Students, to distribute the amounts calculated for formula aid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. Section 265.320. SCHOOL BUS SAFETY (A) The foregoing appropriation item 200413, School Bus Safety, shall be used to support a school bus safety grant program, as recommended by the Governor's School Bus Safety Working Group, and in accordance with guidelines established by the Department of Education and Workforce. The specific safety features shall be informed by the Governor's School Bus Safety Working Group report and in consultation with the Department of Public Safety. (B) The Department shall create an application for eligible applicants. Eligible applicants may apply for funds in a manner prescribed by the Department. The Department shall collect information with respect to the total amount of funding requested, the number of school buses impacted, and the specific safety enhancements for which each eligible applicant seeks funds. In determining grant allocations, the Department shall apply a measure of local capacity. The Department may also apply minimum or maximum funding amounts. (C) Eligible applicants shall use school bus safety grant funds only for repair, replacement, or addition of school bus safety features to school buses in active service or for safety enhancements to the purchase of a new school bus. Eligible applicants shall not use funds to enhance buses not owned by the eligible applicant. (D) As used in this section, "eligible applicant" means any of the following that provides transportation services: (1) A city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district; (2) A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (3) A STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code; (4) A county board of developmental disabilities; (5) A chartered nonpublic school; (6) An educational service center. Section 265.330. LOTTERY PROFITS EDUCATION FUND The foregoing appropriation item 200612, Foundation Funding - All Students, shall be used in conjunction with appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, to distribute the amounts calculated for formula aid under section 3317.022 of the Revised Code. The Department of Education and Workforce, with the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, shall determine the monthly distribution schedules of appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, and appropriation item 200612, Foundation Funding - All Students. If adjustments to the monthly distribution schedule are necessary, the Department shall make such adjustments with the approval of the Director. Section 265.340. ACCELERATE GREAT SCHOOLS The foregoing appropriation item 200614, Accelerate Great Schools, shall be used by the Department of Education and Workforce to support the Accelerate Great Schools public-private partnership. Section 265.350. QUALITY COMMUNITY AND INDEPENDENT STEM SCHOOLS SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 200631, Quality Community and Independent STEM Schools Support, shall be used to distribute the amounts calculated under sections 3317.27 and 3317.29 of the Revised Code for the Quality Community School Support and the Quality Independent STEM School Support programs. If the amount appropriated is not sufficient, the Department shall prorate the amounts so that the aggregate amount appropriated is not exceeded. Section 265.360. COMMUNITY SCHOOL FACILITIES The foregoing appropriation item 200684, Community School Facilities, shall be used to distribute the amounts calculated under section 3317.31 of the Revised Code for assistance with the cost associated with facilities. If the amount appropriated is not sufficient, the Department shall prorate the amounts so that the aggregate amount appropriated is not exceeded. Section 265.370. LOTTERY PROFITS EDUCATION RESERVE FUND (A) There is hereby created the Lottery Profits Education Reserve Fund (Fund 7018) in the State Treasury. Investment earnings of the Lottery Profits Education Reserve Fund shall be credited to the fund. (B) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from Fund 7018 to the Lottery Profits Education Fund (Fund 7017) in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027. (C) On July 15, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of the Ohio Lottery Commission shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount by which lottery profit transfers received by Fund 7017 exceeded $1,440,000,000 in fiscal year 2025. (D) On July 15, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of the Ohio Lottery Commission shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount by which lottery profit transfers received by Fund 7017 exceeded $1,465,138,202 in fiscal year 2026. (E) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash in excess of the amounts necessary to support appropriations in Fund 7017 from that fund to Fund 7018. Section 265.375. STUDENT SUPPORT AND ACADEMIC ENRICHMENT The foregoing appropriation item 200634, Student Support and Academic Enrichment, may be used by school districts, in accordance with state objectives and applicable federal grant requirements, to do the following: (A) Provide a well-rounded education, including emphasis on numeracy and the science of reading; (B) Provide a safe and drug-free learning environment and healthy students through use of the "Success Sequence." (C) Promote the effective use of technology through use of the "Success Sequence." Section 265.380. Notwithstanding division (C) of Section 265.355 of H.B. 110 of the 134th General Assembly and any other provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Education and Workforce shall use the funds authorized under Title II, Sec. 2001(f)(1) and (4) of the federal "American Rescue Plan Act of 2021," Pub. L. No. 117-2, as necessary to support the After school Child Enrichment (ACE) Educational Savings Account Program pursuant to section 3310.70 of the Revised Code in fiscal year 2026. Notwithstanding division (C)(1) of section 3310.70 of the Revised Code, the Department may extend the contract with the vendor administering the program as of the effective date of this amendment through fiscal year 2026 and may pay the vendor more than three per cent of the amount appropriated for the program for fiscal year 2026. Section 265.390. SCHOOL DISTRICT PARTICIPATION IN NATIONAL ASSESSMENT OF EDUCATIONAL PROGRESS The General Assembly intends for the Director of Education and Workforce to provide for school district participation in the administration of the National Assessment of Educational Progress in accordance with section 3301.27 of the Revised Code. Each school and school district selected for participation by the Director shall participate. Section 265.400. EARMARK ACCOUNTABILITY At the request of the Director of Education and Workforce, any entity that receives a budget earmark under the Department of Education and Workforce shall submit annually to the Department a report that includes a description of the services supported by the funds, a description of the results achieved by those services, an analysis of the effectiveness of the program, and an opinion as to the program's applicability to other school districts. For an earmarked entity that received state funds from an earmark in the prior fiscal year, no funds shall be provided by the Department to an earmarked entity for a fiscal year until its report for the prior fiscal year has been submitted. Section 265.410. COMMUNITY SCHOOL OPERATING FROM HOME A community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code that was open for operation as a community school as of May 1, 2005, may operate from or in any home, as defined in section 3313.64 of the Revised Code, located in the state, regardless of when the community school's operations from or in a particular home began. Section 265.420. USE OF VOLUNTEERS The Department of Education and Workforce may utilize the services of volunteers to accomplish any of the purposes of the Department. The Director of Education and Workforce shall approve for what purposes volunteers may be used and for these purposes may recruit, train, and oversee the services of volunteers. The Director may reimburse volunteers for necessary and appropriate expenses in accordance with state guidelines and may designate volunteers as state employees for the purpose of motor vehicle accident liability insurance under section 9.83 of the Revised Code, for immunity under section 9.86 of the Revised Code, and for indemnification from liability incurred in the performance of their duties under section 9.87 of the Revised Code. Section 265.430. FLEXIBLE FUNDING FOR FAMILIES AND CHILDREN In collaboration with the County Family and Children First Council, a city, local, or exempted village school district, community school, STEM school, joint vocational school district, educational service center, or county board of developmental disabilities that receives allocations from the Department of Education and Workforce from appropriation item 200550, Foundation Funding - All Students, or appropriation item 200540, Special Education Enhancements, may transfer portions of those allocations to a flexible funding pool authorized by the section of this act entitled "FAMILY AND CHILDREN FIRST FLEXIBLE FUNDING POOL." Allocations used for maintenance of effort or for federal or state funding matching requirements shall not be transferred unless the allocation may still be used to meet such requirements. Section 265.440. PRIVATE TREATMENT FACILITY PROJECT (A) As used in this section: (1) The following are "participating residential treatment centers": (a) Private residential treatment facilities that have entered into a contract with the Department of Youth Services to provide services to children placed at the facility by the Department and which, in fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 or both, the Department pays through appropriation item 470401, RECLAIM Ohio; (b) Abraxas, in Shelby; (c) Paint Creek, in Bainbridge; (d) F.I.R.S.T., in Mansfield. (2) "Education program" means an elementary or secondary education program or a special education program and related services. (3) "Served child" means any child receiving an education program pursuant to division (B) of this section. (4) "School district responsible for tuition" means a city, exempted village, or local school district that, if tuition payment for a child by a school district is required under law that existed in fiscal year 1998, is the school district required to pay that tuition. (5) "Residential child" means a child who resides in a participating residential treatment center and who is receiving an educational program under division (B) of this section. (B) A youth who is a resident of the state and has been assigned by a juvenile court or other authorized agency to a residential treatment facility specified in division (A) of this section shall be enrolled in an approved educational program located in or near the facility. Approval of the educational program shall be contingent upon compliance with the criteria established for such programs by the Department of Education and Workforce. The educational program shall be provided by a school district or educational service center, or by the residential facility itself. Maximum flexibility shall be given to the residential treatment facility to determine the provider. In the event that a voluntary agreement cannot be reached and the residential facility does not choose to provide the educational program, the educational service center in the county in which the facility is located shall provide the educational program at the treatment center to children under twenty-two years of age residing in the treatment center. (C) Any school district responsible for tuition for a residential child shall, notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code regarding tuition payment, pay tuition for the child for fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 to the education program provider and in the amount specified in this division. If there is no school district responsible for tuition for a residential child and if the participating residential treatment center to which the child is assigned is located in the city, exempted village, or local school district that, if the child were not a resident of that treatment center, would be the school district where the child is entitled to attend school under sections 3313.64 and 3313.65 of the Revised Code, that school district, notwithstanding any conflicting provision of the Revised Code, shall pay tuition for the child for fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 under this division unless that school district is providing the educational program to the child under division (B) of this section. A tuition payment under this division shall be made to the school district, educational service center, or residential treatment facility providing the educational program to the child. The amount of tuition paid shall be: (1) The amount of tuition determined for the district under division (A) of section 3317.08 of the Revised Code; (2) In addition, for any student receiving special education pursuant to an individualized education program as defined in section 3323.01 of the Revised Code, a payment for excess costs. This payment shall equal the actual cost to the school district, educational service center, or residential treatment facility of providing special education and related services to the student pursuant to the student's individualized education program, minus the tuition paid for the child under division (C)(1) of this section. A school district paying tuition under this division shall not include the child for whom tuition is paid in the district's average daily membership certified under division (A) of section 3317.03 of the Revised Code. (D) In each of fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall reimburse, from appropriations made for the purpose, a school district, educational service center, or residential treatment facility, whichever is providing the service, that has demonstrated that it is in compliance with the funding criteria for each served child for whom a school district must pay tuition under division (C) of this section. The amount of the reimbursement shall be the amount appropriated for this purpose divided by the full-time equivalent number of children for whom reimbursement is to be made. (E) Funds provided to a school district, educational service center, or residential treatment facility under this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, funds from other public sources for which the school district, service center, or residential treatment facility is entitled or eligible. (F) The Department of Education and Workforce shall track the utilization of funds provided to school districts, educational service centers, and residential treatment facilities under this section and monitor the effect of the funding on the educational programs they provide in participating residential treatment facilities. The Department shall monitor the programs for educational accountability. Section 265.450. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3317.011 of the Revised Code, for fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Education and Workforce shall do all of the following: (A) Calculate a school district's academic co-curricular activities cost under division (E)(4) of that section using the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district that reported the data specified in division (E)(4)(a) of that section; (B) Calculate a district's supplies and academic content cost under division (E)(6) of that section using the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district that reported the data specified in division (E)(6)(a) of that section; (C) Calculate a district's athletic co-curricular activities base cost under division (H) of that section using the sum of the enrolled ADM of every school district that reported the data specified in division (H)(2) of that section; (D) Calculate a district's building operations cost under division (G)(3) of that section using the sum of the enrolled ADM of every city, local, and exempted village school district that reported the data specified in divisions (G)(3)(a)(i) and (ii) of that section. Section 265.560. AIM HIGHER PILOT PROGRAM (A) The Department of Education and Workforce shall establish a pilot program to provide additional funding to each joint vocational school district that operates a dropout prevention and recovery program in fiscal year 2026. Such a district may choose to participate in the program by notifying the Department of its intent to participate in a form and manner and by a date determined by the Department. (B) The Department shall pay a participating district a sum equal to the following for each student newly enrolled in the district's dropout prevention and recovery program in fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027: (1) $500 X the number of credits earned by the student in fiscal year 2026; (2) $2,500 if the student obtains an industry-recognized credential, or group of credentials, approved under section 3313.6113 of the Revised Code in fiscal year 2026 that meet the criteria established under that section to help the student qualify for a high school diploma, as determined by the Department. (C) The Department shall make a one-time grant payment of $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 to any participating district that has a dropout prevention and recovery program in its first three years of operation and requests a payment under this division. The participating district shall designate $175,000 of the grant for career-technical education equipment and $75,000 of the grant for building renovation. (D) A participating district shall spend the balance of any payments made under this section prior to July 1, 2027. (E) The Department shall adopt guidelines and procedures to operate the pilot program." Section 265.600. RURAL TRANSPORTATION GRANT PROGRAM (A)(1) The Rural Transportation Grant Program is created for fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The Department of Education and Workforce shall award rural transportation grants each fiscal year to dropout prevention and recovery community schools that meet both of the following requirements: (a) More than seventy-five per cent of the school's students are economically disadvantaged, as determined by the department; (b) The school's territory is located in three counties and contains more than twelve school districts. (2) The Department shall determine the amount of each grant awarded, but no grant shall exceed four hundred fifty thousand dollars for any fiscal year. (B) Schools shall use grants awarded under this section to transport students." Section 265.650. FINANCIAL LITERACY AND WORKFORCE READINESS PROGRAMMING INITIATIVE (A) The Financial Literacy and Workforce Readiness Programming Initiative is established within the Department of Education and Workforce. The Programming Initiative shall operate in fiscal years 2026 and 2027. The purpose of the Programming Initiative is to ensure the next generation's preparedness in financial literacy, workforce or career readiness, entrepreneurship, and other relevant skills to enter and be competitive in Ohio's future workforce economy. (B)(1) The Department shall distribute appropriated funds to the following organizations as part of the Programming Initiative: (a) Junior Achievement of North Central Ohio; (b) Junior Achievement of Greater Cleveland; (c) Junior Achievement of Eastern Ohio; (d) Junior Achievement of Northwestern Ohio; (e) Junior Achievement of OKI Partners; (f) Junior Achievement of Central Ohio. (2) The participating organizations listed under division (B)(1) of this section shall collaborate with local schools, institutions of higher education, local, regional, and statewide employers and businesses, subject matter experts, community-based organizations, and other public-private entities or agencies to implement the Programming Initiative. (C) The Programming Initiative shall do all of the following: (1) Place specific emphasis on engagement with students, teachers, and schools primarily located in underserved communities, under-resourced rural areas, or those with populations considered economically disadvantaged; (2) Increase capacity and resources that expand each of the participating organizations' collective ability to offer more financial literacy, workforce readiness and entrepreneurship, or related programming such as work-based learning experiences designed to engage more students in the geographic areas to which the participating organizations provide services; (3) Increase the number of students measurably impacted by the participating organizations' services and increase the number of counties where services are offered; (4) Assist students enrolled in any of grades nine through twelve with direct entry into the workforce, access to higher education, or in-demand job training; (5) Assist participating students in creating and implementing career pathways; (6) Strengthen each participating organization's capacity and resources to collectively provide up to ten student-focused engagement events involving students and teachers from multiple schools and communities in northeast and central portions of the state. The engagement events shall do both of the following: (a) Enhance and deepen participating students' ability to demonstrate mastery of financial literacy, workforce or career readiness, entrepreneurship, or related skills and knowledge vital to equipping and preparing students with the requisite skills, competencies, and knowledge to be competitive for in-demand jobs within the state and global workforce economy, particularly those that are considered high-growth jobs in the state of Ohio; (b) Be offered to all partnering schools and respective students; however, the emphasis shall remain on the engagement of students and schools that meet the conditions prescribed under division (C)(1) of this section." Section 265.660. For fiscal year 2026, each school district board of education shall make the initial submission of current budget information and three-year projections required under division (A) of section 5705.391 of the Revised Code not later than October 15, 2025. Each board shall submit the required information in accordance with the joint rules of the Department of Education and Workforce and the Auditor of State existing as of the effective date of this section. Section 265.670. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Revised Code, the Department of Education and Workforce shall accept applications and award scholarships under sections 3310.41 and 3310.52 of the Revised Code for the 2025-2026 school year for any child who meets all of the following: (A) The child is at least eighteen years of age and less than twenty-two years of age. (B) The child is enrolled in a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school, is home educated in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code, or is a student older than compulsory school age and less than twenty-two years of age and received a home education in accordance with section 3321.042 of the Revised Code and has not received a diploma under section 3313.6110 of the Revised Code. (C) The child is still eligible to receive transition services under the child's individualized education program developed under Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code. (D) If the child is participating in, or applying to participate in, the autism scholarship program established under section 3310.41 of the Revised Code, the child's individualized education program includes services related to autism. Section 267.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ELC OHIO ELECTIONS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 051321 Operating Expenses $214,400 $0 D General Revenue Fund Total $214,400 $0 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4P20 051601 Operating Support $225,600 $0 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $225,600 $0 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $440,000 $0 Section 269.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A FUN STATE BOARD OF EMBALMERS AND FUNERAL DIRECTORS B General Revenue Fund C GRF 881500 Indigent Burial and Cremation Support $250,000 $250,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $250,000 $250,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4K90 881609 Operating Expenses $1,156,000 $1,213,000 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,156,000 $1,213,000 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,406,000 $1,463,000 Section 271.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PAY EMPLOYEE BENEFITS FUNDS B Fiduciary Fund Group C 1240 995673 Payroll Deductions $1,017,970,800 $1,048,509,924 D 8050 995675 Commuter Benefits $1,845,860 $1,967,540 E 8060 995666 Accrued Leave Fund $128,408,784 $132,260,611 F 8070 995667 Disability Fund $27,805,294 $28,337,915 G 8080 995668 State Employee Health Benefit Fund $1,068,647,159 $1,132,765,988 H 8090 995669 Dependent Care Spending Account $2,996,802 $3,196,895 I 8100 995670 Life Insurance Investment Fund $2,644,330 $2,723,060 J 8110 995671 Parental Leave Benefit Fund $18,601,000 $19,159,030 K 8130 995672 Health Care Spending Account $19,690,922 $20,694,694 L Fiduciary Fund Group Total $2,288,610,951 $2,389,615,657 M TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,288,610,951 $2,389,615,657 Section 271.20. PAYROLL DEDUCTION FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995673, Payroll Deductions, shall be used to make payments from the Payroll Deduction Fund (Fund 1240) pursuant to section 125.21 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. ACCRUED LEAVE LIABILITY FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995666, Accrued Leave Fund, shall be used to make payments from the Accrued Leave Liability Fund (Fund 8060) pursuant to section 125.211 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. STATE EMPLOYEE DISABILITY LEAVE BENEFIT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995667, Disability Fund, shall be used to make payments from the State Employee Disability Leave Benefit Fund (Fund 8070) pursuant to section 124.83 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. STATE EMPLOYEE HEALTH BENEFIT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995668, State Employee Health Benefit Fund, shall be used to make payments from the State Employee Health Benefit Fund (Fund 8080) pursuant to section 124.87 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. DEPENDENT CARE SPENDING FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995669, Dependent Care Spending Account, shall be used to make payments from the Dependent Care Spending Fund (Fund 8090) to employees eligible for dependent care expenses pursuant to section 124.822 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. LIFE INSURANCE INVESTMENT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995670, Life Insurance Investment Fund, shall be used to make payments from the Life Insurance Investment Fund (Fund 8100) for the costs and expenses of the state's life insurance benefit program pursuant to section 125.212 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. PARENTAL LEAVE BENEFIT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995671, Parental Leave Benefit Fund, shall be used to make payments from the Parental Leave Benefit Fund (Fund 8110) to employees eligible for parental leave benefits pursuant to sections 124.136 and 124.137 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. HEALTH CARE SPENDING ACCOUNT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 995672, Health Care Spending Account, shall be used to make payments from the Health Care Spending Account Fund (Fund 8130) for payments pursuant to state employees' participation in a flexible spending account for nonreimbursed health care expenses and section 124.821 of the Revised Code. If it is determined by the Director of Budget and Management that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. COMMUTER BENEFITS The foregoing appropriation item 995675, Commuter Benefits, shall be used to make payments from the Commuter Benefits Fund (Fund 8050) for employees who elect to participate in the Commuter Benefits Program. If the Director of Budget and Management determines that additional amounts are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 273.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ERB STATE EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS BOARD B General Revenue Fund C GRF 125321 Operating Expenses $4,533,029 $4,655,023 D General Revenue Fund Total $4,533,029 $4,655,023 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 5720 125603 Training and Publications $138,000 $138,972 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $138,000 $138,972 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $4,671,029 $4,793,995 Section 275.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ENG STATE BOARD OF ENGINEERS AND SURVEYORS B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 892609 Operating Expenses $1,378,866 $1,465,930 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,378,866 $1,465,930 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,378,866 $1,465,930 Section 277.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A EPA ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY B General Revenue Fund C GRF 715502 Auto Emissions E-Check Program $13,232,534 $13,265,775 D General Revenue Fund Total $13,232,534 $13,265,775 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4D50 715618 Recycled State Materials $11,500 $11,500 G 4J00 715638 Underground Injection Control $514,242 $530,276 H 4K20 715648 Clean Air - Non Title V $4,516,349 $4,593,901 I 4K30 715649 Solid Waste $14,791,311 $15,098,763 J 4K40 715650 Surface Water Protection $11,864,197 $12,101,940 K 4K50 715651 Drinking Water Protection $8,774,797 $9,027,993 L 4P50 715654 Cozart Landfill $7,500 $7,500 M 4R50 715656 Scrap Tire Management $3,558,044 $3,581,336 N 4R90 715658 Voluntary Action Program $1,188,026 $1,217,345 O 4T30 715659 Clean Air - Title V Permit Program $10,942,818 $11,148,464 P 5000 715608 Immediate Removal Special Account $747,051 $769,463 Q 5030 715621 Hazardous Waste Facility Management $2,788,523 $2,842,749 R 5050 715623 Hazardous Waste Cleanup $9,334,680 $9,559,074 S 5050 715698 Response and Investigations $3,822,060 $4,211,500 T 5320 715646 Recycling and Litter Control $4,888,354 $5,146,276 U 5410 715670 Site Specific Cleanup $17,744,091 $17,746,631 V 5420 715671 Risk Management Reporting $144,047 $147,307 W 5860 715637 Scrap Tire Market Development $1,000,000 $1,000,000 X 5BC0 715622 Local Air Pollution Control $2,100,000 $2,100,000 Y 5BC0 715624 Surface Water $6,936,269 $6,936,269 Z 5BC0 715672 Air Pollution Control $9,354,059 $9,354,059 AA 5BC0 715673 Drinking and Ground Water $4,024,215 $4,133,956 AB 5BC0 715676 Assistance and Prevention $4,204,000 $4,359,000 AC 5BC0 715677 Laboratory $4,235,216 $4,360,265 AD 5BC0 715678 Corrective Actions $1,271,429 $1,271,429 AE 5BC0 715687 Areawide Planning Agencies $450,000 $450,000 AF 5BC0 715692 Administration $19,684,900 $20,654,900 AG 5BC0 715694 Environmental Resource Coordination $814,339 $832,027 AH 5BT0 715679 C&DD Groundwater Monitoring $50,000 $50,000 AI 5PZ0 715696 Drinking Water Loan Fee $4,109,640 $4,388,600 AJ 5Y30 715685 Surface Water Improvement $520,000 $520,000 AK 5YY0 715405 National Priorities List Remedial Support Fund $1,500,000 $1,000,000 AL 6440 715631 Emergency Response Radiological Safety $274,997 $280,510 AM 6760 715642 Water Pollution Control Loan Administration $5,120,000 $5,282,500 AN 6760 715699 Water Quality Administration $5,123,741 $5,250,489 AO 6790 715636 Emergency Planning $2,917,000 $2,917,000 AP 6960 715643 Air Pollution Control Administration $150,000 $150,000 AQ 6990 715644 Water Pollution Control Administration $307,859 $307,858 AR 6A10 715645 Environmental Education $550,316 $550,427 AS 6H20 715695 H2Ohio $7,500,000 $7,500,000 AT Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $177,835,570 $181,391,307 AU Internal Service Activity Fund Group AV 1990 715602 Laboratory Services $500,000 $500,000 AW 2190 715604 Central Support Indirect $10,657,300 $10,657,300 AX 4A10 715640 Operating Expenses $1,092,000 $1,117,000 AY Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $12,249,300 $12,274,300 AZ Federal Fund Group BA 3530 715612 Public Water Supply $2,564,882 $2,626,504 BB 3570 715619 Air Pollution Control - Federal $6,806,147 $6,929,318 BC 3620 715605 Underground Injection Control - Federal $165,382 $169,516 BD 3BU0 715684 Water Quality Protection $16,230,503 $16,230,503 BE 3CS0 715688 Federal NRD Settlements $1,500,000 $1,500,000 BF 3F30 715632 Federally Supported Cleanup and Response $13,779,323 $14,061,350 BG 3HE0 715697 Volkswagen Clean Air Act Settlement $6,827,000 $6,841,000 BH 3T30 715669 Drinking Water State Revolving Fund $3,054,165 $3,145,894 BI 3V70 715606 Agencywide Grants $746,900 $746,900 BJ Federal Fund Group Total $51,674,302 $52,250,985 BK TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $254,991,706 $259,182,367 Section 277.20. AREAWIDE PLANNING AGENCIES The Director of Environmental Protection may award grants from appropriation item 715687, Areawide Planning Agencies, to areawide planning agencies engaged in areawide water quality management and planning activities in accordance with Section 208 of the "Federal Clean Water Act," 33 U.S.C. 1288. AUTOMOBILE EMISSION TESTING PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item GRF 715502, Auto Emissions E-Check Program, shall be used by the Environmental Protection Agency to support the automobile emission testing program. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Environmental Protection may request that the Director of Administrative Services extend the contract with the vendor operating in accordance with division (A)(1) of section 3704.14 of the Revised Code for not longer than twelve months. The Director of Administrative Services may enter into a contract extension provided that the contract contains the same terms and no funds are paid for incomplete work, utilizing appropriation item GRF 715502, Auto Emissions E-Check Program, in the event that the contractor selected in accordance with division (A)(2) of section 3704.14 of the Revised Code cannot complete the required work prior to July 1, 2025. CASH TRANSFER TO THE AUTO EMISSIONS TEST FUND FROM THE SCRAP TIRE MANAGEMENT FUND The Director of Budget and Management, at the request of the Director of Environmental Protection, and upon approval by the Controlling Board, may transfer up to $1,400,000 cash in each fiscal year from the Scrap Tire Management Fund (Fund 4R50) to the Auto Emissions Test Fund (Fund 5BY0). Section 279.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A EBR ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW APPEALS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 172321 Operating Expenses $730,000 $765,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $730,000 $765,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $730,000 $765,000 Section 281.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ETC BROADCAST EDUCATIONAL MEDIA COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 935401 Statehouse News Bureau $402,000 $402,000 D GRF 935402 Ohio Government Telecommunications Services $2,344,400 $2,344,400 E GRF 935410 Content Development, Acquisition, and Distribution $3,409,000 $2,909,000 F GRF 935430 Broadcast Education Operating $4,108,706 $4,008,569 G General Revenue Fund Total $10,264,106 $9,663,969 H Dedicated Purpose Fund Group I 5FK0 935608 Media Services $50,000 $50,000 J 5VB0 935650 Facility Rental $10,000 $10,000 K Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $60,000 $60,000 L Internal Service Activity Fund Group M 4F30 935603 Affiliate Services $4,200 $4,200 N 4T20 935605 Government Television/ Telecommunications Operating $55,459 $0 O Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $59,659 $4,200 P TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $10,383,765 $9,728,169 Section 281.20. STATEHOUSE NEWS BUREAU The foregoing appropriation item 935401, Statehouse News Bureau, shall be used solely to support the operations of the Ohio Statehouse News Bureau. OHIO GOVERNMENT TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 935402, Ohio Government Telecommunications Services, shall be used solely to support the operations of Ohio Government Telecommunications Services which include providing multimedia support to the state government and its affiliated organizations and broadcasting the activities of the legislative, judicial, and executive branches of state government, among its other functions. CONTENT DEVELOPMENT, ACQUISITION, AND DISTRIBUTION The foregoing appropriation item 935410, Content Development, Acquisition, and Distribution, shall be used for the development, acquisition, and distribution of information resources by public media and radio reading services and for educational use in the classroom and online. Of the foregoing appropriation item 935410, Content Development, Acquisition, and Distribution, up to $841,567 in fiscal year 2026 and $718,134 in fiscal year 2027 shall be allocated equally among the Ohio educational television stations. Funds shall be used for the production of interactive instructional programming series with priority given to resources aligned with state academic content standards. Of the foregoing appropriation item 935410, Content Development, Acquisition, and Distribution, up to $2,311,039 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,972,077 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed by the Broadcast Educational Media Commission to Ohio's qualified public educational television stations and educational radio stations to support their operations. The funds shall be distributed pursuant to an allocation formula used by the Broadcast Educational Media Commission in consultation with Ohio's qualified public educational television stations and educational radio stations. Of the foregoing appropriation item 935410, Content Development, Acquisition, and Distribution, up to $256,394 in fiscal year 2026 and $218,789 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed by the Broadcast Educational Media Commission to Ohio's qualified radio reading services to support their operations. The funds shall be distributed pursuant to an allocation formula used by the Broadcast Educational Media Commission in consultation with Ohio's qualified radio reading services. Section 283.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A ETH OHIO ETHICS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 146321 Operating Expenses $2,480,744 $2,603,142 D General Revenue Fund Total $2,480,744 $2,603,142 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4M60 146601 Operating Support $649,781 $670,793 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $649,781 $670,793 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $3,130,525 $3,273,935 Section 285.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A EXP OHIO EXPOSITIONS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 723403 Junior Fair Subsidy $380,000 $380,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $380,000 $380,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4N20 723602 Ohio State Fair Harness Racing $350,000 $350,000 G 5060 723601 Operating Expenses $20,000,000 $20,000,000 H 5060 723604 Grounds Maintenance and Repairs $300,000 $300,000 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $20,650,000 $20,650,000 J TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $21,030,000 $21,030,000 Section 285.20. STATE FAIR RESERVE The General Manager of the Expositions Commission, in consultation with the Director of Budget and Management, may submit a request to the Controlling Board to use available amounts in the State Fair Reserve Fund (Fund 6400) if revenues from either the 2025 or the 2026 Ohio State Fair are unexpectedly low. On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management, in consultation with the General Manager of the Expositions Commission, may determine that the Ohio Expositions Fund (Fund 5060) has a cash balance in excess of the anticipated operating costs of the Exposition Commission in that fiscal year. Notwithstanding section 991.04 of the Revised Code, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer an amount up to the excess cash from Fund 5060 to Fund 6400 in each fiscal year. Section 287.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A FCC OHIO FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 230321 Operating Expenses $10,750,000 $10,750,000 D GRF 230401 Cultural Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments $37,500,000 $37,500,000 E GRF 230908 Common Schools General Obligation Bond Debt Service $255,000,000 $230,000,000 F General Revenue Fund Total $303,250,000 $278,250,000 G Internal Service Activity Fund Group H 1310 230639 State Construction Management Operations $9,590,355 $10,233,822 I Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $9,590,355 $10,233,822 J Revenue Distribution Fund Group K 7047 230647 Project Support $20,000,000 $0 L Revenue Distribution Fund Group Total $20,000,000 $0 M TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $332,840,355 $288,483,822 Section 287.20. CULTURAL FACILITIES LEASE RENTAL BOND PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 230401, Cultural Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments, shall be used to meet all payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission pursuant to leases and agreements for cultural and sports facilities made under section 154.23 of the Revised Code. These appropriations are the source of funds pledged for bond service charges on related obligations issued under Chapter 154. of the Revised Code. COMMON SCHOOLS GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 230908, Common Schools General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on obligations issued under sections 151.01 and 151.03 of the Revised Code. PROJECT SUPPORT (A) Notwithstanding section 5751.02 of the Revised Code, the forgoing appropriation item 230647, Project Support, shall be used by the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission to support the construction or renovation of a school building pursuant to division (B) of this section. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 230647, Project Support, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. (B) Upon application from a qualifying district, the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall provide funding to the district for a special facilities project to renovate or construct a school building. In calculating the amount of the funding, the Commission shall use the district's most recent percentile ranking under section 3318.011 of the Revised Code to determine the state's share of the project cost, provided that the state's share shall not be less than ninety per cent of the cost of the project or exceed the amount of the appropriation. If necessary, the Commission shall proportionately reduce the amount of funding for each qualifying district that applies so as not to exceed the amount appropriated for the purposes of this section. A qualifying district shall apply to participate in the program not later than December 31, 2025, and in a form and manner prescribed by the Commission. For the purposes of this section, "qualifying district" means a school district to which all of the following apply: (1) The district operates at least one school building in a county with a population of more than one hundred thousand people and at least one school building in another county with a population of less than fifty thousand people. (2) The district's classroom facilities project was deferred or lapsed. (3) The existing building included in the special facilities project for which the district applies for funding was originally constructed prior to June 30, 1925. Section 287.30. SCHOOL FACILITIES ENCUMBRANCES AND REAPPROPRIATION At the request of the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission, the Director of Budget and Management may cancel encumbrances for school district projects from a previous biennium if the district has not raised its local share of project costs within sixteen months of receiving Controlling Board approval under section 3318.05 or 3318.41 of the Revised Code. The Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall certify the amounts of the canceled encumbrances to the Director of Budget and Management on a quarterly basis. The amounts of the canceled encumbrances are hereby appropriated. Section 287.40. CAPITAL DONATIONS FUND CERTIFICATIONS AND APPROPRIATIONS On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of cash receipts and related investment income, irrevocable letters of credit from a bank, or certification of the availability of funds that have been received from a county or a municipal corporation for deposit into the Capital Donations Fund (Fund 5A10) and that are related to an anticipated project. These amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C230E2, Capital Donations. Prior to certifying these amounts to the Director, the Executive Director shall make a written agreement with the participating entity on the necessary cash flows required for the anticipated construction or equipment acquisition project. Section 287.50. AMENDMENT TO PROJECT AGREEMENT FOR MAINTENANCE LEVY The Ohio Facilities Construction Commission shall amend the project agreement between the Commission and a school district that is participating in the Accelerated Urban School Building Assistance Program as of September 29, 2018, if the Commission determines that it is necessary to do so in order to comply with division (B)(3)(c) of section 3318.38 of the Revised Code. Section 287.60. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission may determine the amount of funding available for disbursement in a given fiscal year for any project approved under sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 of the Revised Code in order to keep aggregate state capital spending within approved limits and may take actions including, but not limited to, determining the schedule for design or bidding of approved projects, to ensure appropriate and supportable cash flow. Section 287.70. RETURNED OR RECOVERED FUNDS Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any moneys a school district transfers to the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission under division (C)(2) or (3) of section 3318.12 of the Revised Code as well as any moneys recovered from settlements with or judgments against parties relating to their involvement in a classroom facilities project shall be deposited into the fund from which the capital appropriation for the project was made. In any fiscal year in which the Commission has made a deposit under this section, the Executive Director of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission may seek Controlling Board approval to increase appropriations from those funds and specified appropriation items in an amount equal to the amount of the funds deposited under this section. The additional amounts, if approved, shall be used in accordance with the purposes of Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code for projects pursuant to sections 3318.01 to 3318.20 or sections 3318.40 to 3318.45 of the Revised Code. Upon approval of the Controlling Board, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 289.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A GOV OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR B General Revenue Fund C GRF 040321 Operating Expenses $3,481,221 $3,580,624 D General Revenue Fund Total $3,481,221 $3,580,624 E Internal Service Activity Fund Group F 5AK0 040607 Government Relations $715,600 $734,442 G Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $715,600 $734,442 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $4,196,821 $4,315,066 Section 289.20. OPERATING EXPENSES On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Governor or the Governor's designee may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 040321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated for fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Governor or the Governor's designee may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 040321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated for fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. GOVERNMENT RELATIONS The Office of the Governor may issue an intrastate transfer voucher to charge any state agency of the executive branch such amounts necessary to represent the interests of Ohio to federal, state, and local government units and to cover the costs or membership dues related to Ohio's participation in national and regional associations. Amounts collected shall be deposited in the Government Relations Fund (Fund 5AK0). Section 291.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DOH DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 440413 Local Health Department Support $2,379,000 $2,379,000 D GRF 440416 Mothers and Children Safety Net Services $4,639,763 $4,690,570 E GRF 440431 Free Clinic Safety Net Services $1,755,837 $1,758,067 F GRF 440438 Breast and Cervical Cancer Screening $1,190,549 $1,199,779 G GRF 440444 AIDS Prevention $3,610,779 $3,623,351 H GRF 440451 Public Health Laboratory $8,893,355 $8,926,237 I GRF 440452 Child and Family Health Services Match $667,650 $683,513 J GRF 440453 Health Care Quality Assurance $6,868,538 $7,023,632 K GRF 440454 Environmental Health/Radiation Protection $5,241,349 $5,241,615 L GRF 440465 FQHC Primary Care Workforce Initiative $2,695,268 $2,698,697 M GRF 440472 Alcohol Testing $1,313,349 $1,338,992 N GRF 440482 Chronic Disease, Injury Prevention, and Drug Overdose $2,218,750 $2,195,097 O GRF 440483 Infectious Disease Prevention and Control $4,924,753 $4,988,016 P GRF 440484 Public Health Technology Innovation $909,147 $929,959 Q GRF 440485 Health Program Support $14,737,500 $14,187,500 R GRF 440495 Toxicology Screenings $1,000,000 $1,000,000 S GRF 440496 Children's Vision Services $5,000,000 $5,000,000 T GRF 440505 Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs $13,115,000 $12,615,000 U GRF 440507 Targeted Healthcare Services - Over 21 $2,000,000 $2,000,000 V GRF 440527 Lead Abatement $250,000 $250,000 W GRF 440672 Youth Homelessness $2,754,474 $2,755,903 X GRF 654453 Medicaid – State Health Program Support $4,478,896 $4,581,836 Y General Revenue Fund Total $90,643,957 $90,066,764 Z Highway Safety Fund Group AA 4T40 440603 Child Highway Safety $200,000 $200,000 AB Highway Safety Fund Group Total $200,000 $200,000 AC Dedicated Purpose Fund Group AD 4700 440605 Emergency Preparation and Response $2,500,000 $2,500,000 AE 4700 440647 Fee Supported Programs $32,650,000 $33,629,000 AF 4710 440619 Certificate of Need $408,045 $408,045 AG 4730 440622 Lab Operating Expenses $8,985,000 $9,254,001 AH 4770 440627 Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs Audit $4,942,318 $4,973,075 AI 4D60 440608 Genetics Services $3,316,583 $3,416,000 AJ 4F90 440610 Sickle Cell Disease Control $850,000 $850,000 AK 4G00 440636 Heirloom Birth Certificate $15,000 $15,000 AL 4G00 440637 Birth Certificate Surcharge $15,000 $15,000 AM 4L30 440609 HIV Care and Miscellaneous Expenses $52,697,000 $52,697,000 AN 4P40 440628 Ohio Physician Loan Repayment $1,000,000 $1,000,000 AO 4V60 440641 Save Our Sight $2,505,000 $2,580,000 AP 5B50 440616 Quality, Monitoring, and Inspection $5,753,000 $5,925,000 AQ 5BX0 440656 Tobacco Use Prevention, Cessation, and Enforcement $6,000,000 $6,000,000 AR 5D60 440620 Second Chance Trust $1,892,541 $1,892,541 AS 5ED0 440651 Smoke Free Indoor Air $280,000 $280,000 AT 5G40 440639 Adoption Services $100,000 $100,000 AU 5PE0 440659 Breast and Cervical Cancer Services $500,000 $500,000 AV 5QJ0 440662 Dental Hygienist Loan Repayments $100,000 $100,000 AW 5SH0 440520 Children's Wish Grant Program $275,000 $275,000 AX 5YS0 440491 Chiropractic Loan Repayment $30,000 $30,000 AY 5Z70 440624 Ohio Dentist Loan Repayment $275,000 $275,000 AZ 6100 440626 Radiation Emergency Response $1,551,682 $1,598,000 BA 6660 440607 Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs - County Assessments $24,060,000 $24,060,001 BB 6980 440634 Nurse Aide Training $126,600 $126,600 BC Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $150,827,769 $152,499,263 BD Internal Service Activity Fund Group BE 1420 440646 Agency Health Services $11,575,000 $11,575,000 BF 2110 440613 Central Support Indirect Costs $39,575,839 $40,763,000 BG Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $51,150,839 $52,338,000 BH Holding Account Fund Group BI R014 440631 Vital Statistics $155,000 $155,000 BJ R048 440625 Refunds, Grants Reconciliation, and Audit Settlements $20,000 $20,000 BK Holding Account Fund Group Total $175,000 $175,000 BL Federal Fund Group BM 3200 440601 Maternal Child Health Block Grant $25,000,000 $25,750,000 BN 3870 440602 Preventive Health Block Grant $11,800,000 $12,154,000 BO 3890 440604 Women, Infants, and Children $250,000,000 $250,000,001 BP 3910 440606 Medicare Survey and Certification $21,800,000 $22,454,000 BQ 3920 440618 Federal Public Health Programs $149,503,000 $153,988,000 BR 3GD0 654601 Medicaid Program Support $41,186,077 $41,508,003 BS 3GN0 440660 Public Health Emergency Preparedness $75,825,000 $78,099,000 BT 3HP0 440673 Public Health Emergency Response $100,500,000 $100,500,000 BU 3HP0 440686 ELC Strengthening HAI/AR Grant $10,000,000 $10,000,000 BV Federal Fund Group Total $685,614,077 $694,453,004 BW TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $978,611,642 $989,732,031 Section 291.20. MOTHERS AND CHILDREN SAFETY NET SERVICES Of the foregoing appropriation item 440416, Mothers and Children Safety Net Services, up to $200,000 in each fiscal year may be used to assist families with children who have hearing loss or hearing disorders under twenty-six years of age in purchasing hearing aids and hearing assistive technology. The Director of Health shall adopt rules governing the distribution of these funds, including rules that do both of the following: (1) establish eligibility criteria to include families with incomes at or below four hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines as defined in section 5101.46 of the Revised Code and (2) develop a sliding scale of disbursements under this section based on family income. The Director may adopt other rules as necessary to implement this section. Rules adopted under this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. FREE CLINIC SAFETY NET SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 440431, Free Clinic Safety Net Services, shall be provided to the Charitable Healthcare Network. Funds may be used to reimburse free clinics for health care services provided, as well as for administrative services, information technology costs, infrastructure repair, or other clinic necessities. Additionally, the Director of Health may designate up to five per cent of the appropriation in each fiscal year to pay the administrative costs the Department of Health incurs for operating the program. AIDS PREVENTION The foregoing appropriation item 440444, AIDS Prevention, shall be used to administer educational and other prevention initiatives. FQHC PRIMARY CARE WORKFORCE INITIATIVE The foregoing appropriation item 440465, FQHC Primary Care Workforce Initiative, shall be provided to the Ohio Association of Community Health Centers to administer the FQHC Primary Care Workforce Initiative. The Initiative shall provide medical, dental, behavioral health, physician assistant, and advanced practice nursing students with clinical rotations through federally qualified health centers. Additionally, the Director of Health may designate up to five per cent of the appropriation in each fiscal year to pay the administrative costs the Department of Health incurs for operating the program. CHRONIC DISEASE, INJURY PREVENTION, AND DRUG OVERDOSE Of the foregoing appropriation item 440482, Chronic Disease, Injury Prevention, and Drug Overdose, $1,200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used to administer the Parkinson's disease registry, in accordance with section 3701.25 of the Revised Code, and the stroke registry database, in accordance with section 3727.131 of the Revised Code. The Department of Health shall develop the Parkinson's disease registry utilizing an existing public health population system managed under the Department. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440482, Chronic Disease, Injury Prevention, and Drug Overdose, $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to support the YMCA's Safety Around Water drowning prevention program. Funds shall be distributed as grants to nonprofit and community organizations to provide swim lessons to at-risk youth and water safety education to at-risk youth and adults. The remainder of appropriation item 440482, Chronic Disease, Injury Prevention, and Drug Overdose, shall be used to support the Department of Health's ongoing health improvement and wellness efforts, health promotion, and related activities. HEALTH PROGRAM SUPPORT Of the forgoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $10,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Department of Health, in consultation with the Department of Education and Workforce, to support school-based health centers in high-need counties, as determined by the departments. Prior to establishing a patient-provider relationship with a minor, a school-based health center shall obtain general consent to treat the child from the child's parent, legal guardian, grandparent acting under section 3109.65 of the Revised Code, or other person authorized under Ohio law to consent to the child's medical care . This does not apply in emergency situations, first aid, other unanticipated minor health care services, or health care services provided pursuant to a student's IEP or a school district's obligation under section 504 of the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 794. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Ohio organizations currently providing all of the following services: wraparound care, including multidisciplinary clinical care; local case management services by health care professionals; durable medical and augmentative communication devices; state and federal advocacy; and support groups and patient grants for those diagnosed with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS). The distribution of funds shall be based on each awarded organization's identified Ohio county coverage and by the prevalence rate of persons living with ALS using the most recent population estimates available from the United States Census Bureau. Funds shall be used to support persons living with ALS, including any of the following: wraparound care, case management, purchase and distribution of durable medical equipment and augmentative communication devices, and patient grants for disease-related expenses. Funding is required to be designated in service to Ohioans and shall not be used for persons living outside of the state of Ohio. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $125,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to Ohio Adolescent Health Centers to support sexual risk avoidance programs in schools. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to the Transplant House of Cleveland to support organ transplant recipients and caregivers. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to hospitals and used to support graduate medical education residency slots for residents placed in family medicine or psychiatry fields. The Department shall establish requirements regarding the distribution of funds, including the requirement that funds are used to support residents placed in family medicine or psychiatry slots. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $62,500 in each fiscal year shall be provided to the Domestic Violence Project, Inc. to support the addition of a Community Educator position. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to Memorial Hospital for the Mid-Ohio Cardiovascular Health Improvement Initiative. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440485, Health Program Support, $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to provide fellowship stipends to Dayton Children's Hospital for pediatric therapy students interested in prioritized regional needs, as identified by the hospital. TOXICOLOGY SCREENINGS The foregoing appropriation item 440495, Toxicology Screenings, shall be used to reimburse county coroners in counties in which the coroner has performed toxicology screenings on victims of a drug overdose. The Director of Health shall transfer the funds to the counties in proportion to the numbers of toxicology screenings performed per county. CHILDREN'S VISION SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 440496, Children's Vision Services, shall be used to support the provision of vision care services as described in Section 291.30 of this act. TARGETED HEALTH CARE SERVICES-OVER 21 The foregoing appropriation item 440507, Targeted Health Care Services-Over 21, shall be used to administer the Cystic Fibrosis Program and to implement the Hemophilia Insurance Premium Payment Program. The Department of Health shall expend up to $100,000 in each fiscal year to implement the Hemophilia Insurance Premium Payment Program. The foregoing appropriation item 440507, Targeted Health Care Services-Over 21, shall also be used to do the following: cover services provided to adults over the age of twenty-one with Cystic Fibrosis who are eligible for treatment under the Cystic Fibrosis Program; provide essential medications; and pay the copayments for drugs approved by the Department of Health and covered by Medicare Part D that are dispensed to Program for Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs participants for the Cystic Fibrosis Program. LEAD ABATEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 440527, Lead Abatement, shall be used by the Department of Health to distribute funds to local governments for projects that include, but are not limited to, lead hazard control and housing rehabilitation initiatives that expand the Department's lead hazard control and prevention efforts. YOUTH HOMELESSNESS Of the foregoing appropriation item 440672, Youth Homelessness, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Star House for its Drop-In Centers and its Carol Stewart Village, or its other expansion projects, to provide services to homeless youth. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440672, Youth Homelessness, shall be used to address homelessness in youth and pregnant women by providing assertive outreach to provide stable housing, including recovery housing. No funds shall be distributed to youth shelters that promote or affirm social gender transition, in which an individual goes from identifying with and living as a gender that corresponds to the individual's biological sex to identifying with and living as a gender different from the individual's biological sex. EMERGENCY PREPARATION AND RESPONSE The foregoing appropriation item 440605, Emergency Preparation and Response, shall be used to support public health emergency preparedness and response efforts. This appropriation may also be used to support data infrastructure projects and other data analysis and analytics work. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE CONTROLLING BOARD EMERGENCY PURPOSES/CONTINGENCIES FUND TO THE GENERAL OPERATIONS FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to $2,500,000 cash from the Controlling Board Emergency Purposes/Contingencies Fund (Fund 5KM0) to the General Operations Fund (Fund 4700). FEE SUPPORTED PROGRAMS Of the foregoing appropriation item 440647, Fee Supported Programs, $2,160,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to distribute subsidies, on a per capita basis, to local health departments accredited through the Public Health Accreditation Board, or local health departments that are in the process of earning accreditation. Of the foregoing appropriation item 440647, Fee Supported Programs, $1,840,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to distribute subsidies to local health departments accredited through the Public Health Accreditation Board on a per capita basis. CHILDREN AND YOUTH WITH SPECIAL HEALTH CARE NEEDS AUDIT The Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs Audit Fund (Fund 4770) shall receive revenue from audits of hospitals and recoveries from third-party payers. Moneys may be expended for payment of audit settlements and for costs directly related to obtaining recoveries from third-party payers and for encouraging Program for Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs recipients to apply for third-party benefits. Moneys also may be expended for payments for diagnostic and treatment services on behalf of children and youth with special health care needs, as defined in division (A) of section 3701.022 of the Revised Code, and Ohio residents who are twenty-one or more years of age and who are suffering from cystic fibrosis or hemophilia. Moneys may also be expended for administrative expenses incurred in operating the Program for Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs. GENETICS SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 440608, Genetics Services, shall be used by the Department of Health to administer programs authorized by sections 3701.501 and 3701.502 of the Revised Code. None of these funds shall be used to counsel or refer for abortion. TOBACCO USE PREVENTION, CESSATION, AND ENFORCEMENT Of the foregoing appropriation item 440656, Tobacco Use Prevention, Cessation, and Enforcement, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Director of Health, in consultation with the Director of Children and Youth, to award funds to private, nonprofit, or government entities. The Directors shall determine how the funds are to be distributed, but shall prioritize awards to entities that serve women who reside in communities that have the highest infant mortality rates in this state, as identified under section 3701.142 of the Revised Code. Recognizing the significant health risks posed to women and their children by tobacco use during and after pregnancy, the Department of Health shall award grants to private, nonprofit, or government entities that demonstrate the ability to deliver evidence-based tobacco cessation interventions to women. The remainder of appropriation item 440656, Tobacco Use Prevention, Cessation, and Enforcement, shall be used to administer tobacco use prevention and cessation activities and programs, to administer compliance checks, retailer education, and programs related to legal age restrictions, and to enforce the Ohio Smoke-Free Workplace Act. CHILDREN AND YOUTH WITH SPECIAL HEALTH CARE NEEDS - COUNTY ASSESSMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 440607, Children and Youth with Special Health Care Needs - County Assessments, shall be used to make payments under division (E) of section 3701.023 of the Revised Code. FEDERAL PUBLIC HEALTH PROGRAMS Of the foregoing appropriation item 440618, Federal Public Health Programs, $7,800,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to Ohio Adolescent Health Centers. Section 291.30. OHIO STUDENT EYE EXAM PROGRAM (A) The Department of Health shall establish and administer the Ohio Student Eye Exam Program, to be known as the OhioSEE Program. Under the program, vision care services, including vision screenings, eye examinations, and glasses, may be provided to Ohio students, kindergarten through third grade, who fail vision screenings and lack access to follow-up care. (B) In administering the program, the Department shall focus on improving the percentage of vision care referrals completed, increasing student access to eye examinations, and providing necessary eyewear to eligible students. Section 293.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A HEF HIGHER EDUCATIONAL FACILITY COMMISSION B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4610 372601 Operating Expenses $15,513 $15,513 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $15,513 $15,513 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $15,513 $15,513 Section 295.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A SPA COMMISSION ON HISPANIC/LATINO AFFAIRS B General Revenue Fund C GRF 148321 Operating Expenses $466,248 $483,670 D General Revenue Fund Total $466,248 $483,670 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 6010 148602 Special Initiatives $50,000 $50,000 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $50,000 $50,000 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $516,248 $533,670 Section 297.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A OHS OHIO HISTORY CONNECTION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 360400 Holocaust and Genocide Memorial and Education Commission $1,110,000 $1,110,000 D GRF 360401 Ohio Commission for the U.S. Semiquincentennial $8,750,000 $2,000,000 E GRF 360402 UNESCO World Heritage Sites $2,000,000 $2,500,000 F GRF 360501 Education and Collections $6,139,320 $6,147,040 G GRF 360502 Site and Museum Operations $8,752,200 $8,752,200 H GRF 360504 Ohio Preservation Office $965,287 $965,287 I GRF 360505 National Afro-American Museum $811,000 $811,000 J GRF 360506 Hayes Presidential Center $750,000 $750,000 K GRF 360508 State Historical Grants $850,000 $700,000 L General Revenue Fund Total $30,127,807 $23,735,527 M Dedicated Purpose Fund Group N 5KL0 360602 Ohio History Tax Check-off $150,000 $150,000 O 5PD0 360603 Ohio History License Plate $10,000 $10,000 P Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $160,000 $160,000 Q TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $30,287,807 $23,895,527 Section 297.20. SUBSIDY APPROPRIATION Upon approval by the Director of Budget and Management, the foregoing appropriation items shall be released to the Ohio History Connection in quarterly amounts that in total do not exceed the annual appropriations. The funds and fiscal records of the Ohio History Connection for fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 shall be examined by independent certified public accountants approved by the Auditor of State, and a copy of the audited financial statements shall be filed with the Office of Budget and Management. The foregoing appropriations shall be considered to be the contractual consideration provided by the state to support the state's offer to contract with the Ohio History Connection under section 149.30 of the Revised Code. HOLOCAUST AND GENOCIDE MEMORIAL COMMISSION Of the foregoing appropriation item 360400, Holocaust and Genocide Memorial and Education Commission, $125,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for The Nancy and David Wolf Holocaust and Humanity Center. OHIO COMMISSION FOR THE U.S. SEMIQUINCENTENNIAL The foregoing appropriation item 360401, Ohio Commission for the U.S. Semiquincentennial, shall be used for grants across the state in support of the U.S. Semiquincentennial. Of the foregoing appropriation item 360401, Ohio Commission for the U.S. Semiquincentennial, $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used for marketing and event operations for the America's River Roots Festival. UNESCO WORLD HERITAGE SITES The foregoing appropriation item 360402, UNESCO World Heritage Sites, shall be used for operating costs for approved United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization (UNESCO) World Heritage sites in Ohio. STATE HISTORICAL GRANTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 360508, State Historical Grants, $350,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for the Western Reserve Historical Society, and $350,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for the Cincinnati Museum Center. Of the foregoing appropriation item 360508, State Historical Grants, $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used for the Wadsworth Area Historical Society and the preservation of St. Mark's Episcopal Church located in Wadsworth, Ohio. Section 299.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A REP OHIO HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 025321 Operating Expenses $35,100,000 $36,210,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $35,100,000 $36,210,000 E Internal Service Activity Fund Group F 1030 025601 House of Representatives Reimbursement $1,433,664 $1,433,664 G 4A40 025602 Miscellaneous Sales $50,000 $50,000 H Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $1,483,664 $1,483,664 I TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $36,583,664 $37,693,664 Section 299.20. OPERATING EXPENSES On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Chief Administrative Officer of the House of Representatives may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 025321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Chief Administrative Officer of the House of Representatives may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 025321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. HOUSE REIMBURSEMENT If it is determined by the Chief Administrative Officer of the House of Representatives that additional appropriations are necessary for the foregoing appropriation item 025601, House of Representatives Reimbursement, the amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 301.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A HFA OHIO HOUSING FINANCE AGENCY B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5AZ0 997601 Housing Finance Agency Personal Services $19,760,000 $20,485,000 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $19,760,000 $20,485,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $19,760,000 $20,485,000 Section 303.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A IGO OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL B General Revenue Fund C GRF 965321 Operating Expenses $2,079,000 $2,158,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $2,079,000 $2,158,000 E Internal Service Activity Fund Group F 5FA0 965603 Deputy Inspector General for ODOT $400,000 $400,000 G 5FT0 965604 Deputy Inspector General for BWC/OIC $425,000 $425,000 H Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $825,000 $825,000 I TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,904,000 $2,983,000 Section 305.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A INS DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5540 820401 Examination $11,242,604 $11,690,798 D 5540 820601 Operating Expenses - OSHIIP $400,670 $414,002 E 5540 820606 Operating Expenses $36,479,179 $37,595,513 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $48,122,453 $49,700,313 G Federal Fund Group H 3U50 820602 OSHIIP Operating Grant $3,050,000 $3,050,000 I Federal Fund Group Total $3,050,000 $3,050,000 J TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $51,172,453 $52,750,313 Section 305.20. MARKET CONDUCT EXAMINATION When conducting a market conduct examination of any insurer doing business in this state, the Superintendent of Insurance may assess the costs of the examination against the insurer. The Superintendent may enter into consent agreements to impose administrative assessments or fines for conduct discovered that may be violations of statutes or rules administered by the Superintendent. All costs, assessments, or fines collected shall be deposited to the credit of the Department of Insurance Operating Fund (Fund 5540). Section 307.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A JFS DEPARTMENT OF JOB AND FAMILY SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 600410 TANF State Maintenance of Effort $147,169,083 $147,169,083 D GRF 600450 Program Operations $155,325,446 $156,655,581 E GRF 600502 Child Support - Local $26,400,000 $26,400,000 F GRF 600521 Family Assistance - Local $50,000,000 $50,000,000 G GRF 600533 Child, Family, and Community Protection Services $13,500,000 $13,500,000 H GRF 600534 Adult Protective Services $9,720,000 $9,720,000 I GRF 655425 Medicaid Program Support $15,779,739 $16,393,535 J GRF 655522 Medicaid Program Support - Local $44,000,000 $44,000,000 K GRF 655523 Medicaid Program Support - Local Transportation $43,530,000 $43,530,000 L General Revenue Fund Total $505,424,268 $507,368,199 M Dedicated Purpose Fund Group N 4A80 600658 Public Assistance Activities $21,400,000 $21,400,000 O 4A90 600607 Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund $45,180,000 $36,670,000 P 5CI1 6006B6 Utility Community Assistance $0 $686,947 Q 5ES0 600630 Food Bank Assistance $500,000 $500,000 R 5M40 6006B2 Low Income Energy Assistance $0 $176,222,102 S 5RY0 600698 Human Services Project $10,000,000 $10,000,000 T Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $77,080,000 $245,479,049 U Internal Service Activity Fund Group V 5HL0 600602 State and County Shared Services $2,000,000 $2,000,000 W 5WU0 6006C2 Ohio Benefits $0 $169,005,914 X Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $2,000,000 $171,005,914 Y Fiduciary Fund Group Z 1920 600646 Child Support Intercept-Federal $100,000,000 $100,000,000 AA 5830 600642 Child Support Intercept-State $13,000,000 $13,000,000 AB 5B60 600601 Food Assistance Intercept $9,000,000 $9,000,000 AC Fiduciary Fund Group Total $122,000,000 $122,000,000 AD Holding Account Fund Group AE R012 600643 Refunds and Audit Settlements $500,000 $500,000 AF Holding Account Fund Group Total $500,000 $500,000 AG Federal Fund Group AH 3310 600615 Veterans Programs $9,729,693 $10,046,576 AI 3310 600624 Employment Services $33,757,412 $33,361,820 AJ 3310 600686 Workforce Programs $3,726,601 $3,831,863 AK 3840 600610 Food Assistance Programs $353,577,548 $355,477,007 AL 3850 600614 Refugee Services $43,221,914 $47,817,949 AM 3950 600616 Federal Discretionary Grants $4,500,000 $4,500,000 AN 3960 600620 Social Services Block Grant $38,100,747 $38,339,506 AO 3970 600626 Child Support - Federal $206,615,245 $206,484,306 AP 3F01 655624 Medicaid Program Support - Federal $221,532,699 $222,146,496 AQ 3FI0 6006B4 Home Weatherization Program $0 $45,000,000 AR 3K90 6006B3 Home Energy Assistance Block Grant $0 $180,000,000 AS 3K90 6006B7 HEAP Weatherization $0 $44,000,000 AT 3L00 6006B8 Community Services Block Grant $0 $32,000,000 AU 3S50 600622 Child Support Projects $539,000 $539,000 AV 3V00 600688 Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act Programs $165,467,651 $172,078,185 AW 3V40 600632 Trade Programs $3,001,000 $3,001,000 AX 3V40 600678 Federal Unemployment Programs $122,666,388 $125,686,620 AY 3V40 600679 Unemployment Compensation Review Commission-Federal $6,068,609 $6,249,573 AZ 3V60 600689 TANF Block Grant $561,481,981 $561,481,981 BA Federal Fund Group Total $1,773,986,488 $2,092,041,882 BB TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,480,990,756 $3,138,395,044 Section 307.20. COUNTY ADMINISTRATIVE FUNDS (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600521, Family Assistance - Local, up to $46,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to county departments of job and family services to administer food assistance and disability assistance programs. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600521, Family Assistance –Local, an additional $2,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to assist county departments that submit an approved plan on increasing fraud prevention, early detection of fraud, and investigations on potential fraud that may be occurring in public assistance programs. (C) The foregoing appropriation item 655522, Medicaid Program Support - Local, shall be provided to county departments of job and family services to administer the Medicaid program and the State Children's Health Insurance program. (D) At the request of the Director of Job and Family Services, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer appropriations between the following appropriation items to ensure county administrative funds are expended from the proper appropriation item: (1) Appropriation item 600521, Family Assistance – Local, and appropriation item 655522, Medicaid Program Support – Local; and (2) Appropriation item 655523, Medicaid Program Support – Local Transportation, and appropriation item 655522, Medicaid Program Support – Local. Section 307.30. NAME OF FOOD STAMP PROGRAM The Director of Job and Family Services is not required to amend rules regarding the Food Stamp Program to change the name of the program to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. The Director may refer to the program as the Food Stamp Program, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, or the Food Assistance Program in rules and documents of the Department of Job and Family Services. Section 307.40. OHIO ASSOCIATION OF FOOD BANKS Of the foregoing appropriation items 600410, TANF State Maintenance of Effort, 600658, Public Assistance Activities, and 600689, TANF Block Grant, a total of up to $22,050,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide funds to the Ohio Association of Food Banks to purchase and distribute food products, support Innovative Summer Meals programs for children, provide SNAP outreach and free tax filing services, and provide capacity building equipment for food pantries and soup kitchens. Notwithstanding section 5101.46 of the Revised Code and any other provision in this act, the Director of Job and Family Services shall provide assistance from eligible funds to the Ohio Association of Food Banks in an amount up to $24,550,000 in each fiscal year. This amount includes the funds designated to the Ohio Association of Food Banks in the first paragraph of this section. Eligible nonfederal expenditures made by member food banks of the Association shall be counted by the Department of Job and Family Services toward the TANF maintenance of effort requirements of 42 U.S.C. 609(a)(7). The Director of Job and Family Services shall enter into an agreement with the Ohio Association of Food Banks, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to carry out the requirements under this section. Section 307.50. OHIO ASSOCIATION OF FOODBANKS SUBGRANT The Department of Job and Family Services shall enter into a subgrant agreement with the Ohio Association of Foodbanks to enable the Association to provide food distribution to low-income families and individuals via the statewide charitable emergency food provider network and to support transportation of meals for the Governor's Office of Faith-Based and Community Initiatives Innovative Summer Meals programs for children and provide capacity building equipment for food pantries and soup kitchens. The Ohio Association of Foodbanks shall do all of the following: (A) Purchase food for the Agriculture Clearance and Ohio Food Programs. Information regarding the food purchase shall be reflected in the plan for statewide distribution of food products to local food distribution agencies. (B) Support the Capacity Building Grant program and purchase equipment for partner agencies that is needed to increase their capacity to serve more families eligible under the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program with perishable foods, fruits, and vegetables. This equipment purchase shall include, but is not limited to, shelving, pallet jacks, commercial refrigerators, and commercial freezers. (C) Submit a quarterly report to the Department of Job and Family Services not later than sixty days after the close of the quarter to which the report pertains. The quarterly report shall include all of the following: (1) A summary of the allocation and expenditure of grant funds; (2) Product type and pounds distributed by foodbank service region and county; (3) The number of households, households with children, a breakdown of individuals served by age, including those over the age of sixty, those between the ages of nineteen and fifty-nine, and those up to the age of eighteen, and the number of meals served. (D) Submit an annual report to the Agreement Manager at the Department of Job and Family Services not later than one hundred twenty days after the end of the fiscal year. The annual report shall include the following: (1) A summary of the allocation and expenditure of grant funds; (2) The number of households, households with children, a breakdown of individuals served by age, including those over the age of sixty, those between the ages of nineteen and fifty-nine, and those up to the age of eighteen, and the number of meals served. (3) The quantity and type of food distributed and the total per pound cost of the food purchased; (4) Information on the cost of storage, transportation, and processing; (5) An evaluation of the success in achieving expected performance outcomes. Section 307.60. FOOD STAMPS TRANSFER On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, and upon request of the Director of Job and Family Services, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $1,000,000 cash from the Food Stamp Offset Fund (Fund 5B60), to the Food Assistance Fund (Fund 5ES0). Section 307.70. PUBLIC ASSISTANCE ACTIVITIES/TANF MOE The foregoing appropriation item 600658, Public Assistance Activities, shall be used by the Department of Job and Family Services to meet the TANF maintenance of effort requirements of 42 U.S.C. 609(a)(7). When the state is assured that it will meet the maintenance of effort requirement, the Department of Job and Family Services may use funds from appropriation item 600658, Public Assistance Activities, to support public assistance activities. Section 307.80. TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES FUNDS (A) Of the foregoing appropriation items 600410, TANF State Maintenance of Effort, and 600689, TANF Block Grant, up to $13,410,000 in each fiscal year shall be used, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to provide support to programs or organizations that provide services that align with the mission and goals of the Governor's Office of Faith-Based and Community Initiatives, as outlined in section 107.12 of the Revised Code, and that further at least one of the four purposes of the TANF program, as specified in 42 U.S.C. 601. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation items 600410, TANF State Maintenance of Effort, and 600689, TANF Block Grant, $8,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Ohio Alliance of Boys and Girls Clubs to provide after-school and summer programs that protect at-risk children and enable youth to become responsible adults. (C) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Children's Hunger Alliance to assist with meal sponsorship, early child care programs, child care, consultations and nutrition education, school district nutrition programs, after school nutrition programs, and summer nutrition programs. (D) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to the Toledo Seagate Foodbank, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code. (E) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to Open Doors Academy. (F) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to Produce Perks. (G) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Ohio YMCA to support day camps and before and after school programs to help students remove barriers to their learning. (H) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Country Neighbor Program. (I) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $400,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Southside Life Station Food Pantry in Toledo. (J) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $400,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Simon Kenton Council for the administration of the ScoutReach program. Funding shall be used for the following: to expand access to scouting in under-resourced communities; to provide financial assistance for participating families; to hire two additional program coordinators, a risk manager, and a social worker; to purchase program supplies; and to provide marketing resources to enhance outreach and engagement. Funds shall be distributed in accordance with guidelines established for nonprofit educational and youth development programs. The Simon Kenton Council shall submit an annual report to the Department of Job and Family Services detailing the program's expansion, impact, and financial expenditures. (K) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to La Soupe to support and expand its core food security programs across Ohio. (L) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $600,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to The Foundry Row, Sail, Dream Program. (M) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the African American Male Wellness Agency for the Uplift Her initiative. (N) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $150,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to Dads2Be. (O) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to Child Focus. (P) Of the foregoing appropriation item 600689, TANF Block Grant, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to Ohio Guidestone. Section 307.90. PROGRAM OPERATIONS Of the foregoing appropriation item 600450, Program Operations, $10,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated for the GRIT program to be administered by the Department of Job and Family Services, in coordination with the Governor's Office of Appalachia and the Department of Development. The program shall expand the qualified worker pipeline, remove barriers to fill local and remote jobs, and promote entrepreneurial endeavors in economically distressed and at-risk areas within the Appalachian region of Ohio, as defined in section 107.21 of the Revised Code, and other like counties within the state. The amount set aside for the GRIT program under this section shall be used for the following: (A) To establish, in collaboration with private businesses and public sector partners, virtual workforce development centers and supportive resources and to place unemployed and underemployed youth and adults into jobs; (B) To support assessment, coaching, wraparound services, and other career development and training activities for both high school youth and adults. The amount set aside for the GRIT program under this section may be used for operating costs. Section 307.100. CHILD, FAMILY, AND COMMUNITY PROTECTION SERVICES (A) The foregoing appropriation item 600533, Child, Family, and Community Protection Services, shall be distributed to county departments of job and family services. County departments shall use the funds distributed to them under this section as follows, in accordance with the written plan of cooperation entered into under section 307.983 of the Revised Code: (1) To assist individuals in achieving or maintaining self-sufficiency, including by reducing or preventing dependency among individuals with family income not exceeding two hundred per cent of the federal poverty guidelines; (2) Subject to division (B) of this section, to respond to reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of children and adults, including through the differential response approach program; (3) To provide outreach and referral services regarding home and community-based services to individuals at risk of placement in a group home or institution, regardless of the individuals' family income and without need for a written application; (4) To provide outreach, referral, application assistance, and other services to assist individuals to receive assistance, benefits, or services under Medicaid; Title IV-A programs, as defined in section 5101.80 of the Revised Code; the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; and other public assistance programs. (B) Protective services may be provided to a child or adult as part of a response, under division (A)(2) of this section, to a report of abuse, neglect, or exploitation without regard to a child or adult's family income and without need for a written application. The protective services may be provided if the case record documents circumstances of actual or potential abuse, neglect, or exploitation. Section 307.110. ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES Of the foregoing appropriation item 600534, Adult Protective Services, $7,040,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide an initial allocation of $80,000 to each county. The remainder of appropriation item 600534 shall be provided to counties in accordance with the formula established in section 5101.612 of the Revised Code. Section 307.117. UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION FUND A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 600607, Unemployment Compensation Administration Fund, in each fiscal year shall be used to make payments pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Chapter 125. of the Revised Code, as supplemented by Section 701.40 of H.B. 529 of the 132nd General Assembly, with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, implementation, and integration of the Unemployment Insurance System. Section 307.119. TEMPORARY TRANSFER TO UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION SPECIAL ADMINISTRATIVE FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $15,000,000 cash from any fund used by the Department of Job and Family Services, except General Revenue Funds, to the Unemployment Compensation Special Administrative Fund (Fund 4A90) to pay the costs of building and developing a new unemployment insurance information technology system. Not later than June 30, 2027, the Director of Budget and Management, upon the request of the Director of Job and Family Services, shall transfer cash equal to the amount previously transferred to Fund 4A90 from the fund selected above in fiscal year 2026, from Fund 4A90 back into the selected fund. Section 307.120. FIDUCIARY AND HOLDING ACCOUNT FUND GROUPS The Fiduciary Fund Group and Holding Account Fund Group shall be used to hold revenues until the appropriate fund is determined or until the revenues are directed to the appropriate governmental agency other than the Department of Job and Family Services. Any Department of Job and Family Services refunds or reconciliations received or held by the Department of Medicaid shall be transferred or credited to the Refunds and Audit Settlement Fund (Fund R012). If receipts credited to the Support Intercept – Federal Fund (Fund 1920), the Support Intercept – State Fund (Fund 5830), the Food Stamp Offset Fund (Fund 5B60), or the Refunds and Audit Settlements Fund (Fund R012) exceed the amounts appropriated from the fund, the Director of Job and Family Services may request the Director of Budget and Management to authorize expenditures from the fund in excess of the amounts appropriated. Upon the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 307.130. HEAP WEATHERIZATION Up to twenty-five per cent of the federal funds deposited to the credit of the Home Energy Assistance Block Grant (Fund 3K90) may be expended from appropriation item 6006B7, HEAP Weatherization, to provide home weatherization services in the state as determined by the Director of Job and Family Services. Section 307.140. SUMMER ELECTRONIC BENEFITS TRANSFER FOR CHILDREN FUND (A) The Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer for Children Fund is created, which shall be in the custody of the Treasurer of State but shall not be part of the state treasury. The fund shall consist of all money awarded by the United States Department of Agriculture as benefits under 42 U.S.C. 1762. All money in the fund shall be used by the Director of Job and Family Services solely for the purpose of paying eligible charges incurred by children and families eligible for, and participating in, the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer for Children Program. (B) On or before August 1 of each fiscal year, the Director shall submit to the Governor, the Director of Budget and Management, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives information regarding the Summer Electronic Benefits Transfer for Children Program created under 42 U.S.C. 1762, including the amount of federal funding received for the program in the previous fiscal year. Section 307.150. WORK REQUIREMENTS The Director of Job and Family Services may refer Ohio Works First and Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program participants who have indicated that they have a mental or physical illness or impairment to the agency for vocational rehabilitation assessment and support services. Such participants must continue with vocational rehabilitation services pursuant to this section in order to meet Ohio Works First and Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program work requirements, unless they are determined unable to work by the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities agency, or otherwise meet minimum program work requirements. Participants who are not determined unable to work by the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities agency and who do not participate with vocational rehabilitation services pursuant to this section or otherwise meet minimum program work requirements will have benefits terminated in accordance with federal regulations. Section 309.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A JCR JOINT COMMITTEE ON AGENCY RULE REVIEW B General Revenue Fund C GRF 029321 Operating Expenses $570,000 $570,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $570,000 $570,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $570,000 $570,000 Section 309.20. OPERATING GUIDANCE The Legislative Service Commission shall act as fiscal agent for the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review. Members of the Committee shall be paid in accordance with section 101.35 of the Revised Code. OPERATING EXPENSES On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 029321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Executive Director of the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 029321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. Section 313.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A JMO JOINT MEDICAID OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 048321 Operating Expenses $133,000 $0 D General Revenue Fund Total $133,000 $0 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $133,000 $0 Section 313.20. OPERATING EXPENSES The foregoing appropriation item 048321, Operating Expenses, shall be used to support expenses related to the Joint Medicaid Oversight Committee created by section 103.41 of the Revised Code. Section 315.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A JCO JUDICIAL CONFERENCE OF OHIO B General Revenue Fund C GRF 018321 Operating Expenses $1,398,265 $1,475,131 D General Revenue Fund Total $1,398,265 $1,475,131 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4030 018601 Ohio Jury Instructions $746,000 $814,899 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $746,000 $814,899 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,144,265 $2,290,030 Section 315.20. STATE COUNCIL OF UNIFORM STATE LAWS Notwithstanding section 105.26 of the Revised Code, of the foregoing appropriation item 018321, Operating Expenses, up to $103,315 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $108,481 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used to pay the expenses of the State Council of Uniform State Laws, including membership dues to the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws. OHIO JURY INSTRUCTIONS FUND The Ohio Jury Instructions Fund (Fund 4030) shall consist of grants, royalties, dues, conference fees, bequests, devises, and other gifts received for the purpose of supporting costs incurred by the Judicial Conference of Ohio in its activities as a part of the judicial system of the state as determined by the Judicial Conference Executive Committee. Fund 4030 shall be used by the Judicial Conference of Ohio to pay expenses incurred in its activities as a part of the judicial system of the state as determined by the Judicial Conference Executive Committee. All moneys accruing to Fund 4030 in excess of the amount appropriated for the current fiscal year are hereby appropriated for the purposes authorized. No money in Fund 4030 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Section 317.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A JSC THE JUDICIARY/SUPREME COURT B General Revenue Fund C GRF 005321 Operating Expenses - Judiciary/Supreme Court $218,911,023 $230,757,735 D GRF 005401 State Criminal Sentencing Commission $1,506,142 $1,601,731 E GRF 005406 Law-Related Education $250,000 $250,000 F General Revenue Fund Total $220,667,165 $232,609,466 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group H 4C80 005605 Attorney Services $10,718,083 $10,721,022 I 5HT0 005617 Court Interpreter Certification $9,000 $9,000 J 5SP0 005626 Civil Justice Grant Program $425,000 $425,000 K 5T80 005609 Grants and Awards $1,000 $1,000 L 6720 005601 Continuing Judicial Education $37,500 $37,500 M Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $11,190,583 $11,193,522 N Fiduciary Fund Group O 5JY0 005620 County Law Library Resources Boards $313,800 $318,500 P Fiduciary Fund Group Total $313,800 $318,500 Q Federal Fund Group R 3J00 005603 Federal Grants $1,810,907 $1,157,600 S Federal Fund Group Total $1,810,907 $1,157,600 T TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $233,982,455 $245,279,088 Section 317.20. STATE CRIMINAL SENTENCING COMMISSION The foregoing appropriation item 005401, State Criminal Sentencing Commission, shall be used for the operation of the State Criminal Sentencing Commission established by section 181.21 of the Revised Code. LAW-RELATED EDUCATION Of the foregoing appropriation item 005406, Law-Related Education, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed directly to the Ohio Center for Law-Related Education for the purposes of providing continuing citizenship education activities to primary and secondary students, expanding delinquency prevention programs, increasing activities for at-risk youth, and accessing additional public and private money for new programs. ATTORNEY SERVICES The Attorney Registration Fund (Fund 4C80) shall consist of money received by the Supreme Court (The Judiciary) pursuant to the Rules for the Government of the Bar of Ohio. In addition to funding other activities considered appropriate by the Supreme Court, the foregoing appropriation item 005605, Attorney Services, may be used to compensate employees and to fund appropriate activities of the following offices established by the Supreme Court: the Office of Disciplinary Counsel, the Board of Commissioners on Grievances and Discipline, the Clients' Security Fund, and the Attorney Services Division which include the Office of Bar Admissions. If it is determined by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court that changes to the appropriation are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. No money in Fund 4C80 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Interest earned on money in Fund 4C80 shall be credited to the fund. COURT INTERPRETER CERTIFICATION The Court Interpreter Certification Fund (Fund 5HT0) shall consist of money received by the Supreme Court (The Judiciary) pursuant to Rules 80 through 87 of the Rules of Superintendence for the Courts of Ohio. The foregoing appropriation item 005617, Court Interpreter Certification, shall be used to provide training, to provide the written examination, and to pay language experts to rate, or grade, the oral examinations of those applying to become certified court interpreters. If it is determined by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court that changes to the appropriation are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. No money in Fund 5HT0 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Interest earned on money in Fund 5HT0 shall be credited to the fund. CIVIL JUSTICE GRANT PROGRAM The Civil Justice Program Fund (Fund 5SP0) shall consist of (1) $50 voluntary donations made as part of the biennium attorney registration process and (2) $150 of the pro hac vice fees for out-of-state attorneys pursuant to Government of the Bar Rule amendments. The foregoing appropriation item 005626, Civil Justice Grant Program, shall be used by the Supreme Court of Ohio for grants to not-for-profit organizations and agencies dedicated to providing civil legal aid to underserved populations, to fund innovative programs directed at this purpose, and to increase access to judicial service to that population. If it is determined by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court that changes to the appropriation are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. No money in Fund 5SP0 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Interest earned on money in Fund 5SP0 shall be credited to the fund. GRANTS AND AWARDS The Grants and Awards Fund (Fund 5T80) shall consist of grants and other money awarded to the Supreme Court (The Judiciary) by the State Justice Institute, the Division of Criminal Justice Services, or other entities. The foregoing appropriation item 005609, Grants and Awards, shall be used in a manner consistent with the purpose of the grant or award. If it is determined by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court that changes to the appropriation are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. No money in Fund 5T80 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Interest earned on money in Fund 5T80 shall be credited or transferred to the General Revenue Fund. JUDICIARY/SUPREME COURT EDUCATION The Judiciary/Supreme Court Education Fund (Fund 6720) shall consist of fees paid for attending judicial and public education on the law, reimbursement of costs for judicial and public education on the law, and other gifts and grants received for the purpose of judicial and public education on the law. The foregoing appropriation item 005601, Continuing Judicial Education, shall be used to pay expenses for judicial education courses for judges, court personnel, and those who serve the courts, and for public education on the law. If it is determined by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court that changes to the appropriation are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. No money in Fund 6720 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Interest earned on money in Fund 6720 shall be credited to the fund. COUNTY LAW LIBRARY RESOURCES BOARDS The Statewide Consortium of County Law Library Resources Boards Fund (Fund 5JY0) shall consist of moneys deposited pursuant to section 307.515 of the Revised Code into a county's law library resources fund and forwarded by that county's treasurer for deposit in the state treasury pursuant to division (E)(1) of section 3375.481 of the Revised Code. The foregoing appropriation item 005620, County Law Library Resources Boards, shall be used for the operation of the Statewide Consortium of County Law Library Resources Boards. If it is determined by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court that changes to the appropriation are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. No money in Fund 5JY0 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. Interest earned on money in Fund 5JY0 shall be credited to the fund. FEDERAL GRANTS The Federal Grants Fund (Fund 3J00) shall consist of grants and other moneys awarded to the Supreme Court (The Judiciary) by the United States Government or other entities that receive the moneys directly from the United States Government and distribute those moneys to the Supreme Court (The Judiciary). The foregoing appropriation item 005603, Federal Grants, shall be used in a manner consistent with the purpose of the grant or award. If it is determined by the Administrative Director of the Supreme Court that changes to the appropriation are necessary, the amounts are hereby appropriated. No money in Fund 3J00 shall be transferred to any other fund by the Director of Budget and Management or the Controlling Board. However, interest earned on money in Fund 3J00 shall be credited or transferred to the General Revenue Fund. Section 319.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A LEC LAKE ERIE COMMISSION B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4C00 780601 Lake Erie Protection $900,000 $940,000 D 6H20 780604 H2Ohio $132,000 $132,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,032,000 $1,072,000 F Federal Fund Group G 3EP0 780603 LEC Federal Grants $1,140,000 $1,140,000 H Federal Fund Group Total $1,140,000 $1,140,000 I TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,172,000 $2,212,000 Section 319.20. CASH TRANSFERS TO THE LAKE ERIE PROTECTION FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from the funds specified below, up to the amounts specified below, to the Lake Erie Protection Fund (Fund 4C00). Fund 4C00 may accept contributions and transfers made to the fund. 1 2 3 4 5 A Fund Fund Name User FY 2026 FY 2027 B 5BC0 Environmental Protection Environmental Protection Agency $25,000 $25,000 C 6690 Pesticide, Fertilizer and Lime Department of Agriculture $25,000 $25,000 D 4700 General Operations Department of Health $25,000 $25,000 E 1570 Program Support Department of Natural Resources $25,000 $25,000 F 1350 Supportive Services Department of Development $25,000 $25,000 Section 321.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A JLE JOINT LEGISLATIVE ETHICS COMMITTEE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 028321 Legislative Ethics Committee $713,000 $713,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $713,000 $713,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4G70 028601 Joint Legislative Ethics Committee $150,000 $150,000 G 5HN0 028602 Investigations and Financial Disclosure $10,000 $10,000 H Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $160,000 $160,000 I TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $873,000 $873,000 Section 321.20. LEGISLATIVE ETHICS COMMITTEE On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Legislative Inspector General of the Joint Legislative Ethics Committee may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 028321, Legislative Ethics Committee, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Legislative Inspector General of the Joint Legislative Ethics Committee may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 028321, Legislative Ethics Committee, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. Section 323.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A LSC LEGISLATIVE SERVICE COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 035321 Operating Expenses $24,800,000 $24,800,000 D GRF 035402 Legislative Fellows $1,200,000 $1,200,000 E GRF 035405 Correctional Institution Inspection Committee $125,000 $0 F GRF 035407 Legislative Task Force on Redistricting $100,000 $0 G GRF 035409 National Associations $712,000 $712,000 H GRF 035410 Legislative Information Systems $15,000,000 $15,000,000 I GRF 035501 Litigation $1,000,000 $1,000,000 J General Revenue Fund Total $42,937,000 $42,712,000 K TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $42,937,000 $42,712,000 Section 323.20. OPERATING EXPENSES On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of the Legislative Service Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of the Legislative Service Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION INSPECTION COMMITTEE The foregoing appropriation item 035405, Correctional Institution Inspection Committee, shall be used for Correctional Institution Inspection Committee operations until the date the Committee is abolished. LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON REDISTRICTING An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035407, Legislative Task Force on Redistricting, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated to the Legislative Service Commission for the same purpose for fiscal year 2026. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035407, Legislative Task Force on Redistricting, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the Legislative Service Commission for the same purpose for fiscal year 2027. LEGISLATIVE INFORMATION SYSTEMS On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of the Legislative Service Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035410, Legislative Information Systems, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of the Legislative Service Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035410, Legislative Information Systems, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. LITIGATION The foregoing appropriation item 035501, Litigation, shall be used for any lawsuit in which the General Assembly, or either house of the General Assembly, is made a party. The chairperson and vice-chairperson of the Legislative Service Commission shall both approve the use of the appropriated moneys. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035501, Litigation, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated to the Legislative Service Commission for the same purpose for fiscal year 2026. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 035501, Litigation, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the Legislative Service Commission for the same purpose for fiscal year 2027. Section 325.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A LIB STATE LIBRARY BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4590 350603 Services for Libraries $6,748,455 $6,783,244 D 4S40 350604 Ohio Public Library Information Network $5,567,715 $5,587,432 E 5CW1 350608 Ohioana Library Association $310,516 $310,516 F 5CX1 350609 Regional Library Systems $494,000 $494,000 G 5CZ1 350607 Operating Expenses $4,527,036 $4,527,474 H 5GB0 350605 Library for the Blind $1,274,194 $1,274,194 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $18,921,916 $18,976,860 J Internal Service Activity Fund Group K 1390 350602 Services for State Agencies $8,000 $8,000 L Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $8,000 $8,000 M Federal Fund Group N 3130 350601 LSTA Federal $5,554,767 $5,609,015 O Federal Fund Group Total $5,554,767 $5,609,015 P TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $24,484,683 $24,593,875 Section 325.20. OHIOANA LIBRARY ASSOCIATION Of the foregoing appropriation item 350608, Ohioana Library Association, $191,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the operating expenses of the Martha Kinney Cooper Ohioana Library Association under section 3375.61 of the Revised Code. The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 350608, Ohioana Library Association, shall be used to pay the rental expenses of the Martha Kinney Cooper Ohioana Library Association under section 3375.61 of the Revised Code. REGIONAL LIBRARY SYSTEMS The foregoing appropriation item 350609, Regional Library Systems, shall be used to support regional library systems eligible for funding under sections 3375.83 and 3375.90 of the Revised Code. OHIO PUBLIC LIBRARY INFORMATION NETWORK (A) The foregoing appropriation item 350604, Ohio Public Library Information Network, shall be used for an information telecommunications network linking public libraries in the state and such others as may participate in the Ohio Public Library Information Network (OPLIN). The Ohio Public Library Information Network Board of Trustees created under section 3375.65 of the Revised Code may make decisions regarding use of the foregoing appropriation item 350604, Ohio Public Library Information Network. (B) The OPLIN Board shall research and assist or advise local libraries with regard to emerging technologies and methods that may be effective means to control access to obscene and illegal materials. The OPLIN Director shall provide written reports upon request within ten days to the Governor, the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, and the President and Minority Leader of the Senate on any steps being taken by OPLIN and public libraries in the state to limit and control such improper usage as well as information on technological, legal, and law enforcement trends nationally and internationally affecting this area of public access and service. (C) The Ohio Public Library Information Network, INFOhio, and OhioLINK shall, to the extent feasible, coordinate and cooperate in their purchase or other acquisition of the use of electronic databases for their respective users and shall contribute funds in an equitable manner to such effort. LIBRARY FOR THE BLIND The foregoing appropriation item 350605, Library for the Blind, shall be used for the statewide Talking Book Program to assist the blind and disabled. TRANSFER TO OPLIN TECHNOLOGY FUND Notwithstanding sections 5747.03 and 5747.47 of the Revised Code and any other provision of law to the contrary, in accordance with a schedule established by the Director of Budget and Management, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $3,689,788 cash in each fiscal year from the Public Library Fund (Fund 7065) to the OPLIN Technology Fund (Fund 4S40). TRANSFER TO LIBRARY FOR THE BLIND FUND Notwithstanding sections 5747.03 and 5747.47 of the Revised Code and any other provision of law to the contrary, in accordance with a schedule established by the Director of Budget and Management, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $1,274,194 cash in each fiscal year from the Public Library Fund (Fund 7065) to the Library for the Blind Fund (Fund 5GB0). TRANSFER TO STATE LIBRARY OPERATING EXPENSES FUND Notwithstanding sections 5747.03 and 5747.47 of the Revised Code and any other provision of law to the contrary, in accordance with a schedule established by the Director of Budget and Management, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $4,527,036 cash in fiscal year 2026 and $4,527,474 cash in fiscal year 2027 from the Public Library Fund (Fund 7065) to the State Library Operating Expenses Fund (Fund 5CZ1), which is hereby created in the state treasury. TRANSFER TO THE OHIOANA LIBRARY ASSOCIATION FUND Notwithstanding sections 5747.03 and 5747.47 of the Revised Code and any other provision of law to the contrary, in accordance with a schedule established by the Director of Budget and Management, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $310,516 cash in each fiscal year from the Public Library Fund (Fund 7065) to the Ohioana Library Association Fund (Fund 5CW1), which is hereby created in the state treasury. TRANSFER TO REGIONAL LIBRARY SYSTEMS FUND Notwithstanding sections 5747.03 and 5747.47 of the Revised Code and any other provision of law to the contrary, in accordance with a schedule established by the Director of Budget and Management, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $494,000 cash in each fiscal year from the Public Library Fund (Fund 7065) to the Regional Library Systems Fund (Fund 5CX1), which is hereby created in the state treasury. Section 327.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A LCO LIQUOR CONTROL COMMISSION B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5LP0 970601 Commission Operating Expenses $1,177,114 $1,241,735 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,177,114 $1,241,735 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,177,114 $1,241,735 Section 329.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A LOT STATE LOTTERY COMMISSION B State Lottery Fund Group C 7044 950321 Operating Expenses $70,000,000 $71,000,000 D 7044 950402 Advertising Contracts $30,811,375 $30,811,375 E 7044 950403 Gaming Contracts $123,355,327 $128,639,066 F 7044 950601 Direct Prize Payments $183,030,000 $183,282,000 G 7044 950605 Responsible Gambling $5,000,000 $5,000,000 H 8710 950602 Annuity Prizes $35,637,000 $34,737,000 I State Lottery Fund Group Total $447,833,702 $453,469,441 J TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $447,833,702 $453,469,441 Section 329.20. OPERATING EXPENSES Notwithstanding sections 127.14 and 131.35 of the Revised Code, the Controlling Board may, at the request of the State Lottery Commission, authorize expenditures from the State Lottery Fund in excess of the amount appropriated in each fiscal year, up to a maximum of 10 per cent of the amount appropriated that fiscal year in the foregoing appropriation item 950321, Operating Expenses. Upon the approval of the Controlling Board, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. DIRECT PRIZE PAYMENTS Any amounts, in addition to the amounts appropriated in appropriation item 950601, Direct Prize Payments, that the Director of the State Lottery Commission determines to be necessary to fund prizes are hereby appropriated. ANNUITY PRIZES Upon request of the State Lottery Commission, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from the State Lottery Fund (Fund 7044) to the Deferred Prizes Trust Fund (Fund 8710) in an amount sufficient to fund deferred prizes. The Treasurer of State, from time to time, shall credit the Deferred Prizes Trust Fund (Fund 8710) the pro rata share of interest earned by the Treasurer of State on invested balances. Any amounts, in addition to the amounts appropriated in appropriation item 950602, Annuity Prizes, that the Director of the State Lottery Commission determines to be necessary to fund deferred prizes and interest are hereby appropriated. TRANSFERS TO THE LOTTERY PROFITS EDUCATION FUND Estimated transfers from the State Lottery Fund (Fund 7044) to the Lottery Profits Education Fund (Fund 7017) are to be $1,465,138,202 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,471,729,884 in fiscal year 2027. Transfers by the Director of Budget and Management to the Lottery Profits Education Fund shall be administered as the statutes direct. Section 333.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A MCD DEPARTMENT OF MEDICAID B General Revenue Fund C GRF 651425 Medicaid Program Support - State $164,527,244 $158,222,590 D GRF 651525 Medicaid Health Care Services - Total $20,192,404,766 $21,200,705,831 E Medicaid Health Care Services - State $5,613,156,377 $5,839,046,648 F Medicaid Health Care Services - Federal $14,579,248,389 $15,361,659,183 G GRF 651526 Medicare Part D $696,563,080 $760,700,223 H General Revenue Fund Total $21,053,495,090 $22,119,628,644 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group J 4E30 651605 Resident Protection Fund $7,000,000 $7,000,000 K 5AN0 651686 State Directed Payment Program $50,000,000 $50,000,000 L 5DL0 651639 Medicaid Services - Recoveries $938,907,575 $896,537,969 M 5DL0 651685 Medicaid Recoveries - Program Support $89,560,719 $91,388,371 N 5DL0 651690 Multi-system Youth Custody Relinquishment $20,000,000 $20,000,000 O 5FX0 651638 Medicaid Services - Payment Withholding $12,000,000 $12,000,000 P 5GF0 651656 Medicaid Services - Hospital Franchise Fee $2,632,211,017 $3,030,014,270 Q 5R20 651608 Medicaid Services-Long Term $451,000,000 $451,000,000 R 5TN0 651684 Medicaid Services-HIC Fee $879,876,850 $869,039,656 S 6510 651649 Medicaid Services-Hospital Care Assurance Program $320,543,800 $168,455,600 T Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $5,401,099,961 $5,595,435,866 U Holding Account Fund Group V R055 651644 Refunds and Reconciliation $14,001,665 $14,001,665 W Holding Account Fund Group Total $14,001,665 $14,001,665 X Federal Fund Group Y 3F00 651623 Medicaid Services - Federal $12,572,748,083 $13,394,507,208 Z 3F00 651624 Medicaid Program Support - Federal $499,974,494 $495,333,992 AA 3FA0 651680 Health Care Grants - Federal $7,000,000 $7,000,000 AB 3G50 651655 Medicaid Interagency Pass Through $264,653,075 $264,644,638 AC Federal Fund Group Total $13,344,375,652 $14,161,485,838 AD TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $39,812,972,368 $41,890,552,013 Section 333.12. DIVERSITY EQUITY AND INCLUSION To the extent permitted by federal law, no funds appropriated in Section 333.10 shall be used for diversity, equity, and inclusion initiatives. This section does not apply to funds appropriated to provide services that support access to the community for Medicaid recipients with intellectual and developmental disabilities. Section 333.13. SOCIAL GENDER TRANSITION To the extent permitted by federal law, no funds appropriated in Section 333.10 of this act shall be distributed for mental health services that promote or affirm social gender transition, in which an individual goes from identifying with and living as a gender that corresponds to the individual's biological sex to identifying with and living as a gender different from the individual's biological sex. Section 333.15. MEDICAID IN SCHOOLS PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation items 651425, Medicaid Program Support - State, and 651624, Medicaid Program Support - Federal, $349,925 in each line item in fiscal year 2026 and $358,362 in each line item in fiscal year 2027 shall be used by the Department of Medicaid to support the Medicaid in Schools Program. Section 333.30. LODGING FOR FAMILIES Of the foregoing appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, $2,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Medicaid Director to work with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to continue lodging as an administrative service affiliated with Ohio children's hospitals available for families with children who have special health care needs. Section 333.40. PERSONAL NEEDS ALLOWANCE SUPPORT Upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $2,200,000 appropriation in fiscal year 2026 and $4,400,000 appropriation in fiscal year 2027 from appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, to appropriation items in the Department of Developmental Disabilities. This funding shall be used to support an increase in the personal needs allowance for individuals residing in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities. The Medicaid Director may transfer federal funds as the state's single state agency for Medicaid reimbursements, as drawn for these transactions. Any amounts transferred are hereby appropriated. Section 333.50. MEDICARE PART D The foregoing appropriation item 651526, Medicare Part D, may be used by the Department of Medicaid for the implementation and operation of the Medicare Part D requirements contained in the "Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003," Pub. L. No. 108-173, as amended. Upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer the state share of appropriations between appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, and appropriation item 651526, Medicare Part D. If the state share of appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, is adjusted, the Director of Budget and Management shall adjust the federal share accordingly. The Department of Medicaid shall provide notification to the Controlling Board of any transfers at the next scheduled Controlling Board meeting. Section 333.70. WORK COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PROGRAM - COUNTY COSTS Upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer state share appropriations in each fiscal year between appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, within the Department of Medicaid, and 655522, Medicaid Program Support – Local, within the Department of Job and Family Services. If such a transfer occurs, the Director of Budget and Management shall adjust, using the federal reimbursement rate, the federal share appropriations of appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, within the Department of Medicaid, and appropriation item 655624, Medicaid Program Support – Federal, within the Department of Job and Family Services. Any increase in funding shall be provided to county departments of job and family services and shall only be used for costs related to processing cases for work requirements for the expansion eligibility group that are established under the medicaid waiver component required under section 5166.37 of the Revised Code, and as prescribed by the Medicaid Director. These funds shall not be used for existing and ongoing operating expenses. The Medicaid Director shall establish criteria for distributing these funds and for county departments of job and family services to submit allowable expenses. Section 333.80. DEPOSITS TO THE HEALTH CARE/MEDICAID SUPPORT AND RECOVERIES FUND FOR PROGRAM SUPPORT Of the amount received by the Department of Medicaid during fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 from the intergovernmental transfers paid under any directed payment program as authorized under 42 CFR 438.6(c), the Medicaid Director shall deposit a portion of the payments into the state treasury to the credit of the Health Care/Medicaid Support and Recoveries Fund (Fund 5DL0). The Director of Budget and Management may adjust appropriations in line item 651685, Medicaid Recoveries – Program Support, along with the corresponding federal share in line item 651624, Medicaid Program Support – Federal, based on the amount of the deposits to Fund 5DL0 made under this section. Any adjusted amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 333.85. DEPOSITS TO THE STATE DIRECTED PAYMENT PROGRAM FUND (A) Transfers made for the Hospital Directed Payment Program under section 5162.25 of the Revised Code shall be deposited into the State Directed Payment Program Fund (Fund 5AN0). The state share of the program shall be derived from deposits attributable to the intergovernmental transfers received for the Hospital Directed Payment Program, and the corresponding federal share in appropriation item 651623, Medicaid Services – Federal, shall be used for the Hospital Directed Payment Program. Except for deposits under Section 333.80 of this act, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer any remaining cash in Fund 5DL0 at the end of the fiscal year 2025 attributable to the Hospital Directed Payment Program to Fund 5AN0 to the credit of the Hospital Directed Payment Program. (B) If the Medicaid Director determines additional amounts are needed to support any authorized State Directed Payment Programs, the Director may certify the amount to the Director of Budget and Management. Upon certification from the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management shall increase appropriation item 651686, State Directed Payment Program, provided total expenditures from this appropriation item do not exceed $850,000,000 in each fiscal year. The Director of Budget and Management shall also increase the corresponding federal share in appropriation item 651623, Medicaid Services - Federal. Any adjusted amounts are hereby appropriated. (C) Subject to divisions (B) and (D) of this section, $16,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $32,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 from appropriation item 651686, State Directed Payment Program, as well as the corresponding federal shares in appropriation item 651623, Medicaid Services - Federal, shall be distributed for a directed payment program to support Bon Secours Mercy Health health system locations in the state of Ohio. (D) The Medicaid Director shall terminate the Hospital Directed Payment Program if funds deposited are insufficient to operate the program. Section 333.90. DEPOSITS TO THE HEALTH CARE/MEDICAID SUPPORT AND RECOVERIES FUND Of the amount received by the Department of Medicaid during fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 from the first installment of assessments paid under section 5168.06 of the Revised Code and intergovernmental transfers made under section 5168.07 of the Revised Code, the Medicaid Director shall deposit $2,500,000 cash in each fiscal year into the state treasury to the credit of the Health Care/Medicaid Support and Recoveries Fund (Fund 5DL0). Section 333.100. CASH TRANSFERS FROM THE HEALTH CARE/MEDICAID SUPPORT AND RECOVERIES FUND TO THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE FUND Upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $2,200,000 cash in each fiscal year from the Health Care/Medicaid Support and Recoveries Fund (Fund 5DL0) to the Behavioral Health Care Fund (Fund 5AU0), used by the Department of Behavioral Health. Any transferred funds shall be used to support Centers of Excellence and related activities. Any transferred amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 333.110. HOSPITAL FRANCHISE FEE PROGRAM The Director of Budget and Management may authorize additional expenditures from appropriation item 651623, Medicaid Services - Federal, appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, and appropriation item 651656, Medicaid Services - Hospital Franchise Fee, in order to implement the programs authorized by sections 5168.20 through 5168.28 of the Revised Code. Any amounts authorized are hereby appropriated. Section 333.120. HEALTH INSURING CORPORATION CLASS FRANCHISE FEE If receipts credited to the Health Insuring Corporation Class Franchise Fee Fund (Fund 5TN0) exceed the amounts appropriated from the fund, the Medicaid Director may request the Director of Budget and Management to authorize expenditures from the fund in excess of the amounts appropriated. If any additional amounts are authorized, the Director of Budget and Management shall adjust, using the federal reimbursement rate, the federal appropriation item identified by the Medicaid Director accordingly. Any authorized amounts and any corresponding federal adjustments are hereby appropriated. Section 333.130. HOSPITAL CARE ASSURANCE MATCH If receipts credited to the Health Care Federal Fund (Fund 3F00) exceed the amounts appropriated from the fund for making the hospital care assurance program distribution, the Medicaid Director may request the Director of Budget and Management to authorize expenditures from the fund in excess of the amounts appropriated. Upon the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. The foregoing appropriation item 651649, Medicaid Services – Health Care Assurance Program, shall be used by the Department of Medicaid for distributing the state share of all hospital care assurance program funds to hospitals under section 5168.09 of the Revised Code. If receipts credited to the Hospital Care Assurance Program Fund (Fund 6510) exceed the amounts appropriated from the fund for making the hospital care assurance program distribution, the Medicaid Director may request the Director of Budget and Management to authorize expenditures from the fund in excess of the amounts appropriated. Upon the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 333.140. HOSPITAL ADDITIONAL PAYMENTS PROGRAM The Hospital Additional Payment Program is created. The program shall be a state directed payment program for inpatient and outpatient hospital services provided to Medicaid care management system enrollees receiving care at in-state hospitals. Participating hospitals or hospital industry representatives shall work collaboratively with the Department of Medicaid to establish quality improvement initiatives that are approved by the Medicaid Director and that align with and advance the goals of the Department of Medicaid's quality strategy required under 42. C.F.R. 438.340. Participating hospitals shall receive payments directly for services provided under the program. The non-federal share of services under the program shall be funded through the hospital franchise fee. Hospital franchise fees made for this program shall be deposited into the Medicaid Hospital Fund (Fund 5GF0). The state share of this program shall be derived from deposits attributable to the incremental franchise fee for the program, and the corresponding federal share in appropriation item 651623, Medicaid Services – Federal, shall be used for the HAP Program. The Medicaid Director shall seek approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the program in accordance with section 5162.07 of the Revised Code. Section 333.150. REFUNDS AND RECONCILIATION FUND If estimated receipts to the Refunds and Reconciliation Fund (Fund R055) exceed the amounts appropriated from the fund, the Medicaid Director may request the Director of Budget and Management to authorize expenditures from the fund in excess of the amounts appropriated. Upon approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 333.160. NON-EMERGENCY MEDICAL TRANSPORTATION In order to ensure access to a non-emergency medical transportation brokerage program established pursuant to section 1902(a)(70) of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 1396a(a)(70), upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer the state share appropriations between General Revenue Fund appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, within the Department of Medicaid and 655523, Medicaid Program Support – Local Transportation, within the Department of Job and Family Services. If such a transfer occurs, the Director of Budget and Management shall adjust, using the federal reimbursement rate, the federal share appropriations of appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, within the Department of Medicaid, and appropriation item 655624, Medicaid Program Support - Federal, within the Department of Job and Family Services. The Medicaid Director may transfer federal funds as the state's single state agency for Medicaid reimbursements, as drawn for these transactions. Any amounts transferred are hereby appropriated. Section 333.200. PUBLIC ASSISTANCE FOR ELIGIBILITY REDETERMINATIONS Up to $5,000,000 in each fiscal year of funds within appropriation item 655522, Medicaid Program Support - Local, may be distributed based on performance criteria established by the Ohio Department of Medicaid. Performance based amounts and criteria, and criteria for transfer approval may include but are not limited to timeliness and accuracy of application and renewal processing. Section 333.210. CASH TRANSFERS FROM FRANCHISE PERMIT FEE FUND TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND THE DEPARTMENT OF AGING Upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $5,000,000 cash in each fiscal year from the Nursing Home Franchise Fee Fund (Fund 5R20) to the Quality, Monitoring, and Inspection Fund (Fund 5B50) used by the Department of Health. Also, upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $9,300,000 cash in each fiscal year from the Nursing Home Franchise Fee Fund (Fund 5R20) to the Ombudsman Support Fund (Fund 5BA0), used by the Department of Aging. All transferred funds shall be utilized in accordance with section 5168.54 of the Revised Code. At the end of each fiscal year, the Department of Health and the Department of Aging shall report on spending activities to the Office of Budget and Management. Section 333.230. MEDICAID INTERAGENCY PASS-THROUGH The Medicaid Director may request the Director of Budget and Management to increase appropriation item 651655, Medicaid Interagency Pass-Through. Upon the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 333.240. MEDICAID SERVICES RECOVERIES The Medicaid Director may request the Director of Budget and Management to increase appropriation item 651639, Medicaid Services Recoveries. Upon the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, the additional amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 333.250. MYCARE OHIO EXPANSION (A) As required by H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly, the Medicaid Director shall continue, during fiscal years 2026 and 2027, to expand the Integrated Care Delivery System, as that phrase is defined in section 5164.01 of the Revised Code, or if the Director terminates the Integrated Care Delivery System, the successor program developed by the Director and approved by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to all counties of this state. (B) The entities selected for the expanded Integrated Care Delivery System shall be selected by the Department. (C) The Department shall establish requirements for care management and coordination of waiver services in the expanded Integrated Care Delivery System, subject to all of the following: (1) The entities selected pursuant to division (B) of this section shall employ the applicable area agency on aging to be coordinators of home and community-based services available under a Medicaid waiver component available for eligible individuals over the age of fifty-nine; (2) The entities may delegate to the applicable area agency on aging full care coordination function for home and community-based services and other health care services received by those eligible individuals; (3) Individuals enrolled in an entity's plan or plans may choose the entity or its designee as the care coordinator as an alternative to the area agency on aging; (4) The Department may specify an alternative approach to care management and coordination of waiver services if the performance of the area agency on aging does not meet the requirements of the Integrated Care Delivery System or if the Department determines that the needs of a defined group of individuals requires an alternative approach. Section 333.260. INCREASING CHILDREN'S ACCESS TO VISION AND DENTAL SERVICES Upon the request of the Medicaid Director, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $4,660,000 in appropriations in fiscal year 2026 and $4,295,000 in appropriations in fiscal year 2027 from appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, to appropriation items in the Department of Health. This funding shall be used to support public health programs or the provision of certain services, including preventive care and other interventions, to improve the health of low-income children. Of the transferred funds, up to $2,660,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,295,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used to increase children's access to vision care, and up to $2,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to increase children's access to dental care. The Director of Medicaid may transfer federal funds as the state's single state agency for Medicaid reimbursements, as drawn for these transactions. Any transferred amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 333.263. MEDICAID ADD-ON PAYMENT FOR NURSING FACILITY DIALYSIS SERVICES For fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the Department of Medicaid shall pay a rate add-on of one hundred ten dollars per treatment for dialysis services provided in a nursing facility, as defined in section 5165.01 of the Revised Code, to a resident enrolled in the Medicaid program. Section 333.270. HCBS DIRECT CARE WORKER WAGES The Department of Medicaid, jointly, with the Department of Aging and the Department of Developmental Disabilities, shall collect data from providers regarding the wages paid to direct care workers providing direct care services under the Medicaid home and community-based waiver components administered by those agencies. Not later than the last day in December of each fiscal year of the biennium, the Department of Medicaid shall compile a report and submit the report to the Governor, the President and Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, and the chairperson of the standing committees handling Medicaid matters in both the House of Representatives and the Senate. Section 333.280. GRADUAL IMPLEMENTATION OF PDPM TO CALCULATE NURSING FACILITY DIRECT CARE RATES (A) For the period beginning July 1, 2025, and ending December 31, 2025, the Department of Medicaid shall determine each nursing facility's per medicaid day payment rate for direct care costs by multiplying the cost per case-mix unit determined under division (C) of section 5165.19 of the Revised Code for the facility's peer group by the following case-mix score: (1) If the facility's case-mix score during fiscal year 2025 is the case-mix score specified in division (A)(2)(b) of section 5165.19 of the Revised Code, that case-mix score; (2) If the facility's case-mix score during fiscal year 2025 is the semiannual case-mix score determined for the facility under division (A)(1) of section 5165.19 of the Revised Code, the semiannual case-mix score determined under that division for the semiannual period beginning July 1, 2025. Beginning January 1, 2026, the increase or decrease in a nursing facility's direct care rate shall be one-third of the difference between the direct care rate on January 1, 2025, and the direct care rate determined utilizing case mix scores calculated in accordance with section 5165.192 of the Revised Code. In fiscal year 2027, the increase or decrease to a nursing facility's direct care rate shall be two-thirds of the difference between the direct care rate on January 1, 2025, and the direct care rate determined utilizing case mix scores calculated in accordance with section 5165.192 of the Revised Code. Thereafter, a nursing facility's direct care rate shall be determined utilizing case mix scores calculated in accordance with section 5165.192 of the Revised Code. (B) Beginning October 1, 2025, quarterly during fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the Department of Medicaid shall report to the General Assembly on the progress of its transition to using the patient driven patient model to calculate nursing facility per Medicaid day payment rates. The report shall cover the progress during the previous quarter. The report shall be submitted to the chairperson and the ranking member of the standing committees in both the House of Representatives and in the Senate overseeing Medicaid matters. (C) The implementation of this section for nursing facility direct care costs and per Medicaid day payment rates is intended to be budget neutral during fiscal years 2026 and 2027 and to not increase nursing facility payment rates during the fiscal biennium. Section 333.290. RURAL OHIO HOSPITAL TAX PILOT PROGRAM (A) As used in this section: (1) "Critical access hospital" means a hospital located in a county that has a hospital tax assessment and is certified as a critical access hospital by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and designated as a critical access hospital by the department of health pursuant to section 3701.073 of the Revised Code. (2) "Hospital tax assessment" means an assessment imposed under Section 333.300 of this act to fund the nonfederal share of the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program. (3) "Preprint" means a form created by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to request approval of a state directed payment program as required under 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c). (4) "Rural hospital" means a hospital located in a county that has a hospital tax assessment and is not classified into core based statistical areas as designated in the inpatient prospective payment system case-mix and wage index table published by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. "Rural hospital" includes any hospital located in the following counties: Fayette, Greene, Highland, Hocking, Muskingum, Perry, Pike, Ross, Scioto, or Washington. (B) The Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program Fund (Fund 5CM1) is created. Investment earnings of the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program Fund shall be credited to the fund. (C) The Medicaid Director may create a Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program for directed payments to rural Ohio hospitals, and their related health systems, that meet the following criteria: (1) The hospital is a rural hospital or a critical access hospital. (2) The hospital is enrolled as a provider in the Medicaid program. (D) The Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program established pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c), including all of the following: (1) The program shall be approved by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and the Medicaid Director shall seek approval for the program in accordance with section 5162.07 of the Revised Code. (2) Directed payments under the program shall not exceed the average commercial rate under a preprint as approved by the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. (3) The program shall be subject to an evaluation plan, in accordance with 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(ii)(D). (E) Hospital providers participating in the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program shall do all of the following: (1) Enter into one or more contracts related to the program as necessary, as determined by the Department of Medicaid; (2) Comply with average commercial rate reporting requirements established by the Department, related to the requirements set forth in 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(iii); (3) Comply with the Department's quality measure set, including the metrics and targets set by the Department to advance the goals and objectives in the Department's quality strategy, as specified in 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(ii)(C) and 42 C.F.R. 438.340; (4) Cooperate with any evaluation or reporting requirements established by the Department related to the requirements set forth in 42 C.F.R. 438.6(c)(2)(ii)(D) and (F). (F) Any hospital provider contracts required under division (E)(1) of this section shall be executed not later than the first day of October preceding the first fiscal year of a biennium. A contract required under this section may be entered into in accordance with section 5162.32 of the Revised Code. (G) All funds supporting the Rural Ohio Tax Pilot Program shall comply with the requirements specified in 42 C.F.R. Part 433. No hospital provider may participate in the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program unless sufficient tax funds are assessed, collected, obligated, and appropriated. (H) The Director may terminate or decline to establish the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program if federal or local tax funding is not available or sufficient to sustain the program. The Department shall not at any time be required to provide funding for the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program. The requirements of this section apply only as long as the United States Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that the assessment imposed under Section 333.300 of this act is a permissible health care-related tax pursuant to the "Social Security Act," section 1903(w), 42 U.S.C. 1396b(w). If the Department is informed that the assessment is an impermissible health care related tax, the Department shall promptly refund to each hospital the amount of money currently in the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program Fund (Fund 5CM1) that has been paid by the hospital under Section 333.300 of this act, plus any investment earnings on that amount. (I) The nonfederal share of the directed payments shall be funded exclusively by a hospital tax assessment pursuant to Section 333.300 of this act and must be remitted to the Department through intergovernmental transfer from a county or multi-county funding district, as specified in that section. (J) Transfers made for the program shall be deposited into the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program Fund (Fund 5CM1). The state share of this program shall be derived from deposits attributable to the intergovernmental transfers received for the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program, and the corresponding federal share in appropriation item 651623, Medicaid Services – Federal, shall be used for the Rural Ohio Hospital Tax Pilot Program. Section 333.300. RURAL OHIO HOSPITAL PILOT PROGRAM ASSESSMENTS (A)(1) As used in this section, "county" means a county that contains a rural hospital or critical access hospital as defined in Section 333.290 of this act. (2) For purposes of this section, one or more contiguous counties may create a multi-county funding district. Only counties with two or fewer rural hospitals may participate in a multi-county funding district. The boundary of any multi-county funding district shall be coextensive with the combined boundaries of the counties contained in the multi-county funding district. (B) In establishing a multi-county funding district, all of the following apply: (1) A multi-county funding district is a governmental entity. (2) The board of county commissioners of each county within the boundaries of a proposed multi-county funding district shall pass a resolution or ordinance establishing the county's participation in the multi-county funding district and appointing one county commissioner to serve on the district's governing board. Upon the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by each board of county commissioners, the multi-county funding district is created. Following the creation of a multi-county funding district, each resolution or ordinance required to establish the district shall be amended before a new county may join the district. (3) The governing board of a multi-county funding district shall be comprised solely of the county commissioners appointed by each county within the boundaries of the district. A county may replace its appointment to the governing board by resolution or ordinance. (4) The governing board of a multi-county funding district shall delegate the operational and administrative burdens of the districts to the counties that comprise the district. Within sixty days of the establishment of a multi-county funding district, the governing board shall designate at least one county to serve as the operational and administrative lead for the district. The governing board may change this designation at any time. (C) A county or multi-county funding district may establish a local hospital assessment to provide the nonfederal share for Medicaid payments under division (G) of Section 333.290 of this act. Any local assessment established under this section shall comply with all of the requirements applicable to provider assessments, as specified in 42 U.S.C. 1396b(w) and 42 C.F.R. 433.68. (1) Each county or multi-county funding district shall set the annual rate of the local hospital assessment. (2) An assessment established under this section shall apply uniformly to all non-public hospitals within the jurisdiction of the county or multi-county funding district. A county or multi-county funding district may apply the assessment to public hospitals. (3) A county or multi-county funding district shall set the rate of the assessment such that, in the aggregate, the assessment will generate sufficient revenue to cover both of the following: (a) The nonfederal share of Medicaid payments that benefit hospitals in the county or multi-county funding district; (b) The administrative expenses of the county or multi-county funding district in administering the local hospital assessment, except that administrative expenses shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars annually. (4) Implementation of an assessment established under this section shall further the state's evolving quality goals, including improving mental health, substance abuse prevention, and advancing maternal health. (5) A county or multi-county funding district may impose penalties upon a hospital that is subject to an assessment that fails to pay the assessment in a timely manner. Section 333.360. GROUP VIII TRANSITION PLAN As used in this section,"expansion eligibility group" has the same meaning as in section 5163.01 of the Revised Code. If, during fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027, the federal medical assistance percentage for the Medicaid expansion eligibility group is set below ninety percent, and individuals enrolled in Medicaid on the basis of being enrolled in the expansion eligibility group are no longer eligible to be enrolled in the Medicaid program in accordance with section 5163.04 of the Revised Code, the Department of Medicaid shall implement a phased transition plan to assist those individuals by redirecting them to private insurance subsidies or charity care programs that provide medical assistance. Section 333.415. TRANSFERS FROM THE HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES RESERVE FUND TO THE GENERAL REVENUE FUND During fiscal years 2026 and 2027, if the Director of Budget and Management determines that the Department of Medicaid will exhaust the funds provided under GRF appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, and other relevant non-GRF Medicaid appropriation items for a given fiscal year, and also determines that it is necessary to increase the corresponding state and federal shares of GRF appropriation item 651525 to fully pay the state's Medicaid program obligations, the Director of Budget and Management may seek Controlling Board approval to transfer cash from the Health and Human Services Reserve Fund (Fund 5SA4) to the General Revenue Fund to fund the needed increase to the state share of GRF appropriation item 651525. If the Director of Budget and Management receives Controlling Board approval and makes such a transfer, they shall also adjust the federal share of GRF appropriation line item 651525 correspondingly. Any such Controlling Board approved transfers and adjustments made by the Director of Budget and Management are hereby appropriated. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the total amount of the cash transfer from the Health and Human Services Reserve Fund (Fund 5SA4) to the General Revenue Fund shall not exceed $250,000,000 in either fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027. During fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Ohio Department of Medicaid shall make every effort to achieve administrative cost savings, programmatic cost savings, and implement agency administration efficiency projects, reductions in contracting and vendor costs, and policies focusing on healthier outcomes. The Ohio Department of Medicaid shall also endeavor to ensure Medicaid benefits are received only by eligible recipients. Should the Director of Budget and Management seek Controlling Board approval to make the transfers permitted by this section, the Medicaid Director shall report to the Controlling Board on the Ohio Department of Medicaid's progress on these savings and efficiency endeavors. Section 335.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A MED STATE MEDICAL BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5C60 883609 Operating Expenses $14,315,005 $14,891,225 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $14,315,005 $14,891,225 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $14,315,005 $14,891,225 Section 337.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A MHA DEPARTMENT OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 336321 Program Support and Operations $56,671,000 $56,671,000 D GRF 336402 Resident Trainees $380,000 $380,000 E GRF 336406 Prevention and Wellness $5,500,000 $5,500,000 F GRF 336407 Crisis Services and Stablization $17,000,000 $22,000,000 G GRF 336412 Hospital Services $326,500,000 $335,000,000 H GRF 336415 Mental Health Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments $27,500,000 $24,200,000 I GRF 336421 Continuum of Care Services $104,080,000 $104,080,000 J GRF 336422 Criminal Justice Services $28,500,000 $28,500,000 K GRF 336425 Specialized Docket Support $11,282,469 $11,287,028 L GRF 336504 Community Innovations $8,500,000 $8,500,000 M GRF 336510 Residential State Supplement $24,000,000 $24,000,000 N GRF 336516 Appalachian Children Coalition $2,500,000 $2,500,000 O GRF 336519 Community Projects $5,125,000 $4,325,000 P GRF 336522 9-8-8 Suicide Crisis $25,500,000 $23,000,000 Q GRF 652321 Medicaid Support $478,055 $492,396 R General Revenue Fund Total $643,516,524 $650,435,424 S Dedicated Purpose Fund Group T 4750 336623 Statewide Treatment and Prevention $24,000,000 $24,000,000 U 4850 336632 Mental Health Operating $19,000,000 $24,200,000 V 5AU0 336615 Behavioral Health Care $11,000,000 $11,000,000 W 5JL0 336629 Problem Gambling and Casino Addiction $9,000,000 $7,750,000 X 5T90 336641 Problem Gambling Services $3,200,000 $3,200,000 Y 5VV0 336645 Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation Program $5,000,000 $5,000,000 Z 6320 336616 Community Capital Replacement $350,000 $350,000 AA 6890 336640 Education and Conferences $200,000 $200,000 AB Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $71,750,000 $75,700,000 AC Internal Service Activity Fund Group AD 1490 336609 Hospital Operating Expenses $16,000,000 $16,000,000 AE 1490 336610 Operating Expenses $7,350,000 $7,350,000 AF 1510 336601 Ohio Pharmacy Services $124,937,150 $146,503,708 AG 4P90 336604 Community Mental Health Projects $250,000 $250,000 AH Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $148,537,150 $170,103,708 AI Federal Fund Group AJ 3240 336605 Medicaid/Medicare $18,000,000 $18,000,000 AK 3A70 336612 Social Services Block Grant $8,500,000 $8,500,000 AL 3A80 336613 Federal Grants $8,600,000 $8,600,000 AM 3A90 336614 Mental Health Block Grant $52,000,000 $46,000,000 AN 3B10 652636 Community Medicaid Legacy Support $1,600,000 $1,600,000 AO 3G40 336618 Substance Abuse Block Grant $87,000,000 $86,000,000 AP 3H80 336606 Demonstration Grants $16,000,000 $16,000,000 AQ 3HB1 336644 State Opioid Response $170,000,000 $170,000,000 AR 3N80 336639 Administrative Reimbursement $1,000,000 $1,000,000 AS Federal Fund Group Total $362,700,000 $355,700,000 AT TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,226,503,674 $1,251,939,132 Section 337.20. STATE BLOCK GRANTS (A) As used in this section: (1) "Drug used in withdrawal management or detoxification" means a drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in, or a drug in standard use for, mitigating alcohol or opioid withdrawal symptoms or assisting with detoxification. (2) "Jail" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Medication-assisted treatment" has the same meaning as in section 340.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Medication-assisted treatment drug court program" means a session of any of the following that holds initial or final certification from the Supreme Court of Ohio as a specialized docket program for drugs and that uses medication-assisted treatment as part of its specialized docket program: a common pleas court, municipal court, or county court, or a division of any of those courts. (5) "Alcohol and drug addiction services," "mental health services," "recovery housing residence," and "recovery supports" have the same meanings as in section 5119.01 of the Revised Code. (B) In fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Behavioral Health may allocate General Revenue Funds described in this section, as well as any other General Revenue Funds and Dedicated Purpose Funds determined by the Department, to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services through state block grants. These state block grants shall serve to provide flexibility within established allowable uses for the boards to disburse funds to behavioral health providers to provide harm reduction, prevention, substance use disorder treatment, mental health treatment, recovery supports, and crisis services in local communities. The Director of Behavioral Health shall adopt guidelines on the eligible uses of these block grants. (C) The Director of Behavioral Health shall create a uniform reporting structure related to the expenditures, uses, and outcomes of the state block grants described in this section, including how expenditures, uses, and outcomes relate to the community addiction and mental health plans that boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services are required to submit to the Department in accordance with section 340.03 of the Revised Code. The reporting structure shall ensure that thorough and accurate data is reported with a focus on transparency, accountability, process improvement, outcomes, and return on investment. Data points to be collected include, but are not limited to: (1) The type of service provided and number of individuals served; (2) The amount spent for each state block grant broken down by primary, secondary, tertiary, and targeted expenditures; (3) Data regarding provider determination and monitoring activities; (4) Key performance indicators and outcomes achieved. This data shall be made available in accordance with state of Ohio data governance best practices and federal and state security and privacy laws, regulations, and standards. (D) The Department of Behavioral Health shall disburse the state block grant funds to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services in accordance with distribution methodologies determined by the Director of Behavioral Health. In determining the methodologies, the Director shall consider, at a minimum, all of the following factors: population indicators, poverty rates, health workforce shortage statistics, relevant emerging behavioral health trends, and the amounts of fiscal year 2025 awards made to each board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services for related programs that are eligible uses of the state block grant funds. (E) A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 336406, Prevention and Wellness, shall be used to create a Prevention State Block Grant that boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services shall use to fund the provision of evidence-based or evidence-informed early intervention, suicide prevention, and other prevention services. The Director of Behavioral Health shall establish allowable uses for the Prevention State Block Grant that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (1) Prevention across the lifespan; (2) Suicide prevention across the lifespan; (3) Early intervention; (4) Cross-system collaborative effort to address prevention needs in the community. (F) A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 336407, Crisis Services and Stabilization, shall be used to create a Crisis Services State Block Grant that shall be used by boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to fund the provision of crisis services and supports. The Director of Behavioral Health shall establish allowable uses for the Crisis Services State Block Grant that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (1) Substance use and mental health crisis stabilization centers; (2) Crisis stabilization and crisis prevention services and supports; (3) Cross-systems collaborative efforts to address crisis services needs in the community. (G) A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 336421, Continuum of Care Services, shall be used to create a Mental Health State Block Grant that shall be used by boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to fund the provision of mental health services and recovery supports. The Director of Behavioral Health shall establish allowable uses for the Mental Health State Block Grant that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (1) Mental health services, including the treatment of indigent mentally ill persons subject to court order in hospitals or inpatient units licensed by the Department of Behavioral Health under section 5119.33 of the Revised Code; (2) Cross-system collaborative efforts to serve adults with serious mental illness who are involved in multiple human services or criminal justice systems; (3) Other initiatives designed to address mental health needs. (H) A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 336421, Continuum of Care Services, shall be used to create a Substance Use Disorder State Block Grant that shall be used by boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to fund the provision of alcohol and drug addiction services and recovery supports. The Director of Behavioral Health shall establish allowable uses for the Substance Use Disorder State Block Grant that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (1) Initiatives concerning alcohol and drug addiction services; (2) Substance use stabilization centers; (3) Cross-system collaborative efforts to address substance use disorder needs in the community. (I) A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 336421, Continuum of Care Services, shall be used to create a Recovery Supports State Block Grant that shall be used by boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to fund the provision of recovery supports. The Director of Behavioral Health shall establish allowable uses for the Recovery Supports State Block Grant that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (1) Subsidized support for psychotropic and substance use disorder treatment medication needs of indigent citizens in the community to reduce unnecessary hospitalization due to lack of medication; (2) Peer support; (3) Operational expenses and minor facility improvements to class two and class three residential facilities licensed under section 5119.34 of the Revised Code and recovery housing residences; (4) Community reintegration supports; (5) Cross-system collaborative efforts to address recovery support needs in the community. (J) A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 336422, Criminal Justice Services, shall be used to create a Criminal Justice State Block Grant that shall be used by boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to fund the provision of services and supports to incarcerated individuals and individuals being discharged from prisons and jails. The Director of Behavioral Health shall establish allowable uses for the Criminal Justice State Block Grant that include, but are not limited to, all of the following: (1) Medication-assisted treatment and treatment involving drugs used in withdrawal management or detoxification; (2) Community reintegration supports; (3) Substance use disorder treatment and mental health treatment, including the provision of such treatment as an alternative to incarceration, as well as recovery supports; (4) Forensic monitoring and tracking of individuals on conditional release; (5) Forensic and crisis response training; (6) Projects that assist courts and law enforcement in identifying and developing appropriate alternative services to incarceration for nonviolent offenders with mental illness; (7) The provision of services to incarcerated individuals in jails with a substance use disorder, severe mental illness, or both, including screening and clinically appropriate treatment; (8) Linkages to, and the provision of, substance use disorder treatment, mental health treatment, recovery supports, and specialized re-entry services for incarcerated individuals leaving prisons and jails; (9) The support of specialized dockets, including the expansion of existing medication-assisted treatment drug court programs, the creation of new medication-assisted treatment drug court programs, and assistance with the administrative expenses of participating courts, community addiction services providers, and community mental health services providers; (10) Cross-system collaborative efforts to address the needs of individuals involved in the criminal justice system. Section 337.30. PREVENTION AND WELLNESS The foregoing appropriation item 336406, Prevention and Wellness, shall be used as follows: (A) Up to $3,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services through the Prevention State Block Grant established in division (E) of Section 337.20 of this act. (B) Up to $2,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support suicide prevention efforts. Section 337.50. HOSPITAL SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 336412, Hospital Services, may be used for any of the following purposes: (A) Supporting all operations related to the hospitals established, controlled, or supervised by the Department of Behavioral Health under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code; (B) Supporting physical environments that are designed for patients to receive assessment, evaluation, and stabilization interventions within general hospitals; (C) Providing jails and associated health care providers with access to telehealth consultations with psychiatric specialists, such as psychiatrists and psychiatric nurse practitioners. Section 337.60. MENTAL HEALTH FACILITIES LEASE RENTAL BOND PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 336415, Mental Health Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments, shall be used to meet all payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, by the Department of Behavioral Health pursuant to leases and agreements made under section 154.20 of the Revised Code. These appropriations are the source of funds pledged for bond service charges on obligations issued pursuant to Chapter 154. of the Revised Code. Section 337.70. CONTINUUM OF CARE SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 336421, Continuum of Care Services, shall be used as follows: (A) Up to $69,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services through the Mental Health State Block Grant established in division (G) of Section 337.20 of this act; (B) Up to $9,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services through the Substance Use Disorder State Block Grant established in division (H) of Section 337.20 of this act; (C) Up to $19,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services through the Recovery Supports State Block Grant established in division (I) of Section 337.20 of this act; (D) Up to $4,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to expand statewide access to rapid mobile response and stabilization services provided to youth experiencing an emotional or behavioral health crisis and their families; (E) Up to $455,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to implement sections 5119.39 to 5119.397 of the Revised Code; (F) Up to $400,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide funding for community projects across the state that focus on support for families, assisting families in avoiding crisis, and crisis intervention; (G) $225,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to LifeTown Columbus to provide additional support for facility renovations and operations, including professional development, curriculum development, education materials, equipment, marketing, and recruitment; and (H) $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to Flying Horse Farms. (I) $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to The Freedom Collective to provide outreach, education, and support services to victims of commercial sexual exploitation. Section 337.80. CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 336422, Criminal Justice Services, up to $5,115,483 in fiscal year 2026 and $5,077,378 in fiscal year 2027 shall be allocated to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services through the Criminal Justice State Block Grant established in division (J) of Section 337.20 of this act. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 336422, Criminal Justice Services, up to $6,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Behavioral Health Drug Reimbursement Program established in section 5119.19 of the Revised Code. (C) Of the foregoing appropriation item 336422, Criminal Justice Services, $1,250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Addiction Treatment Program. (D) The remainder of appropriation item 336422, Criminal Justice Services, shall be used for all of the following: (1) The provision of forensic psychiatric evaluations to courts of common pleas; (2) The completion of evaluations of patients of forensic status in facilities operated or designated by the Department of Behavioral Health prior to each patient's conditional release to the community; (3) Workforce, training, and technological initiatives that support the items specified in divisions (D)(1) and (2) of this section; (4) Support therapeutic communities; (5) Provide forensic and crisis response training; (6) Establish and administer outpatient and jail-based competency restoration services; (7) Establish and administer pre-trial diversion programs; (8) Support assisted outpatient treatment programs; (9) Link and provide behavioral health treatment and recovery supports, including housing assistance, to incarcerated individuals with a substance use disorder, severe mental illness, or both, upon their release from jail or prison; (10) Support jail-based treatment and symptom management; (11) Support specialized dockets, including the expansion of existing medication-assisted treatment drug court programs, the creation of new medication-assisted treatment drug court programs, and assistance with the administrative expenses of participating courts and community addiction services providers and community mental health services providers; (12) Establish and administer outpatient competency restoration services. The services shall be provided by forensic centers described in section 5119.10 of the Revised Code or, to the extent a forensic center in a community does not provide outpatient competency restoration services, a psychiatric program or facility selected by a board of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services to provide such services. Section 337.90. SPECIALIZED DOCKET SUPPORT (A) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the foregoing appropriation item 336425, Specialized Docket Support, shall be used to defray a portion of the annual payroll costs associated with the specialized docket of a common pleas court, municipal court, county court, juvenile court, or family court that meets all of the eligibility requirements in division (B) of this section, including a family dependency treatment docket. The foregoing appropriation item 336425, Specialized Docket Support, may also be used to defray costs associated with treatment services and recovery supports for participants. (B) To be eligible, the specialized docket must have received Supreme Court of Ohio initial or final certification and include participants with behavioral health needs in its target population. (C) Of the foregoing appropriation item 336425, Specialized Docket Support, the Department of Behavioral Health shall use up to one per cent of the funds appropriated in each fiscal year to pay the cost it incurs in administering the duties established in this section. (D) The Department, in consultation with the Supreme Court of Ohio, may adopt funding distribution methodology, guidelines, and procedures as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. Section 337.100. COMMUNITY INNOVATIONS The foregoing appropriation item 336504, Community Innovations, may be used by the Department of Behavioral Health to make targeted investments in programs, projects, or systems operated by or under the authority of other state agencies, governmental entities, or private not-for-profit agencies that impact, or are impacted by, the operations and functions of the Department, with the goal of achieving a net reduction in expenditure of state general revenue funds and/or improved outcomes for Ohio citizens without a net increase in state general revenue fund spending. The Director shall identify and evaluate programs, projects, or systems proposed or operated, in whole or in part, outside of the authority of the Department, where targeted investment of these funds in the program, project, or system is expected to decrease demand for the Department or other resources funded with state general revenue funds, and/or to measurably improve outcomes for Ohio citizens with mental illness or with alcohol, drug, or gambling addictions. The Director shall have discretion to provide funds from this appropriation item to private not-for-profit entities in amounts, and subject to conditions, that the Director determines most likely to achieve state savings and/or improved outcomes. Distribution of funds from this appropriation item shall not be subject to sections 9.23 to 9.239 or Chapter 125. of the Revised Code. The Department shall enter into an agreement with each recipient of community innovation funds, identifying the following: allowable expenditure of the funds; other commitment of funds or other resources to the program, project, or system; expected state savings and/or improved outcomes and proposed mechanisms for measurement of such savings or outcomes; and required reporting regarding expenditure of funds and savings or outcomes achieved. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336504, Community Innovations, up to $3,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support workforce development initiatives. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336504, Community Innovations, up to $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide behavioral health access and opportunities. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336504, Community Innovations, up to $3,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the creation and expansion of programs established by peer-run organizations in this state for the purpose of offering individuals with a mental illness, or a mental illness and co-occurring substance use disorder, opportunities for employment, housing, education, and access to medical and psychiatric services. Programs and facilities shall be operated in accordance with model standards and benchmarks selected by the Department of Behavioral Health. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336504, Community Innovations, $125,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Pilot Grant Program for Doctoral Psychology Internships. The funds shall be awarded to doctoral psychology internship programs accredited by the American Psychological Association that offer clinical rotations in non-residential or community mental health and health care systems. Grant funds awarded shall be used to augment stipends for doctoral-level psychology students that come to Ohio internship sites. Section 337.110. RESIDENTIAL STATE SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 336510, Residential State Supplement, may be used by the Department of Behavioral Health to implement and operate the Residential State Supplement (RSS) Program required by section 5119.41 of the Revised Code. Section 337.115. APPALACHIAN CHILDREN COALITION The foregoing appropriation item 336516, Appalachian Children Coalition, shall be provided to the Appalachian Children Coalition to address systemic challenges children face in Appalachian Ohio. Section 337.117. COMMUNITY PROJECTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $700,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Social Advocates for Youth (S.A.Y.) Program at the Bellefaire Jewish Children's Bureau. These funds shall be used to support the expansion of school-based prevention and crises intervention services for youth including community crisis and trauma services, school-based counselors, behavioral health-trained teachers and intervention specialists, and a dedicated researcher to document outcomes. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $150,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Challenge Ministries. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to The Refuge to support existing programming and services. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $175,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the 1N5 Foundation to provide suicide prevention in schools. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $300,000 in each fiscal year shall be used in accordance with the section of this act entitled "HIGH-THC CANNABIS IMPACT RESEARCH STUDY. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $2,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Values-In-Action Foundation for the Kindland initiative. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $50,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be provided to Ohio Special Initiatives by Brothers and Sisters, or OHIO SIBS, for sustaining programs and to support those with a sibling with a developmental disability to empower them to take an active role in the life of the developmentally disabled sibling. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $750,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Cornerstone of Hope to launch and expand the Ohio Traumatic Loss Response Team. Of the foregoing appropriation item 336519, Community Projects, $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to Empowering to Elevate Academy and used to enhance security and improve facilities at the former Mohican Young Star Academy in Ashland County. Section 337.120. MEDICAID SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 652321, Medicaid Support, shall be used to fund specified Medicaid Services as delegated by the state's single agency responsible for the Medicaid Program. Section 337.130. 9-8-8 LIFELINE (A) As used in this section, "9-8-8 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline" means the 9-8-8 universal telephone number designated for use within the United States under section 251(e) of the "Communications Act of 1934," 47 U.S.C. 251(e), as amended by the "National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020," Pub. L. No. 116-172, for the purpose of the national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system. (B) The foregoing appropriation item 336522, 9-8-8 Suicide Crisis, shall be used to support statewide operations and related activities of the 9-8-8 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline and mental health treatment and response. Section 337.150. PROBLEM GAMBLING AND CASINO ADDICTION A portion of appropriation item 336629, Problem Gambling and Casino Addiction, shall be allocated to boards of alcohol, drug addiction, and mental health services in accordance with a distribution methodology determined by the Director of Behavioral Health. Section 337.160. TRANSCRANIAL MAGNETIC STIMULATION PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 336645, Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation Program, shall be used for the Electroencephalogram (EEG) Combined Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation Program as described in section 5119.20 of the Revised Code. Section 337.165. STATE OPIOID RESPONSE Of the foregoing appropriation item 336644, State Opioid Response, $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Cordata Healthcare Innovations, Inc., for case management programming, enhanced assessment, and evaluation of Ohio's law enforcement deflection sites and quick response teams. Section 337.170. ACCESS SUCCESS II PROGRAM To the extent cash is available, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from a fund designated by the Medicaid Director, to the Sale of Goods and Services Fund (Fund 1490), used by the Department of Behavioral Health. The transferred cash is hereby appropriated. The Department of Behavioral Health shall use the transferred funds to administer the Access Success II Program to help non-Medicaid patients in any hospital established, controlled, or supervised by the Department under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code to transition from inpatient status to a community setting. Section 337.180. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE INDIGENT DRIVERS ALCOHOL TREATMENT FUND TO THE STATEWIDE TREATMENT AND PREVENTION FUND On a schedule determined by the Director of Budget and Management, the Director of Behavioral Health shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of excess license reinstatement fees that are available pursuant to division (F)(2)(c) of section 4511.191 of the Revised Code to be transferred from the Indigent Drivers Alcohol Treatment Fund (Fund 7049) to the Statewide Treatment and Prevention Fund (Fund 4750). Upon certification, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from the Indigent Drivers Alcohol Treatment Fund to the Statewide Treatment and Prevention Fund. Section 337.185. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE 9-8-8 SUICIDE AND CRISIS RESPONSE FUND TO THE GENERAL REVENUE FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the cash balance in the 9-8-8 Suicide and Crisis Response Fund (Fund 5AA1) to the General Revenue Fund. Upon completion of the transfer, Fund 5AA1 is hereby abolished. The Director shall cancel any existing encumbrances against appropriation item 336661, 9-8-8 Suicide and Crisis Response, and reestablish them against appropriation item 336522, 9-8-8 Suicide Crisis. The reestablished encumbrance amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 337.190. STATEWIDE MOBILE CRISIS SYSTEM (A) The Department of Behavioral Health, in coordination with local, state, and federal government entities, shall assist with the development and implementation of a statewide system of mobile crisis services for adults and children. (B) The development of a statewide mobile crisis system is contingent on the availability of state and federal funding. Should state and federal funding be insufficient for the development of a full system or limit the extent to which the system can be developed, the Department shall determine whether and to what extent pilot projects or other initiatives for the provision of mobile crisis services could be implemented. Section 337.200. COMMUNITY BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CLINICS The ability of the Department of Behavioral Health to establish a process and standards for the state certification of certified community behavioral health clinics under section 5119.211 of the Revised Code is contingent on the availability of state and federal funding. Should state or federal funding be insufficient for the state certification of certified community behavioral health clinics, the Department shall determine whether and to what extent pilot projects or other initiatives to support an integrated care approach for the provision of substance use disorder treatment and mental health treatment could be implemented. Section 339.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A MIH COMMISSION ON MINORITY HEALTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 149321 Operating Expenses $844,088 $855,455 D GRF 149501 Demonstration Grants $1,352,000 $1,352,000 E GRF 149502 Lupus Program $118,000 $118,000 F GRF 149503 Infant Mortality Health Grants $4,970,489 $4,974,489 G General Revenue Fund Total $7,284,577 $7,299,944 H Dedicated Purpose Fund Group I 4C20 149601 Minority Health Conference $35,000 $35,000 J Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $35,000 $35,000 K Federal Fund Group L 3J90 149405 Healthier Communities $1,000,000 $1,000,000 M Federal Fund Group Total $1,000,000 $1,000,000 N TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $8,319,577 $8,334,944 Section 341.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CRB MOTOR VEHICLE REPAIR BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 865601 Operating Expenses $781,067 $821,804 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $781,067 $821,804 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $781,067 $821,804 Section 343.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DNR DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 725401 Division of Wildlife - Operating Subsidy $1,700,000 $1,700,000 D GRF 725413 Parks and Recreational Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments $57,500,000 $76,500,000 E GRF 725456 Canal Lands $118,000 $118,000 F GRF 725459 Buckeye State Tree Nursery $1,134,650 $1,134,650 G GRF 725460 LWCF Recreation Lands $262,646 $266,995 H GRF 725505 Healthy Lake Erie Program $450,000 $0 I GRF 725507 Coal and Mine Safety Programs $3,222,147 $3,297,340 J GRF 725520 Special Projects $350,000 $350,000 K GRF 725903 Natural Resources General Obligation Bond Debt Service $14,300,000 $14,300,000 L GRF 727321 Division of Forestry $10,000,000 $10,000,000 M GRF 729321 Office of Information Technology $526,055 $526,337 N GRF 730321 Parks and Recreation $27,650,000 $47,650,000 O GRF 736321 Division of Engineering $2,431,760 $2,476,358 P GRF 737321 Division of Water Resources $2,402,230 $2,403,759 Q GRF 738321 Office of Real Estate and Land Management $1,038,539 $1,060,089 R GRF 741321 Division of Natural Areas and Preserves $5,104,211 $5,205,199 S General Revenue Fund Total $128,190,238 $166,988,727 T Dedicated Purpose Fund Group U 2270 725406 Parks Projects Personnel $4,831,529 $4,976,475 V 4300 725671 Canal Lands $479,012 $479,012 W 4S90 725622 NatureWorks Personnel $317,806 $327,341 X 4U60 725668 Scenic Rivers Protection $58,860 $58,860 Y 5090 725602 State Forest $10,852,951 $11,010,594 Z 5110 725646 Ohio Geological Mapping $6,123,647 $6,323,883 AA 5120 725605 State Parks Operations $43,122,931 $43,358,465 AB 5140 725606 Lake Erie Shoreline $1,694,771 $1,732,863 AC 5160 725620 Water Management $3,256,522 $3,562,000 AD 5180 725643 Oil and Gas Regulation and Safety $31,230,432 $31,784,411 AE 5180 725677 Oil and Gas Well Plugging $47,734,902 $48,022,027 AF 5210 725627 Off-Road Vehicle Trails $1,781,723 $286,068 AG 5220 725656 Natural Areas and Preserves $585,191 $600,500 AH 5290 725639 Mining Regulation and Safety $4,004,552 $4,090,096 AI 5310 725648 Reclamation Forfeiture $195,573 $195,579 AJ 5BJ1 7256A6 Parks and Recreation $27,500,000 $7,500,000 AK 5BJ1 7256A7 Wildlife Area Land Royalties $3,000,000 $0 AL 5EL0 725612 Wildlife Law Enforcement $11,826 $11,826 AM 5HK0 725625 Ohio Nature Preserves $9,239 $9,239 AN 5LD0 725458 Oil and Gas Leasing Commission $10,000 $10,000 AO 5P20 725634 Wildlife Boater Angler Administration $5,968,330 $5,968,330 AP 5TD0 725514 Park Maintenance $1,540,331 $1,540,331 AQ 6150 725661 Dam Safety $5,673,950 $6,473,950 AR 6970 725670 Submerged Lands $667,210 $679,080 AS 6H20 725681 H2Ohio $21,200,000 $21,200,000 AT 7015 740401 Division of Wildlife Conservation $84,946,128 $87,919,242 AU 7086 725414 Waterways Improvement $5,782,184 $5,880,807 AV 7086 739401 Watercraft Operations $28,432,898 $28,922,532 AW 8150 725636 Cooperative Management Projects $625,271 $625,271 AX 8160 725649 Wetlands Habitat $659,691 $659,691 AY 8170 725655 Wildlife Conservation Checkoff $1,923,060 $1,923,060 AZ 8180 725629 Cooperative Fisheries Research $1,500,000 $1,500,000 BA 8190 725685 Ohio River Management $43,786 $43,786 BB 81B0 725688 Wildlife Habitats $1,359,102 $1,359,102 BC Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $347,123,408 $329,034,421 BD Internal Service Activity Fund Group BE 1550 725601 Departmental Projects $1,566,470 $1,586,980 BF 1570 725651 Program Support $26,713,040 $27,292,005 BG 5100 725631 Maintenance - State-owned Residences $43,713 $43,713 BH Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $28,323,223 $28,922,698 BI Capital Projects Fund Group BJ 7061 725405 Clean Ohio Trail Operating $267,307 $273,030 BK Capital Projects Fund Group Total $267,307 $273,030 BL Fiduciary Fund Group BM 5ZT0 7256A2 State Park Lodges Maintenance and Repair $11,950,641 $11,950,641 BN Fiduciary Fund Group Total $11,950,641 $11,950,641 BO Holding Account Fund Group BP R017 725659 Performance Cash Bond Refunds $450,999 $450,999 BQ R043 725624 Forestry $2,104,919 $2,104,919 BR Holding Account Fund Group Total $2,555,918 $2,555,918 BS Federal Fund Group BT 3320 725669 Federal Mine Safety Grant $306,979 $316,189 BU 3B30 725640 Federal Forest Pass-Thru $419,535 $419,535 BV 3B40 725641 Federal Flood Pass-Thru $106,648 $106,648 BW 3B50 725645 Federal Abandoned Mine Lands $69,114,806 $69,268,735 BX 3B60 725653 Federal Land and Water Conservation Grants $10,800,000 $25,800,000 BY 3B70 725654 Reclamation - Regulatory $1,311,309 $1,340,625 BZ 3IR0 7256A5 Long Term Abandoned Mine Land Reclamation $100,000 $100,000 CA 3P10 725632 Geological Survey - Federal $805,102 $786,700 CB 3P20 725642 Oil and Gas - Federal $20,109,957 $20,115,008 CC 3P20 725698 Oil And Gas - Federal Orphan Well Plug $22,363,120 $22,363,120 CD 3P30 725650 Coastal Management - Federal $3,953,487 $4,013,587 CE 3P40 725660 Federal - Soil and Water Resources $416,420 $422,292 CF 3R50 725673 Acid Mine Drainage Abatement/Treatment $860,489 $860,489 CG 3Z50 725657 Federal Recreation and Trails $1,122,594 $1,127,603 CH Federal Fund Group Total $131,790,446 $147,040,531 CI TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $650,201,181 $686,765,966 Section 343.20. PROGRAM SUPPORT FUND The Department of Natural Resources shall use a methodology for determining each division's payments into the Program Support Fund (Fund 1570). The methodology used shall contain the characteristics of administrative ease and uniform application in compliance with federal grant requirements. It may include direct cost charges for specific services provided. Payments to Fund 1570 shall be made using an intrastate transfer voucher. DIVISION OF WILDLIFE-OPERATING SUBSIDY The foregoing appropriation item 725401, Division of Wildlife-Operating Subsidy, shall be used to pay the direct and indirect costs of the Division of Wildlife. PARKS AND RECREATIONAL FACILITIES LEASE RENTAL BOND PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 725413, Parks and Recreational Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments, shall be used to meet all payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, by the Department of Natural Resources pursuant to leases and agreements made under section 154.22 of the Revised Code. These appropriations are the source of funds pledged for bond service charges on related obligations issued under Chapter 154. of the Revised Code. HEALTHY LAKE ERIE PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 725505, Healthy Lake Erie Program, shall be used by the Director of Natural Resources, in support of the following: (1) conservation measures in the Western Lake Erie Basin as determined by the Director; (2) funding assistance for soil testing, winter cover crops, edge of field testing, tributary monitoring, and animal waste abatement; and (3) any additional efforts to reduce nutrient runoff as the Director may decide. The Director shall give priority to recommendations that encourage farmers to adopt agricultural production guidelines commonly known as 4R nutrient stewardship practices. SPECIAL PROJECTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 725520, Special Projects, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support Ohio Education Programs at Aullwood Audubon Center and Farm and Grange Insurance Audubon Center. Of the foregoing appropriation item 725520, Special Projects, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for improvements at Mosquito Lake State Park. NATURAL RESOURCES GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 725903, Natural Resources General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on obligations issued under sections 151.01 and 151.05 of the Revised Code. PARKS AND RECREATION The Director of Natural Resources shall consult with the Loramie Watershed Association to identify portions of Lake Loramie that are negatively affected by hard pan sediment and hard clay debris. Of the foregoing appropriation item 730321, Parks and Recreation, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to contract with a third-party vendor for channel excavation and the removal of hard pan sediment and hard clay debris at Lake Loramie. Of the foregoing appropriation item 730321, Parks and Recreation, $172,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used for channel excavation and removal of sediment at Grand Lake St. Marys. Of the foregoing appropriation item 730321, Parks and Recreation, $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to support the Indian Lake Watershed Project. Of the foregoing appropriation item 730321, Parks and Recreation, $150,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to Canalway Partners to support the 2027 bicentennial recognition of the Ohio & Erie Canal. Section 343.30. WELL LOG FILING FEES The Chief of the Division of Water Resources shall deposit fees forwarded to the Division pursuant to section 1521.05 of the Revised Code into the Water Management Fund (Fund 5160) for the purposes described in that section. PARKS CAPITAL EXPENSES FUND The Director of Natural Resources shall submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, engineering, and planning costs of capital-related work to be done by Department of Natural Resources staff for parks projects within the Ohio Parks and Recreation Improvement Fund (Fund 7035). If the Director of Budget and Management approves the estimated costs, the Director may release appropriations from Fund 7035 appropriation item C725E6, Project Planning, for those purposes. Upon release of the appropriations, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Parks Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 2270). Expenses paid from Fund 2270 shall be reimbursed by Fund 7035 using an intrastate transfer voucher. NATUREWORKS CAPITAL EXPENSES FUND The Department of Natural Resources shall submit to the Director of Budget and Management the estimated design, planning, and engineering costs of capital-related work to be done by Department of Natural Resources staff for each capital improvement project within the Ohio Parks and Natural Resources Fund (Fund 7031). If the Director of Budget and Management approves the estimated costs, the Director may release appropriations from Fund 7031 appropriation item C725E5, Project Planning, for those purposes. Upon release of the appropriations, the Department of Natural Resources shall pay for these expenses from the Capital Expenses Fund (Fund 4S90). Expenses paid from Fund 4S90 shall be reimbursed by Fund 7031 using an intrastate transfer voucher. PARKS AND RECREATION The foregoing appropriation item 7256A6, Parks and Recreation, shall be used in conjunction with appropriation item 730321, Parks and Recreation, to support the Division of Parks and Watercraft. PARK MAINTENANCE The foregoing appropriation item 725514, Park Maintenance, shall be used by the Department of Natural Resources to pay the costs of projects supported by the State Park Maintenance Fund (Fund 5TD0) under section 1501.08 of the Revised Code. On July 1 of each fiscal year or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Natural Resources shall certify the amount of five percent of the average of the previous five years of deposits in the State Park Fund (Fund 5120) to the Director of Budget and Management. The Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $2,200,000 from Fund 5120 to the State Park Maintenance Fund (Fund 5TD0). Section 343.50. CLEAN OHIO TRAIL OPERATING EXPENSES The foregoing appropriation item 725405, Clean Ohio Trail Operating, shall be used by the Department of Natural Resources in administering Clean Ohio Trail Fund (Fund 7061) projects pursuant to section 1519.05 of the Revised Code. Section 343.60. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Locally administer" means to supervise the design and construction of, and make contracts for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, alteration, repair, or decoration of a capital facility project without the assistance of the Ohio Facilities Construction Commission. (2) "Capital facility project" means any activities, projects, or improvements described in division (B)(1) of section 1501.011 of the Revised Code. "Capital facility project" does not include the construction of a new facility, structure, or lodge. (B) Notwithstanding section 123.21 of the Revised Code or any other provision of law to the contrary, for fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the Department of Natural Resources may locally administer any capital facility project commenced within those fiscal years, regardless of estimated cost. (C) The Department shall do both of the following regarding a capital facility project that is locally administered: (1) Comply with the applicable procedures and guidelines established in Chapter 153. of the Revised Code; (2) Track all project information in the Ohio Administrative Knowledge System capital improvements application pursuant to Ohio Facilities Construction Commission guidelines as though the Department is administering the project pursuant to section 123.211 of the Revised Code and all generally applicable laws. (D) Nothing in this section interferes with the powers of the Department of Natural Resources authorized in Chapter 1501. of the Revised Code. Section 345.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A NUR STATE BOARD OF NURSING B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 884609 Operating Expenses $13,033,034 $13,491,425 D 5AC0 884602 Nurse Education Grant Program $1,350,000 $1,350,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $14,383,034 $14,841,425 F TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $14,383,034 $14,841,425 Section 347.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PYT OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY, PHYSICAL THERAPY, AND ATHLETIC TRAINERS BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 890609 Operating Expenses $1,352,852 $1,434,859 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,352,852 $1,434,859 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,352,852 $1,434,859 Section 353.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A OOD OPPORTUNITIES FOR OHIOANS WITH DISABILITIES AGENCY B General Revenue Fund C GRF 415402 Independent Living Council $252,000 $252,000 D GRF 415406 Assistive Technology $26,000 $26,000 E GRF 415431 Brain Injury $800,000 $800,000 F GRF 415506 Services for Individuals with Disabilities $39,015,000 $39,015,000 G GRF 415508 Services for the Deaf $527,000 $527,000 H GRF 415511 Centers for Independent Living $1,500,000 $1,500,000 I GRF 415512 Visually Impaired Reading Services $50,000 $50,000 J GRF 415513 Accessible Ohio $1,000,000 $1,000,000 K GRF 415515 DeafBlind Fund $200,000 $200,000 L General Revenue Fund Total $43,370,000 $43,370,000 M Dedicated Purpose Fund Group N 4670 415609 Business Enterprise Operating Expenses $913,127 $918,806 O 4680 415618 Third Party Services Funding $3,725,233 $3,725,233 P 4L10 415619 Services for Rehabilitation $2,000,000 $2,000,000 Q Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $6,638,360 $6,644,039 R Internal Service Activity Fund Group S 4W50 415606 Program Management $17,083,462 $17,539,339 T Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $17,083,462 $17,539,339 U Federal Fund Group V 3170 415620 Disability Determination $88,981,907 $90,733,204 W 3790 415616 Federal-Vocational Rehabilitation $170,000,000 $175,100,000 X 3GH0 415602 Personal Care Assistance $3,995,399 $4,017,337 Y 3GH0 415604 Community Centers for the Deaf $772,420 $772,420 Z 3GH0 415613 Independent Living $2,737,411 $2,737,411 AA 3GH0 415627 Independent Living Projects $100,000 $100,000 AB 3IL0 415629 Works4Me Disability Innovation Fund Grant $2,300,000 $2,300,000 AC 3L40 415615 Federal-Supported Employment $1,200,000 $1,200,000 AD 3L40 415617 Independent Living Older Blind $2,567,746 $2,908,622 AE Federal Fund Group Total $272,654,883 $279,868,994 AF TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $339,746,705 $347,422,372 Section 353.20. INDEPENDENT LIVING The foregoing appropriation item 415402, Independent Living Council, shall be provided to the Ohio Statewide Independent Living Council to support its operations under the State Plan for Independent Living. Of the foregoing appropriation item 415511, Centers for Independent Living, the amount needed in each fiscal year for state matching funds for the Federal Independent Living Grant shall be provided to support the state independent living programs and centers under Title VII of the federal "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 29 U.S.C. 701, et seq., as amended by the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992 and known as the federal Independent Living Services and Centers for Independent Living. Of the foregoing appropriation item 415511, Centers for Independent Living, up to $1,355,608 in each fiscal year may be used as state matching funds to provide vocational rehabilitation services to Ohioans with disabilities. Of the foregoing appropriation item 415511, Centers for Independent Living, $74,124 in each fiscal year shall be used as state matching funds for vocational rehabilitation innovation and expansion activities. The foregoing appropriation item 415613, Independent Living, shall be used to support the operations of the Centers for Independent Living in accordance with the State Plan for Independent Living. ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY The foregoing appropriation item 415406, Assistive Technology, shall be provided to Assistive Technology of Ohio to provide grants and assistive technology services for people with disabilities in the state of Ohio. BRAIN INJURY Of the foregoing appropriation item 415431, Brain Injury, $450,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to The Ohio State University College of Medicine to support the Brain Injury Program established under section 3335.60 of the Revised Code. The remainder of appropriation item 415431, Brain Injury, shall be provided to the Brain Injury Association of Ohio for direct services and supports for brain injury survivors and caregivers. SERVICES FOR THE DEAF The foregoing appropriation item 415508, Services for the Deaf, shall be used to support community centers for the deaf. VISUALLY IMPAIRED READING SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 415512, Visually Impaired Reading Services, shall be used to support VOICEcorps Reading Services to provide reading services for blind individuals. DEAFBLIND FUND The foregoing appropriation item 415515, DeafBlind Fund, shall be distributed to the Columbus Speech and Hearing Center for the recruitment and training of support service providers and to connect support service providers with DeafBlind individuals. SIGHT CENTERS Of the foregoing appropriation item 415617, Independent Living Older Blind, $30,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to contract in equal amounts with the Cleveland Sight Center, the Cincinnati Association for the Blind and Visually Impaired, and the Sight Center of Northwest Ohio to provide outreach to the community of individuals with blindness or low vision. Section 361.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PEN PENSION SUBSIDIES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 090524 Police and Fire Disability Pension Fund $300 $300 D GRF 090534 Police and Fire Ad Hoc Cost of Living $14,000 $14,000 E GRF 090554 Police and Fire Survivor Benefits $138,000 $138,000 F GRF 090575 Police and Fire Death Benefits $40,000,000 $40,000,000 G General Revenue Fund Total $40,152,300 $40,152,300 H TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $40,152,300 $40,152,300 Section 361.20. POLICE AND FIRE DEATH BENEFIT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 090575, Police and Fire Death Benefits, shall be disbursed quarterly by the Treasurer of State at the beginning of each quarter of each fiscal year to the Board of Trustees of the Ohio Police and Fire Pension Fund, which serves as trustees of the Ohio Public Safety Officers Death Benefit Fund pursuant to section 742.62 of the Revised Code. The Treasurer of State shall certify such amounts quarterly to the Director of Budget and Management. By the twentieth day of June of each fiscal year, the Board of Trustees shall certify to the Treasurer of State the amount disbursed in the current fiscal year to make the payments required by sections 124.824 and 742.63 of the Revised Code and shall return to the Treasurer of State moneys received from this appropriation item but not disbursed. Notwithstanding any provision of section 124.824 of the Revised Code to the contrary, for each death benefit fund recipient who participates in health, medical, hospital, dental, surgical, or vision benefits under section 124.824 of the Revised Code, the Board of Trustees of the Ohio Police and Fire Pension Fund shall forward as a pass-through from the revenue received from the foregoing appropriation item 090575, Police and Fire Death Benefits, the percentage of the cost for the applicable benefits that would be paid by a state employer for a state employee who elects that coverage and any applicable administrative costs, which shall not exceed two per cent of the total cost of the benefits. The Board of Trustees shall also withhold from the benefits paid to a death benefit fund recipient under section 742.63 of the Revised Code the percentage of the cost for such benefits that would be paid by a state employee, and forward the withheld amounts to the Department of Administrative Services from the revenue received from the foregoing appropriation item 090575, Police and Fire Death Benefits. In fiscal year 2026 or 2027, if it is determined by the Director of Administrative Services, in consultation with the Chairperson of the Board of Trustees of the Ohio Police and Fire Pension Fund, or designee, that additional amounts are necessary to pay the cost of providing benefits under section 124.824 or 742.63 of the Revised Code, the Director of Administrative Services may certify the additional amount necessary to the Director of Budget and Management. The amount certified is hereby appropriated. Section 363.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A UST PETROLEUM UNDERGROUND STORAGE TANK RELEASE COMPENSATION BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 6910 810632 Petroleum Underground Storage Tank Release Compensation Board - Operating $1,778,594 $1,910,092 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,778,594 $1,910,092 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,778,594 $1,910,092 Section 367.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PRX STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4A50 887605 Drug Law Enforcement $50,000 $50,000 D 4K90 658605 OARRS Integration - State $207,657 $208,860 E 4K90 887609 Operating Expenses $13,773,784 $14,491,459 F 5SG0 887612 Drug Database $2,826,000 $2,865,000 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $16,857,441 $17,615,319 H Federal Fund Group I 3HD0 887614 Pharmacy Federal Grants $2,094,643 $2,111,622 J 3HH0 658601 OARRS Integration - Federal $642,117 $645,729 K Federal Fund Group Total $2,736,760 $2,757,351 L TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $19,594,201 $20,372,670 Section 367.20. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA CONTROL PROGRAM FUND TO THE DRUG DATABASE FUND Upon the request of the Executive Director of the State Board of Pharmacy, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $2,745,500 in cash in each fiscal year from the Medical Marijuana Control Program Fund (Fund 5SY0), used by the Department of Commerce, to the Drug Database Fund (Fund 5SG0), used by the State Board of Pharmacy. Section 369.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PSY STATE BOARD OF PSYCHOLOGY B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 882609 Operating Expenses $975,010 $1,011,722 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $975,010 $1,011,722 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $975,010 $1,011,722 Section 371.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PUB OHIO PUBLIC DEFENDER COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 019401 State Legal Defense Services $13,227,100 $13,467,000 D GRF 019406 Northwest Regional Hub Support $3,350,000 $3,350,000 E GRF 019501 County Reimbursement $173,719,360 $178,930,940 F General Revenue Fund Total $190,296,460 $195,747,940 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group H 1010 019607 Juvenile Legal Assistance $217,456 $223,980 I 4060 019603 Training and Publications $75,000 $75,000 J 4070 019604 County Representation $375,000 $375,000 K 4080 019605 Client Payments $800,000 $800,000 L 4C70 019601 Multi-County: County Share $594,900 $624,300 M 4N90 019613 Gifts and Grants $13,400 $13,400 N 5740 019606 Civil Legal Aid $37,000,000 $33,000,000 O 5CX0 019617 Civil Case Filing Fee $620,000 $620,000 P 5DY0 019618 Indigent Defense Support - County Share $22,908,000 $22,908,000 Q 5DY0 019619 Indigent Defense Support - State Office $4,692,000 $4,692,000 R Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $67,295,756 $63,331,680 S Federal Fund Group T 3IQ0 019626 Reforming Reentry Program $350,000 $85,321 U 3S80 019608 Federal Representation $38,300 $38,300 V Federal Fund Group Total $388,300 $123,621 W TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $257,980,516 $259,203,241 Section 371.20. STATE LEGAL DEFENSE SERVICES Of the foregoing appropriation item 019401, State Legal Defense Services, up to $50,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Ohio Public Defender to provide legal training programs at no cost for private appointed counsel who represent at least one indigent defendant at no cost and for state and county public defenders and attorneys who contract with the Ohio Public Defender to provide indigent defense services. INDIGENT DEFENSE SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 019501, County Reimbursement, shall be used to reimburse counties for the costs of operating county public defender offices, joint county public defender offices and county appointed counsel systems, the counties' costs and expenses of conducting the defense in capital cases, the counties' costs and expenses of appointed counsel covered by section 2941.51 of the Revised Code, and the costs and expenses of contracting with the state public defender or with any nonprofit organization to provide legal representation to indigent persons. CASH TRANSFER FROM THE GENERAL REVENUE FUND TO THE LEGAL AID FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $1,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Legal Aid Fund (Fund 5740). The transferred cash shall be distributed by the Ohio Access to Justice Foundation to Ohio's civil legal aid societies as follows: $500,000 in each fiscal year for the sole purpose of providing legal services for economically disadvantaged individuals and families seeking assistance with legal issues arising as a result of substance abuse disorders, and $250,000 in each fiscal year for the sole purpose of providing legal services for veterans. None of the funds shall be used for administrative costs, including, but not limited to, salaries, benefits, or travel reimbursements. FEDERAL REPRESENTATION The foregoing appropriation item 019608, Federal Representation, shall be used to support representation provided by the Ohio Public Defender in federal court cases. COUNTY INDIGENT DEFENSE BUDGETS Not later than July 31, 2026, each county through its county commission shall submit a biannual indigent defense cost projection report to the Ohio Public Defender. The report shall contain data on the most current projected costs of the indigent defense services in the county for the next two upcoming state fiscal years at the time of submission. Section 371.30. NORTHWEST REGIONAL HUB (A) In fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, the Ohio Public Defender shall create the Northwest Regional Hub pilot program to provide indigent defense services in the counties that elect to join, in lieu of managing those services directly and applying for reimbursement. (B) The following counties may elect to participate in the Northwest Regional Hub, and no other counties are permitted to participate: (1) Allen County; (2) Hardin County; (3) Putnam County. (C) On or after the effective date of this section, any county listed in division (B) of this section may elect, by resolution, to become part of the Northwest Regional Hub and thereby transfer administration of the county's indigent defense system to the Ohio Public Defender for the period of the pilot program. (D) If a county elects to become part of the Northwest Regional Hub and transfer indigent defense services to the Ohio Public Defender pursuant to this section, the Ohio Public Defender shall assume responsibility for representation of indigent persons in the proceedings set forth in division (A) of section 120.16 of the Revised Code, to the extent that representation is not provided by outside counsel in accordance with section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (E)(1) The Ohio Public Defender shall consult with the county commissioners, judiciary, and local attorneys in counties that have opted to participate in the Northwest Regional Hub to determine the number of indigent defense cases the public defender will handle directly. (2) Except as provided in division (E)(4) of this section, in a county that elects to participate in the Northwest Regional Hub, the Ohio Public Defender shall provide direct representation to indigent defendants in not more than eighty per cent of indigent defense cases. (3) In cases where the Ohio Public Defender does not provide direct representation, the court shall appoint counsel in accordance with section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (4) If the Ohio Public Defender, in consultation with the county commissioners, judiciary, and local attorneys, determines that there is insufficient local counsel available to fill an appointment under division (E)(3) of this section, the Ohio Public Defender shall provide direct representation in the case. (F) A county that wishes to withdraw from the Northwest Regional Hub and resume responsibility for the delivery of indigent defense services shall do all of the following: (1) Hold a public meeting regarding the withdrawal and provide notice to all of the following, seven or more days before the meeting: (a) The local bar association; (b) Every judge serving in the county; (c) The county prosecutor; (d) The county public defender; (e) Every attorney who is on the court's roster for appointment to provide indigent defense in accordance with section 120.33 of the Revised Code. (2) Provide the Ohio Public Defender with a copy of the resolution electing to withdraw. (G) When a county transfers indigent defense services to the Ohio Public Defender pursuant to this section, and the transferring county operates a county public defender office at the time of the transfer, the employees of the transferring county public defender may be appointed as employees of the Ohio Public Defender as the Ohio Public Defender determines to be necessary for successful implementation of this section. (H) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Ohio Public Defender may, in consultation with the Director of Administrative Services, do either of the following: (1) Assign any employee of the transferring county to a classification that is not subject to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code and do both of the following for such an employee: (a) Assign the employee to the appropriate compensation, classification, step placement, and step advancement; (b) Determine appropriate service credit for purposes of vacation and longevity. (2) Assign any employee of the transferring county to a bargaining unit classification that is subject to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code if the Ohio Public Defender and the Department of Administrative Services determine that the bargaining unit classification is the proper classification for that employee. (I) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, employees of a transferring county may be eligible for any state benefit plan administered by the Department of Administrative Services with coverage commencing as determined by the Director of Administrative Services. (J) Actions taken by the Ohio Public Defender and the Director of Administrative Services pursuant to this section are not subject to appeal to the State Personnel Board of Review. NORTHWEST REGIONAL HUB SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 019406, Northwest Regional Hub Support, shall be used by the Ohio Public Defender to pay for all the costs of providing indigent defense services in counties that have transferred administration of those services pursuant to this section. Expenses may include the cost of operating public defender offices, reimbursement of expenses of court appointed counsel, and other associated costs of providing legal representation to indigent persons as covered by section 120.04 of the Revised Code. Section 373.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DPS DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY B General Revenue Fund C GRF 761403 Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement $0 $3,250,000 D GRF 761411 Ohio Narcotics Intelligence Center $0 $7,050,000 E GRF 763403 EMA Operating $8,931,000 $9,102,000 F GRF 763513 Security Grants $8,500,000 $8,500,000 G GRF 765401 Emergency Medical Services Operating $5,572,851 $5,843,030 H GRF 767420 Investigative Unit Operating $16,554,073 $14,718,860 I GRF 768425 Justice Program Services $19,695,430 $19,875,918 J GRF 768435 Community Police Relations $2,445,800 $2,607,939 K GRF 769406 Homeland Security - Operating $4,946,000 $5,046,000 L GRF 769407 Driver Safety $6,425,545 $6,458,591 M GRF 769412 Ohio School Safety Center $8,963,284 $9,367,524 N General Revenue Fund Total $82,033,983 $91,819,862 O Highway Safety Fund Group P 5TM0 762321 Operating Expense - BMV $128,500,000 $129,645,783 Q 5TM0 762637 Local Immobilization Reimbursement $87,000 $90,000 R 5TM0 764321 Operating Expense - Highway Patrol $404,019,560 $416,140,146 S 5TM0 764605 Motor Carrier Enforcement Expenses $709,000 $730,000 T 5TM0 769636 Administrative Expenses - Highway Purposes $56,062,283 $58,959,468 U 8370 764602 Turnpike Policing $13,652,000 $14,117,000 V 83C0 764630 Contraband, Forfeiture, and Other $500,000 $500,000 W 83F0 764657 Law Enforcement Automated Data System $6,216,213 $6,380,428 X 83G0 764633 OMVI Enforcement/Education $156,727 $157,703 Y 83M0 765640 EMS Grants $2,900,000 $2,900,000 Z 8400 764607 State Fair Security $1,788,386 $1,842,038 AA 8400 764617 Security and Investigations $14,376,926 $14,808,233 AB 8400 764626 State Fairgrounds Police Force $1,031,556 $1,062,502 AC 8460 761625 Motorcycle Safety Education $4,215,000 $4,220,000 AD 8490 762627 Automated Title Processing Board $11,000,000 $10,950,000 AE 8490 762630 Electronic Liens and Titles $2,008,000 $2,008,000 AF Highway Safety Fund Group Total $647,222,651 $664,511,301 AG Dedicated Purpose Fund Group AH 4P60 768601 Justice Program Services $95,000 $100,000 AI 4V30 763662 EMA Service and Reimbursements $559,000 $562,000 AJ 5330 763601 State Disaster Relief $1,000,000 $1,000,000 AK 5390 762614 Motor Vehicle Dealers Board $140,000 $140,000 AL 5AZ1 761680 eWarrant Local Integration $1,390,000 $1,405,000 AM 5B90 766632 Private Investigator and Security Guard Provider $2,134,000 $2,203,000 AN 5BC1 769638 Ohio School Safety and Security Center Training Fees $100,000 $100,000 AO 5BK0 768687 Criminal Justice Services - Operating $770,000 $795,000 AP 5BK0 768689 Family Violence Shelter Programs $1,550,000 $1,550,000 AQ 5ET0 768625 Drug Law Enforcement $3,750,000 $3,750,000 AR 5FF0 762621 Indigent Interlock and Alcohol Monitoring $1,400,000 $1,400,000 AS 5LM0 768698 Criminal Justice Services Law Enforcement Support $850,000 $850,000 AT 5ML0 769635 Infrastructure Protection $89,000 $91,000 AU 5RH0 767697 OIU Special Projects $750,000 $750,000 AV 5TZ0 761682 Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement $6,500,000 $3,250,000 AW 5TZ0 761683 Ohio Narcotics Intelligence Center $13,200,000 $6,750,000 AX 5Y10 764695 State Highway Patrol Continuing Professional Training $148,000 $148,000 AY 5Y10 767696 Ohio Investigative Unit Continuing Professional Training $10,000 $10,000 AZ 6220 767615 Investigative, Contraband, and Forfeiture $61,000 $61,000 BA 6570 763652 Utility Radiological Safety $1,420,000 $1,467,000 BB 6810 763653 SARA Title III Hazmat Planning $400,000 $331,000 BC Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $36,316,000 $26,713,000 BD Fiduciary Fund Group BE 5J90 761678 Federal Salvage/GSA $600,000 $600,000 BF 5V10 762682 License Plate Contributions $2,900,000 $3,000,000 BG Fiduciary Fund Group Total $3,500,000 $3,600,000 BH Holding Account Fund Group BI R024 762619 Unidentified Motor Vehicle Receipts $1,641,000 $1,641,000 BJ R052 762623 Security Deposits $50,000 $50,000 BK Holding Account Fund Group Total $1,691,000 $1,691,000 BL Federal Fund Group BM 3370 763515 COVID Relief - Federal $150,000,000 $150,000,000 BN 3370 763609 Federal Disaster Relief $73,500,000 $73,500,000 BO 3FP0 767620 Ohio Investigative Unit Justice Contraband $10,000 $10,000 BP 3GL0 768619 Justice Assistance Grants $10,000,000 $10,000,000 BQ 3GR0 764693 Highway Patrol Justice Contraband $227,000 $227,000 BR 3GS0 764694 Highway Patrol Treasury Contraband $80,000 $80,000 BS 3GT0 767691 Investigative Unit Federal Equity Share $100,000 $100,000 BT 3GU0 761610 Information and Education Grant $435,000 $435,000 BU 3GU0 764608 Fatality Analysis Report System Grant $175,000 $175,000 BV 3GU0 764610 Highway Safety Programs Grant $5,226,000 $5,333,000 BW 3GU0 764659 Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program Grant $11,242,000 $11,582,000 BX 3GU0 769610 Investigations Grants - Food Stamps, Liquor, and Tobacco Laws $1,000,000 $1,000,000 BY 3GU0 769631 Homeland Security Disaster Grants $1,500,000 $1,500,000 BZ 3GV0 761612 Traffic Safety Action Plan Grant $31,625,000 $31,685,000 CA 3L50 768604 Justice Program $25,000,000 $25,000,000 CB Federal Fund Group Total $310,120,000 $310,627,000 CC TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $1,080,883,634 $1,098,962,163 Section 373.20. RECOVERY OHIO LAW ENFORCEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 761682, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, shall be used in conjunction with appropriation item 761403, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, to support the RecoveryOhio Initiative. Of the foregoing appropriation items 761682, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, and 761403, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, a total of up to $3,400,000 in each fiscal year may be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services to support local law enforcement narcotics task forces that focus on cartel trafficking interdiction. The interdiction task forces shall be designated Ohio Organized Crime Commission task forces subject to approval and supervision of the Commission. This earmarked amount may also be used to provide funding to local law enforcement agencies, the Commission for task force-related equipment purchases, and for operating expenses of the Office of Criminal Justice Services related to the narcotics interdiction task force program. Of the foregoing appropriation items 761682, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, and 761403, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, a total of up to $2,500,000 in each fiscal year may be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services for Ohio's narcotics task forces in order to build new and strengthen existing partnerships with local law enforcement. This earmarked amount may also be used to provide funding to local law enforcement agencies and for operating expenses of the Office of Criminal Justice Services related to the Ohio narcotics task force program. Of the foregoing appropriation items 761682, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, and 761403, Recovery Ohio Law Enforcement, a total of up to $600,000 in each fiscal year may be used to partner with the Office of Information Technology in the Department of Administrative Services to enhance and maintain a uniform records management and data intelligence system, and provide case management, collaboration, data sharing, and data analytics tools for Ohio narcotics task forces and law enforcement agencies. OHIO NARCOTICS INTELLIGENCE CENTER The foregoing appropriation item 761683, Ohio Narcotics Intelligence Center, shall be used in conjunction with appropriation item 761411, Ohio Narcotics Intelligence Center, to support the Ohio Narcotics Intelligence Center. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES OPERATING Of the foregoing appropriation item 765401, Emergency Medical Services Operating, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Ohio Mortuary Operational Response Team headquarters in Montgomery County for maintenance and training. Section 373.30. SECURITY GRANTS (A) The foregoing appropriation item 763513, Security Grants, may be used to make competitive grants to be used over a two-year period of up to $125,000 to nonprofit organizations, houses of worship, chartered nonpublic schools, and licensed preschools for all of the following purposes: (1) Eligible security improvements that assist the organization in preventing, preparing for, or responding to acts of terrorism, including services performed by the Ohio Department of Transportation related to line of sight security needs; (2) Acquiring or retaining the services of a resource officer, special duty police officer, or licensed armed security guards, including the training, licensing, or certification of resource officers, and training or recommissioning of retired officers and military service members who are transitioning to a civilian career; (3) The lease or purchase of qualified equipment, including equipment for emergency and crisis communication, crisis management, or trauma and crisis response to assist in preventing, preparing for, or responding to acts of terrorism; (4) Placing the qualified equipment at alternative locations that are off the premises belonging to the grantee, provided that the grantee receives prior permission from any appropriate county, municipal corporation, local law enforcement agency, local emergency management agency, or local transportation agency, as applicable; (5) Funding coordinated training between law enforcement, counterterrorism agencies, and emergency responders on either the premises of a nonprofit corporation or through community-wide training efforts; (6) Continuing coverage of costs that were authorized and paid for by a grant issued previously to the grantee in accordance with this section in previous bienniums under the program. (B)(1) In addition to the purposes listed in division (A) of this section, a nonprofit organization that serves a broad community or geographic area may apply for and receive grants to provide antiterrorism related services for its serviced community or area, including providing armed security personnel. Prior to receiving a grant under division (B) of this section, the nonprofit organization shall provide the Emergency Management Agency with any appropriate compliance documentation. The Agency shall establish what compliance documentation is required prior to issuing grants under this division. (2) If more than one nonprofit organization is located at the same address listed on the application, each nonprofit organization may apply for the full amount of a grant issued under this section. Each nonprofit organization shall explain in its application how it will use the grant money to address a different vulnerability than the other applicant nonprofit organizations that are located at the same address. (C) The Emergency Management Agency shall administer and award the grants described in division (B) of this section. The Agency shall establish procedures and forms by which applicants may apply for a grant, a competitive process for ranking applicants and awarding the grants, and procedures for distributing grants to recipients. The procedures shall require each applicant to do all of the following: (1) Identify and substantiate prior threats or attacks by a terrorist organization, network, or cell against the nonprofit organization, house of worship, chartered nonpublic school, or licensed preschool; (2) Indicate the symbolic or strategic value of one or more sites that renders the site a possible target of terrorism; (3) Discuss potential consequences to the organization if the site is damaged, destroyed, or disrupted by a terrorist; (4) Describe how the grant will be used to integrate organizational preparedness with broader state and local preparedness efforts; (5) Submit either a vulnerability assessment conducted by experienced security, law enforcement, or military personnel, or a credible intelligence and threat analysis from one or more qualified homeland security, counterintelligence, or anti-terrorism experts, and a description of how the grant will be used to address the vulnerabilities identified in the assessment. The Agency shall consider all of the above factors in evaluating grant applications. The grantee shall have twenty-four months from the date of the first disbursement to meet program requirements. The Agency shall include information about the grants and the application process on its web site. (6) The Emergency Management Agency may prioritize a portion of funding, but not more than $1,000,000 in each fiscal year, for innovative community-public safety partnerships addressing counterterrorism prevention, provided the grantee is eligible to receive the grant as a nonprofit organization that is at risk of terror attack. (D) The Emergency Management Agency may use up to $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for community police partnerships that focus on collaboration, increased efficiencies, or otherwise assisting both a nonprofit organization and one or more law enforcement, emergency management, or homeland security agencies to serve and protect at-risk nonprofit organizations. (E) Any grant submission described in division (I) of section 3313.536 of the Revised Code or section 149.433 of the Revised Code is not a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code and is not subject to mandatory release or disclosure under that section. (F) The Emergency Management Agency may use up to two and one-half per cent of the total amount appropriated to administer the program, a portion of which may be used to pay costs incurred by the Department of Public Safety to provide security-related or specialized assistance in reviewing vulnerability assessments and prioritizing grant applications. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Eligible security improvements" means any of the following: (a) Physical security enhancement equipment or inspection and screening equipment included on the Authorized Equipment List published by the United States Department of Homeland Security; (b) Attendance fees and associated materials, supplies, and equipment costs for security-related training courses and programs regarding the protection of critical infrastructure and key resources, physical and cyber security, target hardening, or terrorism awareness or preparedness. Personnel and travel costs associated with training shall not be considered an eligible expense of the grant; (c) The purchase, upgrade, or maintenance of high-speed internet for those utilizing it for security purposes. (2) "Nonprofit organization" means a corporation, association, group, institution, society, or other organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3), as amended. (3) "Resource officer" means any law enforcement officer of an accredited local law enforcement agency providing special duty services in a school setting to create or maintain a safe, secure, and orderly environment. A resource officer may include a special duty police officer, off-duty police officer, deputy sheriff, or other peace officer of the applicable local law enforcement agency in which the chartered nonpublic school or licensed preschool is located or qualifying personnel of an accredited local law enforcement agency for any jurisdiction in this state. (4) "Terrorism" means any act taken by a group or individual used to intimidate or coerce a nonprofit organization, house of worship, chartered nonpublic school, or licensed preschool, its employees, and anyone who is or in the future may be associated with it, as well as their families; to influence the policy of the nonprofit organization, house of worship, chartered nonpublic school, or licensed preschool; and to affect the conduct of the nonprofit organization, house of worship, chartered nonpublic school, or licensed preschool. (H) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, of the foregoing appropriation item 763513, Security Grants, $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to award competitive grants to chartered nonpublic schools for school resource officer or special duty officer programs. The grant period shall last for two years and preference shall be given to those institutions that can show a high risk of terror attack. JUSTICE PROGRAM SERVICES Of the foregoing appropriation item 768425, Justice Program Services, up to $5,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services to administer and distribute grants to state and local law enforcement agencies to implement or enhance body-worn camera programs. Of the foregoing appropriation item 768425, Justice Program Services, up to $4,531,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services to support anti-human trafficking efforts in the areas of prosecution, victim services to specifically include assistance for child victims, and prevention and policy to implement the priorities of the Governor's Ohio Human Trafficking Task Force. Of the foregoing appropriation item 768425, Justice Program Services, up to $4,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services to administer and distribute grants to state and local law enforcement agencies to assist local communities in reducing and preventing crime through the use of promising or proven crime reduction strategies. The use of the grants includes, but is not limited to, overtime, equipment, technical assistance, and analytical support to implement crime reduction strategies. Of the foregoing appropriation item 768425, Justice Program Services, up to $2,200,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support state and local law enforcement agencies in the recruitment, hiring, and training of qualified individuals to serve as peace officers; to support state and local first responder agencies in mental, physical, and emotional wellness; and to administer and distribute grants to state and local first responder agencies to assist in recruitment, retention, and wellness of their workforce. Of these funds, $1,200,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed as follows: (A) $500,000 in each fiscal year to First Responders' Bridge to pay for their programs supporting first responders suffering from Post Traumatic Stress Disorder, depression, anxiety, and other mental health conditions; (B) $500,000 in each fiscal year to Save A Warrior Foundation to pay for their programs supporting first responders suffering from Post Traumatic Stress Disorder, depression, anxiety, and other mental health conditions; and (C) $200,000 in each fiscal year to Tri-State Peer Support Team to pay the administrative costs of providing peer support and mental health services for first responders and related program development. Of the foregoing appropriation item 768425, Justice Program Services, up to $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services to distribute grants to state and/or local law enforcement to conduct investigations on sexual assault kit testing results and related expenses. Of the foregoing appropriation item 768425, Justice Program Services, up to $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services to competitively procure, directly from the manufacturer, a commercial off-the-shelf, completely in canal hearing protection product with a minimum noise reduction rating of 25 decibels and a maximum output of 80 decibels. The hearing protection shall be made available to any law enforcement agency in the state on a first-come, first-served basis as part of the Law Enforcement Hearing Protection Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 768425, Justice Program Services, up to $200,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Office of Criminal Justice Services to implement recommendations of the Governor's Warrant Task Force. Section 373.40. MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION The Director of Public Safety may deposit revenues to meet the cash needs of the Public Safety - Highway Purposes Fund (Fund 5TM0) established in section 4501.06 of the Revised Code, obtained under section 4503.02 of the Revised Code, less all other available cash. Revenue deposited pursuant to this paragraph shall support in part appropriations for the administration and enforcement of laws relative to the operation and registration of motor vehicles, for payment of highway obligations and other statutory highway purposes. Notwithstanding section 4501.03 of the Revised Code, the revenues shall be paid into Fund 5TM0 before any revenues obtained pursuant to section 4503.02 of the Revised Code are paid into any other fund. The deposit of revenues to meet the aforementioned cash needs shall be in approximately equal amounts on a monthly basis or as otherwise approved by the Director of Budget and Management. Prior to July 1 of each fiscal year, the Director of Public Safety shall submit a plan to the Director of Budget and Management requesting approval of the anticipated revenue amounts to be deposited into Fund 5TM0 pursuant to this paragraph. If during the fiscal year changes to the plan as approved by the Director of Budget and Management are necessary, the Director of Public Safety shall submit a revised plan to the Director of Budget and Management for approval prior to any change in the deposit of revenues. VALIDATION STICKER REQUIREMENTS Validation stickers are required for the annual registration of passenger, commercial, motorcycle, and other vehicles and are produced in accordance with section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. Notwithstanding section 4503.191 of the Revised Code, the Registrar of Motor Vehicles may adopt rules authorizing validation stickers to be produced at any location. OPERATING EXPENSE - HIGHWAY PATROL Any new revenue derived from an increase of the Highway Safety fee as prescribed in section 4503.10 of the Revised Code that becomes effective with any application for registration or registration renewal received on or after January 1, 2026, shall be used exclusively for the State Highway Patrol. Section 373.50. CASH BALANCE FUND REVIEW The Director of Public Safety shall review the cash balances for each fund in the State Highway Safety Fund Group, and may submit a request in writing to the Director of Budget and Management to transfer amounts from any fund in the State Highway Safety Fund Group to the credit of the Public Safety - Highway Purposes Fund (Fund 5TM0), as appropriate. Upon receipt of such a request, and subject to the approval of the Controlling Board, the Director of Budget and Management may make appropriate transfers as requested by the Director of Public Safety or as otherwise determined by the Director of Budget and Management. CASH TRANSFERS TO THE SECURITY, INVESTIGATIONS, AND POLICING FUND Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Budget and Management, upon written request of the Director of Public Safety and approval of the Controlling Board, may approve the transfer of cash from the State Highway Patrol Contraband, Forfeiture, and Other Fund (Fund 83C0) to the Security, Investigations and Policing Fund (Fund 8400). TRANSFER FROM STATE FIRE MARSHAL FUND TO EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY SERVICE AND REIMBURSEMENT FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $450,000 cash from the State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) to the Emergency Management Agency Service and Reimbursement Fund (Fund 4V30). Of the foregoing appropriation item 763662, EMA Service and Reimbursements, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Ohio Task Force One – Urban Search and Rescue Unit to pay for its operating expenses and developing new programs. Of the foregoing appropriation item 763662, EMA Service and Reimbursements, $200,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Ohio Task Force One – Urban Search and Rescue Unit, other similar urban search and rescue units around the state, and for maintenance of the statewide fire emergency response plan by an entity recognized by the Ohio Emergency Management Agency. TRANSFER FROM CONTROLLING BOARD EMERGENCY PURPOSES/CONTINGENCIES FUND TO STATE DISASTER RELIEF FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $1,000,000 cash from the Controlling Board Emergency Purposes/Contingencies Fund (Fund 5KM0) to the State Disaster Relief Fund (Fund 5330). STATE DISASTER RELIEF The State Disaster Relief Fund (Fund 5330) may accept transfers of cash or appropriations from Controlling Board appropriation items for the Ohio Emergency Management Agency disaster response costs and disaster program management costs, and may also be used for the following purposes: (A) To accept transfers of cash or appropriations from Controlling Board appropriation items for Ohio Emergency Management Agency recovery and mitigation program match costs to reimburse eligible local governments and private nonprofit organizations for costs related to disasters; (B) To accept transfers of cash or appropriations from Controlling Board appropriation items to cover costs incurred and to reimburse government entities for Emergency Management Assistance Compact (EMAC) missions; (C) To accept disaster related reimbursement from federal, state, and local governments. The Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from reimbursements received by this fund to other funds of the state from which transfers were originally approved by the Controlling Board. (D) To accept transfers of cash or appropriations from Controlling Board appropriation items to fund the State Disaster Relief Program, for disasters that qualify for the program by written authorization of the Governor, and the State Individual Assistance Program for disasters that have been declared by the federal Small Business Administration and that qualify for the program by written authorization from the Governor. (E) The State Disaster Relief Fund (Fund 5330) may accept, hold, administer, and expend any cash received from a gift, donation, bequest, devise, or contribution. DRUG LAW ENFORCEMENT FUND Notwithstanding division (D) of section 5502.68 of the Revised Code, in each of fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the cumulative amount of funding provided to any single drug task force out of the Drug Law Enforcement Fund (Fund 5ET0) may not exceed $500,000 in any calendar year. SARA TITLE III HAZMAT PLANNING The SARA Title III Hazmat Planning Fund (Fund 6810) is entitled to receive grant funds from the Emergency Response Commission to implement the Emergency Management Agency's responsibilities under Chapter 3750. of the Revised Code. Section 373.60. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING INCREASES Notwithstanding division (D) of section 127.14 and division (B) of section 131.35 of the Revised Code, except for the General Revenue Fund, the Controlling Board may, upon the request of either the Director of Budget and Management, or the Department of Public Safety with the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, authorize expenditures in excess of appropriations and transfer appropriations, as necessary, for any fund used by the Department of Public Safety, to assist in paying the costs of increases in employee compensation that have occurred pursuant to collective bargaining agreements under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code and, for exempt employees, under section 124.152 of the Revised Code. Any money approved for expenditure under this paragraph is hereby appropriated. Section 375.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PUC PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION OF OHIO B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4A30 870614 Grade Crossing Protection Devices - State $1,200,000 $1,200,000 D 4L80 870617 Pipeline Safety - State $350,000 $360,000 E 5610 870606 Power Siting Board $1,100,000 $1,100,000 F 5F60 870622 Utility and Railroad Regulation $45,851,137 $47,757,281 G 5F60 870624 NARUC/NRRI Subsidy $45,340 $45,340 H 5LT0 870640 Intrastate Registration $230,298 $237,207 I 5LT0 870641 Unified Carrier Registration $451,794 $465,348 J 5LT0 870643 Non-Hazardous Materials Civil Forfeiture $278,202 $286,548 K 5LT0 870644 Hazardous Materials Civil Forfeiture $1,167,567 $1,178,594 L 5LT0 870645 Motor Carrier Enforcement $5,680,962 $5,786,733 M 5Q50 870626 Telecommunications Relay Service $1,020,000 $1,020,000 N 5QR0 870646 Underground Facilities Protection $20,000 $20,000 O 5QS0 870647 Underground Facilities Administration $239,729 $246,776 P Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $57,635,029 $59,703,827 Q Federal Fund Group R 3330 870601 Gas Pipeline Safety $1,683,226 $1,733,723 S 3500 870608 Motor Carrier Safety $16,103,547 $16,288,415 T 3500 870648 Motor Carrier Administration High Priority Activities Grants and Cooperative Agreements $750,000 $750,000 U 3ID0 870649 Department of Energy Grid Resiliency $7,122,706 $7,122,706 V 3IE0 870650 Hazardous Material Commercial Vehicle Inspection Grants $300,000 $300,000 W Federal Fund Group Total $25,959,479 $26,194,844 X TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $83,594,508 $85,898,671 Section 377.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A PWC PUBLIC WORKS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 150904 Conservation General Obligation Bond Debt Service $46,500,000 $39,000,000 D GRF 150907 Infrastructure Improvement General Obligation Bond Debt Service $225,000,000 $240,000,000 E General Revenue Fund Total $271,500,000 $279,000,000 F Capital Projects Fund Group G 7038 150321 State Capital Improvements Program - Operating Expenses $974,304 $991,125 H 7056 150403 Clean Ohio Conservation Operating $324,768 $330,375 I Capital Projects Fund Group Total $1,299,072 $1,321,500 J TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $272,799,072 $280,321,500 Section 377.20. CONSERVATION GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 150904, Conservation General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on obligations issued under sections 151.01 and 151.09 of the Revised Code. INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENT GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 150907, Infrastructure Improvement General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on obligations issued under sections 151.01 and 151.08 of the Revised Code. CLEAN OHIO CONSERVATION OPERATING The foregoing appropriation item 150403, Clean Ohio Conservation Operating, shall be used by the Ohio Public Works Commission in administering Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) projects pursuant to sections 164.20 to 164.27 of the Revised Code. STATE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM - OPERATING EXPENSES The foregoing appropriation item 150321, State Capital Improvements Program - Operating Expenses, shall be used by the Ohio Public Works Commission to administer the State Capital Improvement Program under sections 164.01 to 164.16 of the Revised Code. DISTRICT ADMINISTRATION COSTS The Director of the Public Works Commission is authorized to create a District Administration Costs Program from proceeds of the Capital Improvements Fund and Local Transportation Improvement Program Fund. The program shall be used to provide for the direct costs of district administration of the nineteen public works districts. Districts choosing to participate in the program shall only expend State Capital Improvements Fund moneys for State Capital Improvements Fund costs and Local Transportation Improvement Program Fund moneys for Local Transportation Improvement Program Fund costs. The District Administration Costs Program account shall not exceed $1,235,000 per fiscal year. Each public works district may be eligible for up to $65,000 per fiscal year from its district allocation as provided in sections 164.08 and 164.14 of the Revised Code. The Director, by rule, shall define allowable and non-allowable costs for the purpose of the District Administration Costs Program. Non-allowable costs include indirect costs, elected official salaries and benefits, and project-specific costs. No district public works committee may participate in the District Administration Costs Program without the approval of those costs by the district public works committee under section 164.04 of the Revised Code. NATURAL RESOURCE ASSISTANCE COUNCIL ADMINISTRATION COSTS The Director of the Public Works Commission is authorized to create a District Administration Costs Program for districts represented by natural resource assistance councils. The program shall be funded from proceeds of the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund. The program shall be used by natural resource assistance councils to provide for administration costs of the nineteen natural resource assistance councils for the direct costs of council administration. Councils choosing to participate in this program may be eligible for up to $15,000 per fiscal year from their district allocation as provided in section 164.27 of the Revised Code. The Director, by rule, shall define allowable and non-allowable costs for the purpose of the District Administration Costs Program. Non-allowable costs include indirect costs, elected official salaries and benefits, and project specific costs. Section 379.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A RAC STATE RACING COMMISSION B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5620 875601 Thoroughbred Development $870,555 $873,434 D 5630 875602 Standardbred Development $1,246,399 $1,246,970 E 5650 875604 Racing Commission Operating $3,473,682 $3,503,170 F 5JK0 875610 Horse Racing Development - Casino $10,499,999 $10,499,999 G 5NL0 875611 Revenue Redistribution $12,800,000 $12,800,000 H Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $28,890,635 $28,923,573 I Fiduciary Fund Group J 5C40 875607 Simulcast Horse Racing Purse $3,921,226 $3,921,226 K Fiduciary Fund Group Total $3,921,226 $3,921,226 L Holding Account Fund Group M R021 875605 Bond Reimbursements $108,700 $108,700 N Holding Account Fund Group Total $108,700 $108,700 O TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $32,920,561 $32,953,499 Section 381.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 235321 Operating Expenses $8,750,000 $9,250,000 D GRF 235402 Sea Grants $308,000 $308,000 E GRF 235406 Articulation and Transfer $2,269,500 $2,314,890 F GRF 235408 Midwest Higher Education Compact $115,000 $115,000 G GRF 235413 Computer Science $4,004,863 $4,006,508 H GRF 235414 Grants and Scholarship Administration $922,538 $985,378 I GRF 235417 Technology Maintenance and Operations $4,520,396 $4,528,397 J GRF 235425 Ohio Work Ready Grant $10,500,000 $10,500,000 K GRF 235428 Appalachian New Economy Workforce Partnership $3,955,000 $3,955,000 L GRF 235438 Choose Ohio First Scholarship $32,000,000 $32,000,000 M GRF 235443 Aspire - State $6,322,267 $0 N GRF 235444 Ohio Technical Centers $22,138,000 $22,138,000 O GRF 235450 Military and Veterans Offices $1,144,000 $1,144,000 P GRF 235474 Area Health Education Centers Program Support $1,899,000 $1,899,000 Q GRF 235475 Campus Security Support Program $4,000,000 $0 R GRF 235476 Campus Student Safety Grant Program $1,000,000 $1,000,000 S GRF 235492 Campus Safety and Training $200,000 $200,000 T GRF 235501 State Share of Instruction $2,156,383,406 $2,177,772,240 U GRF 235504 War Orphans and Severely Disabled Veterans' Children Scholarships $25,000,000 $30,000,000 V GRF 235507 OhioLINK $6,447,000 $6,447,000 W GRF 235508 Air Force Institute of Technology $2,000,000 $2,000,000 X GRF 235510 Ohio Supercomputer Center $5,086,000 $5,086,000 Y GRF 235511 The Ohio State University Extension Service $25,504,000 $25,504,000 Z GRF 235514 Central State Supplement $12,768,910 $13,151,977 AA GRF 235515 Case Western Reserve University School of Medicine $2,100,000 $2,100,000 AB GRF 235519 Family Practice $3,098,000 $3,098,000 AC GRF 235520 Shawnee State Supplement $12,000,000 $12,000,000 AD GRF 235525 Geriatric Medicine $511,000 $511,000 AE GRF 235526 Primary Care Residencies $1,468,000 $1,468,000 AF GRF 235530 Governor's Merit Scholarship $47,000,000 $70,000,000 AG GRF 235533 Program and Project Support $9,435,000 $1,050,000 AH GRF 235535 Ohio State Agricultural Research $37,169,000 $37,169,000 AI GRF 235536 The Ohio State University Clinical Teaching $9,461,000 $9,461,000 AJ GRF 235537 University of Cincinnati Clinical Teaching $8,085,000 $8,085,000 AK GRF 235538 University of Toledo Clinical Teaching $6,065,000 $6,065,000 AL GRF 235539 Wright State University Clinical Teaching $4,447,000 $4,447,000 AM GRF 235540 Ohio University Clinical Teaching $2,849,000 $2,849,000 AN GRF 235541 Northeast Ohio Medical University Clinical Teaching $2,930,000 $2,930,000 AO GRF 235543 Kent State University College of Podiatric Medicine Clinic Subsidy $500,000 $500,000 AP GRF 235546 Central State Agricultural Research and Development $5,828,000 $5,828,000 AQ GRF 235548 Central State Cooperative Extension Services $5,168,000 $5,168,000 AR GRF 235552 Capital Component $1,236,561 $1,236,561 AS GRF 235555 Library Depositories $700,000 $500,000 AT GRF 235556 Ohio Academic Resources Network $3,568,000 $3,568,000 AU GRF 235558 Long-term Care Research $318,000 $318,000 AV GRF 235563 Ohio College Opportunity Grant $220,600,000 $207,400,000 AW GRF 235569 The Ohio State University College of Veterinary Medicine Supplement $15,000,000 $15,000,000 AX GRF 235572 The Ohio State University Clinic Support $750,000 $750,000 AY GRF 235578 Federal Research Network $5,099,000 $5,099,000 AZ GRF 235585 Educator Preparation Programs $600,000 $600,000 BA GRF 235591 Co-Op Internship Program $1,065,000 $1,065,000 BB GRF 235595 Commercial Truck Driver Student Aid Program $3,000,000 $3,000,000 BC GRF 235599 National Guard Scholarship Program $18,399,750 $18,399,750 BD GRF 2355A4 Ohio Higher Education Public Policy Research Consortium $500,000 $500,000 BE GRF 235909 Higher Education General Obligation Bond Debt Service $250,000,000 $210,000,000 BF General Revenue Fund Total $3,016,188,191 $2,994,470,701 BG Dedicated Purpose Fund Group BH 2200 235614 Program Approval and Reauthorization $769,126 $789,679 BI 4560 235603 Sales and Services $129,725 $133,017 BJ 4E80 235602 Higher Educational Facility Commission Administration $69,839 $73,807 BK 5AH1 235688 Super RAPIDS $10,000,000 $0 BL 5CJ1 2356A2 Strategic Square Footage Reduction $82,650,000 $0 BM 5D40 235675 Conference/Special Purposes $125,000 $125,000 BN 5FR0 235650 State and Non-Federal Grants and Awards $1,405,944 $1,412,670 BO 5P30 235663 Variable Savings Plan $8,522,034 $8,522,034 BP 5YD0 235494 Second Chance Grant Program $2,000,000 $2,000,000 BQ 5ZD0 235426 Rural Practice Incentive Program $1,500,000 $1,500,000 BR 5ZY0 235592 Grow Your Own Teacher Program $2,500,000 $2,500,000 BS 6450 235664 Guaranteed Savings Plan $1,110,131 $1,110,132 BT 6820 235606 Nursing Loan Program $1,203,730 $1,210,344 BU Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $111,985,529 $19,376,683 BV Bond Research and Development Fund Group BW 7014 235639 Research Incentive Third Frontier - Tax $8,000,000 $8,000,000 BX Bond Research and Development Fund Group Total $8,000,000 $8,000,000 BY Federal Fund Group BZ 3120 235611 Gear-up Grant $2,956,000 $2,956,000 CA 3120 235612 Carl D. Perkins Grant/Plan Administration $1,371,939 $1,388,525 CB 3120 235641 Aspire - Federal $18,996,799 $0 CC 3120 235669 Industry Credential Transfer Assurance Guides Initiative $300,000 $300,000 CD 3BG0 235651 Gear Up Grant Scholarships $3,100,000 $3,100,000 CE 3N60 235658 John R. Justice Student Loan Repayment Program $128,000 $128,000 CF Federal Fund Group Total $26,852,738 $7,872,525 CG TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $3,163,026,458 $3,029,719,909 Section 381.20. OPERATING EXPENSES (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235321, Operating Expenses, up to $1,200,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education, in consultation with OH-TECH, to enhance security operations and services. (B) Enhanced security operations and services shall benefit all members of OH-TECH and may include, but shall not be limited to: (1) Establishing an enterprise security operations center; (2) Configuration management in the area of data loss prevention; (3) Endpoint patch and compliance; (4) Log aggregation; (5) Web application firewall; (6) Vulnerability management across the consortium; (7) Other critical security enhancement services as determined appropriate by the Chancellor. (C) The Ohio Academic Resource Network (OARnet) and the Ohio Supercomputer Center may use a portion of these funds to enhance their respective network security operations to better serve clients who store sensitive data that is subject to the highest data privacy standards imposed by federal regulations and national research organizations, including, but not limited to, the National Institutes of Health, the National Science Foundation, and the Department of Defense. SEA GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 235402, Sea Grants, shall be used to match federal dollars and leverage additional support by The Ohio State University's Sea Grant program, including Stone Laboratory, for research, education, and outreach to enhance the economic value, public utilization, and responsible management of Lake Erie and Ohio's coastal resources. Section 381.30. ARTICULATION AND TRANSFER The foregoing appropriation item 235406, Articulation and Transfer, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to maintain and expand the work of the Articulation and Transfer Network Advisory Council to develop a system of transfer policies to ensure that students at state institutions of higher education can transfer and have coursework apply to their majors and degrees at any other state institution of higher education without unnecessary duplication or institutional barriers under sections 3333.16, 3333.161, 3333.162, and 3333.164 of the Revised Code. Section 381.40. MIDWEST HIGHER EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE COMPACT The foregoing appropriation item 235408, Midwest Higher Education Compact, shall be distributed by the Chancellor of Higher Education under section 3333.40 of the Revised Code. Section 381.80. COMPUTER SCIENCE The foregoing appropriation item 235413, Computer Science, shall be used to administer and award grants under the Teach CS Grant Program established in section 3333.129 of the Revised Code. Section 381.90. GRANTS AND SCHOLARSHIP ADMINISTRATION The foregoing appropriation item 235414, Grants and Scholarship Administration, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to manage and administer student financial aid programs created by the General Assembly and grants for which the Department of Higher Education is responsible. The appropriation item also shall be used to support all state financial aid audits and student financial aid programs created by Congress, and to provide fiscal and administrative services for the Ohio National Guard Scholarship Program. Section 381.110. TECHNOLOGY MAINTENANCE AND OPERATIONS The foregoing appropriation item 235417, Technology Maintenance and Operations, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support the development and implementation of information technology solutions designed to improve the performance and capacity of the Department of Higher Education. The information technology solutions may be provided by the Ohio Technology Consortium (OH-TECH). Of the foregoing appropriation item 235417, Technology Maintenance and Operations, a portion in each fiscal year may be used by the Chancellor to support the continued implementation of eStudent Services, a consortium organized under division (T) of section 3333.04 of the Revised Code to expand access to dual enrollment opportunities for high school students, continue the support of the statewide eTutoring program, and for any other strategic priorities of the Chancellor. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235417, Technology Maintenance and Operations, a portion in each fiscal year shall be used by the Chancellor to implement a high priority data warehouse, advanced analytics, and visualization integration services associated with the Higher Education Information (HEI) system. The services may be facilitated by OH-TECH. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235417, Technology Maintenance and Operations, $150,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support Ohio Reach to provide mentoring and support services to former foster youth attending college. Section 381.160. OHIO WORK READY GRANT (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235425, Ohio Work Ready Grant, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to award grants according to the section of this act entitled "AI INTEGRATION IN COMMUNITY COLLEGES GRANT PROGRAM." (B) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 235425, Ohio Work Ready Grant, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to establish and operate the Ohio Work Ready Grant Program pursuant to section 3333.24 of the Revised Code. Section 381.165. AI INTEGRATION IN COMMUNITY COLLEGES GRANT PROGRAM (A) The Chancellor of Higher Education shall create the Artificial Intelligence Integration in Community Colleges Pilot Grant Program to provide financial assistance to community colleges to implement artificial intelligence initiatives. (B) The Chancellor shall award five competitive grants of $100,000 each in each fiscal year to community colleges, as defined in section 3333.168 of the Revised Code. (C) The Chancellor shall establish procedures and criteria for awarding the grants and shall give preference to community colleges that show a strong commitment and track record to integrating artificial intelligence into education, workforce development, and industry alignment. (D) Eligible uses of the grant funds include all of the following: (1) Integrating artificial intelligence curriculum into credential programs; (2) Establishing artificial intelligence-based College Credit Plus Program offerings; (3) Training faculty and staff on the uses of artificial intelligence technologies relevant to local industry or state needs; (4) Supporting students with practical artificial intelligence skills through certifications and project-based learning; (5) Purchasing artificial intelligence hardware and software; (6) Utilizing artificial intelligence in streamlining administrative functions and student services; (7) Contracting with a vendor to provide any or all of the services described in this division. (E) The Chancellor shall monitor the performance of each grant recipient in meeting the objectives of the program. (F) Upon completion of the program, the Chancellor shall submit a report with legislative recommendations for further development of the program to the General Assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. Section 381.180. APPALACHIAN NEW ECONOMY WORKFORCE PARTNERSHIP The foregoing appropriation item 235428, Appalachian New Economy Workforce Partnership, shall be distributed to Ohio University's Voinovich School to continue a multi-campus and multi-agency coordinated effort to link Appalachia to the new economy. Ohio University shall use these funds to provide leadership in the development and implementation of initiatives in the areas of entrepreneurship, management, education, and technology. Section 381.190. CHOOSE OHIO FIRST SCHOLARSHIP The foregoing appropriation item 235438, Choose Ohio First Scholarship, shall be used to operate the program prescribed in sections 3333.60 to 3333.69 of the Revised Code. During each fiscal year, the Chancellor of Higher Education, as soon as possible after cancellation, may certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of canceled prior-year encumbrances in appropriation item 235438, Choose Ohio First Scholarship. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash, up to the certified amount, from the General Revenue Fund to the Choose Ohio First Scholarship Reserve Fund (Fund 5PV0). Section 381.200. ASPIRE The foregoing appropriation item 235443, Aspire - State, shall be used to support the Aspire program. The supported programs shall satisfy the state match and maintenance of effort requirements for the state-administered grant program in fiscal year 2026. The funds may be used to support students that speak English as their second language. Section 381.210. OHIO TECHNICAL CENTERS FUNDING The foregoing appropriation item 235444, Ohio Technical Centers, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support post-secondary adult career-technical education and secondary students enrolling in Ohio Technical Center programs pursuant to section 3313.901 of the Revised Code. The Chancellor shall provide coordination for Ohio Technical Centers through program approval processes, data collection of program and student outcomes, and subsidy disbursements from the foregoing appropriation item 235444, Ohio Technical Centers. (A)(1) As soon as possible in each fiscal year, in accordance with instructions of the Chancellor, each Ohio Technical Center shall report its actual data, consistent with the definitions in the Higher Education Information (HEI) system's files, to the Chancellor. (a) In defining the number of full-time equivalent students for state subsidy purposes, the Chancellor shall exclude all students who are not residents of Ohio. (b) A full-time equivalent student shall be defined as a student who completes 450 hours. Those students that complete some portion of 450 hours shall be counted as a partial full-time equivalent for funding purposes, while students that complete more than 450 hours shall be counted as proportionally greater than one full-time equivalent. (c) In calculating each Ohio Technical Center's full-time equivalent students, the Chancellor shall use a three-year average. (d) Ohio Technical Centers shall operate with, or be an active candidate for, accreditation by an accreditor authorized by the United States Department of Education to be eligible to receive subsidies from the foregoing appropriation item 235444, Ohio Technical Centers. (2) In each fiscal year, 25 per cent of the allocation for Ohio Technical Centers shall be distributed based on the proportion of each Center's full-time equivalent students to the total full-time equivalent students who complete a post-secondary technical workforce training program approved by the Chancellor with a grade of C or better or a grade of pass if the program is evaluated on a pass/fail basis. (3) In each fiscal year, 20 per cent of the allocation for Ohio Technical Centers shall be distributed based on the proportion of each Center's full-time equivalent students to the total full-time equivalent students who complete 50 per cent of a program of study as a measure of student retention. (4) In each fiscal year, 50 per cent of the allocation for Ohio Technical Centers shall be distributed based on the proportion of each Center's full-time equivalent students to the total full-time equivalent students who have found employment, entered military service, or enrolled in additional post-secondary education and training in accordance with the placement definitions of the Strengthening Career and Technical Education for the 21st Century Act, 20 U.S.C. 2323 (Perkins). The calculation for eligible full-time equivalent students shall be based on the per cent of Perkins placements for students who have completed at least 50 per cent of a program of study. (5) In each fiscal year, five per cent of the allocation for Ohio Technical Centers shall be distributed based on the proportion of each Center's full-time equivalent students to the total full-time equivalent students who have earned a credential from an industry-recognized third party. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235444, Ohio Technical Centers, up to 2.38 per cent in each fiscal year may be distributed by the Chancellor to the Ohio Central School System, up to $48,000 in each fiscal year may be utilized for assistance for Ohio Technical Centers, and up to $2,000,000 in each fiscal year may be distributed by the Chancellor to Ohio Technical Centers that provide customized training and business consultation services with matching local dollars, with preference to industries on the in-demand jobs list created under section 6301.11 of the Revised Code, industries in regionally emerging fields, or local businesses and industries. Each center meeting this requirement shall receive at least $25,000 but not more than a maximum amount determined by the Chancellor. (C) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 235444, Ohio Technical Centers, in each fiscal year shall be distributed in accordance with division (A) of this section. Section 381.215. MILITARY AND VETERANS OFFICES (A) The foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military and Veterans Offices, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support higher education institutions that are members of the Ohio Veterans Education Council. The Chancellor may consult with the Director of Veterans Services as needed. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military and Veterans Offices, up to $213,750 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Chancellor to provide awards of $2,500 per student to up to six students serving as a Military Community Advocate at an Ohio Veterans Education Council-member public university and up to three students serving as a Military Community Advocate at an Ohio Veterans Education Council-member public community college or private nonprofit university or college. (C) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military and Veterans Offices, $255,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for grants for military and veterans offices at institutions of higher education to support growth in private philanthropy, in collaboration with the National Veterans Leadership Foundation. (D) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military and Veterans Offices, $91,800 in each fiscal year shall be used to sponsor staff from military and veterans offices at institutions of higher education to attend the National Veterans Leadership Foundation's Advancement Institute. (E) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 235450, Military and Veterans Offices, shall be used to do all of the following: (1) Support the administrative costs of the National Veterans Leadership Foundation; (2) Create a web site to connect veterans to programs and offerings at all Ohio Veterans Education Council-member colleges and universities; (3) Administer membership and Ohio Purple Star status; (4) Facilitate information sharing; (5) Support any other expenses as determined appropriate by the Chancellor, in consultation with the National Veterans Leadership Foundation. Section 381.220. AREA HEALTH EDUCATION CENTERS PROGRAM SUPPORT (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235474, Area Health Education Centers Program Support, $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Ohio Council for Home Care and Hospice to establish and administer the Home Care and Hospice Workforce Program to enhance the nursing workforce across the state. Of these funds: (1) $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide competitive scholarships to nursing students who are in their last year of study. The scholarship amounts for each student shall be $20,000 for registered nurse (RN) and Bachelor of Science in Nursing (BSN) students, $10,000 for licensed practical nurse (LPN) to RN bridge students, and $6,000 for LPN students. The Council, in collaboration with the Chancellor of Higher Education, shall develop guidelines for the scholarships and procedures for making an award. (2) $400,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide competitive grants to home care agencies to mentor recent nursing graduates. Grant amounts shall be $20,000 for each nurse that receives training and mentoring during the first three months of employment. The Council, in collaboration with the Chancellor, shall develop guidelines for the grants and procedures for making an award. (3) $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to administer the program. (B) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 235474, Area Health Education Centers Program Support, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support the medical school regional area health education centers' educational programs for the continued support of medical and other health professions education and for support of the Area Health Education Center Program. CAMPUS SECURITY SUPPORT PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235475, Campus Security Support Program, shall be distributed by the Chancellor of Higher Education to institutionally sanctioned student organizations, located on or off campus, affiliated with communities that are at risk for increased threats of violent crime, terror attacks, hate crimes, or harassment to enhance security measures and increase student safety at institutions of higher education throughout the state. A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 235475, Campus Security Support Program, may be used by the Chancellor to administer the program. CAMPUS STUDENT SAFETY GRANT PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235476, Campus Student Safety Grant Program, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support the Campus Student Safety Grant Program pursuant to section 3333.80 of the Revised Code. CAMPUS SECURITY SUPPORT AND STUDENT SAFETY GRANT REPORTS Not later than July 1, 2026, the Chancellor of Higher Education shall submit reports regarding the programs funded under the foregoing appropriation items 235475, Campus Security Support Program, and 235476, Campus Student Safety Grant Program, to the chairpersons of the committees of each house that considers higher education legislation. Each report shall include, but not be limited to, information about the number of award recipients and how the funds have been spent under each program. Section 381.230. CAMPUS SAFETY AND TRAINING The foregoing appropriation item 235492, Campus Safety and Training, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education for the purpose of developing model best practices for preventing and responding to sexual violence on campus. The Chancellor, in consultation with state institutions of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code and private nonprofit institutions of higher education holding certificates of authorization under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, shall continue to develop model best practices in line with emerging trends, research, and evidence-based training for preventing and responding to sexual violence and protecting students and staff who are victims of sexual violence on campus. The Chancellor shall convene state institutions of higher education and private nonprofit institutions of higher education in the training and implementation of best practices regarding campus sexual violence. Section 381.240. STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FORMULAS The Chancellor of Higher Education shall establish procedures to allocate the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, based on the formulas detailed in this section that utilize the enrollment, course completion, degree attainment, and student achievement factors reported annually by each state institution of higher education participating in the Higher Education Information (HEI) system. A state institution that does not report data for a full academic year for any of the years included in the three-year reporting period for a fiscal year's state share of instruction allocations shall not receive an allocation for that fiscal year unless the Chancellor determines that exceptional circumstances warrant the institution receiving a full or partial allocation. (A) FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT (FTE) ENROLLMENTS AND COURSE COMPLETIONS (1) As soon as possible during each fiscal year of the biennium ending June 30, 2027, in accordance with instructions of the Department of Higher Education, each state institution of higher education shall report its actual data, consistent with the definitions in the Higher Education Information (HEI) system's enrollment files, to the Chancellor. (2) In defining the number of full-time equivalent students for state subsidy instructional cost purposes, the Chancellor shall exclude all undergraduate students who are not residents of Ohio or who do not meet the definition of residency for state subsidy and tuition surcharge purposes, except those charged in-state fees in accordance with reciprocity agreements made under section 3333.17 of the Revised Code or employer contracts entered into under section 3333.32 of the Revised Code. (B) TOTAL COSTS PER FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT STUDENT For purposes of calculating state share of instruction allocations, the total instructional costs per full-time equivalent student shall be: 1 2 3 A Model Fiscal Year 2026 Fiscal Year 2027 B ARTS AND HUMANITIES 1 $12,218 $12,710 C ARTS AND HUMANITIES 2 $16,282 $16,938 D ARTS AND HUMANITIES 3 $20,250 $21,066 E ARTS AND HUMANITIES 4 $28,250 $29,388 F ARTS AND HUMANITIES 5 $45,031 $46,846 G ARTS AND HUMANITIES 6 $41,346 $43,013 H BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 1 $12,297 $12,793 I BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 2 $12,723 $13,235 J BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 3 $15,491 $16,116 K BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 4 $16,941 $17,623 L BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 5 $23,293 $24,232 M BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 6 $28,346 $29,488 N BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 7 $34,425 $35,812 O DOCTORAL 1 $52,586 $54,705 P DOCTORAL 2 $57,637 $59,960 Q SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 1 $12,059 $12,545 R SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 2 $15,367 $15,986 S SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 3 $17,403 $18,105 T SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 4 $19,364 $20,144 U SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 5 $24,715 $25,711 V SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 6 $21,736 $22,612 W SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 7 $28,839 $30,001 X SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 8 $42,767 $44,491 Y SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 9 $60,542 $62,982 Doctoral I and Doctoral II models shall be allocated in accordance with division (D)(2) of this section. Medical I and Medical II models shall be allocated in accordance with divisions (D)(3) and (D)(4) of this section. (C) SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICAL, AND GRADUATE WEIGHTS For the purpose of implementing the recommendations of the 2006 State Share of Instruction Consultation and the Higher Education Funding Study Council that priority be given to maintaining state support for science, technology, engineering, mathematics, medicine, and graduate programs, the costs in division (B) of this section shall be weighted by the amounts provided below: 1 2 3 A Model Fiscal Year 2026 Fiscal Year 2027 B ARTS AND HUMANITIES 1 1.0000 1.0000 C ARTS AND HUMANITIES 2 1.0000 1.0000 D ARTS AND HUMANITIES 3 1.0000 1.0000 E ARTS AND HUMANITIES 4 1.0000 1.0000 F ARTS AND HUMANITIES 5 1.0425 1.0425 G ARTS AND HUMANITIES 6 1.0425 1.0425 H BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 1 1.0000 1.0000 I BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 2 1.0000 1.0000 J BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 3 1.0000 1.0000 K BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 4 1.0000 1.0000 L BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 5 1.0425 1.0425 M BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 6 1.0425 1.0425 N BUSINESS, EDUCATION & SOCIAL SCIENCES 7 1.0425 1.0425 O DOCTORAL 1 1.0000 1.0000 P DOCTORAL 2 1.0000 1.0000 Q SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 1 1.0000 1.0000 R SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 2 1.0017 1.0017 S SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 3 1.6150 1.6150 T SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 4 1.6920 1.6920 U SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 5 1.4222 1.4222 V SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 6 1.8798 1.8798 W SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 7 1.4380 1.4380 X SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 8 1.5675 1.5675 Y SCIENCE, TECHNOLOGY, ENGINEERING, MATHEMATICS, MEDICINE 9 1.1361 1.1361 (D) CALCULATION OF STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FORMULA ENTITLEMENTS AND ADJUSTMENTS FOR UNIVERSITIES (1) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, 50 per cent of the appropriation for universities, as established in division (B)(1)(b) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for support of associate, baccalaureate, master's, and professional level degree attainment. The degree attainment funding shall be allocated to universities in proportion to each campus's share of the total statewide degrees granted, weighted by the cost of the degree programs. The degree cost calculations shall include the model cost weights for the science, technology, engineering, mathematics, and medicine models as established in division (C) of this section. For degrees including credits earned at multiple institutions, degree attainment funding shall be allocated to universities in proportion to each campus's share of the student-specific cost of earned credits for the degree. Each institution shall receive its prorated share of degree funding for credits earned at that institution. Cost of credits not earned at a university main or regional campus shall be credited to the degree-granting institution for the first degree earned by a student at each degree level. The cost credited to the degree-granting institution shall not be eligible for at-risk weights and shall be limited to 12.5 per cent of the student-specific degree costs. However, the 12.5 per cent limitation shall not apply if the student transferred 12 or fewer credits into the degree granting institution. In calculating the subsidy entitlements for degree attainment for universities, the Chancellor shall use the following count of degrees and degree costs: (a) The subsidy eligible undergraduate degrees shall be defined as follows: (i) The subsidy eligible degrees conferred to students identified as residents of the state of Ohio in any term of their studies, as reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system student enrollment file, shall be weighted by a factor of 1. (ii) The subsidy eligible degrees conferred to students identified as out-of-state residents during all terms of their studies, as reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system student enrollment file, who remain in the state of Ohio at least one year after graduation, as calculated based on the three-year average in-state residency rate using the Unemployment Wage data for out-of-state graduates at each institution, shall be weighted by a factor of 50 per cent. (iii) Subsidy eligible associate degrees are defined as those earned by students attending any state-supported university main or regional campus. (b) In calculating each campus's count of degrees, the Chancellor shall use the three-year average associate, baccalaureate, master's, and professional degrees awarded for the most recent completed three-year period that is practicable as agreed to by the Inter-University Council and the Chancellor. (i) If a student is awarded an associate degree and, subsequently, is awarded a baccalaureate degree, the amount funded for the baccalaureate degree shall be limited to either the difference in cost between the cost of the baccalaureate degree and the cost of the associate degree paid previously, or if the associate degree has a higher cost than the baccalaureate degree, the cost of the credits earned by the student after the associate degree was awarded. (ii) If a student earns an associate degree then, subsequently, earns a baccalaureate degree, the associate degree granting institution shall only receive the prorated share of the baccalaureate degree funding for the credits earned at that institution after the associate degree is awarded. (iii) If a student earns more than one degree at the same institution at the same degree level in the same fiscal year, the funding for the highest cost degree shall be prorated among institutions based on where the credits were earned and additional degrees shall be funded at 25 per cent of the cost of the degrees. (c) Associate degrees and baccalaureate degrees earned by a student defined as at-risk based on academic under-preparation, age, minority status, financial status, or first generation post-secondary status based on neither parent completing any education beyond high school, shall be defined as degrees earned by an at-risk student and shall be weighted by the following: A student-specific degree completion weight, where the weight is calculated based on the at-risk factors of the individual student, determined by calculating the difference between the percentage of students with each risk factor who earned a degree and the percentage of non-at-risk students who earned a degree. (2) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, up to 11.78 per cent of the appropriation for universities, as established in division (B)(1)(b) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for support of doctoral programs to implement the funding recommendations made by representatives of the universities. The amount so reserved shall be referred to as the doctoral set-aside. In each fiscal year, the doctoral set-aside funding allocation shall be allocated to universities as follows: (a) 25 per cent of the doctoral set-aside shall be allocated to universities in proportion to their share of the statewide total earnings of each state institution's three-year average course completions. The subsidy eligible enrollments by model shall equal only those FTE students who successfully complete the course as defined and reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system course enrollment file. Course completion earnings shall be determined by multiplying the amounts listed above in divisions (B) and (C) of this section by the subsidy-eligible FTEs for the most recent completed three-year period that is practicable as agreed to by the Inter-University Council and the Chancellor for all doctoral enrollments in graduate-level models. (b) 50 per cent of the doctoral set-aside shall be allocated to universities in proportion to each campus's share of the total statewide doctoral degrees, weighted by the cost of the doctoral discipline. In calculating each campus's doctoral degrees the Chancellor shall use the three-year average doctoral degrees awarded for the most recent completed three-year period that is practicable as agreed to by the Inter-University Council and the Chancellor. (c) 25 per cent of the doctoral set-aside shall be allocated to universities in proportion to their share of research grant activity. Funding for this component shall be allocated to eligible universities in proportion to their share of research grant activity published by the National Science Foundation. Grant awards from the Department of Health and Human Services shall be weighted at 50 per cent. (3) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, 6.41 per cent of the appropriation for universities, as established in division (B)(1)(b) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for support of Medical II FTEs. The amount so reserved shall be referred to as the medical II set-aside. The medical II set-aside shall be allocated to universities in proportion to their share of the statewide total of each state institution's three-year average Medical II FTEs as calculated in division (A) of this section. In calculating the core subsidy entitlements for Medical II models only, students repeating terms may be no more than five per cent of current year enrollment. (4) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, 1.69 per cent of the appropriation for universities, as established in division (B)(1)(b) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for support of Medical I FTEs. The amount so reserved shall be referred to as the medical I set-aside. In each fiscal year, the medical I set-aside shall be allocated to universities as follows: (a) 12.34 per cent of the medical I set-aside shall be allocated to universities in proportion to their share of the statewide total of each state institution's three-year average Medical I FTEs, as calculated in division (A) of this section, enrolled in public colleges of podiatric medicine. (b) 87.66 per cent of the medical I set-aside shall be allocated to universities in proportion to their share of the statewide total of each state institution's three-year average Medical I FTEs, as calculated in division (A) of this section, enrolled in public colleges of dentistry and veterinary medicine. (5) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, five per cent of the appropriation for universities, as established in division (B)(1)(b) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for support of College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs as described in section 3345.89 of the Revised Code. The College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs funding shall be allocated to universities in proportion to each campus's share of the total statewide enrollment in College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs. In calculating the subsidy entitlements for enrollment in College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs, the Chancellor shall use the following: (a) The subsidy for College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs shall be distributed as follows: (i) The subsidy enrollment in College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs for students identified as residents of this state in any term of their studies, as reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system student enrollment file, shall be weighted by a factor of 1. (ii) The subsidy enrollment in College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs for students identified as out-of-state residents during all terms of their studies, as reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system student enrollment file, who remain in the state of Ohio at least one year after graduation, as calculated based on the three-year average in-state residency rate using unemployment wage data for out-of-state graduates at each institution, shall be weighted by a factor of 50 per cent. (b) In calculating each campus's enrollment in College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs, the Chancellor shall use the three-year average enrollment for the most recent completed three-year period that is practicable as agreed to by the Inter-University Council and the Chancellor. (6) In calculating the course completion funding for universities, the Chancellor shall use the following count of FTE students: (a) The subsidy eligible enrollments by model shall equal only those FTE students who successfully complete the course as defined and reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system course enrollment file; (b) Those undergraduate FTE students with successful course completions, identified in division (D)(6)(a) of this section, that are defined as at-risk based on academic under-preparation or financial status shall have their eligible completions weighted by the following: (i) Institution-specific course completion indexes, where the indexes are calculated based upon the number of at-risk students enrolled during the prior three calendar years; and (ii) A statewide average at-risk course completion weight determined for each subsidy model. The statewide average at-risk course completion weight shall be determined by calculating the difference between the percentage of traditional students who complete a course and the percentage of at-risk students who complete the same course. (c) The course completion earnings shall be determined by multiplying the amounts listed above in divisions (B) and (C) of this section by the subsidy-eligible FTEs for the most recent completed three-year period that is practicable as agreed to by the Inter-University Council and the Chancellor for all models except Medical I and Medical II. (d) For universities, the Chancellor shall compute the course completion earnings by dividing the appropriation for universities, established in division (B)(1)(b) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," less the degree attainment funding as calculated in division (D)(1) of this section, less the doctoral set-aside, less the medical I set-aside, less the medical II set-aside,, and less the College Credit Plus pathways and accelerated ninety-hour degree programs funding as calculated in division (D)(5) of this section, by the sum of all campuses' instructional costs as calculated in division (D)(6) of this section. (E) CALCULATION OF STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FORMULA ENTITLEMENTS AND ADJUSTMENTS FOR COMMUNITY COLLEGES (1) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, 50 per cent of the appropriation for state-supported community colleges, state community colleges, and technical colleges as established in division (B)(1)(a) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for course completion FTEs as aggregated by the subsidy models defined in division (B) of this section. The course completion funding shall be allocated to campuses in proportion to each campus's share of the total sector's course completions, weighted by the instructional cost of the subsidy models. To calculate the subsidy entitlements for course completions at community colleges, state community colleges, and technical colleges, the Chancellor shall use the following calculations: (a) In calculating each campus's count of FTE course completions, the Chancellor shall use a three-year average for course completions for the three-year period ending in the prior year for students identified as residents of the state of Ohio in any term of their studies, as reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system student enrollment file. (b) The subsidy eligible enrollments by model shall equal only those FTE students who successfully complete the course as defined and reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system course enrollment file. (c) Those students with successful course completions, that are defined as access students based on financial status, minority status, age, or academic under-preparation shall have their eligible course completions weighted by a statewide access weight. The weight given to any student that meets any access factor shall be 15 per cent for all course completions. (d) The model costs as used in the calculation shall be augmented by the model weights for science, technology, engineering, mathematics, and medicine models as established in division (C) of this section. (2) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, 25 per cent of the appropriation for state-supported community colleges, state community colleges, and technical colleges as established in division (B)(1)(a) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for colleges in proportion to their share of college student success factors. Student success factors shall be awarded at the institutional level for each subsidy-eligible student that successfully: (a) Completes a college-level math course within the first 30 hours of completed coursework. (b) Completes a college-level English course within the first 30 hours of completed coursework. (c) Completes 12 semester credit hours of college-level coursework. (d) Completes 24 semester credit hours of college-level coursework. (e) Completes 36 semester credit hours of college-level coursework. (3) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, 25 per cent of the appropriation for state-supported community colleges, state community colleges, and technical colleges as established in division (B)(1)(a) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027," in each fiscal year shall be reserved for completion milestones. Completion milestones shall include baccalaureate degrees, associate degrees, technical certificates over 30 credit hours as designated by the Department of Higher Education, and students transferring to any four-year institution with at least 12 credit hours of college-level coursework earned at that community college, state community college, or technical college. The completion milestone funding shall be allocated to colleges in proportion to each institution's share of the sector's total completion milestones, weighted by the instructional cost of the degree, certificate, or transfer models. Costs for technical certificates over 30 hours shall be weighted at one-half of the associate degree model costs and transfers with at least 12 credit hours of college-level coursework shall be weighted at one-fourth of the average cost for all associate degree model costs. (4) To calculate the subsidy entitlements for completions at community colleges, state community colleges, and technical colleges, the Chancellor shall use the following calculations: (a) In calculating each campus's count of completions, the Chancellor shall use a three-year average for completion milestones awarded to students identified as subsidy eligible in any term of their studies, as reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system student enrollment file. (b) The subsidy eligible completion milestones by model shall equal only those students who successfully complete a baccalaureate or an associate degree, or technical certificate over 30 credit hours, or transfer to any four-year institution with at least 12 credit hours of college-level coursework as defined and reported in the Higher Education Information (HEI) system. Student completions reported in HEI shall have an accompanying course enrollment record in order to be subsidy eligible. (c) Those students with successful completions for baccalaureate or associate degrees, technical certificates over 30 credit hours, or transfer to any four-year institution with at least 12 credit hours of college-level coursework, identified in division (E)(3) of this section, that are defined as access students based on financial status, minority status, age, or academic under-preparation shall have their eligible completions weighted by a statewide access weight. The weight shall be 25 per cent for students with one access factor, 66 per cent for students with two access factors, 150 per cent for students with three access factors, and 200 per cent for students with four access factors. (d) For those students who complete more than one completion milestone, funding for each additional degree or technical certificate over 30 credit hours designated as such by the Department of Higher Education shall be funded at 50 per cent of the model costs as defined in division (E)(3) of this section. (5) For purposes of the calculations made in division (E) of this section, the Chancellor shall only include subsidy-eligible students identified as residents of the state of Ohio in any term of their studies, as reported through the Higher Education Information (HEI) system student enrollment file. The Chancellor shall be prohibited from including nonresident students as subsidy-eligible except for those students otherwise identified as subsidy-eligible in division (A)(2) of this section. (F) CAPITAL COMPONENT DEDUCTION After all other adjustments have been made, state share of instruction earnings shall be reduced for each campus by the amount, if any, by which debt service charged in H.B. 16 of the 126th General Assembly, H.B. 699 of the 126th General Assembly, H.B. 496 of the 127th General Assembly, and H.B. 562 of the 127th General Assembly for that campus exceeds that campus's capital component earnings. The sum of the amounts deducted shall be transferred to appropriation item 235552, Capital Component, in each fiscal year. (G) EXCEPTIONAL CIRCUMSTANCES Adjustments may be made to the state share of instruction payments and other subsidies distributed by the Chancellor to state colleges and universities for exceptional circumstances. No adjustments for exceptional circumstances may be made without the recommendation of the Chancellor and the approval of the Controlling Board. (H) APPROPRIATION REDUCTIONS TO THE STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION The standard provisions of the state share of instruction calculation as described in the preceding sections of temporary law shall apply to any reductions made to appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, before the Chancellor has formally approved the final allocation of the state share of instruction funds for any fiscal year. Any reductions made to appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, after the Chancellor has formally approved the final allocation of the state share of instruction funds for any fiscal year, shall be uniformly applied to each campus in proportion to its share of the final allocation. (I) DISTRIBUTION OF STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION The state share of instruction payments to the institutions shall be in substantially equal monthly amounts during the fiscal year, unless otherwise determined by the Director of Budget and Management pursuant to section 126.09 of the Revised Code. Payments during the first six months of the fiscal year may be based upon the state share of instruction appropriation estimates made for the various institutions of higher education, and payments during the last six months of the fiscal year may be based on the final data from the Chancellor. If agreed to by the Chancellor and the Inter-University Council, payments to universities in each month of a fiscal year shall be based on final data in the higher education information system for the selected three-year period that is acceptable to both parties. Section 381.250. STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FOR FISCAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027 (A)(1) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, up to $100,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed according to a formula devised by the Chancellor of Higher Education based on the following order of priority, using data from the United States Census Post-Secondary Employment Outcomes project: (a) Retention-rate outcomes based on factors, including, but not limited to, the number of graduates employed by an Ohio-based employer and employment outcomes of the graduates of each college and university. In counting students under division (A)(1)(a) of this section, graduates who are residents of this state under rules adopted under section 3333.31 of the Revised Code and are employed by an Ohio-based employer shall be weighted the highest, followed by graduates who are employed by an Ohio-based employer but are not residents of this state; (b) Employment outcomes of the graduates of each college and university. In counting students under division (A)(1)(b) of this section, the Chancellor shall use as a factor employment by the graduates of each institution, measured at the 2-digit level of the Classification of Instructional Programs codes published by the National Center for Education Statistics. (2) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, up to $10,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed according to a formula devised by the Chancellor that provides funding bonuses of $10,000 per graduate for technician-aligned associate degrees, as determined by the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation, that are produced above a historical baseline of institutional production, as calculated by the Chancellor. In developing a formula under division (A)(2) of this section, the Chancellor shall give priority to retention-based outcomes, as specified in division (A)(1)(a) of this section, and count only graduates that are employed by an Ohio-based employer. (3) Of the amount set aside in division (A)(1) of this section for each fiscal year, 76.8 per cent shall be distributed to state-supported university main and regional campuses and 23.2 per cent shall be distributed to state-supported community colleges, state community colleges, and technical colleges. (4) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, $8,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to The Ohio State University to support the Salmon P. Chase Center for Civics, Culture, and Society established under section 3335.39 of the Revised Code. (5) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, $3,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the University of Toledo to support the Institute of American Constitutional Thought and Leadership established under section 3364.07 of the Revised Code. (6) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, $2,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Miami University to support the center for civics, culture, and society established under section 3339.06 of the Revised Code. (7) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, $2,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Cleveland State University to support the center for civics, culture, and society established under section 3344.07 of the Revised Code. (8) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, $2,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Wright State University to support the center for civics, culture, and workforce development established under section 3352.16 of the Revised Code. (B)(1) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, shall be distributed according to the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FORMULAS." Of these funds: (a) 23.2 per cent in each fiscal year shall be distributed to state-supported community colleges, state community colleges, and technical colleges, except that the amount calculated for Eastern Gateway Community College shall be distributed as follows: (i) Up to $2,900,000 in fiscal year 2026 for final close out costs of the college; (ii) Up to $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 to reimburse the Controlling Board Emergency Purposes/Contingencies Fund (Fund 5KM0); (iii) The remainder in each fiscal year shall remain in the General Revenue Fund. (b) 76.8 per cent in each fiscal year shall be distributed to state-supported university main and regional campuses; (c) Of the amounts distributed under division (B)(1)(b) of this section, $75,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed according to a formula devised by the Chancellor based on the per cent share of funds calculated in division (B)(1)(b) of this section. No state university shall receive funds from the amount set aside in division (B)(1)(c) of this section for fiscal year 2027 unless the standing committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate that consider higher education legislation determine that the state university has fully complied with sections 3333.045, 3345.029, 3345.0216, 3345.0217, 3345.382, 3345.451, 3345.453, and 3345.591 of the Revised Code for the previous fiscal year. To make this determination, each state university shall, not later than March 1, 2026, submit a report to the committee chairs, in a form and manner determined by the committees, that demonstrates the state university's compliance with those sections. Not later than March 31, 2026, each committee shall determine whether each state university has fully complied with those sections for the previous fiscal year and report that determination to the Office of Budget and Management. The Controlling Board shall consider the release of funds from the amount set aside in division (B)(1)(c) of this section for fiscal year 2027 only for compliant universities. The release of funds shall be subject to Controlling Board approval. Payments for fiscal year 2027 shall be issued to compliant universities in monthly payments in the manner provided in division (I) of the section of this act entitled "STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION FORMULAS." For any university determined noncompliant, the Chancellor shall reduce payments for that university by an amount equal to that university's per cent share of the total funds calculated pursuant to division (B)(1)(b) of this section. (2) Any increases in the amount distributed to an institution from the funds set aside in division (B) of this section that are above the prior year may be used by the institution to provide need-based aid and to provide counseling, support services, and workforce preparation services to students. Section 381.260. RESTRICTION ON FEE INCREASES (A) In fiscal years 2026 and 2027, the boards of trustees of state institutions of higher education shall restrain increases in in-state undergraduate instructional and general fees. (1) For the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 academic years, each community college established under Chapter 3354., state community college established under Chapter 3358., or technical college established under Chapter 3357. of the Revised Code may increase its in-state undergraduate instructional and general fees by not more than ten dollars per credit hour over what the institution charged for the previous academic year. (2) The limitations under division (A)(1) of this section do not apply to student health insurance, fees for auxiliary goods or services provided to students at the cost incurred to the institution, fees assessed to students as a pass-through for licensure and certification examinations, fees in elective courses associated with travel experiences, elective service charges, fines, and voluntary sales transactions. (B) The limitations under this section shall not apply to increases required to comply with institutional covenants related to their obligations or to meet unfunded legal mandates or legally binding obligations incurred or commitments made prior to the effective date of this section with respect to which the institution had identified such fee increases as the source of funds. Any increase required by such covenants and any such mandates, obligations, or commitments shall be reported by the Chancellor of Higher Education to the Controlling Board. These limitations may also be modified by the Chancellor, with the approval of the Controlling Board, to respond to exceptional circumstances as identified by the Chancellor. (C) Institutions offering an undergraduate tuition guarantee pursuant to section 3345.48 of the Revised Code may increase instructional and general fees pursuant to that section. Section 381.270. HIGHER EDUCATION - BOARD OF TRUSTEES (A) Funds appropriated for instructional subsidies at colleges and universities may be used to provide such branch or other off-campus undergraduate courses of study and such master's degree courses of study as may be approved by the Chancellor of Higher Education. (B) In providing instructional and other services to students, boards of trustees of state institutions of higher education shall supplement state subsidies with income from charges to students. Except as otherwise provided in this act, each board shall establish the fees to be charged to all students, including an instructional fee for educational and associated operational support of the institution and a general fee for noninstructional services, including locally financed student services facilities used for the benefit of enrolled students. The instructional fee and the general fee shall encompass all charges for services assessed uniformly to all enrolled students. Each board may also establish special purpose fees, service charges, and fines as required; such special purpose fees and service charges shall be for services or benefits furnished individual students or specific categories of students and shall not be applied uniformly to all enrolled students. A tuition surcharge shall be paid by all students who are not residents of Ohio. The board of trustees of a state institution of higher education shall not authorize a waiver or nonpayment of instructional fees or general fees for any particular student or any class of students other than waivers specifically authorized by law or approved by the Chancellor. This prohibition is not intended to limit the authority of boards of trustees to provide for payments to students for services rendered the institution, nor to prohibit the budgeting of income for staff benefits or for student assistance in the form of payment of such instructional and general fees. Each board may authorize a lower differential tuition rate of instructional or general fees equal to the default rate options provided under the College Credit Plus Program pursuant to Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code or equal to rates established pursuant to an agreement for an alternative payment structure pursuant to section 3365.07 of the Revised Code for nonpublic and home schooled students participating in that program that are not publicly funded. Each board may establish a lower differential tuition rate for in-state undergraduate instructional fees or general fees for students enrolled exclusively in online courses, as well as a lower differential tuition rate for the surcharge for nonresidents enrolled exclusively in online courses, provided a surcharge is still assessed. Each board may authorize a lower tuition rate for courses taken by high school students that do not qualify for funding under the College Credit Plus program under section 3365.07 of the Revised Code. These tuition rates must align with the institution's tuition rates charged for courses eligible for funding under the College Credit Plus Program. Each state institution of higher education in its statement of charges to students shall separately identify the instructional fee, the general fee, the tuition charge, and the tuition surcharge. Fee charges to students for instruction shall not be considered to be a price of service but shall be considered to be an integral part of the state government financing program in support of higher educational opportunity for students. (C) The boards of trustees of state institutions of higher education shall ensure that faculty members devote a proper and judicious part of their work week to the actual instruction of students. Total class credit hours of production per academic term per full-time faculty member is expected to meet the standards set forth in the budget data submitted by the Chancellor. (D) The authority of government vested by law in the boards of trustees of state institutions of higher education shall in fact be exercised by those boards. Boards of trustees may consult extensively with appropriate student and faculty groups. Administrative decisions about the utilization of available resources, about organizational structure, about disciplinary procedure, about the operation and staffing of all auxiliary facilities, and about administrative personnel shall be the exclusive prerogative of boards of trustees. Any delegation of authority by a board of trustees in other areas of responsibility shall be accompanied by appropriate standards of guidance concerning expected objectives in the exercise of such delegated authority and shall be accompanied by periodic review of the exercise of this delegated authority to the end that the public interest, in contrast to any institutional or special interest, shall be served. Section 381.280. WAR ORPHANS AND SEVERELY DISABLED VETERANS' CHILDREN SCHOLARSHIPS The foregoing appropriation item 235504, War Orphans and Severely Disabled Veterans' Children Scholarships, shall be used to reimburse state institutions of higher education for waivers of instructional fees and general fees provided by them, to provide grants to institutions that have received a certificate of authorization from the Chancellor of Higher Education under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, in accordance with the provisions of section 5910.04 of the Revised Code, and to fund additional scholarship benefits provided by section 5910.032 of the Revised Code. During each fiscal year, the Chancellor, as soon as possible after cancellation, may certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of canceled prior-year encumbrances in appropriation item 235504, War Orphans and Severely Disabled Veterans' Children Scholarships. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash, up to the certified amount, from the General Revenue Fund to the War Orphans and Severely Disabled Veterans' Children Scholarship Reserve Fund (Fund 5PW0). Section 381.290. STATE SHARE OF INSTRUCTION RECONCILIATION By the first day of September in each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Chancellor of Higher Education shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount necessary to pay any outstanding prior-year obligations to higher education institutions under the State Share of Instruction formulas, as determined by the Chancellor. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the Director of Budget and Management, upon the request of the Chancellor, may transfer cash in an amount up to the amounts certified for State Share of Instruction reconciliation from the State Financial Aid Reconciliation Fund (Fund 5Y50) to the General Revenue Fund. The amounts certified for State Share of Instruction reconciliation are hereby appropriated to appropriation item 235505, State Share of Instruction Reconciliation. Section 381.300. OHIOLINK The foregoing appropriation item 235507, OhioLINK, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support OhioLINK, a consortium organized under division (T) of section 3333.04 of the Revised Code to serve as the state's electronic library information and retrieval system, which provides access statewide to an extensive set of electronic databases and resources, the library holdings of Ohio's public and participating private nonprofit colleges and universities, and the State Library of Ohio. Section 381.310. AIR FORCE INSTITUTE OF TECHNOLOGY (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235508, Air Force Institute of Technology, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to the Aerospace Professional Development Center in Dayton for statewide workforce development services in the aerospace industry. (B) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 235508, Air Force Institute of Technology, shall be used to do both of the following: (1) Strengthen the research and educational linkages between the Wright Patterson Air Force Base and institutions of higher education in Ohio; and (2) Support the Defense Associated Graduate Student Innovators, an engineering graduate consortium of Wright State University, the University of Dayton, and the Air Force Institute of Technology, with the participation of the University of Cincinnati and The Ohio State University. Section 381.320. OHIO SUPERCOMPUTER CENTER The foregoing appropriation item 235510, Ohio Supercomputer Center, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support the operation of the Ohio Supercomputer Center, a consortium organized under division (T) of section 3333.04 of the Revised Code, located at The Ohio State University. The Ohio Supercomputer Center is a statewide resource available to Ohio research universities both public and private. It is also intended that the center be made accessible to private industry as appropriate. The Ohio Supercomputer Center's services shall support Ohio's colleges, universities, and businesses to make Ohio a leader in using computational science, modeling, and simulation to promote higher education, research, and economic competitiveness. Section 381.330. THE OHIO STATE UNIVERSITY EXTENSION SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 235511, The Ohio State University Extension Service, shall be disbursed through the Chancellor of Higher Education to The Ohio State University in monthly payments, unless otherwise determined by the Director of Budget and Management under section 126.09 of the Revised Code. Section 381.340. CENTRAL STATE SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 235514, Central State Supplement, shall be disbursed by the Chancellor of Higher Education to Central State University. Funds shall be used in a manner consistent with the goals of increasing enrollment, improving course completion, and increasing the number of degrees conferred. Section 381.350. CASE WESTERN RESERVE UNIVERSITY SCHOOL OF MEDICINE The foregoing appropriation item 235515, Case Western Reserve University School of Medicine, shall be disbursed to Case Western Reserve University through the Chancellor of Higher Education in accordance with agreements entered into under section 3333.10 of the Revised Code, provided that the state support per full-time medical student shall not exceed that provided to full-time medical students at state universities. Section 381.360. FAMILY PRACTICE The foregoing appropriation item 235519, Family Practice, shall be distributed in each fiscal year, based on each medical school's share of residents placed in a family practice and graduates practicing in a family practice. Section 381.370. SHAWNEE STATE SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 235520, Shawnee State Supplement, shall be disbursed by the Chancellor of Higher Education to Shawnee State University. Funds shall be used in a manner consistent with the goals of improving course completion, increasing the number of degrees conferred, and furthering the university's mission of service to the Appalachian region. Section 381.380. GERIATRIC MEDICINE The Chancellor of Higher Education shall distribute appropriation item 235525, Geriatric Medicine, consistent with existing criteria and guidelines. Section 381.390. PRIMARY CARE RESIDENCIES The foregoing appropriation item 235526, Primary Care Residencies, shall be distributed in each fiscal year, based on each medical school's share of residents placed in a primary care field and graduates practicing in a primary care field. Section 381.400. GOVERNOR'S MERIT SCHOLARSHIP (A) The foregoing appropriation item 235530, Governor's Merit Scholarship, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to administer the Governor's Merit Scholarship Program and to award merit-based aid to qualifying institutions on behalf of eligible students. Funds awarded under this section shall be used in a manner consistent with the goal of allowing high-achieving high school graduates to remain in Ohio to pursue their post-secondary studies and contribute to Ohio's expanding economic opportunities. (B) In awarding funds under this section, and to the extent that funds are sufficient to do so, the Chancellor shall provide per-student awards of $5,000 per academic year to eligible students determined to be in the top five per cent of their public or nonpublic high school graduating class at the end of their junior year, as determined by their public or nonpublic high school using criteria established by the Chancellor in consultation with the Director of Education and Workforce. School districts and nonpublic high schools shall provide the information as requested by the Chancellor to determine scholarship eligibility. Eligible students shall receive an award for up to the equivalent of four academic years of instruction at a qualifying institution, contingent on satisfactory academic progress. (C) The Chancellor, in consultation with the Director, shall determine eligibility for graduating high school students who were home schooled to provide a level of access to the program described in this section that is reasonably commensurate with the merit-based criteria used to determine eligibility for students graduating from a public or nonpublic high school. (D) The Governor's Merit Scholarship shall be used to pay eligible expenses, as determined by the Chancellor, included within the published cost of attendance at a qualifying institution. (E) A qualifying institution shall not make changes to scholarship or financial aid programs offered by that institution that have the goal or net effect of shifting the cost burden of those programs to the program described in this section. Institutions of higher education that enroll students receiving merit-based financial aid grants under this section shall maintain the same level of merit-based financial aid the institution provided in the most recent academic year in the aggregate to all students or on a per-student basis. (F) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Chancellor may establish guidelines for the purpose of implementing this section, except that the Chancellor shall not place limits on the number of students receiving an award under this section that enroll at a qualifying institution. (G) As used in this section, "qualifying institution" means any of the following: (1) A state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (2) A private nonprofit institution of higher education holding a certificate of authorization under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code. Section 381.410. PROGRAM AND PROJECT SUPPORT Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to Miami University to establish the Ohio Institute for Quantum Computing Research, Talent, and Commercialization and an urban bridge to Cleveland. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $200,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the University of Dayton Statehouse Civic Scholars Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $935,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be allocated to support Ashland University's Military and Veterans Services program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to Kent State University to support its women's wrestling program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to Sinclair Community College for the purchase of equipment for manufacturing education in Ohio's correctional institutions that will support training leading to industry credentials valued by manufacturing employers, as determined by support of a regional manufacturing industry sector partnership endorsed by the Ohio Manufacturer's Association. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to the Strategic Ohio Council on Higher Education to support the Ohio Intern Academy program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be allocated to support Ashland University's Ashbrook Center civics education K-12 teacher training and student learning initiative. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235533, Program and Project Support, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be allocated to support the Kent State University Rising Scholars Program. Section 381.420. OHIO STATE AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH The foregoing appropriation item 235535, Ohio State Agricultural Research, shall be disbursed through the Chancellor of Higher Education to The Ohio State University in monthly payments, unless otherwise determined by the Director of Budget and Management under section 126.09 of the Revised Code. The Ohio Agricultural Research and Development Center, an entity of the College of Food, Agricultural, and Environmental Sciences of The Ohio State University, shall further its mission of enhancing Ohio's economic development and job creation by continuing to internally allocate on a competitive basis appropriated funding of programs based on demonstrated performance. Academic units, faculty, and faculty-driven programs shall be evaluated and rewarded consistent with agreed-upon performance expectations as called for in the College's Expectations and Criteria for Performance Assessment. Section 381.430. STATE UNIVERSITY CLINICAL TEACHING The foregoing appropriation items 235536, The Ohio State University Clinical Teaching; 235537, University of Cincinnati Clinical Teaching; 235538, University of Toledo Clinical Teaching; 235539, Wright State University Clinical Teaching; 235540, Ohio University Clinical Teaching; and 235541, Northeast Ohio Medical University Clinical Teaching, shall be distributed through the Chancellor of Higher Education. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235539, Wright State University Clinical Teaching, $1,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Aerospace Medicine and Human Performance Center at Wright State University. Section 381.440. CENTRAL STATE AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT The foregoing appropriation item 235546, Central State Agricultural Research and Development, shall be used in conjunction with appropriation item 235548, Central State Cooperative Extension Services, by Central State University for its state match requirement as an 1890 land grant university. Section 381.450. CAPITAL COMPONENT The foregoing appropriation item 235552, Capital Component, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to provide funding for prior commitments made pursuant to the state's former capital funding policy for state colleges and universities that was originally established in H.B. 748 of the 121st General Assembly. Appropriations from this item shall be distributed to all campuses for which the estimated campus debt service attributable to qualifying capital projects was less than the campus's formula-determined capital component allocation. Campus allocations shall be determined by subtracting the estimated campus debt service attributable to qualifying capital projects from the campus's formula-determined capital component allocation. Moneys distributed from this appropriation item shall be restricted to capital-related purposes. Any campus for which the estimated campus debt service attributable to qualifying capital projects is greater than the campus's formula-determined capital component allocation shall have the difference subtracted from its State Share of Instruction allocation in each fiscal year. Appropriation equal to the sum of all such amounts shall be transferred from appropriation item 235501, State Share of Instruction, to appropriation item 235552, Capital Component. Section 381.460. LIBRARY DEPOSITORIES The foregoing appropriation item 235555, Library Depositories, shall be distributed to the state's five regional depository libraries for the cost-effective storage of and access to lesser-used materials in university library collections. The depositories shall be administrated by the Chancellor of Higher Education, or by OhioLINK at the discretion of the Chancellor. Section 381.470. OHIO ACADEMIC RESOURCES NETWORK (OARNET) The foregoing appropriation item 235556, Ohio Academic Resources Network, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to support the operations of the Ohio Academic Resources Network, a consortium organized under division (T) of section 3333.04 of the Revised Code, which shall include support for Ohio's colleges and universities in maintaining and enhancing network connections, using new network technologies to improve research, education, and economic development programs, and sharing information technology services. To the extent network capacity is available, OARnet shall support allocating bandwidth to eligible programs directly supporting Ohio's economic development. Section 381.480. LONG-TERM CARE RESEARCH The foregoing appropriation item 235558, Long-term Care Research, shall be disbursed to Miami University for long-term care research. Section 381.490. OHIO COLLEGE OPPORTUNITY GRANT (A)(1) As used in this section: (a) "Eligible institution" means any institution described in divisions(B)(2)(a) to (c) of section 3333.122 of the Revised Code. (b) The three "sectors" of institutions of higher education consist of the following: (i) State colleges and universities, community colleges, state community colleges, university branches, and technical colleges; (ii) Eligible private nonprofit institutions of higher education; (iii) Eligible private for-profit career colleges and schools. (2)(a) Awards under section 3333.122 of the Revised Code shall be as follows for fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027: (i) $4,000 per student at a state institution of higher education; (ii) $5,000 per student at an eligible nonprofit institution of higher education; (iii) $2,000 per student at a private for-profit career college or school. (b) For students attending an eligible institution year-round, awards may be distributed on an annual basis, once Pell grants have been exhausted. (3) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section 3333.122 of the Revised Code, the Chancellor of Higher Education shall make awards under that section in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 to students with a student aid index, or any federal successor, of three thousand seven hundred fifty or less. (4) If the Chancellor determines that the amounts appropriated for support of the Ohio College Opportunity Grant program are inadequate to provide grants to all eligible students as specified under division (D) of section 3333.122 of the Revised Code, the Chancellor may follow methods established in division (C)(1)(a) or (b) of section 3333.122 of the Revised Code. If the Chancellor determines that reductions in award amounts are necessary, the Chancellor shall reduce the award amounts proportionally among the sectors of institutions specified in division (A)(1) of this section in a manner determined by the Chancellor. The Chancellor shall notify the Controlling Board of the distribution method. Any formula calculated under this division shall be complete and established to coincide with the start of each academic year. (B) Prior to determining the amount of funds available to award under this section and section 3333.122 of the Revised Code, the Chancellor shall use the foregoing appropriation item 235563, Ohio College Opportunity Grant, to pay for waivers of tuition and student fees for eligible students under the Ohio Safety Officer's College Memorial Fund Program under section 3333.26 of the Revised Code and for grants to qualifying institutions on behalf of eligible students under the adoption grant program established under section 3333.128 of the Revised Code. In each fiscal year, with the exception of sections 3333.121 and 3333.124 of the Revised Code and the section of this act entitled "STATE FINANCIAL AID RECONCILIATION," the Chancellor shall not distribute or obligate or commit to be distributed an amount greater than what is appropriated under the foregoing appropriation item 235563, Ohio College Opportunity Grant. (C) The Chancellor shall establish, and post on the Department of Higher Education's web site, award tables based on the amounts specified under division (A) of this section. The Chancellor shall notify students and institutions of any reductions in awards. (D) Notwithstanding section 3333.122 of the Revised Code, no student shall be eligible to receive an Ohio College Opportunity Grant for more than ten semesters, fifteen quarters, or the equivalent of five academic years, less the number of semesters or quarters in which the student received an Ohio Instructional Grant. (E) During each fiscal year, the Chancellor, as soon as possible after cancellation, may certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of canceled prior-year encumbrances in appropriation item 235563, Ohio College Opportunity Grant. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash, up to the certified amount, from the General Revenue Fund to the Ohio College Opportunity Grant Program Reserve Fund (Fund 5PU0). (F) No eligible institution that enrolls Ohio College Opportunity Grant recipients shall make any change to its scholarship or financial aid programs with the goal or net effect of shifting the cost burden of those programs to the Ohio College Opportunity Grant program. Each eligible institution that enrolls Ohio College Opportunity Grant recipients shall provide at least the same level of needs-based financial aid to its students as it provided in the immediately prior academic year in terms of either the aggregate aid to all students or on a per student basis. The Chancellor may grant an eligible institution a temporary waiver from that requirement if the Chancellor determines exceptional circumstances make it necessary. The Chancellor shall determine the terms of the waiver. Section 381.500. THE OHIO STATE UNIVERSITY COLLEGE OF VETERINARY MEDICINE SUPPLEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 235569, The Ohio State University College of Veterinary Medicine Supplement, shall be distributed through the Chancellor of Higher Education to The Ohio State University College of Veterinary Medicine in order to increase enrollment of Ohio students, with the goal that seventy per cent of the students entering the college in the 2026-2027 academic year be Ohio students. Section 381.510. THE OHIO STATE UNIVERSITY CLINIC SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item 235572, The Ohio State University Clinic Support, shall be distributed through the Chancellor of Higher Education to The Ohio State University for support of dental and veterinary medicine clinics. Section 381.520. FEDERAL RESEARCH NETWORK The foregoing appropriation item 235578, Federal Research Network, shall be allocated to The Ohio State University to collaborate with federal installations in Ohio, state institutions of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, private nonprofit institutions of higher education holding certificates of authorization under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, and the private sector to align the state's research assets with emerging missions and job growth opportunities emanating from federal installations, strengthen related workforce development and technology commercialization programs, and better position the state's university system to directly impact new job creation in Ohio. A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 235578, Federal Research Network, shall be used to support the growth of small business federal contractors in the state and to expand the participation of Ohio businesses in the federal Small Business Innovation Research Program and related federal programs. Section 381.525. EDUCATOR PREPARATION PROGRAMS The foregoing appropriation item 235585, Educator Preparation Programs, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to implement and administer sections 3333.048, 3333.049, 3333.0411, and 3333.0419 of the Revised Code or other educator preparation programs, such as the Ohio Teacher Apprenticeship Program, as determined by the Chancellor. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with the first full academic year following the adoption of new standards, each educator preparation program at an institution of higher education shall include in its curriculum standards for social studies that align with the standards adopted by the Department of Education and Workforce to ensure that educators and other school personnel are adequately prepared and trained in social studies. Within six months of the beginning of the first full academic year in which the new standards are used, the Chancellor shall complete a review and evaluation process to assess the degree to which every educator preparation program at an institution of higher education is teaching social studies in alignment with the standards. Section 381.530. CO-OP INTERNSHIP PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $165,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the operations of Ohio University's Voinovich School. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Model United Nations Program at Wright State University. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the operations of The Ohio State University's John Glenn College of Public Affairs. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Bliss Institute of Applied Politics at the University of Akron. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Center for Public Management and Regional Affairs at Miami University. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Student Mentoring and Career Development Program at the Levin College Advancing Public Service Professionals at Cleveland State University. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the University of Cincinnati Internship Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Kent State University Washington Program in National Issues. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Kent State University Columbus Program. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the University of Toledo Urban Affairs Center. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Shawnee State University Institute for Appalachian Public Policy. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Center for Regional Development at Bowling Green State University. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235591, Co-Op Internship Program, $75,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Initiative for Community and Regional Development at Youngstown State University. Section 381.540. COMMERCIAL TRUCK DRIVER STUDENT AID PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235595, Commercial Truck Driver Student Aid Program, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to administer and provide grants and loans under the Commercial Truck Driver Student Aid Program established in section 3333.125 of the Revised Code. Section 381.560. NATIONAL GUARD SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM The Chancellor of Higher Education shall disburse funds from appropriation item 235599, National Guard Scholarship Program. During each fiscal year, the Chancellor, as soon as possible after cancellation, may certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of canceled prior-year encumbrances in appropriation item 235599, National Guard Scholarship Program. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash, up to the certified amount, from the General Revenue Fund to the National Guard Scholarship Reserve Fund (Fund 5BM0). A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 235599, National Guard Scholarship Program, may be used to administer the program with the concurrence of the Adjutant General. Section 381.565. OHIO HIGHER EDUCATION PUBLIC POLICY RESEARCH CONSORTIUM Of the foregoing appropriation item 2355A4, Ohio Higher Education Public Policy Research Consortium, $75,000 in each fiscal year may be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to establish and administer the Ohio Higher Education Public Policy Research Consortium pursuant to section 3333.952 of the Revised Code. The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 2355A4, Ohio Higher Education Public Policy Research Consortium, shall be used by the Chancellor to award competitive research grants pursuant to division (B) of section 3333.952 of the Revised Code. Section 381.570. PLEDGE OF FEES Any new pledge of fees, or new agreement for adjustment of fees, made in the biennium ending June 30, 2027, to secure bonds or notes of a state institution of higher education for a project for which bonds or notes were not outstanding on the effective date of this section, to secure a refund of prior debt that is anticipated to increase the total cost of retiring the original debt, or to extend the period in which that full debt is retired shall be effective only after approval by the Chancellor of Higher Education, unless approved in a previous biennium. Section 381.580. HIGHER EDUCATION GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 235909, Higher Education General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, for obligations issued under sections 151.01 and 151.04 of the Revised Code. Section 381.590. SALES AND SERVICES The Chancellor of Higher Education is authorized to charge and accept payment for the provision of goods and services. Such charges shall be reasonably related to the cost of producing the goods and services. Except as otherwise provided by law, no charges may be levied for goods or services that are produced as part of the routine responsibilities or duties of the Chancellor. All revenues received by the Chancellor shall be deposited into Fund 4560 and may be used by the Chancellor to pay for the costs of producing the goods and services. Section 381.600. HIGHER EDUCATIONAL FACILITY COMMISSION ADMINISTRATION The foregoing appropriation item 235602, Higher Educational Facility Commission Administration, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education for operating expenses related to the Chancellor's support of the activities of the Ohio Higher Educational Facility Commission. Upon the request of the Chancellor, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash in an amount up to the amount appropriated from the foregoing appropriation item 235602, Higher Educational Facility Commission Administration, in each fiscal year from the HEFC Operating Expenses Fund (Fund 4610) to the HEFC Administration Fund (Fund 4E80). Section 381.635. SUPER RAPIDS (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235688, Super RAPIDS, up to $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to Youngstown State University for assistance with enrolling new students and taking over building operations from Eastern Gateway Community College. (B)(1) The remainder of the foregoing appropriation item 235688, Super RAPIDS, shall be used by the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation and the Chancellor of Higher Education to support collaborative projects among qualifying institutions to strengthen education and training opportunities that maximize workforce development efforts in defined areas of the state. These funds shall be used to support efforts that build capacity, remove employment and training barriers for prospective and unemployed workers, develop and strengthen business-led strategies in the impacted industries, and provide local guided solutions to employment for communities in economic transition. Under the program, the Chancellor shall distribute funds to Ohio regions or subsets of regions, as defined by the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation. Of these funds, a portion in each fiscal year may be used by the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation to meet urgent workforce development and job creation needs throughout the state. (2) The Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation shall consult with the Department of Development, the Chancellor, and other stakeholders as determined to be appropriate, when defining regions and awarding funds under this division. (3) The Chancellor and the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation shall develop and use a proposal and review process to award funds under the program. In reviewing proposals and making awards, priority shall be given to proposals that demonstrate all of the following: (a) Clear compliance with all applicable state and federal rules and regulations; (b) Collaboration between and among state institutions of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, Ohio Technical Centers, and other education and workforce-related entities as determined to be appropriate by the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation and the Department of Higher Education; (c) Evidence of meaningful business support and engagement; (d) Identification of targeted occupations and industries supported by data, which sources shall include the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation, OhioMeansJobs, labor market information from the Department of Job and Family Services, and lists of in-demand occupations; (e) Sustainability beyond the grant period with the opportunity to provide continued value and impact to the region; (f) Evidence of a strong commitment to invest in one or more of the following areas: (i) Broadband/5G; (ii) Cybersecurity; (iii) Healthcare; (iv) Transportation; (v) Advanced manufacturing; (vi) Trades. (4) As used in division (B) of this section: "Qualifying institution" means any of the following: (a) A state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) An Ohio Technical Center, as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code; (c) Other secondary and postsecondary education and workforce-related entities, as determined by the Chancellor. Section 381.640. STATE FINANCIAL AID RECONCILIATION By the first day of September in each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Chancellor of Higher Education shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount necessary to pay any outstanding prior year obligations to higher education institutions for the state's financial aid programs. The amounts certified are hereby appropriated to appropriation item 235618, State Financial Aid Reconciliation, from revenues received in the State Financial Aid Reconciliation Fund (Fund 5Y50). Section 381.650. SECOND CHANCE GRANT PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235494, Second Chance Grant Program, shall be distributed by the Chancellor of Higher Education to qualifying institutions of higher education and Ohio Technical Centers to provide grants to eligible students under the Second Chance Grant Program established in section 3333.127 of the Revised Code. RURAL PRACTICE INCENTIVE PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235426, Rural Practice Incentive Program, shall be used to provide loan repayments on behalf of certain attorneys as described in section 3333.131 of the Revised Code. Section 381.655. GROW YOUR OWN TEACHER PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235592, Grow Your Own Teacher Program, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to implement and administer the Grow Your Own Teacher Program pursuant to sections 3333.393 and 3333.394 of the Revised Code and the Ohio Teacher Apprenticeship Program. Section 381.660. NURSING LOAN PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 235606, Nursing Loan Program, shall be used to administer the nurse education assistance program. Section 381.670. RESEARCH INCENTIVE THIRD FRONTIER - TAX (A) The foregoing appropriation item 235639, Research Incentive Third Frontier - Tax, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher Education to advance collaborative research at institutions of higher education. Of the foregoing appropriation item 235639, Research Incentive Third Frontier - Tax, a portion in each fiscal year shall be used by the Chancellor to support and promote research that is intended to be commercialized. Research funded under division (A) of this section shall include a condition that the discoveries, inventions, or patents developed therein be retained by the researcher, unless all or a portion of the interests therein are specifically granted to the state college or university at which the researcher is employed. In reviewing proposals and making awards under division (A) of this section, the Chancellor may enlist the assistance of the Ohio Technology Transfer Officer's Council. (B) Of the foregoing appropriation item 235639, Research Incentive Third Frontier - Tax, up to $2,000,000 in each fiscal year may be allocated toward research regarding the improvement of water quality, up to $750,000 in each fiscal year may be allocated for spinal cord research, up to $750,000 in each fiscal year may be allocated toward research regarding cyber security initiatives, up to $300,000 in each fiscal year may be allocated toward the I-Corps@Ohio program, and up to $200,000 in each fiscal year may be allocated toward the Ohio Innovation Exchange program. Section 381.680. VETERANS PREFERENCES The Chancellor of Higher Education shall work with the Department of Veterans Services to develop specific veterans preference guidelines for higher education institutions. These guidelines shall ensure that the institutions' hiring practices are in accordance with the intent of Ohio's veterans' preference laws. Section 381.690. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Board of trustees" includes the managing authority of a university branch district. (2) "State institution of higher education" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (B) The board of trustees of any state institution of higher education, notwithstanding any rule of the institution to the contrary, may adopt a policy providing for mandatory furloughs of employees, including faculty, to achieve spending reductions necessitated by institutional budget deficits. Section 381.700. EFFICIENCY REPORTS In each fiscal year, the board of trustees of each public institution of higher education shall approve the institution's efficiency report submitted to the Chancellor of Higher Education under section 3333.95 of the Revised Code. MEDICAL EDUCATION POST-GRADUATION RESIDENCY REPORTS For each fiscal year, each institution of higher education that receives funds from the foregoing appropriation items 235515, Case Western Reserve University School of Medicine, 235519, Family Practice, 235525, Geriatric Medicine, 235526, Primary Care Residencies, 235536, The Ohio State University Clinical Teaching, 235537, University of Cincinnati Clinical Teaching, 235538, University of Toledo Clinical Teaching, 235539, Wright State University Clinical Teaching, 235540, Ohio University Clinical Teaching, 235541, Northeast Ohio Medical University Clinical Teaching, 235543, Kent State University College of Podiatric Medicine Clinic Subsidy, 235558, Long-term Care Research, and 235572, The Ohio State University Clinic Support, shall report to the Chancellor of Higher Education the residency status of graduates from the respective programs receiving support from those appropriation items one year and five years after graduating. Section 381.710. The Chancellor of Higher Education shall support the continued development of the Ohio Innovation Exchange for the purpose of showcasing the research expertise of Ohio's university and college faculty in a variety of fields, including, but not limited to, engineering, biomedicine, and information technology, and to identify institutional research equipment available in the state. Section 381.730. EASTERN GATEWAY COMMUNITY COLLEGE The Chancellor of Higher Education, in consultation with postsecondary educational institutions and other stakeholders as determined to be appropriate, shall monitor and evaluate the ongoing availability of postsecondary educational offerings within the four-county service district formerly served by Eastern Gateway Community College. To the extent practicable, the Chancellor shall seek to ensure a strong continuity of postsecondary educational access to residents of the region, with a particular focus on access to programs aligned with regional workforce priorities. If determined to be necessary, the Chancellor may seek to achieve favorable outcomes by engaging with other postsecondary educational institutions to encourage uninterrupted access to educational opportunities. This may include, but not be limited to, outcomes associated with academic program offerings, program-related equipment, or physical facilities. Section 381.740. CREDENTIAL AND WORK EXPERIENCE CONSIDERATION Prior to admitting any students applying for enrollment after July 1, 2025, each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, shall consider an applicant's work experience and credentials earned as part of the admissions process. An applicant's work experience or credential does not need to align to the program or discipline the applicant is seeking to pursue to be considered by the state institution as a positive reason to accept the applicant as a student at the institution. At the time of the student's acceptance, an institution shall either grant credit for prior learning or experience or detail the potential opportunities and required documentation needed to grant such credit based on the review of the student's specific information provided in the application. Section 381.750. GENERAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS (A) Not later than December 31, 2026, the board of trustees of each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, shall formally review and evaluate the components of the state institution's general education curriculum and adopt a resolution acknowledging the board's completion of that review. Each board shall submit a copy of its resolution to the Chancellor of Higher Education. (B) Not later than March 31, 2027, the board of trustees of each state institution of higher education shall formally evaluate the state institution's general education curriculum to enhance content that furthers the state's post-secondary education attainment and workforce goals. In conducting the evaluation, the board shall consider adjusting the general education curriculum in the following areas: (1) Civics, culture, and society, including United States and Ohio history, the foundations of American representative government, how to disagree in a civil manner, and the principles of civil discourse; (2) Artificial intelligence, STEM, and computational thinking; (3) Entrepreneurship and the principles of innovation; (4) Workforce readiness, including fundamental skills necessary for Ohio's graduates to gain employment in in-demand occupations. (C) Not later than June 30, 2027, the board of trustees of each state institution of higher education shall adopt a resolution summarizing changes to the state institution's general education curriculum resulting from the evaluation process and submit a copy of the resolution to the Chancellor. (D) The Chancellor shall provide a copy of each resolution submitted under this section to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives. (E) Adjustments made to a state institution of higher education's general education curriculum pursuant to this section are not exempt from the requirements of the Chancellor's program approval process. Section 381.770. DIRECT ADMISSIONS (A) As used in this section: (1) "Academic record" includes grade point average, high school and college transcript information, standardized assessment scores, scores on the end-of-course examinations prescribed under section 3301.0712 of the Revised Code, and any other measure of postsecondary readiness determined appropriate by the Chancellor of Higher Education. (2) "Postsecondary institution" means any of the following: (a) A state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) A private nonprofit institution of higher education that holds a certificate of authorization under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code; (c) An Ohio technical center, as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code. (3) "School governing body" means the board of education of a city, local, exempted village, or joint vocational school district, the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school, the governing authority of a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or the governing body of a STEM school established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code. (B) The Chancellor of Higher Education, in consultation with the Director of Education and Workforce, shall establish a direct admissions pilot program to notify students enrolled at participating high schools about whether they meet the admissions criteria for participating postsecondary institutions. Under the pilot program, the Chancellor shall establish a process that uses a student's academic record to determine whether the student meets the admissions requirements. To the extent practicable, and in accordance with applicable law, the Chancellor shall use existing primary, secondary, and higher education student information systems to automate the process and use information held by a participating student's high school to minimize the need for the student to provide any additional information. The Chancellor shall endeavor to implement the pilot program so that students graduating in the 2026-2027 school year may participate in the program. (C) The Chancellor may do any of the following: (1) Establish eligibility requirements for students, school governing bodies, and postsecondary institutions who elect to participate in the pilot program; (2) Consult with stakeholders and form advisory councils as necessary to design and operate the pilot program; (3) Terminate the pilot program if the Chancellor determines its operation is impracticable. (D) A school governing body or postsecondary institution shall apply to participate in the pilot program in a form and manner prescribed by the Chancellor. A participating school governing body may adopt a written policy authorizing any high school it operates to participate in the pilot program. Not later than ninety days after the adoption of the policy, the school governing body shall transmit an electronic copy of the policy to the Chancellor and the Director of Education and Workforce. A participating school governing body shall develop a procedure to determine whether a student who wants to participate in the pilot program meets any eligibility requirements established under division (C) of this section. (E) At least once each school year, the Chancellor, in consultation with the Director of Education and Workforce, shall issue a report on the pilot program. The Chancellor shall set a deadline for the report's issuance. The report shall include information about the number of students who participate in the program. The report also shall evaluate, to the extent practicable, the impact of the program on postsecondary outcomes for students from populations traditionally underserved in higher education. The Chancellor shall submit the report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Director of Education and Workforce, the Director of Budget and Management, and the Governor's Office of Workforce Transformation. (F) No student, school governing body, or postsecondary institution shall be required to participate in the pilot program. Section 383.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DRC DEPARTMENT OF REHABILITATION AND CORRECTION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 501321 Institutional Operations $1,487,713,893 $1,559,983,411 D GRF 501405 Reentry, Housing, and Support Services $87,812,700 $90,670,600 E GRF 501406 Adult Correctional Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments $42,000,000 $60,000,000 F GRF 501407 Community Nonresidential Programs $71,472,947 $74,153,531 G GRF 501408 Community Misdemeanor Programs $10,101,000 $10,555,545 H GRF 501411 Probation Improvement and Incentive Grants $5,512,500 $5,760,562 I GRF 501501 Community Residential Programs - Community Based Correctional Facilities $99,715,600 $100,161,800 J GRF 503321 Parole and Community Operations $135,000,000 $135,000,000 K GRF 504321 Administrative Operations $29,927,970 $31,394,440 L GRF 505321 Institution Medical Services $374,507,269 $397,184,187 M GRF 506321 Institution Education Services $51,496,437 $55,665,093 N General Revenue Fund Total $2,395,260,316 $2,520,529,169 O Dedicated Purpose Fund Group P 4B00 501601 Sewer Treatment Services $600,000 $600,000 Q 4D40 501603 Prisoner Programs $400,000 $400,000 R 4L40 501604 Transitional Control $2,450,000 $2,450,000 S 4S50 501608 Education Services $4,660,000 $4,660,000 T 5AF0 501609 State and Non-Federal Awards $1,300,000 $1,300,000 U 5H80 501617 Offender Financial Responsibility $1,860,000 $1,860,000 V 5ZQ0 501505 Local Jail Grants $75,000,000 $0 W Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $86,270,000 $11,270,000 X Internal Service Activity Fund Group Y 1480 501602 Institutional Services $3,500,000 $3,500,000 Z 2000 501607 Ohio Penal Industries $46,515,000 $46,515,000 AA 4830 501605 Leased Property Maintenance and Operating $7,500,000 $7,500,000 AB 5710 501606 Corrections Training Maintenance and Operating $940,000 $940,000 AC 5L60 501611 Information Technology Services $500,000 $500,000 AD Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $58,955,000 $58,955,000 AE Federal Fund Group AF 3230 501619 Federal Grants $4,500,000 $4,500,000 AG 3CW0 501622 Federal Equitable Sharing $300,000 $300,000 AH Federal Fund Group Total $4,800,000 $4,800,000 AI TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,545,285,316 $2,595,554,169 Section 383.20. ANALYTICS PLATFORM PILOT Of the foregoing appropriation item 501321, Institutional Operations, $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction to procure a software analytics platform to establish a pilot program to transcribe and analyze all inmate phone calls to increase the security and safety of Department of Rehabilitation and Correction facilities. The procured analytics platform shall be accessible to all law enforcement agencies in this state to support criminal investigations. The Attorney General shall approve the location of the pilot program. The Department shall submit a report of its findings from the pilot program to the Attorney General by December 31, 2026. EXPEDITED PARDON INITIATIVE Of the foregoing appropriation item 501321, Institutional Operations, up to $500,000 in each fiscal year may be used by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction to support projects connecting rehabilitated citizens with community partners to advance the expedited pardon initiative and help eligible individuals navigate the process and access clemency. FELONY OFFENSE COST REIMBURSEMENTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 501321, Institutional Operations, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall allocate an amount not to exceed $250,000 in each fiscal year to reimburse counties for their costs incurred in the prosecution of felonies that occur on the grounds of state correctional institutions operated by the Department. Eligible reimbursement costs include those incurred by the prosecuting attorney, indigent defense counsel, the court of common pleas, the clerk of the court of common pleas, and the sheriff. OSU MEDICAL CHARGES Notwithstanding section 341.192 of the Revised Code, at the request of the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction, the Ohio State University Medical Center, including the Arthur G. James Cancer Hospital and Richard J. Solove Research Institute and the Richard M. Ross Heart Hospital, shall provide necessary care to persons who are confined in state adult correctional facilities. The provision of necessary inpatient care billed to the Department shall be reimbursed at a rate not to exceed the authorized reimbursement rate for the same service established by the Department of Medicaid under the Medicaid Program. TRANSITIONAL HOUSING FUNDING Of the foregoing appropriation item 501405, Reentry, Housing, and Support Services, priority shall be given to residential providers that accept and place individuals released from institutions operated by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction to the supervision of the Adult Parole Authority who were previously rejected by all other residential providers. RELINK Of the foregoing appropriation item 501405, Reentry, Housing, and Support Services, $112,500 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Relink to connect individuals to local resources related to addiction recovery, anti-human trafficking, and incarceration reentry services. ADULT CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES LEASE RENTAL BOND PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 501406, Adult Correctional Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments, shall be used to meet all payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction pursuant to leases and agreements for facilities made under Chapters 152. and 154. of the Revised Code. These appropriations are the source of funds pledged for bond service charges on related obligations issued under Chapters 152. and 154. of the Revised Code. PROBATION IMPROVEMENT AND INCENTIVE GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 501411, Probation Improvement and Incentive Grants, shall be allocated by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction to municipalities as Probation Improvement and Incentive Grants with an emphasis on: (1) providing services to those addicted to opiates and other illegal substances, and (2) supplementing the programs and services funded by grants distributed from the foregoing appropriation item 501407, Community Nonresidential Programs. FREDERICK DOUGLASS PROJECT FOR JUSTICE Of the foregoing appropriation item 506321, Institution Education Services, $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be distributed directly to the Frederick Douglass Project for Justice to operate in all prisons. Section 383.30. LOCAL JAIL GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 501505, Local Jail Grants, shall be used for the construction and renovation of county jails. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall designate the projects involving the construction and renovation of county jails. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction may review and approve the renovation and construction of projects for which funds are provided. The proceeds of any obligations authorized under this section shall not be applied to any such facilities that are not designated and approved by the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall adopt guidelines to accept and review applications and designate projects. The guidelines shall require the county or counties to justify the need for the project and to comply with timelines for the submission of documentation pertaining to the project and project location. In reviewing applications and designating projects, the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall prioritize applications and projects that do all of the following: (1) Target county jails that the Department of Rehabilitation and Correction determines to have the greatest need for construction or renovation work; (2) Improve substantially the condition, safety, and operational ability of the jail; (3) Benefit jails that are, or will be, used by multiple counties. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall award the funds to selected counties not later than July 1, 2027. Section 387.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A RDF STATE REVENUE DISTRIBUTIONS B General Revenue Fund C GRF 110403 Personal Property Tax Replacement Phase Out - Local Government $3,770,000 $3,170,000 D GRF 110908 Property Tax Reimbursement - Local Government $687,764,172 $698,816,877 E GRF 200417 Personal Property Tax Replacement Phase Out - School District $46,478,241 $42,618,185 F GRF 200903 Property Tax Reimbursement - Education $1,291,917,108 $1,312,678,846 G General Revenue Fund Total $2,029,929,521 $2,057,283,908 H Revenue Distribution Fund Group I 5JG0 110633 Gross Casino Revenue Payments - County $168,320,000 $166,460,000 J 5JH0 110634 Gross Casino Revenue Payments - School Districts $112,210,000 $110,970,000 K 5JJ0 110636 Gross Casino Revenue - Host City $16,530,000 $16,400,000 L 7049 336900 Indigent Drivers Alcohol Treatment $1,800,000 $1,800,000 M 7050 762900 International Registration Plan Distribution $26,000,000 $26,000,000 N 7051 762901 Auto Registration Distribution $379,000,000 $391,000,000 O 7065 110965 Public Library Fund $490,000,000 $500,000,000 P 7066 800966 Undivided Liquor Permits $14,600,000 $14,600,000 Q 7069 110969 Local Government Fund $530,900,000 $541,200,000 R 7082 110982 Horse Racing Tax $31,200 $31,200 S 7083 700900 Ohio Fairs Fund $471,000 $471,000 T Revenue Distribution Fund Group Total $1,739,862,200 $1,768,932,200 U Fiduciary Fund Group V 4P80 001698 Cash Management Improvement Fund $1,000,000 $1,000,000 W 5VR0 110902 Municipal Net Profit Tax $241,330,000 $253,400,000 X 6080 001699 Investment Earnings $1,050,000,000 $975,000,000 Y 7001 110996 Horse Racing Tax Local Government Payments $120,000 $120,000 Z 7062 110962 Resort Area Excise Tax Distribution $2,540,000 $2,650,000 AA 7063 110963 Permissive Sales Tax Distribution $3,706,800,000 $3,788,700,000 AB 7067 110967 School District Income Tax Distribution $748,610,000 $778,170,000 AC 7085 800985 Volunteer Firemen's Dependents Fund $300,000 $300,000 AD 7094 110641 Wireless 9-1-1 Government Assistance $35,500,000 $31,300,000 AE 7095 110995 Municipal Income Tax $8,100,000 $8,100,000 AF 7099 762902 Permissive Tax Distribution - Auto Registration $262,000,000 $270,000,000 AG Fiduciary Fund Group Total $6,056,300,000 $6,108,740,000 AH Holding Account Fund Group AI R045 110617 International Fuel Tax Distribution $101,700,000 $108,200,000 AJ Holding Account Fund Group Total $101,700,000 $108,200,000 AK TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $9,927,791,721 $10,043,156,108 Section 387.20. ADDITIONAL APPROPRIATIONS Appropriation items in Section 387.10 of this act shall be used for the purpose of administering and distributing the designated revenue distribution funds according to the Revised Code. If it is determined that additional appropriations are necessary for this purpose in any appropriation items in Section 387.10 of this act, such amounts are hereby appropriated. TANGIBLE PROPERTY TAX REPLACEMENT PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation items 200417, Personal Property Tax Replacement Phase Out-School District, and 110403, Personal Property Tax Replacement Phase Out - Local Government, shall be used to make reimbursement payments to school districts and other local taxing units under sections 5709.92 and 5709.93 of the Revised Code. If it is determined that additional appropriations are needed to make those reimbursement payments in full, such amounts are hereby appropriated. Notwithstanding division (I) of section 5709.92 of the Revised Code, any school district that has a nuclear power plant located within its territory shall receive no less under this section in fiscal year 2027 than paid in fiscal year 2026. PROPERTY TAX REIMBURSEMENT - EDUCATION The foregoing appropriation item 200903, Property Tax Reimbursement - Education, is appropriated to pay for the state's costs incurred because of the homestead exemption, the property tax rollback, and payments required under division (C) of section 5705.2110 of the Revised Code. In cooperation with the Department of Taxation, the Department of Education and Workforce shall distribute these funds directly to the appropriate school districts of the state, notwithstanding sections 321.24 and 323.156 of the Revised Code, which provide for payment of the homestead exemption and property tax rollback by the Tax Commissioner to the appropriate county treasurer and the subsequent redistribution of these funds to the appropriate local taxing districts by the county auditor. Upon receipt of these amounts, each school district shall distribute the amount among the proper funds as if it had been paid as real or tangible personal property taxes. Payments for the costs of administration shall continue to be paid to the county treasurer and county auditor as provided for in sections 319.54, 321.26, and 323.156 of the Revised Code. Any sums, in addition to the amount specifically appropriated in appropriation item 200903, Property Tax Reimbursement - Education, for the homestead exemption and the property tax rollback payments, and payments required under division (C) of section 5705.2110 of the Revised Code, which are determined to be necessary for these purposes, are hereby appropriated. HOMESTEAD EXEMPTION, PROPERTY TAX ROLLBACK The foregoing appropriation item 110908, Property Tax Reimbursement-Local Government, is hereby appropriated to pay for the state's costs incurred due to the Homestead Exemption, the Manufactured Home Property Tax Rollback, and the Property Tax Rollback. The Tax Commissioner shall distribute these funds directly to the appropriate local taxing districts, except for school districts, notwithstanding the provisions in sections 321.24 and 323.156 of the Revised Code, which provide for payment of the Homestead Exemption, the Manufactured Home Property Tax Rollback, and Property Tax Rollback by the Tax Commissioner to the appropriate county treasurer and the subsequent redistribution of these funds to the appropriate local taxing districts by the county auditor. Upon receipt of these amounts, each local taxing district shall distribute the amount among the proper funds as if it had been paid as real property taxes. Payments for the costs of administration shall continue to be paid to the county treasurer and county auditor as provided for in sections 319.54, 321.26, and 323.156 of the Revised Code. Any sums, in addition to the amounts specifically appropriated in appropriation item 110908, Property Tax Allocation - Local Government, for the Homestead Exemption, the Manufactured Home Property Tax Rollback, and the Property Tax Rollback payments, which are determined to be necessary for these purposes, are hereby appropriated. MUNICIPAL INCOME TAX The foregoing appropriation item 110995, Municipal Income Tax, shall be used to make payments to municipal corporations under section 5745.05 of the Revised Code. If it is determined that additional appropriations are necessary to make such payments, such amounts are hereby appropriated. MUNICIPAL NET PROFIT TAX The foregoing appropriation item 110902, Municipal Net Profit Tax, shall be used to make payments to municipal corporations under section 718.83 of the Revised Code. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary to make such payments, such amounts are hereby appropriated. During fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027, if the Tax Commissioner determines that there is insufficient cash in the Municipal Net Profit Tax Fund (Fund 5VR0) to meet monthly distribution obligations under section 718.83 of the Revised Code, the Tax Commissioner shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of additional cash necessary to satisfy those obligations. In addition, the Commissioner shall submit a plan to the Director requesting the necessary cash be transferred from one or a combination of the following funds: the Municipal Income Tax Administrative Fund, the Local Sales Tax Administrative Fund, the General School District Income Tax Administrative Fund, the Motor Fuel Tax Administrative Fund, the Property Tax Administrative Fund, or the General Revenue Fund. This plan shall include a proposed repayment schedule to reimburse those funds for any cash transferred in accordance with this section. After receiving the certification and funding plan from the Tax Commissioner and if the Director determines that sufficient cash is available, the Director may transfer the cash to the Municipal Net Profit Tax Fund in accordance with the plan submitted by the Tax Commissioner or as otherwise determined by the Director of Budget and Management. The Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from the Municipal Net Profit Tax Fund to reimburse the funds from which cash was transferred for the purpose outlined in this section. LOCAL GOVERNMENT FUND Notwithstanding the requirement in division (A) of section 131.51 of the Revised Code that the Director of Budget and Management credit to the Local Government Fund one and seven-tenths per cent of the total tax revenue credited to the General Revenue Fund during the preceding month, the Director shall instead calculate these amounts during fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 using one and seventy-five one-hundredths as the percentage. HOST COMMUNITY CANNABIS FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the remaining cash balance of the Adult Use Tax Fund (Fund QG18) at the end of fiscal year 2025 after transferring cash to the General Revenue Fund under Section 509.10 of this act, to the Host Community Cannabis Fund (Fund 7106). Section 391.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A OSB DEAF AND BLIND EDUCATION SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 226321 Operations $32,700,258 $33,454,668 D General Revenue Fund Total $32,700,258 $33,454,668 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4H80 226602 Blind School State Grants $350,000 $350,000 G 4M00 226400 Deaf School Educational Program Expenses $250,000 $250,000 H 4M10 226401 Deaf School State Grants $25,000 $25,000 I 4M50 226601 Blind School Educational Program Expenses $330,000 $340,000 J 5H60 226402 Early Childhood Education $65,000 $65,000 K 5NJ0 226622 Employee Food Service Charges $22,467 $23,141 L Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $1,042,467 $1,053,141 M Federal Fund Group N 3100 226626 Blind School Federal Grants $1,099,000 $1,099,000 O 3110 226403 Deaf School Federal Grants $574,000 $574,000 P 3DT0 226621 Ohio Transition Collaborative $230,000 $230,000 Q 3P50 226643 Medicaid Professional Services Reimbursement $459,500 $459,500 R Federal Fund Group Total $2,362,500 $2,362,500 S TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $36,105,225 $36,870,309 Section 395.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A SOS SECRETARY OF STATE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 050321 Operating Expenses $3,505,147 $3,510,274 D GRF 050407 Poll Workers Training $0 $500,000 E GRF 050509 County Voting Systems Lease Rental Payments $12,200,000 $12,200,000 F General Revenue Fund Total $15,705,147 $16,210,274 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group H 4120 050609 Notary Commission $541,455 $555,487 I 4S80 050610 Board of Voting Machine Examiners $14,400 $14,400 J 5990 050603 Business Services Operating Expenses $28,686,668 $29,281,310 K 5990 050629 Statewide Voter Registration Database $705,000 $730,000 L 5990 050630 Elections Support Supplement $4,458,687 $4,545,000 M 5990 050631 Precinct Election Officials Training $0 $500,000 N 5990 050636 County Election Officials Training $240,000 $240,000 O 5CS1 050604 Ohio Election Integrity Commission $250,000 $0 P 5SN0 050626 Address Confidentiality $375,000 $400,000 Q Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $35,271,210 $36,266,197 R Holding Account Fund Group S R002 050606 Corporate/Business Filing Refunds $85,000 $85,000 T Holding Account Fund Group Total $85,000 $85,000 U Federal Fund Group V 3AS0 050616 Help America Vote Act (HAVA) $100,000 $100,000 W Federal Fund Group Total $100,000 $100,000 X TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $51,161,357 $52,661,471 Section 395.20. POLL WORKERS TRAINING The foregoing appropriation item 050407, Poll Workers Training, shall be used to provide funding to county boards of elections for precinct election official (PEO) training pursuant to section 3501.27 of the Revised Code. COUNTY VOTING SYSTEMS LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 050509, County Voting Systems Lease Rental Payments, shall be used to make payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, pursuant to leases and agreements entered into under Section 4 of S.B. 135 of the 132nd General Assembly with respect to financing the costs associated with the acquisition, development, installation, and implementation of county voting systems. BOARD OF VOTING SYSTEMS EXAMINERS The foregoing appropriation item 050610, Board of Voting Systems Examiners, shall be used to pay for the services and expenses of the members of the Board of Voting Systems Examiners, and for other expenses that are authorized to be paid from the Board of Voting Systems Examiners Fund (Fund 4S80) created in section 3506.05 of the Revised Code. Moneys not used shall be returned to the person or entity submitting equipment for examination. If it is determined by the Secretary of State that additional appropriation amounts are necessary, the Secretary of State may request that the Director of Budget and Management approve such amounts. Upon approval of the Director of Budget and Management, such amounts are hereby appropriated. BALLOT ADVERTISING COSTS Notwithstanding division (G) of section 3501.17 of the Revised Code, upon requests submitted by the Secretary of State, the Controlling Board may approve cash and appropriation transfers from the Controlling Board Emergency Purposes/Contingencies Fund (Fund 5KM0) to the Statewide Ballot Advertising Fund (Fund 5FH0) in order to pay for the cost of public notices associated with statewide ballot initiatives. ABSENT VOTER'S BALLOT APPLICATION MAILING Notwithstanding division (B) of section 111.31 of the Revised Code, upon the request of the Secretary of State, the Controlling Board may approve cash and appropriation transfers from the Controlling Board Emergency Purposes/Contingencies Fund (Fund 5KM0) to the Absent Voter's Ballot Application Mailing Fund (Fund 5RG0) to be used by the Secretary of State to pay the costs of printing and mailing unsolicited applications for absent voters' ballots for the general election to be held in November 2026. ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY PROGRAM Upon the request of the Secretary of State, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $400,000 per fiscal year in cash from the Business Services Operating Expenses Fund (Fund 5990) to the Address Confidentiality Program Fund (Fund 5SN0). CORPORATE/BUSINESS FILING REFUNDS The foregoing appropriation item 050606, Corporate/Business Filing Refunds, shall be used to hold revenues until they are directed to the appropriate accounts or until they are refunded. If it is determined by the Secretary of State that additional appropriation amounts are necessary, the Secretary of State may request that the Director of Budget and Management approve such amounts. Upon approval of the Director of Budget and Management, such amounts are hereby appropriated. HAVA FUNDS An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered portion of appropriation item 050616, Help America Vote Act (HAVA), at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered portion of appropriation item 050616, Help America Vote Act (HAVA), at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. Section 395.30. ELECTRONIC POLLBOOKS The appropriation item 050638, Electronic Pollbooks, shall be used by the Secretary of State to pay eighty-five per cent of the calculated allocation cost of acquiring electronic pollbooks, as defined in section 3506.05 of the Revised Code, and ancillary equipment, for county boards of elections in accordance with this section. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered portion of the appropriation item 050638, Electronic Pollbooks, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated to the Secretary of State for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. When required, pursuant to state purchasing requirements and at the request of the Secretary of State, the Office of Procurement Services within the Department of Administrative Services shall initiate a competitive solicitation for the purpose of identifying and securing contracts with qualified vendors that can provide electronic pollbooks, as defined in section 3506.05 of the Revised Code, and ancillary equipment. The Department shall maintain such contracts for use by county boards of elections in accordance with this section. The Secretary of State shall calculate the portion of appropriation item 050638, Electronic Pollbooks, to be allocated to each county board of elections in proportion to the number of registered voters in each county as recorded in the statewide voter registration database as of July 1, 2022. The Secretary of State, in conjunction with the Office of Procurement Services within the Department of Administrative Services, shall use the funding allocated to each county board of elections to reimburse them for the cost of acquiring electronic pollbooks and ancillary equipment as follows: (A) For electronic pollbooks and ancillary equipment to be acquired from vendors identified through competitive solicitation by the Office of Procurement Services within the Department of Administrative Services after the effective date of this section, upon request by a county board of elections, the Secretary of State shall provide a list of the vendors and electronic pollbooks certified in accordance with section 3506.05 of the Revised Code. The board of elections shall select electronic pollbooks from this list, notify the Secretary of State of its selection, and shall acquire the selected electronic pollbooks and any other necessary equipment. The board of elections shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the applicable board of county commissioners and the Secretary of State concerning those acquisitions. The Secretary of State shall reimburse the board of elections for the lesser amount of either eighty-five per cent of the cost of those acquisitions, or the amount of the allocation as determined by the Secretary of State under this section. (B) If, between December 31, 2019 and July 1, 2023, a board of elections acquired electronic pollbooks or ancillary equipment and is otherwise in compliance with all applicable directives and statutes, the Secretary of State shall reimburse the board of elections for the lesser amount of either eighty-five per cent of the cost of that acquisition, or the amount of the allocation as determined by the Secretary of State under this section. Reimbursement shall be paid to the county board of elections. Section 397.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A SEN THE OHIO SENATE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 020321 Operating Expenses $23,000,000 $23,000,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $23,000,000 $23,000,000 E Internal Service Activity Fund Group F 1020 020602 Senate Reimbursement $425,800 $425,800 G 4090 020601 Miscellaneous Sales $34,497 $34,497 H Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $460,297 $460,297 I TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $23,460,297 $23,460,297 Section 397.20. OPERATING EXPENSES On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Clerk of the Senate may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 020321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2025 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2026. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2026. On July 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Clerk of the Senate may certify to the Director of Budget and Management an amount up to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 020321, Operating Expenses, at the end of fiscal year 2026 to be reappropriated to fiscal year 2027. The amount certified is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. Section 399.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CSV COMMISSION ON SERVICE AND VOLUNTEERISM B General Revenue Fund C GRF 866321 CSV Operations $694,000 $694,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $694,000 $694,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 5GN0 866605 Serve Ohio Support $10,000 $2,103 G Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $10,000 $2,103 H Federal Fund Group I 3R70 866617 AmeriCorps Programs $13,923,794 $13,956,503 J Federal Fund Group Total $13,923,794 $13,956,503 K TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $14,627,794 $14,652,606 Section 401.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A CSF COMMISSIONERS OF THE SINKING FUND B Debt Service Fund Group C 7070 155905 Third Frontier Research and Development Bond Retirement Fund $45,000,000 $45,000,000 D 7072 155902 Highway Capital Improvement Bond Retirement Fund $118,500,000 $131,500,000 E 7073 155903 Natural Resources Bond Retirement Fund $14,300,000 $14,300,000 F 7074 155904 Conservation Projects Bond Retirement Fund $46,500,000 $39,000,000 G 7076 155906 Coal Research and Development Bond Retirement Fund $4,050,000 $2,525,000 H 7077 155907 State Capital Improvement Bond Retirement Fund $225,000,000 $240,000,000 I 7078 155908 Common Schools Bond Retirement Fund $255,000,000 $230,000,000 J 7079 155909 Higher Education Bond Retirement Fund $250,000,000 $210,000,000 K 7080 155901 Persian Gulf, Afghanistan, and Iraq Conflict Bond Retirement Fund $975,000 $0 L Debt Service Fund Group Total $959,325,000 $912,325,000 M TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $959,325,000 $912,325,000 Section 401.20. ADDITIONAL APPROPRIATIONS Appropriation items in this section are for the purpose of paying debt service and financing costs during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on bonds or notes of the state issued under the Ohio Constitution, Revised Code, and acts of the General Assembly. If it is determined that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, such amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 404.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A SHP STATE SPEECH AND HEARING PROFESSIONALS BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 123609 Operating Expenses $649,200 $665,400 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $649,200 $665,400 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $649,200 $665,400 Section 407.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A BTA BOARD OF TAX APPEALS B General Revenue Fund C GRF 116321 Operating Expenses $2,110,000 $2,160,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $2,110,000 $2,160,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,110,000 $2,160,000 Section 409.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A TAX DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 110321 Operating Expenses $63,000,000 $67,000,000 D GRF 110404 Tobacco Settlement Enforcement $163,000 $166,271 E General Revenue Fund Total $63,163,000 $67,166,271 F Dedicated Purpose Fund Group G 2280 110628 CAT Administration $13,368,132 $13,072,718 H 4350 110607 Local Tax Administration $38,632,001 $39,008,489 I 4360 110608 Motor Vehicle Audit Administration $1,282,300 $1,282,300 J 4380 110609 School District Income Tax Administration $9,651,710 $9,732,886 K 4C60 110616 International Registration Plan Administration $697,635 $706,187 L 4R60 110610 Tire Tax Administration $138,123 $138,123 M 5BP0 110639 Wireless 9-1-1 Administration $251,418 $251,418 N 5JM0 110637 Casino Tax Administration $101,000 $101,000 O 5N50 110605 Municipal Income Tax Administration $115,848 $115,848 P 5N60 110618 Kilowatt Hour Tax Administration $63,415 $63,415 Q 5NY0 110643 Petroleum Activity Tax Administration $1,114,260 $1,114,260 R 5V70 110622 Motor Fuel Tax Administration $6,713,625 $6,871,008 S 5V80 110623 Property Tax Administration $5,477,332 $5,509,569 T 5YQ0 110651 Sports Gaming Tax Administration Operating Expenses $5,000 $5,000 U 5ZA0 110650 Ohio Tax System Operating Expenses $7,000,000 $8,000,000 V 6390 110614 Cigarette Tax Enforcement $1,087,029 $1,114,117 W 6880 110615 Local Excise Tax Administration $391,778 $392,536 X Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $86,090,606 $87,478,874 Y Fiduciary Fund Group Z 4250 110635 Tax Refunds $3,082,044,000 $3,082,044,000 AA 5CZ0 110631 Vendor's License Application $575,000 $575,000 AB Fiduciary Fund Group Total $3,082,619,000 $3,082,619,000 AC Holding Account Fund Group AD R010 110611 Tax Distributions $25,000 $25,000 AE R011 110612 Miscellaneous Tax Receipts $500 $500 AF Holding Account Fund Group Total $25,500 $25,500 AG TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $3,231,898,106 $3,237,289,645 Section 409.20. TAX REFUNDS The foregoing appropriation item 110635, Tax Refunds, shall be used to pay refunds under section 5703.052 of the Revised Code. If it is determined that additional appropriations are necessary for this purpose, such amounts are hereby appropriated. VENDOR'S LICENSE PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 110631, Vendor's License Application, shall be used to make payments to county auditors under section 5739.17 of the Revised Code. If it is determined that additional appropriations are necessary to make such payments, such amounts are hereby appropriated. INTERNATIONAL REGISTRATION PLAN ADMINISTRATION The foregoing appropriation item 110616, International Registration Plan Administration, shall be used under section 5703.12 of the Revised Code for audits of persons with vehicles registered under the International Registration Plan. TRAVEL EXPENSES FOR THE STREAMLINED SALES TAX PROJECT Of the foregoing appropriation item 110607, Local Tax Administration, the Tax Commissioner may disburse funds, if available, for the purposes of paying travel expenses incurred by members of Ohio's delegation to the Streamlined Sales Tax Project, as appointed under section 5740.02 of the Revised Code. Any travel expense reimbursement paid for by the Department of Taxation shall be done in accordance with applicable state laws and guidelines. TOBACCO SETTLEMENT ENFORCEMENT The foregoing appropriation item 110404, Tobacco Settlement Enforcement, shall be used by the Tax Commissioner to pay costs incurred in the enforcement of divisions (F) and (G) of section 5743.03 of the Revised Code. OHIO TAX SYSTEM SUPPORT FUND The foregoing appropriation item 110650, Ohio Tax System Operating Expenses, shall be used to pay costs incurred in the maintenance and support of the department's Ohio Tax System. The Tax Commissioner shall submit a plan to the Director of Budget and Management requesting the necessary cash be transferred to the Ohio Tax System Support Fund (Fund 5ZA0) which is hereby created in the state treasury. Cash shall be transferred from any fund used by the Department of Taxation that is otherwise allowable under state or federal law, except the General Revenue Fund. This plan shall include a schedule of cash transfers. After receiving the funding plan from the Tax Commissioner and if the Director determines that sufficient cash is available, the Director may transfer the cash to the Ohio Tax System Support Fund with the plan submitted by the Tax Commissioner or as otherwise determined by the Director of Budget and Management. The transfers of cash to the Ohio Tax System Support Fund shall not exceed $15,000,000 in the fiscal year 2026-2027 biennium. MISCELLANEOUS TAX RECEIPTS The foregoing appropriation item 110612, Miscellaneous Tax Receipts, shall be used to hold miscellaneous tax payments received by the Tax Commissioner until the appropriate account or fund is identified and the money can be transferred for the identified purpose. If the Director of Budget and Management determines that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, such amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 411.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DOT DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 772456 Unmanned Aerial Systems Center $3,000,000 $500,000 D GRF 775470 Public Transportation - State $37,014,636 $37,014,636 E GRF 776465 Rail Development $3,000,000 $3,000,000 F GRF 777471 Airport Improvements - State $21,650,000 $19,650,000 G General Revenue Fund Total $64,664,636 $60,164,636 H Dedicated Purpose Fund Group I 5QT0 776670 Ohio Maritime Assistance Program $5,000,000 $5,000,000 J 5XI0 772504 Ohio Highway Transportation Safety $6,000,000 $0 K Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $11,000,000 $5,000,000 L TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $75,664,636 $65,164,636 Section 411.20. DRONES FOR FIRST RESPONDERS PILOT PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 772456, Unmanned Aerial Systems Center, $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to fund the Drones for First Responders pilot program, created under Section 755.20 of this act. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 772456, Unmanned Aerial Systems Center, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item in fiscal year 2027. OHIO MARITIME ASSISTANCE PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 776670, Ohio Maritime Assistance Program, not less than ten per cent in each fiscal year shall be used by the Ohio River Commission within the Department of Development to develop and promote economic activity, marine cargo terminal operations, and travel and tourism on the Ohio River and its tributaries. The remainder of appropriation item 776670, Ohio Maritime Assistance Program, shall be used to provide grants under the Ohio Maritime Assistance Program established under section 5501.91 of the Revised Code. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 776670, Ohio Maritime Assistance Program, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item in fiscal year 2027. OHIO HIGHWAY TRANSPORTATION SAFETY The foregoing appropriation item 772504, Ohio Highway Transportation Safety, shall be used in conjunction with the Ohio Rail Commission to identify and fund short-line rail development infrastructure projects that enhance capacity and improve safety. Section 411.30. OHIO AIRPORT IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 777471, Airport Improvements - State, $4,650,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to administer the Ohio Airport Improvement Program established in section 4561.03 of the Revised Code. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the amount from appropriation item 777471, Airport Improvements - State, earmarked for the Ohio Airport Improvement Program at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for fiscal year 2027. AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS - STATE Of the foregoing appropriation item 777471 Airport Improvements - State, $5,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Office of Aviation to provide matching funds for eligible airports awarded Airport Infrastructure Grant funding through the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act. Any matching funds provided to airports that are returned to the Office of Aviation due to lower than estimated project costs shall be reallocated to other eligible projects. The reallocated amounts are hereby appropriated. Of the foregoing appropriation item 777471 Airport Improvements - State, $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used by the Eastern Ohio Military Affairs Commission to support construction and repair projects at the Youngstown Air Reserve Station, the Youngstown-Warren Regional Airport, and the Camp James A. Garfield Joint Military Training Center. Section 413.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A TOS TREASURER OF STATE B General Revenue Fund C GRF 090321 Operating Expenses $5,432,000 $5,432,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $5,432,000 $5,432,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group F 4E90 090603 Securities Lending Income $12,972,444 $13,408,214 G 4E90 090639 STABLE Maintenance Fee Subsidy $900,000 $900,000 H 4X90 090614 Political Subdivision Obligation $38,332 $39,460 I 5770 090605 Investment Pool Reimbursement $1,838,291 $1,885,100 J 5BD1 090576 County Recorder Electronic Record Supplement $1,750,000 $0 K 5BE1 090638 Ohio Treasurer of State Information Technology Reserve $1,459,000 $1,459,000 L 5C50 090602 County Treasurer Education $250,000 $250,000 M 6050 090609 Treasurer of State Administrative Fund $1,820,361 $1,827,252 N Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $21,028,428 $19,769,026 O Fiduciary Fund Group P 4250 090635 Tax Refunds $12,000,000 $12,000,000 Q Fiduciary Fund Group Total $12,000,000 $12,000,000 R TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $38,460,428 $37,201,026 Section 413.20. COUNTY RECORDER ELECTRONIC RECORD MODERNIZATION PROGRAM An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 090409, County Recorder Electronic Modernization Program, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. TAX REFUNDS The foregoing appropriation item 090635, Tax Refunds, shall be used to pay refunds under section 5703.052 of the Revised Code. If the Director of Budget and Management determines that additional amounts are necessary for this purpose, such amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 413.40. STABLE MAINTENANCE FEE SUBSIDY The foregoing appropriation item 090639, STABLE Maintenance Fee Subsidy, shall be used to subsidize costs of monthly fees incurred by STABLE account holders for eligible individuals with disabilities. Section 413.50. COUNTY RECORDER ELECTRONIC RECORD MODERNIZATION FUND The County Recorder Electronic Modernization Fund (Fund 5BD1) is created in the state treasury. Money in the fund shall be used to distribute funds to reimburse counties under the County Recorder Electronic Record Modernization Program, for use by county recorder's offices to implement the requirements set forth in divisions (E) and (F) of section 317.13 of the Revised Code. The Treasurer of State shall reimburse counties on a rolling basis until the appropriation is expended. Counties that met the requirements set forth in divisions (E) and (F) of section 317.13 of the Revised Code on October 24, 2024, are ineligible for funds under the Program. To be eligible for reimbursement under the Program, an expense must be incurred on or after October 24, 2024; expenses incurred before that date are not eligible for reimbursement. A county that receives funds under the Program shall credit those funds to the Recorder's Technology Fund at least to the extent necessary to reimburse the fund for money the county recorder spent to implement the requirements set forth in divisions (E) and (F) of section 317.13 of the Revised Code. On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Treasurer of State shall transfer the cash balance including accrued interest and investment earnings from the Torrens Law Assurance Fund in the custody of the Treasurer of State, to the County Recorder Electronic Modernization Fund (Fund 5BD1). Upon completion of the transfer and on the effective date of its repeal by this act, the Torrens Law Assurance Fund is hereby abolished. Section 414.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A VTO VETERANS' ORGANIZATIONS B General Revenue Fund C GRF 743501 American Ex-Prisoners of War $45,000 $45,000 D GRF 746501 Army and Navy Union, USA, Inc. $85,000 $85,000 E GRF 747501 Korean War Veterans $85,000 $85,000 F GRF 748501 Jewish War Veterans $62,000 $62,000 G GRF 749501 Catholic War Veterans $85,000 $85,000 H GRF 750501 Military Order of the Purple Heart $85,000 $85,000 I GRF 751501 Vietnam Veterans of America $310,000 $310,000 J GRF 752501 American Legion of Ohio $450,000 $450,000 K GRF 753501 AMVETS $450,000 $450,000 L GRF 754501 Disabled American Veterans $450,000 $450,000 M GRF 756501 Marine Corps League $214,000 $214,000 N GRF 757501 37th Division Veterans' Association $17,000 $17,000 O GRF 758501 Veterans of Foreign Wars $450,000 $450,000 P General Revenue Fund Total $2,788,000 $2,788,000 Q TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,788,000 $2,788,000 Section 415.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DVS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 900321 Veterans' Homes $51,956,758 $52,999,692 D GRF 900402 Hall of Fame $74,317 $75,966 E GRF 900408 Department of Veterans Services $5,327,924 $5,428,649 F GRF 900645 Veterans Long Term Healthcare Needs and Support (VET) $1,559,990 $1,559,990 G GRF 900901 Veterans Compensation General Obligation Bond Debt Service $975,000 $0 H General Revenue Fund Total $59,893,989 $60,064,297 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group J 4840 900603 Veterans' Homes Services $680,004 $700,000 K 4E20 900602 Veterans' Homes Operating $14,000,000 $14,000,000 L 5DB0 900643 Military Injury Relief Program $97,000 $97,000 M 5YP0 900650 Sports Gaming - Veterans $75,000 $75,000 N Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $14,852,004 $14,872,000 O Federal Fund Group P 3680 900614 Veterans Training $980,404 $1,021,705 Q 3BX0 900609 Medicare Services $1,000,000 $2,059,273 R 3L20 900601 Veterans' Homes Operations - Federal $31,500,000 $31,500,000 S Federal Fund Group Total $33,480,404 $34,580,978 T TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $108,226,397 $109,517,275 Section 415.20. VETERANS ORGANIZATIONS' RENT The foregoing appropriation item 900408, Department of Veterans Services, shall be used to pay veterans organizations' rent in buildings managed by the Department of Administrative Services. USA CARES - OHIO Of the foregoing appropriation item 900408, Department of Veterans Services, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to USA Cares - Ohio. VETERANS COMPENSATION GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND DEBT SERVICE The foregoing appropriation item 900901, Veterans Compensation General Obligation Bond Debt Service, shall be used to pay all debt service and related financing costs during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, on obligations issued under Section 2r of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. VETERANS HOME MODERNIZATION An amount equal to the unexpended and unencumbered portions of appropriation item 900411, Veterans Homes Modernization, under the Veterans Homes Modernization Fund (Fund 5ZO0) plus an amount equal to cash previously expended but returned to the fund at the end of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. An amount equal to the unexpended and unencumbered portions of appropriation item 900411, Veterans Homes Modernization, under the Veterans Homes Modernization Fund (Fund 5ZO0) plus an amount equal to cash previously expended but returned to the fund at the end of fiscal year 2026 are hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. Section 417.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DVM STATE VETERINARY MEDICAL LICENSING BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 888609 Operating Expenses $532,551 $554,811 D 5YG0 888603 Veterinarian Student Debt Assistance Program $100,000 $100,000 E Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $632,551 $654,811 F Internal Service Activity Fund Group G 5BU0 888602 Veterinary Student Loan Program $20,000 $20,000 H Internal Service Activity Fund Group Total $20,000 $20,000 I TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $652,551 $674,811 Section 419.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A VPB STATE VISION PROFESSIONALS BOARD B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 4K90 129609 Operating Expenses $609,659 $668,146 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $609,659 $668,146 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $609,659 $668,146 Section 421.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A DYS DEPARTMENT OF YOUTH SERVICES B General Revenue Fund C GRF 470401 RECLAIM Ohio $207,000,000 $218,000,000 D GRF 470412 Juvenile Correctional Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments $17,500,000 $17,500,000 E GRF 470510 Youth Services $16,702,000 $16,702,000 F GRF 472321 Parole Operations $11,547,202 $11,926,365 G GRF 477321 Administrative Operations $17,177,391 $18,017,753 H General Revenue Fund Total $269,926,593 $282,146,118 I Dedicated Purpose Fund Group J 1470 470612 Vocational Education $1,436,125 $1,494,968 K 1750 470613 Education Services $4,140,884 $4,317,416 L 4790 470609 Employee Food Service $30,300 $30,300 M 4A20 470602 Child Support $95,000 $95,000 N 4G60 470605 Juvenile Special Revenue - Non-Federal $115,000 $115,000 O 5BN0 470629 E-Rate Program $71,000 $71,000 P Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $5,888,309 $6,123,684 Q Federal Fund Group R 3210 470601 Education $1,899,343 $1,956,154 S 3210 470603 Juvenile Justice Prevention $2,473,806 $2,481,942 T 3210 470606 Nutrition $1,551,000 $1,551,000 U 3210 470614 Title IV-E Reimbursements $1,521,776 $1,529,243 V 3V50 470604 Juvenile Justice/Delinquency Prevention $1,657,737 $1,731,824 W Federal Fund Group Total $9,103,662 $9,250,163 X TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $284,918,564 $297,519,965 Section 421.20. COMMUNITY PROGRAMS For purposes of implementing juvenile sentencing reforms, and notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Department of Youth Services may use up to $1,375,000 of the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the portion of appropriation item 470401, RECLAIM Ohio, that is allocated to juvenile correctional facilities in each fiscal year to expand Targeted RECLAIM, the Behavioral Health Juvenile Justice Initiative, and other evidence-based community programs. JUVENILE CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES LEASE RENTAL BOND PAYMENTS The foregoing appropriation item 470412, Juvenile Correctional Facilities Lease Rental Bond Payments, shall be used to meet all payments during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, by the Department of Youth Services under the leases and agreements for facilities made under Chapters 152. and 154. of the Revised Code. These appropriations are the source of funds pledged for bond service charges on related obligations issued under Chapters 152. and 154. of the Revised Code. EDUCATION SERVICES The foregoing appropriation item 470613, Education Services, shall be used to fund the operating expenses of providing educational services to youth supervised by the Department of Youth Services. Operating expenses include, but are not limited to, teachers' salaries, maintenance costs, and educational equipment. FLEXIBLE FUNDING FOR CHILDREN AND FAMILIES In collaboration with the county family and children first council, the juvenile court of that county that receives allocations from one or both of the foregoing appropriation items 470401, RECLAIM Ohio, and 470510, Youth Services, may transfer portions of those allocations to a flexible funding pool as authorized by the section of this act titled "FAMILY AND CHILDREN FIRST FLEXIBLE FUNDING POOL." Section 423.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A KID DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH B General Revenue Fund C GRF 650400 Medicaid Program Support - State $1,393,000 $1,393,000 D GRF 830321 Children and Youth Program Management $55,000,000 $55,500,000 E GRF 830400 Child Care State/Maintenance of Effort $93,636,000 $93,636,000 F GRF 830402 Maternal and Infant Housing Assistance $500,000 $500,000 G GRF 830403 Help Me Grow $60,000,000 $63,000,000 H GRF 830404 Infant Vitality $18,000,000 $18,000,000 I GRF 830405 Part C Early Intervention $30,000,000 $32,000,000 J GRF 830406 Strong Families Strong Communities $7,500,000 $2,500,000 K GRF 830407 Early Childhood Education $130,319,450 $130,320,617 L GRF 830409 Early Care and Education Learning Standards $6,052,091 $6,150,959 M GRF 830410 Family and Children First $2,706,000 $2,706,000 N GRF 830411 Imagination Library $8,250,000 $8,250,000 O GRF 830414 Child Care Cred Program $10,000,000 $0 P GRF 830415 Parenting and Pregnancy Program $10,000,000 $10,000,000 Q GRF 830416 Adoption Grant Program $34,000,000 $34,000,000 R GRF 830418 Child Care Provider Recruitment $1,000,000 $1,850,000 S GRF 830419 Children's Crisis Care $1,350,000 $1,350,000 T GRF 830420 Community Projects and Assistance $3,100,000 $2,600,000 U GRF 830421 Responsible Fatherhood Initiative Grant Program $5,000,000 $15,000,000 V GRF 830500 Early Care and Education $141,285,000 $141,285,000 W GRF 830501 Kinship Permanency Incentive Program $1,000,000 $1,000,000 X GRF 830502 Court Appointed Special Advocates $1,000,000 $1,000,000 Y GRF 830503 Adoption Services $23,992,000 $23,992,000 Z GRF 830505 Infant and Early Childhood Mental Health (ECMH) $4,100,000 $4,100,000 AA GRF 830506 Family and Children Services $291,759,990 $296,409,990 AB General Revenue Fund Total $940,943,531 $946,543,566 AC Dedicated Purpose Fund Group AD 1980 830600 Children's Trust Fund $5,770,407 $5,800,246 AE 2320 830613 Family and Children First $2,485,214 $2,514,051 AF 4E70 830615 Family and Children Services Collections $650,000 $650,000 AG 4F10 830607 Family and Children Activities $655,000 $655,000 AH 5BN1 830618 Child Welfare Training Support $7,387,465 $7,387,465 AI 5BO1 830620 Children and Youth Community Initiatives $20,000,000 $10,000,000 AJ 5BP1 830621 Agency Oversight and Support $9,000,000 $9,000,000 AK 5CN0 830617 Choose Life $80,000 $80,000 AL 5U60 830619 Family and Children Support $400,000 $400,000 AM Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $46,428,086 $36,486,762 AN Federal Fund Group AO 3201 830608 Maternal and Child Health Block Grant $5,000,000 $5,000,000 AP 3270 830601 Child Welfare $31,024,665 $31,147,396 AQ 3980 830612 Adoption Program $215,000,000 $215,000,000 AR 3A91 830622 Mental Health Block Grant $1,698,892 $1,698,892 AS 3C50 830610 Preschool Special Education $16,026,864 $16,026,864 AT 3D30 830602 Children's Trust Fund $7,030,643 $7,048,243 AU 3F02 650600 Medicaid Program Support - Federal $1,393,000 $1,393,000 AV 3H70 830604 Child Care $646,049,427 $591,221,224 AW 3IT0 830609 Community Social Service Programs $22,803,908 $22,803,908 AX 3IU0 830623 Federal Children and Youth Grants $52,000,000 $52,000,000 AY 3N00 830603 Foster Care Program $337,778,385 $338,091,973 AZ 3V62 830605 TANF Block Grant $327,850,000 $327,850,000 BA Federal Fund Group Total $1,663,655,784 $1,609,281,500 BB TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $2,651,027,401 $2,592,311,828 Section 423.20. MATERNAL AND INFANT HOUSING ASSISTANCE Of the foregoing appropriation item 830402, Maternal and Infant Housing Assistance, up to $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support stable housing initiatives for pregnant mothers and their families to improve maternal and infant health outcomes. Section 423.30. INFANT VITALITY GRANTS AND PROGRAMS Of the foregoing appropriation item, 830404, Infant Vitality, up to $5,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support programming by community and local faith-based service providers that invests in maternal health programs, provides services and support to pregnant mothers, and improves both maternal and infant health outcomes. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830404, Infant Vitality, up to $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the per diem nonmedical services provided by residential infant care centers. The remainder of appropriation item 830404, Infant Vitality, shall be used to fund a multi-pronged population health approach to address infant mortality. This approach may include the following: increasing awareness; supporting data collection; analysis and interpretation to inform decision-making and ensure accountability; targeting resources where the need is greatest; and implementing quality improvement science and programming that is evidence-based or based on emerging practices. Measurable interventions may include activities related to safe sleep, community engagement, group prenatal care, preconception education, continuous support for women during pregnancy and childbirth, patient navigators, community health workers, early childhood home visiting, safe birth spacing, gestational diabetes, smoking cessation tailored for pregnant women, breastfeeding, care coordination, and progesterone. Section 423.40. PART C EARLY INTERVENTION Of the foregoing appropriation item 830405, Part C Early Intervention, up to $7,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 may be used by the Department of Children and Youth to subgrant or contract with county boards of developmental disabilities for the provision of early intervention evaluations, assessments, and service coordination. County boards of developmental disabilities that accept these funds shall maintain the level of local funding for early intervention at the same funding level as the prior fiscal year. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830405, Part C Early Intervention, $1,000,000 in total in each fiscal year shall be used to contract with the Cleveland Sight Center, the Cincinnati Association for the Blind and Visually Impaired, and the Sight Center of Northwest Ohio to provide early intervention special instruction services and family support to children under the age of three with blindness or low vision. Section 423.50. CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH Of the foregoing appropriation item 830406, Strong Families Strong Communities, up to $2,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide funding for community projects across the state that focus on support for families, assisting families in avoiding crisis, and crisis intervention. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830406, Strong Families Strong Communities, $500,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to Riveon Mental Health and Recovery to support primary care integration. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830505, Infant and Early Childhood Mental Health, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to St. Vincent Family Services to support their Early Childhood Mental Health Consultation Program. The remainder of appropriation item 830505, Infant and Early Childhood Mental Health, shall be used to promote identification and intervention for early childhood mental health and to enhance healthy social emotional development in order to reduce preschool expulsions and promote kindergarten readiness. Funds shall be used by the Department of Children and Youth, in coordination with Department of Behavioral Health, to support infant and early childhood mental health credentialed professionals and consultation services, as well as administration, workforce development for the program, and program evaluation. Section 423.60. PEDIATRIC CANCER RESEARCH Of the foregoing appropriation item 830406, Strong Families Strong Communities, up to $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used to provide funding to qualified entities in Ohio to support any of the following: (A) Research into causes, diagnoses, prevention, and treatment of pediatric cancer; (B) The study of new and novel approaches to researching and treating pediatric cancer, as well as the side effects of cancer treatment, including discovering and developing new drugs, clinical trials, neurosurgery, and other surgical interventions, diagnostics, care management, and learning disabilities. Section 423.70. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION The foregoing appropriation item 830407, Early Childhood Education, shall be used to pay the costs of the Early Childhood Education Grant Program to provide quality preschool instruction to improve kindergarten readiness. The Department shall distribute such funds directly to qualifying providers as specified in section 5104.53 of the Revised Code. Section 423.80. EARLY CARE AND EDUCATION LEARNING STANDARDS The foregoing appropriation item 830409, Early Care and Education Learning Standards, shall be used to support the state's early learning assessment work, the assessments required under section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code, and the implementation of curricula, assessments, and learning activities that are aligned with the science of reading and the early learning and development standards. Section 423.85. CHILD CARE CRED PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 830414, Child Care Cred Program, shall be used for the Child Care Cred Program established in section 5104.54 of the Revised Code. Section 423.90. PARENTING AND PREGNANCY PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 830415, Parenting and Pregnancy Program, shall be used, in accordance with section 5180.71 of the Revised Code, to support the Ohio Parenting and Pregnancy Program. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of appropriation item 830415, Parenting and Pregnancy Program, at the end of fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation item for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. Section 423.100. ADOPTION GRANT PROGRAM The foregoing appropriation item 830416, Adoption Grant Program, shall be used to administer grants to adoptive parents through the Adoption Grant Program, in accordance with sections 5180.451 and 5180.452 of the Revised Code. Section 423.103. CHILD CARE PROVIDER RECRUITMENT The foregoing appropriation item 830418, Child Care Provider Recruitment, shall be used for the Child Care Provider Recruitment and Mentorship Grant Program established in Section 751.30 of this act. Section 423.105. COMMUNITY PROJECTS AND ASSISTANCE Of the foregoing appropriation item 830420, Community Projects and Assistance, $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be distributed to Birthing Beautiful Communities to provide perinatal support services for at-risk mothers and children in Cuyahoga and Summit counties. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830420, Community Projects and Assistance, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to Applewood Centers, Inc., to expand its foster care program. Section 423.106. DIAGNOSTIC ULTRASOUND MACHINE PROGRAM The Director of Children and Youth shall create a grant program through which entities may apply to receive diagnostic ultrasound machines purchased in accordance with this section. The Director shall establish the grant application and administration process. To be eligible to receive a diagnostic ultrasound machine through the grant program, all of the following must apply to an entity: (A) The entity must meet all conditions set forth in division (B) of section 5180.71 of the Revised Code, including that the entity does not charge a fee for diagnostic ultrasound services provided to pregnant women and women who suspect they may be pregnant and does not promote abortion, perform abortion-related medical procedures, or make referrals for abortions. (B) The entity is physically located in Ohio. (C) The entity is not a hospital, federally qualified health center, or ambulatory surgical facility. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830420, Community Projects and Assistance, $2,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used by the Director of Children and Youth to competitively bid for the purchase of new three-dimensional diagnostic ultrasound machines. Section 423.108. RESPONSIBLE FATHERHOOD INITIATIVE GRANTS The foregoing appropriation item 830421, Responsible Fatherhood Initiative Grants, shall be used to award grants under the Responsible Fatherhood Initiative Grant Program, in accordance with section 5180.706 of the Revised Code. Of this amount, not more than two per cent in each fiscal year shall be used for administrative purposes. On June 30 of each fiscal year, the Department of Children and Youth shall encumber an amount equal to any unexpended funds in appropriation item 830421, Responsible Fatherhood Initiative Grants. Funds encumbered shall be used for the same purposes in the following fiscal year. Section 423.110. COURT APPOINTED SPECIAL ADVOCATES Of the foregoing appropriation item 830502, Court Appointed Special Advocates, up to $333,333 in each fiscal year shall be used to support administrative costs associated with existing court-appointed special advocate programs. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830502, Court Appointed Special Advocates, up to $666,667 in each fiscal year shall be used to establish court-appointed special advocate programs in areas of the state that are not served by an existing program and to support existing programs. Section 423.120. FAMILY AND CHILDREN SERVICES AND ACTIVITIES Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, up to $25,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to assist with the expense of providing services to youth requiring support from multiple systems. These funds may be used for youth currently in the custody of a public children services agency or to prevent children from entering into the custody of a public children services agency by custody relinquishment or another mechanism. The Director of Children and Youth shall adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code to administer the funding. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, up to $7,500,000 in each fiscal year may be used to incentivize best practices. The Director of Children and Youth shall adopt rules in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code to administer the funding. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, $100,000 in each fiscal year shall be distributed to Cleveland State University for the Sullivan-Deckard Scholarship Opportunity Program and the Helen Packer Scholarship Program to provide tuition and wrap-around services to young adults who have aged out of foster care. Of the foregoing appropriation item, 830506, Family and Children Services, up to $180,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and up to $185,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 shall be provided by the Department of Children and Youth, in coordination with the Department of Job and Family Services, to public children services agencies. Of that amount, $17,600,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to provide an initial allocation of $200,000 to each county and the remainder shall be provided using the formula in section 5180.41 of the Revised Code. If the funds available for distribution under section 5180.41 of the Revised Code in fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027 exceed the amount appropriated in fiscal year 2019, each county contributing local funds in county fiscal year 2019 to the county children services fund shall contribute moneys to the children services fund described in section 5180.411 of the Revised Code. The Director of Children and Youth, in consultation and coordination with the Director of Job and Family Services shall adopt rules, in accordance with section 111.15 of the Revised Code, to determine the amount of local funds each county must contribute to the children services fund based on past contributions. Rules must include a hardship provision identifying circumstances in which the county contribution may be waived or reduced. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, up to $35,309,990 in each fiscal year shall be used to support activities associated with the delivery of children services activities, including recruiting and retaining foster parents, identifying and supporting kinship providers, family preservation, prevention, direct services, and best practices. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, $10,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to assist with the establishment of regional child wellness campuses. The Department of Children and Youth shall provide one-time funding to establish regional child wellness campuses across the state to serve children and youth who are, or have been determined by a public children services agency to be at risk of being, in the custody of a public children services agency and who are not placed in a licensed residential setting and are otherwise spending one or more nights in an unlicensed setting. Regional child wellness campuses shall support children in crisis in or near the communities in which the children reside and create additional capacity for short-term treatment. The Department of Children and Youth shall select entities applying to establish regional child wellness campuses through a competitive process. An entity shall provide proof of local funding commitments that fulfill all necessary start-up costs and ongoing community commitments to ensure timely and appropriate delivery of service to meet the needs of the child, family, and community. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, $350,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used for the Providence House Every Child Ohio Feasibility Study to identify the most viable Ohio communities with the capacity to sustainably operate a children's crisis care facility, as defined in section 5103.13 of the Revised Code. The results and recommendations of the study shall be submitted in a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Director of Children and Youth by September 30, 2026. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, up to $17,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for federal match requirements for Title IV-B and Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 601-687 funding. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, up to $3,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided to the Ohio Network of Children's Advocacy Centers to administer and distribute grants to Child Advocacy Centers to coordinate statewide access to investigation, prosecution, and treatment of child sexual abuse, while helping children heal. The foregoing appropriation item 830607, Family and Children Activities, shall be used to expend miscellaneous foundation funds and grants to support family and children services activities. Section 423.130. KINSHIP CARE NAVIGATOR PROGRAM Of the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, up to $8,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to support the Kinship Care Navigator Program, and may be used to match eligible federal Title IV-E of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 601-687 funds. Section 423.140. WENDY'S WONDERFUL KIDS Of the foregoing appropriation items 830506, Family and Children Services, 830601, Child Welfare, and 830612, Adoption Program, a total of up to $10,000,000 in each fiscal year may be used to provide funds to the Dave Thomas Foundation for Adoption to implement statewide the Wendy's Wonderful Kids program of professional recruiters who use a child-focused model to find permanent homes for children in Ohio foster care. Section 423.150. FAMILY AND CHILDREN FIRST FLEXIBLE FUNDING POOL A county family and children first council may establish and operate a flexible funding pool in order to assure access to needed services by families, children, and older adults in need of protective services. The operation of the flexible funding pools is subject to the following restrictions: (A) The county council shall establish and operate the flexible funding pool in accordance with formal guidance issued by the Family and Children First Cabinet Council; (B) The county council shall produce an annual report on its use of the pooled funds. The annual report shall conform to a format prescribed in the formal guidance issued by the Family and Children First Cabinet Council; (C) Unless otherwise restricted, funds transferred to the flexible funding pool may include state general revenues allocated to local entities to support the provision of services to families and children; (D) The amounts transferred to the flexible funding pool shall be limited to amounts that can be redirected without impairing the achievement of the objectives for which the initial allocation is designated; and (E) Each amount transferred to the flexible funding pool from a specific allocation shall be approved for transfer by the director of the local agency that was the original recipient of the allocation. In collaboration with the county family and children first council, a county department of job and family services or public children services agency that receives an allocation from the Department of Children and Youth, in consultation and coordination with the Department of Job and Family Services, from the foregoing appropriation item 830506, Family and Children Services, or 830502, Court Appointed Special Advocates, may transfer a portion of either or both allocations to a flexible funding pool as authorized by this section. Section 423.160. CHILDRENS CRISIS CARE The foregoing appropriation item 830419, Childrens Crisis Care, shall be allocated by the Department of Children and Youth in each fiscal year to children's crisis care facilities as defined in section 5103.13 of the Revised Code. The Director of Children and Youth shall calculate funds semi-annually and allocate funds quarterly based on the total number of days of care for each child residing in the facility, which is determined by calculating the total days each child resides at the crisis care facility, including the date of admission, but not the day of discharge. A children's crisis care facility may decline to receive funds provided under this section. A children's crisis care facility that accepts funds provided under this section shall use the funds in accordance with section 5103.13 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted under that section. Section 423.170. MATERNAL AND CHILD HEALTH BLOCK GRANT Of the foregoing appropriation item 830608, Maternal and Child Health Block Grant, up to $5,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used to implement Title V Maternal and Child Health Services Block Grant activities in the prenatal, maternal, perinatal, and infant domains. Section 423.180. MENTAL HEALTH BLOCK GRANT The foregoing appropriation item 830622, Mental Health Block Grant, shall be used for infant and early childhood mental health activities. Section 423.190. CHILD CARE CHOICE VOUCHER PROGRAM (A) Of the foregoing appropriation item, 830604, Child Care, a portion in each fiscal year, along with $50,000,000 in each fiscal year in appropriation item 830605, TANF Block Grant, shall be used by the Department of Children and Youth to establish and administer the Child Care Choice Voucher Program. Subject to available funds, the program shall provide support, in the form of vouchers, to families to assist them with child care costs. To be eligible to participate in the program, a family must meet all of the following conditions: (1) The caretaker parent is employed or participating in a program of education or training for an amount of time reasonably related to the time that the parent's children are receiving child care. (2) The family does not meet the income conditions for initial eligibility under the Publicly Funded Child Care Program administered by the Department as described in section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, but the maximum amount of the family's income does not exceed two hundred percent of the federal poverty line. (3) The family meets any other condition established by the Department. (B) In providing vouchers under this section, both of the following apply: (1) The program shall utilize, not later than November 1, 2026, the publicly funded child care payment rates established in section 5104.30 of the Revised Code, except that such payment rates shall not be enhanced payment rates as described in division (E)(2)(c) of that section. (2) If a participating family uses its voucher at a type A family child care home or licensed type B family child care home, the program shall not require the family child care home to be rated through the Step Up to Quality Program administered by the Department as described in section 5104.29 of the Revised Code. Section 423.200. COMMUNITY SOCIAL SERVICE PROGRAMS A portion of the foregoing appropriation item 830609, Community Social Service Programs, may be used by the Early Intervention Services Advisory Council for the following purposes: (A) In addition to other necessary and allowed uses of funds and in accordance with 20 U.S.C. 1441(d), the Early Intervention Services Advisory Council established pursuant to section 5123.0422 of the Revised Code, may, in its discretion, use budgeted funds to do all of the following: (1) Conduct forums and hearings; (2) Reimburse council members for reasonable and necessary expenses, including child care expenses for parent representatives, for attending council meetings and performing council duties; (3) Pay compensation to a council member if the member is not employed or must forfeit wages from other employment when performing official council business; (4) Hire staff; (5) Obtain the services of professional, technical, and clerical personnel as necessary to carry out the performance of its lawful functions. (B) Except as provided in division (A) of this section, council members shall serve without compensation or reimbursement. Section 423.210. FEDERAL CHILDREN AND YOUTH GRANTS Of the foregoing appropriation item 830623, Federal Children and Youth Grants, up to $195,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for the training of guardians ad litem and court-appointed special advocates as well as to conduct a study to demonstrate the impact of court-appointed special advocate volunteers on outcomes for children who are in child welfare custody as a result of abuse, neglect, or dependency. Section 423.220. TEMPORARY ASSISTANCE FOR NEEDY FAMILIES BLOCK GRANT Of the foregoing appropriation item 830605, TANF Block Grant, up to $5,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be used for the Kinship Permanency Incentive Program established under section 5180.52 of the Revised Code to promote a permanent commitment by kinship caregivers through becoming guardians and custodians over minor children who would otherwise be unsafe or at risk of harm if they remained in their own homes. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830605, TANF Block Grant, up to $2,500,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Ohio Commission on Fatherhood. Of the foregoing appropriation item 830605, TANF Block Grant, up to $1,000,000 in each fiscal year shall be provided, in accordance with sections 5101.80 and 5101.801 of the Revised Code, to the Ohio Children's Trust Fund. Section 423.230. PUBLICLY FUNDED CHILD CARE ELIGIBILITY Beginning on the effective date of this section and through June 30, 2027, all of the following apply to a family's eligibility for publicly funded child care as described in division (A) of section 5104.38 of the Revised Code: (A) Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the maximum amount of income that a family may have for initial eligibility shall not exceed one hundred forty-five per cent of the federal poverty line; (B) For special needs child care, as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code, the maximum amount of income that the family may have for initial eligibility shall not exceed one hundred fifty per cent of the federal poverty line; (C) The maximum amount of income that a family may have for continued eligibility shall not exceed three hundred per cent of the federal poverty line. Section 423.240. MULTI-SYSTEM YOUTH (A) As used in this section: (1) "Multi-system youth" are children and adolescents who are receiving services from two or more of the following systems: child protective services, behavioral health services, developmental disabilities services, juvenile court, and medicaid. (2) "Licensed care" means detention facilities, shelter facilities, certified children's crisis care facilities, certified foster homes, placement in a prospective adoptive home prior to the issuance of a final decree of adoption, organizations, certified organizations, group home providers, group homes, institutions, state institutions, residential facilities, or residential care facilities. (B) The following departments must collaborate to identify and take appropriate action with available resources to meet the needs of multi-system youth more effectively: (1) The Department of Job and Family Services; (2) The Department of Children and Youth; (3) The Department of Behavioral Health; (4) The Department of Developmental Disabilities; (5) The Department of Youth Services; (6) The Department of Medicaid. (C) Not later than one year after the effective date of this section, the departments described in division (B) of this section must jointly submit to the General Assembly a report with policy recommendations and the following information: (1) Data on the number of multi-system youth; (2) Data on the number of multi-system youth who are placed in licensed care; (3) Information on how the departments described in division (B) of this section track multi-system youth; (4) A summary of actions taken by the departments to better serve multi-system youth." Section 423.250. (A) Not later than December 31, 2025, and through June 30, 2027, both of the following apply to the administration of publicly funded child care as described in section 5104.30 of the Revised Code: (1) The Department of Children and Youth shall establish the following payment categories and time increments for the number of hours per week that a child is authorized for publicly funded child care: (a) The hourly category, for hours of care totaling fewer than ten hours per week; (b) The part-time category, for hours of care totaling ten hours to fewer than thirty-three hours per week; (c) The full-time category, for hours of care totaling thirty-three or more hours per week. The department shall not establish categories other than those described in this division that pertain to the number of hours a child is authorized for publicly funded child care. (2) In establishing payment rates under the publicly funded child care program for type A family child care homes, the Department of Children and Youth shall not align those rates with rates for child care centers. The Department shall instead align type A family child care home rates with rates for type B family child care homes. When aligning type A and type B family child care home payment rates, the Department shall pay the rates established pursuant to section 5104.30 of the Revised Code. Section 425.10. 1 2 3 4 5 A NAI NEW AFRICAN IMMIGRANTS COMMISSION B General Revenue Fund C GRF 061501 Operating Expenses $250,000 $250,000 D General Revenue Fund Total $250,000 $250,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $250,000 $250,000 Section 503.10. PERSONAL SERVICE EXPENSES Unless otherwise prohibited by law, any appropriation from which personal service expenses are paid shall bear the employer's share of public employees' retirement, workers' compensation, disabled workers' relief, and insurance programs; the costs of centralized financial services, centralized payroll processing, and related reports and services; centralized human resources services, including affirmative action and equal employment opportunity programs; the Office of Collective Bargaining; centralized information technology management services; administering the enterprise resource planning system; and administering the state employee merit system as required by section 124.07 of the Revised Code. These costs shall be determined in conformity with the appropriate sections of law and paid in accordance with procedures specified by the Office of Budget and Management. Expenditures from appropriation item 070601, Public Audit Expense - Intra-State, may be exempted from the requirements of this section. Section 503.15. APPROPRIATIONS FOR EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION CHANGES Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with the pay period that includes July 1, 2025, each state appointing authority is authorized to make expenditures from current state operating appropriations contained in this act or any other act necessary to provide for the changes to compensation provisions pursuant to approved collective bargaining agreements between employee organizations and State of Ohio public employers and pursuant to provisions of law, as amended by this act, for employees exempt from collective bargaining to allow parity for those employees. Section 503.20. SATISFACTION OF JUDGMENTS AND SETTLEMENTS AGAINST THE STATE Except as otherwise provided in this section, an appropriation in this act may be used for the purpose of satisfying judgments, settlements, or administrative awards ordered or approved by the Court of Claims or by any other court of competent jurisdiction in connection with civil actions against the state. This authorization does not apply to appropriations to be applied to or used for payment of guarantees by or on behalf of the state, or for payments under lease agreements relating to, or debt service on, bonds, notes, or other obligations of the state. Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, this authorization includes appropriations from funds into which proceeds of direct obligations of the state are deposited only to the extent that the judgment, settlement, or administrative award is for, or represents, capital costs for which the appropriation may otherwise be used and is consistent with the purpose for which any related obligations were issued or entered into. Nothing contained in this section is intended to subject the state to suit in any forum in which it is not otherwise subject to suit, and is not intended to waive or compromise any defense or right available to the state in any suit against it. Section 503.30. CAPITAL PROJECT SETTLEMENTS This section specifies an additional and supplemental procedure to provide for payments of judgments and settlements if the Director of Budget and Management determines, pursuant to division (C)(4) of section 2743.19 of the Revised Code, that sufficient unencumbered moneys do not exist in the fund to support a particular appropriation to pay the amount of a final judgment rendered against the state or a state agency, including the settlement of a claim approved by a court, in an action upon and arising out of a contractual obligation for the construction or improvement of a capital facility if the costs under the contract were payable in whole or in part from a state capital projects appropriation. In such a case, the Director may either proceed pursuant to division (C)(4) of section 2743.19 of the Revised Code or apply to the Controlling Board to increase an appropriation or create an appropriation out of any unencumbered moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the capital projects fund from which the initial state appropriation was made. The amount of an increase in appropriation or new appropriation approved by the Controlling Board is hereby appropriated from the applicable capital projects fund and made available for the payment of the judgment or settlement. If the Director does not make the application authorized by this section or the Controlling Board disapproves the application, and the Director does not make application under division (C)(4) of section 2743.19 of the Revised Code, the Director shall for the purpose of making that payment make a request to the General Assembly as provided for in division (C)(5) of that section. Section 503.40. RE-ISSUANCE OF VOIDED WARRANTS In order to provide funds for the reissuance of voided warrants under section 126.37 of the Revised Code, there is hereby appropriated, out of moneys in the state treasury from the fund credited as provided in section 126.37 of the Revised Code, that amount sufficient to pay such warrants when approved by the Office of Budget and Management. Section 503.50. REAPPROPRIATION OF UNEXPENDED ENCUMBERED BALANCES OF OPERATING APPROPRIATIONS (A) Notwithstanding the original year of appropriation or encumbrance, the unexpended balance of an operating appropriation or reappropriation that a state agency lawfully encumbered prior to the close of fiscal year 2025 or fiscal year 2026 is hereby reappropriated on the first day of July of the following fiscal year from the fund from which it was originally appropriated or reappropriated for the period of time listed in this section and shall remain available only for the purpose of discharging the encumbrance: (1) For an encumbrance for personal services, maintenance, equipment, or items for resale not otherwise identified in this section, for a period of not more than five months from the end of the fiscal year; (2) For an encumbrance for an item of special order manufacture not available on state contract or an item not available in the open market, for a period of not more than five months from the end of the fiscal year or, with the written approval of the Director of Budget and Management, for a period of not more than twelve months from the end of the fiscal year; (3) For an encumbrance for reclamation of land or oil and gas wells, for a period ending when the encumbered appropriation is expended; (4) For an encumbrance for any other type of expense not otherwise identified in division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, for such period as the Director approves, provided such period does not extend beyond the FY 2026 - FY 2027 biennium. (B) Any operating appropriations for which unexpended balances are reappropriated in fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027 pursuant to division (A)(2) of this section shall be reported to the Controlling Board by the Director of Budget and Management by the thirty-first day of December of each year. The report shall include the item, the cost of the item, and the name of the vendor. The report shall be updated on a quarterly basis for encumbrances remaining open. (C) Upon the expiration of the reappropriation period set out in division (A) of this section, a reappropriation made by this section lapses and the Director of Budget and Management shall cancel the encumbrance of the unexpended reappropriation not later than the end of the weekend following the expiration of the reappropriation period. (D) If the Controlling Board approved a purchase, that approval remains in effect so long as the appropriation used to make that purchase remains encumbered. Section 503.60. CORRECTION OF ACCOUNTING ERRORS (A) The Director of Budget and Management may correct accounting errors committed by the staff of the Office of Budget and Management, such as reestablishing encumbrances or appropriations canceled in error, during the cancellation of operating encumbrances in November and of non-operating encumbrances in December. (B) The Director of Budget and Management may at any time correct accounting errors committed by staff or a state agency or state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, such as reestablishing prior year non-operating encumbrances canceled or modified in error. The reestablished encumbrance amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 503.70. TEMPORARY REVENUE HOLDING The Director of Budget and Management may create funds in the state treasury solely for the purpose of temporarily holding revenue required to be credited to a fund in the state treasury, whose disposition is not immediately known at the time of receipt. Once identified, the Director shall credit the revenue to the appropriate fund in the state treasury. Notwithstanding section 153.63 of the Revised Code or any other provision of law to the contrary, upon certification by a director or head of a state agency, in lieu of banks, buildings and loan associations, or other institutions, the Director of Budget and Management may create funds in the state treasury on behalf of an agency when the agency is required by law to detain funds in escrow. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund while the detained amounts remain in escrow. The Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash between funds within the state treasury to satisfy escrow requirements. Section 503.80. APPROPRIATIONS RELATED TO CASH TRANSFERS AND RE-ESTABLISHMENT OF ENCUMBRANCES Any cash transferred by the Director of Budget and Management under section 126.15 of the Revised Code is hereby appropriated. Any amounts necessary to re-establish appropriations or encumbrances under section 126.15 of the Revised Code are hereby appropriated. Section 503.90. TRANSFERS OF THIRD FRONTIER APPROPRIATIONS The Director of Budget and Management may transfer appropriations between the Third Frontier Research and Development Fund (Fund 7011) and the Third Frontier Research and Development Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7014) as necessary to maintain the exclusion from the calculation of gross income for federal income taxation purposes under the Internal Revenue Code with respect to obligations issued to fund projects appropriated from the Third Frontier Research and Development Fund (Fund 7011). The Director may also create new appropriation items within the Third Frontier Research and Development Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7014) and make transfers of appropriations to them for projects originally funded from appropriations made from the Third Frontier Research and Development Fund (Fund 7011). Section 503.100. INCOME TAX DISTRIBUTION TO COUNTIES There are hereby appropriated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the General Revenue Fund, which are not otherwise appropriated, funds sufficient to make any payment required by division (B)(2) of section 5747.03 of the Revised Code. Section 503.110. EXPENDITURES AND APPROPRIATION INCREASES APPROVED BY THE CONTROLLING BOARD Any money that the Controlling Board approves for expenditure or any increase in appropriation that the Controlling Board approves under sections 127.14, 131.35, and 131.39 of the Revised Code or any other provision of law is hereby appropriated for the period ending June 30, 2027. Section 503.120. FUNDS RECEIVED FOR USE OF GOVERNOR'S RESIDENCE If the Governor's Residence Fund (Fund 4H20) receives payment for use of the residence pursuant to section 107.40 of the Revised Code, the amounts so received are hereby appropriated to appropriation item 100604, Governor's Residence Gift. Section 503.140. FUND INVESTMENT EARNINGS Not later than July 15, 2025, the Office of Budget and Management shall redirect the investment earnings of the following funds to the General Revenue Fund from that date forward: (A) The Capitol Square Improvement Fund (Fund 5AN1); (B) The Health Care/Medicaid Support and Recoveries Fund (Fund 5DL0); (C) The Ohio Workforce Incumbent Job Training Fund (Fund 5NH0). Section 504.10. GENERAL OBLIGATION DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS Certain appropriations are in this act for the purpose of paying debt service and financing costs on general obligation bonds or notes of the state issued pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, Revised Code, and acts of the General Assembly. If it is determined that additional appropriations are necessary for this purpose, such amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 504.20. LEASE RENTAL PAYMENTS FOR DEBT SERVICE Certain appropriations are in this act for the purpose of making lease rental payments pursuant to leases and agreements relating to bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by or on behalf of the state pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, Revised Code, and acts of the General Assembly. If it is determined that additional appropriations are necessary for this purpose, such amounts are hereby appropriated. Section 504.30. AUTHORIZATION FOR TREASURER OF STATE AND OBM TO EFFECTUATE CERTAIN DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS The Office of Budget and Management shall process payments from general obligation and lease rental payment appropriation items during the period from July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2027, relating to bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by or on behalf of the state pursuant to the Ohio Constitution, Revised Code, and acts of the General Assembly. Payments shall be made upon certification by the Treasurer of State of the dates and the amounts due on those dates. Section 505.10. ARBITRAGE REBATE AUTHORIZATION If it is determined that a payment is necessary in the amount computed at the time to represent the portion of investment income to be rebated or amounts in lieu of or in addition to any rebate amount to be paid to the federal government in order to maintain the exclusion from gross income for federal income tax purposes of interest on those state obligations under section 148(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, such an amount is hereby appropriated from those funds designated by or pursuant to the applicable proceedings authorizing the issuance of state obligations. Payments for this purpose shall be approved and vouchered by the Office of Budget and Management. Section 505.20. STATEWIDE INDIRECT COST RECOVERY Whenever the Director of Budget and Management determines that an appropriation made to a state agency from a fund of the state is insufficient to provide for the recovery of statewide indirect costs under section 126.12 of the Revised Code, the amount required for such purpose is hereby appropriated from the available receipts of such fund. Section 505.30. TRANSFERS ON BEHALF OF THE STATEWIDE INDIRECT COST ALLOCATION PLAN The total transfers made from the General Revenue Fund by the Director of Budget and Management under this section shall not exceed the amounts transferred into the General Revenue Fund under section 126.12 of the Revised Code. The director of an agency may certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of expenses not allowed to be included in the Statewide Indirect Cost Allocation Plan under federal regulations, from any fund included in the Statewide Indirect Cost Allocation Plan, prepared as required by section 126.12 of the Revised Code. Upon determining that no alternative source of funding is available to pay for such expenses, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from the General Revenue Fund into the fund for which the certification is made, up to the amount of the certification. The director of the agency receiving such funds shall include, as part of the next budget submission prepared under section 126.02 of the Revised Code, a request for funding for such activities from an alternative source such that further federal disallowances would not be required. The director of an agency may certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of expenses paid in error from a fund included in the Statewide Indirect Cost Allocation Plan. The Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash from the fund from which the expenditure should have been made into the fund from which the expenses were erroneously paid, up to the amount of the certification. The director of an agency may certify to the Director of Budget and Management the amount of expenses or revenues not allowed to be included in the Statewide Indirect Cost Allocation Plan under federal regulations, for any fund included in the Statewide Indirect Cost Allocation Plan, for which the federal government requires payment. If the Director of Budget and Management determines that an appropriation made to a state agency from a fund of the state is insufficient to pay the amount required by the federal government, the amount required for such purpose is hereby appropriated from the available receipts of such fund, up to the amount of the certification. Section 505.35. TRANSFERS TO OAKS SUPPORT ORGANIZATION FUND Transfers from the General Revenue Fund to the OAKS Support Organization Fund (Fund 5EB0) under division (A)(2)(b) of section 126.12 of the Revised Code shall not exceed $1,250,000 cash in each fiscal year of the biennium ending June 30, 2027. Section 505.40. FEDERAL GOVERNMENT INTEREST REQUIREMENTS Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before the first day of September of each fiscal year, the Director of Budget and Management, in order to reduce the payment of adjustments to the federal government, as determined by the plan prepared under division (A) of section 126.12 of the Revised Code, may designate such funds as the Director considers necessary to retain their own interest earnings. Section 505.50. FEDERAL CASH MANAGEMENT IMPROVEMENT ACT Pursuant to the plan for compliance with the Federal Cash Management Improvement Act required by section 131.36 of the Revised Code, the Director of Budget and Management may cancel and re-establish all or part of encumbrances in like amounts within the funds identified by the plan. The amounts necessary to re-establish all or part of encumbrances are hereby appropriated. Section 505.60. INTEREST EARNINGS FOR FEDERAL FUNDS Notwithstanding section 113.09 of the Revised Code, the Director of Budget and Management may designate any fund within the state treasury that receives federal revenue to be credited with investment earnings to comply with federal law. Section 505.70. REPAYMENT OF FEDERAL FUNDS Any unexpended federal revenue received into the state treasury remaining at the end of its applicable period for expenditure which must be returned in compliance with federal law, is hereby appropriated to the fund in which it was received, for that purpose. Section 505.75. STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND An amount equal to the unexpended and unencumbered portions of appropriation items under the State Fiscal Recovery Fund (Fund 5CV3) plus an amount equal to cash previously expended but returned to the fund at the end of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. An amount equal to the unexpended and unencumbered portions of appropriation items under Fund 5CV3 plus an amount equal to cash previously expended but returned to the fund at the end of fiscal year 2026 are hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2027. The Director of Budget and Management may create new appropriation items under Fund 5CV3. In each fiscal year, the Director may transfer appropriation among newly created or existing appropriation items under Fund 5CV3. The Director shall report appropriation transfers made under this section to the Controlling Board no later than January 30, 2027. Section 505.80. REAPPROPRIATION OF RECOVERY AND RELIEF FUNDS Amounts equal to the unexpended portions of appropriation items under the following recovery and relief funds, at the end of fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation items and shall be used for the same purposes in fiscal year 2026: CARES Act School Relief Fund (Fund 3HS0), Governor's Emergency Education Relief Fund (Fund 3HQ0), Emergency Rental Assistance Fund (5CV2), ARPA Capital Projects Fund (5CV5), ARPA Home and Community Based Services – Federal Fund (Fund 3HC8), and ARPA Home and Community Based Services Fund (Fund 5HC8). Amounts equal to the unexpended portions of appropriation items under the following recovery and relief funds, at the end of fiscal year 2026, are hereby reappropriated to the same appropriation items and shall be used for the same purposes in fiscal year 2027: ARPA Home and Community Based Services – Federal Fund (Fund 3HC8), Governor's Emergency Education Relief Fund (Fund 3HQ0), CARES Act School Relief Fund (Fund 3HS0), Emergency Rental Assistance Fund (Fund 5CV2), ARPA Capital Projects Fund (Fund 5CV5), and ARPA Home and Community Based Services Fund (Fund 5HC8). Section 506.10. ONE TIME STRATEGIC COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS Notwithstanding Section 200.30 of H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly, the Office of Budget and Management shall not provide a grant from appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, to the Chardon High School Athletic Boosters for the Chardon Memorial Stadium Restroom and Concession Project. If any amount has been released prior to the effective date of this section, Chardon High School Athletic Boosters shall promptly return the unexpended portion of that amount, as of the effective date of this section, to the state treasury to the credit of the One Time Strategic Community Investments Fund (Fund 5AY1). The Office of Budget and Management shall distribute the amount returned by Chardon High School Athletic Boosters, if any, as follows: forty per cent to South Ridge Christian Academy for school building and roof renovations and sixty per cent to Agricultural Career Education Academy for DOPR career-technical program and infrastructure projects. This amount is hereby appropriated. Section 509.10. TRANSFERS INTO GENERAL REVENUE FUND INTEREST EARNED Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Budget and Management, through June 30, 2027, may transfer interest earned by any state fund to the General Revenue Fund. This section does not apply to funds whose source of revenue is restricted or protected by the Ohio Constitution, federal tax law, or the "Cash Management Improvement Act of 1990," 104 Stat. 1058 (1990), 31 U.S.C. 6501 et seq., as amended. NON-GRF FUNDS Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $200,000,000 cash during the biennium ending June 30, 2027, from non-General Revenue Funds that are not constitutionally restricted to the General Revenue Fund. The Director shall report any such transfers to the Controlling Board within thirty days of making the transfer. TANGIBLE PROPERTY TAX REPLACEMENT FUNDS During the biennium ending June 30, 2027, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer cash as necessary from the School District Tangible Property Tax Replacement Fund (Fund 7047) and the Local Government Tangible Property Tax Replacement Fund (Fund 7081) to the General Revenue Fund. ALL OHIO FUTURE FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $250,000,000 cash from the All Ohio Future Fund (Fund 5XM0) to the General Revenue Fund. SUPER RAPIDS FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to $10,000,000 cash from the Super RAPIDS Fund (Fund 5AH1) to the General Revenue Fund. ADULT USE TAX FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $35,000,000 cash from the Adult Use Tax Fund (Fund QG18) to the General Revenue Fund. GROW YOUR OWN TEACHER PROGRAM FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to $9,000,000 cash from the Grow Your Own Teacher Program Fund (Fund 5ZY0) to the General Revenue Fund. AUDIT SETTLEMENTS AND CONTINGENCY FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $4,000,000 cash from the Audit Settlements and Contingency Fund (Fund 5BP1) to the General Revenue Fund. PRE-SECURITIZATION TOBACCO PAYMENTS FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $20,000,000 cash from the Pre-Securitization Tobacco Payments Fund (Fund 5LS0) to the General Revenue Fund. LITERACY IMPROVEMENT FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to $10,000,000 cash from the Literacy Improvement Fund (Fund 5AQ1) to the General Revenue Fund. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $2,500,000 cash from the Information Technology Development Fund (Fund 5LJ0) to the General Revenue Fund. HUMAN SERVICES PROJECT FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $5,000,000 cash from the Human Services Projects Fund (Fund 5RY0) to the General Revenue Fund. BROADBAND POLE REPLACEMENT FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $15,000,000 cash from the Broadband Pole Replacement Fund (Fund 5AI1) to the General Revenue Fund. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS FUND Notwithstanding section 6301.19 of the Revised Code, on July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $1,000,000 cash from the Workforce Development Projects Fund (Fund 5RX0) to the General Revenue Fund. RAIL SAFETY CROSSING FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $15,000,000 cash from the Rail Safety Crossing Fund (Fund 5ZP0) to the General Revenue Fund. ODJFS AUDIT SETTLEMENTS AND CONTINGENCY FUND Notwithstanding section 5101.073 of the Revised Code, on July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $4,000,000 cash from the ODJFS Audit Settlements and Contingency Fund (Fund 5DM0) to the General Revenue Fund. Section 512.10. TRANSFERS OUT OF GENERAL REVENUE FUND STATE MARKETING OFFICE FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to $22,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the State Marketing Office Fund (Fund 5MJ0). FOUNDATION FUNDING - ALL STUDENTS FUND Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $600,000,000 cash, in each fiscal year, from the General Revenue Fund to the Foundation Funding - All Students Fund (Fund 5VS0). SECOND CHANCE GRANT PROGRAM FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer up to $4,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Second Chance Grant Program Fund (Fund 5YD0). MARCS ADMINISTRATION FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer up to $10,500,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the MARCS Administration Fund (Fund 5C20). WILDLIFE FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer $500,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Wildlife Fund (Fund 7015). TRANSCRANIAL MAGNETIC STIMULATION FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer $5,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation Fund (Fund 5VV0). H2OHIO FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer $165,000,000 from the General Revenue Fund to the H2Ohio Fund (Fund 6H20). OHIO MARITIME ASSISTANCE PROGRAM On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $10,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Ohio Maritime Assistance Fund (Fund 5QT0). RESIDENTIAL DEVELOPMENT REVOLVING LOAN On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $100,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Residential Development Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 5CT1). RURAL PRACTICE INCENTIVE FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $3,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Rural Practice Incentive Fund (Fund 5ZD0). EWARRANT LOCAL INTEGRATION FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer $750,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the eWarrant Local Integration Fund (Fund 5AZ1). TARGETED ADDICTION PROGRAM FUND On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $12,500,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Targeted Addiction Program Fund (Fund 5TZ0). On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $10,000,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the Medical Marijuana Control Fund (Fund 5SY0). Section 513.10. FISCAL YEARS 2025 AND 2026 GENERAL REVENUE FUND ENDING BALANCE Notwithstanding section 131.44 of the Revised Code and except as provided in section 5163.04 of the Revised Code, the cash balance of the General Revenue Fund on June 30, 2025, and on June 30, 2026, shall remain in the General Revenue Fund. Section 514.10. UTILITY RADIOLOGICAL SAFETY BOARD ASSESSMENTS Unless the agency and nuclear electric utility mutually agree to a higher amount by contract, the maximum amounts that may be assessed against nuclear electric utilities under division (B)(2) of section 4937.05 of the Revised Code and deposited into the specified funds are as follows: 1 2 3 4 A Fund User FY 2026 FY 2027 B Utility Radiological Safety Fund (Fund 4E40) Department of Agriculture $136,000 $142,000 C Radiation Emergency Response Fund (Fund 6100) Department of Health $1,551,682 $1,598,000 D ER Radiological Safety Fund (Fund 6440) Environmental Protection Agency $274,997 $280,510 E Emergency Response Plan Fund (Fund 6570) Department of Public Safety $1,420,000 $1,467,000 Section 515.40. EMPLOYEE BENEFITS FUNDS CASH TRANSFERS Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon request of the Director of Administrative Services, the Director of Budget and Management may make temporary cash transfers between the Accrued Leave Liability Fund (Fund 8060), the State Employee Health Benefit Fund (Fund 8080), the Dependent Care Spending Fund (Fund 8090), the Life Insurance Investment Fund (Fund 8100), the Parental Leave Benefit Fund (Fund 8110), and the Health Care Spending Account Fund (Fund 8130) to ensure appropriate and supportable cash flow. Section 516.10. CASH TRANSFERS AND ABOLISHMENT OF FUNDS (A) On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer the cash balance from each of the funds as indicated in the table below to the fund also indicated in the table below. Upon completion of each transfer and on the effective date of its repeal by this act, where applicable, the fund from which the cash balance was transferred is hereby abolished. 1 2 3 4 5 A Transfer from: Transfer to: B User Agency Fund Fund Name Fund Fund Name C AGO 5MP0 Peace Officer Training Commission Fund 5LR0 Ohio Law Enforcement Training Fund D AGR 5MA0 Dangerous and Restricted Animal Fund 5MS0 Animal and Consumer Protection Fund E AGR 5PL0 Pet Store License Fund 5MR0 Commercial Dog Breeding Fund F DAS 5MV0 Theatre Equipment Maintenance Fund GRF General Revenue Fund G DAS 1280 Collective Bargaining Fund 1250 Human Resources Services Fund H MHA 3A60 Federal-Miscellaneous Fund 5AU0 Behavioral Health Care Fund I DPS 3HT0 Justice Emergency Supplemental Funding Fund GRF General Revenue Fund J DPS 5RS0 Community Police Relations Fund 5AZ1 eWarrant Local Integration Fund K MCD 5XY0 Hospital Directed Payment Fund 5AN0 State Directed Payments Fund L OOD 3L10 Social Security Reimbursement Fund 3790 Consolidated Federal Fund M TOS 7090 Job Ready Site Development Bond Retirement Fund GRF General Revenue Fund N LSC 4100 Sale of Publications Fund GRF General Revenue Fund O LSC 4F60 Legislative Budget Services Fund GRF General Revenue Fund P LSC 5EF0 Legislative Agency Telephone Usage Fund GRF General Revenue Fund Q BOR 5RA0 Workforce and Higher Education Programs Fund GRF General Revenue Fund R DOH 5UA0 Emergency Preparation and Response Fund GRF General Revenue Fund (B) The following funds are hereby abolished on the effective date of their repeal by this act: 1 2 3 A User Agency Fund Fund Name B AGR 5HP0 Ohio Livestock Care Standards Fund C DDD 4U40 Developmental Disabilities Trust Fund D MCD 3ER0 Health Information Technology Fund E OBM 5AT1 Statewide Children's Vision Initiative Fund F OBM 5CV1 Coronavirus Relief Fund G PRX 3DV0 Enhancing Ohio's PMP Fund H PRX 3BC0 Dangerous Drug Database Fund I PRX 3EB0 NASPER Fund J PRX 3EY0 Administration of PMIX HUB Fund K PRX 3EZ0 NASPER 10 Fund L PRX 3CT0 2008 Developing/Enhancing PMP Fund (C) On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the cash balance from each of the funds as indicated in the table below to the fund also indicated in the table below. Upon completion of each transfer and on the effective date of its repeal by this act, where applicable, the fund from which the cash balance was transferred is hereby abolished. 1 2 3 4 5 A Transfer from: Transfer to: B User Agency Fund Fund Name Fund Fund Name C DEV 5KN0 Local Government Innovation Fund GRF General Revenue Fund (D) On July 1, 2025, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer the cash balance from each of the funds as indicated in the table below to the fund also indicated in the table below after any encumbrances in these funds are fully discharged. Upon completion of each transfer and on the effective date of its repeal by this act, where applicable, the fund from which the cash balance was transferred is hereby abolished. 1 2 3 4 5 A Transfer from: Transfer to: B User Agency Fund Fund Name Fund Fund Name C EDU 5VU0 School Bus Purchase Fund GRF General Revenue Fund Section 516.30. CASH TRANSFERS TO PRIORITY PROJECTS FUND On July 1 of each fiscal year, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer cash as indicated in the table below from each of the funds also as indicated in the table below to the Priority Projects Fund (Fund 5AO0). 1 2 3 A Fund FY 2026 FY 2027 B State Small Business Credit Initiative Fund (Fund 3FJ0) $500,000 $500,000 C Business Assistance Fund (Fund 4510) $500,000 $500,000 D Minority Business Enterprise Loan Fund (Fund 4W10) $1,000,000 $1,000,000 E Rural Industrial Park Loan Fund (Fund 4Z60) $2,500,000 $2,500,000 F State Fire Marshal Fund (Fund 5460) $2,000,000 $2,000,000 G Industrial Compliance Operating Fund (Fund 5560) $1,500,000 $1,500,000 H Securities Investor Education/Enforcement Fund(Fund 5GK0) $500,000 $500,000 I Capital Access Loan Fund (Fund 5S90) $1,000,000 $1,000,000 J Innovation Ohio Loan Fund (Fund 7009) $2,500,000 $2,500,000 K Research and Development Loan Fund (Fund 7010) $2,000,000 $2,000,000 L Facilities Establishment Fund (Fund 7037) $3,000,000 $3,000,000 Section 518.10. OHIO STATE SMALL BUSINESS CREDIT INITIATIVE VENTURE CAPITAL PROGRAM FUND The Ohio State Small Business Credit Initiative Venture Capital Program Fund (Fund 3IC0) is hereby created in the state treasury. Money in the fund shall be used to pay the expenses of the Ohio Department of Development for the Ohio Growth Capital, Ohio Early-Stage Focus, Certified Development Financial Institution Loan, and Collateral Enhancement programs, including administrative expenses. All federal funds received from the State Small Business Credit Initiative of the United States Department of the Treasury shall be credited to the fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Section 525.10. (A) As used in this section, "Ohio Benefits Program" means the integrated enterprise solution administered by the Department of Administrative Services that assists individuals in verifying eligibility for, and applying for, benefits offered through various programs administered by the Department of Job and Family Services and the Department of Medicaid, including the Medicaid program, Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, and Temporary Assistance for Needy Families. (B) Not later than July 1, 2026, the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of Job and Family Services shall develop a detailed organizational plan and enter into a memorandum of understanding to transfer administration of the Ohio Benefits Program from the Department of Administrative Services to the Department of Job and Family Services. (C) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Director of Administrative Services may transfer the Director's responsibility for administering the Ohio Benefits Program to the Director of Job and Family Services. If the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, all of the following apply: (1) All contracts, records, documents, files, equipment, assets, materials, and staff resources that relate to the Ohio Benefits Program shall be transferred to the Director of Job and Family Services. (2) Any business commenced, but not completed, by July 1, 2027, by the Director of Administrative Services with respect to the Ohio Benefits Program shall be completed by the Director of Job and Family Services in the same manner, and with the same effect, as if completed by the Director of Administrative Services. (3) No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer of the Ohio Benefits Program. (D) If the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, no action or proceeding pending on the date of the transfer is affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Director of Job and Family Services or Department of Job and Family Services. In all such actions or proceedings, the Director or Department, on application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. (E) If the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, all rules, orders, and determinations issued with respect to the Ohio Benefits Program continue in effect as if issued by the Director of Job and Family Services until modified or rescinded by the Director. Pursuant to section 103.05 of the Revised Code and at the request of the Director of Job and Family Services, the Director of the Legislative Service Commission may renumber any rules related to the Ohio Benefits Program to reflect its transfer. (F) If the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, the Director of Administrative Services and the Director of Job and Family Services, jointly or separately, may enter into a contract with a public or private entity for staff training and development to facilitate the transfer of the Ohio Benefits Program. Division (B) of section 127.16 of the Revised Code does not apply to a contract entered into under this division. (G) Subject to the layoff provisions of sections 124.321 to 124.328 of the Revised Code, if the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, all of the Director of Administrative Service's employees, as identified by the Director, whose primary responsibilities include administering the Ohio Benefits Program are transferred to the Department of Job and Family Services. Except as provided in division (H) of this section, employees transferred under this division retain their positions and all of the benefits accruing thereto. Any changes to an employee's position or benefits that occur after the employee is transferred to the Department under this division are subject to Chapter 124. of the Revised Code. Any actions taken under this division are not appealable to the State Personnel Board of Review. (H) If the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, the Director of Job and Family Services may do all of the following: (1) Establish, change, or abolish positions within the Department of Job and Family Services; (2) Assign, reassign, classify, reclassify, transfer, reduce, promote, or demote employees of the Department who are not subject to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code; (3) Assign or reassign an exempt employee, as defined in section 124.152 of the Revised Code, to a bargaining unit for purposes of Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code if the Director determines the bargaining unit is the appropriate bargaining unit with respect to that exempt employee. (I) If, in accordance with division (H) of this section, the Director of Job and Family Services assigns, reassigns, classifies, reclassifies, transfers, reduces, or demotes an employee paid in accordance with schedule E-1 of section 124.152 of the Revised Code to a position in a lower classification, both of the following apply: (1) The Director of Job and Family Services, or if the employee is transferred outside of the Department of Job and Family Services, the Director of Administrative Services, shall assign the employee to the appropriate classification and place the employee in pay step X. (2) The employee shall not receive an increase in compensation until the maximum rate of pay for that classification exceeds the employee's compensation. (J) If the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, the Director of Job and Family Services, with the approval of the Director of Budget and Management, may establish a retirement incentive plan for employees transferred to the Department of Job and Family Services under division (G) of this section. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in section 145.297 of the Revised Code, if the Director establishes such a plan under this division, it shall remain in effect until December 31, 2027. (K) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in sections 4117.08 and 4117.10 of the Revised Code, the transfer of the Ohio Benefits Program and the transfer of employees described under division (J) of this section, and the reassignment of administering the Ohio Benefits Program, are not appropriate subjects for collective bargaining under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. (L) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if the Director of Administrative Services transfers the program, the Director of Budget and Management shall make budget and accounting changes to implement the transfer. The Director may rename funds, create new funds, transfer funds, consolidate funds, or make other administrative changes. If necessary, the Director may cancel or establish encumbrances or parts of encumbrances in the appropriate funds and appropriation items for the same purposes and for payments to the same vendor. Such encumbrances are hereby appropriated. If necessary for the continued efficient administration of the Ohio Benefits Program, the Director may transfer appropriations between the Department of Job and Family Services and the Department of Administrative Services to continue levels of program services and efficiently deliver funding to the program as appropriated under this division. Such changes are hereby appropriated. Section 525.20. PROGRAM TRANSFERS (A) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, before July 1, 2027, the Department of Development shall transfer the entirety of its responsibility of managing the following programs to the Ohio Department of Job and Family Services: (1) Low-income customer assistance programs; (2) Consumer Education Program; (3) Community Services Block Grant; (4) Electric Partnership Plan Fund. (B) Any business commenced but not completed by July 1, 2027, within the Department of Development that is planned to be transferred pursuant to this section shall be completed by the Department of Job and Family Services in the same manner and with the same effect as if completed by the Department of Development. (C) By July 1, 2026, the Director of Job and Family Services and the Director of Development, or their designees, shall develop a detailed organizational plan to implement the transfer of duties and functions of the programs listed in this section from the Department of Development to the Department of Job and Family Services. Pursuant to this plan, the directors of the respective departments shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to implement the transfer of duties and functions of the programs listed in this section from the Department of Development to the Department of Job and Family Services. (D) The Director of Job and Family Services and the Director of Development may jointly or separately enter into one or more contracts with public or private entities for staff training and development to facilitate the transfer of duties and functions of the programs listed in this section from the Department of Development to the Department of Job and Family Services. Division (B) of section 127.16 of the Revised Code does not apply to contracts entered into under this section. (E) All Department of Development employees and resources identified by the Director of Development to be associated with the work of the programs listed in this section are transferred to the Department of Job and Family Services on July 1, 2027, or an earlier date identified by the respective directors. Subject to the layoff provisions of sections 124.321 to 124.381 of the Revised Code, employees who are transferred retain their same positions and all benefits accruing thereto. Once transferred to the Department of Job and Family Services, changes to positions or benefits for employees shall be controlled by Chapter 124. of the Revised Code, or other applicable Revised Code or Administrative Code sections. Actions taken under this section are not subject to appeal to the State Personnel Board of Review. (1) Notwithstanding division (E) of this section, the Director of Job and Family Services has the authority to establish, change, and abolish positions for the Department of Job and Family Services, and to assign, reassign, classify, reclassify, transfer, reduce, promote, or demote all employees of the Department of Job and Family Services who are not subject to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. (2) The authority granted under division (E)(1) of this section includes assigning or reassigning an exempt employee, as defined in section 124.152 of the Revised Code, to a bargaining unit classification if the Director of Job and Family Services determines that the bargaining unit classification is the proper classification for that employee. If an employee in the E-1 pay range is to be assigned, reassigned, classified, reclassified, transferred, reduced, or demoted to a position in a lower classification, the Director of Job and Family Services, or in the case of a position transferred outside of the Department, the Director of Development, shall assign the employee to the appropriate classification and place the employee in Step X. The employee shall not receive any increase in compensation until the maximum rate of pay for that classification exceeds the employee's compensation. (3) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in sections 4117.08 and 4117.10 of the Revised Code, the transfer of programs and employees under this section, and the reassignment of certain functions and duties, are not appropriate subjects for collective bargaining under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. (4) The Director of Job and Family Services may, with the approval of the Office of Budget and Management, establish a retirement incentive plan for eligible employees of those agencies who are members of the Public Employee Retirement System whose job duties will be transferred to the Department of Job and Family Services. Notwithstanding any provision of section 145.297 of the Revised Code to the contrary, a retirement incentive plan established pursuant to this section shall remain in effect until December 31, 2027. (F) No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer required by this section but shall be administered by the Department of Job and Family Services. No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of the transfer of duties, functions, and programs to the Department of Job and Family Services is affected by the transfer and shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Department or Director, as appropriate. In all such actions for those transferred duties, functions, and programs, the Department or Director shall be substituted as a party. (G) Effective July 1, 2027, or on an earlier date determined by the directors identified in this division, all contracts, records, documents, files, equipment, assets, and other materials of the programs and staff resources transferred under this section are to be transferred to the Department of Job and Family Services. (H) All rules, orders, and determinations made or undertaken related to programs listed in this section shall continue in effect as rules, orders, and determinations of the Department of Job and Family Services until modified or rescinded by the Department of Job and Family Services. If necessary to ensure the integrity of the numbering of the Administrative Code and at the request of the Director of Job and Family Services, the Director of the Legislative Service Commission may renumber the rules related to the programs listed in this section to reflect this transfer. (I) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Director of Budget and Management shall make budget and accounting changes to implement the transfer of duties, functions, and program of the programs listed in this section to the Department of Job and Family Services as described in this section, including administrative organization, renaming of funds, creation of new funds, transfer of state funds, and consolidation of funds. The Director of Budget and Management may, if necessary, cancel or establish encumbrances or parts of encumbrances in the appropriate funds and appropriation items for the same purposes and for payment to the same vendor. Such encumbrances are hereby appropriated. If necessary for the continued efficient administration of programs listed in this section, the Director of Budget and Management may transfer appropriations between the Department of Job and Family Services and the Department of Development to continue levels of program services and efficiently deliver state funding to those programs as appropriated herein. Such changes are hereby appropriated. Section 525.40. On the effective date of this section, the Ohio Public Employees Deferred Compensation Board is abolished. All records, assets, and liabilities of the Ohio Public Employees Deferred Compensation Board shall be transferred to the Public Employees Retirement Board. The Public Employees Retirement Board is successor to, and assumes the obligations of, the Ohio Public Employees Deferred Compensation Board. Any business commenced, but not completed by, the Ohio Public Employees Deferred Compensation Board or the Executive Director of that Board on the effective date of this section shall be completed by the Public Employees Retirement Board or the Executive Director of the Public Employees Retirement System in the same manner, and with the same effect, as if completed by the Ohio Public Employees Deferred Compensation Board or the Executive Director of that Board. No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer required by this section. All employees of the Ohio Public Employees Deferred Compensation Board are transferred to the Public Employees Retirement System and retain their positions and all of the benefits accruing thereto. No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of this section is affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Public Employees Retirement Board or the Executive Director of the Public Employees Retirement System. In all such actions and proceedings, the Public Employees Retirement Board or the Executive Director of the Public Employees Retirement System, on application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. Section 525.50. (A) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of sections 109.02, 145.054, 145.055, 145.99, 742.043, 742.044, 742.99, 3307.073, 3307.074, 3307.99, 3309.073, 3309.074, 3309.99, 3501.05, 3513.10, 3517.01, 3517.08, 3517.081, 3517.102, 3517.109, 3517.11, 3517.121, 3517.152, 3517.153, 3517.154, 3517.155, 3517.157, 3517.20, 3517.21, 3517.22, 3517.23, 3517.992, 3517.993, 5505.045, 5505.046, and 5505.99 of the Revised Code as amended by this act, sections 3517.152 (3517.14), 3517.153 (3517.15), 3517.154 (3517.16), 3517.155 (3517.17), 3517.157 (3517.18), 3517.992 (3517.99), and 3517.993 (3517.171) of the Revised Code as renumbered by this act, or new section 3517.991 and section 111.29 of the Revised Code as enacted by this act, and notwithstanding the repeal of sections 3517.14, 3517.151, 3517.156, 3517.99, and 3517.991 of the Revised Code by this act, the provisions of those sections that were in effect immediately before the effective date of this section continue to apply to the Ohio Elections Commission until the Commission is abolished on January 1, 2026. The Commission shall continue to hear and issue decisions concerning complaints filed with the Commission before January 1, 2026, in accordance with those provisions. (B)(1) The Ohio Elections Commission is abolished on January 1, 2026. (2) On January 1, 2026, any complaint pending before the Ohio Elections Commission, is transferred to the Ohio Election Integrity Commission for hearing and disposition in accordance with division (A) of section 3517.155(3517.17) of the Revised Code, as amended and renumbered by this act, provided that divisions (A)(4) and (5) of that section do not apply to a complaint transferred under this division. The Ohio Elections Commission shall provide all records regarding the complaint to the Ohio Election Integrity Commission. (3) All other records of the Ohio Elections Commission and all of its other assets and liabilities shall be transferred to the Ohio Election Integrity Commission. The Ohio Election Integrity Commission is successor to, and assumes the obligations of, the Ohio Elections Commission. (C) Except for the disposition of a complaint pending before the Ohio Elections Commission, any business commenced but not completed by the Ohio Elections Commission or its Executive Director on January 1, 2026, shall be completed by the Ohio Election Integrity Commission in the same manner, and with the same effect, as if completed by the Ohio Elections Commission or by its Executive Director. No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer required by this section. (D) Subject to the lay-off provisions of sections 124.321 to 124.328 of the Revised Code, all of the Ohio Elections Commission's employees are transferred to the Secretary of State and retain their positions and all of the benefits accruing thereto. (E) On January 1, 2026, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer the cash balance of the Ohio Elections Commission Fund (Fund 4P20) to the Ohio Election Integrity Commission Fund (Fund 5CS1). Upon completion of the transfer, Fund 4P20 is abolished. The Director shall cancel any existing encumbrances against appropriation item 051601, Operating Support, and reestablish them against appropriation item 050604, Ohio Election Integrity Commission. The reestablished encumbrance amounts are hereby appropriated. (F) Whenever the Ohio Elections Commission or its Executive Director is referred to in any law, contract, or other document, the reference shall be deemed to refer to the Ohio Election Integrity Commission. (G) Except for the disposition of a complaint pending before the Ohio Elections Commission, no action or proceeding pending on January 1, 2026, is affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Ohio Election Integrity Commission. In all such actions and proceedings, the Ohio Election Integrity Commission, on application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. Section 525.60. (A) Not later than July 1, 2026, the administration of the Aspire Program shall transfer from the Department of Higher Education to the Department of Education and Workforce. Not later than July 1, 2026, the Director of Education and Workforce and the Chancellor of Higher Education shall identify the duties, functions, and staff resources within the Department of Higher Education that pertain to the Aspire Program. The Director and Chancellor may enter into a memorandum of understanding to implement the transfer of those duties, functions, and staff resources and the transfer of any responsibilities required to obtain federal grant funds to support the Aspire Program. Whenever the Chancellor of Higher Education or the Department of Higher Education is referred to in any law, contract, or other document pertaining to the Aspire Program, including contracts sourced by the Director of Administrative Services or the Department of Administrative Services, the reference shall be deemed to refer to the Director of Education and Workforce or the Department of Education and Workforce, whichever is appropriate. (B)(1) All employees whose primary responsibilities include administering the Aspire Program and staff resources used to administer the program shall be transferred to the Department of Education and Workforce, as determined by the Director of Education and Workforce. Subject to the lay-off provisions of sections 124.321 to 124.328 of the Revised Code, employees who are transferred shall be assigned job classifications in accordance with division (B)(2) or (3) of this section. Once transferred to the Department of Education and Workforce, changes to positions or benefits for employees not subject to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code are subject to Chapter 124. of the Revised Code. Employees transferred under this division retain all of their accrued benefits. (2) Notwithstanding division (B)(1) of this section, the Director of Education and Workforce may establish, change, and abolish positions whose primary responsibilities include administering the Aspire Program and may assign, reassign, classify, reclassify, transfer, reduce, promote, or demote all such employees of the Department of Education and Workforce who are not subject to Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code. (3) The Director of Education and Workforce may assign or reassign an exempt employee, as defined in section 124.152 of the Revised Code, to a bargaining unit for purposes of Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code if the Director determines the bargaining unit is the appropriate bargaining unit for that employee. If an employee in the E-1 pay range is assigned, reassigned, classified, reclassified, transferred, reduced, or demoted to a position in a lower classification, the Director of Education and Workforce, or if the employee is transferred outside of the Department of Education and Workforce, the Director of Administrative Services, shall assign the employee to the appropriate classification and place the employee in pay step X. The employee shall not receive any increase in compensation until the maximum rate of pay for that classification exceeds the employee's compensation. (4) Actions taken under divisions (B)(1) to (3) of this section are not subject to appeal to the State Personnel Board of Review. (C) No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer under this section, but instead shall be administered by the Department of Education and Workforce. No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of the transfer is affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Department of Education and Workforce or the Director of Education and Workforce. In all such actions and proceedings, the Department or Director, on application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. (D) Not later than July 1, 2026, all records, data, documents, files, materials, and staff resources pertaining to the Aspire Program are transferred to the Department of Education and Workforce. (E) All rules, orders, and determinations issued with respect to the Aspire Program continue in effect as if issued by the Director of Education and Workforce until modified or rescinded by the Director. (F) Pursuant to section 126.15 of the Revised Code, the Director of Budget and Management shall make budget and accounting changes to implement the transfer. The Director may rename funds, create new funds, transfer funds, consolidate funds, or make other administrative changes. The Director may, if necessary, cancel or establish encumbrances or parts of encumbrances in fiscal year 2027 in the appropriate funds and appropriation items for the same purposes and for payment to the same vendors. Such encumbrances are hereby appropriated. If necessary for the continued efficient administration of the Aspire Program, the Director may transfer appropriations between the Department of Higher Education and the Department of Education and Workforce to continue levels of program services and efficiently deliver funding to the program as appropriated under this division. Section 525.70. (A) Effective on the ninety-first day after this section takes effect, the Joint Medicaid Oversight Committee is abolished. All records of the Committee shall be transferred to the Legislative Service Commission, and all of its other assets and liabilities shall be transferred to the Commission. The Commission is successor to, and assumes the obligations of, the Committee. (B) Any business commenced, but not completed by the Committee on the effective date of this section shall be completed by the Commission in the same manner, and with the same effect, as if completed by the Committee. No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer required by this section. (C) Wherever the Committee Executive Director or the Committee is referred to in any law, contract, or other document, the reference shall be deemed to refer to the Commission Director or the Commission, whichever is appropriate. (D) No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of this section is affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Commission. In all such actions and proceedings, the Commission, on application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. Section 525.80. (A) Effective on the ninety-first day after this section takes effect, the Correctional Institutional Inspection Committee is abolished. All records of the Committee shall be transferred to the Attorney General, and all of its other assets and liabilities shall be transferred to the Attorney General. The Attorney General is successor to, and assumes the obligations of, the Committee. (B) Any business commenced, but not completed by the Committee on that date shall be completed by the Attorney General in the same manner, and with the same effect, as if completed by the Committee. No validation, cure, right, privilege, remedy, obligation, or liability is lost or impaired by reason of the transfer required by this section. (C) Wherever the Committee is referred to in any law, contract, or other document, the reference shall be deemed to refer to the Attorney General. (D) No action or proceeding pending on that date is affected by the transfer, and any such action or proceeding shall be prosecuted or defended in the name of the Attorney General. In all such actions and proceedings, the Attorney General, on application to the court, shall be substituted as a party. Section 610.10. That Sections 125.10 (as amended by H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly) and 125.11 (as amended by H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly) of H.B. 59 of the 130th General Assembly are hereby repealed. Section 610.20. That Section 755.60 of H.B. 54 of the 136th General Assembly be amended to read as follows: Sec. 755.60. (A) The Department of Transportation and the Ohio Turnpike and Infrastructure Commission shall work together to create a joint plan regarding the feasibility of connecting U.S. Route 23 to Interstate Route 71 by doing through one of the following options: (1) Expanding State Route 229 in northern Delaware County; (2) Expanding another similar state route or other highway in northern Delaware County; (3) Creating a new freeway between U.S. Route 23 and Interstate Route 71 in northern Delaware County; (4) Creating a toll road between U.S. Route 23 and Interstate Route 71 in northern Delaware County; (5) Creating a new freeway, which may be a toll road, in the region between State Route 529 and Waldo, Ohio heading eastward toward Interstate Route 71 north of Marengo, Ohio in Marion County and Morrow County; (6) Any other alignment considered appropriate by the Department and the Commission. (B) As part of the plan, related to the options specified in divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section, the Not later than October 1, 2025, the Department and Commission shall prepare a preliminary engineering submit an interim report that determines the most feasible routes for the new freeway or toll road. As part of the report, the Department and Commission shall determine five potential alignments for the freeway or toll road and specify which alignment is the preferred routeincludes both of the following: (1) An identification and evaluation of conceptual corridor alternatives related to the options and alignments specified in division (A) of this section; (2) A preliminary assessment of the toll feasibility, including whether the Commission's statutory authority is sufficient to make the project a turnpike project. (C) The plan shall be completed not later than three months after the effective date of this section. (D) As part of the plan, the Department and the Commission shall determine whether construction Not later than October 1, 2026, the Department and Commission shall submit a final joint plan that includes all of the following: (1) Identification of a preferred route connecting U.S. Route 23 to Interstate Route 71; (2) Completion of preliminary engineering assessments, including the preliminary design of the preferred route specified in division (C)(1) of this section, the cost estimates of construction, and the right-of-way and environmental impacts; (3) A recommendation regarding whether implementation would be best conducted by the Department or the Commission. If construction implementation is best conducted by the Commission, the plan also shall include an evaluation of whether the Commission's statutory authority is sufficient to make the project a turnpike project. (E)(D) The Department and Commission shall submit their both the interim report and the final joint plan specified under divisions (B) and (C) of this section to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority Leaders of both the Senate and the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the respective committees of the House of Representatives and Senate responsible for transportation related matters. Section 610.21. That existing Section 755.60 of H.B. 54 of the 136th General Assembly is hereby repealed. Section 620.10. That Section 265.550 of H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 250 of the 135th General Assembly) be amended to read as follows: Sec. 265.550. PUPIL TRANSPORTATION PILOT PROGRAMPROGRAMS (A) The Department of Education and Workforce shall establish two pilot programs under which two educational service centers shall provide transportation to students in lieu of the students receiving transportation from their resident school district. Not later than October 15, 2023, the Department shall select both of the following to participate in a pilot program under this section: (1) One service center that is in a county located in central Ohio with a population of 1,323,807, according to the 2020 United States census; (2) One service center that is in a county located in southwest Ohio with a population of 537,309, according to the 2020 United States census.. (B)(1) The service center selected under division (A)(1) of this section shall identify students who are struggling with transportation issues, as determined by their resident school district, and are served by the service center, community schools, or chartered nonpublic schools that enroll students from the district or districts for whom the service center will provide transportation during the 2024-2025 school year. (2) The service center selected under division (A)(2) of this section shall provide transportation during the 2024-2025, 2025-2026, and 2026-2027 school year years to any student whom the district and the educational service center determine is struggling with transportation issues that meets either of the following criteria: (a) The student attends a school different from the one to which the student would be assigned in the student's resident school district. (b) The student is a child with a disability for whom the student's resident school district is required to provide transportation as a related service. (3) Both service centers shall report to the Department, in the manner prescribed by the Department, students who are transported by the service center. (C) No community school or chartered nonpublic school shall be required to participate in either pilot program. (D)Each (D) Each participating educational service center shall do all of the following for the 2024-2025 each applicable school year: (1) Arrange for the use of a sufficient number of school buses or other approved vehicles designed to transport not more than nine passengers, not including the driver, and bus drivers or other individuals authorized to transport students in other approved vehicles, to transport students from participating schools who qualify for transportation under section 3327.01 of the Revised Code and the school district's transportation policy. However, nothing shall preclude the service center from providing transportation to other students enrolled in the schools. (2) Collaborate with participating schools to designate daily start and end times for the 2024-2025 each applicable school year that will enable timely and efficient transportation of the schools' students; (3) On behalf of participating schools, notify the school district that those of the students that they will not require transportation for the 2024-2025 applicable school year. (E)(1) Except as described in division (E)(2) of this section, the Department shall deduct from the school district's transportation payment under section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code and pay to the educational service center the statewide average cost per student for the qualifying ridership, under section 3317.0212 of the Revised Code, for each student transported by the service center in compliance with this section. (2) In the case of a student described in division (C)(1) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code, the service center shall not receive a payment under division (E)(1) of this section. Instead, the department shall make a payment to the service center for such student in the manner prescribed under division (C) of section 3317.024 of the Revised Code. (F) The educational service centers and the school districts shall not be subject to section 3327.021 of the Revised Code during the 2024-2025 each school year in which the pilot program they participate in operates with regard to students enrolled in participating schools. Notwithstanding section 3314.46 of the Revised Code, the service centers may provide transportation to any participating community school they sponsor. (G) The educational service centers shall comply with all transportation requirements for students with disabilities as specified in the individualized education programs developed for the students pursuant to Chapter 3323. of the Revised Code (H) The Department shall evaluate each the pilot program in which the service center selected under division (A)(1) of this section participates and issue a report of its findings not later than September 15, 2025. The Department shall evaluate the pilot program in which the service center selected under division (A)(2) of this section participates and issue a report of its findings not later than September 15, 2027. The educational service centers and participating schools shall submit data and other information to the Department, in a manner determined by the Department, for the purpose of conducting the evaluation. Section 620.11. That existing Section 265.550 of H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 250 of the 135th General Assembly) is hereby repealed. Section 620.20. That Sections 200.30 (as amended by H.B. 54 of the 136th General Assembly), 207.37, 221.15 (as amended by S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly), 243.10 (as amended by H.B. 54 of the 136th General Assembly), 363.10, 371.20 (as amended by S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly), and 373.15 (as amended by S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly) of H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly be amended to read as follows: Sec. 200.30. ONE TIME STRATEGIC COMMUNITY INVESTMENTS On June 28, 2024, or as soon as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $17,800,000 cash from the General Revenue Fund to the One Time Strategic Community Investments Fund (Fund 5AY1). The foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, shall be used by the Office of Budget and Management to provide grants for the projects listed in this section in the amounts listed. Prior to disbursing a grant to a recipient, the Office of Budget and Management shall enter into a grant agreement with the recipient. As part of the grant agreement, the recipient shall agree to complete a final report, in a form and manner to be prescribed by the Office of Budget and Management, detailing how the recipient used the grant and submit the report to the Office of Budget and Management. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the foregoing appropriation item 042509, One Time Strategic Community Investments, at the end of fiscal year 2025 is hereby reappropriated for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. 1 2 A Project Amount B Adams County Fairgrounds Improvements $400,000 C Adams County Welcome Center $350,000 D Adams County Community Foundation $200,000 E West Union Wastewater Plant Improvements $200,000 F Lima Veterans Memorial Hall Improvements $10,000,000 G Allen County Airport Fuel Farm $1,000,000 H Rhodes State Advanced Manufacturing Equipment and Lab $440,000 I Allen County Child Support Enforcement Agency Facility $375,000 J Heir Force Community School Land Acquisition $250,000 K Temple Christian School Building Expansion $250,000 L Boys and Girls Club of Lima $100,000 M Ashland County Fair $1,100,000 N Cinnamon Lake Sewer District Lift Station $1,000,000 O Charles Mill Marina Houseboat and Path Renovation $910,000 P Hugo Young Theatre $248,554 Q Davy McClure Outdoor Education Shelter $200,000 R Ashland County Fire Training Facility $200,000 S Hickory Street Sanitary Sewer Lift Station $76,000 T Rowsburg Community Center $30,000 U Hayesville Pedestrian Walkway $25,000 V SPIRE Institute $1,000,000 W Ashtabula Juvenile Court Improvements $800,000 X Boys and Girls Club of Ashtabula $132,274 Y Country Neighbor Program $101,600 Z VFW Roof Repairs Geneva Post 6846 $99,037 AA Ashtabula Arts Center Restroom Project $45,000 AB Athens Regional Training Center $2,500,000 AC The Appalachian Center for Economic Networks Food Sector Accelerator Project $700,000 AD Nelsonville-York Elementary School (NYES) Playground Renovation $250,000 AE York Township VFD Project $250,000 AF City of Nelsonville Dog Park $139,731 AG Boys and Girls Club of Athens $100,000 AH Buchtel Village Park Project $100,000 AI Edna Brooks Domestic Violence Shelter $36,800 AJ Village of Waynesfield Veteran’s Park Enhancement $352,950 AK Saint Mary's Reservoir Mill $250,000 AL New Bremen Public Library Renovation $200,000 AM YMCA Auglaize-Mercer Recreation Complex $200,000 AN Barton VFD Station $1,000,000 AO Belmont Volunteer Fire Department New Station $1,000,000 AP The Sargus Center Revitalization and Sustainability Initiative $500,000 AQ Mead Township Hall and Garage Project $300,000 AR VFW Roof Repairs Powhatan Point Post 5565 $24,900 AS Future Plans Sanctuary $3,000,000 AT Brown County Junior Fair Covered Horse Arena $400,000 AU Water Infrastructure Bramel Mobile Home Park $400,000 AV Millikin Interchange Improvements $8,500,000 AW Madison Township Firehouse Improvements $1,750,000 AX BCRTA Outdoor Workforce Training $1,000,000 AY Riversedge Amphitheater Expansion $1,000,000 AZ Shuler Benninghofen Mixed-Use Project $1,000,000 BA VOA MetroPark Museum Grand Entrance $1,000,000 BB Oxford Student Safety Project $800,000 BC Liberty Playground Replacement Project $500,000 BD Madison Township Park Revitalization $500,000 BE Welding Lab Program Expansion in Fairfield Township $450,000 BF Monroe Plaza South Project $400,000 BG Hamilton YWCA Domestic Violence Project $400,000 BH World Class Clubs: Repairing Community Gymnasium $225,000 BI Boys and Girls Club of West Chester/Liberty $218,796 BJ VFW Roof Repairs West Chester Post 7696 $15,560 BK Carroll County Annex Building Rehab $500,000 BL Seven Ranges Scout Reservation Facility Upgrades $500,000 BM Dellroy Village Storm Drain and Street Repair $250,000 BN Carroll County Agricultural Service Center $200,000 BO Minerva Downtown Revitalization Project $200,000 BP Dellroy Village Offices/Garage Renovations $195,250 BQ Champaign Aviation Museum Improvements $20,000 BR Champion City Sports and Wellness Center $4,000,000 BS A.B. Graham Memorial $750,000 BT Champion Center Arena Improvements $250,000 BU Goshen Fire Department Station 18 Rebuild $2,500,000 BV Felicity Veterans Village Housing Project $1,000,000 BW Milford Five Points Landing $400,000 BX Union Township Community Splash Pad $268,125 BY Nisbet Park Amphitheater $250,000 BZ Moscow Ohio River Stabilization, Phase III $240,000 CA Williamsburg Township Emergency Services Upgrades $150,000 CB Owensville Historical Society Museum $132,000 CC Williamsburg Community Park Trail Extension $86,770 CD VFW Roof Repairs Loveland Post 5354 $28,505 CE VFW Roof Repairs New Richmond Post 6770 $20,894 CF Boys and Girls Club of Clermont $18,921 CG Wilmington Runway Reopening and Improvements $3,500,000 CH Doan-Walnut-Short Street Water Main $500,000 CI Columbiana County Annex/Drug Task Force Building $2,900,000 CJ Utica Shale Academy Improvements $2,500,000 CK East Palestine Village Safety Complex $1,000,000 CL Hanover Township Fire and Emergency Medical Services Expansion Initiative $250,000 CM Lepper Restoration Project $175,000 CN City of Coshocton Fire Training Tower $1,000,000 CO Coshocton Skip’s Landing and Downtown Revitalization $750,000 CP City of Coshocton Roscoe Cemetery Improvements $460,000 CQ City of Coshocton Pickleball Court Upgrades $300,000 CR City of Coshocton Water Plant Electrical Upgrades $300,000 CS City of Coshocton Town Hall Roof Project $240,000 CT City of Coshocton Emergency Generator Project $200,000 CU Coshocton County Library Masonry Project $48,000 CV Maplecrest Community Center $500,000 CW The Galion Depot Canopy Restoration Project $200,000 CX The New Washington Veteran’s Memorial Park Project $34,460 CY Cuyahoga County Northcoast Connector $20,000,000 CZ Bedrock Riverfront Development $8,000,000 DA Rock and Roll Hall of Fame Museum Expansion and Renovation Project $7,000,000 DB Cleveland Port Bulk Terminal Modernization $5,000,000 DC West Side Market in Cleveland $2,400,000 DD Cahoon Park $2,000,000 DE Cleveland Zoo Primate Forest $2,000,000 DF Irishtown Bend Park $2,000,000 DG Valor Acres Brecksville Veterans Affairs Hospital Site Redevelopment $2,000,000 DH Blue Abyss $1,800,000 DI Two Foundation Building Purchase and Renovation $1,625,000 DJ Park Synagogue $1,500,000 DK The Music Settlement – Gries House Redevelopment $1,500,000 DL Brook Park Community Center Restoration $1,000,000 DM Cleveland Women’s Soccer Stadium $1,000,000 DN Electric Building Renovation $1,000,000 DO Independence Selig Drive Emergency Access $1,000,000 DP Shaker Heights Doan Brook Park $1,000,000 DQ YMCA of Greater Cleveland – New Facility Construction $1,000,000 DR Argonaut Project - Advancing Aviation and Maritime Pipeline $800,000 DS Birthing Beautiful Communities Birth Center $800,000 DT Connecting the Circle $800,000 DU Glenville YMCA $800,000 DV Saint Edwards High School Sustainable Urban Agriculture $800,000 DW Cleveland Public Square Improvements $750,000 DX University Heights Municipal Sewer Project $700,000 DY University Hospitals Breast Center - Parma $700,000 DZ Cleveland Habitat Building Project $507,500 EA Cleveland Airport NEOFIX $500,000 EB Euclid Public Library Green Branch Improvements $500,000 EC Hospice of the Western Reserve Center for Community Engagement and Hospice Care $500,000 ED JumpStart Northern Ohio Operations $500,000 EE Ohio Aerospace Institute Sensitive Information Research Facility $500,000 EF Rocky River Fire Station Improvements $500,000 EG Saint Casimir Parish Improvements $500,000 EH Seven Hills Fire Department $500,000 EI Vocational Guidance Services Renovation Cleveland Facility $500,000 EJ YWCA of Greater Cleveland $500,000 EK Boys and Girls Club of Broadway in Cuyahoga County $485,005 EL Maltz Museum of Jewish Heritage $480,000 EM Richmond Heights Salt Bin $450,000 EN Magnolia Clubhouse $400,000 EO Middleburg Heights Central Park Phase 1 $400,000 EP Cleveland Institute of Art - Interactive Media Lab $365,000 EQ Greenstone Lifeline Connection Improvements $327,867 ER Chagrin Valley Volunteer Fire Station $300,000 ES Berea City Hall and Police Station Upgrades $250,000 ET Jenning's Center for Older Adults $250,000 EU Journey Center for Safety and Healing/Domestic Violence Shelter $200,000 EV Lyndhurst Community Center Audio Visual Project $200,000 EW MetroHealth Emergency Department Refresh $200,000 EX Northeast Ohio Music Arts Development Hub $200,000 EY Olmsted Falls Visibility Project $200,000 EZ Camp Cheerful Reimagined $175,000 FA VFW Roof Repairs Solon Post 1863 $88,787 FB VFW Roof Repairs Parma Post 1974 $28,633 FC VFW Roof Repairs Cleveland Post 2533 $17,208 FD Western Ohio Regional Fire Training Facility $750,000 FE Eldora Speedway Public Safety Upgrades $400,000 FF Historic Bear’s Mill Infrastructure Restoration $275,000 FG The Darke County Fish and Game Association $120,000 FH Ney/Washington Township Fire Department Building $300,000 FI Veterans Memorial Park at Latty’s Grove Rehabilitation Project $200,000 FJ Little Brown Jug Grandstand Renovation $2,500,000 FK Sunbury Ohio-to-Erie Trail Expansion $1,250,000 FL Boardman Arts Park Improvements Whimsy Venue $1,000,000 FM Stockhands Horses for Healing, Capital Improvement Project $908,000 FN Dempsey Wildlife and Education Renovation $600,000 FO Delaware County Bicentennial Barn Renovation $500,000 FP Powell Adventure Park Expansion $480,000 FQ "Smuirfield" Golf Project $225,000 FR Ohio Fallen Heroes Memorial $70,000 FS VFW Roof Repairs Sunbury Post 8736 $58,440 FT Worenstaff Memorial Public Library Renovation $34,000 FU The Landing in Erie County $3,000,000 FV Battery Park Coastal Improvements $1,000,000 FW NW Ohio Water Quality Improvements/Cold Creek Foundation $800,000 FX Camp Timberlane Infrastructure Improvements $600,000 FY Kelley's Island East Lakeshore Shoreline Protection $400,000 FZ Erie County Fairgrounds Infrastructure Improvements $250,000 GA Erie County Jail Surveillance Upgrades $200,000 GB Huron Boat Basin and Amphitheater Capital Improvement Project $200,000 GC Sawmill Creek Wastewater Treatment Plant Expansion $200,000 GD Violet Township Event Center $2,100,000 GE Gateway Mixed Use District $2,000,000 GF Government Services Building Acquisition and Renovation $2,000,000 GG Wendel Pool Dehumidification System Replacement $550,000 GH Walnut Township Flood Mitigation $500,000 GI Pickerington Covered Bridge Rehabilitation $350,000 GJ Pickerington Connects $234,410 GK Elmwood Playground $225,000 GL Expanding Horizons – Meals on Wheels Senior Services Center $200,000 GM Historic Lancaster Bell and Clock Tower $150,000 GN Sycamore Creek Park Pond Restoration $125,000 GO Wagnalls Memorial Window Project $50,000 GP American Legion Post 283 Improvements $20,000 GQ Rushville Union Lions Club Accessible Parking $5,500 GR Jeffersonville Rattlesnake Water System Improvements $1,000,000 GS Wayne Township Firehouse Community Shelter $175,000 GT The Ohio Center for Advanced Technologies $20,000,000 GU Columbus Symphony Orchestra – Music for All $18,500,000 GV Downtown Columbus Capital Line $10,000,000 GW Heritage Trail Expansion $8,000,000 GX John Glenn International Airport Improvements $7,500,000 GY OP Chaney Grain Elevator Restoration $2,800,000 GZ Downtown Security Command Center $1,500,000 HA Unverferth House Revitalization and Expansion Campaign $1,500,000 HB Historic Dublin Riverfront Revitalization $1,230,000 HC Heartland Music Incubator $1,000,000 HD Norwich Township Fire Department Station 84 $1,000,000 HE Westland Mall Renovations $1,000,000 HF Hilliard First Responders Park $800,500 HG Green Lawn Cemetery Chapel $750,000 HH Heinzerling Facility Improvements $750,000 HI Whitehall Police Department Emergency Facility $605,220 HJ Knoll View Place $600,000 HK Tolles Cybersecurity Lab Renovation $600,000 HL Edison Welding Institute Renovations $500,000 HM Elevate Northland $500,000 HN LifeTown Kindness Center $500,000 HO National Center for Urban Solutions Facility $500,000 HP Scioto Rise Place $500,000 HQ Dublin Brand Road Pedestrian Tunnel Flood Mitigation $468,000 HR OZEM Gardner House Rehabilitation $375,000 HS Somali Community Link Center $350,000 HT The Refuge $250,000 HU Grandview Heights Fire EMS Police Facility $200,000 HV Grandview Heights McKinley Field Park $200,000 HW Tawnya Salyer Memorial Statue $200,000 HX Columbus Urban League Career Connect Hub $150,000 HY Boys and Girls Club of J. Ashburn $138,585 HZ VFW Roof Repairs Reynoldsburg Post 9473 $32,695 IA Building the Future of 4-H Camp Palmer $1,825,000 IB Community Event and Recreational Facility Renovation in Wauseon $500,000 IC Fulton County Fairgrounds Arts and Craft Building $80,000 ID Gallia County Council on Aging New Facility $2,500,000 IE Reservoir Enhancement Project $2,250,000 IF Gallia County Sheriff Office Renovation $225,000 IG Hambden Fire Station Project $2,000,000 IH Montville Fire Station Construction $1,250,000 II Chardon Fire Department Equipment Project $1,000,000 IJ Burton Berkshire Local Schools Career Pathways Program $915,037 IK Geauga County Fair $500,000 IL Russell Township Community Building $370,905 IM Chester Township Police Department Building Renovation $348,875 IN Chardon Memorial Stadium Restroom and Concession Project $250,000 IO Geauga County Safety Center Parking Lot $250,000 IP Salt Dome Structural Repairs $155,000 IQ St. Mary School Playground Enhancements $4,000 IR Cedarville Opera House $12,000,000 IS Clifton Union School Improvements $3,900,000 IT Future Development of Wright-Patterson $3,500,000 IU Clifton Opera House $1,900,000 IV Skyway SCIF Center $1,000,000 IW Spring House Park: Phase One $1,000,000 IX WSU: Archive Facility Upgrades $500,000 IY OhioMeansJobs Greene County Improving Accessibility Project $175,000 IZ Ohio Veterans’ Children’s Home Expansion and Upgrade, Phase 1 $150,000 JA Cambridge YMCA $3,000,000 JB Route 40 East Sewer Extension $1,000,000 JC Cambridge Fire Department Renovations $560,000 JD Old Washington Community VFD Station $250,000 JE Hamilton County Convention Center District Development $46,000,000 JF University of Cincinnati Health $16,750,000 JG Xavier University College of Osteopathic Medicine $9,750,000 JH Riverbend 2.0 $8,000,000 JI Blue Line Foundation HQ and Regional Training Center $1,000,000 JJ 605 Plum Convention Center Garage Renovation $945,771 JK Boys and Girls Club of Taft $300,978 JL Boys and Girls Club of East Hamilton $194,722 JM Boys and Girls Club of Sheakley $58,529 JN Findlay YMCA $1,250,000 JO Hancock County Fair $500,000 JP Hancock County Park District $250,000 JQ Owens State Community College CDL Facilities $250,000 JR Ada War Memorial Park $500,000 JS Hardin County Fair $500,000 JT Kenton Fire Department $500,000 JU Ohio Northern University HealthWise Mobile Health Clinic $500,000 JV Pump House Funding – Rodney Hensel $200,000 JW Hardin County Veterans Memorial Park District $50,000 JX Alger Baseball Field $40,000 JY Harrison County Fairground Replacement and Enhancement $720,000 JZ Regional Safety Center at Tappan Lake $650,000 KA Jewett Fire and Emergency Equipment Storage Building $325,000 KB Village of Bowerston VFD $205,000 KC Village of Bowerston Maintenance Building $100,000 KD Napoleon Public Library Improvements $1,000,000 KE The Henry County Community Event Center Office Addition $1,000,000 KF Corn City Regional Fire District New Fire Station $500,000 KG Napoleon Water Tower Upgrades $135,000 KH Core Networking Equipment at The Center for Child and Family Advocacy (CCFA) in Henry County $72,000 KI Malinta Community Historical Society Site Project $45,000 KJ Highland County Engineer Truck Barn $1,000,000 KK Camp Wyandot Historic Camper Cabin Project $50,000 KL Union Furnace / Starr Township Improvements $35,000 KM Agricultural Society Millersburg Expo $750,000 KN Safe Harbor Ohio $500,000 KO Winesburg Park Improvements $250,000 KP West Holmes Local Schools Robotics Program $22,000 KQ Norwalk Theater Restoration $2,000,000 KR Norwalk Public Library Rehab $400,000 KS Feichtner Memorial Building Improvements $250,000 KT Huron County Transfer Station Scale Replacement $202,000 KU Jackson County Memorial Building Renovation $2,500,000 KV City of Jackson Park and Trail Revitalization $1,000,000 KW Jackson County Courthouse Building and Grounds Renovation $600,000 KX Blamer Park Renovation $392,038 KY Wellston Food Pantry Turn-Key Renovation $200,000 KZ Wellston Fire Department Training Academy $175,000 LA Jefferson County Agricultural Society Small Animal Barn $35,000 LB Mount Vernon Police Station $2,000,000 LC Fredericktown Water Infrastructure Improvements $750,000 LD Family Fun Grounds in Knox County $125,000 LE Willoughby Osborne Park Shoreline Protection $2,000,000 LF Uptown Mentor Revitalization $1,500,000 LG ISTEM Painesville Township Haden Facility and Crowns Project $1,000,000 LH Mentor Fire Station $1,000,000 LI University Hospitals TriPoint Breast Center - Painesville $938,750 LJ Concord Township Waterline Extension Project $500,000 LK Lake Erie College Center for Health Sciences $500,000 LL Lake Metro Parks Lakefront Trail $500,000 LM Kirtland Public Library Roof Project $340,625 LN Mentor on the Lake – Lake Overlook $300,000 LO Rabbit Run Theater Improvements $100,000 LP VFW Roof Repairs Mentor Post 9295 $35,478 LQ Resources for Restoring Lives and Providing Safety and Security $15,328 LR Wayne National Forest Welcome Center $5,000,000 LS Coal Grove Village Riverfront Park $1,250,000 LT Lawrence County School Communications $750,000 LU Necco Center Improvements $375,000 LV Boys and Girls Club of Portsmouth $100,000 LW Buckeye Lake North Shore Park and Pier $8,500,000 LX Memorial Health Systems Education and Event Center $3,000,000 LY Johnstown - Mink Street Water Infrastructure $500,000 LZ Newark Towne Center Project $1,854,000 MA Buckeye Valley Family YMCA Pataskala Childcare Center $200,000 MB Mary Ann Township Fire Department $66,000 MC Hanover Hains Hill Drive Drainage Improvements $52,000 MD Junior Achievement - Regional Satellite Learning Center $50,000 ME Boys and Girls Club of Newark $46,195 MF Indian Lake Advocacy Group $5,000,000 MG Logan County Sewer District Flat Branch Upgrades $1,500,000 MH Bellefontaine Calvary Christian School $250,000 MI Indian Lake Pickleball $150,000 MJ Lorain County Community College Desich Entrepreneurship Center 3rd Floor Microelectronics Training Hub $2,500,000 MK Lorain County Fairs $2,500,000 ML Boys and Girls Club of Elyria South $1,000,000 MM Lorain County PACE Site Modifications $1,000,000 MN The Nord Center Capital Improvement Project $1,000,000 MO French Creek Sports Complex $925,000 MP Lorain County Administrative BuildingJustice Center $750,000 MQ North Ridgeville Cypress Avenue Project $700,000 MR Sheffield Lake Field House Rec Complex $600,000 MS Black River Landing Amphitheater $500,000 MT Haven Center Emergency Shelter / Neighborhood Alliance $500,000 MU Vocational Guidance Services (VGS) Project - Lorain $500,000 MV Lorain County Health and Dental Facility $375,000 MW Elyria Public Library West River Branch $300,000 MX Lorain Hispanic Veterans Memorial $300,000 MY Lorain County Kennel Project $250,000 MZ El Centro Facility Improvements $200,000 NA Good Knights Bed Building Center $150,000 NB Sheffield Village Colorado Avenue Side Path $150,000 NC Carlisle Township Hall Project $100,000 ND VFW Roof Repairs Wellington Post 6941 $12,276 NE Lucas County Seawall and River Edge Reconstruction Project $3,000,000 NF Toledo Innovation Center $3,000,000 NG Inclusive Multigenerational Community and Recreation Center (IMCRC) $2,900,000 NH Virginia Stranahan Trail and Senior Affordable Housing/Senior Center Development $2,700,000 NI Eugene F. Kranz Toledo Express Airport Terminal Renovation Project $2,000,000 NJ Toledo YWCA Domestic Shelter Project $2,000,000 NK Toledo Zoo Reptile House $1,740,000 NL Toledo Fire and Rescue Department Facility Repairs $1,600,000 NM Ottawa Park Revitalization Phase 1 $950,000 NN Imagination Station; Toledo Science Center World of Discovery Exhibit $750,000 NO Homer Hanham Boys and Girls Club Renovation $650,000 NP Toledo Seagate Food Bank $650,000 NQ Pre-Medical and Health Science Academy at Mercy College $500,000 NR Toledo School for the Performing Arts Replacement Windows $500,000 NS Sylvania Township Safety Training and Grounds Improvement $485,000 NT Toledo Safe Haven Ronald McDonald Facility $300,000 NU Whitney Manor $300,000 NV Toledo Hensville Entertainment District $250,000 NW Ottawa Hills Walk Path Project $175,000 NX Glass City Mural Wall Lighting (Toledo) $100,000 NY Lucas County Sheriff Substation Renovation $100,000 NZ Toledo Broadway Commercial Redevelopment Project $100,000 OA Madison County Airport Improvements $35,938 OB Animal Charity of Ohio Infrastructure Expansion $1,500,000 OC Community Learning Center $1,000,000 OD West Branch Regional Community Education and Wellness Training Center in Mahoning County $875,000 OE Mahoning Valley Historical Society Expansion and Improvement $750,000 OF Campbell Access and Safety Project $660,000 OG Mahoning County Veterans Center $650,000 OH Salem Airpark Improvements $600,000 OI Youngstown Area Jewish Federation Building Expansion $501,389 OJ Mahoning Valley Regional Multi-Jurisdictional Infrastructure Initiative $450,000 OK Boys and Girls Club of Youngstown $300,000 OL Youngstown Playhouse Roof $238,000 OM Sheridan Road Multi-Use TrailVillage of Poland $185,000 ON Boys and Girls Club of Oak Hill $159,131 OO City of Struthers Mauthe Park Splash Pad $103,150 OP Rich Center for Autism Building for Tomorrow Phase 2 $100,000 OQ OCCHA Renovado Capital Campaign $93,500 OR Canfield Police Department Drone Program $60,000 OS War Vet Museum Facility and Program Improvement Project $60,000 OT Austintown 9-11 Memorial Park $50,000 OU VFW Roof Repairs Ellsworth Post 9571 $14,480 OV Marion Harding Performing Arts Center $500,000 $347,000 OW Magnetic Springs Community Park $153,000 OX Marion Soldiers and Sailors Memorial Chapel $450,000 OY George W. King Mansion – Etowah $300,000 OZ Boys and Girls Club of Oak Street $277,170 PA Terradise Nature Center Interpretive Center $200,000 PB Women’s History Resource Center Phase II $185,000 PC City of Wadsworth Brickyard Athletic Complex and Fixler Reservation $2,500,000 PD Lake Medina $1,500,000 PE Akron Childrens Medina Health Center $1,400,000 PF Medina County Career Center Modular Fire Training Tower $1,000,000 PG Oenslager Nature Center $500,000 PH City of Medina Multi-Use Uptown Loop Phase 1 $396,000 PI Medina County Radio System – Seville Tower $450,000 PJ Medina County Sheriff Office Jail Safety Enhancement $200,000 PK Equine Assisted Mental Health Community Campus $200,000 PL Majestic Equine Connections $200,000 PM Main Street Medina Facade Improvement $150,000 PN Medina County Achievement Center Renovation and Innovative Vocational Training Building $100,000 PO Serenite Restaurant and Culinary Institute Roof/Gutter Repair $65,000 PP Main Street Medina South Town Gateway $62,000 PQ VFW Roof Repairs Medina Post 5137 $60,898 PR Homer Township Tornado Siren Project $36,834 PS Chippewa Lake Area Emergency Siren $35,000 PT Ohio University Airport Improvements $2,500,000 PU Meigs County Transportation Hub $1,500,000 PV Racine Entertainment District $1,500,000 PW 1872 Hall Complex $250,000 PX Meigs County Fair $250,000 PY Fort Recovery Water Tower $600,000 PZ Troy Great Miami River Recreation Connectivity Project $2,000,000 QA Troy-Miami County Public Library Improvements $500,000 QB Bethel Township VFD Improvements $400,000 QC Graysville and Community VFD Improvements $250,000 QD Bethel Community Center Improvements $183,000 QE Woodsfield Government and Community Center $100,000 QF Midway Community and Senior Citizens $70,000 QG Laings Community Center $23,000 QH VFW Roof Repairs Sardis Post 9930 $19,836 QI Miami Chapel Inspire Zone Youth Workforce Development Center – Boys & Girls Club $3,000,000 QJ Dayton Aviation Heritage Site (Wright Factory) $2,000,000 QK Dayton International Airport Concourse B $2,000,000 QL Future Development of Wright-Patterson $1,500,000 QM Healthy Family Market / Dayton Children's Pediatric Center $1,500,000 QN Tri-Cities North Regional Wastewater Authority $1,500,000 QO Kettering Business Park $1,250,000 QP West Carrollton River District and Whitewater Park $500,000 QQ Countryside Park Revitalization $1,000,000 QR Ronald McDonald House of Dayton $1,000,000 QS Schuster Center $1,000,000 QT Union Ring Road Completion Project - Phase II $1,000,000 QU Uptown Centerville Connectivity and Development Improvements $1,000,000 QV Harrison Township Police Headquarters Renovation $950,000 QW Saint Vincent de Paul Community Donation Intake Facility $800,000 QX Saint Vincent de Paul Social Services Emergency Shelter for Men $500,000 QY Homefull Housing, Food and Jobs Center $750,000 QZ Jefferson Township Community Improvements $600,000 RA BOLT Innovation Center $500,000 RB Centerville Schools Safety Access $500,000 RC Dayton Dream Center Transitional Housing $500,000 RD East End Whole Family Services Hub Facility Expansion and Renovation in Dayton $500,000 RE Union Ring Road Completion Project - Phase III $500,000 RF Robinette Park $400,000 RG Homefull’s Healthy Start Child Care & Early Learning Center West Dayton $350,000 RH Dayton Airshow $300,000 RI Germantown Covered Bridge $275,000 RJ Dayton Clothes that Work! Facility Improvements $250,000 RK Flyghtwood Sports Life and Leadership Campus $250,000 RL Grant Park Accessibility Improvements $250,000 RM K-12 Gallery and TEJAS Acquisition Project $250,000 RN Miami Township Public Works $250,000 RO Old North Dayton Park Expansion Project $250,000 RP Catholic Social Services Supervised Visitation Center $200,000 RQ Dayton Alvis, Inc. $195,149 RR Boys and Girls Club of Dayton $154,851 RS Preservation of Dayton Woman’s Club Historic Mansion $100,000 RT West Memory Gardens Flood Mitigation Project $75,000 RU German Township Channel Maintenance $60,000 RV Miamisburg Historical Society Improvements $40,000 RW Pennsville Volunteer Fire Department – New Building Construction $1,500,000 RX Historic Preservation, Job Creation, and Healthcare Expansion at the Stanbery Building (McConnelsville) $500,000 RY Malta/McConnelsville Equipment Project $325,000 RZ Chesterhill VFD Station $250,000 SA Morgan County Emergency Communications Center $250,000 SB Morgan County Fair $250,000 SC Reinersville Volunteer Fire Department $50,000 SD Flying Horse Farms Renovation and Updates to Facilities $350,000 SE Morrow County Engineers Facility $250,000 SF Morrow County Health Department Renovations $250,000 SG Water Filter Installation for Legacy Phosphorus Fields $500,000 SH The Wilds Giraffe Barn and Innovative Guest Lodging $2,500,000 SI Avondale Youth Center HVAC Upgrade $450,000 SJ The Tribe Athletic Complex Track $1,000,000 SK Ottawa County Workforce Hub and Center for Career Advancement $1,250,000 SL Skills Academy in Ottawa County $250,000 SM Ottawa County Fairgrounds Upgrades $200,000 SN Put-In-Bay Downtown Promenade Renovation $200,000 SO Genoa Civic Theatre Improvements $100,000 SP Paulding County Agricultural Society Racetrack Lighting Improvement $41,000 SQ Antwerp Rotary Basketball Court $40,000 SR Perry County Community Access and Workforce Training $500,000 SS Reading Township Volunteer Fire Department $1,250,000 ST Thornville AMVETS 51 $80,000 SU South Bloomfield Corridor Improvements $1,500,000 SV Ohio Christian University for Science $500,000 SW Pickaway County Library $250,000 SX Memorial Hall Window Replacement Project $200,000 SY Pike Emergency Operations Backup Power Project $750,000 SZ Ravenna Health Center $1,500,000 TA Serenity House Residential Facility $700,000 TB Happy Trails Farm Animal Sanctuary Welcome Center $500,000 TC Kent Safety Town $250,000 TD Shalersville Park $225,000 TE Freedom Township Historical Society Historical Museum $105,000 TF Buchert Park Improvements $51,000 TG Portage County Children’s Advantage HVAC $40,000 TH Windham Historical Society $27,950 TI Preble County Fairgrounds Stall Barns $700,000 TJ Preble Gratis Well Reconstruction $50,000 TK Fort Jennings Park Pedestrian Bridge and Park Improvements $350,000 TL The Ottoville Park Community Wellness and Recreation Enhancement Project $213,000 TM Womens Policy and Resource Center $100,000 TN Buckeye Park Improvements $40,000 TO Mansfield Christian School Improvements $1,500,000 TP Avita Comprehensive Cancer Center $1,150,000 TQ Plymouth Fire Department Building Replacement $600,000 TR Mansfield Theater "Road to 100" Renovation $500,000 TS YMCA-North Central Ohio Sports Complex $500,000 TT Main Street Plaza Improvement Project $250,000 TU Richland County Agricultural Society $100,000 TV VFW Roof Repairs Mansfield Post 3494 $27,964 TW Ohio Genealogical Society Archives Security $10,000 TX Hopewell Regional Visitor Center $5,000,000 TY Union Township Fire Department Project $175,000 TZ Fremont Downtown Revitalization $1,350,000 UA Hayes Presidential Library Improvements $300,000 UB Fremont Water Access Emergency Response $150,000 UC Shawnee State University College of Health and Human Services $5,000,000 UD Appalachian Youth Behavioral Health Services Expansion $2,000,000 UE Scioto County Safety Operations Center $696,000 UF Scioto County Fairgrounds $600,000 UG Green Township Garage $500,000 UH Installer Technician Registered Apprenticeship in Scioto County $323,150 UI Portsmouth Courtroom Renovations $240,000 UJ Bloom-Vernon Local Schools Lighting $51,600 UK Seneca County Agricultural Center $370,000 UL Fostoria Learning Center Security $352,000 UM Seneca County Museum Interior Revitalization $190,000 UN Bettsville Emergency Medical Services Renovation $150,000 UO Attica-Venice Township Joint Cemetery Mausoleum $93,742 UP Court Street Streetscape Project $50,000 UQ Ritz Theatre Marquee Renovation $30,000 UR Fort Loramie Industrial Park $724,000 US Midwest Regional ESC Resilient Heights Improvements $600,000 UT Shelby County Community Workforce Training Center $500,000 UU Boys and Girls Club of Massillon $193,904 UV VFW Roof Repairs Louisville Post 7490 $42,970 UW Hall of Fame Village $9,763,126 UX Pro Football Hall of Fame Modernization $7,000,000 UY Stark County Juvenile Detention System Demolition $64,200 UZ Cascade Plaza $5,000,000 VA New Franklin Sewer Project $3,800,000 VB Akron-Canton Airport West Side Development for Aeronautic Activity $3,200,000 VC Cuyahoga Falls Regional Fire Training Complex $3,000,000 VD Akron Art Museum – Center for Digital Discovery $2,000,000 VE Akron Zoo Veterinary Hospital $1,750,000 VF Akron Community Health Center Addiction One Campus Expansion $1,250,000 VG Barberton City Hall and Justice Center $1,000,000 VH Summit County Mobile Medical Project $1,000,000 VI Boston Heights Safety Center $986,831 VJ Middle School Trades Education Center in Summit County $750,000 VK Hudson Inclusive Playground $680,000 VL Summit County Fairgrounds New Agriculture Center $600,000 VM Macedonia Service Center $500,000 VN Child Guidance and Family Solutions – Multi-Campus $450,000 VO Boys and Girls Club - Steve Wise $440,913 VP Akron Urban League Building Improvements $400,000 VQ Legacy Building Project Improvements $400,000 VR Bath North Fork Preserve Improvements $170,000 VS Copley Road Trail East $150,000 VT G.A.R. Hall Rehabilitation $150,000 VU Stark State Oil and Natural Gas Job Training Equipment $100,000 VV Stow First Responders Memorial $95,863 VW Special Education Cornerstone Community School $76,393 VX Boston Township Hall ADA Upgrades $50,000 VY Cortland Safety Service Complex / Training Facility $2,150,000 VZ West Warren Industrial Park Traffic and Fire Suppression Improvements $1,500,000 WA Holy Trinity Orthodox Christian Academy and Preschool $1,000,000 WB Eastwood Field Renovations $500,000 WC Trumbull County Fairgrounds Grandstand Renovation $500,000 WD Cortland’s Outdoor Education & Event Space $350,000 WE Bloomfield Regional Emergency Medical Services Renovation Project $345,000 WF Mosquito Lake State Park Water Improvements $330,350 WG Camp Sugarbush Infrastructure Improvements $300,000 WH John F. Kennedy Renovation Project $300,000 WI Hubbard Outpost Sanitary Sewer Project $175,000 WJ Liberty Township Fencing Project $100,000 WK Victory Christian School Renovation $100,000 WL Tuscarawas County Facilities Investments in Health, Safety, and Election Security $2,500,000 WM Tuscarawas County Engineer Building $1,350,000 WN Cleveland Clinic Union Hospital Cancer Center $1,000,000 WO Fire, EMT, Law Enforcement Burn Building $500,000 WP Norma Johnson Center Improvements (Red Barn and Brandywine) $250,000 WQ Dover Public Library Roof Replacement Project $85,731 WR Transportation Research Center, Inc. Impact Lab Upgrades $24,000,000 WS Richwood Pickleball $218,000 WT Leesburg Township Walking Trail and Playground Project $162,545 WU The Village of Richwood Fairgrounds $49,849 WV Northwest State Community College Van Wert Campus Renovation $1,000,000 WW Van Wert Regional Airport Runway Project $600,000 WX VFW Roof Repairs Van Wert Post 5803 $41,754 WY Middle Point Memorial Park $25,000 WZ Moser Park Concession Stand Replacement $19,860 XA Wilkesville Township Outdoor Warning Siren $35,000 XB Cincinnati Open Tennis Tournament $27,500,000 XC Warren County Ion Exchange Project $200,000 XD Waynesville and Maineville Girl Scout Camp Improvements $200,000 XE VFW Roof Repairs Mason Post 9622 $9,969 XF Mid Ohio Valley Aquatic Center $750,000 XG Decatur Township Building Construction $350,000 XH Boys and Girls Club of Marietta $213,909 XI Marietta Saint Mary of the Assumption Roof Project $150,000 XJ Betsy Mills Drainage Project $79,000 XK Marietta College Womens Softball Complex $50,000 XL VFW Roof Repairs New Matamoras Post 6387 $13,740 XM Shreve Wastewater Treatment Plant System Improvements $1,750,000 XN Wooster Community Hospital Improvements $1,000,000 XO Wayne County Agricultural Society, Inc. $415,000 XP Wayne County Airport Hangar Construction Project $350,000 XQ Wayne County Emergency Vehicle Drivers Training Course $300,000 XR Boys and Girls Club of Orrville $280,318 XS Boys and Girls Club of Edgewood $186,771 XT Foodsphere Commercial Kitchen/Food Marketplace $100,000 XU Edgerton Community Center $425,000 XV Installation of Elevator to North Annex Building in Williams County $187,076 XW Wabash Cannonball Trail: Design Engineering $153,500 XX Wood County Engineer Garage and Maintenance Facility (Bowling Green) $1,000,000 XY Wood County Educational Service Center $750,000 XZ Positive Community Connections Center Project (Bowling Green) $600,000 YA Wood County Committee on Aging $500,000 YB City of Perrysburg $200,000 YC North Baltimore Public Library Emergency Repairs $100,000 YD Wood County Public Library Heating Project $100,000 YE Upper Sandusky Midway Industrial Park $400,000 YF VFW Roof Repairs Carey Post 3759 $20,712 Sec. 207.37. 1 2 3 A YSU YOUNGSTOWN STATE UNIVERSITY B Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) C C34500 Basic Renovations $700,000 D C34565 IT Infrastructure Upgrades $952,498 E C34586 Kilcawley Center Renovations $9,753,000 F C34591 Penguin City Brewing Company Upgrade Project $700,000 G C34592 Rich Center for Autism Building for Tomorrow $450,000 H C34593 YNG Aviation Education Center $350,000 I C34594 Regional Workforce Training and Community Wellness Center $250,000 J C34595 Eastern Ohio Biztown Financial Literacy & Entrepreneurship Center $250,000 K Higher Education Improvement Fund (Fund 7034) Total $12,705,498 L TOTAL ALL FUNDS $12,705,498 Sec. 221.15. COMMUNITY SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be used to support the projects listed in this section. 1 2 A Cleveland Christian Home - Child Wellness Campus $1,500,000 B Boys & Girls Club of Greater Cincinnati $1,400,000 C Lindner Center $1,000,000 D The Buckeye Ranch $1,000,000 E Bellefaire Child and Youth Services Center $750,000 F LADD Forever Home $720,000 G Best Point West Cincinnati Early Childhood and Mental Health Center Construction $650,000 H St. Vincent de Paul Child and Family Advocacy Center $600,000 I Clark County Family Justice Center $500,000 J Horses on the Hill $500,000 K Netcare Facility Improvements $500,000 L New Main Office for Community Counseling Center of Ashtabula County $500,000 M Ravenwood Health Renovation $500,000 N Toledo YWCA Domestic Shelter Project $500,000 O Tri-County Response Center Project $500,000 P Vista Village $500,000 Q The Crossroads Center New Recovery Treatment Center $430,000 R Applewood Centers Inc. $425,000 S Harcum House $400,000 T Maryhaven Residential Treatment Facility Improvements $400,000 U May Dugan Center Renovation $400,000 V YWCA of Greater Cincinnati Domestic Violence Shelter $400,000 W Integrated Community Solutions Community Center $350,000 X Shelby Health & Wellness Renovation Project $350,000 Y Journey Center for Safety and Healing $300,000 Z Alliance Area Domestic Violence Shelter $250,000 AA Alliance YWCA Headquarters Improvements $250,000 AB Ashtabula County Transitional Housing for Homeless Youth $250,000 AC CommQuest Reception Project $250,000 AD Lower Lights Christian Health Center $250,000 AE Paint Creek Youth Center - Multipurpose Community Building $250,000 AF St. Vincent Behavioral Health Project $250,000 AG The Refuge - New Building $250,000 AH Tobacco Treatment Center of Ohio $250,000 AI Wayfinders Ohio Emergency Homeless Shelter $250,000 AJ Addiction Services Council Facility Expansion $230,000 AK Richland County Shelter Renovation Project $217,235 AL Cincinnati Children's Hospital Youth Mental Health Facility $210,000 AM Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) - Akron Project $200,000 AN Child Guidance & Family Solutions (CGFS) - Stow Buildout $200,000 AO Hancock County ADAMH Board $200,000 AP Sanctuary Night - Expanding to Meet the Need $200,000 AQ Canton Domestic Violence Shelter $175,000 AR OhioGuidestone Youth and Family Resiliency Center $150,000 AS Lorain County Safe Harbor $115,000 AT Foundations Community Childcare, Inc. (FCC) $101,129 AU Shelby Mercy Mission House Renovations $101,000 AV Beyond the Walls $100,000 AW Blue Line Foundation HQ & Regional Training Center $100,000 AX Haven Home Renovations $100,000 AY Livingston Avenue Community New Direction Project $100,000 AZ Mansfield Domestic Violence Shelter Child Advocacy Center Renovation $100,000 BA The Cocoon Project for Survivors of Domestic and Sexual Violence $100,000 BB Toledo Lutheran Social Services Expansion Project $100,000 BC Muskingum Behavioral Health Improvements $57,000 BD Veterans Resource Center Project $50,000 The Department of Behavioral Health shall distribute the foregoing earmark to Vista Village notwithstanding sections 153.06 and 153.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 243.10. 1 2 3 A PWC PUBLIC WORKS COMMISSION B State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) C C15000 Local Public Infrastructure $415,000,000 D State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) Total $415,000,000 E State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) F C15030 Revolving Loan $100,000,000 G State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) Total $100,000,000 H Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) I C15060 Clean Ohio Conservation $75,300,000 J Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) Total $75,300,000 K TOTAL ALL FUNDS $590,300,000 LOCAL PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE Capital appropriations in H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly made from the State Capital Improvements Fund (Fund 7038) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. The Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that a need exists to appropriate investment earnings to be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Director of Budget and Management determines pursuant to division (D) of section 164.08 and section 164.12 of the Revised Code that investment earnings are available to support additional appropriations, such amounts are hereby appropriated. If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15000, Local Public Infrastructure/State CIP. Of the foregoing appropriation item C15000, Local Public Infrastructure, $15,000,000 under the Emergency Program shall be used to provide grants to communities to assist with road-slip emergency projects on nonstate roads or locally maintained routes and portions of interstates. STATE CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM - SMALL GOVERNMENTS Up to $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 shall be used for State Capital Improvement Program (SCIP) projects, in accordance with division (B)(1) of section 164.08 of the Revised Code, in townships with populations of less than five thousand persons within their unincorporated areas. REVOLVING LOAN Capital appropriations in H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly made from the State Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund (Fund 7040) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. If the Public Works Commission receives refunds due to project overpayments that are discovered during a post-project audit, the Director of the Public Works Commission may certify to the Director of Budget and Management that refunds have been received. In certifying the refunds, the Director of the Public Works Commission shall provide the Director of Budget and Management information on the project refunds. The certification shall detail by project the source and amount of project overpayments received and include any supporting documentation required or requested by the Director of Budget and Management. Upon receipt of the certification, the Director of Budget and Management shall determine if the project refunds are necessary to support existing appropriations. If the project refunds are available to support additional appropriations, these amounts are hereby appropriated to appropriation item C15030, Revolving Loan. CLEAN OHIO CONSERVATION GRANT REPAYMENTS Capital appropriations in H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly made from the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund (Fund 7056) shall be used in accordance with sections 164.20 to 164.27 of the Revised Code. Any amount in grant repayments received by the Public Works Commission and deposited into the Clean Ohio Conservation Fund pursuant to section 164.261 of the Revised Code is hereby appropriated through the foregoing appropriation item C15060, Clean Ohio Conservation. Sec. 363.10. 1 2 3 A DAS DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES B Reappropriations C Building Improvement Fund (Fund 5KZ0) D C10035 Building Improvement $210,942 E TOTAL Building Improvement Fund $210,942 F Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund (Fund 7016) G C10041 MARCS - Taxable $5,045,730 H C10044 Lorain County MARCS Tower/Sheffield Lake $250,000 I C10052 Symmes Valley Tower Project in Lawrence County $1,000 J C10055 Highland County MARCS Tower $1,000 K TOTAL Administrative Building Taxable Bond Fund $5,297,730 L Administrative Building Fund (Fund 7026) M C10000 Governor's Residence $2,536,996 N C10010 Office Services Building Renovations $64,539 O C10015 SOCC Renovations $622,172 P C10019 25 S. Front Street Renovations $11,801 Q C10020 North High Building Complex Renovations $400,000 R C10021 Office Space Planning $5,000,000 S C10034 Aronoff Center Systems Replacements and Upgrades $1,150,000 T C10038 Riffe Renovations $710,702 U C10042 IT Projects $4,000,000 V C10051 Fleet Sustainability $250,000 W TOTAL Administrative Building Fund $14,746,210 X Capital IT Projects Fund (Fund 7091) Y C10054 Statewide IT Projects $10,000,000 Z TOTAL Capital IT Projects Fund $10,000,000 AA TOTAL ALL FUNDS $30,254,882 MARCS STEERING COMMITTEE AND STATEWIDE COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEM (A) There is hereby continued a Multi-Agency Radio Communications System (MARCS) Steering Committee consisting of the following members: (1) The directors, or designees thereof, of Administrative Services, Public Safety, Natural Resources, Transportation, Rehabilitation and Correction, and Budget and Management, and the State Fire Marshal or the State Fire Marshal's designee; (2) The following members appointed by the Governor: (a) One representative of the Ohio Chapter of the Association of Public Safety Communications Officials or its successor organization; (b) One representative of the Buckeye State Sheriff's Association or its successor organization; (c) One representative of the Ohio Association of Chiefs of Police or its successor organization; (d) One representative of the Ohio Fire Chiefs' Association or its successor organization. (3) Two members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one from the majority party and one from the minority party; (4) Two members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party. (B) The Director of Administrative Services or the Director's designee shall chair the Committee. (C) The Committee shall provide assistance to the Director of Administrative Services for effective and efficient implementation of MARCS as well as develop policies for the ongoing management of the system. Upon dates prescribed by the Directors of Administrative Services and Budget and Management, the MARCS Steering Committee shall report to the Directors on the progress of MARCS implementation and the development of policies related to the system. (D) The Committee shall establish a subcommittee to represent MARCS users on the local government level. The chairperson of the subcommittee shall serve as a member of the MARCS Steering Committee. (E) The foregoing appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, shall be used to purchase or construct the components of MARCS that are not specific to any one agency. The equipment may include, but is not limited to, computer and telecommunications equipment used for the functioning and integration of the system, communications towers, tower sites, tower equipment, and linkages among towers. The Director of Administrative Services shall, with the concurrence of the MARCS Steering Committee, determine the specific use of funds. Expenditures from this appropriation shall not be subject to Chapters 123. and 153. of the Revised Code. MEDINA COUNTY RADIO SYSTEM-SEVILLE TOWER The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10057, Medina County Radio System-Seville Tower, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation items C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Westfield Center Community Center ADA Improvement Project and the Medina County and Brunswick Historical Societies Project/Wadsworth Historical Society, and C58001, Community Assistance Projects, earmarked for Westfield Center Improvements. BUILDING IMPROVEMENT The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement, plus up to $293,343. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $293,343 from appropriation item C10035, Building Improvement. MARCS - TAXABLE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable, plus up to $45,731. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $45,731 from appropriation item C10041, MARCS - Taxable. LORAIN COUNTY MARCS TOWER/SHEFFIELD LAKE The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10044, Lorain County MARCS Tower/Sheffield Lake, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10044, Lorain County MARCS Tower/Sheffield Lake, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10048, Williams County MARCS Tower. OFFICE SERVICES BUILDING RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10010, Office Services Building Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10010, Office Services Building Renovations, plus up to $64,539. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $64,539 from appropriation item C10010, Office Services Building Renovations. SOCC RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10015, SOCC Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10015, SOCC Renovations, plus up to $873,760. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $873,760 from appropriation item C10015, SOCC Renovations. 25 S. FRONT STREET RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10019, 25 S. Front Street Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10019, 25 S. Front Street Renovations, plus up to $28,717. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $28,717 from appropriation item C10019, 25 S. Front Street Renovations. ARONOFF CENTER SYSTEMS REPLACEMENTS AND UPGRADES The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10034, Aronoff Center Systems Replacements and Upgrades, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10034, Aronoff Center Systems Replacements and Upgrades, plus up to $385,580. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $385,580 from appropriation item C10034, Aronoff Center Systems Replacements and Upgrades. RIFFE RENOVATIONS The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C10038, Riffe Renovations, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C10038, Riffe Renovations, plus up to $11,514. Prior to the expenditure of this additional appropriation, the Department of Administrative Services shall certify to the Director of Budget and Management canceled encumbrances up to $11,514 from appropriation item C10038, Riffe Renovations. Sec. 371.20. COMMUNITY SUPPORT The foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, shall be equal to the amount of all projects specified in this section, unless the amounts are released prior to June 30, 2024, plus any unexpended amounts in appropriation item C58001, Community Assistance Projects, for projects that are not specified in this section, if the Director of Budget and Management determines that such amounts are needed to complete the projects for which they were appropriated. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C58050, Community Support, plus the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation items C25537, YMCA Dayton - Huber Heights Campus, minus $250,000, C58033, Transforming Vital Services, C58044, Women Community Reentry Project, and C58046, Seek Inc., plus a portion of the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C58001, Community Assistance Projects, needed to complete the projects specified in this section. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Dayton Boys and Girls Club (Miami Chapel Inspire Zone), is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C37755, Comprehensive Outpatient Program Expansion (COPE). The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C58050, Community Support, earmarked for Faith Mission Life Safety and Critical Improvements, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation items C315HS, Charitable Pharmacy and Market, C315IT, Culture Markets, C315JC, Negev Foundation - Smart Water Stations, C58001, Community Assistance Projects, earmarked for Save a Warrior Project and YWCA Family Center - Columbus, and C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Harrisburg Baseball Complex. 1 2 A Project List B Gracehaven-Multipurpose Building $2,500,000 C Dayton Boys and Girls Club (Miami Chapel Inspire Zone) $1,000,000 D Cuyahoga County Mental Health Diversion Center $1,700,000 E Bellefaire Jewish Children's Bureau Child and Youth Service Center $1,000,000 F Greater Dayton Regional Hospital Association $800,000 G Cleveland Clinic Akron General $700,000 H Cleveland Christian Home $700,000 I Providence House East Side Campus Community Hub $700,000 J Faith Mission Life Safety and Critical Improvements $560,000 K Neighborhood Alliance YMCA Renovation $500,000 L Unison Health Poe Road Crisis Residential CenterWhitney Manor $500,000 M Lorain County Health and Dentistry $500,000 N Tri-County Board of Recovery and Mental Health Services $450,000 O Medina County Emergency Housing Shelter $450,000 P Providence House $400,000 Q Ashtabula City - Samaritan House $400,000 R May Dugan Building Renovation and Expansion $350,000 S Western Reserve Area on Aging $300,000 T Alvis House $300,000 U Tiffin Community Kitchen $300,000 V House of Hope-Friends of the Homeless $300,000 W Saint Vincent de Paul Social Services Emergency Shelter for Men $250,000 X Adams County $250,000 Y Cedar Hills Transformation Camp $250,000 Z YWCA Greater Cincinnati Domestic Violence Shelter East $250,000 AA Sisters of Charity Health System and Sisters of Charity Foundation of Cleveland $250,000 AB Center for Addiction Treatment Recovery House $250,000 AC TCH Outpatient Community Behavioral Health (Best Point) Building $250,000 AD Toledo YWCA Domestic Violence Shelter $250,000 AE CHC Addiction Services $250,000 AF West Dayton Community Services Center (Easter Seals Miami Valley) $200,000 AG CommQuest Recovery Campus Improvements $200,000 AH Star House $200,000 AI Union Miles Development Corp (Walt Collins Veterans Housing Facility) $200,000 AJ Washington County Boys and Girls Club $175,000 AK City of Franklin $150,000 AL Y-Haven YMCA of Greater Cleveland $150,000 AM Pathways for Women $150,000 AN Square One Meigs $150,000 AO Maryhaven $125,000 AP Uptown Smiles Clinical Renovations $125,000 AQ Forbes House Domestic Violence Project $120,000 AR Henry County $110,000 AS Seven Hills Trauma Recovery Center $105,000 AT CommQuest $100,000 AU Comprehensive Health Care at the Centers, Gordon Square $100,000 AV Y-Haven YWCA of Greater Cleveland $100,000 AW Women's Resource Center of Hancock County $100,000 AX YMCA Competitive Sports Training Facility $75,000 AY Grace House Akron, Inc. $50,000 AZ Cadence Care Network Family and Community Resource Center $50,000 BA Cornerstone of Hope $50,000 BB Harbor Crisis Stabilization Unit $50,000 BC Homesafe - Ashtabula $40,000 BD The Commons at Springfield $25,000 BE Women's Recovery Center $13,000 Sec. 373.15. The foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, shall be equal to the amount of all unreleased local parks projects and allowable administrative costs specified in this section, unless amounts are released prior to June 30, 2024. Of the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, an amount equal to two per cent of the projects listed may be used by the Department of Natural Resources for the administration of local projects. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Mandel Jewish Community Center Preston's H.O.P.E. Playground, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C26086, Mandel Jewish Community Center. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Geller Park Pickleball Court Complex, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C315GR, Heath Port Authority Primary Standards Lab, minus $41,000. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Lake Erie Council - Boys Scouts of America Beaumont Scout Camp, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C38335, Lake Erie Council - Boys Scouts of America Beaumont Scout Camp. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Lima Simmons Field Sports Complex, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C38124, Allen County Airport Communications. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Beverly Island Park Bridge and Mid-Ohio Aquatic Center, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for the Carnes Center. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Rootstown TWP Community Park Improvements Project, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C23062, Village of Edinburg Veterans Memorial. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Lagore Memorial Dog Park at Caesar Creek, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C230FM, Cultural and Sports Facilities Projects, earmarked for Warren County Community Services. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Versailles Heritage Park, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C230J7, Cardinal Center. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for GRIT Chesapeake Community Center, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C32231, GRIT Chesapeake Community Center. The amount reappropriated for the foregoing appropriation item C725E2, Local Parks, Recreation, and Conservation Projects, earmarked for Vienna Air Heritage Park, is the unencumbered balance as of June 30, 2024, in appropriation item C34567, Western Reserve Port Authority. 1 2 A Project List B Downtown Cleveland Lakefront Access Project $5,000,000 C Mentor Erosion Mitigation $3,000,000 D Heritage Trail Extension $2,500,000 E Cleveland Tower City and Bedrock Development Activities $2,000,000 F Smale Riverfront Park $1,700,000 G Cincinnati Findlay Community and Recreation Center $1,200,000 H Gateway to Freedom Park $1,200,000 I Akron Area YMCA Camp Y-Noah Capital Improvement $1,000,000 J South Point Community Pool $1,000,000 K Cincinnati Zoo and Botanical Garden Pedestrian Bridge $900,000 L The Wilds RV Park and Campground $900,000 M Conneaut Marina Improvement $850,000 N Irishtown Bend and Canal Basin Park $850,000 O Auglaize Mercer Recreational Complex $750,000 P Copley Ridgewood Trail $750,000 Q Delhi Towne Square $750,000 R Environmental Education Pavilion at Forest Lawn Stormwater Park $750,000 S Glen Helen Nature Preserve Accessibility Improvements $750,000 T Sandusky Bay Pathway/Landing Park $750,000 U Scranton Trail ProjectDetroit Shoreway Project $750,000 V GRIT Chesapeake Community Center $750,000 W Dublin Bridge Park and Greenways Project $650,000 X Kurt Tunnell Memorial Trail $500,000 Y Massillon Park Splash Pad $500,000 Z North Ridgeville Mills Creek $500,000 AA Oak Harbor Waterfront $500,000 AB Sidney Feeder Canal Bike Trail $500,000 AC The Foundry $500,000 AD Geneva Township Park - Old Lake Road Shoreline Restoration $450,000 AE Hamilton-Clover Groff Trail Project $450,000 AF McCord Park Renovations $450,000 AG Mentor Marsh Observation Tower $450,000 AH Wadsworth Memorial Park Improvements $420,000 AI Mosquito Creek Lake Park Improvements $404,000 AJ Buckeye Lake Feeder Channel Restoration $400,000 AK Chagrin Meadows Preserve $400,000 AL Kelleys Island East Lakeshore Shoreline Protection $400,000 AM Lake Metroparks Lake Erie Shoreline Trail and Revetment Wall $400,000 AN McDonald Commons Renovation and Construction $400,000 AO Solon to Chagrin Falls Multi- Purpose Trail $400,000 AP Lake Erie Council - Boys Scouts of America Beaumont Scout Camp $350,000 AQ Dover Riverfront Trail ConnectorPark Improvements $350,000 AR Alum Creek Pedestrian/Bike Bridge - Bexley $350,000 AS Boeckling Building Pier $350,000 AT Elyria Intergenerational Community Center $350,000 AU Fairport Harbor Marina Boat Launch $350,000 AV Gateway Regional Sports Complex $350,000 AW Wauseon Community Social and Recreational Center $350,000 AX Sheffield Village French Creek Project $325,000 AY Lima Simmons Field Sports Complex $300,000 AZ Camp Joy $300,000 BA Canal Fulton Community Park $300,000 BB Chagrin River Trail $300,000 BC Creston Community Park Renovations $300,000 BD Glenford Earthworks Phase III $300,000 BE Kalida St. Michael Holy Name Ballpark $300,000 BF Magic Mile Trail $300,000 BG Massillon Park Splash Pad $300,000 BH Mayerson JCC Expansion $300,000 BI Niles Bike Path Bridge Improvements $300,000 BJ North Canton Price Park Recreation and Accessibility Improvements $300,000 BK Plain Township Diamond Park Historic Barn $300,000 BL Portage Lakes Drive Community Park $300,000 BM Reservoir Connector Trail Phase 2 $300,000 BN Solon-Chagrin Falls Multi-purpose Trail $300,000 BO Wadsworth City Park $300,000 BP Grailville Park Improvements $260,000 BQ Cave Lake Center for Community Leadership $250,000 BR Coke Oven Community Civic Center Park $250,000 BS Rotary Lodge at River Cliff Park Renovation $250,000 BT Covington - Schoolhouse Park $250,000 BU Heights to Hudson Trail $250,000 BV J. Babe Stern Ball Field $250,000 BW Johnstown Splash Pad $250,000 BX Lockington Trail Bridge $250,000 BY SPIRE Institute and Academy $250,000 BZ Timken Gatehouse Renovation $250,000 CA West Carrollton Whitewater Park $250,000 CB Wooster Barnes Preserve $250,000 CC Beverly Island Park Bridge $250,000 CD Mid-Ohio Aquatic Center $250,000 CE Vienna Air Heritage Park $250,000 CF Valleyview Park $240,000 CG Cave Lake Dam $225,000 CH Dan Beard Scout Camp Flooding and Erosion Mitigation $223,000 CI Chillicothe Paint Creek Recreational Trail $215,000 CJ Lawrence County Union Rome Trails and Walkways $214,000 CK Mandel Jewish Community Center Preston's H.O.P.E Playground $210,000 CL Geller Park Pickleball Court Complex $210,000 CM Bradstreet's Landing Pier, Lakefront Access and Resiliency Improvements $200,000 CN Camp Oty'Okwa Capital Improvements $200,000 CO Center Gateway Improvement Project - Rocky River $200,000 CP Centerville Benham's Grove $200,000 CQ City of Monroe Lookout Point $200,000 CR Franklin Furnace Park $200,000 CS Great Miami River Trail – Middletown to Monroe Segment Construction Project $200,000 CT Home Road Trail Extension $200,000 CU Lorain County Metro Park Connector $200,000 CV Mayerson JCC Improvements $200,000 CW Mount Aloysius Community Recreational Center $200,000 CX Munson Springs Nature Preserve and Historical Site $200,000 CY Portage Bike and Hike Trail - Mill Race Segment $200,000 CZ Shared Use Path Connector (Goosepond Road-Licking Health Department) $200,000 DA Sheffield Village Trails $200,000 DB Union and Rome Township Trails Project $200,000 DC Shawnee West Buckeye Trail $195,000 DD Jim Terrell Park Canoe/Kayak Launch $190,000 DE Darke County Art Trail $180,000 DF Bryn Du Barn $175,000 DG Norton Bicentennial Park $175,000 DH Antrim Community Center $150,000 DI Brown County Board of Developmental Disabilities Resource and Community Center $150,000 DJ Buckeye Lake Boat Ramps and Pier Enabling Project $150,000 DK Findlay Playground/Grant Park/Over-the-Rhine Recreation Center $150,000 DL Forest Park Central Park Improvements $150,000 DM Lancaster All Accessible Sports Complex and Park $150,000 DN Mansfield B&O Trail Connector $150,000 DO Mansfield Central Park $150,000 DP Medina County Rocky River Trail West Branch $150,000 DQ Mill Creek Valley Conservancy District Corridor Revitalization $150,000 DR Mount Gilead Park Site Preparations $150,000 DS North Kingsville Village - Community Park $150,000 DT North Olmsted Community Park Improvements $150,000 DU Pickerington Soccer Association Facility Improvements $150,000 DV Restore Rockefeller $150,000 DW Rio Grande Reservoir and Park Improvements $150,000 DX Swanton Railroad Park $150,000 DY Wellsville Marina Dredging $150,000 DZ West Union SR 41 Shared Use Path Phase II $140,000 EA Bellefontaine Blue Jacket Park $135,000 EB Wadsworth Durling Park Improvements $135,000 EC Carey Splash Pad $125,000 ED Fairlawn Gully Water Quality Basins $125,000 EE Flight Line: East Dayton Rails-to-Trails $125,000 EF Friedt Park $125,000 EG Old Murray City School Building Demolition $125,000 EH Willard Park Improvements $110,000 EI Lodi's Richman Field Splash Pad $105,000 EJ Avon Lake Weiss Field Park Pavilion Replacement Project $100,000 EK Brunswick Hills Township Park $100,000 EL Sylvania Plummer Pool $100,000 EM Cobblestone Park - Medina $100,000 EN Columbia Township Wooster Pike Bike Trail $100,000 EO Fairfax Ziegler Park Improvements $100,000 EP Holden Arboretum All-Season Trails $100,000 EQ Mansfield Sterkel Park $100,000 ER Mecca Township Recreation Center $100,000 ES Miracle Field Complex $100,000 ET Mitchell Park Trail Connector $100,000 EU Ottawa Memorial Pool Splash Pad $100,000 EV Outdoor Theater and Performing Arts Community Park - Hillsboro $100,000 EW Pickleball Courts at Patricia Allyn Park $100,000 EX Plain City Heritage Trail $100,000 EY The Pony Wagon Trail $100,000 EZ The Wilds Shade and Shelter Improvements $100,000 FA Veterans Memorial at Rose Run Park $100,000 FB Village of Bellville Historic Bandstand Renovations $100,000 FC Weatherstone Park - Wadsworth $100,000 FD Whitehall Community Park Revitalization $100,000 FE Acres of Adventure Learning Center $90,000 FF Byesville Patriot Park $90,000 FG Lagore Memorial Dog Park at Caesar Creek $75,000 FH 4-H Camp Piedmont Upgrades $75,000 FI Brook Park Central Park $75,000 FJ Buckeye Lake Crystal Lagoon $75,000 FK Fairborn Memorial Park $75,000 FL Geneva-on-the-Lake Shoreline Protection Project $75,000 FM Independence Pool Facility Improvements $75,000 FN Leipsic Buckeye Park $75,000 FO Little Miami River Access and Park Development $75,000 FP McConnelsville Community Recreational Building $75,000 FQ Middleport-Pomeroy Walking Path Project Phase IV $75,000 FR Mt. Sterling Mason Park $75,000 FS New Concord Swimming Pool $75,000 FT Outdoor Sports Court Revitalization - Springdale $75,000 FU Sharon Nature Preserve Trails Phase I $75,000 FV Summit Lake Vision Plan $75,000 FW Hiestand Woods Park and Preserve $75,000 FX Versailles Heritage Park $75,000 FY Wadsworth Safety Town Park $75,000 FZ Western Reserve Greenway Bike Trail $75,000 GA Voice of America MetroPark Tylersville Road Entrance $70,000 GB Ellsworth Hills Learning Lab $65,000 GC Buckeye Trail East Fork Wildlife Area $57,000 GD Avon Lake Veterans Park Gazebo $50,000 GE Bellaire Walking Trail $50,000 GF Big Walnut Trail Extension and Park $50,000 GG Big Walnut Trail SE Columbus - Eastland Area $50,000 GH Brunswick Lake ADA Canoe/Kayak Launch $50,000 GI Buckeye Lake Crystal Lagoon and Public Park $50,000 GJ Caldwell Race Track Upgrades $50,000 GK Camp Sherman Park $50,000 GL Center Ice Foundation $50,000 GM Cleveland Botanical Garden Public Accessible Garden Path $50,000 GN Drews Trak Memorial Pump Track Expansion $50,000 GO Greenwich Reservoir Park $50,000 GP Harmar Pedestrian Bridge Restoration Projects $50,000 GQ Jeromesville Square Park $50,000 GR Keener Park Renovations/Pickleball Courts $50,000 GS Kelley Nature Preserve Boat Ramp $50,000 GT Levitt Pavilion Dayton $50,000 GU Madison Village Dana's Park $50,000 GV Madison Village Wetland Trail $50,000 GW Milford Center Rail Depot $50,000 GX Millersport Lions Park $50,000 GY P&G MLB Cincinnati Reds Youth Academy $50,000 GZ Pomeroy Multimodal Path $50,000 HA Prairie Trail/Stitt Park Improvements $50,000 HB Richmond Heights Community Park Gazebo $50,000 HC Salt Fork State Park $50,000 HD Shade Community Center Upgrades $50,000 HE Village of Bloomdale Reservoir Project $50,000 HF West Union Pedestrian Bike Path $50,000 HG Bruce L. Chapin Bridge- Northcoast Inland Trail $45,000 HH Selby Building Revitalization $45,000 HI Village of Dunkirk Splash Pad and Storage Building $45,000 HJ Burr Oak State Park $44,000 HK Chippewa Falls Rail Trail Parking Lot $40,000 HL Chippewa Park Shelter House $40,000 HM Monroe Community Park Activity Center $40,000 HN Nimisila Park Excavating $40,000 HO Rittman Splash Pad $40,000 HP Waverly Canal Park $40,000 HQ Rootstown TWP Community Park Improvements $35,000 HR Jeromesville Community Garden $35,000 HS Village of Highland Hills Gazebo $35,000 HT Monroeville Clark Park - North Coast Inland Trail Connection $33,000 HU Camp McKinley Improvements $30,000 HV Keener Park Sledding Hill $30,000 HW Perry Township Community Recreation Center $30,000 HX Village of Weston Community Splash Pad $30,000 HY Aurora Kayak Launch Platform $26,000 HZ Blue Heron Park Trail Phase II $25,000 IA Charlement Reservation Stable $25,000 IB East Liverpool Park Improvements $25,000 IC Gloria Glens Southwest Park Grading $25,000 ID YMCA Auglaize-Mercer Recreation Complex $25,000 IE Rayland Friendship Park Restroom Project $25,000 IF Willshire Ballpark Enhancements $25,000 IG Oakwood Community Park $22,610 IH Blue Heron Park Flood Mitigation $20,000 II Clifton to Yellow Springs Bike Trail $20,000 IJ Hardin County Veterans Memorial Park $20,000 IK Moser Park Concession Stand Replacement $20,000 IL Zuck Riparian Preserve Trail $18,000 IM Wakeman Trail Connector $17,000 IN Sardinia Veteran's Community Park Revitalization $15,000 IO Seville Memorial Park Public Restroom Facilities $15,000 IP Kokosing Gap Trail $14,000 IQ Village of Albany Bike Paths $10,000 IR Paulding County Trails Project $7,500 IS Buckeye Trail Boesel Easement Bridge $2,800 Section 620.21. That existing Sections 200.30 (as amended by H.B. 54 of the 136th General Assembly), 207.37, 221.15 (as amended by S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly), 243.10 (as amended by H.B. 54 of the 136th General Assembly), 363.10, 371.20 (as amended by S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly), and 373.15 (as amended by S.B. 54 of the 135th General Assembly) of H.B. 2 of the 135th General Assembly are hereby repealed. Section 620.30. That Sections 335.20 and 757.60 of H.B. 33 of the 135th General Assembly are hereby repealed. Section 620.40. That Section 14 of H.B. 238 of the 135th General Assembly be amended to read as follows: Sec. 14. (A)(A)(1) The Ohio Medical Quality Foundation, described in section 3701.89 of the Revised Code, is retained under division (E) of section 101.83 of the Revised Code and expires as a statutory entity at the end of December 31, 2025. (B)(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly, through the repeal by this act H.B. 238 of the 135th General Assembly of section 3701.89 of the Revised Code, to abolish the Ohio Medical Quality Foundation as a statutory entity on January 1, 2026. (C)(3) As soon as practicable after the effective date of this section but not later than April 1, 2025, the Foundation, through its corporate trustee, shall transfer all of its remaining unencumbered funds, to the extent possible under law and contract, to the Medical Quality Assurance Fund established under section 113.78 of the Revised Code. (D)(4) As soon as practicable after the transfer described in division (C)(A)(3) of this section, the trustees of the Foundation shall prepare a written report identifying the following: (1)(a) Any encumbered funds unable to be transferred to the Medical Quality Assurance Fund, including the amounts still to be distributed pursuant to contracts in effect at the time of the report's preparation; (2)(b) The duration of any contracts in effect at the time of the report's preparation; (3)(c) The dates on which any remaining funds will be considered unencumbered. The trustees shall submit the report to the Treasurer of State, Governor, Senate President, and Speaker of the House of Representatives. (E) Following the repeal of section 3701.89 of the Revised Code on January 1, 2026, the Treasurer of State shall assume the contractual duties of the Foundation, its trustees, and its corporate trustee, as identified under any contracts in effect on that date. If any payments owed by the Foundation remain in arrears on or after January 1, 2026, the Treasurer of State may make the payments on behalf of the Foundation. (5) For the purposes specified in this division divisions (A)(1) to (4) of this section and any others that the Treasurer of State considers necessary in winding down the affairs of the Foundation, the Treasurer of State shall be given access to the Foundation's records. (B)(1) Not later than thirty days after the Treasurer of State receives notice under section 4731.256 of the Revised Code that the foundation described in that section has been created, the Treasurer of State shall transfer all unencumbered money remaining in the Medical Quality Assurance Fund to the monitoring organization under contract with the State Medical Board pursuant to section 4731.25 of the Revised Code. (2) Not later than thirty days after the monitoring organization receives the money transferred under division (B)(1) of this section, the monitoring organization shall submit the money to the foundation's governing board described in section 4731.256 of the Revised Code. (3) On January 1, 2026, or the thirtieth day after the foundation's governing board receives the money submitted division (B)(2) of this section, whichever is later, the governing board shall complete its initial disbursement of funds in accordance with section 4731.256 of the Revised Code. Section 620.41. That existing Section 14 of H.B. 238 of the 135th General Assembly is hereby repealed. Section 630.10. That Section 6 of H.B. 150 of the 134th General Assembly is hereby repealed. Section 630.20. That Section 5 of S.B. 202 of the 134th General Assembly is hereby repealed. Section 630.30. That Section 5 of H.B. 554 of the 134th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 101 of the 135th General Assembly) be amended to read as follows: Sec. 5. (A) This section applies to a community school described in Section 16 of H.B. 583 of the 134th General Assembly and to any other community school that is operated by a management company that operates a community school subject to that section. (B) Notwithstanding division (H) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code, a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code and to which this section applies may report to the Department of Education and Workforce the number of students enrolled in the community school on a full-time equivalent basis for the 2022-2023, 2023-2024, and 2024-2025, and 2025-2026 school years using the lesser of the following: (1) The maximum full-time equivalency for the portion of the school year for which the student is enrolled in the school; (2) The sum of one-sixth of the full-time equivalency based on attendance for the portion of the school year for which the student is enrolled in the school and one-sixth the full-time equivalency based on each credit of instruction earned during the enrollment period, not to exceed five credits. (C)(1) The Department of Education and Workforce shall complete a review of each community school that reports the full-time equivalency of students under division (B) of this section in accordance with division (K) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code. (2) If the Department determines a school has been overpaid based on a review completed under division (C)(1) of this section, it shall require a repayment of the overpaid funds and may require the school to establish a plan to improve the reporting of enrollment. (D) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the Revised Code or the Administrative Code, for purposes of reporting attendance and meeting minimum school year requirements under sections 3313.48 and 3314.03 of the Revised Code, a community school to which this section applies may report attendance to the Department of Education and Workforce consistent with the attendance policy approved by the governing authority of the school. Section 630.31. That existing Section 5 of H.B. 554 of the 134th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 101 of the 135th General Assembly) is hereby repealed. Section 630.40. That Section 270.14 of H.B. 45 of the 134th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 101 of the 135th General Assembly) be amended to read as follows: Sec. 270.14. In FY 2023, $15,000,000 of the enhanced federal medical assistance percentage, enacted as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, in Section 6008 of the "Families First Coronavirus Response Act," Pub. L. No. 116-127, shall be used to fund the one-time payment to each freestanding dialysis center, from GRF appropriation item 651525, Medicaid Health Care Services, in the manner in which the one-time payment is established in Section 751.20 of this act H.B. 45 of the 134th General Assembly. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the amount allocated in this section, at the end of fiscal year 2023, is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Medicaid for the same purpose in fiscal year 2024. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the amount allocated in this section, at the end of fiscal year 2024, is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Medicaid for the same purpose in fiscal year 2025. An amount equal to the unexpended, unencumbered balance of the amount allocated in this section, at the end of fiscal year 2025, is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Medicaid for the same purpose in fiscal year 2026. Section 630.41. That existing Section 270.14 of H.B. 45 of the 134th General Assembly (as amended by H.B. 101 of the 135th General Assembly) is hereby repealed. Section 701.40. (A) The Governor may execute a Governor's Deed in the name of the State conveying to Madison County ("grantee"), and its successors and assigns, to be determined in the manner provided in division (C) of this section, all of the State's right, title, and interest in the following described real estate: Situated in the State of Ohio, Madison County, Deer Creek Township, VMS 6246, being part of a 579.44 original acre tract (Deer Creek Township Parcel 05-00542.000) as conveyed to the State of Ohio Madison Correctional Prison by Deed Book 134 page 347, and being more particularly described as: Beginning at a mag nail set in the centerline of State Route 38, in the line between VMS 6246 and VMS 6169, in the line between Deer Creek Township and the City of London, being the Southeast corner of a 1.000 acre tract conveyed to Tom Farms Inc by Deed Book 278 page 889 and a corner to said 579.44 original acre tract, said mag nail bears North 15°36'05" West a distance of 5646.35 feet from Madison County Monument 02-004, said mag nail bears North 04° 15' 00" East a distance of 1079.10 feet from the intersection of the centerline of State Route 38 with the line between Deer Creek Township and Union Township; Thence, with the centerline of State Route 38, said VMS line and said Corp. line, South 04° 15' 00" a distance of 616.00 feet to a mag nail set; Thence, across said 579.44 original acre tract with the following two new courses: 1) South 81° 53' 47" West, passing an iron pin and cap set at 35.00 feet, a total distance of 728.66 feet to an iron pin and cap set; 2) North 10° 12' 38" West a distance of 569.69 feet to an iron pin and cap set in the South line of a 100 original acre tract conveyed to Tom Farms Inc by Deed Book 268 page 770; Thence, with the South line of said 100 original acre tract, North 79° 47' 22" East, passing a 1/2 inch diameter iron pipe found at the Southwest corner of said Tom Farms Inc's 1.000 acre tract at 591.70 feet, passing a 5 inch diameter steel post in concrete found at 849.53 feet, a total distance of 881.99 feet returning to the Point of Beginning, containing 10.8003 Acres more or less. Bearings are based on the centerline of State Route 38 (North 04° 15' 00" East) as described in Official Record 307 page 2131. Subject to and with the benefit of all legal highways, restrictions, easements, limitations, and reservations, of record, if any and to zoning restrictions which have been imposed thereon, if any. All iron pins are 5/8-inch diameter rebar with yellow plastic cap stamped "Cotrill Surveying." The foregoing legal description may be corrected or modified by the Department of Administrative Services to a final form if such corrections or modifications are needed to facilitate recordation of the deed. (B)(1) The conveyance includes improvements and chattels situated on the real estate, and is subject to all easements, covenants, conditions, leases, and restrictions of record: all legal highways and public rights-of-way; zoning, building, and other laws, ordinances, restrictions, and regulations; and real estate taxes and assessments not yet due and payable. The real estate shall be conveyed in an "as-is, where-is, with all faults" condition. (2) The deed for conveyance of the real estate may contain restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, and other terms and conditions the Director of Administrative Services determines to be in the best interest of the state. (3) Subsequent to the conveyance, any restrictions, exceptions, reservations, reversionary interests, or other terms and conditions contained in the deed may be released by the state or the Department of Administrative Services without the necessity of further legislation. (C) The Director of Administrative Services shall offer the real estate to the grantee to be determined through a real estate purchase agreement. Consideration for the conveyance of the real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be at a price acceptable to the Director of Administrative Services. If the grantee to be determined does not complete the purchase of the real estate within the time period provided in the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services may use any reasonable method of sale to determine an alternate grantee willing to complete the purchase within three years after the effective date of this section. The Department of Administrative Services shall pay all advertising costs, additional fees, and other costs incident to the sale of the real estate to an alternate grantee. (D) The real estate described in division (A) of this section shall be sold as an entire tract and not in parcels. (E) Except as otherwise specified above, the grantee shall pay all costs associated with the purchase, closing and conveyance, including surveys, title evidence, title insurance, transfer costs and fees, recording costs and fees, taxes, and any other fees, assessments, and costs that may be imposed. The proceeds of the sale shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the General Revenue Fund. (F) Upon execution of the real estate purchase agreement, the Director of Administrative Services, with the assistance of the Attorney General, shall prepare a Governor's Deed to the real estate described in division (A) of this section. The Governor's Deed shall state the consideration and shall be executed by the Governor in the name of the state, countersigned by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State, presented in the Department of Administrative Services for recording, and delivered to the grantee. The grantee shall present the Governor's Deed for recording in the Office of the Franklin County Recorder. Section 701.50. Sections 122.1712 and 122.1713 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, shall be known as the Platinum Provider Act. Section 701.60. When calculating the state appropriation limitation for fiscal year 2028, the Governor shall determine the limitation taking into account the amendments to or enactments of sections 107.032 to 107.034 of the Revised Code contained in Section 101.01 of this act. Section 701.70. All public officers whose compensation cannot be changed during the officer's term under Ohio Constitution, Article II, Section 20, shall continue receiving for the remainder of the officer's term the amount the official is entitled to under section 325.18, 505.24, or 507.09 of the Revised Code before the effective date of the amendments to those sections made by this act until the officer begins a new term and may constitutionally receive the changed compensation amount. Section 701.90. The Auditor of State shall conduct a performance audit of the Public Utilities Commission of Ohio, which shall include a review of the Ohio Power Siting Board, in accordance with sections 117.46 to 117.463 of the Revised Code. The Auditor of State shall release the audit not later than May 1, 2027. Section 701.100. The Rare Disease Advisory Council shall prepare and submit a final report to the General Assembly, in accordance with division (B) of section 101.68 of the Revised Code, not later than December 31, 2025. Section 701.110. (A) Each agency to which section 121.93 of the Revised Code applies shall review its operations to identify principles of law or policy that have not been stated in a rule and that the agency is relying upon in conducting adjudications or other determinations of rights and liabilities or in issuing writings and other materials, such as instructions, directives, policy statements, guidelines, handbooks, manuals, advisories, notices, circulars, advertisements, forms, letters, and opinions. An agency is not required to identify principles of law or policy relied upon in issuing internal management rules as defined in section 111.15 of the Revised Code. Not later than November 30, 2025, each agency to which section 121.93 of the Revised Code applies shall electronically transmit a report to the Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review containing all of the following: (1) A statement that the agency has completed the review required by this section; (2) The principles of law or policies identified under this division; (3) The agency's considerations regarding the identified principles of law or policies under division (C) of this section; (4) Any principles of law or policies for which the agency determines rulemaking is indicated or for which the agency has commenced the rule-making process under division (C) of this section. (B) The Joint Committee on Agency Rule Review shall make the reports available on its web site. (C) Each agency to which section 121.93 of the Revised Code applies shall determine whether a principle of law or policy identified in a review required under this section has a general and uniform operation and establishes a legal regulation or standard that would not exist in its absence. If the principle of law or policy has these characteristics, the agency shall evaluate the principle or policy using the standards in division (B) of section 121.93 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, to determine whether the principle of law or policy should be supplanted by its restatement in a rule. If the agency determines, in light of the standards, that rulemaking is indicated, the agency shall commence the rule-making process in accordance with divisions (C) and (D) of section 121.93 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act. Section 701.130. (A) As used in this section, "state agency" and "state employee" have the same meanings as in section 124.184 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act. (B) Not later than December 31, 2026, each state agency required to develop a plan under section 124.184 of the Revised Code regarding the work location of the agency's state employees shall submit an implementation report to the Director of Administrative Services during the period established by the Director that describes the agency's compliance with that plan. The agency shall include both of the following in the report: (1) The number of the agency's state employees who report to the agency's worksite or another location designated by the agency under that section; (2) The wages and job classification of the agency's state employees. Section 701.140. (A) The Auditor of State shall conduct a performance audit and a financial audit of the Ohio Judicial Conference in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 117. of the Revised Code. (B) The Auditor of State shall submit the audit results to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and President of the Senate not later than December 31, 2026. Section 709.10. Of the two additional members appointed to the Ohio Grape Industries Committee under section 924.51 of the Revised Code as amended by this act, the initial term of office of one member shall be for a term of one year and the initial term of office of one member shall be for a term of two years. Thereafter, terms of those members shall be for three years as provided in that section. Section 731.10. A county prevention specialist who is serving an existing term on a child abuse and child neglect regional prevention council in accordance with section 3109.172 of the Revised Code as of the effective date of this section may complete the council member's term of office. Section 733.20. (A) Notwithstanding the repeal and reenactment by this act of sections 3313.902, 3314.38, and 3345.86 of the Revised Code and the repeal by this act of sections 3317.23, 3317.231, and 3317.24 of the Revised Code effective July 1, 2026, any individual enrolled in a program established under one of those sections may do either of the following: (1) Complete the program in accordance with the applicable section, as it existed prior to the section's repeal or repeal and reenactment by this act, provided the individual completes the program not later than June 30, 2027; (2) Complete a program described in section 3313.902, 3314.38, or 3345.86 of the Revised Code in accordance with the applicable section, as enacted by this act. (B) The Department of Education and Workforce shall pay an eligible institution or eligible provider as required by the section under which the individual completes the program. Section 733.30. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in division (D) of section 3301.079 and section 3301.0715 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, for the 2025-2026 school year, school districts, community schools established under Chapter 3314., and STEM schools established under Chapter 3326. of the Revised Code shall administer each diagnostic assessment in accordance with those sections as they existed prior to the effective date of their amendment by this act. Section 733.40. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Revised Code, nothing prohibits any other community college, as defined in section 3333.168 of the Revised Code, from serving the counties previously served by Eastern Gateway Community College under section 3354.24 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section exempts a community college from academic program approval by the Chancellor of Higher Education under section 3333.04 of the Revised Code or from seeking approval under rules adopted by the Chancellor. Section 733.70. (A) The Department of Education and Workforce shall evaluate each sponsor of a community school pursuant to section 3314.016 of the Revised Code for the 2025-2026 school year. Each sponsor's rating for that school year shall determine the sponsor's evaluation cycle under division (B)(6)(b) of that section. (B) As the Office of Ohio School Sponsorship established under section 3314.029 of the Revised Code assumes sponsorship of Alternative Education Academy, also known as OHDELA, pursuant to a settlement agreement with the community school effective July 1, 2025, the Department shall not include the school when calculating the academic component of the Office's sponsor evaluation for the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years. If the Office continues to sponsor the school after the 2026-2027 school year, the Department shall include the school when calculating the academic component of the Office's evaluation. Section 733.80. (A) The Director of Education and Workforce shall establish a workgroup on student transportation. The workgroup shall consist of members selected by the Director and shall include representatives from each of the following: (1) The chairpersons of the standing committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate that consider primary and secondary education legislation; (2) The ranking members of the standing committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate that consider primary and secondary education legislation; (3) School districts, including districts from rural, small town, suburban, and urban typologies; (4) Career-technical education centers; (5) Educational service centers; (6) Community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code; (7) Chartered nonpublic schools; (8) The Ohio Association for Pupil Transportation. (B) The workgroup shall do both of the following: (1) Monitor and review the student transportation system during the 2025-2026 school year and develop recommendations for changes to better meet the transportation needs of Ohio students; (2) Conduct a study of and develop recommendations regarding the feasibility of each school district board of education providing transportation to students enrolled in a community school or nonpublic school on days that the community school or nonpublic school is open for operation with students in attendance but the school district is not open for operation with students in attendance on that day. (C) Not later than June 30, 2026, the workgroup shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly, in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code, a report on its findings and recommendations. Upon submission of the report, the workgroup shall cease to exist. Section 733.90. (A) The amendment by this act of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code does not affect the terms of the members of the State Teachers Retirement Board serving on the effective date of this section. Division (B) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code does not apply to appointed members of the Board serving on the effective date of this section. (B) Pursuant to section 3307.05 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, as soon as practicable after the effective date of this section, all of the following apply: (1) The Chancellor of Higher Education shall take office on the Board or designate an individual to serve on the Board as the Chancellor's designee. (2) The Treasurer of State shall appoint to the Board the Treasurer of State's investment designee. (3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate each shall appoint one investment expert member to the Board. (C)(1) The office of the contributing member of the Board described under former division (D) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code whose term expires on August 31, 2026, is abolished on that date. (2) The office of the contributing member of the Board described under former division (D) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code whose term expires on August 31, 2027, is abolished on that date. (3) The office of the contributing member of the Board described under former division (D) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code whose term expires on August 31, 2028, is abolished on that date. (D) The office of the retired teacher member of the Board described under former division (E) of section 3307.05 of the Revised Code whose term expires on August 31, 2026, is abolished on that date. Section 735.10. This act first applies to the nomination of candidates for the office of member of a board of education, and the election of those nominees at the following general election, beginning with the next primary election held in an even-numbered year that is held at least one hundred twenty days after the effective date of this section. Section 737.10. (A) The Director of Environmental Protection shall conduct a review to assess the motor vehicle inspection and maintenance program that is implemented in accordance with section 3704.14 of the Revised Code. The Director shall include all of the following in the review: (1) A determination of the necessity of the program; (2) An evaluation of whether each county that is subject to the program during the prior calendar year has achieved, and has the ability to maintain, compliance with federal ozone standards without implementation of the program in that county. The evaluation shall include the most recent air quality monitoring data and predictive modeling of future compliance. (3) An analysis of whether a revision to Ohio's state implementation plan could be submitted to the United States Environmental Protection Agency to discontinue the program while maintaining compliance with national ambient air quality standards. If the Director's analysis finds that compliance may be achieved without participation in the program, the Director shall formally submit a request to the United States Environmental Protection Agency for reconsideration of the program's implementation in affected regions. (4) After proper monitoring, an analysis of weather patterns over northeast Ohio and the entire great lakes region with respect to how those patterns impact ozone levels, air circulation, and overall emissions. The analysis shall include a review of temperature inversions, seasonal variations, and other meteorological factors that could contribute to emissions buildup or dispersion. The analysis also shall evaluate current ozone levels and how such weather patterns affect compliance status with the national ambient air quality standards. (5) Any potential alternative measures for maintaining air quality if the program is altered or discontinued. (B) Not later than eighteen months after the effective date of this section, the Director shall compile the findings of the review into a report. The Director shall submit the report to the General Assembly and make the report available to the public on the Environmental Protection Agency's web site. Section 737.30. Not later than ninety days after the effective date of this section, the Director of Health shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to implement division (A)(22) of section 3718.02 of the Revised Code. Section 739.20. PRIVATE INSURANCE OUTREACH PROGRAM During fiscal year 2027, the Department of Insurance shall create and administer an outreach program to provide information, awareness, and assistance to Medicaid recipients to help them transition from Medicaid to private insurance. Section 741.10. (A) As used in this section, "contributions," "contributory employer," "payments in lieu of contributions," and "wages" have the same meanings as in section 4141.01 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as provided in division (E) of this section, the Director of Job and Family Services shall, in accordance with division (C) of this section, collect a technology and customer service fee from all contributory employers and all nonprofit organizations, or groups of such organizations, that elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions under section 4141.241 of the Revised Code. (C)(1) The Director shall collect a technology and customer service fee of not more than fifteen-hundredths of one per cent of wages per employee subject to this chapter from each contributory employer. The Director shall collect any fee due under this section from a contributory employer at the same time and in the same manner as contributions due under section 4141.25 of the Revised Code. (2) At the time a nonprofit organization, or group of such organizations, that elects to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions files or renews a surety bond with the Director in accordance with division (C) of section 4141.241 of the Revised Code, the Director shall collect a technology and customer service fee of not more than thirteen dollars and fifty cents from the organization or group of organizations. (D) Technology and customer service fees collected under this section shall be paid into the Unemployment Compensation Special Administrative Fund established in section 4141.11 of the Revised Code. (E) The technology and customer service fee required under this section applies only to the period beginning December 31, 2025, and ending December 31, 2027. Section 745.10. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Classic motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4517.021 of the Revised Code. (2) "Absolute auction" has the same meaning as in section 4707.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Auction firm" and "auction services" have the same meanings as in section 4707.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Collector's motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that has all of the following characteristics: (a) It is of special interest. (b) It has a fair market value of not less than one hundred dollars, regardless of whether the motor vehicle is operable. (c) It is owned, operated, collected, preserved, restored, maintained, or used primarily as a collector's item, leisure pursuit, or investment rather than as the owner's primary means of transportation. (5) "Owner" includes any person or entity that has title to a motor vehicle. (B) Beginning on the effective date of this section through August 1, 2026, a person auctioning classic motor vehicles and collector's motor vehicles is exempt from the vehicle auction-related requirements and prohibitions of Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code, provided all of the following apply: (1) All of the vehicles that will be auctioned are either classic motor vehicles or collector's motor vehicles; (2) One or more or the vehicles will be auctioned on behalf of a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that is located in Ohio; (3) Not less than three-fourths of the vehicles will be auctioned through the style of an absolute auction; (4) The auction will last not more than three days; (5) The auction will be held at an exposition center in the largest city by population in Ohio, according to the most recent federal decennial census; (6) The person will only hold one auction of classic motor vehicles and collector's motor vehicles between the effective date of this section and August 1, 2026; (7) The person requests and receives permission for the auction from the Registrar of Motor Vehicles in accordance with division (C) of this section. (C)(1) Not less than thirty days prior to the proposed date of the auction, the person intending to host an auction in accordance with division (B) of this section shall file an application requesting approval for the auction with the Registrar that contains all of the following: (a) The person's name and business address; (b) The location of the auction; (c) Evidence, sufficient to satisfy the Registrar, that the person does not exclusively sell motor vehicles; (d) Any necessary, reasonable, and relevant information that the Registrar may require to verify compliance with this section. (2) The application shall be signed and sworn to by the applicant. (D) The person hosting an auction in accordance with division (B) of this section shall do all of the following: (1) Auction any classic motor vehicle or collector's motor vehicle to the general public for the legal owner of the vehicle, of which ownership must be evidenced at the time of the auction by a valid certificate of title; (2) Keep a record of the following information for each classic motor vehicle and collector's motor vehicle offered for sale at the auction, in a manner prescribed by the Registrar: (a) The certificate of title number, county, and state of registration; (b) The year, make, model, and vehicle identification number; (c) The name and address of the person offering the vehicle for sale; (d) The name and address of any vehicle purchaser; (e) The date the vehicle is offered for sale; (f) Any purchase price; (g) The odometer reading at the time of the auction and an odometer statement from the person offering the vehicle for sale at auction that complies with 49 U.S.C. 32705. (3) Allow reasonable inspection by the Registrar of the person's records relating to each classic motor vehicle and collector's motor vehicle auctioned. (E) Any person who auctions classic motor vehicles and collector's motor vehicle under this section shall use the auction services of an auction firm to conduct the auction. (F) The Registrar may refuse permission to hold an auction if the Registrar finds that the parameters of the auction do not comply with division (B) of this section or that the applicant made a false statement of a material fact in the application filed under division (C) of this section. (G) The Registrar shall not authorize a person licensed under section 4707.072 of the Revised Code to offer auction services or act as an auctioneer in regard to an auction of classic motor vehicles and collector's motor vehicle pursuant to this section. (H) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as modifying or conflicting with the requirements of Chapter 4707. of the Revised Code. Section 751.20. (A) The Department of Medicaid shall conduct a comprehensive study on the feasibility, legality, and potential cost savings of establishing a Medicaid waiver component that establishes work requirements for Medicaid recipients and includes additional supplemental workforce development requirements. (B) As part of the study required under this section, the Department shall evaluate the impact of requiring Medicaid recipients who maintain eligibility by satisfying work requirements for twelve consecutive months to enroll in a workforce development program that satisfies either of the following: (1) The program is a state-sponsored workforce development program that can be completed within twelve months. (2) The program is one that is offered through a private or public training facility, community college, or university that can be completed within twelve months. (C) The study required under this section shall assess all of the following: (1) The legal feasibility of implementing the requirements described in division (B) of this section; (2) The workforce development training capacity within this state; (3) The potential cost savings associated with implementing the requirements described in division (B) of this section; (4) The projected impact on Medicaid enrollment in this state if the requirements described in division (B) of this section were to be implemented. (D) Not later than September 1, 2026, the Medicaid Director shall prepare a report detailing the Department's findings of the study conducted under this section, including any policy recommendations. The report shall be submitted to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, and the chairperson of the finance committee of both the House of Representatives and Senate. Section 751.30. (A)(1) The Child Care Provider Recruitment and Mentorship Grant Program is created in the Department of Children and Youth. Under the program, the Department shall award grants to eligible organizations for the following purposes: (a) To increase, through recruitment efforts, Ohio's supply of licensed child care providers, including at least one hundred twenty new family child care homes, especially in areas or communities of the state most in need of such care; (b) To assist entities and individuals recruited under the program in establishing and operating child care businesses and adopting business practices to best serve the needs of Ohio's families. (2) The Department shall operate the program described in division (A)(1) of this section until July 1, 2027. (3) Each grant recipient shall do all of the following over the course of the recipient's grant period: (a) With the assistance of the Department and relevant stakeholders, identify and recruit entities and individuals interested in operating family child care homes, in particular, in areas and communities with limited access to such homes; (b) Partner with prospective child care providers to assist them in developing and implementing child care business models; (c) Assist prospective child care providers in obtaining licensure under Chapter 5104. of the Revised Code; (d) Mentor licensed child care providers in such topics as operating, maintaining, and expanding child care businesses. (B) An organization seeking a program grant shall apply to the Department in the manner prescribed by the Department. To be eligible for a program grant, an applicant shall demonstrate that it is able to do all of the following: (1) In collaboration with the Department and relevant stakeholders, plan, staff, and hold events, either in-person or virtually, to identify and recruit prospective child care providers; (2) Develop informational materials to assist licensed child care providers with marketing, advertising, and outreach; (3) Establish a software platform, with a customizable dashboard, that may be accessed by licensed child care providers to assist them with tasks such as marketing their businesses, enrolling children, communicating with families, billing for services, and reporting expenses; (4) Offer and provide coaching and training to child care staff employed by licensed child care providers, which may include in-person, group training sessions, on-site coaching visits, community forums, and other events; (5) Perform any other activity the Department considers relevant. The Department shall review each application it receives under this section. After receiving an application it considers complete, the Department shall determine whether the applicant meets the eligibility conditions described in this division. If the eligibility conditions are met, and subject to available funds, the Department shall award a grant to the recipient. Each grant shall expire at the close of fiscal year 2027. (C) The Department shall require each grant recipient, as a condition of continued funding, to submit to the Department on a periodic basis reports describing the recipient's progress in partnering with, assisting, and mentoring prospective and licensed child care providers, in particular the number and content of trainings offered by the recipient, the types of software or web site platforms the recipient makes available to child care providers, and any other information the Department considers necessary. The reports shall be completed and submitted in the manner and at the intervals prescribed by the Department. Section 751.40. (A) The Ibogaine Treatment Study Committee is established to study and evaluate the use of ibogaine for the care and treatment of individuals with substance use disorders and veterans with post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and mild traumatic brain injuries. In conducting its study and evaluation, the committee shall consider the following topics: (1) The needs of individuals with substance use disorders; (2) The needs of veterans with post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and mild traumatic brain injuries; (3) The efficacy of using ibogaine for the care and treatment of the individuals specified in divisions (A)(1) and (2) of this section, including a review of available scientific literature; (4) State and federal law regarding ibogaine; (5) Any other topics the committee considers relevant. (B) The committee consists of the following six members: (1) Four members of the General Assembly, two appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and two appointed by the Senate President; (2) The Director of Behavioral Health or the Director's designee; (3) The Director of Veterans Services or the Director's designee. The members shall be appointed not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Vacancies, including any vacancy due to the expiration of a member of the General Assembly's term of office, shall be filled not later than thirty days after the vacancy occurs in the same manner as the original appointment. The members shall select a chairperson from among the committee's membership and shall meet as necessary to satisfy the requirements of this section. (C) Not later than December 31, 2027, the committee shall prepare and submit to the General Assembly a report of its recommendations for legislation addressing use of ibogaine for the care and treatment of individuals with substance use disorders and veterans with post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and mild traumatic brain injuries. The report shall be submitted in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code. The Ohio Department of Behavioral Health shall provide to the committee the administrative support necessary to execute its duties. (D) The committee ceases to exist on the submission of the report described in division (C) of this section. Section 751.70. Not later than December 31, 2027, the Auditor of State shall conduct a performance and fiscal audit of the Department of Medicaid's next generation system. The Auditor of State shall submit a copy of the audit report to the the standing committees of the House of Representatives and the Senate that primarily consider legislation governing the Medicaid program and the Legislative Service Commission. In conducting the audit under this section, the Auditor of State may examine any of the following components of the system: (A) The Provider Network Management; (B) The Ohio Medicaid Enterprise System; (C) The Ohio Resilience Through Integrated Systems and Excellence (OhioRISE) Program; (D) The Electronic Data Interchange; (E) The Medicaid state pharmacy benefit manager that was selected in accordance with section 5167.24 of the Revised Code; (F) Centralized Provider Credentialing; (G) Prior authorization requirements; (H) Issues with late payments to Medicaid providers; (I) Any other aspects of the system that the Auditor of State considers relevant. Section 751.80. PRIVATE INSURANCE OUTREACH PROGRAM During Fiscal Year 2027, the Department of Medicaid shall create and administer an outreach program to provide information, awareness, and assistance to Medicaid recipients to help them transition from Medicaid to private insurance. Section 751.90. HIGH-THC CANNABIS IMPACT RESEARCH STUDY (A) As used in this section, "cannabis" and "THC" have the same meanings as in section 3780.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The Department of Behavioral Health, in collaboration with the Department of Commerce, shall conduct a study in partnership with a qualified Ohio public university, public safety agency, or research consortium selected by the Department of Behavioral Health to assess the potential health risks and benefits of cannabis and hemp-derived product use and to review state-level program evaluations from other states and peer-reviewed research regarding the following: (1) Physical, behavioral, cognitive, and neurodevelopmental effects of chronic or early use of high-potency THC cannabis products, particularly among individuals under the age of twenty-five; (2) Cannabis-induced psychosis and schizophrenia; (3) Cannabis hyperemesis syndrome; (4) The relationship between cannabis use and depression, anxiety, suicidal ideation, completed suicides, and cannabis use disorder; (5) The relationship between cannabis use and cognitive and neurodevelopmental impairments such as decline in memory and executive functioning; (6) Disproportionate impacts of cannabis use on vulnerable populations, including youth, pregnant women, unborn children, and individuals with a history of trauma or mental illness; (7) The relationship between cannabis use and IQ loss; (8) Health benefits of cannabis and hemp-derived products, including potential therapeutic uses and recommended guidelines for potency and usage. (C) The Department of Behavioral Health shall submit two reports to the Governor and the General Assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code and shall publish a copy of each report on the Department's web site. The initial report shall be submitted by June 30, 2026, and the final report shall be submitted by June 30, 2027. Each report shall include the following: (1) A comparative analysis of THC regulations, potency limits, and health outcomes from other states' cannabis programs; (2) A synthesis of peer-reviewed research and reputable state program data; (3) Recommendations for cannabis regulation, prevention education, public education campaigns, and outreach efforts for stakeholders such as the General Assembly, state agencies, employers, educators, and the general public. (D) The Department of Behavioral Health shall seek the input of the following as necessary to complete the report required by division (C) of this section: (1) The Department of Health; (2) RecoveryOhio; (3) The Bureau of Workers' Compensation; (4) The Department of Public Safety; (5) The Attorney General; (6) The State Medical Board; (7) The Ohio High Intensity Drug Trafficking Area; (8) Prevention consultants certified by the Chemical Dependency Professionals Board; (9) Children's hospitals. Section 751.100. PLACEMENT OF CHILDREN IN GROUP HOMES (A) As used in this section, "group home" has the same meaning as "group home for children" in section 5103.05 of the Revised Code. (B) The operator of a group home shall not displace a child who is placed in the group home as of the effective date of this section in order to comply with the ratio requirements established in rules adopted under division (B)(3) of section 5103.0520 of the Revised Code. The operator shall not accept the placement of additional children until the group home has complied with the ratio requirements. Section 751.120. The Department of Medicaid shall conduct a request for information to study the feasibility of requiring Medicaid managed care organizations to conduct internal data cross checks. Section 751.150. The Department of Rehabilitation and Correction shall create a pilot program in the Ross Correctional Institution to ensure that no private entity provides food service within the institution and instead utilizes state employees to oversee meals and food service to the extent such a program does not conflict with existing contracts. Section 751.160. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Electronic visit verification system" has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. 1396b. (2) "Integrated care delivery system" means the demonstration project implemented as described in section 5164.91 of the Revised Code. (3) "Medicaid managed care organization" includes a managed care organization participating in the integrated care delivery system. (B) Beginning on the effective date of this section and through June 30, 2027, if the Medicaid Director establishes an electronic visit verification system in rules adopted under section 5164.02 of the Revised Code, then all of the following apply: (1) The electronic visit verification system shall not exceed the minimum requirements specified in 42 U.S.C. 1396b. (2) The Department of Medicaid and the Department of Developmental Disabilities shall provide education and technical assistance to Medicaid providers subject to the electronic visit verification system to aid them in complying with the system. (3) When a Medicaid provider described in division (B)(2) of this section submits a claim to the Department of Medicaid, the Department of Developmental Disabilities, a Medicaid managed care organization, or any other entity authorized to pay a Medicaid claim subject to the electronic visit verification system and the claim is not supported by information in the system, all of the following apply: (a) The department, organization, or entity shall not deny the claim. (b) The department, organization, or entity shall notify the Medicaid provider that the claim is not supported by information in the system. (c) The department, organization, or entity shall offer the Medicaid provider the opportunity to review and correct both the claim and data in the system. (4) The Department of Medicaid, the Department of Developmental Disabilities, a Medicaid managed care organization, or any other entity authorized to conduct a post-payment audit or review may consider information in the electronic visit verification system as part of its audit or review protocol, but shall not conduct an audit or review based solely on information in the system. Section 751.170. AUDIT AND CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN FOR THE AGED, BLIND, AND DISABLED MEDICAID ELIGIBILITY GROUP (A) The Auditor of State shall conduct an audit of the Medicaid program to determine whether any individuals enrolled in the Medicaid program on the basis of being a member of the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group are ineligible to participate in the Medicaid program. The audit shall specifically examine whether individuals who are members of the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group have countable assets that exceed the limits specified in 20 C.F.R. 416.1205. (B) Upon the conclusion of the audit conducted under this section, the Department of Medicaid shall initiate a corrective action plan, designed to reduce spending in the Medicaid program for individuals in the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group, that does all of the following: (1) Addresses individuals who are determined by the audit to be ineligible for continued participation in the Medicaid program; (2) Establishes and implements an electronic asset verification system for all applicants and enrollees in the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group; (3) Undertakes other initiatives designed to reduce spending in the Medicaid program for individuals in the aged, blind, and disabled eligibility group. (C) The Department of Medicaid shall submit a copy of the corrective action plan to the Legislative Service Commission and the chairpersons of the standing committees in both the House of Representatives and the Senate that primarily consider legislation governing the Medicaid program. Section 755.20. (A) As used in this section: (1) "First responder" means a law enforcement agency, fire department, or emergency medical services organization. (2) "Unmanned aerial vehicle system" has the same meaning as in section 4561.50 of the Revised Code. (B) The Director of Transportation shall establish a Drones for First Responders pilot program to be administered by the Department of Transportation. (C) The program shall be designed to focus on the following goals: (1) Acquiring unmanned aerial vehicle system assets for first responders within municipal corporations; (2) Providing training on the operation of unmanned aerial vehicle systems to the operators of those systems; (3) Obtaining approval from the Federal Aviation Administration for beyond visual line of sight operations for purposes of the pilot program and the operation of unmanned aerial vehicle systems within the program; (4) Integrating existing Ohio unmanned aerial vehicle system infrastructure for purposes of conducting beyond visual line of sight operations within the program; (5) Collecting metrics for cost-benefit analyses related to advanced unmanned aerial vehicle system operations; (6) Developing a comprehensive approach for community acceptance and integration of unmanned aerial vehicle system operations; (7) Standardizing an approval process with the Federal Aviation Administration for unmanned aerial vehicle system operators across the state. (D)(1) The Director shall establish a process to award money available under the program to the legislative authority of municipal corporations that are willing to participate in the program and meet any guidelines established by the Director for meeting the program's goals. The money awarded shall be allocated towards the purchase of unmanned aerial vehicle systems for first responders within the municipal corporations, for training support, for assisting in navigating federal processes and approvals, and for supporting the integration of statewide operations. (2) Any unmanned aerial vehicle system purchased through the program shall comply with the federal laws and regulations for such systems, including those in the national security interests of the United States. As such, no system, including any components, services, or maintenance of that system, shall originate from a country or other entity that has been deemed a national security risk by the United States Secretary of State in accordance with 22 U.S.C. 2780 and 50 U.S.C. 4813. Additionally, any system shall comply with the "Support Anti-terrorism by Fostering Effective Technologies Act of 2002," 6 U.S.C. 441, et seq., and any applicable conditions of national defense spending. (E) The Director shall establish any procedures and requirements necessary to administer this section, including award processes, and any conditions for the expenditure of funding awarded under the program. (F)(1) Not later than two years after the effective date of this section, the Director shall submit a report regarding the program to the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the Minority Leaders of the House of Representatives and Senate, and the chairs of any committee of the House of Representatives and Senate related to transportation issues. (2) The report shall detail how funds were expended through the program, the success of the program in meeting its goals, the cost-benefit analysis created through the program, and any recommendations for additional integration of unmanned aerial vehicle system operations by first responders. Section 757.10. The amendment by this act of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code is intended to clarify the meaning of that section as it existed before the effective date of this section and is not intended to change the meaning in any way. Section 757.20. The amendment by this act of section 5747.40 of the Revised Code is intended to clarify the meaning of that section as it existed prior to the effective date of this section. It is not intended to change the meaning of section 5747.40 of the Revised Code in any way. Section 757.30. The Tax Commissioner may issue assessments pursuant to the amendment by this act of section 5736.09 of the Revised Code on or after the effective date of that amendment, subject to the four-year time limitation prescribed in division (F) of that section. Section 757.40. BUSINESS INCENTIVE TAX CREDITS In order to facilitate an understanding of business incentive tax credits, as defined in section 107.036 of the Revised Code, the following table provides an estimate of the amount of credits that may be authorized in each fiscal year of the 2026-2027 biennium, an estimate of the credits expected to be claimed in each fiscal year of that biennium, and an estimate of the amount of credits authorized that will remain outstanding at the end of that biennium. In totality, this table provides an estimate of the state revenue forgone due to business incentive tax credits in the 2026-2027 biennium and future bienniums. 1 2 3 4 5 6 A Biennial Business Incentive Tax Credit Estimates (All Figures in Thousands of Dollars) B Estimate of total value of tax credits authorized Estimate of tax credits issued/claimed Expected Out-standing Credits C Tax Credit FY 2026 FY 2027 FY 2026 FY 2027 End of Biennium D Job Creation $170,000 $175,000 $139,200 $145,000 $705,000 E Job Retention $0 $0 $15,300 $10,710 $23,000 F Historic Preservation $60,000 $60,000 $122,300 $86,100 $372,000 G Film $50,000 $50,000 $40,000 $35,000 $100,000 H Film and Theatre $25,000 $25,000 $15,000 $25,000 $70,000 I New Markets $10,000 $10,000 $7,500 $7,500 $46,000 J R&D Loan $0 $0 $0 $0 $5,000 K InvestOhio Program $5,000 $5,000 $3,750 $3,750 $7,500 L Ohio Rural Business Growth $0 $0 $18,750 $18,750 $7,500 M Ohio Opportunity Zone $25,000 $25,000 $25,000 $25,000 $0 N Transformational Mixed-Use Development $0 $0 $136,200 $110,600 $237,500 Section 757.60. The amendment by this act of division (I) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code and section 5747.39 of the Revised Code is intended to clarify the meaning of those sections as they existed before the effective date of this section and is not intended to change their meaning in any way. Section 757.70. (A) As used in this section, "qualified property" means property that satisfies the qualifications for tax exemption under section 5709.07 of the Revised Code, or any other section of the Revised Code that provides a tax exemption for property owned or used by a church, and that was acquired by a church which recorded the deed for the property between May 1, 2022, and May 31, 2022. (B) Notwithstanding sections 5713.08, 5713.081, and 5715.27 of the Revised Code, and without regard to any time or payment limitations under any section of the Revised Code, the owner of qualified property at any time within twelve months after the effective date of this section may file an application with the Tax Commissioner requesting that the qualified property be placed on the exempt list and that all unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest on the property be abated, including taxes, penalties, and interest that have become a lien prior to the date of acquisition of title to the property by the qualified property's owner. (C) The application shall be made on the form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner under section 5715.27 of the Revised Code and shall list the name of the county in which the property is located; the property's legal description, taxable value, and the amount, in dollars, of the unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest; the date of acquisition of title to the property; the use of the property during any time that the unpaid taxes accrued; and any other information required by the Commissioner. The county auditor shall supply the required information upon request of the applicant. (D) Upon request of the applicant, the county treasurer shall determine if all taxes, penalties, and interest that became a lien on the qualified property before it was first used by the property's owner or a prior owner for an exempt purpose have been paid in full. If so, the county treasurer shall issue a certificate to the applicant stating that all such taxes, penalties, and interest have been paid in full. The applicant shall attach the county treasurer's certificate to the application filed with the Tax Commissioner under this section. (E) Upon receipt of an application, the Tax Commissioner shall determine if the qualified property meets the qualifications set forth in this section and if so shall issue an order directing that the property be placed on the exempt list of the county in which it is located and that all unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest for each year that the property met the qualifications for exemption described in section 5709.07 or another section of the Revised Code be abated. If the Commissioner finds that the property is or previously was being used for a purpose that would disqualify it for such exemption, the Tax Commissioner shall issue an order denying the application with respect to such tax years where the Commissioner finds that disqualifying use. (F) If the Tax Commissioner finds that the property is not entitled to the tax exemption and abatement of unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest for any of the years for which the applicant claims an exemption or abatement, the Commissioner shall order the county treasurer of the county in which the property is located to collect all taxes, penalties, and interest on the property for those years as required by law. Section 757.80. (A) As used in this section, "qualified property" means real property that is owned by a municipal corporation or township and satisfies the qualifications for tax exemption under the terms of section 5709.08 of the Revised Code. (B) Notwithstanding sections 5713.08, 5713.081, and 5715.27 of the Revised Code, and without regard to any time or payment limitations under any section of the Revised Code, the owner of qualified property at any time within twelve months after the effective date of this section may file an application with the Tax Commissioner requesting that the qualified property be placed on the exempt list and that all unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest on the property be abated, including taxes, penalties, and interest that have become a lien prior to the date of acquisition of title to the property by the qualified property's owner. (C) The application shall be made on the form prescribed by the Tax Commissioner under section 5715.27 of the Revised Code and shall list the name of the county in which the property is located; the property's legal description, taxable value, and the amount, in dollars, of the unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest; the date of acquisition of title to the property; the use of the property during any time that the unpaid taxes accrued; and any other information required by the Commissioner. The county auditor shall supply the required information upon request of the applicant. (D) Upon request of the applicant, the county treasurer shall determine if all taxes, penalties, and interest that became a lien on the qualified property before it was first used by the property's owner or a prior owner for an exempt purpose have been paid in full. If so, the county treasurer shall issue a certificate to the applicant stating that all such taxes, penalties, and interest have been paid in full. The applicant shall attach the county treasurer's certificate to the application filed with the Tax Commissioner under this section. (E) Upon receipt of an application, the Tax Commissioner shall determine if the qualified property meets the qualifications set forth in this section and if so shall issue an order directing that the property be placed on the exempt list of the county in which it is located and that all unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest for each year that the property met the qualifications for exemption described in section 5709.08 or another section of the Revised Code be abated. If the Commissioner finds that the property is or previously was being used for a purpose that would disqualify it for such exemption, the Tax Commissioner shall issue an order denying the application with respect to such tax years where the Commissioner finds that disqualifying use. (F) If the Tax Commissioner finds that the property is not entitled to the tax exemption and abatement of unpaid taxes, penalties, and interest for any of the years for which the applicant claims an exemption or abatement, the Commissioner shall order the county treasurer of the county in which the property is located to collect all taxes, penalties, and interest on the property for those years as required by law. Section 757.90. (A)(1) The amendment by this act of division (A) of section 5715.19 of the Revised Code is intended to be a remedial measure and applies to original complaints filed on or after the effective date of this section. (2) The amendment by this act of division (B) of section 5715.19 of the Revised Code is intended to be a remedial measure and applies to tax year 2022 and after. (3) The amendment or enactment by this act of division (I) of section 5715.19 of the Revised Code applies to agreements entered into on or after the effective date of this section. (4) The enactment by this act of division (K) of section 5715.19 of the Revised Code applies to original complaints filed on or after the effective date of this section. (B) The amendment by this act of section 5717.01 of the Revised Code is intended to be a remedial measure and applies to any appeal taken from a decision of a board of revision rendered on or after July 21, 2022, except that the amendment of that section prohibiting an appeal by a third party complainant, as defined in section 5715.19 of the Revised Code, applies to any appeal taken from a board of revision decision rendered on or after the effective date of this section. Section 757.110. Notwithstanding section 5705.316 of the Revised Code, each county budget commission or, if applicable, joint budget commission, shall convene not later than October 31, 2025, to proceed as described in that section. At that meeting, the commission shall review the certification required for fiscal year 2025 under section 5705.36 of the Revised Code for each city, local, or exempted village school district in the county. If the carry-over balance in a district's general operating budget exceeds the applicable percentage of the district's general fund expenditures made in that fiscal year, the commission shall reduce the rate of, or the annual amount of money to be raised by, any or all of the current expense taxes levied by the district for tax year 2025 to the extent described in section 5705.316 of the Revised Code. A board may, by resolution certified to the commission on or before October 1, 2025, designate an amount of the district's carry-over balance as reserved for current or future permanent improvements expenditures, and the commission shall not consider the designated amount as described in that section. If such funds are not expended as designated within those three years, the commission shall consider them as a part of the carry-over balance in all subsequent years. This section does not apply to a school district to which section 5705.316 of the Revised Code does not apply. Section 757.120. (A) The Tax Commissioner shall not make adjustments in 2025 or 2026 to the income amounts in divisions (A)(2) and (3) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, as otherwise required by division (A)(5) of that section, or make adjustments in 2025 or 2026 to the personal exemption amounts prescribed in division (A) of section 5747.025 of the Revised Code, as otherwise required by divisions (B) and (C) of that section. (B) Notwithstanding any rule adopted pursuant to section 5747.06 of the Revised Code, the Tax Commissioner shall adjust the income tax withholding rate tables published pursuant to those rules to reflect all amendments to the income tax rates prescribed in section 5747.02 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, such that not more than one hundred million dollars in General Revenue Fund revenue is forgone in fiscal year 2026 and not more than two hundred fifteen million dollars in General Revenue Fund revenue is forgone in fiscal year 2027 as the result of such adjustments. Section 757.140. The owner of a tax credit certificate issued under section 122.852 of the Revised Code, as it existed prior to that section's repeal by this act, may claim the credit in the manner prescribed in that section and sections 5726.59, 5747.67, and 5751.55 of the Revised Code, as those sections existed prior to their repeal by this act. Section 757.150. (A) For the first year in which the property tax relief screening system established under section 5703.83 of the Revised Code is operational, notwithstanding division (C)(3) of section 323.153 or division (B)(2) of section 4503.066 of the Revised Code, no charges, penalties, or interest shall be imposed against a parcel of real property or a manufactured or mobile home based on a determination under the property tax relief screening system that the parcel or home received one or more reductions for which the parcel or home was not eligible, except if the county auditor determines that the parcel or home's reduction was procured through fraud, a false statement, or a knowing omission as described in divisions (D), (E), or (F) of section 323.153 or divisions (C), (D), or (E) of section 4503.066 of the Revised Code. The county auditor and county treasurer shall disqualify such ineligible parcels and homes from receiving the reduction or reductions beginning with the tax year in which the county auditor makes a final determination that the parcel or home is not eligible for such reduction or reductions. (B) A county treasurer shall ensure that any tax bill issued under section 323.13 or 4503.06 of the Revised Code in that year for a parcel receiving the reduction in taxes authorized under division (A) or (B) of section 323.152 or section 4503.065 of the Revised Code, as applicable to the parcel, clearly informs the owner of the eligibility requirements for that applicable reduction and notifies the owner of the one-year amnesty for self-reporting improper receipt of the reduction provided under division (A) of this section. Section 757.160. Notwithstanding division (B)(3) of section 323.152 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, if a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution under that section on or before October 31, 2025, the partial exemption shall first apply, in the case of real property taxes, to tax year 2025 or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, to tax year 2026. Section 757.170. Notwithstanding section 319.304 of the Revised Code, as enacted by this act, if a board of county commissioners adopts a resolution under that section on or before October 31, 2025, the reduction shall first apply, in the case of real property taxes, to tax year 2025 or, in the case of manufactured home taxes, to tax year 2026. Section 759.10. The Director of Veterans Services shall investigate potential sites for the construction of a state veterans home in or near the Columbus metropolitan area and issue a report on the Director's findings to the General Assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the Revised Code and to the Governor no later than September 30, 2026. The report shall include an evaluation of all relevant grant approval criteria for priority-one grant funding under the State Veterans Home Construction Grant Program operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and authorized under 38 U.S.C. 8131 to 8137 and regulated under 38 C.F.R. part 59. The report also shall include an estimate of the state's share of facility construction and land acquisition costs under the grant program for each site. Section 801.10. Section 4141.29 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, applies to valid applications for determination of benefit rights filed on or after the effective date of this section. Section 801.20. (A) The amendment by this act of division (A)(18) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code is intended to clarify the meaning of that division as it existed before the effective date of this section and is not intended to change its meaning in any way. (B) The amendment by this act of division (S)(14) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 2025. (C) The amendment by this act of divisions (A)(21) and (31) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years ending on or after the effective date of this section. (D) The enactment by this act of division (A)(44) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code applies contributions described in that division made on and after the effective date of this section. Section 801.40. The amendment by this act of section 5747.09 and division (C) of section 5747.43 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025. Section 801.60. The repeal and reenactment by this act of section 3780.22 of the Revised Code applies on and after July 1, 2025. Section 801.70. The amendment by this act of sections 5748.02, 5748.021, 5748.04, 5748.08, and 5748.09 of the Revised Code involving notice to the tax commissioner applies to resolutions adopted under sections 5748.02, 5748.021, 5748.08, and 5748.09 and petitions filed under section 5748.04 of the Revised Code on or after the effective date of those amendments. Section 801.90. The amendment by this act of division (B) of section 5747.43 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026. Section 801.100. The amendment by this act of sections 5747.021, 5748.01, 5748.02, 5748.021, 5748.03, 5748.04, 5748.08, 5748.081, and 5748.09 of the Revised Code involving eliminating school district income taxes on estates applies to any school district income tax, as defined in section 5748.01 of the Revised Code, in effect, levied, or renewed on or after January 1, 2026. The amendments do not invalidate or modify any portions of a properly enacted tax in effect on that date, other than those applicable to estates. For any school district income tax in effect on that date, the school district is not required to adopt a new resolution or obtain voter approval for the tax in order to effectuate those amendments. Section 801.110. The amendment by this act of section 3734.904 of the Revised Code takes effect on January 1, 2026. Section 801.120. The amendment by this act of every portion except the changes to the withholding rate under sections 5747.062, 5747.063, and 5747.064 and sections 718.031, 3123.89, 3123.90, 3770.071, 3770.072, 3770.073, 3770.10, 3770.25, and 3775.16 of the Revised Code and the enactment by this act of sections 3770.074 and 3770.075 of the Revised Code apply to amounts deducted and withheld on or after January 1, 2026. Section 801.130. The amendment by this act of section 5747.071 of the Revised Code applies to withholding requests made under that section on or after January 1, 2027. Section 801.150. The enactment by this act of section 5747.073 of the Revised Code applies to income tax withholding returns, reports, or payments filed or remitted on or after January 1, 2026. Section 801.160. The amendment by this act of section 5739.07 of the Revised Code applies to refunds made pursuant to applications that are filed on or after the effective date of this section. Section 801.170. The amendment by this act of section 5739.132 of the Revised Code applies to refunds allowed on and after the effective date of that amendment. Section 801.180. The amendment by this act of section 5747.38 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years ending on or after January 1, 2025. Section 801.190. The amendment by this act of section 718.01 of the Revised Code applies to taxable years ending on or after the effective date of this section. Section 801.210. The amendment by this act of division (A)(1) of section 5749.02 of the Revised Code applies to calendar quarters ending on or after the effective date of this section. Section 801.220. The amendment by this act of section 3735.67 of the Revised Code applies to all agreements entered into under section 3735.671 of the Revised Code on or after January 1, 2025. The amendment by this act of section 3735.671 of the Revised Code applies to agreements entered into under that section before, on, or after the effective date of this section. Section 801.240. The amendment by this act of division (B)(1) of section 5739.12 of the Revised Code applies to returns required to be filed on and after January 1, 2026. Section 801.260. The amendment by this act of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, except division (B)(13) of that section, applies on and after January 1, 2026. Section 801.270. The amendment by this act of division (B)(8) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code applies on and after January 1, 2026. Section 801.280. The amendment by this act of division (E)(1) of section 319.301 of the Revised Code applies to tax years beginning on or after the effective date of this section. Section 801.310. (A) Except as otherwise provided in Sections 801.70 and 801.100 of this act, the amendment by this act of sections 133.18, 306.32, 306.322, 345.01, 345.03, 345.04, 505.37, 505.48, 505.481, 511.28, 511.34, 513.18, 755.181, 1545.041, 1545.21, 1711.30, 3311.50, 3318.01, 3318.06, 3318.061, 3318.062, 3318.063, 3318.361, 3318.45, 3381.03, 4582.024, 4582.26, 5705.01, 5705.03, 5705.17, 5705.21, 5705.212, 5705.213, 5705.215, 5705.217, 5705.218, 5705.219, 5705.2111, 5705.2114, 5705.233, 5705.25, 5705.251, 5705.261, 5705.55, 5748.01, 5748.02, 5748.03, 5748.08, and 5748.09 of the Revised Code applies to elections held on or after January 1, 2026, except as otherwise provided in those amendments. (B) As used in this division, "former section 5705.192 of the Revised Code" means section 5705.192 of the Revised Code as it existed before the effective date of its repeal by this act. If a taxing authority, as defined in former section 5705.192 of the Revised Code, acts under that section prior to its repeal by this act to replace an existing levy and submit the question to electors at an election held before January 1, 2026, then a board of elections shall proceed to submit that question in accordance with that former section, notwithstanding the effective date of its repeal by this act. No replacement of a tax proposed under former section 5705.192 of the Revised Code shall be submitted to electors at an election held on or after January 1, 2026. Section 801.320. The amendment or enactment by this act of sections 307.696, 307.697, 4301.421, 5743.024, 5743.323, 5743.511, 5743.621, and 5743.631 of the Revised Code applies to any proceedings commenced after the effective date of this section, and, so far as their provisions support the actions taken, also apply to proceedings that on that effective date are pending, in progress, or completed, notwithstanding the applicable law previously in effect or any provision to the contrary in a prior resolution, ordinance, order, advertisement, notice, or other proceeding. Any proceedings pending or in progress on that effective date of that amendment or enactment shall be deemed to have been taken in conformity with the amendment or enactment. Section 801.330. The amendment by this act of division (A)(43) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code is remedial in nature and applies to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, including any petition for reassessment or appeal thereof pending on or after the effective date of this section. A taxpayer who previously added amounts under division (A)(43) of section 5747.01 of the Revised Code, as that division existed before the effective date of this section, may file an amended return to revise the addition consistent with the amendment by this act. Such amended returns must be filed within one year after the effective date of this section. Section 801.340. The amendment by this act of sections 718.05 and 718.85 of the Revised Code applies to returns required to be filed on or after January 1, 2026. Section 801.350. The amendment by this act of division (L) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code applies beginning the first day of the first month after the effective date of this section. Section 801.360. The amendment by this act of section 3307.27 of the Revised Code applies to an employment contract with a superintendent or principal under section 3319.08 of the Revised Code entered into on and after the effective date of this section. The amendment by this act of section 3309.47 of the Revised Code applies to an employment contract with a treasurer under section 3313.22 of the Revised Code entered into on and after the effective date of this section. Section 805.10. SEVERABILITY The items of law contained in this act, and their applications, are severable. If any item of law contained in this act, or if any application of any item of law contained in this act, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other items of law contained in this act and their applications that can be given effect without the invalid item of law or application. Section 810.10. NO EFFECT AFTER END OF BIENNIUM An item of law, other than an amending, enacting, or repealing clause, that composes the whole or part of an uncodified section contained in this act has no effect after June 30, 2027, unless its context clearly indicates otherwise. Section 820.10. Sections of this act prefixed with numbers in the 200s, 300s, 400s, and 500s of this act are exempt from the referendum under Ohio Constitution, Article II, Section 1d, and therefore take immediate effect when this act becomes law. Section 820.20. The amendment, enactment, or repeal by this act of the sections listed below is exempt from the referendum under Ohio Constitution, Article II, section 1d and section 1.471 of the Revised Code and therefore takes effect immediately when this act becomes law or, if a later effective date is specified below, on that date. Sections 131.51, 3302.03, 3319.51, 3780.02, 3780.03, 3780.10, 3780.18, 3780.19, 3780.22, 3780.23, 3780.26, 3780.30, 4743.05, 4927.01, 4927.22, 5119.211, 5124.15, 5709.93, and 5751.02 of the Revised Code. Section 820.30. SUBJECT TO REFERENDUM Except as otherwise provided in this act, the amendment, enactment, or repeal by this act of a section is subject to the referendum under Ohio Constitution, Article II, section 1c and therefore takes effect on the ninety-first day after this act is filed with the Secretary of State or, if a later effective date is specified below, on that date. Section 820.70. Section 1547.54 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, takes effect January 1, 2027. Section 820.80. Sections 127.13, 4505.09, and 4519.59 of the Revised Code as amended by this act take effect on January 1, 2026. Section 820.90. Section 2303.201 of the Revised Code as amended by this act takes effect six months after the effective date of this section. Section 820.100. Sections 3305.05 and 3305.053 of the Revised Code, as amended by this act, take effect one year after the effective date of this section. Section 820.110. Sections 107.032 to 107.034 of the Revised Code, as amended or enacted by Section 101.01 of this act, take effect July 1, 2026. Section 820.120. The enactment by this act of sections 3313.902, 3314.38, and 3345.86 of the Revised Code takes effect July 1, 2026. Section 820.130. Section 117.56 of the Revised Code as presented in this act takes effect on the later of October 1, 2025, or the effective date of this section. October 1, 2025, is the effective date of the enactment of that section by H.B. 54 of the 136th General Assembly. Section 830.10. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 123.28 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 64 and H.B. 141 of the 131st General Assembly. Section 124.385 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 1 and H.B. 16 of the 128th General Assembly. Section 149.43 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 265, H.B. 315, S.B. 29, and S.B. 109, all of the 135th General Assembly. Section 173.38 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 110 and S.B. 217 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 173.381 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 110 and S.B. 217 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 323.152 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 33 and S.B. 43 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 505.37 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 315 and H.B. 496 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 2925.14 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 29 and S.B. 95 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 2929.12 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 234 and H.B. 531 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 2929.15 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 110, H.B. 281, and S.B. 288, all of the 134th General Assembly. Section 2967.18 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 180 and H.B. 445 of the 121st General Assembly. Section 3302.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both S.B. 104 and S.B. 168 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, H.B. 214, H.B. 250, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, all of the 135th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, H.B. 47, H.B. 214, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, all of the 135th General Assembly. Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both S.B. 208 and S.B. 234 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 3517.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 166 and S.B. 107 of the 133rd General Assembly. Section 3701.79 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 281 and S.B. 157 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 4141.29 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 49 and H.B. 158 of the 132nd General Assembly. Section 4501.21 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 315 and S.B. 163 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 4517.01 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 33 and H.B. 195 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 4725.48 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 509 and S.B. 131 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 4731.22 of the Revised Code as amended by both S.B. 95 and S.B. 109 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 4751.20 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 509 and S.B. 131 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 5101.35 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 33 and S.B. 21 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 5117.07 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 283 and S.B. 3 of the 123rd General Assembly. Section 5122.03 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 281 and S.B. 2 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 5122.15 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 7 and H.B. 281 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 5123.169 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 263 of the 133rd General Assembly and S.B. 3 of the 134th General Assembly. Section 5123.41 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 158 and H.B. 483 of the 131st General Assembly. Section 5123.42 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 158 and H.B. 483 of the 131st General Assembly. Section 5739.01 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 315 and S.B. 196 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 5739.31 of the Revised Code as amended by both S.B. 143 and S.B. 200 of the 124th General Assembly. Section 5747.01 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 101 and S.B. 154 of the 135th General Assembly. Section 6111.04 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 49 and S.B. 2 of the 132nd General Assembly. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________